label	text0	text1
1	histochemical and autoradiographic studies on the effects of aging on the mucopolysacharides of the periosteum	Histochemical and autoradiographic studies on the effects of aging on periosteal mucopolysacharides.
1	the relationship to age and cerebral vascular accidents of fibrin and fibrinolytic activity	The relationship with age and strokes of l' fibrinolytic and fibrinolytic activity.
1	effects of perceptual training at three age levels	Three-level effects of perceptual training; age.
1	sociocultural aspects of aging medical points of view	Socio-cultural medical aspects of the aging process.
1	the cellular complement of the skeletal system studied autoradiographically with tritiated thymidine h3tdr during growth and aging	Autoradiographically, the cell complement of the skeletal system was studied with tritiated thymidine h3tdr during growth and aging.
1	biochemistry of aging	Biochemistry of aging?
1	age changes in adenine nucleotides in flight muscle of male house fly	Changes in the age of the nucleotides of adenine in the flight muscle of the male housefly.
1	following response initiation in ducklings age and sensory stimulation	After implantation; initiation of response in ducklings at birth; age and sensory stimulation.
1	analysis of the experimental lesion of connective tissue produced by a complex of c polysaccharide from group a streptococci ii influence of age and hypersensitivity	L' analysis of the experimental connective tissue lesion produced by a c-saccharide complex of the a streptococci group (ii) influences age and age; hypersensitivity.
1	age and susceptibility of mice to coxsackie a viruses	Age and Sensitivity of mice to Coxsackie Viruses a.
1	experimental transmission of influenza virus infection in mice ii some factors affecting the incidence of transmitted infection	Experimental transmission of apo; influenza infection in mice ii certain factors affecting apo; incidence of apo; transmitted infection.
1	galactose metabolism by rat liver tissue influence of age	Galactose metabolism by rat liver tissue is associated with age.
1	the microscopical appearances of human peripheral arteries during growth and aging	The microscopic appearance of the human peripheral arteries during growth and aging.
1	the controversial and dynamic ovary	L' ovary controversial and dynamic.
1	the fate of mitochondria during aging in tetrahymena pyriformis	The fate of mitochondria during age in the tetrahymena pyriformis.
1	age of weaning in two subspecies of deer mice	L' weaning age in two under-species of deer mice.
1	compact bone in chinese and japanese	Bone compact in Chinese and Japanese.
1	skeletal age in subjects with mental retardation	Skeletal age in individuals with dementia; mental retardation.
1	enzyme changes in flight muscle correlated with aging and flight ability in the male housefly	The enzymatic changes in flight muscle are related to aging and flight ability in male houseflies.
1	mitotic rates of rat epidermis during growth maturity senility and regeneration	Mitotic rate of apo; rat epidermis during senescence and regeneration at maturity.
1	an electron microscope study of mature and differentiating paneth cells in the rat especially of their endoplasmic reticulum and lysosomes	An electron microscopic study of mature and differentiating rat paneth cells, particularly their endoplasmic reticulum and lysosomes.
1	the pathogenesis of herpes virus encephalitis ii a cellular basis for the development of resistance with age	The pathogenesis of apos; viral encephalitis; herpes simplex virus; herpes ii a cell base for the development of resistance with apos; age.
1	aromatic induced prevention of fetal toxicity of 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene	Aromatic induction of 7,12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene in the prevention of fetal toxicity.
1	communication in illness the relationship of national origin to symptoms and diagnosis	Communication in disease of relationship; national origin with symptoms and diagnosis.
1	redundancy and biological aging	Redundancy and biological aging.
1	the effect of age on normal values of the westergen sedimentation rate	L' effect of age on normal Westergen sedimentation rate values.
1	peptic ulcer in assam	Gastric ulcer in the apos; assam?
1	induced protection of adrenal cortex against 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene influence of ethionine induction of menadione reductase incorporation of thymidine h3	Induced protection of the adrenal cortex against 7,12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene influences lidos; induction by lidos; ethionine from lidos; incorporation of menadione reductase from thymidine h3.
1	nutrition onset of disease and longevity in the rat	Nutrition This is the onset of disease and longevity in the rat.
1	colonization of the mouse intestine with escherichia coli	Colonization of the mouse's intestine by escherichia coli.
1	surgical treatment of tumours of the eyelids	Surgical treatment of eyelid tumors.
1	age variations in cortical membranes of rotifers	D&apos variations; age in rotifer cortical membranes.
1	changes in sphingosine and fatty acid components of the gangliosides in developing rat and human brain	Modifications to sphingosine and fatty acids of gangliosides in the brain of developing rats and humans.
1	activity of peptidase in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence	L' peptidase activity in tobacco leaf tissue related to leaf senescence.
1	blood viscosity in healthy subjects and patients with coronary heart disease	Blood viscosity in healthy subjects and coronary heart disease patients.
1	the influence of endotoxin administration on the nutritional requirements of mice	L' influence of apos; administration of endotoxins on the nutritional needs of mice.
1	weaning of young rats effect of time on behavior	The effect of time on the behaviour of the weaning of young rats is a function of time.
1	free ranging rhesus monkeys age and sex differences in individual activity patterns	Free rhesus monkeys differ according to age and sex in the individual activity profiles.
1	some characteristics of persons hospitalized in saskatchewan because of heart disease involving the coronary arteries	Certain characteristics of people hospitalized in Saskatchewan due to heart disease affecting the coronary arteries.
1	the geographic pathology of coronary atherosclerosis	Geographical disease of coronary atherosclerosis.
1	relationship of donor age to in vitro production of foot and mouth disease virus by mouse kidney cells	Relationship between donor age and in vitro production of the FMD virus by mouse kidney cells.
1	estimation of the low density beta lipoproteins of serum in health and disease using large molecular weight dextran sulphate	Estimation of healthy and diseased low-density beta lipoproteins; aid from the high molecular weight dextran sulfate.
1	visually evoked potentials amplitude changes with age	Changes in the amplitude of visually evoked potentials were observed with age.
1	lentigo maligna and malignant melanoma	Uh, lengo maligna and malignant melanoma.
1	electroretinogram in newborn human infants	Electroetinogram (Electroetinogram) in the new human-born @-@.
1	host parasite relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in iran 1 effect of the age of b truncatus on the development of s haematobium	The host-relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in Iran 1 influences l' age of b truncatus influences development of l' hematobium s.
1	rash associated with coxsackie a9 infection	Skin rashes associated with Coxsackie A9 infection.
1	clinical management of acute myocardial infarction	Clinical management of apos; acute myocardial infarction.
1	ontogeny of the immune response ii correlations between the development of the afferent and efferent limbs	L' ontogeny of the immune response ii correlations between efferent and afferent limb development ii.
1	metabolism of propionate by sheep liver interrelations of propionate and glutamate in aged mitochondria	Metabolism of propionate by the liver of sheep in the interrelationship of propionate and glutamate in aged mitochondria.
1	incidence and origin of non systemic microdeposits of amyloid	Incidence and origin of non-systemic amyloid deposits.
1	possibility of normokalaemic primary aldosteronism as reflected in the frequency of adrenal cortical adenomas	The occurrence of adrenal cortical adenomas reflects the possibility of normokalaemic primary aldosteronism.
1	age personality and somatosensory cerebral evoked responses	The personality of the age and the somatosensory brain elicited responses.
1	the relationship of diabetes mellitus and body weight to osteoporosis in elderly females	Relationship between diabetes mellitus and body weight and osteoporosis in older women.
1	decreased susceptibility to the mammary tumour agent in mice with advancing age	Decreased susceptibility to cancer; mammary tumorigenic agent in mice as they age.
1	surgical timing in biliary tract disease	Surgical chronology of biliary tract diseases.
1	studies of male survivors of myocardial infarction ix mortality experience and insurability	Studies with survivors of myocardial infarction; experience with mortality and insurable status.
1	perforated peptic ulcer	Perforated peptic ulcer.
1	epidemiology of head injuries in children a pilot study	Epidemiology of Head Injury in Children, pilot study.
1	activity of aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence and to the action of 6 furfurylaminopurine	Ribonucleic synthetases; aminoacyl in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence and l' action of 6 furfurylaminopurine.
1	development of immune tolerance in the chick embryo to borrelia hispanica	Development of the immune tolerance of the chicken embryo to borrelia hispanica.
1	gonadotrophin releasing activity of the median eminence at different ages	L' l&apos gonadotropin release activity; median eminence at different ages.
1	oxygen consumption during pouch development of the macropod marsupial setonix brachyurus	Consumption of apos; oxygen during marsupial setonix brachyurus macropod development.
1	dealkylation and loss of capacity for reactivation of cholinesterase inhibited by sarin	Dealkylation and loss of sarin-inhibited cholinesterase reactivation ability.
1	fat metabolism in higher plants xxxiv development of fatty acid synthetase as a function of protein synthesis in aging potato tuber slices	Fat metabolism in higher plants xxxiv fatty acid synthetase development as a function of protein synthesis in aging tuber slices.
1	noncollagenous nature of the proteins of shark enamel	Non-collagenic nature of shark enamel proteins.
1	effect of hypophysectomy and replacement therapy on fatty acid metabolism in the rat testis	Effect of hypophysectomy and replacement therapy on rat testis fatty acid metabolism.
1	changes in hepatic lipigenesis during development of the rat	Changes in hepatic lipigenesis during rat development.
1	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate enzymes in the mosquito during growth and aging	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate enzymes in mosquitoes during growth and aging.
1	serum triglyceride method of estimation and levels in normal humans	Procedure; Estimation of serum triglycerides and concentrations in normal humans.
1	modern concepts in the management of emphysema in the aged and infirm	Modern Concepts of Management of Apos; Emphysema in the Elderly and Disabled.
1	patterns of water ash and organic matter changes in senescence	Models of changes in ashes from water and organic matter during senescence.
1	high level health for the elderly	High-level health care for the elderly.
1	metabolism of propionate by sheep liver pathway of propionate metabolism in aged homogenate and mitochondria	Hepatic Sheep Propionate Metabolism Propionate metabolism in the aged homogenate and mitochondria.
1	the effect of platelet age on platelet adherence to collagen	Lapos; effect of apos; platelet age on plaque; platelet adhesion to collagen.
1	the phospholipid composition of embryonic chick liver microsomes	The phospholipid composition of microsomes from chick liver.
1	phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and pyruvate carboxylase in developing rat liver	Phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and pyruvate carboxylase in developing rat liver.
1	development of uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity in cultures of chick embryo liver	The development of l' activity of l' uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase in cultures of liver; chick embryos.
1	lipid composition of the vascular system during infancy childhood and young adulthood	Lipid composition of the vascular system during childhood and early adulthood.
1	the release of a bradykinin like pulmonary vasodilator substance in foetal and new born lambs	Release of apos; bradykinin as a pulmonary vasodilator substance in fetal lambs and new @-@born.
1	changes in the fatty acid composition of cerebrosides and sulfatides of human nervous tissue with age	Changes in the fatty acid composition of human nerve tissue cerebroside and sulfatids with age.
1	oxygen poisoning in drosophila	Drosophila toxin; O2 in Drosophila.
1	mice fighting by neonatally androgenized females	Mice fighting with androgenized female in vitro.
1	shift with age in steady state concentrations of androstenedione and testosterone in incubations of guinea pig testis	In the incubation of testes of guinea pigs, the concentrations of androstenedione and testosterone change with the age of the testes; the state of the testes; equilibrium.
1	hypnotic age regression and magnitudes of the ponzo and poggendorff illusions	The hypnotic regression of age and sex, the extent of the illusions ponzo and poggendorff.
1	diurnal variation of oral glucose tolerance a possible pointer to the evolution of diabetes mellitus	The diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance may also be an indication of the development of diabetes mellitus.
1	structure and significance of metaplastic nodules in the rectal mucosa	Structure and importance of metaplastic nodules in rectal mucosa.
1	osteoporosis of lumbar vertebrae and calcification of abdominal aorta in women living in durban	Osteoporosis of the lumbar vertebrae and calcification of the abdominal aorta in durban women.
1	ontogeny of soluble and mitochondrial tyrosine aminotransferases	Ontogeny of soluble and mitochondrial tyrosine aminotransferases.
1	release of free fatty acids and loss of hill activity by aging spinach chloroplasts	D'apos release; free fatty acids and loss of apos; activity on the hills by chloroplasts d'apos; aging spinach.
1	effect of oestradiol 3 benzoate on the concentrations of retinal and lipids in cod plasma	Effect of benzoate d'apos; estradiol 3 on retinal and lipid levels in cod plasma.
1	the lipid composition of rat brain myelin and subcellular fractions during development	Lipid composition of rat cerebral myelin and subcellular fractions during development.
1	the localization of proteolytic activity in rat liver mitochondria and its relation to mitochondrial swelling and aging	Localization of l' proteolytic activity in rat liver mitochondria and its relation to mitochondrial aging and swelling.
1	aging and cancerogenesis iv interrelationships among age immune response and tumor incidence in several strains of mice	Cancer and aging iv interrelationships between immune response by age and age; incidence of tumours in several strains of mice.
1	neoplasms occurring in aged fischer rats with special reference to testicular uterine and thyroid tumors	Neoplasms occurring in older Fischer rats, especially testis and thyroid tumours.
1	effect of ovariectomy at different ages on development of mammary tumors in c3h x r3 f1 mice	Effect of ovariectomy on breast tumour development in c3h x r3 f1 mice at different ages.
1	studies on the chromatin of barley leaves during senescence	Studies on leaf chromatin in barley during senescence.
1	the cryptic nature of hepatic microsomal sulphite oxidase	Cryptic nature of hepatic microsomal sulfite oxidase oxidase.
1	effect of second leaf removal or kinetin treatment on the nucleic acid metabolism of senescing first seedling leaf of barley	Effect of apo; removal of second leaf or kinetin treatment on nucleic acid metabolism of first senescent leaf of seedling; barley.
1	lipofuscin aging pigment granules of the newborn human liver	The aging lipofuscin pigment granules of new-born human liver.
1	a maturity time representation for cell populations	Representation of the date of maturity of cell populations.
1	heterogeneity of rough surfaced liver microsomal membranes of adult phenobarbital treated and newborn rats	Heterogeneity of rough hepatic microsomal membranes from newly born and phenobarbital-treated adult rats.
1	properties of heparan sulphate and chondroitin sulphate from young and old human aortae	The properties of d&apos sulfate; heparan and chondroitin sulfate in young and old human aortae.
1	bone matrix turnover and balance in vitro ii the effects of aging	Rotation of bone matrix and in vitro balance ii effects of aging.
1	calcium transport by skeletal muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum in the hypothyroid rat	Calcium transport by the hypothyroid rat skeletal muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum.
1	gastric antigens in health and disease behaviour in early development senescence metaplasia and cancer	Gastric antigens in health and disease behaviour in the early development of metastatic senescence and cancer.
1	mammary cancer induction by 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene relation to age	Induction of breast cancer by 712 dimethylbenz an anthracene relationship with age.
1	aging of alpha crystallins during development of the lens	Ageing of the alpha crystals during lens development.
1	the effect of age on protein synthesis in mouse liver	Lapos; effect of apos; age on protein synthesis in mouse liver.
1	clinical trial of emepronium bromide in nocturnal frequency of old age	A clinical trial of d*apos bromide; omeponium at the age-old night frequency.
1	changes in certain kinetic properties of hepatic microsomal aniline hydroxylase and ethylmorphine demethylase associated with postnatal development and maturation in male rats	Changes in some kinetic properties of hepatic microsomal aniline hydroxylase and l' ethylmorphine demethylase associated with postnatal development and maturation in male rats.
1	phospholipases in arterial tissue iv the role of phosphatide acyl hydrolase lysophosphatide acyl hydrolase and sphingomyelin choline phosphohydrolase in the regulation of phospholipid composition in the normal human aorta with age	Phospholipases in arterial tissue iv the role of phosphatide acyl hydrolase lysophosphatide acyl hydrolase and sphingomyelin choline phosphohydrolase in the regulation of phospholipid composition in the apos; human aorta normal with the apos; age.
1	alteration in microsomal protein synthesis during early development of mouse brain	L' alteration of synthesis of microsomal proteins in early development of mouse brain.
1	inhibition of humab brain pyruvate kinase and hexokinase by phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate possible relevance to phenylketonuric brain damage	Apos; pyruvate kinase and apos inhibition; apos brain hexokinase; humab by phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate may be related to the phenylketonuric brain lesions.
1	inhibition of hydroid aging in campanularia flexuosa	L' inhibition of hydroid aging by campanularia flexuosa.
1	ontogeny of adrenergic arousal and cholinergic inhibitory mechanisms in the rat	The ontogeny of the rat cholinergic inhibitors and the apos; adrenergic awakening.
1	ozone and vitamin e	Ozone and vitamin e.
1	soluble sulfatase in growing bone of rats	Sulfatase that is soluble in the bones of growing rats.
1	the ribosomes of pear fruit their synthesis during the climacteric and the age related compensatory response to ionizing radiation	The pear ribosomes are synthesized during the climacterial and compensatory reaction process related to the apos; age of ionizing radiation.
1	glycolytic control of respiration during aging of carrot root tissue	Glycolytic control of respiration during aging of root tissue of the core.
1	energy linked reactions in photosynthetic bacteria v relation of the light induced proton uptake to photophosphorylation in r rubrum chromatophores	Photosynthetic responses; energy in photosynthetic bacteria v relationship of pH; light-induced proton absorption upon photophosphorylation in rubrum chromatophores.
1	the prevalence of carbon 13 in respiratory carbon dioxide as an indicator of the types of endogenous substrate the change from lipid to carbohydrate during the respiratory rise in potato slices	The prevalence of carbon-13 in respiratory carbon dioxide as an indicator of endogenous substrate types lipid to carbohydrate transition during potato slices; respiratory increase.
1	hyperphenylalaninemia disaggregation of brain polyribosomes in young rats	Neurology: Hyperphenylalaninemia désaggregation of brain polyribosomes in young rats.
1	hormonal effects on ontogeny of swimming ability in the rat assessment of central nervous system development	Hormonal effects on the body; ontogeny of swimming ability in the body; evaluation of central nervous system development in rats.
1	cataracts produced in rats by yogurt	Cataracts produced by yogurt in rats.
1	decrease in ventilatory capacity between ages of 50 and 54 in representative sample of swedish men	Decreased ventilatory capacity between 50 and 54 years in a representative sample of Swedish men.
1	the influence of age on the xylose absorption test	L' influence of age; age on glucose test; xylose absorption.
1	improvement of learning in the aged by modification of autonomic nervous system activity	Improvement of the skills; learning in the elderly through modification of the skills; autonomous nervous system activity.
1	sensitivity of synchronized chinese hamster cells to ultraviolet light	The sensitivity of Chinese hamster synchronized cells to ultraviolet light.
1	in vitro protein synthesis and aging in rhizoctania solani	The synthesis of proteins in vitro and aging in rhizoctania solani.
1	association of inorganic pyrophosphatase activity with normal calcification of rat costal cartilage in vivo	L' association of l' activity of inorganic pyrophosphatase with normal calcification of rat costal cartilage in vivo.
1	developmental variation in the isoenzymes of human liver and gastric alchhol dehydrogenase	Variation in the development of human liver and liver isoenzymes; gastric alchhol dehydrogenase.
1	repression of interferon action induced dedifferentiation of embryonic cells	Interferon induces dedifferentiation of embryonic cells.
1	eye lens color formation and function	Lens color and function in the eyes.
1	dihydrotestosterone in prostatic hypertrophy i the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic prostate of man	Dihydrotestosterone in the prostatic hypertrophy; the formation and the content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic prostate of the apos; man.
1	dihydrotestosterone in prostatic hypertrophy ii the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic canine prostate and the effect of dihydrotestosterone on prostate growth in the dog	Dihydrotestosterone in apos; prostate hypertrophy ii, dihydrotestosterone formation and content in hypertrophic canine prostate and l' effect of dihydrotestosterone on prostate growth in dogs.
1	changes in the concentration of high affinity oestradiol receptor in rat uterine supernatant preparations during the oestrous ycle pseudopregnancy pregnancy maturation and after ovariectomy	Changes in receptor concentration of high-affinity estradiol in rat uterine supernatant preparations during pregnancy maturation of estrous and post ovariectomy pseudo-pregnancy.
1	age associated changes in the dna of mouse tissue	Changes associated with apo; apo age; mouse tissue DNA.
1	neuronal perikarya and astroglia of rat brain chemical composition during myelination	Pericarya and neuronal astroglies of rat brain chemical composition during the myelination.
1	effects of long term administration of estrogen on the occurrence of mammary cancer in women	Effects of apo; long-term administration of estrogen on breast cancer incidence in women.
1	control of ribonuclease and acid phosphatase by auxin and abscisic acid during senescence of rhoeo leaf sections	Control of ribonuclease and acid phosphatase by apos; auxin and apos; abscisic acid during senescence of leaf sections of rhoeo.
1	composition of cellular membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig 3 enzymatic activities	Composition of cellular membranes in the pancreas of guinea pig enzyme 3 activities.
1	further studies on the effect of ageing on beta adrenoceptor activity of rat aorta	D' other studies on osteoarthritis; effect of aging on osteoarthritis; beta activity-osteoceptors; rat aorta were performed.
1	residues of total mercury and methylmercuric salts in lake trout as a function of age	Total mercury and methylmercury salt residues in lake trout as a function of age.
1	intelligence and blood pressure in the aged	Sensitivity and blood pressure in older adults.
1	heart rate and haemodynamics after autonomic blockade in infants and children	Cardiac and hemodynamic frequencies following autonomic blockade in infants and in children.
1	regression of valvular pulmonary stenosis	Regression of pulmonary valvular stenosis.
1	cytomorphometry of developing rat liver and its application to enzymic differentiation	Cytomorphometry of developing rat liver and its application to enzyme differentiation.
1	degenerative changes in the mitochondria of flight muscle from aging blowflies	Degenerative changes in flight muscle mitochondria of aging flies.
1	chemical change and energy output during muscular contraction	Chemical change and production of drugs; energy during muscle contraction.
1	age changes in cross striated muscle of the rat	Apos changes; age in rat crossed striated muscle.
1	selective loss of adipose cell responsiveness to glucagon with growth in the rat	Selective loss of the reactivity of fat cells to glucagon with growth in the rat.
1	three forms of cytochrome b 559 and their relation to the photosynthetic activity of chloroplasts	Three forms of cytochrome b 559 and their relationship to etapos; photosynthetic activity of chloroplasts.
1	the toxicity of organophosphorus compounds to mammals	Mammalian toxicity of organophosphates.
1	granular cell myoblastoma an electron microscopic and cytochemical study illustrating the genesis of granules and aging of myoblastoma cells	Granular cell myoblastoma: cytochemical and electron microscopic study illustrating granule genesis and aging of myoblastoma cells.
1	physiological fatty liver and hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig chemical and ultrastructural characterization	Chemical and ultrastructural characterization of foie gras and lapos; hyperlipidemia of the fetal guinea pig.
1	hmg coa reductase of intestinal mucosa and liver of the rat	Hmg reductase of the rat intestinal mucosa and liver.
1	decreased rna polymerase activity in mammalian zinc deficiency	Reduction of zinc deficiency; rna polymerase activity in mammalian zinc deficiency.
1	the dynamics of life aging	Dynamics of life aging.
1	a method for estimating the number of motor units in thenar muscles and the changes in motor unit count with ageing	Method used; Estimation of number of motor units in the thenarian muscles and changes in the number of motor units with aging.
1	physiological changes in ageing muscles	Physiological changes in aging muscles.
1	some properties of the uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity synthesizing thio beta d glucuronides	Some properties of uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase synthesizing thio beta glucuronides.
1	uptake of orotate and thymidine by normal and regenerating rat livers	Capture of orotate and thymidine by livers from normal and regenerating rats.
1	increased liver l serine pyruvate aminotransferase activity under gluconeogenic conditions	Increased hepatic serine serine aminotransferase activity under gluconeogenic conditions.
1	age changes in the neuronal microenvironment	Changes in age in neural microenvironment.
1	regular decline in physical working capacity with age	Regular decrease in physical capacity with age.
1	reversed development and cellular aging in an insect	Reversing cellular aging and development in an insect.
1	inheritance of plasma cholesterol levels in mice	Legacy of mouse plasma cholesterol levels.
1	interrelationship of glutathione cystine transhydrogenase and glutathione reductase in developing rat intestine	L' interrelation of glutathione cystine transhydrogenase and glutathione reductase in the apos; developing rat intestine.
1	acetoacetate and brain lipogenesis developmental pattern of acetoacetyl coenzyme a synthetase in the soluble fraction of rat brain	Acetoacetate, cerebral lipogenesis, apos development profile; acetoacetyl coenzyme a synthetase in the soluble fraction of the rat brain.
1	contrasting patterns of memory span decrement in ageing and aphasia	Comparison of loss of memory during aging and phasia.
1	studies of nuclei separated by zonal centrifugation from liver of rats treated with thioacetamide	Nuclear nuclei separated by zonal centrifugation of liver from rats treated with thioacetamide.
1	the crisis of middle age	The crisis of poverty; the crisis of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the half crisis of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age of poverty; the age; the age of the age of poverty; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age of the age; the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age; the age of the age of the age of the age of the age;
1	intestinal transport of antibodies in the newborn rat	The intestinal transport of antibodies in new-rat born.
1	role of the pituitary and thyroid glands in the decline of minimal o2 consumption with age	The role of the pituitary and thyroid glands in the decline of the minimal consumption of aposes; oxygen with apos; age.
1	age associated changes in fecal excretion patterns of strain 93 chick embryo lethal orphan virus in chicks	Changes associated with apo; age in egg profiles; fecal shedding of lethal orphan chick embryo virus of strain 93 in chicks.
1	presbyopia and the changes with age in the human crystalline lens	Presbyopia and changes with age in human crystalline lens.
1	changes in the uptake of tritiated estradiol in the hypothalamus and adenohypophysis of old female rats	Changes in the uptake of estradiol tritiated in the hypothalamus and the apos; elderly female rat adenohypophysis.
1	inactive enzyme molecules in aging mice liver aldolase	Inactive enzyme molecules in the hepatic aldolase of aged mice.
1	functional and morphologic maturation of the superficial nephrons relationship to total kidney function	Functional and morphological maturity of the relationship between superficial nephrons and total renal function.
1	the collagenous nature of amianthoid degeneration of human costal cartilage	The collagen nature of the amianthoid degeneration of human costal cartilage.
1	a quantitative study of synapses on motor neuron dendritic growth cones in developing mouse spinal cord	A quantitative study of synapses on dendritic growth cones of motor neurons in the spinal cord of developing mice.
1	aging increases susceptibility of mouse skin to dmba carcinogenesis independent of general immune status	The susceptibility of mouse skin to dmba carcinogenesis increases with aging, independently of the general immune state.
1	altered heat lability of a fraction of glutathione reductase in aging human lens	Alteration of heat stability of plants; fraction of glutathione reductase in aging human lentils.
1	a regional survey of myelin development some compositional and metabolic aspects	A regional study of myelin development on certain compositional and metabolic aspects.
1	alterations in biliary lipids of mice during dehydrocholic acid feeding	Alterations of mouse bile lipids during oral administration; dehydrocholic acid.
1	the effect of age on adrenoceptor activity in tracheal smooth muscle	Lapos; effect of apos; age on apos; and adrenoceptor activity in tracheal smooth muscle.
1	tolerance to the hypothermic effects of 9 tetrahydrocannabinol as a function of age in the chicken	Tolerance to hypothermic effects of 9 tetrahydrocannabinol as a function of age in chicken.
1	release phenomena and iterative activities in psychiatric geriatric patients	Release effects and iterative activities in geriatric psychiatric patients.
1	aging in hiroshima and nagasaki atomic bomb survivors speculations based upon the age specific mortality of persons with malignant neoplasms	Ageing among survivors of the hiroshima and nagasaki atomic bombs is based on mortality according to age; the age of people with neoplastic malignancies.
1	role of phosphodiesterase in glucagon resistance of large adipocytes	Role of phosphodiesterase in glucagon resistance in large adipocytes.
1	microtubule protein during ciliogenesis in the mouse oviduct	The microtubule protein during ciliogenesis in the oviduct of mice.
1	presbyopia and the water content of the human crystalline lens	Presbytivity and water content of human crystalline lens.
1	the activity of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in nuclei from brain fractionated by zonal centrifugation	L' activity of l' deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase and synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid in brain nuclei fractionated by zonal centrifugation.
1	rna synthesis in the mouse oocyte	Synthesis in mouse oocyte; mouse oocyte.
1	attenuation of the ventilatory and heart rate responses to hypoxia and hypercapnia with aging in normal men	Alleviating respiratory and heart rate responses to apo; hypoxia and apo; hypercapnia with apo; age in normal men.
1	myelinated fibres in the human paravertebral sympathetic chain quantitative studies on white rami communicantes	Myelinated fibers in quantitative studies of the human parvertebral sympathetic chain on white communicating twigs.
1	correlation between deoxyribonucleic acid excision repair and life span in a number of mammalian species	Correlation between deoxyribonucleic acid repair, deoxyribonucleic acid excision, and lifespan in a number of mammalian species.
1	a serum component related to nonimmunoglobulin amyloid protein as a possible precursor of the fibrils	A serum component related to non-immune globulin amyloid protein as a possible precursor to fibrils.
1	glucose metabolism in the newborn rat temporal studies in vivo	Glucose metabolism in time studies of in vivo born new-rats.
1	inhibition of 3 phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase from pisum sativum by purine nucleotides	Inhibition of 3 pisum sativum phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase activity by purine nucleotides.
1	studies on a murine form of spontaneous lower motor neuron degeneration the wobbler wa mouse	Studies on the wobbler wa mouse, a murine form of spontaneous degeneration of the lower motor neurons.
1	changes with age in the valvular apparatus of the superficial and deep veins of the leg	The valves of the deep superficial veins of the leg change with age.
1	amyloid in normal and pathological parathyroid glands	Amyloid in the normal and pathological parathyroid glands.
1	the effect of age on the fibrinolytic enzyme system	L' aging effect on the fibrinolytic enzyme system.
1	electron probe analysis of calcium transport by small intestine	Electron probe analysis of calcium transport by the apos; small intestine.
1	age related changes in the thermoregulatory capacity of tryptophan deficient rats	Changes in body weight; age of thermoregulatory capacity of tryptophan-deficient rats.
1	pituitary inhibitor of thyroxine	Pituitary thyroxine inhibitor.
1	runwheel activity patterns of mature young and senescent mice the effect of constant lighting conditions	Runwheel activity patterns of mature young and senescent mice. Effect of Constant Light Conditions.
1	composition of liver histones in aging rat and mouse	Hepatic histone composition in the aging rat and mouse.
1	accumulation of lipofuscin age pigment in aging skeletal connective tissues as revealed by electron microscopy	L' accumulation of lipofuscin pigments; age of lipofuscin in connective tissue skeletal aging was revealed by electron microscopy.
1	aging and the passage of l tyrosine l dopa and inulin into mouse brain slices in vitro	Aging and passage of tyrosine dopa and inulin in mouse brain slices in vitro.
1	fluid and crystallized intelligence in young adulthood and old age	Fluid and crystallized intelligence early in life; adult age and old age.
1	an autopsy study of human axillary lymph node histology	Dapos study; postpartum autopsy; human axillary lymph node histology.
1	breast cancer in women as a paradigm for ageing as a hidden syncarcinogenic factor	Breast cancer in women as paradigm of aging as a hidden syncarcinogenic factor.
1	fate of linoleic arachidonic and docosa 7 10 13 16 tetraenoic acids in rat testicles	Destination of the l' linoleic arachidonic and docosa 7 10,1316 tetraenoic acids in rat testis.
1	dependence of rates of lipolysis esterification and free fatty acid release in isolated fat cells on age cell size and nutritional state	The rates of lipolysis esterification and free fatty acid release in isolated fat cells depend on the size of the cell; age and age; nutritional status.
1	studies on the compartmentation of lipid in adipose cells ii cholesterol accumulation and distribution in adipose tissue components	Studies of lipid compartmentalization in fat cells ii accumulation and distribution of cholesterol in the components of adipose tissue.
1	glycosaminoglycans of brain during development	Brain glycosaminoglycans during development.
1	a developmental study of the relationship between the protein components of rat cns myelin	A study of the development of the relationship between protein components of rat cortical myelin.
1	age dependent utilization of phenylalanine for the synthesis of neuronal and glial proteins	Use of phenylalanine as a function of age for synthesis of glial and neuronal proteins.
1	the occurrence of two types of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase activity in the main classes of nuclei obtained from the brains of infant and adult rats	Two types of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase activity in major classes of nuclei obtained from the brain of newborn and adult rats.
1	sequential patterns of circulating lh and fsh in female sheep during the early postnatal period effect of gonadectomy	Sequence patterns of circulating lh and fsh in early postnatal gonadectomy female sheep.
1	ultrastructural changes in human prepubertal prostatic epithelium grown in vitro	Ultrastructural changes in the human prepubertal epithelium cultured in vitro.
1	effects of nicotine given into the brain of fowls	Nicotine-induced effects in the brain of poultry.
1	effects of cholinomimetic agents given into the brain of fowls	Effects of cholinomimetic agents administered into the poultry brain.
1	the effect of prostaglandin e2 on the arterial blood pressure of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The effect of prostaglandin e2 on blood pressure in both normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
1	age related changes in isocitrate lyase from the free living nematode turbatrix aceti	Changes related to apo; age in apo; turbatrix aceti free-living nematode isocitrate lyase.
1	aging isometric strength and endurance and cardiovascular responses to static effort	Isometric force and weight; aging endurance and cardiovascular responses to exercise; and static effort.
1	evolution of sleep spindles in childhood	Evolution of sleep spindles in the early years.
1	plasma lipid values and lipoprotein patterns during adolescence in boys	Plasma lipid values and lipoprotein profiles during pregnancy; adolescence among males.
1	skeletal muscle lipids ii changes in phospholipid composition in man from fetal to middle age	Skeletal muscle lipids ii modify muscle phospholipid composition in men from the fetus to the middle age.
1	skeletal muscle lipids 3 changes in fatty acid composition of individual phosphoglycerides in man from fetal to middle age	Lipids 3 of skeletal muscle modify the fatty acid composition of individual phosphoglycerides in men from fetus to age.
1	synthesis and turnover of cerebroside sulfate of myelin in adult and developing rat brain	Synthesis and renewal of myelin cerebroside sulfate in adult and developing rat brain.
1	age dependent changes on the state of aggregation of cartilage matrix	Changes according to age; age as a function of age; age as a function of age; condition; aggregation of cartilage matrix.
1	the effect of age upon the coagulation system	L' effect of age on coagulation system.
1	plasma testosterone and dihydrotestosterone in male rats during sexual maturation and following orchidectomy and experimental bilateral cryptorchidism	Plasma testosterone and dihydrotestosterone in male rats during sexual maturation and after experimental bilateral orchidectomy and cryptorchidism.
1	human muscle fiber fine structure morphometric data on controls	Morphometric data on fine structure of human muscle fibers from controls.
1	renal glutaminase in postnatal and adult rats	Renal glutaminase in adult and postnatal rats.
1	surgical sterilization by vasectomy and its effects on the structure and function of the testis in man	Surgical sterilization by vasectomy and its associated effects on the structure and function of the male testis.
1	effect of development and aging on the response of canine lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	Effect of development and aging on response of canine lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
1	identity of maleate stimulated glutaminase with gamma glutamyl transpeptidase in rat kidney	L' maleate identity enhanced glutaminase with gamma glutamyl transpeptidase in rat kidney.
1	the shape of the dental arch	The shape of the toothbelt.
1	comparison of physiological responses of women and men to isometric exercise	Comparison of physiological responses of men and women to isometric exercise.
1	aerobic power of females ages 10 to 68	This is the aerobic power of women aged 10 to 68.
1	a fine structural study of degenerative changes in the dorsal column nuclei of aging mice lack of protection by vitamin e	A fine structural study of degenerative changes in dorsal column nuclei of aging mice was not protected by vitamin e.
1	significance of brain reactive antibodies in serum of aged mice	L' importance of reactive antibodies in brain in old mouse serum.
1	changes with age in protein bound iodine pbi and body temperature in the mouse	Changes with age; age of binding of protein and body temperature in mouse.
1	reaction and movement time as a function of age and physical activity level	Movement and reaction time is a function of age and level of physical activity.
1	similarities and differences between psychological deficit in aging and brain damage	The similarities and differences between the psychological deficit of aging and brain damage.
1	schwann cell internuclear distances in developing rat unmyelinated nerve fibers	Schwann cell internuclear distances in developing rats nonmyelinated nerve fiber.
1	the effects of age and liver disease on the disposition and elimination of diazepam in adult man	The effects of weight loss; age and liver disease on disposition and function; elimination of diazepam in adults.
1	the effect of b cell immunosuppression on age related resistance of chickens to marek s disease	The effect of immunosuppression of b cells on chicken resistance to Marek disease as a function of age.
1	autoimmune human sperm antibodies and age in males	Antibody to human auto-immune and l' age in males.
1	influence of age of ewe and photoperiod on the intervals between parturition and first oestrus in lactating and non lactating ewes at different nutritional levels	Ewes age and photoperiod influence on the intervals between parturition and first oestrus in lactating and non-nursing ewes at different nutritional levels.
1	on the possibility that dna repair is related to age in non dividing cells	On the possibility that DNA repair is related to apos; age in non-divisional cells.
1	influence of age on the formation of 5alpha androstanediol and 7alpha hydroxy testosterone by incubated rat testes	L' influence of l' age on the formation of 5alpha androstanediol and 7alpha hydroxy testosterone by the testes of incubated rats.
1	effect of age on kidney hyperplasia in the rat after unilateral nephrectomy	Effect of apo; age on apo; renal hyperplasia in rats following unilateral nephrectomy.
1	effect of age on kidney hyperplasia in the rat during cold acclimation	Effect of vomiting; age on vomiting; renal hyperplasia in rats during vomiting; cold acclimation.
1	age changes in the dorsal and ventral lumbar nerve roots of dogs	Changes in height; age in dorsal and ventral roots of dog lumbar nerves.
1	cholinesterase che response and related mortality among birds fed che inhibitors	Cholinesterase infection among birds fed as inhibitors.
1	effect of age and long term diet on exocrine pancreas of the rat	Effect of age and long-term diet on exocrine rat pancreas.
1	normal ranges of hip motion in infants six weeks three months and six months of age	Lapos; normal amplitude of hip movement in six-week-, three- and six-month-old infants.
1	age related changes in the incorporation of 14 c leucine into myofibrillar and sarcoplasmic proteins of red and white muscles of chicks	Changes in age; incorporation of leucine 14 c into the myofibrillar and sarcoplasmic proteins of the red and white muscle of chicks.
1	abo blood groups age and work in ischaemic heart disease	The abo blood groups are aging and are working in the ischemic heart disease.
1	a possible age related decrement in the conduction velocity of aplysia neuron r2	A possible decrease related to apos; age of the conduction velocity of the neuron r2 of the apos; aplysia could be related to age.
1	lack of increase in dna crosslinking in drosophila melanogaster with age	Lapos; lack of cross-linking of apos; DNA in melanogaster fruit flies increases with age.
1	the effect of age on mitochondrial enzymes and respiration	Impact of apos; age on mitochondrial enzymes and respiration.
1	attitudes toward age an exploration in school age children	Attitudes at home; about age; exploration age among children; school age.
1	circadian oscillations in rodents a systematic increase of their frequency with age	Circadian oscillations in rodents increase systematically with age.
1	variation with age and disease of an amyloid a protein related serum component	Variation with age; age and apos disease; a serum component amyloid bound to a protein.
1	age related activity changes in arginine phosphokinase in the house fly musca domestic l	Changes in apos; apos activity; arginine phosphokinase activity as a function of apos; age in stinky houseflies.
1	influence of age on size and number of fat cells in the epididymal depot	Influence of age; age on size and number of fat cells in epididymal deposit.
1	effects of age and genotype on acquisition of an active avoidance response in mice	The effects of diabetes; age and genotype on diabetes; acquisition of diabetes; an active response; avoidance in mice.
1	effect of age on liver function	Lapos; effect of apos; age on liver function was studied.
1	being single in old age	To be single at an advanced age.
1	age related changes in a spontaneously reassociating fraction of mouse dna	Changes in age; age in a spontaneously reassociating fraction of the mouse cell; mouse DNA.
1	age dependent micronuclear deterioration in tetrahymena pyriformis syngen 1	Micronuclear deterioration of tetrahymena pyriformis syngen 1 as a function of age.
1	studies on the synthesis and degradation of dna in developing and old chick cerebellum	Studies on synthesis and degradation of DNA in the cerebellum of developing and old chickens.
1	age related peculiarities of acetylation of rat liver nuclear histones	Features related to age; age of onset; acetylation of rat liver nuclear histones.
1	an estimate of the number of cells arising by division in mouse cerebral hemispheres from age one to 12 months an autoradiographic study of dna synthesis	Estimation of the number of cells from division in the cerebral hemispheres of 1- to 12-month-old mice, autoradiographic study of synthesis of DNA.
1	age and sex differences in behaviors mediated by the ventromedial hypothalamus	Differences in age and sex among ventromedial-mediated behaviours.
1	age differences in aversively motivated visual discrimination learning and retention in male sprague dawley rats	Differences in age; learning and retention of visual discrimination due to age; aversion in male sprague rats @-@dawley.
1	perceptions of onsets of young adulthood middle age and old age	The perception of age; the evolution of young adults, of the average age and of the advanced age.
1	age involution in the normal human adult thymus	L' involution of l' age in normal adult human thymus.
1	an electron microscopic investigation of age dependent changes in the flight muscle of musca domestica l	Age-related changes in flight muscle of musca domestica l.
1	light and electron microscopic studies on human temporal arteries with special reference to alterations related to senescence atherosclerosis and giant cell arteritis	Electron and light microscopic studies of human temporal arteries, in particular alterations related to l' senescent atherosclerosis and l' giant-cell arteritis.
1	engagement with an old theory	Uh, commitment to an old theory.
1	qualitative vocabulary test responses and age	Qualitative vocabulary will test answers and age.
1	studies on immune competence in the rat changes with age sex and strain	Rat immune competence studies change with age, sex and strain.
1	age differences in the speed of a spatial cognitive process	Differences in age and speed, a spatial cognitive process.
1	macromolecular components of the vitelline membrane of hen s egg i membrane structure and its deterioration with age	Macromolecular components of the yolk membrane of the egg; hen's egg and its deterioration with the apos; age.
1	age dependence of heat induced strand separation of dna in situ in postmitotic cells of rat brain as revealed by acridine orange microfluorimetry	Microfluorimetry with orange dolipos; acridine revealed that the separation of strands of DNA in situ in the postmitotic cells of rat brain was age dependent.
1	the influence of age on the distribution metabolism and excretion of methoxyflurane in fischer 344 rats a possible relationship to nephrotoxicity	Lapos; influence of apo; age on distribution metabolism and apo; methoxyflurane excretion in Fischer 344 rats could be related to nephrotoxicity.
1	comparative studys on ages related changes in collagen structures of achilles and tail tendons in rats	Comparative studies of changes related to apos; age in collagen structure of rat achilles and tail tendons.
1	changes in proteins of the human lens in development and aging	Changes in human lens proteins in development and aging.
1	age changes in the human frontozygomatic suture from 20 to 95 years	Changes in age; age of human frontozygomatic suture from 20 to 95 years.
1	age related incidence of sclerotic glomeruli in human kidneys	Incidence of sclerotial glomeruli in human kidneys as a function of age.
1	the influence of age on cardiac refractory periods in man	L' influence of the apos; age on cardiac refractory periods in men.
1	effects of age and fasting on gluconeogenesis from glycerol in dogs	Effects of age and fasting on gluconeogenesis from glycerol in dogs.
1	the effect of age on arterial alveolar nitrogen difference in normal adults	L' effect of age on the difference in nitrogen in arterial alveoli in normal adults.
1	information processing limits the effects of information load and age	Treatment of seizures; information limits the effects of loading and seizures; age of seizures; information.
1	age related changes in free plasma testosterone dihydrotestosterone and oestradiol	Dosage-related changes; age of dihydrotestosterone-free plasma testosterone and lidos; estradiol.
1	age related changes in the affinity of hemoglobin to oxygen in rabbits	Oxygen varies with age; age in rabbits varies with age.
1	age related and seasonal variations in the atpase system of mitochondria of skeletal muscles in rabbit	Seasonal and apo-related changes in age of the skeletal muscle mitochondrial atpase system in rabbits.
1	age peculiarities in the effect of m and n cholinolytics on the activity of the epileptogenic zone in the rabbit hippocampus	Epileptogenic zone activity in rabbit hippocampus, cholinolytic age, cholinolytic effect in m and n on apos.
1	sleep related penile tumescence as a function of age	It's called sleep-related penile tumescence as a function of age.
1	age differences in learning immediate and one week delayed recall	Differences in age, immediate learning experience and one week delayed the recall.
1	serum 5alpha dihydrotestosterone and testosterone changes with age in man	In men, the serum 5alpha dihydrotestosterone and testosterone change with age.
1	human adipose tissue in culture vi effect of age on cell size and lipolysis	Human adipose tissue in culture has an effect on cell size and on lipolysis.
1	age and changes in the thyroid gland of a he mice morphometric and histochemical studies	It is not possible to determine the age and changes in the thyroid gland of a mouse from morphometric and histochemical studies.
1	immunologic cross reactivity between antisera to group a type 12 streptococcal cell membrane and human glomerular basement membrane the effect of age and carbohydrate content	Immunological cross-reactivity between the antisera to group a type 12 streptococcal cell membrane and human glomerular basement membrane, l' effect of age; age and carbohydrate content.
1	antipyrine metabolism in man influence of age alcohol caffeine and smoking	Metabolism of apos; antipyrine in men influences apos; age caffeine alcohol and smoking.
1	biochemical variations in the matrix of human tendons in relation to age and pathological conditions	Biochemical variations of human tendon matrix as a function of age and pathological conditions.
1	gerontological and geriatric problems in stomatology 1 effects of age related physical changes on prosthetic therapy	Gerontological and geriatric problems in the stomatology 1 Effects of physical changes related to apo; age on the denture.
1	the effect of age on plasma levels of propranolol and practolol in man	The effects of age on plasma propranolol and practolol levels in men.
1	rat liver superoxide dismutase purification and age related modifications	Purification of rat liver superoxide dismutase and changes related to age.
1	inulin clearance in the newborn infant relationship to gestational and postnatal age	Inulin clearance in the newborn relation to gestational and postnatal age.
1	cell types originating from kidney explants of young and old mice	These are the types of cells obtained from kidney explants from young and old mice.
1	plasma testosterone levels in c57bl 6j male mice effects of age and disease	Rate of plasma testosterone in male mice c57bl 6j Effects of age and disease in male mice.
1	the collagenous and non collagenous protein of the canine intervertebral disc and their variation with age spinal level and breed	The collagen and non-collagenic protein of the canine intervertebral disc varies with age, spine level and race.
1	changes in drug metabolism with increasing age 1 warfarin binding and plasma proteins	Changes in drug metabolism with apo; increased binding to warfarin; age 1 and plasma proteins.
1	influence of age and starvation on po2 pco2 and haematocrit values in the rat	Influence of age and fasting on po2 and apo values; hematocrit in rat.
1	effect of sex age and cultivation time on number of satellites and acrocentric associations in man	Effect of age; age of sex and culture time on number of satellites and satellite sites; acrocentric associations in males.
1	changes in the pituitary testicular system with age	Change of the pituitary system of the testes with age.
1	the lipids of human sciatic nerve by age group	Lipids from the human sciatic nerve by age group.
1	pituitary gonadal relations in infancy 2 patterns of serum gonadal steroid concentrations in man from birth to two years of age	Pituitary gonadal relations in early childhood 2 patterns of gonadal serum steroid concentrations in lacid; man from birth to age; age two.
1	the influence of age and sex on the metabolism of testosterone	The effects of age and sex on testosterone metabolism and metabolism.
1	median age at onset of asthma and allergic rhinitis in tecumseh michigan	Age of onset of asthma and allergic rhinitis in tecumseh michigan.
1	human intelligence sex differences	Gender human intelligence gender differences.
1	age related changes in hepatic fine structure a quantitative analysis	Changes in liver function; age in liver fine structure, a quantitative analysis.
1	the effect of age on creatinine clearance in men a cross sectional and longitudinal study	Effect of apos; age on creatinine clearance in men: a longitudinal and cross-sectional study.
1	age differences in central perceptual processing a dichoptic backward masking investigation	Differences in age in central perceptual processing; retrograde dichoptic investigation masking dichoptic investigation.
1	paired associate learning in young and old adults as related to stimulus concreteness and presentation method	L' pair learning in young adults and older adults is related to the concreteness of the stimulus and the presentation method.
1	attitudinal predictors of devaluation of old age in a multigenerational sample	The attitudinal predictors of the devaluation of old age in the context of a multigenerational sample.
1	social class and association membership an analysis of age graded and non age graded voluntary participation	Analysis of voluntary participation by age, not age; age, by social class and age; membership in an association.
1	age related secretion of androstenedione testosterone and dihydrotestosterone by the human testis	Secretion of apos; androstenedione testosterone and dihydrotestosterone associated with apos; age by human testes.
1	methodological problems in the determination of biological age	Methodological issues in biological age determination.
1	sexual behavior in higher age	Sexual behavior at an older age.
1	chronobiologic and inbred strain differences in blood hemoglobin of the mouse	Chronobiological and inbreeding differences in mouse blood hemoglobin.
1	age dependent changes in juvenile hormone esterase and general carboxyesterase activity in the hemolymph of the colorado potato beetle leptinotarsa decemlineata	Changes with age; juvenile esterase and lacidase age; general carboxyesterase activity in the apos; beetle hemolymph leptinotarsa decemlineata.
1	transcutaneous measurements of age conditioned changes in the elasticity of the human common carotid artery	Transcutaneous measurements of age-dependent changes in elasticity, elasticity, and human common carotid artery were performed.
1	age related changes in the glycosidases of chick embryo eye tissues	Changes related to apo; age of ocular tissue glycosidases; chick embryo.
1	relation to osteoporosis of age and hormone induced changes in the metabolism of collagen and bone	The relationship to age and hormone osteoporosis has induced changes in collagen and bone metabolism.
1	hair cell loss as a function of age in the normal cochlea of the guinea pig	Loss of hair cells as a function of age in normal pig cochlea d' India.
1	changes in ethanol consumption by c3h and cf1 mice with age	Changes in the consumption of ethanol by c3h and cf1 mice with ethanol; age.
1	age related changes in the intact and sympathetically denervated gerbil pineal gland	It is not possible to determine the age in the pineal gland of the intact and sympathetically denervated gerbil.
1	effect of neonatal thymectomy on experimental subacute sclerosing panencephalitis in adult hamsters	Effect of neonatal thymectomy on experimental subacute sclerosing panencephalitis (SSP) in adult hamsters.
1	ontogeny of human cell mediated immunity age related variation of in vitro infantile lymphocyte transformation	Apos; ontogeny of apos; age of apos; human cell-mediated immunity is related to variation in transformation of infant lymphocytes in vitro.
1	age anxiety and self reported health	Anxiety related to self-reported age and health status.
1	treatment of immature mice with gonadotrophins the influence of mouse age on the response of ovarian alkaline phosphatase activities to gonadotrophins	Treatment of immature mice with gonadotropins, the influence of apos; age of the mouse on the response of ovarian alkaline phosphatase activities to gonadotropins.
1	age changes in rat vasomotor reflexes and sympathetic neuron ultrastructure following chemical sympathectomy	Changes in vasomotor reflexes and apo; ultrastructure of sympathetic neurons in the rat after chemical sympathectomy.
1	age simulation in perceptual and cognitive functioning age progression to 80 years in a college sample	Simulation of apos; age in perceptual and cognitive functioning progression of apos; age at 80 in a college sample.
1	age differences in backward dichoptic masking	Differences in age in retrograde dichoptic masking.
1	age differences in evoked potential correlates of a memory scanning process	Differences in age in potential correlates evoked from a memory scan process.
1	age trends in human chiasma frequencies and recombination fractions i chiasma frequencies	Trends according to age; age in frequency of human chiasmata and recombination fractions; chiasmata frequencies.
1	age related changes in cell surface antigens of preleukemic akr thymocytes	Apos-related changes; antigen age in cell surface antigens of akr preleukemic thymocytes.
1	age related chemical changes in human elastins from non atherosclerotic areas of thoracic aorta	Chemical changes related to apo; age in human elastinae in non-atherosclerotic areas of the apo; thoracic aorta.
1	age related changes in the lipid metabolism of fisher 344 rats	Changes in lipid metabolism; age in lipid metabolism in Fisher rats.
1	lifespan age changes and tumour incidence in an ageing c57bl mouse colony	Changes in lifespan and tumour incidence in aging c57bl mouse colony.
1	partial loss of cytoplasmic incompatibility with age in males of culex fatigans	Partial apos loss; cytoplasmic incompatibility with apos; age in culex fatigans males.
1	correlation between age arteriosclerosis and elastinolytic activity of human aorta wall	Correlation between apos; age of arteriosclerosis and apos; elastinolytic activity of apos cell wall; human aorta.
1	age related changes in ouabain pharmacology ouabain exhibits a different volume of distribution in adult and young dogs	Changes in the pharmacology of ouabain with respect to age Ouabain has a different volume of distribution in adult and young dogs.
1	effect of age and sex on lung colony forming efficiency of injected mouse tumour cells	Effect of age and sex on immune response; efficacy of injected mouse tumor cell lung colonies.
1	changes in developing behavior following prenatal administration of imipramine	Behavioural changes after pregnancy; prenatal administration of antibody; imipramine.
1	an x ray diffraction investigation of age related changes in the crystal structure of bone apatite	A study by X-ray diffraction of the changes related to the apos; age in the crystal structure of the apos; bone apatite.
1	serum immunoreactive corticotrophin and response to metyrapone in old age in man	Serum immunoreactive corticotropin and metyrapone response in old age in men.
1	maturational changes of amino acid concentration in cerebrospinal fluid of the rat	Changes in amino acid concentration maturation in rat cerebrospinal fluid.
1	absence of low molecular weight alpha crystallin in nuclear region of old human lenses	Absence of low molecular weight alpha crystals at the nuclear region of old human lenses.
1	sex ratio sex change and natural selection	Change in sex ratio and natural selection.
1	breast parenchymal patterns and their changes with age	Breast parenchyma and its changes with age.
1	age dependence of the biosynthesis of intercellular matrix macromolecules of rabbit aorta in organ culture and cell culture	The biosynthesis of the intercellular matrix macromolecules of rabbit aorta in organic culture and in cell culture is age dependent.
1	age changes in the structure of adenohypophysical gonadotropocytes and hypothalamic arcuate nucleus neurocytes	Changes in apo; age in the structure of hypothalamic arcuate node adenohypophysical gonadotropocytes and neurocytes.
1	age differences in the effects of palatability of diet on regulation of calorie intake and body weight of rats	However, it is important to note that the effects of dietary palatability on caloric intake and body weight of rats are not identical.
1	vascular adenylate cyclase role of age and guanine nucleotide activation	Role of age and age; activation of guanine nucleotides in vascular adenylate cyclase.
1	the significance of age in the colposcopic evaluation of women with atypical apanicolaou smears	Extent of infection; age; colposcopic assessment of women with atypical apanicolaou smears.
1	attack like schizophrenia with a progressive course and profound long term remissions in old age	Attack like schizophrenia with progressive progression and deep, long-term remission into old age.
1	the effect of age on the ultrastructure of the mid gut cells of the hymenopteran nasonia vitripennis walk hymenoptera pteromalidae	L' effect of apos; age on apos; midgut cell ultrastructure of l' hymenopteran nasonia vitripennis walks pteromalid hymenoptera.
1	tachyarrhythmias in old age	Tachyarrhythmia in older adults.
1	physiology of aging metabolic changes during the climacteric and menopausal periods	The physiology of metabolic changes during aging during climacterial and menopausal periods.
1	modification of the adrenal stress response by age and prior experience	Change in response to adrenal stress based on age and previous experience.
1	age differences in learning and memory on a digit symbol substitution task	Differences in age; learning and memory for digital symbol substitution task.
1	age and tachistoscopic perception	Age and tachistoscopic perception.
1	age related increase of cuticle permeability in the nematode caenorhabditis briggsae	Increased cuticular permeability in the nematode caenorhabditis briggsae; age of cuticular permeability.
1	the effect of age on the speed of sentence formation and incidental learning	L' effect of age on speed of sentencing and training; ancillary learning.
1	differences in the sequential integration of form as a function of age and interstimulus interval	Differences in age; sequential integration of form with age; age and age; interstimulus interval.
1	speed and age multiple rates of age decline	Multiple decay rates of speed and age are decreasing.
1	age associated structural alterations in senescent mouse brain dna	Structural changes associated with aging; age in aging; brain DNA of senescing mice.
1	age related changes in the proteolytic enzymes of mammalian lens	Modifications of mammalian lens proteolytic enzymes as a function of age.
1	prolactin release in response to blockade of dopaminergic receptors and to trh injection in developing and adult rats role of estrogen in determining sex differences	The release of prolactin in response to high injection and dopaminergic receptor blockade in developing and adult rats plays a role in determining sexual differences.
1	morphological changes in prolactin cells of male rats after testosterone administration	The morphological changes in the prolactin cells of male rats following administration of testosterone.
1	neonatal treatment with sex steroids relationship between the uterotropic response and the estrogen receptor in prepubertal rats	Neonatal treatment with sex steroids, relation between the uterotropic response and the estrogen receptor in prepubertal rats.
1	effect of a periodic growth retarding diet on changes with age in the hypothalamo hypophyseo adrenal system	Effect of periodic growth retardation on changes with apos; age in the hypothalamic pituitary system-adrenal.
1	tail carriage in baboons papio cynocephalus relationship to dominance rank and age	Tail transport in papio cynocephalus baboons was related to dominance rank and age.
1	age and transformation dynamics of rectal vains and their alteration during hemorrhoid development	"""Age and dynamics transformation of rectal defects and their alteration during hemorrhoid development"", Am J Med."
1	age related changes in the flight muscle mitochondria from the blowfly sarcophaga bullata	Changes related to apos; age in sarcophaga bullata fly flight muscle mitochondria.
1	the effect of practice on age differences in central perceptual processing	Effect of practice on differences in age in central perceptual treatment.
1	methodologic differences and measurement of cup disc ratio an epidemiologic assessment	Methodological differences and measurement of the ratio of section to disk Epidemiological evaluation.
1	changes in the structure of the wall of the human thoracic duct in relation to atherosclerosis and age	Changes in the structure of the human thoracic canal wall in relation to apos; atherosclerosis and apos; age.
1	age related changes in the free amino acid pool of rat lens	Changes related to apo; age in pool of apo; free amino acids of rat lens.
1	changes in the nuclear volume of rat hypothalamic neurons in old age	Changes in the nuclear volume of hypothalamic neurons in rats in old age.
1	age related change in pituitary threshold for tsh release during thyroxine replacement therapy for cretinism	Apos-related change; pituitary threshold age for tsh release during thyroxine substitution for cretinism.
1	enhanced activity of hormone sensitive adenylate cyclase during dietary restriction in the rat dependence on age and relation to cell size	L' increased hormone-sensitive lipophilic activity; adenylate cyclase hormone during dietary restriction in rats depends on age and cell size.
1	effects of age strain and illumination intensity on activity and self selection of light dark schedules in mice	Effects of weight; age and weight; intensity of weight; light on weight; activity and weight; auto-selection of programs; darkness in mice.
1	pore size measurements and some age related changes in human alveolar bone and rat femur	Pore size measurements and age changes in the human alveolar bone and rat femur.
1	phosphoglycerate kinase from young and old turbatrix aceti	Phosphoglycerate kinase from the young and old aceti turbatrix aceti.
1	primary hyperlipoproteinemia and cardiovascular diseases in relation to age	Primary hyperlipoproteinemia and cardiovascular disease as a function of age.
1	age related changes of ballistocardiogram in healthy persons	Changes in ballistocardiogram (BCC) related to weight loss; age in healthy individuals.
1	changes in 80s ribosomes from drosophila melanogaster with age	Modification of 1980s drosophila melanogaster ribosomes with the apos; age.
1	on the age associated presence of immunoglobulin and complement in the renal glomeruli of mice	The age associated with the presence of immunoglobulin and complement in mouse renal glomeruli.
1	the old man as woman detecting stereotypes of aged men with a femininity scale	The old man as a woman detects the stereotypes of older men on a scale of femininity.
1	allograft rejection in larval and adult xenopus following early thymectomy	Apos rejection; larval and adult xenopteran allografts following apos; early thymectomy.
1	chromosomes in old age a six year longitudinal study	Chromosomes in old age 6-year longitudinal study.
1	lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin age related effects	Lymphocyte responses to phytohemagglutinin age effects.
1	age related variation in lymphocyte subpopulations	Lapse-related variation; age in sub-lymphocyte populations.
1	changes depend on age in electromyogram studies about parameter of motor unit action potentials in normal subjects of different age author s transl	Changes are dependent on age; age in apo studies; electromyograms of potential parameters; action of motor units in normal subjects of different ages.
1	age dependent changes of biosynthesis of proteins author s transl	Genetic differences in the genetic makeup of the protein molecules.
1	age related decrement in hearing for speech sampling and longitudinal studies	Decreased voice; hearing related to age; voice sampling and longitudinal studies.
1	a relationship between functional age and health status in female subjects	Relationship between age; functional age and disability; health status of females.
1	cautiousness in adulthood as a function of age and instructions	The caution in adult age is a function of age and instructions.
1	age differences in humor comprehension and appreciation in old age	Differences in age; understanding and skills; appreciation of age; humour in old age.
1	variations in fluorescence characteristics of intact human crystalline lens segments as a function of age	Variations in the fluorescence characteristics of the intact human lens segments as a function of age.
1	attitudes toward aging as a function of in service training and practitioner age	Attitudes toward aging as a function of on-going training and education; employment and skills; and age of practitioners.
1	age related change in the neuronal microenvironment penetration of ruthenium red into extracellular space of brain in young adult and senescent rats	Changes related to apo; age of ruthenium red penetration into apo; extracellular space of brain in neuronal microenvironment in senescing and young adult rats.
1	free radical theory of aging effect of age sex and dietary precursors on rat brain docosahexanoic acid	Free radical theory of apo; effect of aging sex and food precursors on apo; rat brain docosahexaenoic acid.
1	the influence of age and drugs on the thermoregulatory behaviour of rats	L' influence of age and medication on thermoregulatory behaviour of rats.
1	age related changes in t cell function	Changes in t-cell function related to apos; age.
1	the relation between physician and patient age in family practice	The age of the physician and the patient in family practice.
1	cadmium in liver kidney and hair of humans fetal through old age	In the kidneys and hair of the fetal human liver up to the advanced age.
1	age related changes of accuracy and efficiency of protein synthesis machinery in rat	Changes in precision and protein content; efficiency of protein synthesis mechanism with respect to age; in rats.
1	age changes in the allosteric properties of brain acetylcholinesterase	Changes in age; age in allosteric properties of brain acetylcholinesterase.
1	the age dependent decrease in creatine kinase and aldolase activities in human striated muscle is not caused by an accumulation of faulty proteins	The decrease in protein, creatine kinase and aldolase activity in human stripe muscle as a function of age, is not caused by the accumulation of defective proteins.
1	epithelial tumor like changes precancerous conditions and skin neoplasms standardization study	Epithelial tumors such as precancerous changes and skin neoplasms study of standardization of skin neoplasms.
1	induced pku in rats effects of age and melatonin treatment	In rats, pku induces the effects of age and melatonin treatment.
1	age related changes in the hepatic endoplasmic reticulum a quantitative analysis	Changes related to liver enzymes; age in hepatic endoplasmic reticulum, quantitative analysis.
1	age dependent differences of distribution and clearance patterns in normal rihsa cisternograms	Distribution and clearance differences as a function of age; age in normal rihsa tanks.
1	active and passive avoidance in rats as a function of age	Age-related active and passive avoidance in rats.
1	biochemical changes in the central nervous system with age in the rat	Biochemical changes in the central nervous system, with apos; age in rat.
1	the effect of criterion level on the acquisition and retention of a 1 way avoidance response in young and old rats	Effects of criterion level on acquisition and retention of animals; one-sided response; one-sided avoidance in young and old rats.
1	influence of age on the plasma hormonal iodine response to thyrotropin injection in young calves	L' influence of apos; age on plasma iodine hormonal response to apos; thyrotropin injection in young calves.
1	age difference of bone collagen in hydrolysis by streptomyces griseus protease	Difference in age of bone collagen in the apos; graiseus streptomyces protease hydrolysis.
1	histological and electrophysiological changes of the lower motor neurone with aging	Lower motor neuron histological and electrophysiological changes with aging.
1	age and changes in the activity of several energy metabolism enzymes in the rabbit aorta	Age and changes in age; activity of several enzymes of energy metabolism in rabbit aorta.
1	a comparison of fat absorption in young and old subjects	Comparison of fat absorption in the young and old.
1	the influence of age onthe sensitivity of the cornea	The cornea may also have a role in the development of the cornea; the influence of the cornea on the cornea; the influence of the cornea on the cornea; the influence of the cornea on the cornea; the formation of the cornea.
1	physiological characteristics of a champion runner age 77	Physiological characteristics of a 77-year-old runner-runner.
1	developmental analysis of human figure drawings in adolescence young adulthood and middle age	Developmental analysis of drawings of human figures at adolescence, early adulthood and early adulthood; average age.
1	age dependent distribution of isoamylases in human parotid saliva	Isoamylase distribution in human parotid saliva as a function of age.
1	effect of age of non skin tissues on susceptibility of skin grafts to 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene dmba carcinogenesis in balb c mice and effect of age of skin graft on susceptibility of surrounding recipient skin to dmba	Effect of leprosy; age of non-dermal tissue on susceptibility of skin grafts to carcinogenesis of 712 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene dmba in Berber mice and effect of leprosy; age of skin graft on susceptibility of the surrounding skin to dmba.
1	glycemic response to 24 hour fast in normal children iii influence of age	The glycemic response to a 24-hour fast in normal children influences age.
1	age related changes in the effect of electroconvulsive shock ecs on the in vivo hydroxylation of tyrosine and tryptophan in rat brain	Changes Associated with Apos; age in onset; effect of electroconvulsive shock on apos; in vivo hydroxylation of tyrosine and tryptophan in rat brain.
1	influence of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two steroid anesthetics in rats	Influence of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two rat steroidal anesthetics.
1	alterations in fecal microflora enzymes related to diet age lactobacillus supplements and dimethylhydrazine	Changes in faecal microflora enzymes related to Dapos lactobacilli and dimethylhydrazine supplements; food age.
1	influence of gonadal hormones and age on 1 2 dimethylhydrazine induced colon carcinogenesis	The influence of gonadal hormones and apo; age on 12 dimethylhydrazine induced carcinogenesis of the colon.
1	age dependence of nuclear rna processing	The treatment of nuclear weapons depends on age.
1	relation between smoking and age of natural menopause report from the boston collaborative drug surveillance program boston university medical center	Report on the relationship between tobacco use and age of natural menopause at Boston University Medical Center of Boston Cooperative Drug Surveillance Program.
1	immunogenicity of cows milk in man influence of age and of disease on serum antibodies to five cows milk proteins	Immunogenicity of cow's milk to humans influences age and disease on serum antibodies to the milk proteins of five cows.
1	hla antigens in different age groups	Antigen hla in different groups of ages.
1	gamma glutamyltranspeptidase activity in newborn rat kidney brush border	L' Gamma glutamyltranspeptidase activity in brush border of rat kidney again @-@.
1	genetic and non genetic effects on plasma lh concentrations in lambs at 4 and 8 weeks of age	Genetic and non-genetic effects on plasma levels of lh in lambs aged 4 and 8 weeks.
1	functional capability of 68 year old people in the town of jyv skyl	Functional capacity of persons aged 68 years in the city of Jyv Skyl.
1	on the problem of so called ulcer in the old age author s transl	On the problem of what are called the apos; ulcer in the translations of the authors on the old age.
1	perception of exertion in the elderly effects of aging mode of exercise and physical training	The effects of aging, exercise and weight training on the perception of weight; effort in the elderly.
1	eye tracking in relation to age sex and illness	Eye monitoring and follow-up in relation to age, sex and disease.
1	relationship between diazepam dose plasma level age and central nervous system depression	Relationship between dose of diazepam, age of plasma and central nervous system depression.
1	interactive effects of age and brain disease on reaction time	Interactive effects of age and brain diseases on reaction time.
1	cyclophosphamide induced sensitivity against avian rna myeloblastosis virus in age resistant hosts	Cyclophosphamide induced sensitivity to avian myeloblastosis virus in hosts resistant to etapos; age.
1	motion sickness susceptibility and related behavioral characteristics in men and women	Sensitivity of men and women to motion sickness and related behavioural characteristics.
1	age and the perception of incomplete figures	Age and perception of incomplete figures.
1	growing up and growing old the politics of age exclusion	As we grew older and older, the policy of excluding older people became more pronounced.
1	age changes in alcian blue staining of glycosaminoglycans in sheep articular cartilage	Age changes in alcian blue colour of glycosaminoglycans in articular cartilage sheep.
1	gene expression of a region of chromosome 17 during murine spermatogenesis	Gene expression of d' a region of chromosome 17 during mouse spermatogenesis.
1	neutrophilic turnover rate in human age groups evaluated by serum lysozyme activity	Neutrophil turnover rates in serum lysozyme activity; human age as measured by apos.
1	changes of dna ligase in developing rat brain	Modifications to the apo-ligase enzyme; DNA in developing rat brain.
1	replication of age and physical activity effects on reaction and movement time	Reproduction of the effects of weight loss, age and weight loss; physical activity on reaction and movement time.
1	age related changes in the motor nerve conduction velocity in dogs	Changes in motor nerve velocity; age of motor nerve conduction velocity in dogs.
1	factors influencing sexual performance in male rhesus monkeys	Factors that influence sexual performance in male rhesus monkeys.
1	gout in the age author s transl	Drop at the apos; age of translation of the apos; author.
1	systolic periods in dependence of age	Systolic periods of drug dependence; age dependence; age dependence.
1	on molecular biology of aging 11th communication enzyme adaptation age author s transl	On the Molecular Biology of Aging 11th transl-age communication enzyme adaptation.
1	longitudinal force and stress of rat s esophagus age related changes	The longitudinal force and stress of the rat esophagus vary with age.
1	interactive effects of age and cerebral disease on cognitive performances	Interactive effects of age and brain disease on cognitive performance.
1	age associated glycopeptide pigment in human costal cartilage	Glycopeptide pigmentation associated with apos; age in human costal cartilage.
1	dependence of diverticulosis on age author s transl	Diverticulosis dependence-@-@ vis de l' age of authors s translations.
1	age changes of the human optic nerve head a neurohistologic study	Changes in the age of the head of the human optic nerve a neurohistological study.
1	age dependent change in the ability of protein synthesis by rat liver microsomes significance of 2 associated factors	Apos-dependent change; age in the ability of rat liver microsomes to synthesize protein, meaning 2 related factors.
1	age related changes in responsiveness of rat leydig cells to hcg	Changes in the reactivity of rat leydig cells to hcg as a function of age.
1	effect of age on thickness of adult patellar articular cartilage	Effect of age; age on age; thickness of adult patellar articular cartilage.
1	lupus erythematodes visceralis and age part 1 lupus erythematodes visceralis as model of an autoimmune process and its relationship to age with special reference to antinuclear factors in different age groups	Lupus erythematodes visceralis and lupus erythematodes visceralis from Part 1 of l' age as models for d' auto process-immune and its relationship to l' age, with special reference to anti-nuclear factors in different groups of ages.
1	tbg dependency of age related variations of thyroxine and triiodothyronine	Tbg dependence of changes in thyroxine and triiodothyronine related to l'apos; age.
1	effect of age on collagen fibril formation	Impact of apo; age on collagen fibrillar formation.
1	collagen age and platelet aggregation	Age of collagen and aggregation platelet.
1	age differences in personality structure revisited studies in validity stability and change	Differences in personality structure and age have re-examined stability and change of validity studies.
1	comparison by autoradiography of macromolecular biosynthesis in young and old human diploid fibroblast cultures a brief note	Autoradiography comparison of macromolecular biosynthesis in young and old human diploid fibroblast cultures.
1	age related changes in protein turnover and ribonucleic acid of the diaphragm muscle of normal and dystrophic hamsters	Changes related to apo; age of protein turnover and l' ribonucleic acid of diaphragm in normal and dystrophic hamsters.
1	immunosurveillance and cancer epidemiologic observations	Cancer immunologic surveillance and epidemiological observation.
1	age related changes in chromatin of liver cell nuclei of different ploidity	Changes related to apo; chromatin age of liver cell nuclei of different ploidy types.
1	dependence of age and cell mediated immunity by newborn and adult children author s transl	Drug dependence; age and age; cell-mediated immunity in newborn-infants and in adult children.
1	image processing in pathology iv age dependent changes of morphometric features of liver cell nuclei in biopsies	Treatment of spinal cord injury; imagery in apo-dependent pathology iv; age changes in the morphometric characteristics of liver cell nuclei in biopsies.
1	effects of age sex and starvation on the turnover of plasma liver and breast muscle proteins in the japanese quail	Effects of sex and fasting on liver and breast muscle plasma protein turnover in Japanese quail.
1	historical aspects of suicide in the old age author s transl	Translation of historical aspects of suicide among older perpetrators.
1	causes motivations and tendencies of suicidal acts in old age author s transl	Causes of the motivations and trends of suicide among the translated authors of old age.
1	social psychological aspects of suicide in the old age author s transl	Psychosocial aspects of suicide among the elderly.
1	physiological age of the fleas and the analysis of age structure of natural population of xenopsylla gerbilli wagn	L' physiological age of fleas and leaflets; analysis of the age structure of the natural population of xenopsylla gererbilli wagnagnagn.
1	age dependent distribution of acidic glycosaminoglycans in human kidney tissue	Distribution of acidic glycosaminoglycans as determined by age in human renal tissue.
1	effect of age on nodule induction by azaserine and dna synthesis in rat pancreas	Effect of apos; age on apos; nodule induction by synthesis of apos; azoserin and apos; rat pancreatic DNA.
1	age related decline in receptivity in normal neonatally androgenized female and male hamsters	Apos-related decrease in receptivity; age in neonatal androgenated normal male and female hamsters.
1	the effect of age on the safety factor in neuromuscular transmission in the isolated diaphragm of the rat	The effect of age on the safety factor of neuromuscular transmission in isolated rat diaphragm.
1	age related changes in the lipids of the microsomal and the mitochondrial membranes of rat liver and kidney	Changes related to apos; age in microsomal and mitochondrial membrane lipids of rat liver and kidney are age-related.
1	gross histomorphological and histochemical changes in thyroid gland of goat with age ii occurrence of ultimobranchial follicles	Significant histomorphological and histochemical changes in goat thyroid gland with age ii occur in ultimobranchial follicles.
1	karyometric changes in human muscle with age	Karyometric changes in human muscle tissue with age.
1	tolerance induction as an index of age related changes	Tolerance induction as an index of changes related to age.
1	age related differences in binding of concanavalin a to plasma membranes of isolated neurons	Differences in the age of concanavalin a binding to plasma membranes of isolated neurons were observed.
1	age and sexual behavior of japanese macaques macaca fuscata	L' age and sexual behavior of Japanese macaques and macaca fuscata.
1	the age dependence of bile acid metabolism in rats	L' influence of age on bile acid metabolism in rats.
1	age dependent changes of the protein synthetic machinery of liver cell cytoplasm as revealed by electron microscopic morphometry	The age of the machinery of synthesis of hepatic cell cytoplasmic proteins, as revealed by electron microscopy morphometry.
1	age dependent metabolism and polymerisation of collagen author s transl	Metabolism and polymerization as a function of age; age of translational collagen authors.
1	warfarin sodium steady state plasma levels and patient age	Stable plasma levels of warfarin sodium and patient age.
1	development of plasma cortisol in calves from birth to 14 days of age	Development of plasma cortisol in calves from birth to age 14 days.
1	age at puberty in relation to age at marriage and parenthood a national longitudinal study	Age at puberty vs. age at marriage and paternity or maternity is a national longitudinal study.
1	variations in melanin content with age in the human substantia nigra	In the case of the human substance, the content of melanin varies with age.
1	age dependent changes in the activities of atpase and some pyridine nucleotide linked enzymes in the chick testis	In chicken testis, the activities of the enzymes associated with apos, atpase, and certain pyridine nucleotides are found to change with age.
1	prolactin cells of the human pituitary gland in old age	Prolactin cells of the apos; human pituitary in old age.
1	persistence of complementary afterimages as a function of adult age and exposure duration	The effect of the dose on the mortality of adult patients.
1	differences in unconspicuous word identification as a function of age and reversible figure training	Differences in the numbers; identification of discrete words as a function of age; and formation of reversible figures.
1	aging and semantic memory structural age differences	Aging and the semantic memory structural differences of age.
1	the possible use of sociological onsets in theory on the problem of age and surroundings author s transl	L' possible use of d' sociological sets in theory on the problem of l' age and environment was translated by the authors.
1	factors influencing diazepam pharmacokinetics age sex and liver disease	Gender and liver disease influences the pharmacokinetics of diazepam.
1	thyroid hormone concentrations in a large scale community survey effect of age sex illness and medication	Levels of thyroid hormones in pregnant women; a large-scale community survey of pregnant women; effects of gender-related diseases; age; and medications.
1	the effects of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two barbiturate anesthetics in rats	The effects of age and sex on acute toxicity of two barbiturate anesthetics in rats.
1	age changes in the quantity of hematopoietic tissue	Changes with age; age in amount of hematopoietic tissue.
1	age differences in short term memory and cell loss in the cortex of the rat	Differences in age, short-term memory, and cell loss in rat cortical tissue.
1	tissue specificity and age changes for the pattern of the h1 group of histones in chromatin from mouse tissues	Tissue specificity and age changes in mouse tissue h1 group profile; histones in mouse tissue chromatin change.
1	distribution of monoamine oxidase in hippocampal region of the rat	Distribution of monoamine oxidase in the rat hippocampal region.
1	age differences in verbal mediation a structural and functional analysis	The differences between them; age in the verbal mediation a structural and functional analysis.
1	age differences in a controlled lag recognition memory task	Differences in speed; age in a time-controlled recognition memory (RMD) task.
1	instrumentality terminality values in relation to age	Values of l' terminal instrumentality in relation to age.
1	interactions between age and the neuroendocrine and immune systems	Interactions between age, neuroendocrine and immune systems.
1	a comparison of general and age specific factors associated with political behavior	Comparison of general and political factors; age of political behaviour.
1	age rate and instructional conditions empirical support against the pacing variable	Rates of death; age and conditions of death; teaching empirical support against the stimulus variable.
1	adult age differences in cognitive abilities and educational background	Age of adults in terms of cognitive ability and educational attainment.
1	age characteristics of dna replication in regenerating rat liver	Characteristics of onset; age of replication; DNA in regenerating rat liver.
1	effects of age and stimulus intensity of the far field auditory brain stem potentials in the laboratory mouse	Effects of age and age; intensity of auditory brain potential stimulus in a distant field in laboratory mice.
1	changes in the plasma clearance and protein binding of carbenoxolone with age and their possible relationship with adverse drug effects	Changes in plasma clearance and protein binding of carbenoxolone with age and its possible association with adverse drug reactions.
1	trials of influenza a new jersey 76 virus vaccine in normal children an overview of age related antigenicity and reactogenicity	New Jersey 76 influenza vaccine trials in normal children; overview of apo; antigenicity and reactogenicity related to apo; age.
1	age changes in the perception of comfortable mandibular occlusal positions	Changes in apo; age in perception of comfortable mandibular occlusion.
1	the significance of age changes in human alveolar mucosa and bone	L' importance of cellular changes; age in alveolar mucosa and human bones.
1	histochemical and biochemical changes in human skeletal muscle with age in sedentary males age 22 65 years	Histochemical and biochemical changes in human skeletal muscle with apos; age in 22-65 year sedentary males.
1	work capacity in women in relation to age as judged from a maximal work performance test	A maximum work performance test was used to assess women's ability to work in relation to their age.
1	creative productivity age and stress a biographical time series analysis of 10 classical composers	Age of Creative Productivity and Emphasis on a biographical time series analysis of 10 classical composers.
1	vitamin d hydroxylation in youth and old age	Vitamin d hydroxylation in the elderly and the young.
1	age dependent increase in the non specific cholinesterase activity of the capillaries in the rat neostriatum	Lapos-dependent increase; age of onset; non-specific capillary cholinesterase activity in rat neostriatum.
1	hair analysis of trace minerals in human subjects as influenced by age sex and contraceptive drugs	The analysis of the traces of minerals in the hair of human subjects is influenced by factors such as age, sex and birth control.
1	the role of memory in the age decline in digit symbol substitution performance	The role of memory in the decline of memory; age in the substitution performance of the numeric symbol.
1	orienting task effects on edr and free recall in three age groups	Orientation of the effects of tasks on er and free recall in three age groups.
1	hepatitis b virus infections among danish dentists	Infections with the hepatitis B virus in Danish dentists.
1	age related differences in the disposition of acetanilide	Differences related to age; age in dosage form; acetanilide.
1	effects of age diet and lactation on lipogenesis in rat adipose liver and mammary tissues	Effects of diet and lactation on lipogenesis in adipose liver and breast tissue of the rat.
1	the effect of age on neuromuscular transmission	The effects of age on neuromuscular transmission.
1	structural and replicative forms of mitochondrial dna from human leukocytes in relation to age	Structural and replicative forms of the epos; mitochondrial DNA of human leukocytes as a function of age.
1	age dependent alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity changes in mutant and wild type drosophila melanogaster	Apos changes; apos activity; alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase as a function of apos; mutant and wild type drosophila melanogaster age.
1	influence of age on the immunological activity and capacity of the cba mouse	Influence of body weight; age of body weight; activity and immunological capacity of mouse.
1	limits of several cell nucleus reactions in old age and in the presence of a pathological process	Limits of many reactions of the cell nucleus in old age and in the presence of a pathological process.
1	burned out schizophrenia evidence for age effects on schizophrenic symptomatology	Evidence of schizophrenia for the effects of age on schizophrenic symptomatology has vanished.
1	cardiovascular disease and changes in intellectual functioning from middle to old age	Cardiovascular diseases and changes in intellectual functioning between the middle and the end of life.
1	endogenous steroid levels in the human prostate from birth to old age a comparison of normal and diseased tissues	Rates of endogenous steroids in the human prostate from birth to old age; comparison of normal and diseased tissues.
1	description of age depending cellular changes in the human tonsil	Description of the disease; age as a function of cellular changes in the human amygdala.
1	sex and generational differences in senior apperception technique projections	Gender and generational differences in projection of techniques; perception of elders.
1	metacarpal morphometry in monozygotic dizygotic elderly twins	Metacarpal morphometry in monozygotic dizygotic elderly twins.
1	subsynaptic plate perforations changes with age and experience in the rat	Perforations of subsynaptic plaques change with age and rat experience.
1	effect of age on acute morphine response in the rat	Effect of apo; age on acute response to morphine in rats.
1	visual short term memory response delay and age	Short-term, visual memory response time and age.
1	serum magnesium circadian rhythm in human adults with respect to age sex and mental status	Circadian magnesium rhythm in adults with respect to age, sex, and mental status.
1	the role of the adenohypophysis in connection with changes in the thyroid caused by old age author s transl	The role of the adenohypophysis in relation to thyroid changes caused by the aging of the apos; transl.
1	a modification of the gompertz plot resulting from the age index by ries and an approximation of the survivorship curve author s transl	A modification of the gompertz graph resulting from the index of age by age and an approximation of the survival curve translation by the authors.
1	prenatal diagnosis a psychological study ii pregnancy after the age of 40 author s transl	Prenatal diagnosis, psychological study ii pregnancy after birth; age 40.
1	age related dynamics of outpatient forms of schizophrenia on the age related dynamics of so called latent schizophrenia in light of late catamneses in senescence	Dynamics related to apos; age of external forms of schizophrenia on the dynamics related to apos; age of what are called latent light schizophrenia of late catamneses of senescence.
1	a quantitative study of peripheral nerve fibres in the mouse following the administration of drugs 1 age changes in untreated cba mice from 3 to 21 months of age	A quantitative study of peripheral nerve fibers in mice after dosing; drug administration; and age 1 changes in untreated cba mice aged 3 to 21 months.
1	age related changes in the composition and structure of human articular cartilage proteoglycans	Changes related to apo; age in proteoglycan composition and structure of human articular cartilage.
1	effect of age on amnesia and sedation induced by flunitrazepam during local anaesthesia for bronchoscopy	Effect of the apos; age on apos; amnesia and sedation induced by flunitrazepam during apos; local anesthesia for bronchoscopy.
1	age associated changes in microvasculature of human adult testis	Changes associated with apo placentae; age in the microvasculature of adult human testes.
1	an unusual sex steroid binding protein in mature male rat liver cytosol	An unusual sex steroid binding protein in the cytosol of mature male rat liver.
1	lipolytic response of rat adipocytes to epinephrine effect of age and cell size	Lipolytic reaction of rat adipocytes to apos; effect of apos; epinephrine according to apos; age and cell size.
1	problem solving as a function of age sex and the role appropriateness of the problem content	Problem solving based on gender; age and age; relevance to the role of the content of the problem.
1	genitourinary disorders of old age therapeutic considerations including counseling for sexual dysfunction	Genetic Disorders @- urinary age; mature therapeutic considerations, including counseling for sexual dysfunction.
1	some age related changes in pituitary adrenal function in the male laboratory rat	Changes in pituitary adrenal function related to apos; age in male laboratory rats.
1	changes in coagulation effects by venoms of crotalus atrox as snakes age	Modification of the effects of coagulation by crotalus atrox snake venoms as snakes age.
1	colonization of teeth in humans by streptococcus mutans as related to its concentration in saliva and host age	Human streptococcus mutans colonization of teeth is related to its concentration in the saliva and the age of the host.
1	age related susceptibility to pseudomonas aeruginosa ocular infections in mice	Ocular infections caused by Pseudomonas aeruginosa in mice as a function of age.
1	endothelial cell population changes of human cornea during life	Changes in the life history endothelial cell population of the human cornea.
1	age changes in the triangular fibrocartilage of the wrist joint	Apo changes; age in the triangular apo fibrotilage; wrist joint.
1	the relationship between brain weight and head circumference from birth to age 18 years	Ratio of the weight of the brain to the head circumference from birth to age 18 years.
1	the motor activity as an age parameter of the rat authors transl	L' motor activity as a parameter for translation; age of rat authors.
1	the effect of age on the distensibility of the abdominal aorta of man	The effects of the apo; age on the distensibility of the apo; abdominal aorta; man.
1	the tensile strength of human zonule and its alteration with age author s transl	The tensile strength of the human zonule and its alteration with the apos; age of translation of the author.
1	structural basis for the changing physical properties of human pulmonary vessels with age	Structural basis of the apos; evolution of the physical properties of human pulmonary vessels with age.
1	perinatal methadone exposure and its influence on the behavioral ontogeny of rats	Perinatal exposure to methadone and its influence on behavioural ontogeny of rats.
1	variation of chemical composition with age in human femoral head cartilage	Variation in chemical composition as a function of age in the femoral cartilage of the human head.
1	age related changes in cholesterol and bile acid metabolism in rats	Changes in liver weight; age of cholesterol and bile acid metabolism in rats.
1	isoelectric spectra of liver tissue and blood serum albumin for rabbits of different age	Isoelectric spectrum of liver tissue and serum albumin of blood in rabbits of various ages.
1	are loss of glistening of normal colour and increased friability normal aspects of the oesophagus in old age author s transl	Loss of l' brightness of normal color and increase of friability normal aspects of l' esophagus in the translation of the older authors.
1	an investigation into the variation of human contrast sensitivity with age and ocular pathology	A study of variation in sensitivity of human contrasts with age and ocular pathology.
1	a histologic study of age changes in the adult human periodontal joint ligament	A histological study of changes in the age profile of the adult human periodontal joint ligament.
1	dystrophic mice show age related muscle fibre and myelinated axon losses	Dystrophic mice show loss of muscle fibers and myelinated axons related to age.
1	influence of age on metal metabolism and toxicity	Impact of pH; age on metal metabolism and toxicity.
1	changes in igg2 levels with age in british cattle	Change in egg levels; igg2 with age; age in British cattle.
1	effect of age cardiovascular disease and vasomotor changes on transmission of arterial pressure waves through the lower extremities	Effect of cardiovascular disease and vasomotor changes in the lower limbs on the transmission of blood pressure.
1	age associated pathological changes in male rats	"""Age associated pathological changes in male rats,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
1	age related changes of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats	Changes in the glomerular basement membrane related to lacidosis; age in normal rats.
1	quantitative estimation of age related thickening of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats	Quantitative estimation of apos; thickening related to apos; age of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats.
1	brake reaction time effects of age sex and carbon monoxide	Effects of age and carbon monoxide on the sex-induced braking response time.
1	autoradiographic demonstration of dna repair synthesis in ganglion cells of aquarium fish at various age in vivo	Autoradiography demonstrates the synthesis of repair of DNA in ganglion cells from fishes; aquarium at various ages in vivo.
1	preparing for old age necessity possibilities contents limits	Being prepared for the necessities of old age limits the content of opportunities.
1	age and familiarity in memory scanning	Age and familiarity in the analysis of memory.
1	differences and changes with age in the benton visual retention test	Differences and changes with age; age in age; benton visual retention test.
1	eeg changes in old age normal and pathological	Eeg changes in normal and pathological aging.
1	changes in the sensitivity of dopamine receptors in the nucleus accumbens and in the striatum induced by chronic ethanol administration	Changes in the sensitivity of dopaminergic receptors in the nucleus accumbens and striatum induced by apos; chronic administration of d' ethanol.
1	lead and cadmium in hair as an indicator of body burden in rats of different age	Hair lead and cadmium as an indicator of body burden in rats of different ages.
1	hyaluronate in articular cartilage age related changes	Hyaluronate in changes related to the age of articular cartilage.
1	age related changes in penile erections and circulating testosterone in middle aged male rats	Changes related to apo; age of penile erections and circulating testosterone in male Dapo rats; mean age.
1	change in taste preference related to aging of taste cells in rat	Change in taste preference due to aging of rat gustatory cells.
1	influence of age on the renal renin response to a high salt intake in the rat	L' influence of l' age on renal renin response to high salt uptake in rat.
1	influence of age on the modifications of cerebral electrogenesis in the curarized rat induced by acute and repeated asphyxic anoxia	The influence of age; age on changes in brain function; cerebral electrogenesis in curated rats induced by acute and repeated asphyxiation.
1	age differences in perceptual style selective attention and perceptual motor reaction time	The differences in age in the perceptual style attract attention, selective attention and perceptual motor reaction time.
1	age isometric knee extension strength and fractionated resisted response time	The isometric resistance to apos; knee extension and response time fractionation resisted apos; age.
1	associative symmetry and item availability evidence for qualitative age differences in acquisition strategies	The associative symmetry and the availability of objects demonstrate the existence of qualitative differences between objects, their age, and their acquisition strategies.
1	age related differences in serial binary classification	Differences related to age and sex; age in binary serials.
1	microhardness measurement of the cartilage of the human femur head	Measurement of cartilage microhardness of the human femur head.
1	polycardiographic researches on over 90 years old subjects author s transl	Cardiographic research on subjects over 90 years of age.
1	age related changes in the colonic blood supply their relevance to ischaemic colitis	Changes in colic blood supply related to age are related to ischemic colitis.
1	conservatism innovation and old age	Conservative innovation and the aging process.
1	performance on tests of power and speed as related to age among male job applicants	In the case of a male job applicant, performance in power and speed tests as a function of age.
1	age and social composition factors as explanations for cleavages in socio political values	Factors related to age and social composition explain socio-political divisions.
1	evidence for an endocrine function of the human pineal gland chairman s introduction	In addition, there is the possibility of an endocrine function in the body; the introduction of the president of the human pineal gland.
1	quantitative age dependent variations in dendritic spines in the hippocampus ca1 ca3 and fascia dentata of the albino mouse	Age of dendritic spines; hippocampus ca1 ca3 and fascia dentata of albino mouse.
1	age related pharmacokinetics of high dose methotrexate in patients with osteosarcoma	A dose-dependent pharmacokinetics of methotrexate; age in patients with apo; osteosarcoma.
1	levels of the serum amyloid a protein saa in normal persons of different age groups	Levels of apo; serum amyloid a protein saa in normal people in different groups of people; age.
1	sex related differences in diurnal activities and development of hepatic microsomal 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase and cholesterol 7alpha hydroxylase	Gender differences in diurnal activities and development of etapos; hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme has hepatic microsomal reductase and cholesterol 7alpha hydroxylase 7alpha hydroxylase.
1	higher corticosterone values at a fixed single timepoint in serum from mice trained by prior handling	Higher corticosterone values at a fixed time point in prehandled mouse serum.
1	effects of age on brain oxidative metabolism in vivo	Effects of age on the oxidative metabolism of the brain in vivo.
1	the distribution and lipid composition of ultracentrifugally separated lipoproteins of young and old rat plasma	The distribution and lipid composition of ultracentrifugated separated lipoproteins in the plasma of young and old rats.
1	age dependent changes in the excretion of urinary proteins by the rat	Changes according to age; age in onset; urinary protein excretion by rat.
1	age related changes in purkinje fiber action potentials of adult dogs	Changes related to age; age of potential; action of purkinid fibers in adult dogs.
1	age differences in peripheral perceptual processing a monoptic backward masking investigation	Differences in age in peripheral perception deal with a retrogressive, one-sided survey masking reality.
1	change with age of anisotropic properties of collagen bundles	The anisotropic properties of collagen beams will change with age.
1	quantitative age related histologic changes in the human vas deferens	Quantitative histological changes related to age; age in human vas deferens.
1	histocompatibility linked genetic control of susceptibility to age dependent polioencephalomyelitis in mice	Genetic control of susceptibility to apo-dependent polioencephalomyelitis in mice was linked to histocompatibility.
1	stereological analysis of hepatic fine structure in the fischer 344 rat influence of sublobular location and animal age	L' Fischer 344 rat stereological analysis of hepatic fine structure influences sublobular localization and l' age of animal.
1	dihydropteridine reductase activity of adult fetal and neoplastic tissues	Dihydropteridin reductase activity in adult neoplastic and fetal tissue.
1	influence of age on results of vestibular function tests review of literature and presentation of caloric test results	Influence of vestibular function tests; age on vestibular function test results Review of literature and presentation of calorific test results.
1	hepatic lipid metabolism age related changes in triglyceride metabolism	Liver lipid metabolism, age, changes in triglyceride metabolism.
1	the interaction between age and list length in free recall	L' interaction between the apos; age and length of the list during a free reminder.
1	age effects on event related potentials in a selective attention task	Effects of Initia; Age on potentials related to Initia; event in a task of Initia; selective attention.
1	age differences in relationships between crystallized and fluid intelligences and problem solving	Differences between them; age in the relationships between crystallized and fluid intelligences and problem solving.
1	urinary glycopeptides and glycosaminoglycans in children and adults as affected by age	Urinary glycopeptides and glycosaminoglycans in children and adults, depending on age.
1	age dependent structural changes in human neuronal chromatin	Structural changes in human neural chromatin as a function of age.
1	some observations in the fine structure of age changes of the mouse retinal pigment epithelium	Some observations in the fine structure of apo changes; apo age; mouse retinal pigment epithelium.
1	regional differences in the timing of synapse elimination in skeletal muscles of the neonatal rabbit	Regional differences in neonatal rabbit timing; elimination of synapses in neonatal rabbit skeletal muscle.
1	pharmacological analysis of the functional ontogeny of the nigrostriatal dopaminergic neurons	Pharmacological analysis of the functional ontogeny of neuronal dopaminergic nigrostriatals.
1	effects of age strain and dietary carbohydrate on the hepatic metabolism of male rats	Dosage-related effects of age and dietary carbohydrate on hepatic metabolism in male rats.
1	age related changes in the content of the collagen crosslink pyridinoline	Changes related to l' age of the pyridinoline reticulate collagen content.
1	deficiency of calcitonin in age related osteoporoses	Calcitonin deficiency in osteoporosis related to apos; age.
1	age related susceptibility of mice to staphylococcal infection	Staphylococcal infection (STI): sensitivity of mice to disease as a function of age.
1	resolution of age dependent reference intervals polynomial regression methodology with applicability to plasma zinc levels in a childhood population	Resolution of age-dependent reference intervals; polynomial regression method with applicability to plasma zinc levels in a children's population.
1	studies of age related changes in the metabolism of eosin in the rat	Studies of eosin-related changes; age of metabolism of eosin in rats.
1	adaptive physiopathology of advanced age	Adaptive Physiopathology of Escherichia coli; advanced age.
1	age dependence of mechanical parameters in rat skin following repeated strain	Lapos; effect of apos; age on mechanical parameters of rat skin following apos; repeat strain dependent on apos; age.
1	the role of the physician in the preparation of adults for old age	The doctor's role in preparing adults for old age.
1	digoxin in the elderly pharmacokinetic consequences of old age	Digoxin in the pharmacokinetic consequences of aging in the elderly.
1	secretion of prostatic binding protein by rat ventral prostate influence of age and androgen	The secretion of the prostate binding protein by the ventral prostate of the rat influences age and and androgen.
1	human pharmacokinetics of nitrazepam effect of age and diseases	Pharmacokinetics of humans; effect of nitrazepam on age and disease.
1	low serum triiodothyronine and high serum reverse triiodothyronine in old age an effect of disease not age	Low serum triiodothyronine and high serum reverse triiodothyronine in the elderly, a disease-related effect unrelated to age.
1	age related response of plasma testosterone delta 4 androstenedione and cortisol to adrenocorticotropin in infants children and adults	Testosterone plasma delta 4 androstenedione and cortisol response to adrenocorticotropin.
1	regional differences of neuron loss of rat brain in old age	"""Regional differences of neuron loss of rat brain in old age,"" Neurology."
1	age related changes of the pattern of non histone chromatin proteins from rat and mouse liver chromatin	Apos-related changes; age of nonhistone chromatin protein profile of rat and mouse liver chromatin.
1	kinetic parameters of calcium metabolism and femur morphometry in rats i influence of sex and age	Sex and age were influenced by kinetic parameters of calcium metabolism and femoral morphometry in rats.
1	age related changes in the nigrostriatum a behavioral and biochemical analysis	Changes related to apo; age in nigrostriatum a behavioural and apo; biochemical analysis.
1	the relationship of age and level of physical activity with the fractionated components of patellar reflex time	Relationship between age and level of activity and fractionated components of patellar reflex time.
1	age related differences in binocular backward masking with visual noise	Apos-related differences; age in binocular masking towards the apos; rear end with visual noise.
1	age changes cohort differences and cultural change on the guilford zimmerman temperament survey	Changes in age, cohort differences and cultural changes in the population; survey of the temperament of the Guildford zimmerman.
1	changes in the specific activity of n acetyl beta d hexosaminidase in the rat epididymis with age	Changes in apo; specific activity of nacetyl beta hexosaminidase in apo; rat epididyme with age.
1	effect of sex and sex role in later life report of a seminar by prof margaret hellie huyck april 1978	Sex effect and role of sex in later life report d' seminar by Professor Margaret Hellie Huyck April 1978.
1	the effect of age on the absorption and excretion of lead	The effects of lead poisoning; age; absorption and death; lead excretion.
1	body fat at puberty in rats alteration by changes in diet	In rats, body fat at puberty is altered by dietary changes.
1	the hand in diabetes study of 97 diabetics compared to a control group	Hand in hand; study of diabetes in a control group of 97 diabetics.
1	palatal sensitivity to touch correlation with age	Palatal sensitivity to tactile correlation with age.
1	age and aerobic power in women a longitudinal study	L' age and aerobic potency in Canadian women, a longitudinal study.
1	age differences in resolving power and decision strategies in a weight discrimination task	Differences in age in resolving power and decision-making strategies in weight discrimination.
1	effects of varying irrelevant information on adult age differences in problem solving	Effects of variation in age; irrelevant information on differences in age; and age of adults in problem solving.
1	respective influence of extrinsic and intrinsic factors on the age related decrease of thymic secretion	L' influence of extrinsic and intrinsic factors on decrease in thymic secretion related to l' age decreased.
1	age related changes in sebaceous gland activity	Changes in age; sebaceous gland activity as a function of age.
1	age related changes in the mechanical properties of human skin	Apos-related changes; age in mechanical properties of human skin.
1	ontogeny of maternal behavior in the laboratory rat early origins in 18 to 27 day old young	Laboratory rat ontogeny of maternal behaviour is in progress; early onset of birth in 18- to 27-day-old young.
1	effect of a saccharose diet on the enzymatic activity and the metabolite content from carbohydrate metabolism in the saliva of rats of varying age	Effect of sucrose-based diets on the lipids; enzyme activity and the metabolite content of carbohydrate metabolism in rat saliva; different ages.
1	cyclophosphamide eliminates suppressor t cells in age associated central regulation of delayed hypersensitivity in mice	Cyclophosphamide eliminates the t-suppressor cells associated with the apos; age of central regulation of the apos; delayed hypersensitivity in mice.
1	age dependent gene induction in the quail oviduct viii a survey of experimental data	Gene induction as a function of age; age in quail oviduct viii, study of experimental data.
1	effect of an episode of severe malnutrition and age on lactose absorption by recovered infants and children	Effect of vomiting; an episode of severe malnutrition and vomiting; age on vomiting; absorption of lactose by recovered infants and children.
1	influence of age on bronchial mucociliary transport	Influence of the apos; age on mucociliary transport bronchus.
1	depth and elaboration of processing in relation to age	Depth and location; development of facilities; treatment development in relation to age.
1	spiral ganglion cell counts in an age graded series of rat cochleas	Counting of spiral ganglion cells in a series of cochleas of age-different rats.
1	effect of age on axoplasmic transport of cholinesterase in rat sciatic nerves	Effect of age on the axoplasmic transport of cholinesterase in the sciatic nerves of the rat.
1	mouse erythropoietic stem cell lines function normally 100 months loss related to number of transplantations	Mice erythropoietic stem cell lines function normally for 100 months, loss due to the number of transplants.
1	age related changes in glycerolipid formation in lean and obese zucker rats	Changes related to apos; age of glycerolipid formation in lean and obese zucker rats.
1	plasma lipoprotein changes in suckling and weanling rabbits fed semipurified diets	Changes in plasma lipoproteins in suckled and weaned rabbits fed purified semi-diets.
1	influence of sex and age on febrile responses to peripheral and central administration of pyrogens in the rabbit	Influence of sex and age; age on febrile responses to apos; peripheral and central administration of pyrogens in rabbits.
1	changes with age in copper and superoxide dismutase levels in brains of c57bl 6j mice	Changes with age; age of the copper and superoxide dismutase levels in brain of c57bl 6j mice.
1	combined effects of hla matching and age in renal transplantation	Combined effects of age in renal transplants.
1	serum cholesterol levels of males and females in different age groups in south india	Serum cholesterol levels of men and women in different age groups in the south of the country; India.
1	changes with age in cadmium and copper levels in c57bl 6j mice	Change with pH; age of cadmium and copper concentrations in 6j c57bl mice.
1	prolyl 3 hydroxylase and 4 hydroxylase activities in certain rat and chick embryo tissues and age related changes in their activities in the rat	Prolyl-3 hydroxylase and 4 hydroxylase activities in certain tissues of rat and chick embryos and changes related to them; age of activity in rat.
1	aging and conservatism cohort changes in attitudes about legalized abortion	The age and conservatism cohort changed attitudes toward legalizing abortion.
1	peripheral autonomic changes accompanying learning and reaction time performance in older people	Peripheral autonomous changes accompanying learning; learning and reaction time in the elderly.
1	normal values of total serum ige in children from birth to 16 years of age	Normal values of serum weight; total serum weight in children from birth to age 16.
1	analysis of ribosomal proteins from adult drosophila melanogaster in relation to age	Analysis of adult Drosophila melanogaster ribosomal proteins in relation to age.
1	some remarks on assessing morphologic changes in old demented people	A few remarks on apos; assessment of morphological changes in the elderly with dementia.
1	effect of age on arden grating acuity	Effect of apos; age on apos; acuity of the arden network.
1	severe hypernatremia caused by age isolation and obstructive uropathy	Severe hypernatremia due to apo; elderly isolation and lupus; obstructive uropathy.
1	endocrine function of the ovaries of blue foxes alopex ladopus during postnatal ontogenesis	Endocrine functions of blue fox alopex ladopus ovaries during postnatal ontogenesis.
1	age dependent changes in the specificity of trna methyltransferases in the cerebellum of the icteric and nonicteric gunn rat	Changes in specificity of trna methyltransferases in icteric and non-dicteric rat cerebellum as a function of age.
1	bipolar affective disorder in old age	"""Bipolar affective disposition in old age."" 3."
1	influence of the age of the recipient on the manifestation of the effect of allogeneic inhibition	Causes; influence of age of recipient on manifestation of apo; effect of apo; allogenic inhibition.
1	secretion of growth hormone in men and women during the reproductive age in aged men and menopausal women with or without estrogens or progesterone	Emission of apo; growth hormone in men and women of child-bearing age, with or without estrogen or progesterone, in men and women of post-menopausal age.
1	maturational changes in adrenal xenobiotic metabolism in male and female guinea pigs	Stimulation of xenobiotic adrenal metabolism in male and female guinea pigs.
1	age related changes resembling fibrocystic disease in iodine blocked rat breasts	Changes related to age, resembling a fibrocystic disease in the apos; iodine, blocked rat breasts.
1	effect of hydrocortisone on the state of liver chromatin in rats of different age	Effects of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; hepatic chromatin status in rats of different ages.
1	age related degenerative changes in the mouse mandibular joint	Degenerative changes due to age in the mandibular articulation of the mouse.
1	age related changes in rat muscle collagen	Changes in muscle age; age in rat muscle collagen.
1	effect of age and short term cold stress on sdh activity and oxygen consumption of lizard brain	Effect of age and short-term cold on appetite, sdh activity and food consumption; oxygen in the lizard's brain.
1	analysis and exploration of age related changes in mammalian structure and function	Analysis and exploration of changes related to age; age in mammalian structure and function.
1	age related changes in function of transfer ribonucleic acid of rat livers	Changes related to apos; age in the liver transfer function; rat liver ribonucleic acid.
1	human articular cartilage in relation to age a morphometric study	Human articular cartilage in relation to age; morphometric study.
1	changes in renal function in middle and old age established by isotopic nephrography	Changes in renal function at baseline; mean age and advanced age, as determined by isotopic nephrography.
1	gender differences in open field behavior as a function of age	Differences between the sexes in behaviour in the field as a function of age.
1	developmental changes in visual orienting behavior to featural versus structural information in the human infant	Developmental behavioural changes in apo; visual orientation vs. apo; nature vs. structure information in human infant.
1	change in response with age of human articular cartilage to plasma somatomedin activity	Modification of human articular cartilage response to apos; plasma somatomedin activity with apos; age.
1	a clinico pathological survey of thyroid glands in old age	A clinical-pathological study of thyroid glands in the elderly.
1	developmental changes in malpighian tubule cell structure	Developmental changes in the cellular structure of the squamous tubules.
1	age related variations in the testes and prostate of beagle dogs	Variations in testis and prostate as a function of age; age in beagle dogs.
1	changes in pituitary and thyroid function with increasing age in young male rats	Changes in the pituitary and thyroid function with apos; age in young male rats.
1	effect of age on testicular function in patients with klinefelter s syndrome	Effect of Lapse; age on testicular function in patients with klinefelter syndrome.
1	age related variations in cortical bone remodeling measurements in male beagles 10 to 26 months of age	Changes related to apo; age of otos remodeling measurements; cortical bones in males from 10 to 26 months.
1	morphological and biochemical studies on the development of cholinergic properties in cultured sympathetic neurons ii dependence on postnatal age	Morphological and biochemical studies on the development of cholinergic properties in cultivated sympathetic neurons ii dependence on the postnatal age.
1	age related changes of calcitonin secretion in females	Changes in calcitonin secretion related to apos; female age.
1	thymic changes in muscular dystrophy and evidence for an abnormality related to prostaglandin synthesis or action	Thymic changes in muscular dystrophy and evidence of synthesis or lacidosis; action of prostaglandins.
1	effect of age on immune function in terms of chemically induced cancers	Effect of Lapos; age on immune function in terms of chemically induced cancers.
1	the influence of stimulus age and sex on person perception	L' influence of age and gender of stimulus on perception of the individual.
1	differences in the magnitude of the delboeuf illusion and usnadze effect during adulthood	Differences in body weight; extent of vision; delboeuf and delboeuf illusion; usnadze effect; adult age.
1	age related differences in two stages of central perceptual processes the effects of short duration targets and criterion differences	Differences related to age, age at two stages of central perceptual processes, and effects of short-term targets and criteria differences.
1	intracellular distribution of copper and zinc in sheep effect of age and dietary levels of the metals	Intracellular distribution of copper and zinc in sheep Effect of pH; age and metal food levels.
1	iodoamino acid distribution and weight of the thyroid gland t4 serum level and t4 metabolism in relation to diet body fat content and age of rats	Distribution of iodoamino acids and weight of thyroid gland, serum t4 and t4 metabolism in relation to diet, body fat and age of rats.
1	fine structural changes in the liver of young and old rats as influenced by microsomal enzyme inducers	Mild structural changes in the liver of young and aged rats are influenced by microsomal enzyme inducers.
1	maturation of nerve conduction velocity from birth to 5 years of age	Maturity of nerve conduction velocity from birth to birth; age of 5 years.
1	age related effects on the incorporation of acetate into rat liver histones	Effects related to apo; age on apo; incorporation of apo; acetate into rat liver histones.
1	generational and other differences between males and females in problem drinking and its treatment	Generational and other differences between men and women with regard to problematic alcohol consumption and treatment.
1	age dependent changes in the latency of the pattern visual evoked potential	Changes in the profile latency as a function of age were also suggestive of visual potential.
1	hearing and age research challenges and the national institute on aging	The Challenges of Population Health Research; Hearing and Literacy; Aging and Literacy; and the National Institute of Aging.
1	age pigments cell loss and hippocampal function	Loss of pigment cells; age and function of age; seahorse.
1	involution of genital function with age studied as an index aging in drosophila melanogaster	L' involution of genital function with age; age was studied as an index of aging in Drosophila melanogaster.
1	age related differences in salt taste acuity	Differences related to age; age; taste of salt.
1	age associated changes in activities of rat hepatocytes i protein synthesis	Changes associated with protein synthesis; age in protein synthesis; rat hepatocyte activity.
1	intraperitoneal systemic anaphylaxis in the mouse i age dependence of fatal anaphylactic shock	Intraperitoneal systemic anaphylaxis in mice; age of fatal anaphylactic shock.
1	age related and thymus dependent rejection of adenovirus 2 transformed cell tumors in the syrian hamster	The rejection of age-related, thymus-dependent adenovirus 2 (ADV2) has transformed cellular tumors in the Syrian hamster.
1	changes of dna ligases in chick neural retina as a function of age	Changes in apo ligases; neural retina DNA of chicken as a function of age.
1	circadian changes in adrenal dopamine beta hydroxylase activity dependency of change at darkness onset and the effect of pinealectomy on animal strain and age	Circadian variations of epos; adrenal dopamine beta hydroxylase activity are dependent on changes in onset of apo; darkness and apo; effect of pinealectomy on animal strain and age.
1	processing by the thymus is not required for cells that cure and populate w wv recipients	Thymus treatment is not necessary for cells that heal and populate blood recipients.
1	age related changes of renal osteodystrophy	Changes in age; age of onset; renal osteodystrophy.
1	gonadotropin binding and testicular function in old rats	Gonadotropin binding and testicular function in older rats.
1	age related changes in the testicular and antler cycles of reindeer rangifer tarandus	Age in testis and antler cycles of rangifer tarandus reindeer.
1	biochemical studies on collagen and connectin from human skeletal muscle age related changes in the properties of elasticity author s transl	Biochemical studies of collagen and human skeletal muscle connectin related to apos; age of skeletal muscle changes in muscle properties; authorship; translastic elasticity.
1	the cholinergic system in old age and alzheimer s disease	The cholinergic system in old age and Alzheimer's disease.
1	aminazine distribution in the organs and tissues of rats depending on the routes of administration and the age of the animals	Distribution of apo; aminazine in organs and tissues of rats by administration and administration; age of animals.
1	the touch corpuscles of the plantar surface of the big toe histological and histometrical investigations with respect to age	Tactile plant surface bodies from histological and histometric studies of large toes as a function of age.
1	age changes in the livers of costa ricans	Changes in age; age in liver of Costa Ricans.
1	changes in the activity and distribution of the ribosomal dissociation factor of rat liver during growth	Changes in the activity and distribution of rat liver ribosomal dissociation factor during growth.
1	corticotroph cells of the human pituitary in old age	Corticotrophic cells of the apos; human pituitary in old age.
1	age related changes in the immune system of mice of eight medium and long lived strains and hybrids ii short and long term effects of natural infection with parainfluenza type 1 virus sendai	Changes related to apo; age in the immune system of mice from eight strains and hybrids with medium and long life spans ii Short- and long-term effects of apo; natural infection with Parainfluenza type 1 sentai virus.
1	the effect of age on the protein degradation system in the nematode turbatrix aceti	L' effect of age on protein degradation system in turbatrix aceti nematode.
1	testosterone and testosterone precursors in the spermatic vein and in the testicular tissue of old men reduced oxygen supply may explain the relative increase of testicular progesterone and 17 alpha hydroxyprogesterone content and production in old age	The precursors of testosterone and testosterone in the spermatic vein and testicular tissue of older men may explain the relative increase in testicular progesterone content and 17 alpha-hydroxyprogesterone and production in old age.
1	comparative ultrastructural study of the optic nerves and visual cortices of young 2 5 months and old 17 months mice	Comparative study of the ultrastructure of optical nerves and visual cortices in 2- to 5-month-old 17-month-old mice.
1	age related differences in lactate distribution kinetics following maximal exercise	Differences related to age; age in lactate distribution kinetics after maximal exercise.
1	effect of age on contractility of guinea pig ureter	Effect of apo; age on guinea pig contractility.
1	age related changes of the mineral component content in the hemolymph of 2d and 3d stage larvae of the reindeer warble fly hypodermatidae	Changes related to apos; age of mineral content in apos; hemolymph of instar 2d and 3d reindeer fly larvae hypodermatidae.
1	age differences in the effects of perceptual noise	Differences in age in perceptual noise effects.
1	postnatal changes in urinary prostaglandin e excretion in premature infants	Postnatal changes in urinary prostaglandins and excretion in preemies.
1	age dependent constitution of chondroitin sulfate isomers in cartilage proteoglycans under associative conditions	Composition of chondroitin sulfate isomers as a function of age; proteoglycan age of cartilage under associative conditions.
1	changes in rat gastric proteases with age effect of hydrocortisone	Changes in the rat gastric proteases with apos; effect of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; age.
1	age related changes in the transmembrane potential of isolated rabbit sino atrial nodes and atria	Changes related to apo; age of transmembrane potential of isolated rabbit atrial ganglia and sino atria.
1	acoustically evoked potential dependence upon age	L' acoustics allowed us to talk about the potential for dependency on age.
1	the effects of age upon the visual perception of speech	The effects of age and language on visual perception of speech.
1	the first night effect revisited with age as a variable	The first nocturnal effect has returned with l' age as a variable.
1	achievement aggression and perceived adult age stages	Achievement of goals and objectives Aggressiveness and perception of stages of life; adulthood.
1	the effects of age and sex on the factor structure of the wechsler memory scale	The effects of age and gender on the structure of the factor; the effects of memory scale Wechsler.
1	age changes in bone mineralization cortical thickness and haversian canal area	Changes in age; age; thickness of bone mineralization and haversian channel area.
1	lipids in accessory sex glands of immature mature and castrated male rats	Lipids in the accessory sex glands of immature, mature or castrated male rats.
1	psychological problems of incurable patients in old age author s transl	Translation of psychological problems of patients who are incurable in the elderly.
1	effects of age and frequency of ejaculation on sperm production and extragonadal sperm reserves in stallions	Effect of age; age and frequency; ejaculation on sperm production and extragonadal sperm reserves in stallions and stallions.
1	age and sex differences on preferred listening rates for speech	It is important to note that there are differences in the rates of speech, age and gender.
1	variation with age in the volumes of grey and white matter in the cerebral hemispheres of man measurements with an image analyser	Variation with l' age of volumes of grey and white matter in the brain hemispheres of l' man at l' help from a d&apos analyzer; images.
1	methadone exposure in utero developmental status at one and two years of age	Exposure to methadone in utero at 1 year and 2 years of age.
1	conditioned taste aversion as a function of age in mature male rats	Conditioned; taste aversion vs. age; age in mature male rats.
1	shifts toward risk in adults at three age levels	Trends in adult risk at three age levels.
1	effect of age on levels of diazepam in plasma and brain of rats	Effect of diazepam; age on plasma and brain diazepam levels in rats.
1	effects of age on the metabolism of thyroid hormones by rat brain tissue in vitro	The effects of apo; age on thyroid hormone metabolism by rat brain tissue in vitro.
1	effect of starvation and refeeding a high protein or high carbohydrate diet on lipid composition and glycogen content of rat livers in relation to age	Effect of fasting and refeeding on the lipid composition and glycogen content of rat liver as a function of age; a protein- or carbohydrate-rich diet.
1	influence of adult age on the skeletal response to phosphate and estrogen in rats	Influence of apo; adult age on skeletal response to phosphate and apo; estrogen in rats.
1	age related histochemical and histological changes in the knee joint cartilage of c57b1 mice and their significance for the pathogenesis of osteoarthrosis i oxidative enzymes	Histochemical and histological changes associated with osteoarthritis; joint knee cartilage age of c57b1 mice and their importance for the pathogenesis of oxidative enzymes of osteoarthritis i.
1	intimal thickening of human femoral arteries with special regard to elastin part 1 diffuse intimal thickening due to growth and age	Intimal thickening of human femoral arteries with special attention to the apos; diffuse intimal thickening of part 1 of the apos; growth and elastin; age.
1	age related changes in oxygen consumption and the sdh activity of liver homogenate of male garden lizards effect of malonate and short term cold stress	Changes related to age; age of consumption of oxygen and oxygen; liver activity; male garden lizard liver homogenate; effect of malonate and short-term cold stress.
1	age associated changes in deoxyglucose uptake in whole brain	Changes associated with apo; age of whole brain deoxyglucose uptake.
1	urate excretion in old age	Excretion of urine in the elderly.
1	the structure of the spongy bone in lumbar vertebrae and the neck of the femur a comparative analysis of the age dependent remodelling process author s transl	The structure of spongy bones in the lumbar vertebrae and the neck of the femur is the subject of a comparative analysis of the remodeling process in relation to age.
1	changes in form and structure of vertebrae as a manifestation of mechanical loading author s transl	Changes in the shape and structure of the vertebrae as a manifestation of translation of l' author of mechanical loading.
1	atherosclerosis in the pediatric age with special reference to initiation progression and regression of atherosclerotic lesions	Atherosclerosis with apos; paediatric age, especially with regard to the initial progression and regression of atherosclerotic lesions.
1	adrenal reactivity to acth age changes in silver foxes inheriting different defensive behaviors	Adrenal responsiveness to changes in age of the silver foxes inheriting different defensive behaviours.
1	fertility in women after age forty five	Fertility of women after pregnancy; age 45 years.
1	vitamin d dependent calcium binding protein changes during gestation prenatal and postnatal development in rats	Changes in vitamin d-dependent calcium binding proteins during prenatal and postnatal pregnancy development in rats.
1	pattern of age related bone loss in mandibles	Bone loss model related to apos; age in mandibles.
1	the influence of sex age and strain of chicken on liver biotin content	Lapos; influence of apos; age of sex and strain of chicken on biotin content of liver.
1	age differences on raven s coloured progressive matrices	Age differences on progressive matrixes coloured as ravens were observed.
1	thyroxin binding globulin tbg radioimmunoassay normal patients results according to age and sex and in the cases of dysthyroidisms author s transl	Normal patients receiving a radioimmunoassay of thyroxine-binding tbg globulin (TGBG) receive results according to age and sex and, in cases of dysthyroidism, the results are reported.
1	discrimination learning in horses effects of breed age and social dominance	L' learning to discriminate in horses has the effects of l' age of race and social dominance.
1	normal cardiac output in relation to age and body size	Normal cardiac output as a function of age and body size.
1	age related response to tryptophan pyrrolase to 17 beta estradiol in the liver of female rats	The response to tryptophan pyrrolase in the presence of 17 beta-estradiol in female rat liver was age-related.
1	maturational changes related to dopamine in the effects of d amphetamine cocaine nicotine and strychnine on seizure susceptibility	Dopamine-related changes in maturation in the effects of amphetamine d, cocaine, nicotine and strychnine on seizure susceptibility.
1	age differences in the effect of glucagon on the metabolism of glucose precursors in perfused rat liver	It is important to note that the effects of glucagon on the metabolism of glucose precursors in perfused rat liver are not known.
1	a method for estimating the age of field collected female simulium damnosum s l diptera simuliidae	A method was used to estimate the age of simuliid female simulium damnosum s l diptera caught in the field.
1	age sex and hemisphrere asymmetry differences induced by a concurrent memory processing task	Age Sex and Hemisphere Asymetry Differences induced by a concurrent memory processing task.
1	dimensional preferences in middle and old age	Dimensional preferences in the elderly population; average or advanced age.
1	stimulus persistence and age	Persistence and age of stimulus.
1	hypothalamic pituitary function in the old irregularly cycling rat	Hypophysial hypothalamic functions in the rat, the old, irregular-cycle rat.
1	age dependent changes in the sperm population and fertility in the male rat	Changes in sperm population and fertility with age in male rat.
1	age differences in dark interval threshold across the life span	Differences in lifespan; threshold age; interval of onset; darkness throughout life.
1	effects of age and other drugs on benzodiazepine kinetics	Effects of apo, age and other drugs on benzodiazepine kinetics.
1	diagnostic problems of tuberculosis in old age	Difficulties with the diagnosis of TB in seniors.
1	age related decrease in prostacyclin biosynthetic activity in rat aortic smooth muscle cells	Apos-related decrease; age of onset; prostacyclin biosynthetic activity in smooth muscle cells of rat aorta.
1	an analysis of blood transfusion of surgical patients by sex a question for the transfusion trigger	An analysis of blood transfusion in surgical patients by gender is also a question for the trigger for transfusion.
1	critical aortic coarctation patch aortoplasty in infants less than age 3 months	Critical aortic coarct patch aortoplasty in infants < 3 months of age.
1	dyspnea in 70 year old people	Dyspnea in 70-year-olds.
1	clinical features of schizophrenia with a malignant course in patients surviving into old age	Clinical features of malignant progression schizophrenia in patients surviving to an advanced stage of life.
1	age related changes in the carbohydrate and fat metabolic indices of female rats	Apos-related changes; age in lipid and carbohydrate metabolic indices in female rats.
1	age dependent avidin induction v changes on the level of post transcriptional modification	Apos-dependent changes; apos age; apos induction; avidine v at the post transcriptional modification.
1	interaction of age and sex in sympathetic axon ingrowth into the hippocampus following septal afferent damage	Interaction of age and sex in the internal growth of the apos; sympathetic axon in the apos; seahorse following the apos; septal afferent lesion.
1	food restriction as a modulator of age related changes in serum lipids	Dietary restriction as a modulator of body weight; age changes in serum lipids associated with body weight; age.
1	iris heterochromia variations in form age changes sex dimorphism	The changes in age of the forms of the apos; heterochromia of the apos; iris change sexual dimorphism.
1	serum lipid and lipoprotein fractions in 2 age groups of male rabbits	Lipid and serum lipoproteins in 2 groups of rabbits; age of male rabbits.
1	age differences in p3 reaction time associations	Age differences in the reaction time associations p3 were observed.
1	age related changes in auditory event related potentials	The changes associated with hearing; age in the potentials associated with hearing-related events; auditory event.
1	age related auditory loss in the mongolian gerbil	Hearing loss related to apos; age in Mongolian gerbil.
1	age related changes in the auditory evoked brainstem potentials of albino and pigmented guinea pigs	Changes related to apo; age in hearing evoked brain stem potentials in albino and pigmented guinea pigs.
1	age effect on dopamine and serotonin metabolite levels in cerebrospinal fluid	Effect of apos; age on the levels of dopamine and serotonin metabolites in cerebrospinal fluid.
1	immunoglobulin levels in children with celiac disease variations with age and diet	Immunoglobulin levels in children with CD will vary with age and diet.
1	age related changes in neuronal rna content in rhesus monkeys macaca mulatta	Changes in the age of rna neuronal content in cynomolgus macaca macatta monkey monkeys.
1	age related distribution of serum immunoglobulin concentration in 1003 healthy children and adults	Distribution by age of concentration of serum immunoglobulin in 1,003 healthy children and adults.
1	age associated changes in initiation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in isolated rat liver nuclei	Changes associated with apos; apos age; initiation of apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid in isolated rat liver nuclei are associated with apos age.
1	age differences in the hormonal reaction of the adrenals and testes to stress exposure in monkeys	Differences in age; hormonal response of adrenals and testes to apos; stress exposure in monkeys.
1	ontogenic drug studies in calves i age dependent salicylate levels and metabolism	Ontogenic studies in calves as a function of age, calf salicylate concentration, and calf metabolism.
1	role of age related serum factors in the mechanism of interferon production	Role of serum factors related to osteoarthritis; age in mechanism of production; interferon.
1	influence of age cigarette smoking and the oral contraceptive on plasma concentrations of clomipramine	Lapos; influence of cigarette and oral contraceptive on plasma clomipramine levels.
1	age related alterations of the proximal axon segment in lamina iiiab pyramidal cells of the human isocortex a golgi and fine structural study	Alterations related to leaf apos; age of proximal axonal segment in the lamina iiiab pyramidal cells of l' human isocortex a golgi and a fine structural study.
1	comparative roentgenographical study on the incidence of ossification of the posterior longitudinal ligament and other degenerative changes of the cervical spine among japanese koreans americans and germans author s transl	Comparative roentgenographic study on apo; incidence of apo; ossification of the posterior longitudinal ligament and apo; other degenerative cervical spinal changes in American; Japanese origin and German authors.
1	control of gill reflex habituation and the rate of epsp decrement of l7 by a common source in the cns of aplysia	Control of tooth loss; reflex habituation of the gills and epsp removal rate of l7 by a common source in the gills; aplysia.
1	effect of age on the detection rate in duchenne muscular dystrophy	Effect of lacidosis; age on the rate of duchenne muscle dystrophy detection.
1	histochemical and ultrastructural aspects of m vastus lateralis in sedentary old people age 65 89 years	Histochemical and ultrastructural aspects of m vastus lateralis in sedentary aged 65-89.
1	changes with age in the peripheral nerves of the rat an ultrastructural study	Changes with l' age in peripheral nerves of rat ultrastructural study.
1	effect of host age on the transplantation growth and radiation response of emt6 tumors	Effect of implantation; age of implant; host on graft growth and tumour radiation response.
1	reflex oral activity in decerebrate rats of different age	"""Oral reflex activity in decerebrate rats of different ages"", J."
1	sex difference in serum calcitonin level in rats as related to feeding fasting and age	Sexual differences in serum calcitonin levels in rats as a function of fasting and fasting age.
1	capacity of old versus young male rats to release thyrotropin tsh thyroxine t4 and triiodothyronine t3 in response to different stimuli	The ability of young and old male rats to release thyrotropin tsh thyroxine t4 and triiodothyronine t3 in response to different stimuli.
1	mouse c57bl ksj liver phosphofructokinase allosteric kinetics and age related changes in the genetically diabetic state	The allosteric kinetics of hepatic phosphofructokinase c57bl ksj from mice and the changes related to apos; age in apos; genetic diabetes.
1	regulation of three forms of cytochrome p 450 and epoxide hydrolase in rat liver microsomes effects of age sex and induction	Regulation of three forms of cytochrome p 450 and dapos; epoxide hydrolase in rat liver microsomes; sex effects; age and age; induction.
1	sexual differences in the development of plasma thyroxine levels in the embryo and young chick	Sexual differences in development of plasma thyroxine levels in embryo and young chick.
1	changes with age characterize circadian rhythm in telemetered core temperature of stroke prone rats	Changes with age characterize the circadian core temperature rhythm measured by telemeasurement in stroke-prone rats.
1	familial and individualized longitudinal autorhythmometry for 5 to 12 years and human age effects	Individualized family and longitudinal self-hythm for 5 to 12 years and effects of age; human.
1	adult age differences in memory for sex of voice	Differences in age; age in adult memory according to sex of voice.
1	relationship of serum somatomedin like activity and fibroblast proliferative activity with age and growth in the rat	Ratio between apos; serum somatomedin activity and apos; proliferative activity of fibroblasts as a function of apos; age and growth in the rat.
1	identification of lactate dehydrogenase elevating virus as the etiological agent of genetically restricted age dependent polioencephalomyelitis of mice	Identification of the causative virus for apo; elevation of lactate dehydrogenase as etiologic agent of poliomyelitis @-> apo; genetically restricted age in mice.
1	age related changes in the concentrations of cytosol receptors for sex steroid hormones in the hypothalamus and pituitary gland of the rat	Changes in age; age of cytosolic receptors of sex steroid hormones in the apos; hypothalamus and l' rat pituitary.
1	resting heartrate variability in man declines with age	In men, the variability of resting heart decreases with age.
1	pharmacokinetic characteristics of salicylates in old animals	Pharmacokinetic characteristics of salicylates in the elderly animals.
1	acetylation and urinary excretion of norsulfazole in gastrointestinal disease patients of different age groups	L' acetylation and l' urinary excretion of norsulfazole in patients with gastro-intestinal illness in different groups of patients; age.
1	age and sex related variations of serum thyroxine binding globulin	Changes in age and sex of serum thyroxine-binding globulin.
1	age related changes in central nervous system beta endorphin and acth	Changes related to apos; age of beta endorphin and apos; acth in central nervous system.
1	morphological immunochemical and biochemical study of rabbit achilles tendon at various ages	Morphological, immunochemical, and biochemical study of d&apos tendon; rabbit achilles at different ages.
1	urinary polyamine excretion in man i influence of sex and age	Lapos; urinary excretion of polyamines in males is influenced by sex and age.
1	interaction of age and thyroid hormone status on na k atpase in rat renal cortex and liver	Age and thyroid hormone status on na k atpase in the renal cortex and rat liver.
1	age dependent immunological parameters	Apos-dependent immunological parameters; age.
1	a strain survey of age dependent changes in antigen elimination antibody formation and tolerance	A strain-based study of changes in age in the formation of apo- and apo- antigenic antibodies; elimination and tolerance.
1	sex related variations in the frequency and characteristics of adverse drug reactions	Gender differences in the frequency and characteristics of reported adverse drug reactions.
1	age changes at cerebral artery bifurcations and the pathogenesis of berry aneurysms	Changes in height; age at bifurcations; cerebral artery and berry aneurysm pathogenicity.
1	sex difference of mercuric chloride induced renal tubular necrosis in rats from the aspect of sex differences in renal mercury concentration and sulfhydryl levels	The sexual difference in mercuric chloride (MC) induced renal tubular necrosis in rats, below the pH; angle of sexual differences in renal mercury concentration and sulfhydryl levels.
1	ultrastructural morphometric investigations on rat liver of young and adult rats after treatment with technical pentachlorophenol pcp	Ultrastructural morphometric studies in the liver of juvenile and adult rats after pcp treatment.
1	age and susceptibility of swiss mice for mouse adenovirus strain fl	It is important to note, however, that there are no data on the age and susceptibility of Swiss mice to the fl strain of adenovirus.
1	influence of age on the vitamin e requirement for resolution of necrotizing myopathy	Influence of weight; age on the need for vitamin e for the resolution of necrotizing myopathy.
1	age dependent changes in rat liver steroid hormone receptor proteins	Changes in rat liver steroid hormone receptor proteins as a function of their age.
1	changes i superoxide dismutase activity and copper during development and ageing in the fruit fly drosophila melanogaster	Modifies apos; superoxide dismutase i and copper activity during development and aging in fruit fly drosophila melanogaster.
1	molecular basis of age dependent changes in the activity of adenine nucleotide translocase	The molecular basis of changes in apos; nucleotide translocase activity; adenine nucleotide depends on the apos; age.
1	stereological changes in the capillary network and nerve cells of the aging human brain	Stereological changes in the network of the hair and nerve cells of the aging human brain.
1	morphometric studies on synapses of the cerebellar glomerulus the effect of centrophenoxine treatment in old rats	Morphometric studies on cerebellar glomerular synapses, apos effect; centrophenoxin treatment in old rats.
1	age dependent gene induction in quail oviduct x alterations on the post transcriptional level enzymic aspect	Apos-dependent gene induction; age in apos; quail oviduct x quail alterations; enzymatic aspect of post-transcriptional level.
1	models of the biological age of the rat i a factor model of age parameters	Capital models; Biological age of rat a factorial model of capital parameters; Age.
1	the effect of age and pentobarbitone tolerance on pentobarbitone depression of calcium 45 uptake by mouse brain synaptosomes	L' effect of age and pentobarbitone tolerance on decreased calcium uptake by mouse brain synaptosomes.
1	age related changes in the kinetic properties of the acetyl coa carboxylase and phospholipid content of rat liver	Changes related to apos; age of kinetic properties of apos; acetyl coa carboxylase and rat liver phospholipid content.
1	the influence of age alcohol consumption and body build on gonadal function in men	The influence of alcohol consumption and body weight, as well as age, is based on men's gonadal function.
1	the effect of age on the pharmacokinetics of diazepam	Effect of apo; age on pharmacokinetics of diazepam.
1	survival under hypoxia age dependence and effect of cholinergic drugs	It is important to note that the use of cholinergic drugs is not a substitute for the use of other drugs.
1	lymphocyte subpopulations in the thymus of sjl j mice age related alterations and the effect of spontaneous reticulum cell sarcoma development	Under-lymphocyte populations in the thymus of mice sjj, alterations related to the apos; age and apos; effect of spontaneous development of the reticulum cell sarcoma.
1	age related changes in the sensitivity to vibration	Changes in vibration sensitivity; age in vibration sensitivity.
1	age and changes in vocal jitter	L' age and changes in the vocal vibration.
1	intellectual differences of adult men related to age and physical fitness before and after an exercise program	Intellectual differences among adult males are related to age and physical fitness before and after a program of exercise.
1	age related characteristics of thyroxine action on the cytochrome content in rat liver mitochondria and on body weight	Attributable characteristics; age of onset; action of thyroxine on cytochrome content in rat liver mitochondria and body weight.
1	altered hepatic microsomal metabolism of androstenedione as a function of age in mice	Modification of the hepatic microsomal metabolism of androstenedione as a function of age in the mouse.
1	is weakness in old age due to muscle wasting	C' is the weakness of old age due to the loss of the muscle.
1	age related changes in extracellular materials in the inner wall of schlemm s canal	Changes related to apo; age of extracellular material in the inner schlemm canal wall.
1	orthopaedic findings of the foot as related to age and body weight among women author s transl	Foot orthopedic findings in relation to age and body weight among female translators.
1	at prophylaxis of disturbance of the electrolyte and water metabolism age author s transl	Prophylaxis of liver disturbance; electrolyte and liver metabolism; age of the authors transl.
1	starvation in the rat ii effect of age and obesity on protein sparing and fuel metabolism	Fasting in rats; effects of age and weight; obesity on appetite; protein savings and energy metabolism.
1	effects of age and alcohol on psychomotor performance of men	Effects of age, age and alcohol on the psychomotor performance of men.
1	age related radio morphologic changes in the extremity muscles	Radio morphological changes associated with apos; age in extremity muscles.
1	psychological changes from midlife to early old age implications for the maintenance of mental health	The psychological changes that occur during the early years of the age of 40 have implications for the maintenance of mental health.
1	mental health characteristics and acceptance rejection of old age	Characteristics of mental health and acceptance of the rejection of old age.
1	sex differences in the response to apomorphine in rats	The response to apos; apomorphine differed sexwise in rats.
1	age related decrease in repair of oxidative damage to surface sulfhydryl groups on rat adipocytes	Reduction related to apo; age of repair of oxidative damage to surface sulfhydryl groups on rat adipocytes.
1	age related changes in dopamine lhrh and somatostatin in the rat hypothalamus	Changes in liver function; age of dopamine lhrh and somatostatin in rat hypothalamus.
1	localization of cellular changes within multimodal sensory regions in aged monkey brain possible implications for age related cognitive loss	The localization of cellular changes in the multimodal sensory regions of the brain of older monkeys may have implications for age-related cognitive loss.
1	memory for verbal and spatial information as a function of age	Memory of verbal and spatial information according to age.
1	the meaning and measurement of age identity	The meaning and the measurement of age and sex; identity; age.
1	the effect of age on the ability of oocytes to synthesize rna and proteins during in vitro maturation	L' effect of age on the ability of oocytes to synthesize chick and protein synthesis during in vitro maturation.
1	age dependent variations in choline and ethanolamine phosphorylating activities of rodents	Changes according to age; age of plants; phosphorylating activity of choline and apos; ethanolamine in rodents.
1	age related changes in the cornea	Corneal changes related to apos; age.
1	changes in vagal activity and response to muscarinic receptor agonists with age	Changes in apo; vagal activity and response to muscarinic receptor agonists with age.
1	dynamics of changes in the estradiol receptor content in the nuclear fraction of the hypothalamus of female rats during ontogenesis	Dynamics of changes in receptor content of estradiol in the nuclear fraction of estos; hypothalamus of female rats during ontogenesis.
1	antibodies against mycobacterium leprae antigen 7 from birth to 18 months of age an indicator of intra uterine infection in leprosy	Antibodies to mycobacterium antigen 7 from birth to age 18 months are an indicator of apos; intra-@uterine infection in leprosy.
1	causes of age dependency of mammary tumour induction by carcinogens in rats	Causes of breast cancer dependence; age of onset; induction of breast tumours by carcinogens in rats.
1	the effect of age on the activity and molecular properties of human brain monoamine oxidase	The effects of age on the activity and molecular properties of human cerebral monoamine oxidase.
1	influence of ration physical form ruminal degradable nitrogen and age on rumen epithelial propionate and acetate transport and some enzymatic activities	The influence of ration, diet, degradable nitrogen, rumen and apo nitrogen; age on propionate and apo transport; epithelial rumen acetate and certain enzymatic activities.
1	hematology of beta thalassemia trait age related developmental aspects and intrafamilial correlations	L' hematology of drug-related beta thalassemia; age was linked to developmental aspects and intra-familial correlations.
1	kindling in developing rats variability of afterdischarge thresholds with age	Burning in developing rats variability in firing thresholds of post-discharge with age.
1	increased ototoxicity in both young and old mice	Increased liver function; ototoxicity in young and aged mice.
1	comparative study on age related changes and atherosclerotic involvement of the coronary arteries of male and female subjects up to 40 years of age	Comparative study of changes in age and weight; atherosclerotic involvement in coronary arteries in male and female subjects under 40 years of age.
1	relation between age and respiratory response to inhaled carbon dioxide in healthy nigerians	The relationship between age and respiratory response to ozone; inhalation of carbon dioxide in healthy Nigerians.
1	age peculiarities of the citrate pyruvate system functional in rat liver	Anomalies according to age; age of the functional citrate pyruvate system in rat liver.
1	a morphological study of the mouse subependymal layer from embryonic life to old age	A morphological study of the ependymal mouse layer from embryo to old age.
1	correlation analysis of free mammary gland stroma cells during age associated reorganization and spontaneous tumor development	Correlation analysis of free mammary gland stromal cells during mammary gland reorganization; age and spontaneous development of tumours.
1	age dependent synthesis of nucleic acids and proteins in the livers of different lines of rats	Nucleic acid and protein synthesis as a function of age; age in liver of different rat strains.
1	metabolic studies of n bases of phospholipids and long chain bases of sphingolipids in two weeks old mouse brain tissue in comparison with one month old mouse visceral tissues	Metabolic studies of phospholipid n bases and long-chain sphingolipid bases in brain tissue from 2-week-old mice compared with visceral tissues from 1-month-old mice.
1	circulating levels of pregnancy zone protein normal range and the influence of age and gender	Protein levels in the circulating pregnancy zone are within the normal range and are influenced by age and sex.
1	age related changes in the incorporation of 35s sulfate into two proteoglycan populations from human cartilage	Apos-related changes; age in onset; 35s sulfate incorporation into two human cartilage proteoglycan populations.
1	the effect of age and sex on bone density bone mineral content and cortical index	The effects of age and sex on bone density, bone mineral content and weight; cortical index.
1	nucleus raphe dorsalis a morphometric golgi study in rats of three age groups	Nucleus raphe dorsalis, a morphometrical study of rat golgi in three age groups.
1	the geometry of diarthrodial joints its physiologic maintenance and the possible significance of age related changes in geometry to load distribution and the development of osteoarthritis	The geometry of the diarthrodial joints is physiological maintenance and function; possible importance of changes in geometry as a function of age; age of joint burden distribution and development; osteoarthritis.
1	comparison of specific activities of enzymes from young and old dogs and mice	Comparison of enzyme specific activities in young and old dogs and mice.
1	age related glycogen changes in bruchids	Changes in glycogen with apo; age in bruchids.
1	energy and protein metabolism in ewes as influenced by age and dietary protein calorie ratio	Ewes' energy and protein metabolism is influenced by their age and the ratio of protein to calories in their diet.
1	comparative effects of age and sedation on sinus node automaticity and atrioventricular conduction	Comparative effects of apos; age and sedation on apos; automatic sinus node and atrioventricular conduction.
1	age related differences for motion sickness in the rat	Differences due to apo; age for motion sickness in rats.
1	age differences in acoustic and semantic recognition memory	Differences in age in acoustic and semantic recognition memory.
1	age differences in memory as a function of depth of processing	Differences in memory age as a function of the depth of processing.
1	effect of age on visual functions	Effect of age on the visual functions.
1	age differences in the duration of mating period of female rhesus monkeys	Differences in age; the length of the interval; mating of female rhesus monkeys.
1	effects of age and dietary restriction on the kidney glomeruli of mice observations by scanning electron microscopy	Effects of age and food restriction on mouse renal glomeruli as observed by scanning electron microscopy.
1	thyroid hormone carbohydrate interaction in the rat correlation between age related reductions in the inducibility of hepatic malic enzyme by triiodo l thyronine and a high carbohydrate fat free diet	Interaction of carbohydrate; thyroid hormone in correlation of carbohydrate-related reductions; age of onset; inducibility of the apo; hepatic malic enzyme by thyronine triiodo and a high-fat carbohydrate diet.
1	age dependent changes in fsh responsive adenylyl cyclase and fsh binding in rat testes	Lapos-dependent changes; age in the fsh response of apos; adenylyl cyclase and fsh binding in rat testis.
1	specific and nonspecific immune factors in dental plaque fluid and saliva from young and old populations	Specific, not-specific, immune factors in plaque fluid and saliva of young and old populations.
1	a comparative morphometric analysis of the component tissues of the urethra in young and old female c57bl icrfat mice	Comparative morphometric analysis of urethra constitutive tissues in young and old female mice, c57bl fat.
1	age changes on bone size and mass in two strains of senescent rats	Changes in height and bone mass; age in two strains of senescing rats.
1	a primate model for age and host response to genital herpetic infection determinants of latency	Primate model for age and response of host to latency determinants of pregnancy; genital herpes infection.
1	age related changes in processing explicit and implicit language	Changes related to language; age in treatment of explicit and implicit language.
1	effects of age on long term memory retention of fixed interval responding	Effects of age; age on long-term memory retention of reactive fixed intervals.
1	age related facilitation in recall following semantic processing	Ease of recall of medications; age of use following semantic treatment.
1	on the locus of age differences in visual information processing	On the locus differences d' age in drug treatment; visual information.
1	age related pigmentation changes in the coats of allophenic mice	Pigmentation changes associated with allophenic mice; age in allophenic mice.
1	lack of age associated immune dysfunction in mucosal associated lymph nodes	Immune dysfunction associated with lack of apo; mucosal-associated lymph node age.
1	age related changes in oxygen consumption by guinea pig paramedian cortex	The effect of age-related changes in oxygen consumption on the paramedian cortex guinea pig.
1	influence of age on the discrimination of barium in comparison with strontium during their incorporation into compact bone	L' influence of apos; age on the discrimination of the barium against strontium in compact bones.
1	age dependent changes in esterases of callosobruchus maculatus fab bruchidae coleoptera	Changes in callosobruchus maculatus fabuchidae coleoptera esterases as a function of age.
1	serum digoxin concentration and age	Digoxin serum concentration and age.
1	life span age trends in laterality	Laterality trends based on age and lifespan.
1	influence of sex and age on the biological half life of cadmium in mice	Sex and age influence; age on the half-life-biological life of cadmium in mice.
1	further observations on age induced changes of cerebral arteries in rats an electron microscopic study	D' other observations on age induced changes in the cerebral arteries in rats, a study by electron microscopy.
1	changes in the content of riboflavin and its coenzyme in tissues during the aging of rats	Changes in tissue content of riboflavin and its coenzyme during aging of rats.
1	results of operation for obstructive hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in the elderly septal myotomy and myectomy in 20 patients 65 years of age or older	Apo results; obstructive hypertrophic cardiomyopathy surgery in elderly patients with septal myotomy and myectomy in 20 patients 65 years of age or older.
1	age related progress among children with severe learning difficulties	Progress in child development; age of children with severe learning difficulties.
1	age related changes of serum 5alpha androstane 3alpha 17beta diol in normal men	Apos-related changes; serum age 5alpha androstane 3alpha 17beta diol in normal males.
1	the influence of age height and weight on the bone mineral content of lumbar vertebrae	L' influence of height and weight; age on bone mineral content of lumbar vertebrae.
1	age related changes in the degradation of thyrotrophin releasing hormone by human and rat serum	Changes related to apo; age in breakdown of apo; thyrotrophin-releasing hormone from human serum and rat serum.
1	age strain interrelations in lipid metabolism of rats	Interrelations among potato strains; age of lipid metabolism in rats.
1	postnatal development and sex differences in hepatic phosphatidate phosphohydrolase activity in the rat	Postnatal development and sexual differences in the liver; phosphatidate phosphohydrolase activity in the rat.
1	differences in mitogenic responses of murine t cells to two distinct phytohemagglutinin pha subcomponents	Differences in mitogenic responses of two-membered murine t-cells under distinct components of phytohemagglutinin pha.
1	reasons for eliminating the age 60 regulation for airline pilots	Reasons for delay; elimination of the 60-year rule for airline pilots.
1	age dependence of social learning processes author s transl	L' influence of apos; age on processes; social learning Translation of authors by the authors.
1	age related quantitative changes in enzyme activities of rat brain	The results of this study are presented in Appendix C. Quantitative changes in the enzymatic activities of rat brain.
1	the influence of age on the hypothalamo neurohypophyseal system of the mouse a quantitative ultrastructural analysis of the posterior pituitary	L' influence of apos; age on the mouse hypothalamo neurohypophysial system has a quantitative ultrastructural analysis of the posterior pituitary.
1	susceptibility of mice to rotavirus infection effects of age and administration of corticosteroids	Rotavirus Infections: sensitivity of mice to effects of diabetes; age and age; administration of corticosteroids on rotavirus infections.
1	longitudinal changes in rigidity in old age	Longitudinal changes in the rigidity of aging.
1	intelligence or relevant knowledge as a prerequisite for strategies in environmental management in old age	Intelligence or relevant knowledge as a prerequisite to management strategies for the environment in old age.
1	the nervous system and old age	The nervous system and aging!
1	age related changes in very low density lipoprotein metabolism in normal rats	"""Age-related changes in very low density lipoprotein metabolism in normal rats,"" J. Toxicol."
1	creatine kinase isozyme transition in chicks with hereditary muscular dystrophy	"""Creine kinase isozyme transition in chicks with hereditary muscular dystrophy (MSD)"", Arch."
1	blood pressure in the child and the adolescent effect of age sex height weight and heart rate	Children's blood pressure and the effects of sex on height, weight and heart rate.
1	regional changes in phenylethanolamine n methyltransferase of rat brain during development	Regional developmental changes in phenylethanolamine n methyltransferase from rat brain.
2	studies on the fine structure of the mammalian testis i differentiation of the spermatids in the cat felis domestica	Mammalian testes fine structure studies, spermatid differentiation i in the cat felis domestica.
2	convulsant drug action on neuronally isolated cerebral cortex	Convulsive drug action on neurally isolated cerebral cortex.
2	estrogen sensitive neurons and sexual behavior in female cats	Estrogen-sensitive neurons and sexual behaviour in female cats.
2	postsynaptic potentials and spike patterns during augmenting responses in cat s motor cortex	Potential post-synaptic and peak profiles during responses d' increase in the cat motor cortex.
2	the effects of choline and other factors on the release of acetylcholine from the stimulated perfused superior cervical ganglion of the cat	The effects of choline and d' other factors on the stimulated and perfused release of acetylcholine from the cat upper cervical ganglion.
2	visual motion detection in the cat	Visual detection of movement in the cat.
2	reduction of dimethylsulfoxide to dimethylsulfide in the cat	Reduction of dimethylsulfoxide to the cat's dimethylsulfide.
2	post tetanic repetitive activity in the cat soleus nerve its origin course and mechanism of generation	L' repetitive activity post-tetanic in the soleus nerve of the cat follows its course; origin and generation mechanism.
2	attack elicited by stimulation of the thalamus of cats	Attack caused by stimulation of cat thalamus.
2	midbrain hemisection effect on cortical acetylcholine in the cat	Effect of apos; mesencephalic hemisection on cortical cat acetylcholine.
2	electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord i action potentials of the motoneuron	Fetal spinal cord electrophysiology i potential d' motoneuron action.
2	electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord ii interaction among peripheral inputs and recurrent inhibition	Fetal spinal cord electrophysiology ii interaction between peripheral inputs and l' recurrent inhibition.
2	the responses to tyramine of the normal and denervated nictitating membrane of the cat analysis of the mechanisms and sites of action	Responses to the normal and denervated nictitating membrane tyramine; analysis of the cat's mechanisms and sites; action.
2	activating and synchronizing centers in cat brain electroencephalograms after lesions	Activation and synchronization of nerve centers in cat brain electroencephalograms after lesions.
2	prolonged excitation in the visual cortex of the cat	Extended excitement in visual cortex of cat.
2	nicotine effect on the sleep cycle of the cat	Effect of nicotine use on the sleep cycle of cats.
2	histological evidence against the view that the cat s optic nerve contains centrifugal fibres	Histological evidence against the apos; cat optic nerve contains centrifugal fibers.
2	somatic sensory cortical projection areas excited y tactile stimulation of the cat a triple representation	Somatic sensory cortical projection zones excite a threefold representation of the tactile stimulation of the cat.
2	the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat carotid body	Distribution of cholinesterases in the Carotid Body of cats.
2	background and evoked activity in the auditory pathway effects of noise shock pairing	History and activity evoked in the effects of acoustic shock matching.
2	anteroventral cochlear nucleus wave forms of extracellularly recorded spike potentials	D&apos forms; peak potential waves of anteroventral cochlear nucleus recorded extracellularly.
2	the reflex response to sinusoidal stretching of soleus in the decerebrate cat	Reflex response to sinusoidal stretch of the soleus in the cadaver cat.
2	organization of neurones in the cat cerebral cortex that are influenced from group i muscle afferents	Organization of the cat cerebral cortical neurons that are influenced by the cat muscle afferents group i.
2	asphyxial potentials of spinal grey matter and of ventral and dorsal roots	Potential asphyxiation of spinal gray matter and ventral and dorsal roots.
2	vesico somatic reflexes in the chronic spinal cat	Somatic reflexes, vesico, in the chronic spinal cat.
2	intracellular recording from cat spinal motoneurones during acute asphyxia	Intracellular recording of cat spinal motoneurons during asthma; acute asphyxiation.
2	intracellular recording from spinal motoneurones in cats with post asphyxial rigidity	Intracellular recording of spinal motoneurons in cats with post-rigidity-asphyxia.
2	excretion of the glucuronide of thyroxine in cat bile	Lapos; excretion of thyroxine glucuronide into cat bile.
2	facilitation electrical response enhanced by conditional excitation of cerebral cortex	Electrical response is facilitated by the apo-stimulated electrical response; conditional excitation of the cerebral cortex.
2	synaptic noise as a source of variability in the interval between action potentials	Synaptic noise as source of variability in the range between potentials of action.
2	excitation of afferent cardiac sympathetic nerve fibres during myocardial ischaemia	L' excitation of afferent cardiac sympathetic nerve fibers during cardiac arrest; myocardial ischemia.
2	acetylcholine sensitivity of cerebellar neurones in the cat	Sensitivity of cerebellar neurons to acetylcholine in cats.
2	learning set formation by mink ferrets skunks and cats	Training with mink ferrets, skunks and cats.
2	input resistance electrical excitability and size of ventral horn cells in cat spinal cord	D&apos resistance; electrical excitability input and ventral horn cell size in cat spinal cord.
2	specialized receptive fields of the cat s retina	Specialty receptive fields for the cat's retina cavity.
2	the action of dopamine on neurones of the caudate nucleus	L' action of dopamine on caudate nucleus neurons.
2	an analysis of spontaneous impulse activity of units in the striate cortex of unrestrained cats	Apos analysis; spontaneous activity of apos pulses; units in the striated cortex of wild cats.
2	the effects of suxamethonium and acetylcholine on the behaviour of cat muscle spindles during dynamics stretching and during fusimotor stimulation	The effects of suxamethonium and l' acetylcholine on the behavior of cat muscle spindles during apos; dynamic stretching and fusimotor stimulation.
2	the release of acetylcholine from the spinal cord of the cat by antidromic stimulation of motor nerves	Release of d' acetylcholine from the spinal cord of cats via antidromic stimulation of motor nerves.
2	the effects of acute haemorrhage on respiration in the cat	The effects of an acute hemorrhage on the cat's respiratory system.
2	algebraical summation in synaptic activation of motoneurones firing within the primary range to injected currents	Algebraic summit of the apos; synaptic activation of motor neurons unloading in the primary range at injected currents.
2	the effect of thyrocalcitonin on blood bone calcium equilibrium in the perfused tibia of the cat	L*apos; effect of thyrocalcitonin on the apos; calcium balance of the blood vessels in the cat's perfused tibia.
2	visual receptive fields in the cat s retina complications	Fields of visual reception in the cat's retina complications.
2	glial responses to degenerating cerebellar cortico nuclear pathways in the cat	Glial responses to the nuclear pathways of degenerating cerebellar cortico in the cat.
2	sleep suppression of rapid eye movement phase in the cat after electroconvulsive shock	The sleep suppression of the fast-moving phase of the eyes of the cat after a shock.
2	a study of cholinoceptive cells in the lateral geniculate nucleus	A study of cholinoceptive cells in the nucleus lateralis.
2	receptive fields in the cat retina a new type	Receptive fields in the cat's retina a new type.
2	control of somatosensory input by cerebral cortex	Control of apos; somatosensory entry via cerebral cortex.
2	control of sensory fields by stimulation of hypothalamus	Control of the sensory fields by stimulation of the body; hypothalamus.
2	effects of changes in po2 pco2 and ph on the total vascular resistance of perfused cat kidneys	Effects of changes in po2 pco2 and ph on total vascular resistance in perfused cat kidneys.
2	ascending and descending cholinergic fibers in cat spinal cord histochemical evidence	Up and down cholinergic fibers in the spinal cord of cats, histochemical evidence.
2	interaction of cortex and superior colliculus in mediation of visually guided behavior in the cat	Interaction of the superior colliculus and cortex in mediating visually guided behavior in the cat.
2	inferior olive of the cat intracellular recording	Lower olive of l' intracellular recording of cat.
2	origin of synaptic noise	The origin of synaptic noise.
2	cilia formation in the adult cat brain after pargyline treatment	Formation of cilia in the adult cat brain following pargyline treatment.
2	oxygen tension changes evoked in the brain by visual stimulation	Changes in blood pressure; oxygen evoked in the brain by visual stimulation.
2	binocularly driven neurons in visual cortex of split chiasm cats	Neurons driven by binoculation into the visual cortex of separated chiasmate cats.
2	an inhibitory process in the cerebral cortex	An inhibitory process in the cerebral cortex?
2	dissociation of the visual placing response into elicited and guided components	Dividing the visual placement response into requested and guided components.
2	responses in the inferior olive to stimulation of the cerebellar and cerebral cortices in the cat	Reactions of l' olive inferior to cerebellar and cerebral cortex stimulation in cat.
2	the laminar organization of dorsal horn and effects of descending impulses	L' the laminar organization of the dorsal horn and the effects of descending impulses.
2	somatic afferent input to posterior thalamic neurones and their axon projection to the cerebral cortex in the cat	Somatic input related to posterior thalamic neurons and their axonal projection to the cerebral cortex in cats.
2	activity of cells in the lateral vestibular nucleus as a function of head position	Cell activity in lateral vestibular nucleus as a function of head position.
2	thalamic projection of muscle nerve afferents in the cat	Thalamic projection of eposes; muscle nerve afferents in the cat.
2	disuse in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat	De-use in the lateral genicular nucleus of the cat.
2	release by tubocurarine of dopamine and homovanillic acid from the superfused caudate nucleus	Dopamine and d*apos release by tubocurarine; homovanillic acid from the caudate nucleus superfused.
2	thin layer chromatography of 1 dimethylaminonaphthalene 5 sulphonyl derivatives of amino acids present in superfusates of cat cerebral cortex	Thin-layer chromatography of a dimethylaminonaphthalene derivative 5 sulfonyl d*apos; amino acids present in cerebral cortical superfusates of cats.
2	effect on temperature of 5 hydroxytryptamine injected into the cerebral ventricles of cats	Temperature effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine injected into the cerebral ventricles of cats.
2	site of origin of the abnormal discharge in the electrocorticogram produced by tubocurarine perfused through the anterior horn of a lateral ventricle	Site of occurrence; origin of abnormal discharge in apos; electrocorticogram produced by tubocurarine perfused through the anterior horn of apos; lateral ventricle.
2	an afferent pathway for the selective release of vasopressin in response to carotid occlusion and haemorrhage in the cat	Route of selective release of vasopressin in response to carotid occlusion and hemorrhage in cat.
2	vestibular cochlear and trigeminal projections to the cortex in the anterior suprasylvian sulcus of the cat	Cochlear vestibular and trigeminal projections to the cortex in the cat's anterior suprasylvian groove.
2	responses of the pyramidal tract to stimulation of the baboon s motor cortex	Reactions of the pyramidal tract to stimulation of baboon motor cortex.
2	cerebral synaptic transmission and behavioral effects of dimethoxyphenylethylamine a potential psychotogen	Cerebral synaptic transmission and behavioural effects of dimethoxyphenylethylamine, a potential psychotogen.
2	temporal relation between long lasting aftercontractions and action potentials in cat papillary muscles	Temporal relationship between long-term post-contractions and spinal cord potentials; action in cat papillary muscles.
2	somatosensory thalamic neurons effects of cortical depression	Effects of cortical depression on somatosensory thalamic neurons.
2	visual form discrimination after removal of the visual cortex in cats	Visual form discrimination after seizures; visual cortical ablation in the cats.
2	dna content of neurons in the cat hippocampus	Neuronal DNA content of the cat's hippocampus.
2	termination and functional organization of the dorsal spino olivocerebellar path	Completion and functional organization of the spino olivocerebellar trail.
2	three factors limiting the reliable detection of light by retinal ganglion cells of the cat	Three factors limit reliable detection of light by cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	effects of nicotine on electrocortical activity and acetylcholine release from the cat cerebral cortex	Effects of nicotine on epos, electrocortical activity and release of acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex of cats.
2	gallamine flaxedil and synaptic transmission in the spinal cord	Flaxedil gallamine and synaptic transmission in the spinal cord.
2	projection to cerebral cortex of group i muscle afferents from the cat s hind limb	Projection to the cerebral cortex of the cat's hind limb i-group muscle afferents.
2	the projection of splanchnic afferents on the cerebellum of the cat	The projection of splanchnic afferents on the cat cerebellum.
2	visual area of the lateral suprasylvian gyrus clare bishop area of the cat	Visual zone of the gyrus clare lateral suprasylvian of l' bishop of the cat.
2	motor effects of copper in the caudate nucleus reversible lesions with ion exchange resin beads	Motor effects of copper in reversible caudate core lesions with resin beads exchange d' ions.
2	a quantitative analysis of the responses of certain dorsal horn neurones to mechanical stimulation of the large foot pad in cats	A quantitative analysis of the responses of certain dorsal horn neurons to mechanical pedal-cushion stimulation in cats.
2	extraocular muscle afferents to the cerebellum of the cat	The extraocular muscle is related to the cerebellum of the cat.
2	responses evoked in the cerebellar cortex by stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	Reactions evoked in the cerebellar cortex by stimulation of the nucleus caudate in the cat.
2	a reappraisal of reflex stepping in the cat	A re-evaluation of the reflex of walking in the cat.
2	quantitative aspects of sensitivity and summation in the cat retina	Quantitative aspects of the sensitivity and summation in the cat's retina.
2	kinins beta adrenergic receptors and functional vasodilatation in the submaxillary gland of the cat	Adrenergic beta receptor kinins and functional vasodilation in the gland under-maxillary of cat.
2	3h nicotine in cat superior cervical and nodose ganglia after close arterial injection in vivo	Three hours of nicotine in the upper cervical ganglia of cats nodulate after narrow arterial injection in vivo.
2	group ia synaptic input to fast and slow twitch motor units of cat triceps surae	Synaptic influx of the ia group to the cat triceps surae fast and slow twitching motor units.
2	athetoid and choreiform hyperkinesias produced by caudate lesions in the cat	Hyperkinesis, both athetoid and choreiform, caused by caudate lesions in the cat.
2	acetylcholine facilitation atropine block of synaptic excitation of cortical neurons	Facilitation of apos, atropine blockade of apos acetylcholine, synaptic excitation of cortical neurons.
2	preserved vagal visceromotor function following destruction of the dorsal motor nucleus	After the destruction of the dorsal motor nucleus, the vagal visceromotor function was preserved.
2	dorsal column projection of fibres from the cat knee joint	Projection of the backbone of the fibers of the carapos; knee joint of the cat.
2	effect of barbiturates on quantal synaptic transmission in spinal motoneurones	Effect of barbiturates on the quantum synaptic transmission in spinal motoneurons.
2	glycine in the spinal cord of cats with local tetanus rigidity	Glycine in the spinal cord of cats with a local tetanic rigidity.
2	opponent color cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus	Staining of the opposing cells in the lateral genicular nucleus of the cat.
2	non linear summation of unit synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurones of the cat	Nonlinear summation of unit synaptic potentials in cat spinal motoneurons.
2	analysis of synaptic efficacy in spinal motoneurones from quantum aspects	Spinal motoneuron analysis; spinal motoneuron synaptic efficiency below; quantum angle.
2	neuromuscular contacts in intracranial arteries of the cat	Neuromuscular contacts in the cat's intracranial arteries.
2	the spatial selectivity of the visual cells of the cat	The spatial selectivity of cat visual cells.
2	excitatory postsynaptic potential and monosynaptic reflex discharge of spinal motoneurons during anoxic insult	Postsynaptic potentials excitatory and reflex monosynaptic discharge of spinal motoneurons during anoxic aggression.
2	properties of cholinoceptive neurones in the medial geniculate nucleus	Properties of the cholinoceptor neurons in the median geniculate nucleus.
2	studies on cholinergic transmission in the medial geniculate nucleus	Cholinergic transmission studies in the median geniculate nucleus.
2	mephenesin methocarbamol chlordiazepoxide and diazepam actions on spinal reflexes and ventral root potentials	Mephenesin methocarbamol chlordiazepoxide and diazepam actions on spinal reflexes and ventral root potentials.
2	release to the cerebral ventricles of substances with possible transmitter function in the caudate nucleus	Substances with a possible transmitter function in the caudate nucleus released into the cerebral ventricles.
2	thermosensitivity of neurons in the sensorimotor cortex of the cat	The temperature sensitivity of neurons in the cat sensorimotor cortex.
2	cat colour vision one cone process or several	The vision of the colors d' a cat is made by a cone or several cones.
2	the nature and location of certain phasic mechanoreceptors in the cat s foot	Nature and Lapos; location of some phasic mechanoreceptors in the foot of the cat.
2	the mechanical properties of cat soleus muscle during controlled lengthening and shortening movements	Mechanical properties of cat soleus muscle during controlled motion; elongation and shortening.
2	correlation of prostaglandin release from the cerebral cortex of cats with the electrocorticogram following stimulation of the reticular formation	Correlation between the release of prostaglandins from the cerebral cortex of cats and l' electrocorticogram after stimulation of reticular formation.
2	effect of monoamineoxidase inhibitors on 5 hydroxytryptamine output from perfused cerebral ventricles of anaesthetized cats	Effect of monoamine inhibitors,-oxidase, on the release of 5 hydroxytryptamine from perfused cerebral ventricles of anesthetized cats.
2	cat brain mucopolysaccharides and their in vivo hyaluronidase digestion	The mucopolysaccharides of the cat brain and their in vivo digestion by the hyaluronidase.
2	electrophysiological evidence for binocular disparity detectors in human visual system	Electrophysiological evidence that there are binocular disparity detectors in the human visual system.
2	somatovisceral pathway rapidly conducting fibers in the spinal cord	Somatovisceral pathway, rapidly conductive fibers in the spinal cord.
2	effects of nicotine and tobacco smoke on the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex and olfactory bulb	Effects of nicotine and tobacco smoke on appetite; electrical activity of the cerebral cortex and the olfactory bulb.
2	visual experience modifies distribution of horizontally and vertically oriented receptive fields in cats	L' visual experience alters the distribution of horizontally and vertically oriented receptive fields in cats and cats.
2	number coding in association cortex of the cat	Code number in the cortex d' cat association.
2	behavioral discrimination of click intensity in cat	The behavioral discrimination of the click intensity in the cat.
2	afferent connexions to group i activated cells in the main cuneate nucleus of the cat	Group i connections activate the cells in the main cuneate nucleus of the cat.
2	central nervous system activity associated with the pain evoked by bradykinin and its alteration by morphine and aspirin	Activity of the central nervous system associated with bradykinin-evoked pain and its alteration by morphine and l' aspirin.
2	superior colliculus single unit responses to stimulation of visual cortex in the cat	Upper unitary responses of the colliculus to visual cortical stimulation in cats.
2	a method of stimulating different segments of the autonomic outflow from the spinal column to various organs in the pithed cat and rat	A method for stimulating different segments of the vertebral spine; autonomic flow from the spine to various organs in decerebrated cats and rats.
2	histochemical and functional correlations in anterior horn neurons of the cat spinal cord	Histochemical and functional correlations in neurons in the anterior horn of the cat spinal cord.
2	unilateral ablation of the auditory cortex in the cat impairs complex sound localization	L' the unilateral removal of the auditory cortex in the cat prevents a complex sound localization.
2	effects of general depressant drugs on the electrical responses of isolated slabs of cat s cerebral cortex	Effects of generalized depressants on the electrical responses of isolated cat's cerebral cortical plates.
2	effects of general stimulant drugs on the electrical responses of isolated slabs of cat s cerebral cortex	Effects of generalized stimulants on the electrical responses of isolated patches of the cerebral cortex of cats.
2	a study in vivo of adrenergic receptors in the rectum and in the internal and sphincter of the cat	An in vivo study of adrenergic receptors in the rectum, inner sphincter, and sphincter of the cat.
2	neural pathways associated with hypothalamically elicited attach behavior in cats	Neural pathways associated with d&apos-like behavior; hypothalamic attachment in cats.
2	visual patterned reflex present during hypothalamically elicited attack	A visual reflex present during the apos; attack initiated hypothalamously.
2	the effects of dimethothiazine on muscle spindle activity in the decerebrate cat	The effects of dimethothiazine on the apos; muscle spindle activity in brain-dead cats.
2	geometrical illusions and the response of neurones in the cat s visual cortex to angle patterns	Geometric illusions and the response of cat visual cortical neurons to d' angle.
2	microinjections of tubocurarine leptazol strychnine and picrotoxin into the cerebral cortex of anaesthetized cats	Microinjections of leptazol strychnine and picrotoxin tubocurarine into the cerebral cortex of anesthetized cats.
2	superior colliculus some receptive field properties of bimodally responsive cells	Superior colliculus some receptive field properties of the bimodal response cells.
2	how does the striate cortex begin the reconstruction of the visual world	How does the striated cortex initiate-t-it reconstruction of the visual world?
2	somatosensory responses of bulboreticular units in awake cat relation to escape producing stimuli	Somatosensory responses of the bulboreticular units in relation to the fledgling cat producing stimuli.
2	functional specializations of the vascular bed of soleus	Functional specializations of the soleus vascular bed.
2	the extraneuronal uptake and localization of noradrenaline in the cat spleen and the effect on this of some drugs of cold and of denervation	Extraneuronal uptake and localization of noradrenaline in the cat spleen and lapos; effect of certain cold and denervation drugs on the cat spleen.
2	responses of cat retinal ganglion cells to brief flashes of light	Reactions of the cat's retinal ganglion cells to brief flashes of light.
2	the form and distribution of the surface evoked responses in cerebellar cortex from intercostal nerves in the cat	The shape and distribution of the surface suggest responses in the cerebellar cortex of the cat's intercostal nerves.
2	perfusion from cerebral ventricle to cisterna magna in the unanaesthetized cat effect of calcium on body temperature	Perfusion of the cerebral ventricle to the magna cistern in the apos; unanaesthetized cat effect of calcium on body temperature.
2	the representation of three dimensional visual space in the cat s striate cortex	The representation of l' 3D visual space in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	cervico lumbar reflex interactions involving a proprioceptive receiving area of the cerebral cortex	Reflexic cervical interactions-lumbar involving a proprioceptive receptive area of the cerebral cortex.
2	mesopic increment threshold spectral sensitivity of single optic tract fibres in the cat cone rod interaction	Mesopic enlargement Mesopic enlargement Spectral sensitivity of cell fibers; a single optical tract in the cell; cat cone stick interaction.
2	differences in the distribution of catecholamine varicosities in cat and rat reticular formation	Differences in the distribution of catecholamine varicosities in reticular formation in the cat and rat.
2	field potentials evoked in the brain stem of the cat by stimulation of the carotid sinus glossopharyngeal aortic and superior laryngeal nerves	Potential fields evoked in the brainstem of the cat by stimulation of the lip; glossopharyngeal aorta of the carotid sinus and superior laryngeal nerves.
2	responses of cells in the brain stem of the cat to stimulation of the sinus glossopharyngeal aortic and superior laryngeal nerves	Cells of the cat brain stem respond to stimulation of the apos; glossopharyngeal aorta of the sinus and upper laryngeal nerves.
2	ouabain sensitive carrier mediated transport of glucose from the cerebral ventricles to surrounding tissues in the cat	Glucose transport from the cerebral ventricles to surrounding tissues in the cat is mediated by a ouabain-sensitive carrier.
2	the afferent innervation of two infrahyoid muscles of the cat	L' afferent innervation of two subhyoid cat muscles.
2	impedance changes across the footpad of the cat in relation to action and secretion in sweat glands	L' impedance changes on the mat of the cat as a function of the action and secretion in the sweat glands.
2	spontaneous activity of neurones of nucleus reticularis thalami in freely moving cats	Spontaneous activity of reticularis thalami nucleus neurons in free-ranging cats.
2	centrifugal inhibitory processes affecting neurones in the cat cochlear nucleus	D&apos process; centrifugal inhibition affecting cochlear nucleus neurons in cat.
2	acetylcholine liberation from cerebral cortex during paradoxical rem sleep	Release of d' acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex during REM REM REM sleep.
2	the release of gamma aminobutyric acid during inhibition in the cat visual cortex	The release of d' gamma-amino-butyric acid during apos; inhibition in the cat's visual cortex.
2	the mechanism of the cardio acceleration elicited by electrical stimulation of the parahypoglossal area in the cat	The mechanism of l' acceleration of the cardio triggered by electrical stimulation of the parahypoglossal region in the cat.
2	recurrent inhibition of interneurones monosynaptically activated from group ia afferents	Recurrent inhibition of monosynaptically activated interneurons by ia-group afferents.
2	spino spinal mechanisms in the chloralose anaesthetized cat	Spinal mechanisms in the spinal cord of chloralose-anesthetized cats.
2	cat colour vision evidence for more than one cone process	The cat's color vision shows the existence of more than a dozen colors; a cone process.
2	responses to visual contours spatio temporal aspects of excitation in the receptive fields of simple striate neurones	Responses to visual spatial contours-time-series of the apos; excitation in the receptor fields of single striated neurons.
2	presynaptic and post synaptic inhibition elicited in the cat s dorsal column nuclei by mechanical stimulation of skin	Presynaptic and post-synaptic inhibition was induced in the nuclei of the cat dorsal column by mechanical stimulation of the skin.
2	variations of the visual responses of the superior colliculus in relation to body roll	Changes in the visual response of the superior colliculus to body roll.
2	identification of prostaglandins in prevertebral venous blood after preganglionic stimulation of the cat superior cervical ganglion	Identification of prostaglandins in prevertebral venous blood following cat superior cervical ganglion preganglion stimulation.
2	acetylcholine in adrenergic terminals of the cat iris	L' acetylcholine in the adrenergic terminals of l' iris of the cat.
2	chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of cat visual cortical cells cone rod interaction	Chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of the apos; cone rod interaction of visual cat cortical cells.
2	spinal sympathetic reflexes initiated by coronary receptors	Sympathetic spinal reflexes initiated by coronary receptors.
2	neuronal correlates of eye movements in the visual cortex of the cat	Neuronal correlations of the movement of the eye in the visual cortex of the cat.
2	spontaneous activity of cerebellar purkinje cells and their responses to impulses in climbing fibres	L' spontaneous activity of the cells of cerebellar purkinje and their responses to impulses in the climbing fibers.
2	vasoactive hormones in endotoxin shock a comparative study in cats and dogs	Vasoactive hormones in endotoxic shock a comparative study in cats and dogs.
2	effects of some sympathomimetic drugs and their antagonists on afterdischarges elicited in chronically isolated slabs of cerebral cortex	The effects of some sympathomimetic drugs and their antagonists on post-discharges have been induced in chronically isolated slices of cerebral cortex.
2	anomalous retinal pathways in the siamese cat an inadequate substrate for normal bioncular vision	Abnormal retinal pathways in Siamese cats constitute an inadequate substrate for normal bioncular vision.
2	fusimotor innervation in the cat	Fusimotor innervation in the cat?
2	the parasympathetic secretory nerves of the lacrimal gland of the cat	The parasympathetic secretory nerves of the cat's lacrimal gland.
2	rod dependent intracellular responses to light recorded from the pigment epithelium of the cat retina	Intracellular light-dependent reactions of the rodlets recorded in the epithelium pigment of the cat retina.
2	binocular interaction fields of single units in the cat striate cortex	Champs d' interaction binoculars d' single units in the cortex stripe of the cat.
2	synaptic transmission in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat after reinnervation by vagus fibres	Synaptic transmission in the upper cervical ganglion of the cat following vaginal fiber reinnervation.
2	the purkinje shift in cat extent of the mesopic range	The purkinje movement in the apos; range of the cat of the mesopic range.
2	aberrant visual projections in the siamese cat	Visual aberrant projections in the Siamese cat.
2	the flow of juice from the pancreatic gland of the cat in response to vagal stimulation	The juice flow of the cat's pancreatic gland in response to vagal stimulation.
2	recurrent inhibition of fusimotor neurones exhibiting background discharges in the decerebrate and the spinal cat	Recurrent inhibition of fusimotor neurons in the decerebrate and spinal cat with background discharge.
2	the paramedian reticular nucleus a site of inhibitory interaction between projections from fastigial nucleus and carotid sinus nerve acting on blood pressure	The paramedial reticular nucleus is a site that acts as an inhibitory interaction between the projections of the fastidial nucleus and the carotid sinus nerve acting on blood pressure.
2	modification of the reflex response to stimulation of carotid sinus baroreceptors during and following stimulation of the hypothalamic defence area in the cat	Modification of the reflex response to carotid sinus baroreceptor stimulation during and after cat stimulation of the hypothalamic defense zone.
2	sex difference in the number of the sympathetic neurons in the spinal cord of the cat	A sexual difference in the number of sympathetic neurons in the cat's spinal cord.
2	a neuron model with spatially distributed synaptic input	Neural model with synaptic input distributed in the same region.
2	radiofrequency cordotomy for the relief of spasticity in decerebrate cats	A radiofrequency cordotomy for the relief of spasticity in cats with decerebral defects.
2	spatial synaptic distribution of recurrent and group ia inhibitory systems in cat spinal motoneurones	Spatial synaptic distribution of group and recurrent inhibition in cat spinal motoneurons.
2	visual and auditory inputs into the cuneate nucleus	Inputs into the kernel are visual and auditory.
2	the action of carbon dioxide on afferent transmission in the dorsal column lemniscal system	L' the action of carbon dioxide on the afferent transmission in the lemniscal system of the dorsal column.
2	the action of carbon dioxide on synaptic transmission in the cuneate nucleus	The action of carbon dioxide on synaptic transmission in the dune nucleus.
2	specialized membrane junctions between neurons in the vertebrate cerebellar cortex	A series of specialized membrane junctions between neurons in the cerebellar cortex of vertebrates.
2	physiological and structural changes in the cat s soleus muscle due to immobilization at different lengths by plaster casts	Physiological and structural changes in the soleus muscle of the cat due to plaster immobilization of different lengths.
2	spontaneous and evoked activity of neurones in the somatosensory thalamus of the waking cat	Spontaneous evoked neuronal activity in the somatosensory thalamus of the awake cat.
2	sustained and transient neurones in the cat s retina and lateral geniculate nucleus	Transient and sustained neurons in the cat retina and the lateral genital nucleus.
2	the form and distribution of the receptive fields of pacinian corpuscles found in and around the cat s large foot pad	The shape and distribution of the receptive fields of pacinic corpuscles found in the interior and around the great paw of the cat.
2	selective inhibition by glycine of some somatic reflexes in the cat	Glycine selective inhibition of certain somatic reflexes in cats.
2	effects of dopamine on the conductance of perfused vascular beds of the chloralosed cat	Effects of dopamine on the conductance of chloralose cat perfused vascular beds.
2	responses of neurones in the cat s visual cerebral cortex to relative movement of patterns	Reactions of visual cerebral cortical neurons of the cat to relative motion of patterns.
2	cholinergic and non cholinergic transmission in the medial geniculate nucleus of the cat	Cholinergic and noncholinergic transmission in the median genicular nucleus of cats.
2	a study of stretch and vibration reflexes of the cat by intracellular recording from motoneurones	A study of cat stretching and vibration reflexes by intracellular recording of motor neurons.
2	the vasomotor component of the carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex in the cat during stimulation of the hypothalamic defence area	The vasomotor component of the cat carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex during stimulation of the hypothalamic defense zone.
2	image quality of the cat eye measured during retinal ganglion cell experiments	Quality of the tissue; image of the cell; cat's eye measured during cell studies; retinal ganglionic cell experiments.
2	morphologic alterations of synapses in electrically stimulated superior cervical ganglia of the cat	Morphological alterations of synapses in electrically stimulated cat superior cervical ganglia.
2	the time course of minimal excitory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurones by group ia afferent fibres	L' temporal evolution of minimum excitatory synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurons by afferent fibers of the ia group.
2	spinal integration of segmental cortical and breathing inputs to thoracic respiratory motoneurones	Spinal integration of cortical and respiratory segmental inputs to chest ventilatory motoneurons.
2	columnar organization of visually driven neurons in the superior colliculus of the cat	Column organization of visually controlled neurons in the cat superior colliculus.
2	effects of cingulate cortex lesions on emotional behavior and delayed responses in cats	Effects on emotional behavior and delayed responses in cats from cingulate cortical lesions.
2	antagonism of gaba by picrotoxin in the feline cerebral cortex	Picrotoxin antagonism of the gaba in the feline cerebral cortex.
2	effects of narcotic analgesics and antagonists on the in vivo release of acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex of the cat	Effects of narcotic analgesics and antagonists on the in vivo release of acetylcholine from the cat cerebral cortex.
2	the mechanism of the facilitatory action of edrophonium in cat skeletal muscle	The mechanism of the apos; edrophonium facilitating action in the cat skeletal muscle.
2	modifications of dorsal horn cell activities in the spinal cord after intra arterial injection of bradykinin	Modification of the apos; activity of dorsal horn cells in the spinal cord after bradykinin intra-@ arterial injection.
2	influence of adaptation level on response pattern and sensitivity of ganglion cells in the cat s retina	L' influences the level of d' adaptation to the response pattern and sensitivity of cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	cat hemoglobin ph dependent cooperativity of oxygen binding	L' cat hemoglobin depends on the cooperativity of binding of the oxygen.
2	visual input to the pontine nuclei	Visual entry into the pontic cores.
2	unit responses to moving visual stimuli in the motor cortex of the cat	Unit reactions to moving visual stimuli in the cat motor cortex.
2	release of 5 hydroxytryptamine from caudate nucleus and septum	Release 5 caudate nucleus and septum hydroxytryptamine.
2	release of transmitters on stimulation of the nucleus linearis raphe in the cat	D&apos release; emitters by stimulation of the cat's linearis nucleus.
2	effects of denervation and reinnervation on the responses of kitten muscles to acetylcholine and suxamethonium	Effects of denervation and reinnervation on the responses of kitten muscle tissue to acetylcholine and suxamethonium.
2	an electrophysiological demonstration of the axonal projections of single spinal interneurones in the cat	An electrophysiological demonstration of axonal projections of simple spinal interneurons in the cat.
2	facilitation of monosynaptic excitatory synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurones evoked by internuncial impulses	Facilitation of monosynaptic excitatory synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurons evoked by an interuncial pulse.
2	quantal components of the inhibitory synaptic potential in spinal mononeurones of the cat	Quantum components of inhibitory synaptic potential in spinal mononurons of cats.
2	comparison of receptive field organization of the superior colliculus in siamese and normal cats	Comparison of l' receptive field organization of superior colliculus in normal and Siamese cats.
2	the contrast sensitivity of the cat	Oh, the cat's contrast sensitivity.
2	contrasts in spatial organization of receptive fields at geniculate and retinal levels centre surround and outer surround	Contrasts in the apos; spatial organization of the receptive fields at the geniculate and retinal levels surround the center and surround the apos; outside.
2	the effect of chronic duct ligation on the vascular and secretory responses of the cat s submaxillary gland	Lapos; effect; chronic ligation of channels on vascular and secretory responses of the gland under cat's maxillary.
2	morphology of interneurones mediating ia reciprocal inhibition of motoneurones in the spinal cord of the cat	Morphology of the meditating interneurons; reciprocal inhibition of motoneurons in the cat spinal cord.
2	sarcocystis in mice inoculated with toxoplasma like oocysts from cat feces	In mice inoculated with toxoplasm, the sarcocyst resembles oocysts from cat feces.
2	chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of lgn neurone receptive fields in cat cone rod interaction	The chromatic sensitivity and l' spatial organization of the receptor fields of lgn neurons in the apos; interaction of cat cone rods.
2	sensitivity of the nictitating membrane of the cat to succinylcholine after decentralization and denervation	Sensitivity of cat nictitating membrane to succinylcholine after decentralization and denervation.
2	anaesthetic cardiovascular and respiratory effects of a new steroidal agent ct 1341 a comparison with other intravenous anaesthetic drugs in the unrestrained cat	Cardiovascular and respiratory anesthetic effects of Dapos; a new steroidal agent ct 1341 a comparison with Dapos; other intravenous anesthetic drugs in uncontrolled cat.
2	the behavior of chronic cats with lesions in the frontal association cortex	Behaviour of chronic cats with lesions in the cortex d' frontal association.
2	determination of the frequency response of isometric soleus muscle in the cat using random nerve stimulation	Determination of the frequency response of the isometric soleus muscle in cats by random nerve stimulation.
2	cats reared in stroboscopic illumination effects on receptive fields in visual cortex	Cats reared in strobe lighting had effects on the receptive fields in the visual cortex.
2	differential transport of protein in axons comparison between the sciatic nerve and dorsal columns of cats	Differential protein transport in the axons of comparison between the sciatic nerve and cat dorsal columns.
2	effects of adrenaline isoprenaline and histamine on transsinusoidal fluid filtration in the cat liver	Effects of epos, adrenaline, isoprenaline and apos; histamine on transsine filtration of fluid in the cat liver.
2	synchronization of discharge spontaneous and evoked between inspiratory neurons	Synchronization of spontaneous and evoked electrical discharge between inspiring neurons.
2	neuronal organization of the central respiratory mechanisms in the brain stem of the cat	A neural organization of the central respiratory mechanisms in the cat's brainstem.
2	anatomical and functional heterogeneity of the medullary respiratory neurons	Anatomical and functional heterogeneity of medullary respiratory neurons.
2	isolation of rd 114 like oncornavirus from a cat cell line	To isolate rd 114 as oncornavirus d' a cat cell line.
2	receptive field organization of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells which subserve different function roles	Receptive field organization of transient and sustained retinal ganglion cells that have different functional roles.
2	release of transmitters into the perfused third cerebral ventrical of the cat	Release of transmitters in the third cerebral perfused ventricle of the cat.
2	the visual areas in the splenial sulcus of the cat	The visual areas in the cat's splenic groove.
2	visual resolution and experience acuity deficits in cats following early selective visual deprivation	The visual resolution and lapos; experience of deficits d'apos; acuity in cats as a result of d'apos; early selective visual deprivation.
2	visual experience without lines effect on developing cortical neurons	Visual experience without d&apos lines; effect on cortical neuron development.
2	predatory attack grooming and consummatory behaviors evoked by electrical stimulation of cat cerebellar nuclei	Predatory attack, grooming, and consumption behaviors evoked by electrical stimulation of the cat's cerebellar nuclei.
2	flux not retinal illumination is what cat retinal ganglion cells really care about	Flux and not lapos; retinal illumination is what retinal ganglion cells in cats are really interested in.
2	the organization of visual receptive fields or neurons in the cat colliculus superior	Organization of receptive visual fields or neurons in the cat's superior colliculus.
2	receptive fields of simple cells in the cat striate cortex	Receptive fields of single cells in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	electron microscopy of cat spinal cord subject to circulatory arrest and deep local hypothermia 15 c	Electron microscopy of the cat spinal cord is subject to circulatory arrest and severe local hypothermia 15 c.
2	morphometry of an ischemic lesion of cat spinal cord	D&apos morphometry; an ischemic spinal cord injury in the cat.
2	evidence from the use of vibration during procaine nerve block that the spindle group ii fibres contribute excitation to the tonic stretch reflex of the decerebrate cat	L' use of vibrations during the nerve block of the procaine shows that the fibers of spindle group ii contribute to the apos; excitation of the reflex d' tonic stretch of the decerebrated cat.
2	gamma aminobutyric acid antagonism in visual cortex different effects on simple complex and hypercomplex neurons	L' gamma antagonism of l' aminobutyric acid in the visual cortex was found to have different effects on simple complex and hypercomplex neurons.
2	on the pharmacology of the gamma aminobutyric acid receptors on the cuneo thalamic relay cells of the cat	The pharmacology of gamma receptors of aminobutyric acid on cuneo thalamic relay cells in cats.
2	the amplitude time course and charge of unitary excitatory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurone dendrites	L' temporal evolution of apos; amplitude and loading of unit excitatory post-synaptic potentials have been evoked in spinal motoneuron dendrites.
2	physiological types and histochemical profiles in motor units of the cat gastrocnemius	Physiological types and histochemical profiles in gastrocnemius cat motor units.
2	anatomy and innervation ratios in motor units of cat gastrocnemius	Anatomy and rates of apo; innervation in the motor units of the cat gastrocnemius.
2	actions of morphine on the segmental reflex of the decerebrate spinal cat	Morphine effects on the segmental reflex of the spinal cat.
2	excitability changes in cat lateral geniculate cells during saccadic eye movements	Changes in body size; excitability in cat lateral genital cells during jerky movements of the eye.
2	the projection of the posterior knee joint nerve to the cerebellar cortex	The projection of the posterior articular nerve from the knee to the cerebellar cortex.
2	receptive field analysis responses to moving visual contours by single lateral geniculate neurones in the cat	L' receptive field analysis reacts to moving visual outlines with simple cat lateral genicular neurons.
2	kitten visual cortex short term stimulus induced changes in connectivity	Short-term stimulation of the kitten's visual cortex induced changes in connectivity.
2	interaction between picrotoxin and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat	Interaction between picrotoxin and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the cat's upper cervical ganglion.
2	synaptic vesicle depletion and recovery in cat sympathetic ganglia electrically stimulated in vivo evidence for transmitter secretion by exocytosis	Depletion and recovery of synaptic vesicles in sympathetic ganglia of the cat were electrically stimulated in vivo, indicating exocytosis transmitter secretion.
2	central projection of tooth pulp primary afferents in the cat	Central projection of the primary afferents of cat toothpaste.
2	conditioned blink reflex and neuronal activity in the auditory cortex of the cat	Conditioned flashing reflex and neuronal activity in the cat auditory cortex.
2	dynamic properties of denervated fast and slow twitch muscle of the cat	Dynamic properties of slow and fast denervated cat twitch muscles.
2	relationships between motor nerve conduction velocities and motor unit contraction characteristics in a slow twitch muscle of the cat	The relationship between motor nerve conduction velocities and the characteristics of contraction of the motor unit in a slow twitch muscle of the cat.
2	electrical activity of cerebral cortex in the cat during closure of simple form of a temporary connection	Electrical activity of the cerebral cortex in the cat during the cat's closure; a simple form of temporary connection.
2	functional significance of ventral descending tracts of the spinal cord in the cat	Functional relevance of the cat's ventral descending pathways of the spinal cord.
2	5 hydroxyindoleacetic acid in the lumbar fluid a specific indicator of spinal cord injury	Five hydroxyindole acetic acids in the lumbar fluid... a specific indicator of spinal cord injury.
2	macroelectrodic activity of the facial nucleus of the cat	Macroelectrodic activity of cat facial kernel.
2	operant conditioning of single unit response patterns in visual cortex	Operational conditioning of single unit visual cortical response patterns.
2	influence of eye movements on geniculo striate excitability in the cat	L' influence of eye movements on the apos; excitability of genital striate in cats.
2	normal contractile state of hypertrophied myocardium after pulmonary artery constriction in the cat	Normal contractile state of the hypertrophied myocardium after constriction of the epos; pulmonary artery in the cat.
2	mechanical studies on the retractor bulbi muscle and its motor units in the cat	Mechanical studies of the retractor bulb and its motor units in cats.
2	the detection of differential beta adrenoceptor blockade in the cat	Detection of apos; differential beta-adrenergic receptor blockade in cats.
2	the bleaching and regeneration of rhodopsin in the cat	Rhodopsin bleaching and regeneration in the cat.
2	cat retinal ganglion cells size and shape of receptive field centres	The size and shape of retinal ganglion cells of the cat are receptor field centres.
2	temperature sensitivity of the paw of the cat a behavioural study	The temperature sensitivity of the cat's paw... a behavioral study.
2	the afferent discharge pattern of atrial mechanoreceptors in the cat during sinusoidal stretch of atrial strips in situ	The pattern of afferent discharge of atrial mechanoreceptors in the cat during apo; sinusoidal stretch of atrial strips in situ.
2	the projection of the vestibular nerve to the cerebral cortex in the cat	The projection of the vestibular nerve into the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	antigenicity of serum albumin in allergy against cat or dog epithelium significance of the radioallergosorbens test in the diagnosis of allergies	Antigenicity of l' serum albumin in allergy to apos; epithelium of cat or dog meaning of radioallergosorbens test in diagnosis of allergies.
2	types of synapses in the claustrum of the cat	Types of synapses in the cat claustrum.
2	the structure of the first auditory cortex a i in the cat i light microscopic observations on its organization	The structure of the first auditory cortex in the cat i light microscopic observations on its organization.
2	manganese ions and synaptic transmission in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat	Manganese ions and synaptic transmission in the cat upper cervical ganglion.
2	reconstruction of axonal trajectory of individual neurons in the spinal cord using golgi stained serial sections	Reconstruction of the axonal trajectory of individual neurons in the spinal cord at the apos; aid of golgi-stained serial sections.
2	fine structure and distribution of axon terminals from the cochlear nucleus on neurons in the medial superior olivary nucleus of the cat	Fine structure and distribution of the axonal terminals of the cochlear nucleus on neurons of the middle upper olivary nucleus.
2	projections of extraocular neck muscle and retinal afferents to superior colliculus in the cat their connections to cells of origin of tectospinal tract	Projections of extraocular neck muscle and retinal afferents to the superior colliculus in cats from connections to d&apos cells; origin of tectospinal tract.
2	enlargement of synaptic vesicles in degenerating nerve endings a comparison between cat and monkey	Augmentation of synaptic vesicles in degenerating nerve endings; comparison of cat and monkey nerve endings.
2	effect of delayed local cooling on experimental spinal cord injury	Effect of delayed local cooling on the experimental spinal cord injury.
2	behavioural contrast sensitivity of the cat in various visual meridians	Sensitivity to cat behavioral contrast in various visual meridians.
2	the effect of indomethacin on the cardiovascular and metabolic responses to e coli endotoxin in the cat	Effects of apos; indomethacin on cardiovascular and metabolic responses to apos; endotoxin; e coli in cats.
2	organization of corticofugal neurones in somatosensory area ii of the cat	Organizing corticofugal neurons in the zone of somatosensory ii of the cat.
2	the effect of visual experience on the development of stimulus specificity by kitten cortical neurones	Effects of visual experience on the development of stimulus specificity by the kitten cortical neurons.
2	contradiction of auditory and visual information by brain stimulation	Contradiction of hearing and visual information through brain stimulation.
2	abolition of electrically induced cortical seizures by stereotactic thalamic lesions evidence for descending thalamopontine medullar spinal connections in the centrencephalic epileptic system of the cat	L*apos; suppression of electrically induced cortical seizures by stereotactic thalamic lesions indicates the presence of thalamopontin-derived medullary connections in the cat's epileptic centencephalic system.
2	the activity of respiratory neurons before and during panting in the cat	L' activity of cat respiratory neurons before and during panting.
2	treatment of ethylene glycol toxicosis in cats	Treatment of Toxicosis in cats: ethylene glycol.
2	cns site of antiarrhythmic action of diphenylhydantoin dph in the cat	Site(s) of infection; antiarrhythmic action of diphenylhydantoin dph in cats.
2	the mode of action of 5 hydroxytryptophan in facilitating a stretch reflex in the spinal cat	The mode of d' action of 5 hydroxytryptophan to facilitate a reflex d' stretch in spinal cat.
2	vestibular and somatosensory inflow to the vestibular projection area in the post cruciate dimple region of the cat cerebral cortex	A vestibular and somatosensory entry into the vestibular projection area of the fossa area post-crossed the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	evoked activity of cat association cortex neurons in different sleep stages	The activity of cortical neurons has been evoked; association of the cat with different stages of sleep.
2	evoked automatism repeated responses of cat cardiac ventricular fibers	Repetitive, automated reactions evoked from cat cardiac ventricular fibers.
2	corticofugal influences of somatosensory areas of the cortex on signal transmission in the posterior ventral nucleus	Corticofugal influences of somatosensory regions of the cortex on signal transmission in the ventral posterior nucleus.
2	quantitative aspects of the shift effect in cat retinal ganglion cells	Quantitative aspects of the apos; displacement effect in the cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	the synaptic structure of catecholaminergic axon varicosities in the dorso medial portion of the nucleus tractus solitarius of the cat possible roles in the regulation of cardiovascular reflexes	The synaptic structure of catecholaminergic axonal varicosities in the middle-dorso portion of the cat solitary bundle nucleus may play a role in the regulation of cardiovascular reflexes.
2	effects of co 2 and extracellular h iontophoresis on single cell activity in the cat brainstem	Effects of apos; co2 and apos ionophoresis; extracellular h ionophoresis on apos; monocytocellular activity in the brainstem of cats.
2	cardiovascular chemoreflexes from the perfused innervated ileum of the cat	Cardiovascular Chemoreflexes of the ileum; ileum innervated from the cat.
2	effect of nitrogen narcosis on cortical and subcortical evoked responses in the cat	The effect of nitrogen narcosis on cortical responses and under-corticalales was discussed in the cat.
2	projections from the nucleus and tractus solitarius in the cat	Projections of the nucleus and the tractus solitarius in the cat.
2	olivocochlear and vestibular efferent neurons of the feline brain stem their location morphology and number determined by retrograde axonal transport and acetylcholinesterase histochemistry	Olivocochlear and vestibular efferent neurons of cat brain have a localization morphology and number determined by retrograde axonal transport and l' l&apos histochemistry; acetylcholinesterase.
2	projections of the dorsal column nuclei and the spinal cord on the inferior olive in the cat	Projections of the spinal column and spinal cord nuclei on the cat's lower olive sac.
2	variability of the relative preference for stimulus orientation and direction of movement in some units of the cat visual cortex areas 17 and 18	Variability of the relative preference for l' orientation of stimuli and direction of movement in certain units of zones 17 and 18 of the visual cortex of the cat.
2	the effect of a chronic lesion in cortical area 17 on the visual responses of units in area 18 of the cat	In addition, there is a chronic lesion in the cortical area 17 on the visual responses of the units in area 18 of the cat.
2	climbing fibre inputs to cerebellar purkinje cells from trigeminal cutaneous afferents and the si face area of the cerebral cortex in the cat	Inputs of climbing fibers into cerebellar purkinje cells of trigeminal skin afferents and the face if of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	responses of fastigial nucleus neurones to stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	Reactions of fastigial nuclei to stimulation of caudate nuclei in cats.
2	periodic excitability changes across the receptive fields of complex cells in the striate and parastriate cortex of the cat	L' excitability varies periodically through the receptor fields of complex cells in the striated and parastrious cat cortex.
2	corticofugal effects from sensorimotor area i and somatosensory area ii on neurones of the pontine nuclei in the cat	Corticofugal effects of the sensorimotor region i and the somatosensory region ii on neurons in cat pontic nuclei.
2	visual receptive fields and their images in superior colliculus of the cat	Visual receptive fields and their images in the upper colliculus of the cat.
2	representation of cochlea within primary auditory cortex in the cat	A representation of the cochlea in the primary auditory cortex of the cat.
2	abnormal neuronal responses during evolution of a penicillin epileptic focus in cat visual cortex	Abnormal neuronal reactions during apos; evolution of apos; an epileptic focal point of penicillin in the cat visual cortex.
2	disinhibition in cat motor cortex by ammonia	Disinhibition in the cat's cerebral motor cortex by ammonia.
2	spatial limits of epileptogenic cortex its relationship to ectopic spike generation	Spatial limitations of the epileptogenic cortex, its relationship to ectopic episopic generation.
2	reticulospinal neurons with and without monosynaptic inputs from cerebellar nuclei	Reticulospinal neurons with and without monosynaptic inputs from the cerebellar nuclei.
2	medial recticular neurons projecting rostrally	Median recticular neurons making a rostral projection.
2	viruslike inclusions in the cecal epithelial cells of pa agonimus kellicotti digenea troglotrematidae	Virus-like cell inclusions in the caecal epithelial cells of pa agonimus kellicotti digenea troglotrematidae.
2	eye movement related activity in the visual cortex of dark reared kittens	Activity related to eye movement in the visual cortex of kittens raised in black.
2	single unit activity in the lateral amygdala of the cat during sleep and waking	Unital activity in the lateral amygdala of cat during sleep and alarm.
2	receptive field characteristics and plastic properties of visual cortical cells in kittens reared with or without visual experience	Characteristics of the receptive field and plastic properties of visual cortical cells in kittens reared with or without visual experience.
2	modification of single neurons in the kitten s visual cortex after brief periods of monocular visual experience	Modification of single neurons in visual cortex of kitten after brief periods of d' monocular visual experience.
2	labyrinthine influence on cat forelimb motoneurons	Labyrinthic influence on the cat's forelimbs motoneurons.
2	thalamo cortical projections for recruiting responses and spindling like responses in the parietal cortex	Thalamo cortical projections for spindle and recruitment responses in the parietal cortex.
2	receptive fields in cat superior colliculus after visual cortex lesions	Receptors in the cat's superior colliculus after lesions of visual cortex.
2	unusual arrangement of agranular endoplasmic reticulum in the interstitial cells of the cat ovary	Unusual arrangement of the agranular endoplasmic reticulum in the interstitial cells of the oval of the cat.
2	nonhematopoietic neoplasms in cats	Non-hematopoietic neoplasms in the cats.
2	effect of constant currents on orthodontic tooth movement in the cat	Effect of constant currents on the movement of orthodontic teeth in cats.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord i analysis of amino acids at maximum of potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanus potentiation post-tetanus, monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord and amino acid analysis at maximum potentiation.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord ii determination of phospholipids at maximum of potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanic potentiation post-tetanic of monosynaptic reflexes in the spinal cord of cats ii determination of phospholipids at maximum potentiation.
2	vagal responses to vestibular stimulation in the cat	Vaginal responses to vestibular stimulation in cats.
2	influence of dendritic location and membrane properties on the effectiveness of synapses on cat motoneurones	Influence of dendritic localization and membrane properties on apos; efficiency of synapses on cat motoneurons.
2	hypoxia induced tachypnea in carotid deafferented cats	L' hypoxia induced tachypnoea in deafferented cats of the carotid artery.
2	distribution of latencies in the receptive fields of superior colliculus neurons in cats	Distribution of latencies in the receptor fields of colliculus superior neurons in cats.
2	neural plasticity in visual cortex of adult cats after exposure to visual patterns	Neural plasticity in visual cortex of adult cats after exposure to visual patterns. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/pubs/index_e.html.
2	far field acoustic response origins in the cat	The far-field acoustic response comes from the cat.
2	a re evaluation of the effects of lesions of the pontine tegmentum and locus coeruleus on phenomena of paradoxical sleep in the cat	A reassessment of the effects of pontic tegmentum and locus coeruleus lesions on paradox sleep phenomena in cats.
2	effect of phenoxybenzamine on experimental cerebral arterial spasm in cats	Effect of phenoxybenzamine on experimental cat cerebral arterial spasms.
2	quantitative changes in proteins in the cat parietal zone large pyramids in various sleep stages and during wakefulness	Quantitative changes in proteins in the wall zone of the cat from large pyramids at various stages of sleep and during awakening.
2	grouping of neurons according to their rna content during different functional states of the cerebral cortex	Clustering of neurons according to rna content during different functional states of the cerebral cortex.
2	glycogen content in the brain stem neurons during hyperthermia in cats	The glycogen content of neurons in the brainstem during apos; hyperthermia in cats.
2	mesencephalic porjections of the rectus lateralis muscle afferents in the cat	Mesencephalic porjections of the afferent rectus lateralis muscle of the cat.
2	local specialization at ileocecal junction of the cat and opossum	Local specialization at the ileo interface-cat-and-apos caecal; opossum.
2	density of distribution of nerve cells in the nuclei of the cat s trigeminal complex	Nerve cell distribution densities in the nuclei of the cat trigeminal complex.
2	neuronal organization of the large cell segment of the cat s red nucleus	This is the neural organization of the large cell segment of the red nucleus of the cat.
2	method of live microscopy of the neurons of the cat brain	Living microscopy method of neurons in the cat brain.
2	ultrastructural characteristics of axon terminals of the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus in the cat	Ultrastructural features of axonal terminals of the posterior lateral nucleus of the cat.
2	epidemiological pattern of chagas disease in an endemic area of costa rica	Epidemiological profile of the disease in an endemic region of Costa rica.
2	cell structure and function in the visual cortex of the cat	Cell structure and function within the visual cortex of the cat.
2	effects of anesthetics on ponto geniculo occipital waves from the oculomotor nucleus of the cat	Anesthetic effects on the ponto geniculo occipital waves of the oculomotor nucleus of cats.
2	projection of the vestibular nerve to the si arm field in the cerebral cortex of the cat	A projection of the vestibular nerve into the arm field so into the cat's cerebral cortex.
2	a fluorescence and electron microscopic study of the adrenergic innervation in the vestibular ganglion and sensory areas	An electron microscopic and fluorescence study of adrenergic innervation in the vestibular ganglion and sensory regions.
2	effects on the ventral spinocerebellar tract neurones from deiters nucleus and the medial longitudinal fascicle in the cat	Effects on neurons in the ventral diter nucleus spinocerebellar tract and the cat median longitudinal fascicle.
2	detection of natural complex sounds by cells in the primary auditory cortex of the cat	Detection of complex natural sounds by the cells of the cat's primary auditory cortex.
2	visual suppression of vestibular nystagmus after cerebellar lesions	Visual suppression of vestibular nystagmus following cerebellar lesions.
2	study of the protection on afforded by nicergoline against the effects of cerebral ischemia in the cat	Investigation of the protection of nicergoline against the effects of brain ischemia in cats.
2	specific membrane properties of cat motoneurones	Specific membrane properties of cat motoneurons.
2	method for the morphological identification of individual brain neurons intravitally and after fixation	Dapos method; intravital and post-fixation morphological identification of individual cerebral neurons.
2	chemosensitive neurons on the ventral medullary surface	Chemo-sensitive neurons on the ventral medullary surface.
2	leukocytic pyrogen and sodium acetylsalicylate on hypothalamic neurons in the cat	Leukocyte Pyrogen and sodium acetylsalicylate on cat hypothalamic neurons.
2	an electron microscope study of synaptic organization in the lateral reticular nucleus of the medulla oblongata in the cat	An electron microscopic study of the cat synaptic organization in the lateral reticular nucleus of medulla oblongata.
2	diversity of mossy fibres in the cerebellar cortex in relation to different afferent systems an experimental electron microscopic study in the cat	The diversity of the mossy fibers in the cerebellar cortex in relation to different afferent systems was studied experimentally by electron microscopy in the cat.
2	diencephalic projections from the midbrain reticular formation	Diencephalic projections of reticular formation of midbrain.
2	demonstration of a somatotopically organized projection onto the paramedian lobule and the anterior lobe from the lateral reticular nucleus an experimental study with the horseradish peroxidase method	Demonstration of apos; somatotopic projection of the paramedian lobule and anterior lobe from the lateral reticular nucleus using horseradish peroxidase method.
2	transganglionic degeneration in trigeminal primary sensory neurons	Transganglionic degeneration in primary sensory trigeminal neurons.
2	the pontocerebellar projection onto the paramedian lobule in the cat an experimental study with the use of horseradish peroxidase as a tracer	An experimental study using horseradish peroxidase as a tracer was carried out on the projection of the pontocephalus onto the paramedian lobule in the cat.
2	the pontine projection from the inferior colliculus in the cat an experimental anatomical study	Pondine projection of the inferior colliculus in cats has been the subject of an experimental anatomical study.
2	macular input to neurons of the spinoreticulocerebellar pathway	This is a macular entry into the neurons of the spinoreticulocerebella pathway.
2	studies on the cerebellar projections from the main and external cuneate nuclei in the cat by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	L' study of cerebellar projections of main and outer cuneate nuclei in cats by retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	a golgi and electron microscopical study of nerve cells in layer i of the cat auditory cortex	Golgi- and electron-microscopic study of i-layer nerve cells of the cat auditory cortex.
2	sustained and transient discharges of retinal ganglion cells during spontaneous eye movements of cat	Sustained, transient discharge of retinal ganglion cells during spontaneous cat eye movements.
2	visual discrimination of flux equated figures by cats with brain lesions	Visual discrimination of flow was the equivalent of figures by cats with brain damage.
2	the auditory cortical projections onto the medial geniculate body in the cat an experimental anatomical study with silver and autoradiographic methods	Hearing cortical projections on the cat median geniculate body an experimental anatomical study with silver and autoradiographic methods.
2	analysis of various factors involved in eeg synchronization during milk drinking in the cat	Analysis of various factors involved in eeg synchronization during milk consumption in cats.
2	normal critical bands in the cat	Regular critical tapes in the cat.
2	endogenous primate and feline type c viruses	Primate and feline c-endogenous virus type.
2	integrated somatomotor cardiovascular and gastrointestinal adjustments induced from the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Integrated somatomotor, cardiovascular, and gastro adjustments-intestinal induced by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus.
2	reflexogenic contraction of the ileo cecal sphincter in the cat following small or large intestinal distension	In the case of cats, there is a reflexogenic contraction of the ileus sphincter, i.e., a distension of the small or large intestine.
2	effects of chlorpromazine and diazepam on neuronal activities of the lateral vestibular nucleus in cats	Effects of chlorpromazine and diazepam treatment on the neuronal activities of the lateral vestibular nucleus in cats.
2	the effect of background illumination on the responses of the neurons of the cat s superior colliculus to moving stimuli	L' effect of l' background illumination on the responses of cat superior colliculus neurons to moving stimuli.
2	dipropylacetic acid depakine in experimental epilepsy in the alert cat	Apos depakin; dipropylacetic acid in apos; experimental epilepsy in alert cat.
2	motor nerve terminal response to edrophonium in delayed dfp neuropathy	Terminal response of the motor nerve to edrophonium in delayed DPF neuropathy.
2	influence of vestibular and afferent impulses on the spontaneous activity of interneurons in the spinal cord of cats	Influence of vestibular and afferent impulses on the epos; spontaneous interneuronal activity in the spinal cord of cats.
2	variability of neuronal activity of the parastriate cortex before and after callosotomy	Variability of the apos; neuronal activity of the cerebral cortex parastrized before and after callosotomy.
2	motoneuron dendrites role in synaptic integration	Role of dendrite motoneurons in apos; synaptic integration.
2	impariment by 6 hydroxydopamine of locus coeruleus induced monosynaptic potential in the spinal trigeminal nucleus	L' impairment by 6 hydroxydopamine of locus coeruleus induced a monosynaptic potential in the trigeminal nucleus spinal.
2	electromyography in the localization of spinal cord and nerve root neoplasia in dogs and cats	Electromyography of neoplastic locations of spinal cord and nerve roots in dogs and cats.
2	retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase in peripheral autonomic nerves	Axonal retrograde horseradish peroxidase transport in peripheral autonomic nerves.
2	salmonellosis in a human infant a cat and two parakeets in the same household	Salmonella in a human infant, cat and two parakeets in the same household.
2	binocular interaction in the cat s superior colliculus	Binocular interaction in the superior colliculus of the cat.
2	the spinal course and distribution of fore and hind limb muscle afferent projections to the superior colliculus of the cat	L' spinal column evolution and the distribution of afferent projections from the forelimb and hindlimb muscle to the superior colliculus of the cat.
2	venous drainage of the heart with special references to the excito conduction system	Venous drying of the heart tissue with special reference to the d&apos conduction system; excito.
2	adrenergic innervation of the extramedullary arteries of the spinal cord of cats	Adrenergic innervation of extramedullary arteries of the cat spinal cord.
2	neuronal organization of the inspiratory center baumgarten s nucleus	Neural organization of the d&apos center; baumgarten inspiration s nucleus.
2	e coli endotoxin shock in the cat treatment with indomethacin	Implications of E. coli endotoxin shock in the cat treatment with indomethacin.
2	horner s syndrome in the dog and cat as an aid to diagnosis	Horn syndrome in dogs and cats to make it easier to diagnose.
2	delayed alternation learning under electrical blocking stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	L' delayed alternative learning under stimulation by electrical blockade of the caudate nucleus in the cat.
2	the effects of acetylcholine and dopamine on the caudate nucleus depleted of biogenic amines	The effects of acetylcholine and dopamine on the caudate nucleus do not contain biogenic amines.
2	a quantitative analysis of the cat retinal ganglion cell topography	Quantitative analysis of topography of cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	the projections of different morphological types of ganglion cells in the cat retina	The projection of different morphological types of ganglion cells in the cat's own retina.
2	the projections of cells in different layers of the cat s visual cortex	Cell projections in the different layers of the cat's visual cortex.
2	an electron microscope study of the red nucleus in the cat with special reference to the quantitative analysis of the axosomatic synapses	Electron microscopy of the red nucleus in the cat with special attention to apos; quantitative analysis of axosomatic synapses.
2	disorder and recovery of somatic sensitivity in cats with destruction of the afferent pathways of the spinal cord	Disturbance and restoration of somatic sensitivity in cats with destruction of spinal cord afferents.
2	an analysis of the interaction of the parietal and visual regions of the cortex with the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus	L&apos analysis; interaction of the wall and visual regions of the cortex with the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus.
2	the effect of stimulation of the deep layers of somatosensory zones ci and cii on the activity of motor zone mi of the cat cortex	L' effect of stimulation of the deep layers of the somatosensory zones here and here on the apos; activity of the motor zone mi of the cortex of the cat.
2	substance p and spinal neurones	P substance and spinal neurons.
2	an immunoprecipitin study of the incidence of influenza a antibodies in animal sera in the ottawa area	Immunoprecipitin study of rabies; incidence of influenza antibodies in animal serum in the Ottawa region.
2	the effect of neurotropic agents on evoked potentials of the association and projection regions of the cat neocortex	The effect of neurotropic agents on the evoked potentials of the regions of the apo; association and projection of the cat neocortex.
2	an analysis of interneuronal connections in the auditory cortex of awake cats	We're analyzing internaluronal connections in the auditory cortex of awake cats.
2	determinants of experimental neurosis in cats	Determinants of experimental neurosis in cats.
2	visual stimulation effects on vestibular habituation	Visual stimulation effects on the apos; vestibular habituation.
2	metabolic manifestations of the compensatory process in the brains of cats following spinal cord injuries	Metabolic manifestations of the compensatory process in the brain of cats resulting from spinal cord injury.
2	cortical diffusion characteristics of seizure induced in the horm of ammoni ii chemical stimulation	Cortical diffusion characteristics of convulsions induced by d&apos hormones; ammonia ii chemical stimulation.
2	effect of quinidine together with antibiotics on contractility of cat papillary muscle	Adverse effects of quinidine and antibiotics on cat papillary muscle contractility.
2	electron microscopy of the arcuate nucleus of normal and 5 hydroxydopamine treated cats	Electron microscopy of the arcuate nucleus of normal cats and of 5 cats treated with etapos; hydroxydopamine.
2	d amphetamine induced release of newly synthesized and stored dopamine from the caudate nucleus in vivo	D-amphetamine induces the release of newly synthesized dopamine stored from the caudate nucleus in vivo.
2	a calcium ionophore stimulating the secretion of catecholamines from the cat adrenal	A calcium ionophore stimulates the secretion of catecholamine adrenals.
2	stimulus generalization between differentiated visual auditory and central stimuli	The generalization of stimuli between differentiated visual auditory stimuli and central visual stimuli.
2	visual receptive field properties of cells in area 18 of cat s cerebral cortex before and after acute lesions in area 17	Receptive visual field cell properties in area 18 of the cat cerebral cortex before and after acute lesions in area 17.
2	discharge patterns of cat pontine brain stem neurons during desynchronized sleep	The firing patterns of neurons in the brain stem of cat bridges during unsynchronized sleep.
2	unit activity in posterior association cortex of cat	Unital activity in d&apos cortex; cat posterior association.
2	afferent efferent linkages in motor cortex for single forelimb muscles	Motor cortical afferent efferent links for single forelimb muscles.
2	on the mechanism of the relaxing adrenaline effect on cat jejunum	On the mechanism of l' relaxing effect of l' adrenaline on the cat jejunum.
2	extrinsic nervous control of the ileo cecal sphincter in the cat	Extrinsic nervous control of cat ileo sphincter-caecal.
2	motor control of nuclear bag and nuclear chain intrafusal fibres in isolated living muscle spindles from the cat	Motor control of the nuclear bag and the nuclear-chain intrafusal fibers in the cat's living, isolated spindles.
2	discharge frequency of tendon organs evoked by the contraction of motor units in the cat	The frequency of discharge of the organs of the tendon evoked by the contraction of the motor units in the cat.
2	uptake and transport of exogenous peroxidase in the masticatory muscles of the cat localization of motor neurons	Capture and transport of exogenous peroxidase in masticatory muscles of motor neuron localization in cats.
2	acquired and inherent trace processes in the neuronally isolated cortex	Processes acquired and processes intrinsic to the neuronally isolated cortical trace state.
2	from attentiveness to sleep a topographical analysis of localized synchronized activities on the cortex of normal cat and monkey	L'apos; attention to sleep, a topographical analysis of the synchronized activities localized on the cortex of cats and normal monkeys.
2	the biological significance of pgo spikes in the sleeping cat	The biological significance of pgo peaks in a sleeping cat.
2	temperature and behavioural responses induced in the unanaesthetized cat by the central administration of rx72601 a new anticholinesterase	Temperature and behavioral responses induced in cats not being anesthetized by e.g. apos; central administration of rx72601 a novel anticholinesterase.
2	feline oncornavirus associated cell membrane antigen ii antibody titers in healthy cats from household and laboratory colony environments	Oncornavirus feline associated with apo; cell membrane antigen (cellular membrane antigen) ii titre; antibodies in healthy cats from apo; domestic and laboratory colony environments.
2	depressive effects of morphine upon lamina v cells activities in the dorsal horn of the spinal cat	Depressive effects of morphine on epos; lamina v cell activity in dorsal horn of spinal cat.
2	a late component of flash evoked potentials in the cat s optic chiasma and superior colliculus its appearance due to background illumination	A late component of flash evoked potentials in the optical chiasma and upper colliculus of the cat is background illumination.
2	intracellular postsynaptic potentials of cat lateral geniculate cells and the effects of degeneration of the optic terminals	Potential cat lateral geniculate cell intracellular synaptic potentials post-and effects of degeneration of optical terminals.
2	barbiturate spindle activity in the thalamic lateral ventro posterior nucleus and the second somato sensory area of the cortex	L' barbituric spindle activity in the posterior lateral thalamic ventro nucleus and second somato sensory region of the cortex.
2	sleep cycle control and cholinergic mechanisms differential effects of carbachol injections at pontine brain stem sites	Cholinergic mechanisms and sleep cycle control Differential effects of carbachol injections at brain stem sites as a pontine.
2	effects of elevated magnesium on discharge of myenteric neurons of cat small bowel	An elevation of magnesium on the discharge of myenteric neurons in the cat's small intestine.
2	preliminary data on the origin of splanchnic nerve afferent fibers with respiratory influence	Preliminary data on the origin of afferent fibres of the respiratory-influenced splanchnic nerve.
2	cytoimmunological and histochemical study of cat adenohypophyseal cells made fluorescent by the falck and hillarp technic	L' cytoimmunological and histochemical study of cat adenohypophysial cells is fluorescent by hawk and mountain lion.
2	electrospinogram and spinal and cortical evoked potentials in experimental spinal cord trauma	Spinal and cortical evoked electrospinogram and potentials in experimental spinal cord trauma.
2	the depressant effect of halothane and sodium thiopental on the spontaneous and evoked activity of dorsal horn cells lamina specificity time course and dose dependence	L' depressant effect of sodium halothane and thiopental on the apos; spontaneous and evoked activity of blade specificity of dorsal horn cells and dose dependence.
2	oculomotor outflow and its relation to electrical activity of suprasylvian gyrus and pulvinar during paradoxical sleep in the cat	L' oculomotor flow and its relation to the spinal cord; electrical activity of the suprasylvian gyrus and pulvinar during cat's REM sleep.
2	electroencephalographic signs of ethanol tolerance and physical dependence in the cat	Electroencephalographic signs of apo tolerance; ethanol and physical dependence in the cat.
2	chloralose induced alteration of visually evoked response from specific and non specific regions of cat neocortex	Chloralosis induced impaired visually evoked response to specific and nonspecific regions of cat neocortex.
2	effects of taurine on kindled amygdaloid seizures in rats cats and photosensitive baboons	Effects of taurine on burning amygdala seizures in rat photosensitive baboons and cats.
2	dantrolene effects on neuromuscular function in cat soleus muscle	Effects of dantrolene on the neuromuscular function of cat soleus muscle.
2	the positive inotropic effect of glucagon in the chronically failed right ventricle as demonstrated in the isolated cat heart	The positive inotropic effect of glucagon in the right ventricle chronically failing was demonstrated in the isolated cat heart.
2	microcirculation of traumatized spinal cord a correlation of microangiography and blood flow patterns in transitory and permanent paraplegia	Microcirculation of traumatized spinal cord correlation of microangiography and blood flow patterns in the temporary and permanent paraplegia.
2	dorsal column nuclei afferents in the lateral funiculus of the cat distribution pattern and absence of sprouting after chronic deafferentation	The dorsal column nuclei have afferents in the lateral funicule of the cat and l&apos distribution pattern; after chronic deafferentiation there are no rejections.
2	the pharmacology of the inhibition of dorsal horn neurones by impulses in myelinated cutaneous afferents in the cat	The inhibition of dorsal horn neurones by impulses in myelinated cutaneous afferents in the cat.
2	electrophysiological studies of the projections from the parietal association area to the cerebellar cortex	Electrophysiological studies of d&apos zone projections; parietal association with cerebellar cortex.
2	suppression of cerebellar evoked potentials by a peripheral action of diphenylhydantoin	Removal of cerebellar potentials evoked by the peripheral action of diphenylhydantoin.
2	development of visually evoked responses and visually guided behavior in kittens effects of superior colliculus and lateral geniculate lesions	The development of visually evoked responses and visually guided behaviors in kittens, the effects of superior colliculus and lateral geniculate lesions.
2	anatomical and physiological evidence for a cerebellar nucleo cortical projection in the cat	Anatomical and physiological evidence of a cortical projection of the nucleus-cerebellar in the cat.
2	electron microscopic investigation of the vestibular projection to the cat trochlear nuclei	Electron microscopic examination of the cat's vestibular projection to the trochlear nuclei.
2	the effects of stimulating the cerebellar nodulus in the cat on the responses of vestibular neurons	Effects of cerebellar nodule stimulation in the cat on vestibular neuronal responses.
2	neurochemical changes in the cat s spinal cord due to orthodromic tetanic stimuli i phospholipids	Neurochemical changes in cat spinal cord due to orthodromic i phospholipid tetanus stimuli.
2	localization of laryngeal motor neurons in the kitten	Location of larynx motor neurons in kittens.
2	epileptogenic properties of folic acid and n5 methyltetrahydrofolate in cat	Epileptogenic properties of folic acid and n5 methyltetrahydrofolate in the cat.
2	retinal degeneration associated with taurine deficiency in the cat	Acute retinal degeneration associated with a taurine deficiency in the cat.
2	horizontal cells in cat retina with independent dendritic systems	Horizontal cells with independent dendritic systems in the cat retina.
2	feedback training of 36 44 hz eeg activity in the visual cortex and hippocampus of cats evidence for sensory and motor involvement	L' feedback training; 36 to 44 hours of activity in the visual cortex and l' cat seahorse demonstrates motor and sensory involvement.
2	receptive field mechanisms of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells in the cat	Receptive-field mechanisms of transient and sustained retinal ganglion cells in the cat.
2	effects of visual cortex lesions following recovery from monocular deprivation in the cat	Effects of visual cortical lesions following recovery of apos; single-cell deprivation in the cat.
2	a direct input from amygdaloid complex to caudate nucleus of the rat	Direct input from the amygdaloid complex to the rat caudate nucleus.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius problem of their categorisation on the basis of mechanical properties	The cat motor units are the median gastrocnemius problem of their categorization based on mechanical properties.
2	patterns of projection and braching of reticulospinal neurons	Schematics of reticulospinal neuron projection and turning.
2	neurons in the cochlear nucleus investigated with tone and noise stimuli	Neurons of the cochlear nucleus were examined with the aid of tonic and sound stimuli.
2	autoradiographic studies of the projections of the midbrain reticular formation descending projections of nucleus cuneiformis	Autoradiographic studies of projections of reticular formation of the midbrain, descending projections of the cuneiformis nucleus.
2	translaminar growth of axons in the kitten dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus following removal of one eye	Translaminar growth of axons in the cat's dorsal lateral genicular nucleus, after apos; one eye.
2	synaptic relationships of golgi type ii cells in the medial geniculate body of the cat	Synaptic relationships of type ii Golgi cells in the middle body of the cat.
2	caliber spectra of fibers in the fasciculus gracilis of the cat cervical spinal cord a quantitative electron microscopic study	Spectre of fiber size in cat cervical spinal cord fasciculus gracilis, quantitative study by electron microscopy.
2	single unit activity in the posteroventral cochlear nucleus of the cat	Unitary activity in the cochlear nucleus posteroventral of the cat.
2	single unit activity in the dorsal cochlear nucleus of the cat	Unitary activity in the cochlear dorsal kernel of the cat.
2	spindle wave synchrony in the somatosensory cortex of the cat	Synchronization of the spindle waves in the cat's somatosensory cortex.
2	golgi studies in the substantia gelatinosa neurons in the spinal trigeminal nucleus	Golgi studies in substantia gelatinosa neurons of the spinal trigeminal nucleus.
2	brbiturate spindle activity in the association cortex of the cat and its relation to spindle activity in the somatosensory system	L' spindle activity in the spindle cortex; association of the cat and its relationship with the spindle; spindle activity in the somatosensory system.
2	the dorsal column nuclear projections to the nucleus ventralis posterior lateralis thalami and the inferior olive in the cat an autoradiographic study	The cat nuclear projections from the dorsal column to the ventralis posterior lateralis thalami nucleus and the inferior olive made the following autoradiographic study.
2	character of neuronal functional associations according to the content of rna and sh groups in the cat cerebral cortex	Characterization of functional neural associations according to rna content and sh groups in the cat cerebral cortex.
2	comparison of the dimensions of synaptic vesicles in axon profiles forming synapses on the bodies and dendrites of cat motor cortex neurons	Comparison of the dimensions of synaptic vesicles in synapsed axonal profiles on the bodies and dendrites of neurons of the cat motor cortex.
2	demonstration of direct projections between the ponto mesencephalic tegmentum and the visual cortex of the cat using a peroxidase technique	Demonstration of direct projections between the ponto tegmentum-mesencephalic and the cat's visual cortex at apos; a peroxidase technique.
2	histochemical fiber typing and staining intensity in cat and rat muscles	Type of histochemical fibers and intensity of cat and rat muscle staining.
2	microionophoretic study of the cholinoceptor neurons of the visual cortex of cats	Microionophoretic study of the visual cortical cholinoceptor neurons of cats.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord iii analysis of amino acids after long term potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of the tetanic potentiation post-tetanic of monosynaptic reflexes in the spinal cord of cats iii amino acid analysis after long-term potentiation.
2	influence of phenamin on the reaction of cortical neurons evoked by stimulation of mesodiencephalic structures	L' influence of phenamine on the response of cortical neurons evoked by mesodyseal structural stimulation.
2	an electron microscopic study of the intermediolateral nucleus of the cat spinal cord	An electron microscopic study of the intermedolateral nucleus of the cat spinal cord.
2	convergence and interaction of visceral somatic and visual excitations in individual neurons of the cat lateral geniculate bodies	Convergence and interaction of visual and somatic visceral excitations in individual neurons of cat lateral geniculate bodies.
2	interhemispheric relations of the cat visual cortex following unilateral polarization of the secondary visual area	Hemispherical relations of the cat visual cortex as a result of unilateral polarization of the visual secondary zone.
2	the effects of noise upon the electrical activity of the cat cortex	The effects of noise on l' electrical activity of the cortex of the cat.
2	spinal evoked response in the cat	Spinal cues in the cat.
2	morphologic and cytophotometric indices of the state of the neurons of the spinal cord and spinal cord ganglia following exposure to gravitational stress	Morphological and cytophotometric indices of the apos; condition of spinal cord neurons and spinal cord ganglia after exposure to gravitational stress.
2	dorsal raphe stimulation produces inhibitory effect on trigeminal nucleus neurons	Stimulation of dorsal raphe has an inhibitory effect on trigeminal nucleus neurons.
2	fine structure of growth cones in medullary raphe nuclei in the postnatal cat	The fine structure of growth cones in the medullary raphe nuclei of the postnatal cat.
2	visual receptive fields in the lateral suprasylvian area clare bishop area of the cat	The receptive visual fields in the lateral suprasylvania region are cat bishop zone.
2	the fluorescent catecholamine reaction in neurons of the intervertebral sensory ganglion	The reaction of fluorescent catecholamines in neurons of the intervertebral sensory ganglion.
2	projections of the somatosensory areas of the cerebral cortex into the thalamic nuclei	Projections of the somatosensory zones of the cerebral cortex in thalamic nuclei.
2	neuronal activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus of the cat v topographical distribution of inhibitory effects mediated by the spino olivocerebellar pathway	Neuronal activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus of the cat's topographic v distribution of spino olivocerebellar-mediated inhibitory effects.
2	feline infectious peritonitis with spinal cord involvement in two cats	Infectious feline peritonitis with spinal cord disease in two cats.
2	leiomyosarcoma of the urinary bladder in a cat	Urinary bladder leiomyosarcoma in a cat.
2	sensorimotor cortical representation in the rat and the role of the cortex in the production of sensory myoclonic jerks	Cortical sensorimotor representation in the rat and role of the cortex in the production of sensory myoclonic shock.
2	physiological identification of a morphological class of cat retinal ganglion cells	Physiological identification of a morphological class of cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	ganglionic cytoarchitecture of the esophagus in the cat and the rhesus monkey	Ganglionic cytoarchitecture of the esophagus in rhesus cats and monkeys.
2	innate and environmental factors in the development of the kitten s visual cortex	Natural and environmental factors in the development of kitten's visual cortex.
2	depression in the excitability of relay cells of lateral geniculate nucleus following saccadic eye movements in the cat	Decreased apo; excitability of lateral geniculate nucleus relay cells following cat's jerky eye movements.
2	single unit responses to natural objects in area 19 of cats with different early visual experiences	Unit reactions to natural objects in zone 19 of cats with different early visual experiences.
2	histochemical and neurophysiological studies of autotransplanted cat muscle	Histochemical and neurophysiological studies of cat muscle autotransplantation.
2	effect of analgestics and narcotics on the potentials of the posterior roots evoked by stimulation of the sensorimotor cortex	The effect of analgesics and narcotics on the posterior root potentials evoked by sensorimotor cortical stimulation.
2	distribution and properties of commissural and other neurons in cat sensorimotor cortex	Distribution and properties of commissural and other neurons in the sensorimotor cortex of cats.
2	electrophysiologic effects of stimulating the vestibular nuclei on the sensomotor cortex of cats	Electrophysiological effects of stimulation of vestibular nuclei on the cat sensory cortex.
2	two levels of restriction by mouse or cat cells of murine sarcoma virus coated by endogenous xenotropic oncornavirus	Two levels of mouse or cat cell restriction of murine sarcoma virus coated with xenotropic endogenous oncornavirus.
2	changes of epidural pressures after experimental occlusion of one middle cerebral artery in cats	Changes in epidural pressures after birth; experimental cerebral artery occlusion in cats.
2	electron microscopic observations on preterminal fibers in the oculomotor nucleus of the cat with special reference to the relation between axon diameter and myelin thickness in mammalian gray matter	Electron microscopic observations on preterminal fibers in the oculomotor nucleus of the cat, with particular attention to the relationship between the diameter of l' axone and l' thickness of myelin in mammalian grey matter.
2	central functional changes after facial spinal accessory anastomosis in man and facial hypoglossal anastomosis in the cat	Central functional changes following facial medullary accessory anastomosis in cats; man and facial hypoglossal anastomosis.
2	hydrocephalus iii reconstitution of the cerebral cortical mantle following ventricular shunting	Hydrocephalus iii reconstruction of cerebral cortical mantle following ventricular shunting.
2	the sinus nerve and baroreceptor input to the medulla of the cat	The sinus nerve and baroreceptor enter the cat's spinal cord.
2	autonomic nerve stimulation kallikrein content anc acinar cell granules of the cat s submandibular gland	Autonomous nerve stimulation anchored kallikrein cellular acinar granules of the gland under-mandibular cat s.
2	labyrinthine and extralabryinethine influences on the background activity of the spinal interneurons of cats during swaying	Both labyrinthine and l' extralabryinethine influence the apos; spinal interneuron activity of cats during swirling.
2	reflex mechanisms of interlimb interrelationships displayed in lumbar flexor centers of the cat spinal cord	Reflex mechanisms of the limb interrelationships in the lumbar flexor centers of the cat spinal cord.
2	afferent impulse of fibers of the vagus nerve of cats using the method of coincidence of outgoing action potentials	Afferent impulse of vagus nerve fibers from cats, using the method of coincidence of d&apos potentials; outward action.
2	medullary relay neurons in the carotid body chemoreceptor pathway of cats	Medullary relay neurons in the chemoreceptor pathway of the carotid body of cats.
2	brain microvascular hemodynamic responses to induced seizures	Microvascular hemodynamic reactions to seizures; induced epilepsy.
2	spasmogenic qualities of prostaglandin f2alpha in the cat	Spasmogenic characteristics of prostaglandin f2alpha in cats.
2	effects of opiate agonists and antagonists on central neurons of the cat	Effects of opiate agonists and antagonists on cat central neurons.
2	actions of methoxamine and tryptamine and their interactions with cyproheptadine and phenoxybenzamine on cat spinal cord segmental reflexes	The actions of methoxamine and tryptamine and their interactions with cyproheptadine and phenoxybenzamine on the segmental reflexes of the cat spinal cord.
2	response of generalized penicillin epilepsy in the cat to ethosuximide and diphenylhydantoin	"""Ethosuximide and diphenylhydantoin response of generalized penicillin epilepsy in the cat"", J. Am."
2	immunofluorescence study of lrf producing neurons in the cat and the dog	Study of apos; immunofluorescence of producing neurons; RFID in cats and dogs.
2	feline infectious peritonitis proteins of plasma and ascitic fluid	Feline infectious peritonitis proteins from plasma and ascitic fluid.
2	bulbo spinal neurons activated by baroreceptor afferents and their possible role in inhibition of preganglionic sympathetic neurons	Spinal bulbo neurons activated by baroreceptor afferents and their possible role in the inhibition of preganglionic sympathetic neurons.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius twitch potentiation and twitch tetanus ratio	Motor units of twitch potentiation of the cat median gastrocnemius and twitch tetanus ratio of the cat.
2	remyelination after transient compression of the spinal cord	Remyelination following transient compression of the spinal cord.
2	clare bishop area in the cat location and retinotopical projection	Clare crazy zone in the map; cat location and retinotopic projection.
2	visual responses of neurons in the clare bishop area of the cat	Visual reactions of neurons in key area of the apos; bishop of the cat.
2	response of cat cerebellar vermis induced by sound i influence of drugs on responses of single units	The cat cerebellar worm response is induced by the effects of drugs on individual unit responses.
2	response of cat cerebellar vermis induced by sound ii the role of the mossy and climbing fibers in acoustic transmission to the cerebellar cortex and influence of stimuli parameters	The response of the cerebellar verme of the cat to sound ii the role of the mossy and climbing fibers in the acoustic transmission to the cerebellar cortex and l&apos influences the parameters of the stimuli.
2	effect of clonidine on the excitability of vasomotor loci in the cat	Effect of clonidine on elicitation of vasomotor loci in cats.
2	serotonin in the lateral geniculate	Serotonin in the lateral geniculate.
2	mechanical transduction in the golgi tendon organ a hypothesis	Mechanical transduction in the apos; organ of the golgi tendon a hypothesis.
2	evidence and meaning of monophasic potentials in the electromyogram of extraocular muscles of rabbits and cats author s transl	Evidence and significance of monophasic potentials in the electromyogram of rabbit and cat extraocular muscle.
2	hypersomnia by isthmic lesion in cat ii neurophysiological and pharmacological study	Hypersomnia by isthmic injury in the cat ii neurophysiological and pharmacological study.
2	projection of tooth pulp afferents to the cat trigeminal nucleus caudalis	Dental pulp splashes on the caudalis cat trigeminal nucleus.
2	unit responses to moving stimuli in area 18 of the cat	Unique response to stimuli in area 18 of the cat.
2	bilateral effects of vestibular nerve stimulation on activity in the lumbar spinal cord	Bilateral effects of vestibular nerve stimulation on epos; lumbar spinal cord activity.
2	a study of inhibitory antagonism in cat visual cortex	Study of l' inhibitory antagonism in the cat visual cortex.
2	observation of injected fluorescein diffusion after laser treatment of cat fundi an experimental study with angiography and microscopy	L' observation of diffusion of injected fluorescein after laser treatment of the cat fungus, experimental study with angiography and microscopy.
2	tracing axons and axon collaterals of spinal neurons using intracellular injection of horseradish peroxidase	Plot spinal neuronal axons and axonal collaterals at the apos; aid; an intracellular injection of horseradish peroxidase.
2	effect of coronal plane tilt on cat caloric nystagmus responses	Effect of the coronal plane inclination on the caloric nystagmus responses of the cat.
2	carotid arterial supply of the feline brain applications to the study of regional cerebral ischemia	Lapses; carotid arterial intake from feline cerebral applications to apos; study of apos; regional cerebral ischemia.
2	influence of anesthetics on metabolic functional and pathological responses to regional cerebral ischemia	Effects of anesthetic on metabolic, functional and pathological responses to regional cerebral ischemia.
2	cortical and subcortical projected foci in cats inhibitory action of taurine	Projected cortical and-cortical jars in cats inhibiting apo; action of taurine.
2	frequency following response to cochlear nuclei in cats to polycomponent sonic signals	Frequency following response to cochlear nuclei in cats to sound signals with multiple components.
2	the role of extracellular ca2 and cyclic nucleotides in the mechanism of enzyme secretion from the cat pancreas	The role of extracellular ca2 and cyclic nucleotides in the enzyme secretion mechanism of cat pancreas.
2	influences on colonic and small intestinal motility by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Influences of the fastigial nucleus of the cerebellum on the motility of the colon and the intestine.
2	influences on the defecation and micturition reflexes by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Influences of the cerebellar fastigial nucleus on reflexes of bowel movement and micturition.
2	release of gastrin on vagal stimulation in the cat	Acute gastrin release on vagal stimulation in cats.
2	effect of anticoagulants and inhibitors of platelet aggregation on thrombotic occlusion of endarterectomized cat carotid arteries	Effect of anticoagulants and inhibitors of the apos; platelet aggregation on the apos; thrombotic occlusion of carotid arteries of endarterectomized cats.
2	postsynaptic potentials in cat abducens motoneurons evoked by stimulation of cortical eye fields	The synaptic potentials of the cat remove motor neurons evoked by stimulation of cortical eye fields.
2	the effect of methoxyflurane on pulmonary vascular resistance and hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in the isolated perfused cat lung	L' effect of methoxyflurane on pulmonary vascular resistance and pulmonary hypoxic vasoconstriction in the isolated perfused cat lung.
2	epileptic activity and anatomical characteristics of different lesions in cat cortex ultrastructural study	Epileptic activity and anatomical characteristics of lesions in the ultrastructural study of the cat cortex.
2	firing mechanisms in the single vestibular neurons in the cat	Release mechanisms in the cat's simple vestibular neurons.
2	effects of cholinergic agonists and antagonists of nucleus vestibularis lateralis unit discharge to vestibular nerve stimulation in the cat	Effects of cholinergic agonists and unit discharge nucleus vestibularis lateralis antagonists on vestibular nerve stimulation in the cat.
2	medial forebrain bundle projections to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca	Projections of the bundle from the median forebrain to the nucleus of the broca diagonal band.
2	central vestibular compensation effect of the bilateral labyrinthectomy on neural activity in the medial vestibular nucleus	Centrally compensating vestibular effect of bilateral labyrinthectomy on the apos; neural activity in the mid vestibular nucleus.
2	specialized contacts of astrocytes with astrocytes and with other cell types in the spinal cord of the cat	Specialized contacts of astrocytes with astrocytes and dapos; other spinal cord cells of cats.
2	the topography of functional interhemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex	The topography of l' functional, inter-hemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex.
2	the neuronal organization of a focus of conditioned excitation in the cat sensory motor cortex	L' neuronal organization of apos; a locus of apos; conditioned excitation in the sensory motor cortex of the cat.
2	the activity of cat motor cortex neurons during performance of a conditoned response of placing the forepaw on a support	L' activity of cat motor cortical neurons during apos; execution of apos; a conditioned response consisting of placing the front leg on a support.
2	the effect of ablation of the caudate nucleus on the alimentary zone of the lateral hypothalamus	The effect of the apo; ablation of the caudate nucleus on the food zone of the apo; lateral hypothalamus.
2	post tetanic strengthening of evoked electrical responses of the sensomotor cortex	Tetanic reinforcement post-tetanic of evoked electrical responses of sensory cortex.
2	functional maturation of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis	Functional maturity of the visual cortex of the cat during prenatal ontogenesis.
2	effect of callosotomy on frequency characteristics of neuronal activity in the parastriate cortex	The effect of callosotomy on the frequency characteristics of the apos; neuronal activity in the parastriate cortex.
2	an analysis of the depressor responses to histamine in the cat and dog involvement of both h1 and h2 receptors	Analysis of the depressive responses to apos; histamine in apos; involvement of h1 and h2 receptors in cats and dogs.
2	the effects of lysergic acid diethylamide on the response to field stimulation of the rat vas deferens and the rat and cat anococcygeus muscles	The effects of l' lysergic acid diethylamide on the field-stimulated response of rat and cat anococcygeus vas deferens.
2	anatomical asymmetry of the cerebral hemispheres of the cat brain	Anatomical asymmetry of the cerebral hemispheres of the brain.
2	cerebellar contributions to the papez circuit	Cerebellar input to the papez circuit.
2	receptive field properties of single units in the opossum striate cortex	Receptive field properties d' individual units in the striated opossum cortex.
2	notes on the hypothesis of columnar organization in somatosensory cerebral cortex	Notes on apos; hypothesis of apos; column organization in cerebral cortex somatosensory.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius speed size relations and their significance for the recruitment order of mortor units	The motor units of the median gastrocnemius velocity ratios of cats and their importance to the apos; order of recruitment of mortar units.
2	movements of the forelimbs of the cat during stepping on a treadmill	Movement of the cat's forelimbs when it walks on a conveyor belt.
2	temperature effects on the inflation reflex during expiratory time in the cat	Effects of temperature on reflex d' inflation during expiratory time in cats.
2	the origin of impulses recorded from dentinal cavities in the tooth of the cat	L' origin of impulses recorded in teeth cavities of cat.
2	photogenic epilepsy with localization of the generator of excitation in the lateral geniculate body the phenomenon of a determining dispatch station	Epilepsy with location of generator d' excitation in the lateral geniculate body phenomenon d' a controlling control station.
2	electrographic manifestations of falling asleep in isolated cat cortex	Electrographic manifestations of sedation in the isolated cortex of the cat.
2	rhythmic firing of deiters neurons and synchronization by cerebellar inhibition in lidocaine treated cats	Rhythmic firing of deiter neurons and cerebellar inhibition timing in cats treated with lidocaine.
2	effects of electrical stimulation of the lateral aspect of the prefrontal cortex upon attack behavior in cats	Effects of electrical stimulation of the apo; lateral aspect of the prefrontal cortex on the prefrontal behavior; attack in cats.
2	effect of stimulation of prefrontal cortex and amygdala on diencephalic neurons	Effect of pre-frontal cortical stimulation and amygdala on brain neurons.
2	response properties and anatomical organization of pontine and medullary units responsive to vaginal stimulation in the cat	Properties of response and anatomical organization of the pontic and medullary units responsive to vaginal stimulation in the cat.
2	recruitment and firing rate modulation of motor unit tension in a small muscle of the cat s foot	Modification of the rate of recruitment and release of the tension of the motor unit in a small muscle of the cat's foot.
2	functional significance of projection from the cerebellar nuclei to the motor cortex in the cat	Functional importance of projecting from the nuclei of the cerebellum to the motor cortex in the cat.
2	studies of connections between locus coeruleus and cerebral cortex	To study the connections between locus coeruleus and cerebral cortex.
2	relationship between carotid chemoreceptor activity and ventilation in the cat	Relationship between carotid chemoreceptor activity and cat ventilation.
2	synaptic actions of tectofugal pathways on abducens motoneurons in the cat	Synaptic action of tectofugal pathways on cat-kidnapped motoneurons.
2	somatotopic localization in cat motor cortex	Locating somatotopic in the cat motor cortex.
2	descending influences of periaqueductal gray matter and somatosensory cerebral cortex on neurones in trigeminal brain stem nuclei	Descending influences of periaqueductal gray matter and somatosensory cerebral cortex on neurons in the nuclei of the trigeminal brainstem.
2	activation of left ventricular receptors with nonmedullated vagal afferent fibers during occlusion of a coronary artery in the cat	L' activation of left ventricular receptors with non-medullated vagal afferent fibers during apos occlusion; a cat coronary artery.
2	classification of neurons of the cat neocortex	Classification of cat neocortex neurons.
2	catecholaminergic axo axonic synapses in the nucleus of the tractus solitarius pars commissuralis of the cat possible relation to presynaptic regulation of baroreceptor reflexes	Catecholaminergic axon synapses in the nucleus solitarius pars commissuralis of the cat may be related to presynaptic regulation of baroreceptor reflexes.
2	the effects of the pathogenic influence of botulin toxin on different types of spinal motor neurons	The effects of the botulinum toxin on different types of spinal motor neurons.
2	evaluation of fecal technics for the diagnosis of cat liver fluke infection	Evaluation of fecal techniques for diagnosis of apos; cat liver infection.
2	modification of cortical orientation selectivity in the cat by restricted visual experience a reexamination	Modification of the selectivity of the cortical orientation in the cat by a limited cat visual experiment reexamination.
2	nature of the distribution of synapses in the neurons of the reticular formation and some afferent nuclei	Nature of synaptic distribution in neurons of reticular formation and some afferent nuclei.
2	the postnatal development of myelinated nerve fibres in the visual cortex of the cat a stereological and electron microscopical investigation	The postnatal development of myelinated nerve fibers in the visual cortex of the cat has been the subject of a study by stereological and electron microscopy.
2	different organization of cat lateral geniculate neurons in binocular inhibitory interaction	Different organization of lateral geniculate neurons of the cat in the apos; inhibitory interaction binocular.
2	interaction of psychotropic agents with central neurotransmitters as revealed by their effects on pgo waves in the cat	L' interaction of psychotropic agents with central neurotransmitters is revealed by effects on pgo waves in the cat.
2	effects of pentaformylgitoxin gitoformate on the cardiovascular system of anesthetized cats	Effects of pentaformylgitoxin gitoformate on the cardiovascular system of cats under anaesthesia.
2	the interaction of impulses evoked by stimuli of different modality in neurons of the parietal association cortex	L' impulse interaction evoked by stimuli of different modalities in neurons of the d&apos cortex; parietal association.
2	centrifugal and centripetal connections of the cat visual cortex	Centrifugal and centripetal cat visual cortex connections.
2	reproduction of delayed evoked potentials during amygdaloid complex stimulation	Reproduction of delayed evoked potentials during stimulation of the amygdaloid complex.
2	antidromal and synaptic potentials of motoneurons of the cat accessory nerve nucleus	Antiromal and synaptic potentials of cat accessory nerve nucleus motoneurons.
2	the ultrastructure of portions of the cat spinal cord gray matter connected to fibers of different descending tracts	L&apos is the ultrastructure of portions of cat spinal cord gray attached to fibers of various descending pathways.
2	amygdala and masseteric reflex ii mechanism of the diphasic modifications of the reflex elicited from the defence reaction area role of the spinal trigeminal nucleus pars oralis	Amygdala and masseter reflex ii mechanism of diphasic reflex modifications induced by the defense zone role of the spinal trigeminal nucleus pars oralis.
2	correlation analysis of units recorded in the cat dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus	Correlation analysis of units recorded in the cat's lateral genicular dorsal nucleus.
2	a quantitative study of the projection area of the central and the paracentral visual field in area 17 of the cat i the precision of the topography	A quantitative study of the central and paracentral visual field projection surface in zone 17 of the cat i the accuracy of the topography.
2	flexion extension sensitivity of elbow joint afferents in cat	Sensitivity to apos; extension of bending apos afferents; elbow articulation in cat.
2	effects of diphenylhydantoin on cardiac arrhythmias induced by carotid occlusion in the cat	Effects of diphenylhydantoin on cat carotid occlusion induced cardiac arrhythmias.
2	hyperaemic responses in two vascular beds of the anaesthetised cat	Hyperaemic reactions in two vascular beds of anesthetized cat.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat i pgo wave activity induced by ro 43284 and by p chlorophenylalanine pcpa as a basis for neuropharmacological studies	Drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the apos; curated activity of the apos; ro 43284 and p chlorophenylalanine pcpa induced wave i pgo as a basis for neuropharmacological studies.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat ii pgo wave activity and brain 5 hydroxytryptamine	Drugs and pgo waves in the lateral genicular body of curated cat ii l' pgo wave activity and brain 5 hydroxytryptamine.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat iii pgo wave activity and brain catecholamines	Drugs and pgo waves in the lateral genicular body of the curated cat iii brain pgo and catecholamine activity.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat iv the effects of acetylcholine gaba and benzodiazepines on pgo wave activity	The drugs and the pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curated cat iv the effects of the acetylcholine gaba and the benzodiazepines on the apos; activity of the apos; wave pgo.
2	anatomical organization of the phasic activity produced by reserpine at the level of the oculomotor system	Anatomical organization of the l' phasic activity produced by reserpine in the oculomotor system.
2	management of acute spine and spinal cord injuries old and new concepts	Treatment of old and new acute spinal cord and spinal cord injuries.
2	adaptation and dynamics in x cells and y cells of the cat retina	Adaptation and dynamics in the x and y cells of cat retina.
2	a note on the method of retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase as a tool in studies of afferent cerebellar connections particularly those from the inferior olive with comments on the orthograde transport in purkinje cell axons	A note on the retrograde transport method of horseradish peroxidase as a tool in the apos; study of afferent cerebellar connections, particularly those of the lower olive; olive, with comments on orthograde transport in purkinje cell axons.
2	projections from the lateral reticular nucleus to the cerebellar cortex and nuclei in the cat	Projections from lateral reticular nucleus to cerebellar cortex and nuclei in cat.
2	deep temporal lobe projections to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca	Deep projections from the temporal lobe to the nucleus of the broca diagonal stripe.
2	histamine receptors in the cat mesenteric circulation	Histamine receptors in the mesenteric circulation of the cat.
2	responses of cortical vestibular center produced by stimulation of vestibular nuclei and visual association area in the cat	Cortical vestibular center reactions produced by stimulation of the vestibular and vestibular nuclei; visual association in the cat.
2	discharge patterns of bulbo pontine respiratory unit populations in cat	Discharge pattern of dog populations; bulbo breathing units-pontine in cats.
2	afferent projections to the locus coeruleus nucleus in the cat study by the horseradish peroxidase technic	Projections afferent to locus coeruleus nucleus in l'apos; cat study by horseradish technical peroxidase.
2	morphology and distribution of muscle spindles in dorsal muscles of the cat neck	Muscle spindle morphology and distribution in the dorsal muscles of the cat neck.
2	receptive field characteristics of single neurons in lateral suprasylvian visual area of the cat	Characteristics of the receptor field of single neurons in cats; suprasylvian lateral visual area.
2	properties of projections from vestibular nuclei to medial reticular formation in the cat	Projection properties of the cat vestibular nuclei to the median reticular formation.
2	slowly adapting receptors in cat knee joint can they signal joint angle	The receptors that slowly adapt to the joint of the cat's knee can indicate an angle of articulation.
2	stereopsis in normal domestic cat siamese cat and cat raised with alternating monocular occlusion	Stereopsis in normal Siamese domestic cats and raised cats with alternating monocular occlusion.
2	the postnatal development of some twitch and fatigue properties of single motor units in the ankle muscles of the kitten	The postnatal development of some of the twitching and fatigue properties of individual motor units in kitten ankle muscles.
2	limb coordinations during locomotion in amygdalar rubral and funicular cats	The coordination of limbs during locomotion in rubral and funicular amygdalar cats.
2	visual discrimination learning in cats with different early visual experiences	L' learning to discriminate visually in cats with different early visual experiences.
2	a cytochemical study of binaurally converging connections in the nuclei of the cat superior olive	A cytochemical study of binural converging connections in nuclei of the olive upper cat.
2	quantitative histological studies of the variability of golgi impregnated cortical neurons in rats and cats	Quantitative histological studies of the variability of cortical neurons impregnated with golgi in rats and cats.
2	eye movements evoked by superior colliculus stimulation in the alert cat	Eye movements caused by superior stimulation of the colliculus in the alert cat.
2	effects of respiratory gases on cytochrome a in intact cerebral cortex is there a critical po2	Effects of respiratory gases on cytochrome a in the intact cerebral cortex are a critical po2.
2	specific angiotensin ii receptive neurons in the cat subfornical organ	Angiotensin ii specific receptor neurons in the etapos; subfornical organ of the cat.
2	cerebellar corticonuclear projection in the cat the vermis of the anterior and posterior lobes	Cerebellar corticonuclear projection in the cat, vermeil anterior and posterior lobes.
2	brainstem loci for activation of electrodermal response in the cat	Location of the brain stem for the apos; activation of the electrodermal response in the cat.
2	control of depth and frequency of breathing during baroreceptor stimulation in cats	Control of depth and frequency of respiration during cat baroreceptor stimulation.
2	demonstration of the tuberoinfundibular tract of the cat fluorescence histochemistry and electron microscopy	Demonstration of the tuberoinfundibular mucosal tract; cat fluorescence histochemistry and electron microscopy.
2	melatonin content of cat cerebrospinal fluid and blood following intravenous injection of melatonin as measured by xenopus laevis skin melanophore test	Cephalal spinal fluid and cat blood melatonin content after intravenous injection of melatonin, as measured by Xenopus laevis skin test.
2	on the role of catecholamines in the humoral modulation of the electrocortical activity in the cat	The role of catecholamines in the humoral modulation of electrocortical activity in cats.
2	specific patterns of neuron arrangement and of synaptic articulation in the medial geniculate body	Specific patterns of the apos; neural arrangement and apos; synaptic articulation in the median geniculate body.
2	types of interneurons and their participation in the neuronal network of the medial geniculate body	Types of interneurons and their participation in the neural network of the median geniculate body.
2	the length of parallel fibers in the cat cerebellar cortex an experimental light and electron microscopic study	The length of parallel fibres in the cat cerebellar cortex was studied experimentally by light and electron microscopy.
2	effect of sulfated and non sulfated gastrin and octapeptide cholecystokinin on cat gall bladder in vitro	Effect of gastrin and lacidosis; sulfated and nonsulfated cholecystokinin octapeptide on cat gallbladder in vitro.
2	autoradiographic studies of the projections of the midbrain reticular formation ascending projections of nucleus cuneiformis	Autoradiographic studies of reticular formation of the midbrain, ascending projections of the cuneiformis nucleus.
2	organization of retinocollicular pathways in the cat	Arranging retinocollicular pathways in cats.
2	effects of adrenergic blockade on adipose tissue lipolysis provoked in cats and humans by intravenous perfusion of isoprenaline	Effects of adrenergic blockade on fat-lipolysis in cats and humans by intravenous infusion of isoprenaline.
2	influence of cholinergic drugs on the lateral geniculate phasic waves	Influence of cholinergic drugs on lateral geniculate phasic waves.
2	analgesia induced by electrical stimulation of the inferior centralis nucleus of the raphe in the cat	Electrical stimulation-induced analgesia of the lower central nucleus of cat raphé.
2	different targets of different neurons in nucleus gracilis of the cat	Different targets of different neurons in cat gracilis.
2	neuroplasticity of primary afferents in the neo natal cat and some results of early deafferentation of the trigeminal spinal nucleus	Neuroplasticity of primary afferents in the neonatal cat and some results of early deafferentiation of the spinal trigeminal nucleus.
2	axonal projections and connections of the principal sensory trigeminal nucleus in the monkey	Axonal projections and connections of the primary sensory trigeminal nucleus of monkeys.
2	the patterns of projection of cortical areas 17 18 and 19 onto the laminae of the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus in the cat	Projection patterns of cortical zones 17, 18, and 19 on lateral nucleus dorsal laminae of the cat.
2	localization of masticatory motoneurons in the cat and rat by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase localizes the masticatory motoneurons in cats and rats.
2	dorsal column nuclei projections to the cerebellar cortex in cats as revealed by the use of the retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase	Projection of nuclei from the dorsal column to the cerebellar cortex in cats was revealed by use of retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	comparative anatomical studies of the sml face cortex with special reference to the occurrence of barrels in layer iv	Anatomical comparative studies of the sml face cortex, particularly barrel occurrence in layer IV.
2	effect of auditory neocortex ablation on pitch perception in the cat	Effect of ablation of the auditory neocortex on the cat's tone perception.
2	synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells i steady frequency tone bursts	Stable frequency pulses synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells.
2	synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells ii frequency modulated tones	Synaptic events and patterns of discharge of cochlear cells ii frequency modulated tones.
2	effects of static tilt on cervical spinoreticular tract neurons	Effects of apo; static tilt on neurons of cervical spinoreticular tract.
2	the transmission of reflexes in the spinal cord of cats during direct irradiation with microwaves	The transmission of reflexes in the spinal cord of cats during it; direct irradiation with micro@-@ waves.
2	synapsoarchitechtonics of the parietal and acoustic regions of the cerebral cortex of cats	Synapsoarchitechtonics of the parietal and acoustic regions of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	the association connexions of the suprasylvian fringe sf and other areas of the cat auditory cortex	The connections d' association of the suprasylvian fringe sf and d' other regions of the auditory cortex of the cat.
2	the mode of synaptic linkage in the cerebro ponto cerebellar pathway of the cat i responses in the brachium pontis	Mode of synaptic binding in cerebellar pathway of cerebro-ponto cat i responses in brachium pontis.
2	the mode of synaptic linkage in the cerebro ponto cerebellar pathway of the cat ii responses of single cells in the pontine nuclei	The mode of synaptic binding in the cerebral cerebral pathway (CAD)-pontotic of the cat ii responses of individual cells in pontic nuclei.
2	columnar distribution of u fibres from the postcruciate cerebral projection area of the cat s group i muscle afferents	Column distribution of post-cranial cerebral projection region u fibers of cat muscle group i afferent fibers.
2	functional organization of vestibulofastigial projection in the horizontal semicircular canal system in the cat	Functional organization of the vestibulofastigial projection in the horizontal circular channel system in the cat.
2	preventive anti epileptic action of taurine administered by direct cortical perfusion	Antimicrobial action-epileptic prophylaxis of taurine administered by direct cortical infusion.
2	transendothelial vesicular transport of protein following compression injury to the spinal cord	Transendothelial vesicular transport of proteins following a bone marrow compression injury.
2	regulation of local tissue po2 in the cerebral cortex of the cat	Regulation of the local tissue po2 in the cat cerebral cortex.
2	effect of the hypothalamus and reticular formation on the cerebral cortex in hypoxic brain states	Effect of the hypothalamus and reticular formation on cerebral cortex in hypoxic brain.
2	the heterosensory interaction of neurons in the cat frontal association cortex	L' heterosensory interaction of neurons in the cortex d' frontal association of the cat.
2	effects of early binocular deprivation on visual input to cat superior colliculus	Effects of early binocular deprivation on the cat's body; visual contribution to the cat's superior colliculus.
2	responses of spinal cord neurons to systematic changes in hindlimb skin temperatures in cats and primates	Responses of spinal cord neurons to systematic changes in the hindlimb skin temperatures of cats and primates.
2	organization of cat striate cortex a correlation of receptive field properties with afferent and efferent connections	Correlation of receptive field properties with afferent and efferent connections.
2	cat parastriate cortex a primary or secondary visual area	Cortex parastriate cat a primary or secondary visual area.
2	modification of auditory and somatosensory system activity during pupillary conditioning in the paralyzed cat	Alteration of the hearing and somatosensory system activity during pupillary conditioning in a paralyzed cat.
2	unit activity in vestibular nucleus of the alert monkey during horizontal angular acceleration and eye movement	Unital activity in the vestibular nucleus of the alarm monkey during the apos; horizontal angular acceleration and eye movement.
2	intracellular recordings from different types of medullary respiratory neurons of the cat	Intracellular recordings of different types of cat medullary respiratory neurons.
2	accommodative reactions of medullary respiratory neurons of the cat	Flexible reactions of the cat's medullary breathing neurons.
2	inferior colliculus i comparison of response properties of neurons in central pericentral and external nuclei of adult cat	Lower colliculus i of the response properties of neurons in adult cat's central and outer pericentraous nuclei.
2	inferior colliculus ii development of tuning characteristics and tonotopic organization in central nucleus of the neonatal cat	Colliculus ii development of syntonization and d&apos features; tonotopic organization in the central nucleus of the neonatal cat.
2	physiologic characteristics of vestibular first order canal neurons in the cat i response plane determination and resting discharge characteristics	Physiological characteristics of first-order duct vestibular neurons in determining the cat's i response plane and discharge characteristics at rest.
2	physiologic characteristics of vestibular first order canal neurons in the cat ii response to constant angular acceleration	Physiological characteristics of first-order duct vestibular neurons in cats ii in response to constant angular acceleration.
2	laminar analysis of evoked potentials of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis	Laminar analysis of evoked potentials of visual cortex of the cat during prenatal ontogenesis.
2	the velocity tuning of single units in cat striate cortex	L' speed adjustment for single units in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	the effectiveness of bicuculline as an antagonist of gaba and visually evoked inhibition in the cat s striate cortex	L' effectiveness of bicuculline as bell and l&apos antagonist; visually evoked inhibition in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	the contribution of inhibitory mechanisms to the receptive field properties of neurones in the striate cortex of the cat	The contribution of inhibitory mechanisms to receptor field properties of neurons in the cat striated cortex.
2	the tendon organs of cat medial gastrocnemius significance of motor unit type and size for the activation of ib afferents	The tendinous organs of the cat's median gastrocnemius are the type and size of the motor unit for the apos; activation of the afferents ib.
2	discharges of relay cells in lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat during spontaneous eye movements in light and darkness	Release of relay cells into the lateral genicular nucleus of the cat during spontaneous eye movements under light and darkness.
2	evidence for the presence of eye movement potentials during paradoxical sleep in cats	Evidence of eye movement potentials during REM sleep in cats.
2	effects of ponto mesencephalic lesions and electrical stimulation upon pgo waves and emps in unanesthetized cats	Effects of ponto lesions-mesencephalic and electrical stimulation on pgo waves and emps in cats not anesthetized.
2	parameters of the reflex responses of cat spinal cord neurons during ontogenesis	Reflex response parameters of cat spinal cord neurons during ontogenesis.
2	the growing conceptus of the domestic cat	The burgeoning concept of the domestic cat.
2	behavioural repertory of cats without cerebral cortex from infancy	Cats without cerebral cortex from childhood.
2	early versus late visual cortex lesions effects on receptive fields in cat superior colliculus	Effects of early and late visual cortical lesions on receptor fields in upper cat colliculus.
2	synaptosomal fractions of cat cerebral cortex after hypo osmotic and detergent treatment	Synaptosomal Fractions of the cat cerebral cortex after hypoosmotic and detergent treatment.
2	modulation of the photically evoked potentials in the motor cortex of cats by influences of the somatosensory system and the reticular formation	Modulation of photically evoked potentials in the motor cortex of cats by influences of somatosensory system and reticular formation.
2	technical note about simultaneous recording of oxygen partial pressure and neuronal activity in cat cortex	Technical note on the apos; simultaneous recording of partial pressure of the apos; oxygen and apos; neuronal activity in the cat cortex.
2	respiratory rhythmicity in the cat	He's got respiratory rhythm in the cat.
2	changes in the activity of the cat sensomotor cortex under heterosensory stimulation	Changes of the sensomotor cortex of the cat under heterosensory stimulation.
2	the interaction of symmetrical cortical descending influences on lumbar motoneurons	L&apos is the interaction of symmetrical cortical descending influences on lumbar motor neurons.
2	the effect of microiontophoretic administration of acetylcholine on evoked activity of visual cortex neurons subjected to direct cortical stimulation	L' effect of apos; microiontophoretic administration of apos; acetylcholine on apos; evoked activity of visual cortical neurons subjected to direct cortical stimulation.
2	transformation of neuronal activity in the cat lateral geniculate body	Transformation of the apos; lateral genicular body neuronal activity in the cat.
2	extra and intra cranial blood supply to brains of dog and cat	Provision of extra- and intra--cranial blood to the brains of dogs and cats.
2	descending inputs to caudal cochlear nucleus in cats a horseradish peroxidase hrp study	Downward effects on the caudal cochlear nucleus in the cat during an horseradish peroxidase study.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iii the projection to the vermal visual area	Olivocerebellar projection in cats has been studied by the retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iii, the projection to the vermic visible zone.
2	marginal and extramarginal cortical lesions and visual discrimination by cats	Marginal and extramarginal cortical injury and visual discrimination by cats?
2	performance on the visual cliff by cats with marginal gyrus lesions	On the visual cliff by cats with marginal lesions of gyrus.
2	a histochemical study of acetylcholinesterase in intact and deafferented cat auditory cortex	Histochemical study of acetylcholinesterase in the intact and deafferented auditory cortex of the cat.
2	comparative characteristics of the background activity of neurons from several regions of the cerebral cortex of unanesthetized cats	Comparative characteristics of the apos; background activity of neurons in several regions of the cerebral cortex of unanaesthetized cats.
2	reactions of medial geniculate body neurons to stimulation of the auditory cortex	Reactions of neurons in the middle geniculate body to stimulation of the auditory cortex.
2	effect of diphenylhydantoin on a developed epileptogenic focus in cats with split cerebral hemispheres	The effect of diphenylhydantoin on an epileptogenic focus developed in a cat with divided cerebral hemispheres.
2	the peri angular masseteropterygoid belt in the cat felis catus l	The belt of peri-angular masseteropterygoids of the cat felis catus l.
2	the effect of atropine upon acetylcholine release from cat superior cervical ganglia and rat cortical slices measurement by a radio enzymic method	The effect of apos; atropine on the release of apos; acetylcholine from the upper cervical ganglia of cats and the measurement of rat cortical slices by a radio method.
2	acquired retinal folds in the cat	Retinal fold backs acquired in the cat.
2	binocular interaction in strabismic kittens deprived of vision	L' binocular interaction in vision deprived strabismic kittens.
2	destruction of the endolymphatic sac in the cat	Uh, the destruction of the endolymphatic sac in the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Cat olivocerebellar projection was studied by the retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	signs of plasticity and reconnection in spinal cord damage	Plasticity and reconnection in spinal cord lesions.
2	experimental immunohistochemical studies on the localization and distribution of substance p in cat primary sensory neurons	Experimental immunohistochemical studies on the localization and distribution of p-substance in the primary sensory neurons of the cat.
2	visual discrimination between spatially separated stimuli by cats with lesions of the superior colliculus pretectum	Visual discrimination between stimuli separated spatially by cats with lesions of the superior colliculus pretectum.
2	effects of vagotomy on the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat medulla oblongata	Effects of vagotomy on the distribution of cholinesterases in cat medulla oblongata.
2	effect of beta adrenergic blockaders on the bioelectrical activity of the mesenchephalic reticular formation	Effect of beta--adrenergic blockers on cell wall tissue; bioelectrical activity of mesencephalic reticular formation.
2	individual epsps produced by single triceps surae ia afferent fibers in homonymous and heteronymous motoneurons	Individual epspspsps produced by a single triceps surae ia fibers afferents in homonymous and heteronymous motoneurons.
2	analysis of passive and active electrophysiologic properties of neurons in mammalian nodose ganglia maintained in vitro	Analysis of active and passive electrophysiological properties of neurons in mammalian nodular ganglia maintained in vitro.
2	activation of neurons in the cerebellar nuclei and ascending reticular formation by stimulation of the cerebellar surface	Neuronal activation in cerebellar nuclei and reticular ascending formation by stimulation of the cerebellar surface.
2	effect of succinylcholine on responses of neurons in the motor cortex to natural activation of muscle spindle primary endings	Effect of succinylcholine on the responses of motor cortical neurons to apos; natural activation of the primary terminals of muscle spindle.
2	the cat as a possible source of toxoplasma infection for man	Cats as a possible source of toxoplasmic infection for humans.
2	spinal sympathetic reflexes in the cat and the pathogenesis of arterial hypertension	Sympathetic spinal reflexes in the cat and pathogenicity of the apos; hypertension.
2	a study of geniculate unit activity during cryogenic blockade of the primary visual cortex in the cat	Genetic unit during cryogenic blockade of the primary visual cortex in cats.
2	micro electrophoretic studies in the cat pulvinar region effect of acetylcholine	Microelectrophoretic studies of the apos; effect of the apos; acetylcholine on the cat pulvinar region.
2	autoradiographic tracing of the cerebellar projections from the lateral reticular nucleus in the cat	Autoradiographic tracing cerebellar projections of the lateral reticular nucleus of the cat.
2	cats raised in a one directional world effects on receptive fields in visual cortex and superior colliculus	Cats raised in one direction global effects on receptive fields in the visual cortex and superior colliculus.
2	in vivo activation of synthetic hormonogens of lysine vasopressin na glycyl glycyl glycyl 8 lysine vassopressin in the cat	L' in vivo activation of synthetic vasopressin na glycyl glycyl lysine 8 lysine vassopressin hormones in cats.
2	dendroaxonic synapses in the substantia gelatinosa glomeruli of the spinal trigeminal nucleus of the cat	Dendroaxonic synapses in the glomeruli substantia gelatinosa of the spinal trigeminal nucleus of the cat.
2	the influence of secretin on the secretion of pepsin in response to acid stimulants in the anaesthetized cat	L' influence of secretin on pepsin secretion in response to acidic stimulants in the anesthetized cat.
2	size and duration of inhibition in the medial geniculate body in unanesthetized cats	Inhibition in the median geniculate body in unanesthetized cats.
2	allergens of mammalian origin iv evidence for common allergens in cat and dog serum	Allergens in cats and dogs; mammalian origin evident from common allergens in cat and dog serum.
2	motor unit responses in the lateral rectus muscle of the cat intracellular current injection of abducens nucleus neurons	Reactions of the apos; motor unit in the lateral rectum muscle of the apos; intracellular current injection of neurons from nuclei removed from the cat.
2	junctions in the central nervous system of the cat v the junctional complex of the pia arachnoid membrane	The junctions in the central nervous system of the cat v. the junctional complex of the pia arachnoid membrane.
2	experimental salivary mucoceles in cat a histochemical study	Experimental salivary mucoceles in the cat was studied histochemically.
2	response plasticity of lateral geniculate neurons during and after pairing of auditory and visual stimuli	Aplasticity of response of lateral genicular neurons during and after apo; pairing auditory and visual stimuli.
2	unit activity in somatosensory area ii sii and tooth pulp stimulation in a cat	Unital activity in the somatosensory region ii sii and stimulation of the tooth pulp in a cat.
2	the bony tentorium of the cat stereotaxic coordinates	The bony tentorium of cat stereotactic coordinates.
2	monoamine oxidase inhibition and the induction of ponto geniculo occipital wave activity by reserpine in the cat	Monoamine oxidase inhibition and apos; apos induction; apos activity; ponto geniculo occipital wave by cat reserpine.
2	an analysis of the subsynaptic site of action of theophylline on isolated cat tenuissimus muscle	An analysis of the subsynaptic action of theophylline on isolated cat muscle tenuissimus has been performed.
2	dopamine evoked inhibition of single cells of the feline putamen and basolateral amygdala	Dopamine caused the apos; inhibition of the individual cells of the feline putamen and the apos; basolateral amygdala.
2	synaptic transmission in parasympathetic ganglia in the urinary bladder of the cat	Synaptic transmission in the parasympathetic ganglia of the cat's bladder.
2	regulation of unit activity in nucleus reticularis thalami by the mesencephalic reticular formation and the frontal granular cortex	Regulation of l' unitary activity in nucleus reticularis thalami through formation of mesencephalic reticulum and frontal granular cortex.
2	impedance and spontaneous electrical activity as a localizing method in percutaneous spinal surgery	L' impedance and apos; spontaneous electrical activity as a method of localization in percutaneous spinal surgery.
2	cortico cortical connections of the orbito frontal cortex	Cortical cortical cortical connections in orbital frontal cortex.
2	fentanyl and tooth pulp evoked responses in the spinal trigeminal nucleus caudalis region	Fentanyl and the tooth pulp evoke responses in the spinal trigeminal region of the caudalis nucleus.
2	receptive field types in the lateral geniculate body and their frequency characteristics	Types of receptive fields in the lateral genital area and their frequency characteristics.
2	antagonism of gamma aminobutyric acid and glycine by convulsants in the cuneate nucleus of cat	Apos; gamma aminobutyric acid and glycine antagonism by convulsions in the cadenced cat nucleus.
2	sensitization and habituation of the plantar cushion reflex in cats	Sensitization and habituation to plantar cushion reflex in cats.
2	electrophysiological identification of pontomedullary reticular neurons directly projecting into dorsal column nuclei	Electrophysiological identification of pontomedullary reticular neurons (CPRNs) projecting directly into the dorsal column nuclei.
2	effects of thinner fibers on spinal neurones in the cat author s transl	Effects of thinner fibers on spinal neurons in translation of the apos; author of the cat.
2	crossing axons in the third nerve nucleus	Uh, crossed axons in the third nerve nucleus.
2	peptide and acetylcholine action on neurones of the cat subfornical organ	Peptide action and acetylcholine on the neurons of l' organ under-fornical of the cat.
2	energy state of the cerebral cortex of the cat during hyperventilation author s transl	State of onset; energy of cat cerebral cortex during symptoms; translative hyperventilation.
2	statistical characteristics of the background and evoked activity of cat superior colliculus neurons	Statistical background characteristics and evoked activity of cat superior colliculus neurons.
2	correlation of potentials evoked by tones and clicks during simultaneous recording from many points in the auditory cortex of awake cats	Correlation of sounds and clicks evoked potentials during the recording; simultaneous recording from several points in the auditory cortex of awake cats.
2	efferent connections of the caudate nucleus in cats	Caudate kernel efferent connections in cats.
2	background impulse activity of cat pericruciate cortex neurons	Basal impulse activity of pericruciated cortical neurons of cats.
2	reflection of temporal parameters of an optic stimulus in neuronal responses of the senso motor and visual cortex in cats	Reflection of temporal parameters d' optical stimulus in sensory and visual cortical neuronal responses in cats.
2	synaptic processes in neurons of the cat pericruciate cortex evoked by pyramidal tract stimulation	Synaptic processes in neurons in the pericruciated cortex of the cat evoked by stimulation of the pyramidal tract.
2	generation and propagation of direct responses of intact and chronically isolated strips of cortex	Production and propagation of direct cortical responses of intact and chronically isolated cortical strips.
2	electrical characteristics of neurons in the motor region of the cat cerebral cortex	Electrical characteristics of neurons in the motor region of the cerebral cortex of cats.
2	functional organization of pathways transmitting auditory signals in the somatosensory zone of the cat cerebral cortex	Functional organization of the pathways of hearing transmission in the somatosensory area of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	changes in the receptive fields of cat lateral geniculate body neurons following removal of corticofugal influence	Changes in the receptor fields of lateral genicular neurons in the cat body after death; corticofugal influence.
2	connections between the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus and the cortex of the cat suprasylvian gyrus	Connections between the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus and the cat's suprasylvian gyrus cortex.
2	the possibility of different effects of primary afferent depolarization on spinal reflexes	The possibility of different effects of the primary afferent depolarization on spinal reflexes.
2	rubrofugal influences on the spike activity of neurons of the medial reticulo spinal tract	Effects of rubrofugality on apos; peak activity of reticulo medial rachidial tract neurons.
2	reactions of the neurons of the reticular and ventral anterior nuclei of the optic thalamus to afferent stimulation of different modalities	Reactions of neurons in the anterior reticular and ventral nuclei of the optic thalamus to different modalities of afferent stimulation.
2	the relationship between the second zone of the auditory cortex and the medial geniculate body and first auditory zone	Relationship between the second zone of the auditory cortex and the geniculate medial body and the first auditory zone.
2	formation of a generator of excitation in the gigantocellular nucleus of the medulla oblongata during disruption of inhibitory processes	Formation of apos; generator; excitation in the gigantocellular nucleus of the oblongata medulla during rupture of inhibitory processes.
2	classification of the vestibulospinal neurons of the cat deiter s nucleus	Enterbulospinal neuron classification of the nucleus deiter s of the cat.
2	changes in the synaptic vesicles of cat motor cortex axon terminals upon stimulation	Changes in the synaptic vesicles of the axonal terminals of the motor cortex of the cat during stimulation.
2	brain stem reticular units synaptic responses to stimulation within the ascending reticular pathways	Reticular units of the brain stem respond synaptically to stimulation in ascending reticular pathways.
2	intracellular study of synaptic events related to phase locking responses of cat cochlear nucleus cells to low frequency tones	Intracellular study of synaptic events related to the phase-locking responses of cat cochlear cells to low-frequency sounds.
2	laminar patterns of geniculocortical projection in the cat	Laminar models of geniculocortical projection for cats.
2	visual cortical neurons influenced by the oculomotor input characterization of their receptive field properties	Visual cortical neurons influenced by characterization oculo-motor of their receptive field properties.
2	the raphe nuclei of the cat brain stem a topographical atlas of their efferent projections as revealed by autoradiography	The raphe nuclei of the brain of the cat form a topographic atlas of their efferent projections as revealed by autoradiography.
2	bilateral projection of the canine tooth pulp to bulbar trigeminal neurons	Bilateral projection of canine dental pulp into bulbar trigeminal neurons.
2	the myelinated parallel fibers of the cerebellar cortex and their regional distribution	Parallel myelinated fibers of cerebellar cortex and their regional distribution.
2	postnatal growth of the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat	Postnatal growth of the lateral genicular cat dorsal nucleus.
2	on the variability of form and vascularization of the cat carotid body	On variability of shape and vascularization of the cat's carotid body.
2	cyclic nucleotides in spinal cells	Cyclic nucleotides in spinal cells.
2	nature of rhythmic discharges in ventral spinal cord roots	Nature of rhythmic discharges in the ventral spinal cord roots.
2	electrophysiological investigations on the projections from the cerebral cortex to the vermal posterior lobe of the cerebellum	Electrophysiological studies of the projections from the cerebral cortex to the cerebellum posterior lobe.
2	autonomic nervous system of the cat middle ear mucosa	Autonomic nervous system of the mucosa of the apos; middle ear of the cat.
2	a method of quantitating injury inflicted in acute spinal cord studies	Quantification of lesions in acute spinal cord studies.
2	electron microscopy of stages of isospora felis of the cat in the mesenteric lymph node of the mouse	Electron microscopy of isospora felis from cats in the mouse mesenteric ganglion.
2	informational characteristics of the impulse activity of cat sensomotor cortex neurons during elaboration of a defensive conditioned reflex	Informative characteristics of the apos; activity of the sensomotor cortical neurons of the cat during the apos; a conditioned defensive reflex.
2	comparative characteristics of the topography of functional interhemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex following exposure to stimuli of different strength	Comparative characteristics of the topography of the apos; functional inter-hemispheric asymmetry in visual cortex after exposure to stimuli of different force.
2	effect of stimulation of rostral portions of the midbrain reticular formation on the cat motor cortex	Stimulation of the rostral portions of the reticular formation of the midbrain on the cat motor cortex.
2	effect of microiontophoretic application of serotonin on the background impulse activity of visual cortex neurons in unanesthetized cats	Effect of apos; microiontophoretic application of serotonin on apos; apos activity; visual cortical neuron background impulses in unanesthetized cats.
2	bandage backfall reaction occurs in infancy hypothalamic damage and catalepsy	Hypothalamic lesions in early childhood and catalepsy cause a reaction to the fall of apos; bandage.
2	regulation of local tissue po2 of the brain cortex at different arterial o2 pressures	Cerebral cortical regulation of local po2 tissue at different arterial o2 pressures.
2	transitional cell carcinoma of the urethra in a cat	Transient cellular carcinoma of the spinal cord; urethra in a cat.
2	the effect of hydrocortisone on the impulse activity of cat cerebral cortex neurons	Apos; effect of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; apos activity; cat cerebral cortical neuron impulse.
2	interaction of capillary and tissue forces in the cat small intestine	Interaction of the capillary and tissue forces in the cat's small intestine.
2	united neurons in the cat motor cortex	Unified neurons in the cat's motor cortex.
2	reaction of caudate nucleus neurons to direct stimulation	Neurons in the caudate nucleus react to direct stimulation.
2	effect of vestibular somatic and autonomic afferent impulsation on the activity of individual neurons in the nuclei of the cat vestibular complex	Effect of d' autonomic and somatic vestibular afferent impulse on the apos; activity of individual neurons in the nuclei of the cat vestibular complex.
2	electrophysiologic study of propagation of excitation in the cat pterygopalatine ganglion	An electrophysiological study of the propagation of apos; excitation in the ganglion pterygopalatine of the cat.
2	evoked potential decrements in auditory cortex i discrete trial and continual stimulation	Potential decreases have been evoked in the auditory cortex i discrete assay and continuous stimulation.
2	neuromuscular sensitivity to tubocurarine a comparison of 10 parameters	Neuromuscular sensitivity to tubocurarine, 10-parameter comparison.
2	sensitivity of calcium binding in cerebral tissue to weak environmental electric fields oscillating at low frequency	Sensitivity of calcium binding in brain tissue to low-frequency oscillating environmental weak electric fields.
2	biological bases for the integration of appetitive and consummatory grooming behaviors in the cat a review	Biological basis for l' integration of grooming appetizing and consuming behaviors in the cat a revision.
2	studies on drug induced neuropathies iii motor nerve deficit in cats with experimental acrylamide neuropathy	Studies of Drug-Induced Neuropathies iii motor nerve deficits in cats with apo; experimental apo neuropathy; acrylamide.
2	projection of thalamic neurons to cat primary vestibular cortical fields studied by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Projection of thalamic neurons into primary cat vestibular cortical fields studied using retrograde axonal horseradish peroxidase transport.
2	electrophysiological properties of nucleus reticularis tegmenti pontis cells antidromic and synaptic activation	Electrophysiological properties of antidromic and synaptic activating nucleus reticularis tegmenti pontis cells.
2	heterogeneity of motor units activating single golgi tendon organs in cat leg muscles	Heterogeneity of the motor units activating single golgi tendon organs in the cat's leg muscles.
2	ascending long spinal actions on forelimb motoneurons in the acute spinal cat	Long ascending spinal actions on forelimb motoneurons of acute spinal cats.
2	study on the intraspinal cord regeneration of sensory fibers sectioned in the posterior root of the cat	Study of the regeneration of the intraspinal cord of sectioned sensory fibers in the cat's dorsal root system.
2	inhibitory innervation of cat sphincter of oddi	Cats sphincter inhibitory innervation d' Oddi.
2	reflection of visceral signals in the impulse activity of the caudate nucleus	Reflection of visceral signals in the apos; d&apos activity; caudate-core pulse.
2	behavior of microflow and local po2 of the brain cortex during and after direct electrical stimulation a contribution to the problem of metabolic regulation of microcirculation in the brain	The behavior of microflux and local cerebral cortical po2 during and after direct electrical stimulation contributes to the problem of metabolic regulation of microcirculation in the brain.
2	dependence of reward contingent positive variation rcpv and cortical synchronization on visual input in the cat	Dependence of the conditional positive reward variation rcpv and cortical synchronization to l' visual entry in the cat.
2	effect of ablation of the motor cortex or the cerebellum on postural kinetic coordination in the cat	Effect of Lapos; removal of motor cortex or cerebellum on postural kinetic coordination in cats.
2	strabismus measurements in the siamese cat	Measurement of strabismus in Siamese cat.
2	role of the carotid chemoreceptors in the hyperpnea of exercise in the cat	Role of carotid chemoreceptors in apos; hyperpnea; exercise in cats.
2	brainstem neurons without spontaneous unit discharge	Brain stem neurons with no unital, spontaneous discharge.
2	steroid anaesthesia althesin ct 1341 and dorsal horn cell activities in feline spinal cord	Steroidal anesthesia with apos; althesin ct 1341 and dorsal horn cell activities in the spinal cord of the feline.
2	hypotensive responses following oral adminstration of beta adrenoceptor blocking drugs to the conscious cat	Hypotensive reactions following oral administration of beta @-@adrenoceptor blocking drugs to conscious chat.
2	quantitative studies of intracellular postsynaptic potentials in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat with respect to optic tract stimulus response latencies	Quantitative studies of the intracellular synaptic potentials in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat with respect to the latencies of the visual tract stimuli.
2	cat retinal ganglion cells projecting to the superior colliculus as shown by the horseradish peroxidase method	Cat retinal ganglion cells projecting onto the superior colliculus, as shown by horseradish peroxidase method.
2	the integrative role of the intralaminar system of the thalamus in visual orientation and perception in the cat	The integrative role of the intralaminar thalamic system in visual orientation and perception in cats.
2	effects of frontal eye field stimulation upon activities of the lateral geniculate body of the cat	Effects of frontal ocular field stimulation on lateral genicular body activities of cats.
2	the lateral reticular nucleus in the cat v does collateral activation from the dorsal spinocerebellar tract occur	The lateral reticular nucleus of cat v elicits collateral activation of the dorsal spinocerebellar tract.
2	conduction velocity groupings among axons of cat retinal ganglion cells and their relationship to retinal topography	Rate groups among axons of cat retinal ganglion cells and their relation to retinal topography.
2	micropuncture study of pancreatic secretion in the cat	Micropuncture study of pancreatic secretion in cats.
2	indoleamine accumulating neurons in the retina of rabbit cat and goldfish	L' indoleamine accumulates neurons in the retina of the rabbit cat and the goldfish.
2	occurrence of cilia in the fundus striati of the cat	We found eyelashes in the cat's fundus striati.
2	effect of isotonic contrast agents on spinal reflexes in the cat	Effect of apos; isotonic contrast agents on spinal reflexes in cats.
2	characteristics of three strains of feline fibrosarcoma virus grown in cat and marmoset monkey cells	Characteristics of three strains of feline fibrosarcoma virus (CFV) grown in monkey-chat and monkey @-@marmot cells.
2	effects of visual deprivation on polyribosome aggregation in visual cortex of the cat	Effects of visual deprivation on the apos; aggregation of polyribosomes in the visual cortex of the cat.
2	some contractile and electrophysiologic properties of the periurethral striated muscle of the cat	Some contractile and electrophysiological properties of the cat's periurethral muscle striae.
2	the extent of the odontoblast process in the cat	L' extent of odontoblast process in the cat.
2	cellular changes in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and monkey after section of the optic tract	Cellular changes in lateral genicular nucleus of cat and monkey after section of the optic tract.
2	further studies on the mechanisms controlling prostaglandin biosynthesis in the cat adrenal cortex the role of calcium and cyclic amp	Other studies on the mechanisms controlling prostaglandin biosynthesis in the cat's adrenal cortex have also examined the role of calcium and the cyclic ampulla.
2	reactions of respiratory center neurons to local cooling of the ventral surface of the medulla oblongata	Neuronal responses of the respiratory centre to local cooling of the ventral surface of the oblongata medulla.
2	a fraction isolated from porcine upper small intestine stimulating pepsin secretion in the cat	Pepsin secretion in cats was stimulated by a fraction isolated from the upper porcine small intestine.
2	the effects of 5 hydroxytryptophan and l tryptophan on wakefulness and sleep patterns in the cat	Effects of 5 hydroxytryptophan and 1 tryptophan on alertness and sleep in cats.
2	basal forebrain and hypothalamic influences upon brain stem neurons	Basal forebrain and apos influences; hypothalamus on neurons in the brainstem.
2	integrative versus delay line characteristics of cerebellar cortex	Cerebral characteristics; integration versus delay line of the cerebellar cortex.
2	ultrastructural and biochemical evidence for a steroid containing secretory organelle in the perfused cat adrenal gland	Ultrastructural and biochemical evidence of the presence of a steroid containing secretory organelle in the cat's perfused adrenal gland.
2	effects of low level x irradiation on cat cerebella at different postnatal intervals i quantitative evaluation of morphological changes	The effects of low-level irradiation on the cerebellum of cats at different postnatal intervals on the quantitative assessment of morphological changes.
2	mechanical stimuli exciting type a atrial vagal receptors in the cat	Exciting mechanical stimuli such as a vagal atrial receptor in the cat.
2	experimental myocardial infarction in the cat i reversible decline in contractility of noninfarcted muscle	Myocardial infarction in the cat i reversible decrease in the contractility of the noninfarctus muscle.
2	ultrastructural localization of acid phosphatase and thiamine pyrophosphatase activities and of phosphotungstic staining at low ph in the placental labyrinth of the cat	Ultrastructural localization of acid phosphatase and thiamine pyrophosphatase activities and low-php phosphotungstic staining in the cat placental labyrinth.
2	the retinal projection to the ventral part of the lateral geniculate nucleus an experimental study with silver impregnation methods and axoplasmic protein tracing	Retinal projection to the lateral genicular ventral part of the nucleus was the subject of an experimental study using fingerprinting, silver and axoplasmic protein tracing methods.
2	absence of the gamma spindle loop in the reinnervated hind leg muscles of the cat alpha muscle	Absence of gamma spindle loop in the reinnervated muscles of the hind leg of the cat's alpha muscle.
2	horizontal vestibular nystagmus ii activity patterns of medial vestibular neurones during nystagmus	Nystagmus vestibular horizontalii patterns d' activity of the medial vestibular neurons during nystagmus.
2	the climbing fibers of the cerebellar cortex their origin and pathways in cat	The fibers of the cerebellar cortex have their origin and their pathways in the cat.
2	changes in the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex under the combined influence of cl perfringens type a toxin and products of cl butyricum activity	Changes in apo; electrical activity of cerebral cortex beneath; combined influence of perfringens a toxin and apo products; cl-butyric activity.
2	comparative study of the dorso medial nucleus of the inferior colliculus	Comparative study of the dorso-median lower colliculus.
2	dendroarchitectonic study of the inferior colliculus in the cat	Dendroarchitectonic study of the lower colliculus of the cat.
2	spatiotemporal organization of cat lateral geniculate receptive fields	Spatial organization-time of the lateral receptive fields geniculate of the cat.
2	interactions between cat lateral geniculate neurons	These are interactions between lateral geniculate neurons in the cat.
2	responses to tones and noise of single cells in dorsal cochlear nucleus of unanesthetized cats	Single cell tone and tone responses in the dorsal cochlear nucleus of unanesthetized cats.
2	mossy fiber neck and second order labyrinthine projections to cat flocculus	Fossil fiber neck and second-order labyrinthine flocculus projections from the cat.
2	reversal properties of climbing fiber potential in cat purkinje cells an example of a distributed synapse	An example of a distributed synapse is the d&apos properties; reversing the potential of climbing fibers in cat purkinje cells.
2	cortical histopathology following stimulation with metallic and carbon electrodes	Apos; cortical histopathology following apo-stimulation; apo-help metal and carbon electrodes.
2	responses of single neurons to electrical stimulation of the surface of the visual cortex	Isolated neuronal reactions to electrical stimulation of the visual cortical surface.
2	the visual cortex during chronic stimulation	Your visual cortex during chronic stimulation.
2	morphine naloxone and the responses of medial thalamic neurones of the cat	Morphine naloxone, and the responses of the cat's median thalamic neurons.
2	electrophysiological and horseradish peroxidase studies of precerebellar afferents to the nucleus interpositus anterior i climbing fiber system	Electrophysiological and horseradish peroxidase studies of the precerebellar afferents of the anterior interpositus nucleus of the climbing fiber system i.
2	relationship between visual and tactile representations in cat superior colliculus	Relationships between visual and tactile representations in the upper colliculus of cats.
2	fast and slow pyramidal tract neurons an intracellular analysis of their contrasting repetitive firing properties in the cat	Slow and fast pyramidal pathways neurons, an intracellular analysis of their contrasting repetitive firing properties in cats.
2	the response of ca mediated action potentials and contractile activity in mammalian ventricular myocardium towards alkalosis	The response of C-mediated and C-mediated action potentials; contractile activity in mammalian ventricular myocardium to acidosis; alkalosis.
2	monocular deprivation morphological effects on different classes of neurons in the lateral geniculate nucleus	Morphological effects of single cell deprivation on different classes of neurons in the lateral geniculate nucleus.
2	lipids in the proximal convoluted tubule of the cat kidney and the reabsorption of cholesterol	Lipids in the proximal convoluted tubule of cat kidney and reabsorption of cholesterol.
2	reconstruction of neurons of dorsal horn proper using golgi stained serial sections	Reconstruction of dorsal horn neurons proper at the apos; aid of golgi-stained serial sections.
2	properties of ganglion cells in the visual streak of the cat s retina	Properties of the ganglion cells in the visual band of the retina of the cat.
2	the effect of l tryptophan on spinal cord c fiber reflexes	L' effect of tryptophan on reflexes of spinal cord c fibers.
2	the effects of batrachotoxin on cat papillary muscle	The effects of batrachotoxin on papillary muscle in cats.
2	cancellation of rod signals by cones and cone signals by rods in the cat retina	Cone cancelling of rod signals and cone signals by rods in the cat retina.
2	fast axoplasmic transport in the fibres of chromatolysed neurones	Rapid axoplasmic transport in fibers of chromatolyzed neurons.
2	lateral geniculate relay of slowly conducting retinal afferents to cat visual cortex	Lateral genitalial relays of slowly conducting retinal afferents of the cat visual cortex.
2	the physiology and anatomy of long ranging afferent fibres within the spinal cord	The physiology and l' anatomy of long-range afferent fibres in the spinal cord.
2	visual cells in the pontine nuclei of the cat	Visual cells in pontic nuclei of the cat.
2	visual cortical cells their developmental properties in normal and dark reared kittens	Visual cortical cells have developmental properties in normal kittens and kittens raised in darkness.
2	the diastolic viscous properties of cat papillary muscle	Diastolic viscosity properties of cat papillary muscle.
2	influence of frequency of splanchnic nerve stimulation on development of habituation in the cat cerebral cortex	Influence of the stimulation frequency of the splanchnic nerve on the development of habituation in the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	features of individual sympathetic preganglionic neurons and their axons in the superior thoracic portion of the spinal cord	Characteristics of individual, sympathetic preganglionic neurons and their axons in the upper thoracic portion of the spinal cord.
2	purification of kallikrein from cat submaxillary gland	Purifying kallikrein from the gland under-cat maxilla.
2	effects of electrical stimulation of the substantia nigra on responses of lateral geniculate body neurons to light	Effects of electrical stimulation of the black substance on the responses of neurons in the lateral geniculated body to light.
2	comparisons of the immunological properties of two structural polypeptides of type c rna viruses endogenous to old world monkeys	Comparison of the immunological properties of two structural polypeptides of endogenous c rna-like viruses to monkeys of the old world.
2	visual cortex role in object discrimination in cats deprived of pattern vision from birth	Role of the visual cortex in discriminating objects in cats deprived of sight of patterns from birth.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat i motor output during sinusoidal linear accelerations	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and l' anterior limb extensor muscle activity in the cat motor output decerebrated during d' linear sinusoidal accelerations.
2	discharges of superior colliculus neurons during head and eye movements of the alert cat	Discharge neurons from the superior colliculus during head and eye movement of alert cat.
2	the effects of cerebral sensory cortical ablation on instrumental conditioned reflex in cats with cerebellar lesions	The effects of cerebral cortical sensor ablation on instrumental reflex condition in cats with cerebellar lesions.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat ii motor output during rotations in the horizontal plane	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and l' forelimb extensor muscle activity in the decerebrate cat ii motor output during horizontal plane rotations.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat iii motor output during rotations in the vertical plane	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and the forelimb extensor muscle activity in the decerebrate cat iii motor output during vertical plane rotations.
2	somatosensory properties of spinoreticular neurons in the cat	The somatosensory properties of the spinoreticular neurons in the cat.
2	activity of some enzymes in the cortex of the cat with pretrigeminal brainstem transection	The activity of certain enzymes in the cat cortex with transection from the brain stem to the pre-semminal stage.
2	ascites associated with intrahepatic arteriovenous fistula in a cat	Ascitis associated with intrahepatic arteriovenous fistula in the cat.
2	relationships between the spike components and the delayed depolarization in cat spinal neurones	Relationships between spike components and delayed spinal depolarization in cat spinal neurons.
2	strain sensitivity and directionality in cat atrial mechanoreceptors in vitro	The sensitivity and directionality of this strain in cat atrial mechanoreceptors in vitro.
2	mechanosensitive afferent units in the hypogastric nerve of the cat	Mechanosensitive afferent units in the hypogastric nerve.
2	statistical fluctuations in charge transfer at ia synapses on spinal motoneurones	Statistical fluctuations of charge transfer to synapses ia in spinal motoneurons.
2	non quantal fluctuations and transmission failures in charge transfer at ia synapses on spinal motoneurones	Nonquantum fluctuations and transmission failures in charge transfer to spinal motoneuron synapses.
2	the effect of polarizing currents on unitary ia excitatory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurones	The effect of polarizing currents on excitatory synaptic postaptic potentials has been evoked in spinal motoneurons.
2	threshold setting by the surround of cat retinal ganglion cells	Establishment of the threshold by the apos; surrounds the ganglion cells of the cat retina.
2	functional adaptation of sarcomere number of normal cat muscle	Functional adaptation of number of normal muscle sarcomeres in cat.
2	horseradish peroxidase localization of masticatory muscle motoneurons in cat	The location of masticatory muscle motoneurons in cats by horseradish peroxidase.
2	identification and discharge patterns of spinal sympathetic interneurons	Identification and discharge of sympathetic spinal interneurons.
2	ascending pressor and depressor pathways in the cat spinal cord	Pressor and depressive ascending pathways in the spinal cord of the cat.
2	the effect of activation of central adrenergic receptors by clonidine on the excitability of the solitary tract neurons in cats	Effects of apo; activation of central adrenergic receptors by clonidine on apo; excitability of solitary tract neurons in cats.
2	the anatomical organization of the cerebello olivary projection in the cat	L' anatomical organization of cerebello olivary projection in the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat as studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase ii the projection to the uvula	Retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase ii projection to the apos; uvule was used to study olivocerebellar projection in cats.
2	electrophoretic patterns of insoluble proteins in the sensory cerebral cortex of visually deprived and normal kittens	Electrophoretic models of protein that is insoluble in the sensory cerebral cortex of normal kittens and visually impaired kittens.
2	effect of clonidine and chlorpromazine on centrally evoked electrodermal responses and their interaction with yohimbine	Effect of clonidine and chlorpromazine on centrally evoked electrodermal responses and their interaction with yohimbine.
2	neuronal responses to eye muscle stretch in cerebellar lobule vi of the cat	The neural responses to the ocular muscle are s' stretch in the cerebellar lobule vi of the cat.
2	dark adaptation and receptive field organisation of cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus	Adaptation to apo; darkness and cell receptive field organization in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat.
2	responses of cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus to moving stimuli at various levels of light and dark adaptation	Reactions of cells of the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat to mobile stimuli at various levels of time; adaptation to light and light; darkness.
2	commissural projection to the amygdala thourgh the fimbria fornix system in the cat	It's a good way to get a feel for the fimbria system in the chat.
2	effects of lsd on the response of single units in cat visual cortex	Effects of lsd on single unit response in visual cortex.
2	time discrimination performance in cats with lesions in prefrontal cortex and caudate nucleus	Time discrimination performance in cats with damage to the prefrontal cortex and to the caudate nucleus.
2	interaction between spindles evoked by electric stimulation of different regions of the cerebral cortex	Spindle-spindle interaction evoked by electrical stimulation of different regions of the cerebral cortex.
2	distribution of gastrin in canine cat and human digestive organs	Distribution of gastrin in digestive organs of canine cat and lapos; man.
2	prophylactic effects of phenytoin phenobarbital and carbamazepine examined in kindling cat preparations	The prophylactic effects of phenytoin phenobarbital and carbamazepine have been examined in pet cat preparations.
2	cross sectional area of scala tympani in human and cat	Transverse area of the scala eardrum in humans and cats.
2	unmyelinated axons in thoracic ventral roots of the cat	Unmyelinated axons are present in the ventral thoracic roots of the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iv the projection to the anterior lobe	Olivocerebellar projection in cats has been studied by the retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iv, the projection to the anterior lobe.
2	the effect of superior colliculus lesions upon the visual fields of cats with cortical ablations	L' effect of lesions of the superior colliculus on the visual field of cats that have undergone cortical ablation.
2	the effect of cortical and tectal lesions on the visual fields of binocularly deprived cats	Effects of cortical and tectal lesions on the visual field of cats without binoculars.
2	quantitative studies of cell size in the cat s dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus following visual deprivation	Quantitative studies of cell size in the lateral geniculate nucleus dorsal to the cat following visual deprivation.
2	visual cortical areas mediating form discrimination in the cat	Visual cortical zones mediating form discrimination in the cat.
2	effects of benzodiazepines and pentobarbital on the evoked potentials in the cat brain	The effects of benzodiazepines and pentobarbital on the brain's evoked potentials.
2	preterminal and terminal axon arborizations in the substantia gelatinosa of cat s spinal cord	Preterminal and terminal arborizations of axons in the gelatinous substance of the cat spinal cord.
2	relay cell classes in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and the effects of visual deprivation	Classes of relay cells in the lateral genicular nucleus of the cat and effects of visual deprivation.
2	antagonizing effects of beta adrenergic blockers on lucus coeruleus induced inhibition of trigeminal nucleus neurons	The antagonistic effects of β-adrenergic blockers on lucus coeruleus induced the apos; inhibition of neurons in the trigeminal nucleus.
2	projections from the amygdaloid complex to the cerebral cortex and thalamus in the rat and cat	Projections of amygdaloid complex to cerebral cortex and thalamus in rat and cat.
2	projections from the amygdaloid complex and adjacent olfactory structures to the entorhinal cortex and to the subiculum in the rat and cat	Projections of the amygdaloid complex and of olfactory structures adjacent to the entorhinal cortex and subiculum in rats and cats.
2	an autoradiographic identification of purkinje axon terminals in the cat	Autoradiographic identification of the axonal terminals of Purkinje in the cat.
2	projections of several intralaminar nuclei of the thalamus to the caudate nucleus in cats	Projections of several intralaminated nuclei from the cat thalamus to the caudate nucleus.
2	histological effects of ductal ligation of salivary glands of the cat	Histological effects of the cat's ligation of its salivary glands.
2	structural characteristics of the axons of nerve cells of the cat motor cortex	Structural characteristics of the axons of the cat's motor cortical nerve cells.
2	comparative morphometric study of sensory neurons of the cerebral and spinal cord ganglia following transection of their processes	Comparative morphometric study of sensory neurons in spinal and cerebral cord ganglia after their processes are cut.
2	efferent projections of the ventral portion of the putamen to the frontal parietal and temporal regions of the cat cerebral cortex	Efferent projections of the ventral part of the putamen into the frontal temporal and parietal regions of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	associative connections of the visual area of the neuronally isolated cat cortex	Associative connections in the visual area of the cat cortex neurally isolated.
2	altered levels of pgf in cat spinal cord tissue following traumatic injury	Change in ftg levels in spinal cord tissue of cat as a result of traumatic injury.
2	neuronal activity of the cat visual cortex during the sleep wakefulness cycle	Neural activity of cat visual cortex during cycle d' alertness to sleep.
2	mechanisms of transmission of excitation grnerated in the orbito frontal cortex	Mechanisms of orbital transmission; pulsed excitation in the orbital frontal cortex.
2	a standardized model of microembolization in the cat brain	Standardized model of microembolism in the cat brain.
2	simple striate neurons in the cat i comparison of responses to moving and stationary stimuli	Single striated neurons in cat i compare the responses to stationary and motile stimuli.
2	simple striate neurons in the cat ii mechanisms underlying directional asymmetry and directional selectivity	The single striated neurons of the cat ii mechanisms under-jacentes l' directional asymmetry and directional selectivity.
2	antidromic activity in visual radiation during evoked cortical responses	L' antidromic activity in visual radiation during the cortical responses evoked.
2	the actions of natural secretin on the small intestinal vasculature of the anaesthetized cat	The actions of natural secretin on the anesthetized cat's small intestine.
2	labelled decamethonium in cat muscle	Decamethonium labeled in the cat muscle.
2	biotin deficiency in the cat and the effect on hepatic propionyl coa carboxylase	Biotin deficiency in cat and effect on hepatic propionyl coa carboxylase.
2	the mechanism of inhibition of neuronal activity by opiates in the spinal cord of cat	Dapos mechanism; opiate inhibition; neuronal activity by opiates in cat spinal cord.
2	selective discharge of pontine neurons during the postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat	Selective discharge of pontic neurons during apo; postural atonia produced by anticholinesterase in decerebrated cat.
2	tonic inhibition of dorsal pontine neurons during the postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat	Tonic inhibition of the dorsal pontic neurons during the apos; postural atrophy produced by anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat.
2	sequential discharges of phasic activities pgo waves during paradoxical sleep after selective cortical lesions in the cat	Sequential discharge of pgo-wave phasic activities during REM after selective cortical lesions in the cat.
2	the uptake of dh ergotoxine by different parts of the cat brain	Absorption of the ergotoxin by different parts of the cat's brain.
2	serotonin involvement in the blockade of bulbospinal inhibition of the spinal monosynaptic reflex	Serotonin involvement in blockade of the apos; bulbospinal inhibition of the monosynaptic spinal reflex.
2	responses of complex cells in the visual cortex of the cat as a function of the length of moving slits	The responses of complex cells in the cat visual cortex are dependent on the length of moving slits.
2	incorporation of tritiated leucine by axotomized rubral neurons	Incorporation of tritium leucine by axotomized rubella neurons.
2	convergence of the descending pathways of motor visual and limbic cortex in the cat di and mesencephalon	Convergence of the descending pathways of the motor vision and of the limbic cortex in the cat di and midbrain.
2	the effect of antifibrinolytic therapy in experimental spinal cord trauma	The effect of antifibrinolytic therapy on the development of spinal cord trauma.
2	spinal projections from the nucleus locus coeruleus and nucleus subcoeruleus in the cat and monkey as demonstrated by the retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase	Spinal projections of the rat and monkey nucleus locus coeruleus and subcoeruleus, as demonstrated by retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	power spectral analysis of eeg activity obtained from cortical and subcortical sites during the vigilance states of the cat	Spectral power analysis of the apos; activity eeg obtained from cortical and cortical sites during cat vigilance states.
2	the mechanism of the vasodilator effects of histamine and 4 methylhistamine in the hindquarters of the cat	The mechanism of vasodilatory effects of histamine and methylhistamine 4 in posterior areas of the cat.
2	ultrastructure of arterioles in the cat brain	L' ultrastructure of arterioles in the brain of the cat.
2	allergens of mammalian origin v properties of extracts derived from the domestic cat	D&apos allergens; mammalian origin, properties of extracts derived from the domestic cat.
2	abnormal visual resolution in the siamese cat	An abnormal visual resolution in Siamese cat.
2	effect of damage to the zone of the medial forebrain bundle and preoptic area on the activiy of a penicillin induced epileptiform focus phenomenon of the hyperactive determinant dispatch station	Effects of apos; alteration of the area of the median forebrain bundle and the preoptic region on apos; activity of apos; an epileptiform focusing phenomenon induced by penicillin of the hyperactive determinant control station.
2	influence of the somatic region of the cortex on trace inhibitory processes in the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus	L' influence of the somatic region of the cerebral cortex on inhibitory processes; trace state in the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus.
2	epinephrine inhibition of the electrodermal response in the cat	Epinephrine inhibition of electrodermal response in the cat.
2	the influence of hypothalamically administered reserpine on the sexual behavior of the female cat	L' influence of the apos; hypothalamic administration of reserpine on the female cat's sexual behaviour.
2	method for reliably recording geniculate spikes during paradoxical sleep in the cat	A reliable method for recording spikes during a sleep paradox in a cat.
2	modification of visual function by early visual experience	Modification of visual function by elapos; visual experience at an early stage.
2	reactions of neurons in the primary and secondary somatosensory zones of the cortex to stimulation of the ventral posterior nucleus of the thalamus	Response of primary and secondary somatosensory regions of the cortex to stimulation of the ventral posterior nucleus of the thalamus.
2	spatial organization of the direct connections of the sensory motor cortex with the rhombencephalon and spinal cord in cats	Spatial organization of direct connections of the sensory motor cortex in cats with the rhombencephalon and spinal cord.
2	comparative characteristics of interneuronal dimensions in the cervical segments of the cat spinal cord	Comparative characteristics of the internaluronal dimensions in the cervical segments of the spinal cord of the cat.
2	cardiovascular actions of prostaglanding f2alpha 15 me f2alpha f1alpha f2beta and f1beta in the cat	Cardiovascular action of f2alpha 15 me f2alpha f1alpha f2beta and f1beta in chat.
2	neuroanatomic projections related to biting attack elicited from ventral midbrain in cats	Neuroanatomical projections related to bite induced in the ventral midbrain of the cats.
3	binding capacity of reductively fragmented antibodies to the 2 4 dinitrophenyl group	Reductively fragmented antibodies binding capacity to the dinitrophenyl group 2.
3	antigens and enzymes made insoluble by entrapping them into lattices of synthetic polymers	Antigen and enzyme are insoluble by trapping them in networks of synthetic polymers.
3	gamma globulins quantitative relationships in human serum and nonvascular fluids	Quantitative ratio of gamma-globulins in human serum to nonvascular fluids.
3	complementary strand association between nucleic acids and nucleic acid gels	Complementary strands between nucleic acids and gels; nucleic acid.
3	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes lability at low temperature	Lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes lability at low temperatures.
3	provitamin a2 from lutein	Lutein provitamin a2.
3	mitomycin c chemical and biological studies on alkylation	Chemical and biological studies of mitomycin c on apos; alkylation.
3	double stranded ribonucleic acid formation in vitro by ms 2 phage induced rna synthetase	In vitro formation of d' phage ms 2 induced rna synthetase double-stranded ribonucleic acid.
3	production of antirenin to homologous renin and its effect of experimental renal hypertension	The production of homologous renin antirenin and its effect on the immune system; experimental renal hypertension.
3	the arrangements of nucleotide sequences in t2 and t5 bacteriophage dna molecules	Organizing the nucleotide sequences in molecules; DNA from bacteriophages t2 and t5.
3	protein polysaccharide in connective tissue inhibition of phase separation	Protein polysaccharide in connective tissue inhibition of the phase separation.
3	microdetermination of calcium and magnesium in biological materials	Microdetermination of calcium and magnesium levels in biological materials.
3	practical human growth hormone preparation and clinical use	Practical preparation of the human growth hormone (HGH) and clinical use.
3	steric factors in the chemistry of polypeptides poly alphaamino acids and proteins	Steric Factors in the Chemistry of Polyalphaamino-Acidic and Protein Polypeptides.
3	preparation of retine from human urine	Preparation of the retina from human urine.
3	a stable substrate for the assay of plasma kinin forming enzymes	A stable substrate for the determination of plasma kinin-forming enzymes.
3	hybridization of half molecules of rabbit gamma globulin	Half hybridization-rabbit gamma globulin molecules.
3	circularity of the replicating form of a single stranded dna virus	Circularity of the replicative form of apos virus; a single DNA-chain virus.
3	hemoglobin solubility and alpha chain structure in crosses between two inbread mouse strains	The solubility of apos; hemoglobin and alpha chain structure in crosses between two lines of selfed mice.
3	identity of tarichatoxin and tetrodotoxin	Identity of the tarichatoxin and tetrodotoxin.
3	alpha chain of human hemoglobin occurrence in vivo	Alpha chain of the presence of apos; human hemoglobin in vivo.
3	actinomycin d as a probe for nucleic acid secondary structure	L' actinomycin d as a probe for the secondary structure of the nucleic acids.
3	actinomycin correlation of structure and function of its complexes with purines and dna	Correlation of the structure and function of the peptide; actinomycin of its complexes with purines and amino acids; DNA.
3	conversion of leucoanthocyanins into the corresponding anthocyanidins	Conversion of leucoanthocyanines into corresponding anthocyanidines.
3	thermal denaturation of collagen in the dispersed and solid state	Collagen thermal denaturation at apos; dispersed and solid state.
3	group specific carbohydrate of group c variant hemolytic streptococci	Group c specific glucides varying the hemolytic streptococci.
3	oxygen stable hemolysins of group a streptococci ii chromatographic and electrophoretic studies	Stable oxygenated group hemolysins have streptococci ii Chromatographic and electrophoretic studies.
3	affinity and phosphorylation constants for the inhibition of esterases by organophosphates	D' affinity and phosphorylation constants for organophosphate inhibition of esterases.
3	intercellular macromolecules containing polysaccharides	Intercellular macromolecules containing cellular polysaccharides.
3	the three dimensional structures of proteins	The three-dimensional structures of proteins.
3	macromolecules origin development significance	Importance of apo development; macromolecular origin for development.
3	guanine formation during the thermal polymerization of amino acids	Guanine formation during thermal polymerization of amino acids.
3	insect chemosterilants with low toxicity for mammals	Apos chemosterilants; insects not very toxic to mammals.
3	sonic energy effects in bovine serum albumin solutions	Effects of apos; sonic energy in apos solutions; bovine serum albumin.
3	immunological and toxic differences between mouse virulent and mouse avirulent candida albicans	Immunological and toxic differences between virulent and avirulent mice, candida albicans.
3	physical surface features and chemical density of dry bacterial spores	Physical characteristics of the surface and chemical density of dry bacterial spores.
3	outstanding characteristics of thrombokinase isolated from bovine plasma	Unique features of the thrombokinase isolated from bovine plasma.
3	new natural growth promoting substances in young citrus fruit	New substances for natural growth in young citrus fruits.
3	invertebrate ferritin occurrence in mollusca	Distribution of invertebrate ferritin in molluscs.
3	cesium 134 in alaskan eskimos and in fallout	Cesium 134 in the Eskimo of Alaska and in fallout.
3	measurement of bone mineral in vivo an improved method	An improved method is the measurement of bone minerals in vivo.
3	an investigation of the electrical conductivity of steroids	This is a study of the electrical conductivity of steroids.
3	linear polymerization of a gastropod hemocyanin	Linear polymerization of gastropod hemocyanine.
3	cortisol from human nerve	Cortisol of the human nerve.
3	feedback control of purified deoxycytidylate deaminase	Retro-control of deoxycytidylate deaminase purified.
3	thiamine a novel conversion from thiochrome	Thiamine is a new conversion from thiochrome.
3	the cytonucleoproteins of amebae i some chemical properties and intracellular distribution	The cytonucleoproteins of the amoebae have certain chemical properties and an intracellular distribution.
3	antibodies to bradykinin and angiotensin a use of carbodiimides in immunology	Antibodies to bradykinin and to l' angiotensin, a use of carbodiimides in immunology.
3	extracellular polysaccharides of azotobacter vinelandii	Soft extracellular polysaccharides; azotobacter vinelandii.
3	lipids of sarcina lutea i fatty acid composition of the extractable lipids	Sarcina lutea lipids i fatty acid composition of extractable lipids.
3	identification of species of actinomyces	Identification of species; actinomyces.
3	some characteristics of streptococcal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotidase and streptolysin o	Characteristics of Streptococcal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotidase and Streptolysin o.
3	the impurity of radioiodinated triolein	L' impurity of triolein radioiodine.
3	oxygen atom reactions with condensed olefins	Reactions of the atoms d' oxygen with condensed olefins.
3	heparinic acids determination of equivalent weights and sulfate to carboxyl ratios	Determination of heparinic acids of equivalent weight and sulfate to carboxyl ratios.
3	nucleic acids a nuclear magnetic resonance study	Nucleic acids, nuclear magnetic resonance study.
3	antigenic structure of the actinomycetales vii chemical and serological similarities of cell walls from 100 actinomycetales strains	Antigenic actinomycetal structure vii chemical and serological similarities of cell walls of 100 strains of d' actinomycetales.
3	alkylation of synthetic polynucleotides	It's called a synthetic polynucleotide alkylation.
3	hydrogen atom thermal parameters	Thermal parameters of the apos; atom d'apos; hydrogen.
3	creative scientists of today	Creative scientists from today.
3	immunoglobulin structure partial amino acid sequence of a bence jones protein	Apos structure; partial immunoglobulin sequence of apos; apos amino acids; a jones bence protein.
3	dna reaction with chloroquine	Reaction of apo; DNA with chloroquine.
3	mercurial induced transformation of myosin prevented by adenosine triphosphate and pyrophosphate	Mercury induces myosin transformation prevented by adenosine triphosphate and pyrophosphate.
3	base specificity in the interaction of polynucleotides with antibiotic drugs	Specificity of bases in the apos; interaction of polynucleotides with antibiotic.
3	cesium 137 in alaskan eskimos	Cesium 137 in the eskimos of l'apos; Alaska.
3	chemical studies on cellular components of bordetella pertussis iii isolation of highly potent toxin from bordetella pertussis	Chemical studies of cellular components of Bordetella pertussis iii isolation of a potent toxin from Bordetella pertussis.
3	immunochemical analysis of human oral strains of fusobacterium and leptotrichia	Immunochemical analysis of human oral strains of fusobacteria and leptotrichies.
3	experimental salmonellosis iii new toxic fraction l obtained from salmonella enteritidis and its immunological properties	Experimental Salmonellosis iii novel toxic fraction l obtained from Salmonella enteritidis and immunological properties.
3	classification of microorganisms by analysis of chemical composition i feasibility of utilizing gas chromatography	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix A. Microelectronics classification@-@ organisms by chemical composition analysis i feasibility of using gas chromatography.
3	fatty acid composition of lipids from streptococcus cremoris and streptococcus lactis var maltigenes	Streptococcus cremoris and streptococcus lactis var maltigenes lipids composed of fatty acids.
3	phenotypic genotypic and chemical changes in starving populations of aerobacter aerogenes	Phenotypic, genotypic, and chemical changes in populations of fasting aerobics.
3	spectrochemical analysis of inorganic elements in bacteria	Spectrochemical analysis of inorganic elements in bacteria.
3	dependence of the content of cell envelopes on the growth rate of bacillus megaterium	The content of the cell envelopes will depend on the growth rate of the megaterium bacillus.
3	capsular polysaccharide of azotobacter agilis	Apos capsular polysaccharide; azotobacter agilis.
3	origin and properties of naturally occurring hapten from escherichia coli	Origin and properties of plants; haptene of plants; natural origin from plants; escherichia coli.
3	differentiation of exotoxin and other biologically active substances in pseudomonas pseudomallei filtrates	The differentiation of exotoxin and other biologically active substances in the filtrates of Pseudomonas pseudomallei.
3	evidence for an exocellular site for the acid phosphatase of saccharomyces mellis	Evidence of an exocellular site for saccharomyces mellis acid phosphatase activity.
3	structure and composition of the bacillus anthracis capsule	Structure and composition of the anthracis bacillus capsule.
3	chemical composition and biological properties of the endotoxin of brucella abortus	Chemical composition and biological properties of endotoxin of brucella abortus.
3	hypoferremia in mice and its application to the bioassay of endotoxin	Hypoferremia in mice, and its application to endotoxin bioassay.
3	mitomycins and porfiromycin chemical mechanism of activation and cross linking of dna	Matiomycins and porfiromycin chemical mechanism of apos; activation and cross-linking of apos; DNA.
3	immunological and biochemical studies on serum haptoglobin	Immunological and biochemical studies on apos; haptoglobin serum.
3	antigenic relationships between groups b and g streptococci	Antigenic interactions between groups b and g Streptococcus.
3	the spectral distribution of firefly light	Spectral distribution of firefly light.
3	nucleic acid homologies of selected bacteria l forms mycoplasma species	Nucleic acid homologies of selected bacteria form species of mycoplasma.
3	lifetime of bacterial messenger ribonucleic acid	Lifetime of Lapos; ribonucleic acid, a bacterial messenger.
3	nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi i ribonucleic acids	The nucleotide composition of the nucleic acids of the fungi i ribonucleic acids.
3	autolytic mechanism for spheroplast formation in bacillus cereus and escherichia coli	Autolytic mechanisms of spheroplast formation in cereus bacillus and l' escherichia coli.
3	myosin substructure isolation of a helical subunit from heavy meromyosin	Isolation of myosin; one sub-helical unit of myosin structure from heavy meromyosin.
3	use of a filter paper disk assay in the measurement of lipid biosynthesis	Using a filter paper disk test to measure lipid biosynthesis.
3	synthesis of fatty acid anhydrides by reaction with dicyclohexylcarbodiimide	D&apos synthesis; d&apos anhydrides; fatty acids by reaction with dicyclohexylcarbodiimide.
3	radiation chemical oxidation of peptides in the solid state	Peptide radiation chemical oxidation at the apos; solid state.
3	the crystal and molecular structure of 5 fluro 2 deoxy beta uridine	Crystal and molecular structure of 5 fluro 2 beta uridine deoxy.
3	some properties of the rhodanese system of thiobacillus denitrificans	Some of the properties of the rhodanese system of thiobacillus denitrificans.
3	cysteine in calf thymus histones	Cysteine in the calf thymus histones.
3	the hypobranchial mucin of the whelk buccinum undatum l properties of the mucin and of the glycoprotein component	The hypobranchial mucin of the undatum whelk mucin and the glycoprotein component.
3	the molecular structure of bacterial walls the size of ribitol teichoic acids and the nature of their linkage to glycosaminopeptides	The bacterial cell wall molecular structure, the size of ribitol teichoic acids, and the nature of their binding to glycosaminopeptides.
3	purification and properties of coproporphyrinogenase	Purification and the properties of coproporphyrinogenase.
3	isolation of a naphthaquinone with partly hydrogenated side chain from corynebacterium diphtheriae	Naphthaquinone with a partially hydrogenated side chain from corynebacterium diphtheriae.
3	the origins of tannins and flavonoids in black wattle barks and heartwoods and their associated non tannin components	Origins of tannins and flavonoids in black baleen bark and heartwood and their associated non-tannin components.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group g o 13 22 lipopolysaccharides	Salmonella chemotype immunochemistry antigens the structure of salmonella group g o 1322 lipopolysaccharide oligosaccharides.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group n o 30 lipopolysaccharides	L' immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype antigens the structure of 30 lipopolysaccharide lipopolysaccharide salmonella group oligosaccharides.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group u o 43 lipopolysaccharides	Immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype antigens the structure of salmonella oligosaccharides group u o 43 lipopolysaccharides.
3	isolation of a peroxidatically active product from the peptic digest of ox liver catalase and some of its properties	Isolate a peroxidant-active product from the peptic digestion of beef liver catalase and certain of its properties.
3	differences in cattle globins	Differences in bovine globins.
3	catalase kinetics of photooxidation	Catalase kinetics of photooxidation.
3	hybridization experiments evidence of dissociation equilibrium in hemerythrin	Dapos; hybridization experiments have revealed a dissociation equilibrium in haemerythrin.
3	comparison of messenger rna in photoperiodically induced and noninduced xanthium buds	Comparison of messenger rna in photoperiod-induced and nonphotoperiod-induced xanthium buds.
3	variation in density and transformation potential in deoxyribonucleic acid from neisseria meningitidis	Variation in the density and transformation potential of l' deoxyribonucleic acid of Neisseria meningitidis.
3	ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus i measurement of glyoxylate and enzyme purification	Streptococcus allantoicus ureidoglycolate synthetase measures glyoxylate and purifies the enzyme.
3	ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus ii properties of the enzyme and reaction equilibrium	Streptococcus allantoicus ureidoglycolate synthetase ii properties of enzymes; enzyme and reaction; equilibrium.
3	mode of inhibition of diphtheria toxin by ammonium chloride	Modes of death; inhibition of diphtheria toxin by d*apos chloride; ammonium.
3	trehalose as an endogenous reserve in spores of the fungus myrothecium verrucaria	Trehalose as endogenous reserve in spores of myrothecium verrucaria.
3	use of secondary data in numerical taxonomy of the genus erwinia	Use of secondary data in the numerical taxonomy of the genus erwinia.
3	polysaccharide lipid complexes from veillonella parvula	Vella parvula polysaccharide lipid complexes.
3	trehalase from dictyostelium discoideum purification and properties	Trehalase from the purification and properties of dictyostelium discoideum.
3	clinical evaluation of brinaldix a new oral diuretic	Clinical evaluation of a novel oral diuretic for brine.
3	microbial degradation of corrinoids 3 pigments derived from vitamin b12 by pseudomonas rubescens	Microbial degradation of the corrinoids 3 pigments derived from vitamin b12 per pseudomonas rubescens.
3	in vitro inhibition of diphtheria toxin action by ammonium salts and amines	In vitro, l' inhibition of l' action of diphtheria toxin by salts d' ammonia and amines.
3	electrical impedance of isolated amnion	Electrical failure of isolated amnion.
3	changes in fungi with age chemical composition of rhizoctonia solani and sclerotium bataticola	Changes in the chemical composition of rhizoctonia solani and sclerotia bataticola as a function of age in fungi.
3	nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi ii deoxyribonucleic acids	Nucleic acid composition of fungi ii Deoxyribonucleic acids.
3	thermostability of bacillus cereus penicillinase	The thermostability of cereus cereus bacillus penicillinase.
3	ribonucleic acid and ribosomes of bacillus stearothermophilus	Ribonucleic acid and ribosomes of the bacterium stearothermophilus.
3	effect of light intensity on the formation of the photochemical apparatus in the green bacterium chloropseudomonas ethylicum	Effect of apos; light intensity on apos formation; photochemical apparatus in the green bacterium chloropseudomonas ethylicum.
3	beta hemolytic gram negative hemophilic bacillus isolated from the genitalia of rabbits	Hemophilic beta bacillus-hemolytic Gram negative isolated from genital organs of rabbits.
3	amino acid changes provoked by streptomycin in a polypeptide synthesized in vitro	Changes in amino acids induced by streptomycin in an in vitro synthesized polypeptide.
3	charge transfer self complex formed by 8 azaguanine	Auto-charge transfer complex formed by azaguanine 8.
3	prostaglandins in human seminal plasma prostaglandins and related factors 46	Prostaglandins and related factors in human seminal plasma prostaglandins 46.
3	a bacteriological study of non chromogenic variants of serratia marcescens from human sources	A bacteriological study of nonchromogenic variants of serratia marcescens d' origin of man.
3	release of formaldehyde from polynoxylin and noxythiolin	Release of formaldehyde from polynoxyline and polynoxyline.
3	serial laboratory reports and records for chemical analyses	Laboratory reports and serial records for chemical analysis.
3	cumulative reporting of chemical pathology	Cumulative report on chemical pathology.
3	exchange of carbon bound hydrogen atoms ortho to the hydroxyl group in tyrosine	In addition, it has been shown that the hydrogen bonded to the hydroxyl group in tyrosine is the only hydrogen bonded to the carbon bond.
3	sodium sulphomethyl derivatives of polymyxins	Sulfomethylated sodium derivatives of polymyxins.
3	nuclear dna and cytoplasmic dna from tissues of higher plants	Nuclear DNA and cytoplasmic DNA from the tissues of the higher plants.
3	the isolation of retinal outer segment fragments	Isolation of fragments from the outer segment of the retina.
3	immunoglobulin structure amino and carboxyl terminal peptides of type i bence jones proteins	The structure of the apos; immunoglobulin peptides amino and carboxyl terminals of proteins of type i bence jones.
3	intermolecular forces in association of purines with polybenzenoid hydrocarbons	Intermolecular forces in the association of the purines with the polybenzenoid hydrocarbons.
3	synthesis of block oligonucleotides	D&apos synthesis; block oligonucleotides.
3	the natural history of oxygen	L' natural history of apos; oxygen.
3	radiolysis of estrone and estradiol	Apos radiolysis; estrone and apos; estradiol.
3	the linkage between the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei	Binding between polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei.
3	properties of the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei	Cell wall polysaccharide and mucopeptide properties of lactobacillus casei.
3	tritiated starch granules	Granules d' starch tritiated.
3	ovoglycoprotein a protein of hen s egg white	Ovoglycoprotein, a protein from the egg whites.
3	a comparison of methods for the isolation and fractionation of reticulocyte ribosomes	Comparison of methods of isolation and fractionation of the reticulocyte ribosomes.
3	studies on the metabolism of the protozoa the molecular structure of a starch type polysaccharide from polytoma uvella	Studies of protozoan metabolism, the molecular structure of a starch-like polysaccharide from polytoma uvella.
3	dehydrogenation of androsterone by purified 3 alpha hydroxy steroid dependent nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenating enzyme of rat liver	Key words:apos dehydrogenation; androsterone by apos; andapos transhydrogenation enzyme; nicotinamide-dependent adenine dinucleotide phosphate; and rat liver steroid hydroxy-3 alpha.
3	enzymatic action on the capsular material produced by pseudomonas aeruginosa of cystic fibrosis origin	Enzymatic action on capsular material produced by cystic fibrosis pseudomonas aeruginosa d&apos.
3	observations on the group c streptococcal bacteriophage and lytic enzyme system	Observations on streptococcal bacteriophage of group c and lytic enzyme system.
3	beta hemolytic streptococci with group a and type ii carbohydrate antigens	Hemolytic beta streptococci with group a and type ii glucidic antigens.
3	preparation of steroid structural data for the consideration of possible structural functional relationships	Preparation of steroid structure data for consideration of possible structural functional relationships.
3	the clinical significance of elevated blood lactate	L' clinical importance of; high blood lactate concentration.
3	relation between optical configuration and immunogenicity of synthetic polypeptides	Relationship between optical configuration and apos; immunogenicity of synthetic polypeptides.
3	the partial acid hydrolysis of a highly dextrorotatory fragment of the cell wall of aspergillus niger isolation of the alpha 1 3 linked dextrin series	L' partial acid hydrolysis of d' a highly dextrator fragment of the d&apos cell wall; isolated aspergillus niger from the alpha-1 bound dextrin series.
3	ribonucleic acids from barley leaves	Ribonucleic acids (RACs) from leaf tissue; barley.
3	natural and synthetic diastereoisomeric 3 4 7 trihydroxyflavan 3 4 diols	Diastereoisomer, natural and synthetic 3, 4, 7 trihydroxyflavane 3, 4 diols.
3	the isolation of structural components present in the cell wall of bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346	Isolation of structural components in the cell wall of licheniformis n c t c 6346.
3	the interaction of collagen and acid mucopolysaccharides a model for connective tissue	The interaction of collagen and acid mucopolysaccharides is a model for connective tissue.
3	structural studies of alpha crystallin	Structural studies of crystalline alfa.
3	the mechanism of the periodate thiobarbituric acid reaction of sialic acids	The mechanism of the reaction of periodic thiobarbituric acid with sialic acid.
3	the swelling of bovine ligamentum nuchae as a function of ph	The swelling of the ligamentum nuchae bovine as a function of ph.
3	the structure of the glucuronide of sulphadimethoxine formed in man	The structure of the formed sulfadimethoxine glucuronide in men.
3	the fluorescence of some biphenyl derivatives	Fluorescence of some biphenyl derivatives.
3	indole compounds isolation from pineal tissue	L' indole is isolated from pineal tissue.
3	histone regulation of lactic dehydrogenase in embryonic chick brain tissue	Regulation of lactic dehydrogenase histones in embryonic brain tissue of chickens.
3	the isolation and properties of epithelial cell ghosts from rat small intestine	Isolation and properties of phantom epithelial cells of rat small intestine.
3	peptide synthesis from amino acids in aqueous solution	Peptide synthesis from amino acids in aqueous solution.
3	dicyandiamide possible role in peptide synthesis during chemical evolution	Dicyandiamide may also play a role in peptide synthesis during the chemical evolution.
3	glycerinated skeletal and smooth muscle calcium and magnesium dependence	Calcium and magnesium dependence of glycerin-induced skeletal and smooth muscles.
3	peptides attached to thrombin their influence on proteolysis	Thrombin-bound peptides have been shown to influence proteolysis.
3	hybrid antibody molecules with allotypically different l polypeptide chains	D&apos molecules; hybrid antibodies with allotypically different chains of polypeptides.
3	phospholipid and nucleic acid gradients in the developing amphibian embryo	The gradients of phospholipids and d' nucleic acids in the embryo; developing amphibian.
3	the preparation and properties of bacterial chromatophore fractions	Preparation and properties of bacterial chromatophore fractions.
3	deamination of 4 aminopyrimidine nucleosides by extracts of rye grass lolium perenne	Deamination of 4 aminopyrimidine nucleosides by rye lolium perenne extracts.
3	sap concentrations in halophytes and some other plants	Sap concentrations in halophytes and other plants.
3	the phosphorylated intermediate in the phosphoglyceromutase reaction	L' phosphorylated intermediate in the reaction of phosphoglyceromutase.
3	purification of beta acetylglucosaminase and beta galactosidase from ram testis	Purification of the beta acetylglucosaminase and beta galactosidase from the sheep testicles.
3	the chemical synthesis and biological oxidation of 7 alpha hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol 7 dehydro 26 14c cholesterol and 26 hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol	Chemical synthesis and biological oxidation of 7 alpha hydroxy 26c cholesterol 7 dehydro 26c cholesterol, and 26 hydroxy 26c 14c cholesterol.
3	the preparation and properties of ficin chemically attached to carboxymethylcellulose	Preparation and properties of fiber chemically attached to carboxymethylcellulose.
3	fluorescence studies on some hydroxypyridines including compounds of the vitamin b6 group	Fluorescence studies on some hydroxypyridines including vitamin b6 compounds.
3	a new flavan 3 4 diol from acacia auriculiformis by paper ionophoresis	A new flavan 3-4 diol d' acacia auriculiformis by ionophoresis on paper.
3	the determination of the substitution achieved at the alpha amino epsilon amino and imidazole groups of proteins with special reference to derivatives of gelatin	Substitution determination at the alpha group level-amino-epsilon-amino and imidazole protein level with special reference to gelatin derivatives.
3	the hypobranchial mucin of the whelk buccinum undatum l the polysaccharide sulphate component	Hypobranchial mucin of the whelk, buccinum undatum l the polysaccharide sulfate component.
3	characterization of ribonucleases and ribonuclease inhibitor in subcellular fractions from rat adrenals	Characterization of ribonucleases and ribonuclease inhibitors in subcellular fractions of rat adrenals.
3	electrophoretic and other studies on haem pigments from rhodopseudomonas palustris cytochrome 552 and cytochromoid c	Electrophoretic and other studies on the liver and kidney pigments; cytochrome 552 hematoma of Rhodopseudomonas palustris and cytochromoid c.
3	proteins and disulfide groups in the aggregation of dissociated cells of sea sponges	Proteins and disulfide groups in appos; aggregation of dissociated cells from marine sponges.
3	the electron microscopic localization of cholinesterase activity in the central nervous system of an insect periplaneta americana 1	Electron microscopy localization of cholinesterase activity in the central nervous system of apos; an insect, periplaneta americana 1.
3	predicting production in light limited continuous cultures of algae	Light production prediction limited continuous culture of algae.
3	geosmin an earthly smelling substance isolated from actinomycetes	Geosmin is earth-smelling and is isolated from the actinomycetes.
3	disulfide bond cleavage and formation in proteins	Disulfide bond cleavage and protein formation.
3	heat labile antigens of salmonella enteritidis i extraction of antigens	Salmonella enteritidis antigens have been found to be antigenic.
3	soluble antigens of vaccinia infected mammalian cells i separation of virus induced soluble antigens into two classes on the basis of physical characteristics	Soluble antigens from virus separation infected mammalian cells induced soluble antigens into two classes based on physical characteristics.
3	components required for the formation of ch 4 from methylcobalamin by extracts of methanobacillus omelianskii	Components necessary for the formation of ch 4 from methylcobalamine extracts of methanobacillus omelianskii.
3	comparison of two serologically distinct ribonucleic acid bacteriophages ii properties of the nucleic acids and coat proteins	Comparison of two bacteriophages d'apos; serologically distinct ribonucleic acid ii properties of the nucleic acids and the coat proteins.
3	isolation and morphology of temperature agrobacterium tumefaciens bacteriophage	Isolation and morphology of agrobacterium tumefaciens temperature bacteriophage.
3	crystal and molecular structure of a phospholipid component l alpha glycerophosphorylcholine cadmium chloride trihydrate	Crystalline and molecular structure d' a phospholipid compound, cadmium chloride trihydrate, alpha glycerophosphorylcholine.
3	thymine addition to ethanol induction by gamma irradiation	L' addition of thymine to apos; induction of apos; ethanol by gamma irradiation causes apos; addition of thymine to apos; ethanol.
3	enzymatic synthesis of tri and tetranucleotides of defined sequence	Enzyme synthesis of defined sequence sorting and tetranucleotides.
3	papain membrane on a collodion matrix preparation and enzymic behavior	Papain membrane on a collodion matrix preparation and enzymatic behavior. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/hc-sc.
3	the growth of a laboratory	The growth and development of a laboratory.
3	deamino oxytocin and 1 gamma mercaptobutyric acid oxytocin x ray crystallographic data	X-ray crystallographic data for apo; deamino and apo oxytocin; gamma oxytocin 1 of apos; and mercaptobutyric acid.
3	purification of a salt requiring enzyme from an obligately halophilic bacterium	Purification of a salt that requires a halophilic salt; a halophilic enzyme; a mandatory halophilic bacteria.
3	influence of deoxyribonucleic acid degradation products and orthophosphate on deoxynucleotide kinase activity and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in pneumococcus type 3	Impact of apo degradation products; deoxyribonucleic acid and apos; apos orthophosphate; deoxynucleotide kinase activity and synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid in type 3 pneumococcus.
3	isolation and characterization of the cyanide resistant and azide resistant catalase of lactobacillus plantarum	Isolation and characterization of cyanide-resistant and phosphate-resistant lactobacillus plantarum catalase; azide.
3	enzymatic deacylation of s35 benzylpenicillin	An enzyme-linked deacylation of benzylpenicillin s35.
3	conservation of ribosomal and messenger ribonucleic acid cistrons in bacillus species	Conservation of ribosomal cistrons and apos messengers; ribonucleic acid in species of bacilli.
3	corroboration of recent models of the gamma g immunoglobulin molecule	Confirmation of recent models of gamma immunoglobulin g.
3	chain initiation and control of protein synthesis	Chain initiation and control of synthesis.
3	native and renatured transfer ribonucleic acid	Transfer the apos; ribonucleic acid to the apos; native or renatured state.
3	the role of carbonium ions in color reception	Role of carbonium ions in color reception.
3	lysis of bacterial cell walls by an enzyme isolated from a myxobacter	Lysation of the bacterial cell walls by an enzyme isolated from d' a myxobacterium.
3	agar gel precipitin inhibition technique for c reactive protein determinations 3 quantitation of c reactive protein in serum specimens	Procedure for the determination of reactive c protein 3 quantitation of reactive c protein in serum samples.
3	alpha sarcin a new antitumor agent i isolation purification chemical composition and the identity of a new amino acid	Alpha sarcin, a new anti-tumor agent for chemical purification of apos; isolation and apos; identity of apos; a new amino acid.
3	removal of plant nutrients by means of aerobic stabilization of sludge	Removal of plant nutrients through aerobic sludge stabilization.
3	allomorphic forms of bacteriophage phix 174 replicative dna	Allomorphic forms of phix-like bacteriophage 174 replicative DNA.
3	physicochemical and biological studies on various preparations of tuberculin purified protein derivative	Physico-chemical and biological studies of various tuberculin purified protein derivative preparations.
3	detection of staphylococcal enterotoxin in food	Detection of apo; staphylococcal enterotoxins in foods.
3	chemical composition of cell wall preparations from strains of various form genera of aerobic actinomycetes	Chemical composition of cell wall preparations of various genera of aerobic actinomycete forms.
3	in vitro and in vivo laboratory evaluation of cephaloglycin and cephaloridine	Laboratory in vitro and in vivo evaluation of cephaloglycine and cephaloridin.
3	cytochemical localization of acid phosphatases in euglena gracilis	Cytochemical localization of acid phosphatases in euglena gracilis.
3	lysosomal fractions from transitional epithelium	Lysosomal fractions of the apos; transitional epithelium.
3	localization of the succinic dehydrogenase system in escherichia coli using combined techniques of cytochemistry and electron microscopy	Localization of the succinic dehydrogenase system in escherichia coli by combined cytochemistry and electron microscopy.
3	the alpha chymotryptic ydrolysis of glycine esters	Chymotryptic ydrolysis alpha of glycine esters.
3	nzymic conversion of 3 hydroxyanthranilic acid into cinnabarinic acid partial purification and properties of ra liver cinnabarinate synthase	Nzymic conversion of hydroxyanthranilic acid 3 to cinnabarinic acid partial purification and liver cinnabarinate synthase properties.
3	interactions of calf thymus histone fractions in aqueous solution with 8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonic acid	Interactions of histone fractions of calf thymus in aqueous solution with 8 anilinononaphthalene 1 sulfonic acid.
3	studies on glycopeptides deried from acidic glycoproteins of guinea pig serum	Glycopeptide studies are derived from acidic guinea pig serum glycoproteins.
3	deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase from landsch tz ascites tumour cells	L' nucleotid deoxyribonucleic acid, nucleotidyltransferase from cancer cells; ascites tz landch.
3	the preparation of adenosine 5 pyrophosphate by a non enzymic method	Preparation of d&apos pyrophosphate and adenosine 5 by a non-enzymatic method.
3	bitter peptide isolated from milk cultures of streptococcus cremoris	Bitter peptide isolated from cultures of milk of streptococci cremoris.
3	sensitivity of mixed populations of staphylococcus aureus and escherichia coli to mercurials	Sensitivity of mixed populations of Staphylococcus aureus and Escherichia coli to mercurial agents.
3	metabolism of barbital by streptomyces mediterranei	Barbital metabolism by streptomyces mediterranei.
3	the pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a mercury activated exopolygalacturonase	The pectic enzymes of the apos; aspergillus niger a activate the apos; exopolygalacturonase by mercury.
3	the pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a second exopolygalacturonase	The pectic enzymes of l' aspergillus niger a second exopolygalacturonase.
3	enzymic hydrolysis of barley and other beta glucans by a beta 1 4 glucan hydrolase	Enzyme hydrolysis of barley and d' other beta-glucans via beta- 1-4 glucan-hydrolase.
3	lipids of sarcina lutea 3 composition of the complex lipids	sarcina lutea 3 lipids, complex lipid composition.
3	nitrogen containing and carbohydrate containing antigen from actinomyces bovis	Antigen containing nitrogen and nitrogen; antigen containing carbohydrates from apos; actinomyces bovis.
3	a study of immunoglobulin structure ii the comparison of bence jones proteins by peptide mapping	A study of the structure of immunoglobulin ii the comparison of proteins bence jones by peptide mapping.
3	c glycosylflavonoids the chemistry of aspalathin	C-glycosylflavonoids the chemistry of aspalathin.
3	magnesium ions and the structure of escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acid	The magnesium ions and their structure; ribosomal ribosomal ribonucleic acid; escherichia coli.
3	the biological activity of subfragment 1 prepared from heavy meromyosin	L' biological activity of sub--fragment 1, prepared from heavy meromyosin.
3	the isolation and properties of delta tocotrienol from hevea latex	Isolation and properties of delta tocotrienol de l' latex rubber.
3	the role of shikimic acid in the biosynthesis of vitamin k2	The role of vitamin K2 in the biosynthesis of vitamin C is discussed below.
3	conformational changes in sperm whale metmyoglobin due to combination with antibodies to apomyoglobin	Conformational changes in sperm whale metamyoglobin due to the combination of antibodies to apos, apomyoglobin and dapos, antibodies to apos.
3	comparative studies of bile salts myxinol disulphate the principal bile salt of hagfish myxinidae	Comparative Studies of Bile Salts Myxinol disulfate is the major bile salt of hagfish myxinids.
3	nuclear magnetic resonance and mass spectral study of myxinol tetra acetate	Nuclear magnetic resonance and mass spectrometry study of l' tetra acetate,-myxinol.
3	amino acid incorporation by cell fractions from the oviduct of the laying hen and the synthesis of egg white proteins	Amino acid incorporation by cellular fractions of egg cells; laying hen oviduct and egg white protein synthesis.
3	the purification and properties of nitrite reductase from higher plants and its dependence on ferredoxin	Purification and properties of nitrite reductase of higher plants and dependence on apos with respect to ferredoxin.
3	the kinetics and mechanism of liver alcohol dehydrogenase with primary and secondary alcohols as substrates	The kinetics and mechanism of dehydrogenase of l' hepatic alcohol with primary and secondary alcohols as substrates.
3	the antigen binding capacity of the peptide chains of horse antibodies	The antigenic binding capacity of horse antibody peptide chains.
3	the relation of 3 deoxy 2 oxo octonate to the serological and physical properties of a lipopolysaccharide from a rough strain of escherichia coli	The relationship between 3 deoxyoxo-oxo-octonate and the serological and physical properties of a lipopolysaccharide from apos; a rough strain from apos; and Escherichia coli.
3	the identification of the antimicrobial factors of the stomach contents of sucking rabbits	Identification of antimicrobial factors in stomach contents of sucker rabbits.
3	influence of diet on the composition of plasma cholesterol esters in man	Diet influences the composition of plasma cholesterol esters in men.
3	characterization of trisubstituted cholanoic acids in human feces	Characterization of trisubstituted cholanoic acids in human feces.
3	carboxylic ester hydrolases of rat pancreatic juice	Hydrolases d' carboxylic esters of rat pancreatic juice.
3	simple charring method for determination of lipids	A simple method of charring for the determination of lipids.
3	sequential primary and secondary shunt metabolism in penicillium chrysogenum	Primary and secondary sequential metabolism of penicillium chrysogenum shunt.
3	a specific sucrose phosphatase from plant tissues	Sucrose specific phosphatase from plant tissue.
3	the glycerol teichoic acid from the cell wall of bacillus stearothermophilus b65	Tichoic glycerol from the cell wall of stearothermophilus b65.
3	some observations on the behaviour of hypothalamic enzymes during the time of blastocyst implantation in the rabbit	Some observations on the behavior of hypothalamic enzymes during blastocyst implantation in rabbits.
3	the fate of di 3 5 di tert butyl 4 hydroxyphenyl methane ionox 22 in the rat	The fate of di 3-5 di tert-butyl 4 hydroxyphenylmethane ionox 22 in the rat.
3	adenosine 5 triphosphate arginine phosphotransferase from lobster muscle molecular weight	Adenosine 5 triphosphate arginine phosphotransferase from the molecular weight of the lobster muscle.
3	the biochemistry of aromatic amines 2 formamido 1 naphthyl hydrogen sulphate a metabolite of 2 naphthylamine	The biochemistry of aromatic amines 2 formamido 1 naphthyl sulfate d' a 2-naphthylamine metabolite.
3	a study of the reaction catalysed by the liver branching enzyme	A study of the reaction process catalyzed by liver branching enzyme etapos.
3	some rate constants for the phenazine methosulphate catalysed oxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Some rate constants for phenazine methosulfate catalyze epos; reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidation.
3	the esterase and depsidase activities of tannase	L' esterase and tannase depidase activity.
3	the synthesis of amino acids by methanobacterium omelianskii	Synthesis of amino acids by methanobacterium omelianskii.
3	interactions of proteins with other polyelectrolytes in a two phase system containing phenol and aqueous buffers at various ph values	The interaction of proteins with d' other polyelectrolytes in a two-phase system containing phenol and aqueous buffers at various pH values.
3	interaction of aspartate aminotransferase with amino acids	Apos interaction; aspartate aminotransferase with amino acids.
3	solution photochemistry of thymine and uracil	Thymine and uracil photochemistry in solution.
3	the formation of peptides with uterine activity from ovine human and bovine growth hormones and from bovine and ovine lactogenic hormones	Formation of peptides with uterine activity from human and bovine ovine and d&apos growth hormones; bovine and ovine lactogenic hormones.
3	psilocybin reaction with a fraction of rat brain	Reaction of psilocybin with a fraction of the brain of the rat.
3	enzyme action comparison on soluble and insoluble substrate	Comparison of l' enzymatic action on soluble and insoluble substrates.
3	stable complex of fibrinogen and fibrin	Stable fibrinogen and fibrinin complex.
3	naturally occurring anhydrovitamin a2 transformation into retinene	Natural conversion of l' anhydrovitamin a2 to retino.
3	the kinetics of papain and ficin catalysed hydrolyses in the presence of alcohols	The kinetics of papain- and ficin-catalyzed hydrolyses in the presence of alcohols.
3	optical and chemical identification of kinetic steps in trypsin and chymotrypsin catalysed reactions	L' optical and chemical identification of kinetic steps in the trypsin- and chymotrypsin-catalyzed reactions.
3	urinary screening tests in the prevention of mental deficiency	Urinary screening tests in prevention of mental disability.
3	drosophila phenol oxidases	The Drosophila phenol oxidases.
3	identification of mono and dihydroxy bile acids in human feces by gas liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry	Identification of the mono- and dihydroxy acids-biliary in human feces by liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry.
3	the lysis of cell walls of group a streptococci by streptomyces albus enzyme treated with diisopropyl fluorophosphate characteristics of the lytic reaction and the soluble cell wall fragments	The lysis of the cell walls of group A streptococci by the albus streptomyces enzyme treated with the diisopropyl fluorophosphate characteristics of the lytic reaction and the soluble fragments of the cell wall.
3	u 21 963 a new antibiotic ii isolation and characterization	A new antibiotic product, 21-963: isolation and characterization.
3	thyroxine interaction with actinomycin d and possible biological implications	Interaction of thyroxine with d-actinomycin and possible biological implications.
3	partial purification of monoglyceride lipase from adipose tissue	Partial purification of the monoglyceride lipase from adipose tissue.
3	lipid monolayers action of phospholipase a of crotalus atrox and naja naja venoms on phosphatidyl choline and phosphatidal choline	L' action of lipid monolayers of phospholipase has venoms of crotalus atrox and naja naja on phosphatidylcholine and choline phosphatidale.
3	synthesis and characterization of 1 and 2 monoglycerides of anteiso fatty acids	Synthesis and characterization of the monoglycerides 1 and 2 of the aniso fatty acids.
3	forms of human serum high density lipoprotein protein	Protein forms of high-density human serum lipoproteins.
3	composition and properties of a cell membrane fraction from the polymorphonuclear leucocyte	Composition and properties of a cellular membrane fraction derived from polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
3	nucleotide synthesis under possible primitive earth conditions	Nucleotide synthesis under possible conditions of primitive Earth.
3	radiolysis of thymine in aqueous solutions change in site of attack with change in ph	The radiolysis of thymine in aqueous solution will change site d' attacks with the ph change.
3	chemistry of antibiotics from micromonospora 3 isolation and characterization of everninomicin d and b	Chemistry of antibiotics from the apos; isolation of micromonospores 3 and characterization of everninomicins d and b.
3	physical and topological properties of circular dna	Physical and topological properties of the apos; circular DNA.
3	some properties of dna from phage infected bacteria	Certain properties of the bacterium; phage-infected bacterial DNA.
3	the structure and function of the dna from bacteriophage lambda	The structure and function of the DNA of the lambda bacteriophage.
3	the enzymatic phosphorylation of nucleic acids and its application to end group analysis	Enzyme phosphorylation of nucleic acids and its application to end-group analysis.
3	recovery of antibody activity from inactive hybrids of h and l chains	Recovery of antibody levels; antibody activity in inactive h-chain and l-chain hybrids.
3	c 1 esterase effect on activity and physicochemical properties of the fourth component of complement	Apos effect; esterase c 1 on apos activity and physical properties-chemicals of the fourth component of the complement.
3	the cyst wall of colpoda steinii a substance rich in glutamic acid residues	The cyst wall of colpoda steinii was found to be a substance rich in d' glutamic acid.
3	a new derivative of vitamin c and its application to the synthesis of labelled ascorbic acid	A novel vitamin c derivative and its application to the synthesis of labelled ascorbic acid.
3	the structure and deposition of human liver glycogens	The structure and deposition of glycogen in human liver.
3	toxic fluorine compounds the use of the omega fluorine atom in the study of the metabolism of fatty acids containing ethyl n propyl and isopropyl branches	Poisonous fluoride compound; use of the omega fluorine atom in appos; study of ethyl propyl and isopropyl fatty acid metabolism.
3	studies of the proteins peptides and free amino acids of mature bovine enamel	Studies of protein peptides and free amino acids in mature bovine enamel.
3	the isolation and partial characterization of glycolipids of normal human leucocytes	Isolation and partial characterization of normal human leukocyte glycolipids.
3	the proteolysis of immunoglobulin g with long acting thyroid stimulating activity	Proteolysis of l' immunoglobulin g with prolonged, stimulating thyroid activity.
3	the hatching factor of the potato root eelworm	Factor; potato worm hatching; potato root eel.
3	dealkylation studies on inhibited acetylcholinesterase	Inhibited etapos; acetylcholinesterase dealkylation studies were performed.
3	lipids of debaryomyces hansenii	Debaryomyces hansenii lipids.
3	comparision of soluble reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidases from cells and spores of clostridium botulinum	Comparison of soluble nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidases of clostridium botulinum cells and spores.
3	reoviruses ii structure and composition of the virion	Reovirus ii. structure and composition of the virus.
3	fine structure of the coat and nucleoid material of fowlpox virus	Fine structure of the egg sac; egg sac and nucleoid material of the avian smallpox virus.
3	enzymatic hydrolysis of yeast cell walls i isolation of wall decomposing organisms and separation and purification of lytic enzymes	Enzymatic hydrolysis of yeast cell walls, isolation of cell wall decomposing organisms, and separation and purification of lytic enzymes.
3	solubilization of native and derived forms of cellulose by cell free microbial enzymes	Solubilization of native and cellulose-derived forms by cell-free microbial enzymes.
3	physical properties of single and double stranded coliphage ribonucleic acid	Physical properties of l' single- and double-stranded ribonucleic acid.
3	the formation of 2 hydroxypropylmercapturic acid from 1 halogenopropanes in the rat	The formation of 2 hydroxypropylmercapturic acids from 1 halopropane in the rat.
3	separation of water soluble n 2 4 dinitrophenylamino acids	Separation of dinitrophenylamino acids 2-4 soluble in water.
3	the metabolism of the isomeric decalones	The metabolism of isomeric decalones.
3	the metabolism of cis and trans decalin	The metabolism of both the cis- and trans-decalin.
3	citrate and the regulation of adipose tissue phosphofructokinase	Citrate and regulation of fat-tissue phosphofructokinase.
3	vitamin k and oxidative phosphorylation	Vitamin k and oxidative phosphorylation.
3	components of the cell wall of clostridium welchii type a	Components of the cell wall of Clostridium welchii type a.
3	substrate activation and inhibition in coenzyme substrate reactions cyclohexanol oxidation catalysed by liver alcohol dehydrogenase	L' activation and l' substrate inhibition in coenzyme reactions; hepatic cyclohexanol oxidation; hepatic alcohol dehydrogenase.
3	fibrinogen from human plasma preparation by precipitation with heavy metal coordination complex	Precipitation fibrillogen of human plasma preparation with heavy metal coordination complex.
3	mechanism of tryptic activation of clostridium botulinum type e toxin	Follow-up mechanisms; tryptic activation of clostridium botulinum toxin type e.
3	hydrogen bonded dimers of adenine and uracil derivatives	Hydrogen bonded dimers of the derivatives of adenos; adenine and uracil.
3	effect of diet upon intestinal disaccharidases and disaccharide absorption	Effect of diet on the intestinal disaccharidases and l' disaccharide absorption.
3	the conversion of c is to c 1 esterase by plasmin and trypsin	Conversion of c to c 1 esterase by plasmin and trypsin.
3	formation and functional significance of a molecular complex derived from the second and the fourth component of human complement	Formation and functional importance of d&apos, a molecular complex derived from the second and fourth complement components.
3	optical rotatory dispersion circular dichroism and far ultraviolet spectra of avidin and streptavidin	Circular rotational optical scattering and remote ultraviolet spectra of the apos; avidin and streptavidin.
3	the kinetics of carboxymethylcellulose ficin in packed beds	The kinetics of carboxymethylcellulose in crowded beds are similar.
3	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 10a 34 structure of the dephosphorylated repeating unit	Types specific pneumococcus type 10a 34 structure of the dephosphorylated repeat unit.
3	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 10a 34 the phosphodiester linkages	Pneumococcal type 10a 34 specific substance, phosphodiester bonds.
3	specificity and mechanism of tetracycline resistance in a multiple drug resistant strain of escherichia coli	Specificity and mechanism of tetracycline resistance in a multidrug-resistant strain of Escherichia coli.
3	heat inactivation of the relaxing site of actomyosin prevention and reversal with dithiothreitol	Heat inactivation of the prevention and d&apos relaxant site; dithiothreitol reversal of the apos; actomyosin.
3	hydrolysis of synthetic esters by the antibacterial agent in serum	Hydrolysis of apos; synthetic esters by apos; antibacterial agents in serum.
3	influence of calcium cholesterol and unsaturation on lecithin monolayers	Influence of calcium cholesterol and apos; lecithin monolayer unsaturation.
3	gas liquid chromatography of 2 chloroethyl esters using a detector specific for halogens	Chromatography of 2 chloroethyl esters in the liquid phase; a specific detector for halogens.
3	photooxidation of hydrocarbons in the presence of aliphatic aldehydes	Photooxidation of hydrocarbons in the presence of aliphatic hydrocarbons.
3	ultraviolet irradiation of dna in vitro and in vivo produces a 3d thymine derived product	Lapos; apo irradiation; apo ultraviolet; in vitro and in vivo DNA produces a thymine-derived product 3d.
3	oxygenation properties of snake hemoglobin	Properties; oxygenation; haemoglobin of snake.
3	aflatoxin production and degradation by aspergillus flavus in 20 liter fermentors	Production and degradation of apos; aflatoxin by aspergillus flavus in 20-litre fermenters.
3	gamma a cold agglutinin importance of disulfide bonds in activity and structure	Cold gamma agglutinin importance of disulfide bonds within the activity and structure.
3	comparative effects of corticosteroids on host resistance to infection in relation to chemical structure	Comparative effects of corticosteroids on cell resistance; host to apos; infection in relation to chemical structure.
3	complement as a mediator of inflammation ii biological properties of anaphylatoxin prepared with purified components of human complement	Complement as mediator of the inflammation ii The biological properties of the anaphylatoxin prepared with purified components of the human complement.
3	nonthrombogenic plastic surfaces	The plastic non-hrombogens surfaces are plastic.
3	pathway of cholesterol biosynthesis in the brain of the neonatal rat	A pathway for cholesterol biosynthesis in the neonatal rat brain.
3	role of plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase in the metabolism of high density lipoproteins	Role of plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase in high density lipoprotein metabolism.
3	effects of dietary phytol and phytanic acid in animals	Effects of food phytol and plant acid on animals.
3	starch gel electrophoresis of human tissue enzymes which hydrolyze l leucyl beta naphthylamide	Apos gel electrophoresis; human tissue enzymes that hydrolyze leucyl beta naphthylamide.
3	d lactate dehydrogenase in lower fungi	Lactate dehydrogenase in lower fungi.
3	protective action of polycyclic hydrocarbons against induction of adrenal necrosis by dimethylbenzanthracene	The protective action of polycyclic hydrocarbons against adrenal necrosis induced by dimethylbenzanthracene.
3	biologically active metabolite of vitamin d3 from bone liver and blood serum	Biologically active metabolite of bone liver vitamin d3 and blood serum.
3	automatic titration of plasma fatty acids by photocolorimetry	Automatic titration of plasma fatty acids (PFA) by photocolorimetry.
3	new partially hydrolyzable synthetic analogues of lecithin phosphatidyl ethanolamine and phosphatidic acid	New partially hydrolysable analogs of lecithin phosphatidyl ethanolamine and l' phosphatidic acid.
3	chemical and antigenic analysis of the cell walls of neisseria meningitidis group b	Chemical and antigenic analysis of neisseria meningitidis cell walls of Group b.
3	the reaction of ribonuclease inhibitor with modified ribonucleases	Reaction of l' ribonuclease inhibitor with modified ribonucleases.
3	some observations on the periodate oxidation of amino compounds	Some observations on periodate oxidation of amino compounds.
3	substrate and dilution effects on the inhibition of acetylcholinesterase by carbamates	Effects of substrate and dilution on pH; inhibition of pH; acetylcholinesterase by carbamates.
3	the binding of inhibitors to alpha chymotrypsin	The binding of the inhibitors to l' alpha-chymotrypsin.
3	aspartate carbamoyltransferase from rat liver	Rat liver aspartate carbamoyltransferase.
3	chemical modification of yeast alanine trna with a radioactive carbodiimide	Chemical modification of the alanine trna yeast with a radioactive carbodiimide.
3	homolanthionine excretion in homocystinuria	Lapos; excretion of apos; homolanthionine during apos; homocystinuria.
3	actin volume change on transformation of g form to f form	Change in volume of l' actin during transformation of g-form to f-form.
3	the inhibition of phosphoglucomutase by beryllium	L' inhibition of beryllium phosphoglucomutase.
3	the chemistry of xanthine oxidase reaction with iodoacetamide	The chemistry of the reaction of xanthine oxidase with iodoacetamide.
3	3 o methyl d mannose from streptomyces griseus	Three o methyl streptomyces griseus mannose.
3	absorption spectra of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin	Spectre d' absorption of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin.
3	the purification and properties of a penicillinase whose synthesis is mediated by an r factor in escherichia coli	Purification and penicillinase properties, synthesis of which is mediated by a r factor in escherichia coli.
3	fractionation of deoxyribonucleic acid from phage infected bacteria	The fractionation of l' deoxyribonucleic acid from phage-infected bacteria.
3	interaction of vi antigen with proteins	Protein vi antigen interaction.
3	production purification and composition of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Production, purification and composition of alpha staphylococcal toxin.
3	cholesterol in human semen	Cholesterol in human sperm.
3	the isolation and composition of helical protein microfibrils from hevea brasiliensis latex	Isolation and composition of microfibrils of helical proteins of latex hevea brasiliensis.
3	changes in lipid composition of the maturing rat testis	Changes in the lipid composition of the testes of maturing rats.
3	the acidic amino acids of tulip isolation of gamma ethylideneglutamic acid	The acidic amino acids of l' isolation of the tulips of l' gamma-ethylideneglutamic acid.
3	isolation of certain oligonucleotides obtained by degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid	Isolate some oligonucleotides obtained by degradation of l' deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	selective degradation of thymidine and thymine deoxynucleotides	Selective degradation of thymidine deoxynucleotides and thymine.
3	nucleotide sequence of a yeast tyrosine transfer rna	Apos nucleotide sequence; yeast tyrosine transfer rna.
3	the rate of hydrolysis of the molluscicide n tritylmorpholine	Dapos; molluscicide n tritylmorpholine hydrolysis.
3	galactosamine glycan of chondrococcus columnaris	Galactosamine glycan from chondrococcus columnaris.
3	rna composition and base pairing	It's a rna composition and base-matching.
3	lipid films as transducers for detection of antigen antibody and enzyme substrate reactions	Lipid films are used as transducers for the detection of antigenic antibody and enzyme substrate reactions.
3	formylmethionine codon aug as an initiator of polypeptide synthesis	The formylmethionine aug codon as the initiator of polypeptide synthesis.
3	action of anionic and cationic nerve blocking agents experiment and interpretation	Action of anionic and cationic agents blocking the experimental and interpretative nerves.
3	tritiated thymidine effect of decomposition by self radiolysis on specificity as a tracer for dna synthesis	Tritiated effect of thymidine decomposition by auto-radiolysis on specificity as a tracer for the synthesis of l' DNA.
3	deficient complement fixation by aggregated gamma globulin from hypogammaglobulinemic patients	Deficient complement fixation by aggregated gamma globulin (AGG) in hypogammaglobulinemic patients.
3	serum high density lipoprotein effect of change in structure on activity of chicken adipose tissue lipase	Effect of a structural change on apo, chicken adipose tissue lipase activity, serum high density lipoprotein.
3	nucleic acid guanine reaction with the carcinogen n acetoxy 2 acetylaminofluorene	Reaction of guanine of nucleic acids with etapos; acetoxy-2 acetylaminofluorene, a carcinogen.
3	influence of cobalt on fermentative methylation	Influence of cobalt on fermentative methylation.
3	cyanoacetylene in prebiotic synthesis	It's called cyanoacetylene prebiotic synthesis.
3	retention of the biological potency of human pituitary growth hormone after reduction and carbamidomethylation	Re-establishment of the biological potency of the human pituitary growth hormone after reduction and carbamidomethylation.
3	nucleotide sequence repetition a rapidly reassociating fraction of mouse dna	Replication of the nucleotide sequence of the apos; a rapidly reassociating fraction of the apos; mouse DNA.
3	studies on the immunochemistry of streptococcal mucopeptide	Apos studies; streptococcal mucopeptide immunochemistry.
3	prostaglandins ii an improved synthesis and structural proof of plus or minus 11 deoxyprostaglandin f 1 beta	Prostaglandins ii are a better synthesis and structural evidence of plus or minus 11 deoxyprostaglandins f 1 beta.
3	inhibition of banana polyphenoloxidase by 2 mercaptobenzothiazole	Banana polyphenoloxidase inhibition by 2 mercaptobenzothiazole.
3	a m ssbauer study of ferri and ferrocytochrome c	A mssbauer study of ferri and ferrocytochrome c.
3	binuclear ion containing nitrogen as a bridging group	Binuclear ion containing nitrogen as bridging group.
3	the equilibrium sedimentation of hyaluronic acid and of two synthetic polymers	The sedimentation to l' equilibrium of l' hyaluronic acid and two synthetic polymers.
3	partial characterization of protocollagen from embryonic cartilage	Partial characterization of protocollagen embryo cartilage.
3	characterization of the hexahydropolyprenols of aspergillus fumigatus fresenius	Characterization of hexahydropolyprenols of l' aspergillus fumigatus fresenius.
3	the stereochemistry of the hydrogen elimination in the biological conversion of cholest 7 en 3 beta ol into cholesterol	Apos stereochemistry; elimination of hydrogen in the biological conversion of cholesterol 7 to 3 beta ol to cholesterol.
3	periodate oxidation of sperm whale myoglobin and the role of the methionine residues in the antigen antibody reaction	Periodate oxidation of sperm whale myoglobin and role of methionine residues in antigenic antibody reaction.
3	reaction of myoglobin with 3 3 tetramethyleneglutaric anhydride	Reaction of myoglobin with tetramethylenegutaric anhydride, i.e.
3	separation and properties of beta galactosidase beta glucosidase beta glucuronidase and n acetyl beta glucosaminidase from rat kidney	Separation and properties of beta galactosidase beta glucosidase beta glucuronidase and n-acetyl beta glucosaminidase from rat kidney.
3	countercurrent distribution studies on histones	Distribution studies versus-current histone studies.
3	studies on the proteolytic activity of gamma globulin preparations	Apos studies; proteolytic activity of gamma globulin preparations.
3	a diagonal electrophoretic method for selective purification of methionine peptides	Method for the selective purification of methionic peptides; diagonal electrophoresis.
3	nucleohistone dissociation by ganglioside micelles	Dissociation of nucleohistones by ganglioside micelles.
3	crystal and molecular structure of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate	Crystalline and molecular structure of l' adenosine 3-5 phosphate cycling.
3	an improved synthesis of isopentenyl pyrophosphate	Improved synthesis of l' isopentenyl pyrophosphate.
3	a simple method for the preparation of 5 methyltetrahydropteroylglutamic acid	Simple method of preparation of l' methyltetrahydropteroylglutamic acid 5.
3	the formation of phosphatidylglycerol and other phospholipids by the transferase activity of phospholipase d	Phosphatidylglycerol and d&apos formation; other phospholipids by apos; transferase activity of phospholipase d.
3	the reaction of sulphite ions with an intermolecular disulphide bond in bovine serum non mercaptalbumin	Reaction of sulfite ions with an intermolecular disulfide bond in nonmercaptalbumin bovine serum.
3	the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d upon lysolecithin	L' action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on leaf lysolecithin.
3	the chemical nature of the products obtained by the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on lysolecithin the structure of lysolecithin	The chemical nature of the products obtained from the lysolecithin structure by the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on lysolecithin.
3	some properties of purified phospholipase d and especially the effect of amphipathic substances	Some properties of the purified phospholipase and especially the effect of the amphipathic substances.
3	a method for the degradation of radioactive nicotinic acid	A method of degradation of radioactive nicotinic acid.
3	hydroxamic acids in nature	Hydroxamic acids in nature.
3	acetylation of human serum albumin by acetylsalicylic acid	Acetylation of the apos; human serum albumin by apos; acetylsalicylic acid.
3	cyclic uridine 3 5 phosphate molecular structure	Molecular structure of l' cyclic uridine 3-5 phosphate.
3	enzyme induction by corticosteroids in embryonic cells steroid structure and inductive effect	Enzymatic induction by corticosteroids into steroidal structure of embryonic cells and inductive effect.
3	crystal structure of a complex of acridine cytosine and water 1 1 1	A cytosine complex of dosos, acridine and dos, and water.
3	the ultrastructure of normal and pathological igm immunoglobulins	The ultrastructure of normal and pathological immunoglobulins.
3	specificity and stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin	Specificity and stereospecificity of chymotrypsin alpha etapos.
3	reaction of beta propiolactone with amino acids and its specificity for methionine	Reaction of beta propiolactone with amino acids and its methionine specificity.
3	new method for the reductive ozonolysis of double bonds in monoenoic fatty acid methyl esters	New method for the reductive ozonolysis of double bonds in the methyl esters of monoenoic fatty acids.
3	positional distribution of fatty acids in glycerophosphatides of bovine gray matter	Positional distribution of fatty acids in glycerophosphatids of bovine gray matter.
3	substrate specific inactivation of staphylococcal penicillinase	Specific inactivation of the staphylococcal penicillinase substrate.
3	studies on the interaction of homologues of spermine with deoxyribonucleic acid and with bacterial protoplasts	Studies on the interaction of spermine homologs with deoxyribonucleic acid and bacterial protoplasts.
3	biosynthesis of phosphatidyl glycerophosphate in escherichia coli	Phosphatidyl glycerophosphate biosynthesis in Escherichia coli.
3	separation and size determination of human serum lipoproteins by agarose gel filtration	Separation and size determination of human serum lipoproteins by d&apos gel filtration; agarose.
3	a simplified preparation of phosphatidyl inositol	Simplified preparation of phosphatidyl inositol.
3	internal standards in the estimation of acetyl coa in liver extracts	Internal standards in liver extracts; estimate of liver weight; acetyl coa in liver extracts.
3	chemical analysis of acetylated bovine growth hormone a growth hormone inhibitor	Chemical analysis of apos; acetylated bovine growth hormone, an inhibitor of growth hormone.
3	interaction of polypeptide hormones with lipid monolayers	Interaction of polypeptide hormones with lipid-layer monolayers.
3	specific dimerization of the light chains of human immunoglobulin	Specific dimerization of human immunoglobulin (HIV) light chains.
3	the mechanism of the elaboration of ring b in ergosterol biosynthesis	The mechanism of cycle b formation in the biosynthesis of apos; ergosterol.
3	the metabolism of tetralin	Metabolism of tetralin.
3	the stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin	The stereospecificity of the apos; alpha chymotrypsin.
3	the binding of cupric ions to 1 carboxymethylhistidine 119 ribonuclease	Binding of copper ions to a 119-membered carboxymethylhistidine ribonuclease.
3	tanned gelatin spheres and granules for exclusion chromatography	Tanned spheres and gelatin granules for Dapos chromatography; exclusion.
3	properties of renin substrate in rabbit plasma with a note on its assay	Renin substrate properties in rabbit plasma with a note on its assay.
3	the oxidation of nn dimethyl p phenylenediamine by oxidizing agents and by caeruloplasmin	L' oxidation of dimethyl pphenylenediamine by oxidizing agents and by caeruloplasmin.
3	effects of chondroitin sulphates on mineralization in vitro	In vitro mineralization effects of chondroitin sulfates.
3	the binding of inhibitors to alpha chymotrypsin at alkaline ph	The binding of the inhibitors to l' alpha chymotrypsin at the level of the alkaline phalanx.
3	purification and properties of an acidic protein from chromaffin granules of bovine adrenal medulla	The purification and properties of acidic protein from the chromaffin granules of the medullo-bovine adrenal.
3	the redox state of free nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in the cytoplasm and mitochondria of rat liver	L' redox state of free adenine dinucleotide nicotinamide in rat liver cytoplasm and mitochondria.
3	preparation properties and metabolism of 5 6 monoepoxyretinoic acid	Preparation properties and metabolism of 5-6 monoepoxyretino acid.
3	subunits and their interactions	Subs-Units and their Subs-Units, as well as their interactions, are Subs-Units.
3	occurrence of positional isomers of octadecenoic and hexadecenoic acids in human depot fat	Presence of d' isomeric isomers of octadecenoic and hexadecenoic acids in human fat.
3	synthesis of fatty aldehydes and their cyclic acetals new derivatives for the analysis of plasmalogens	Synthesis of the fatty aldehydes and their cyclic acetals, new derivatives for the apos; plasmalogen analysis.
3	improved reagent for trimethylsilylation of sphingolipid bases	Improved reagent for trimethylsilylation of sphingolipid bases.
3	immunological evidence for the presence of b protein apoprotein of beta lipoprotein in normal and abetalipoproteinemic plasma	Immunological evidence for the presence of l' apoprotein of the b protein of lipoprotein beta in normal and abetalipoproteinemic plasma.
3	comparative study of ribosomal ribonucleic acid cistrons in enterobacteria and myxobacteria	Comparative study of ribosomal cistrons in apo; ribonucleic acid in enterobacteria and in myxobacteria.
3	physical states of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Staphylococcal alpha toxin physical status.
3	rna dna hybridization demonstration in a mammalian system of competition by preincubation	Rna dna hybridization, demonstration in a mammalian system of competition by preincubation.
3	action of degradative enzymes on the light fraction of bovine septa protein polysaccharide	Action of degradation enzymes on light fraction of bovine septa protein polysaccharides.
3	the purification and properties of placental histaminase	The purification and properties of the placental histaminase.
3	some properties of lactate dehydrogenase found in human urine	Some of the properties of lactate dehydrogenase are in human urine.
3	control of the citric acid cycle by glyoxylate mechanism of the inhibition by oxalomalate and gamma hydroxy alpha oxoglutarate	Glucose cycle control; citric acid by the glyoxylate mechanism of the apos; inhibition by apos; oxalomalate and l' gamma-hydroxylate alpha oxoglutarate.
3	sedimentation viscosity and partial specific volumes of membrane proteins and lipoproteins	Viscosity of sedimentation and partial specific volumes of membrane proteins and lipoproteins.
3	the compartmentation of choline acetyltransferase within the synaptosome	The compartmentalization of choline acetyltransferase activity in the synaptosome.
3	studies on the nature of the regulation by purine nucleotides of adenine phosphoribosyltransferase and of hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase from ehrlich ascites tumour cells	Studies on the nature of purine nucleotide regulation of apos; adenine phosphoribosyltransferase and l' hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase in ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
3	immunochemistry of sperm whale myoglobins prepared with various modified porphyrins and metalloporphyrins	L' immunochemistry of sperm whale myoglobins prepared with modified porphyrins and metalloporphyrins.
3	the purification and properties of histidinol dehydrogenase from neurospora crassa	The purification and properties of the histidinol dehydrogenase of neurospora crassa.
3	species differences in the inhibition of glutathione s aryltransferase by phthaleins and dicarboxylic acids	Specific differences in apo; inhibition of glutathione s aryltransferase by phthaleins and dicarboxylic acids.
3	rat small intestinal beta galactosidases influence of ph on the hydrolysis of different substrates	Beta galactosidases of rat small intestine affect cellular processes; hydrolysis of different substrates.
3	the estimation of galactose mannose and fucose in glycoproteins by radioisotope dilution	L' radioisotope dilution estimation of galactose mannose and fucose in glycoproteins.
3	the kinetics of the reversible inhibition of heart lactate dehydrogenase through the formation of the enzyme oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide pyruvate compounds	The kinetics of l' reversible inhibition of cardiac lactate dehydrogenase by the formation of l' nicotinamide oxidizing enzyme adenine dinucleotide pyruvate compounds.
3	effect of glutathione on ribonuclease	Effect of glutathione on ribonuclease.
3	structural changes in mitochondria induced by uncoupling reagents the response to proteolytic enzymes	Structural changes in mitochondria induced by uncoupling reactants respond to proteolytic enzymes.
3	chemical sensing an approach to biological molecular mechanisms unsig difference spectroscopy	Chemical detection of apos; an approach to molecular biological mechanisms unsig difference spectroscopy.
3	quantitative reactions for the chain elongation of aliphatic compounds	Quantitative reactions for the elongation of aliphatic compounds.
3	the effect of acid mucopolysaccharides and acid mucopolysaccharide proteins on fibril formation from collagen solutions	L' effect of acid mucopolysaccharides and acid mucopolysaccharide proteins on collagen fibril formation.
3	aspects of the chemistry of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Aspects of glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase chemistry.
3	some physical and chemical properties of trypsin digested nucleoprotein	Some of the physical and chemical properties of trypsin are nucleoprotein digesters.
3	metal binding sites of concanavalin a and their role in the binding of alpha methyl d glucopyranoside	Concanavalin a metal binding sites and their role in the binding of l' alpha methyl glucopyranoside.
3	cyanovinyl phosphate a prebiological phosphorylating agent	Cyanovinyl phosphate is a pre-biological phosphorylating agent.
3	preparation and analysis of peptide fragments produced by pepsin hydrolysis of human plasma albumin and their relationship to its structure	Preparation and analysis of peptide fragments produced by apos; hydrolysis of human pepsin; human plasma albumin and its relationship to structure.
3	the effects of inhibitor mixtures and the specific effects of different anions on the oxidase activity of caeruloplasmin	The effects of mixtures of inhibitors and the specific effects of different anions on caeruloplasmin oxidase activity.
3	dimethyl sulfoxide an inhibitor of liver alcohol dehydrogenase	Dimethylsulfoxide is an inhibitor of the hepatic alcohol dehydrogenase.
3	correlation of amino acid sequence and conformation in tobacco mosaic virus	Tobacco mosaic virus amino acid sequence and conformation correlation.
3	hemoglobin synthesis in beta thalassemia the properties of the free alpha chains	Synthesis of apos; hemoglobin in beta thalassemia, properties of free alpha chains.
3	identification of a macromolecular factor in the ileum which binds intrinsic factor and immunologic identification of intrinsic factor in ileal extracts	Identification of a macromolecular factor in the cell; ileum that links intrinsic factor and immunological identification of intrinsic factor in ileal extracts.
3	studies on haem alpha methenyl oxygenase isomeric structure of formylbiliverdin a possible precursor of biliverdin	Studies on the isomeric structure of the heme alpha methenyloxygenase of formylbiliverdine, a possible precursor of biliverdin.
3	structures of contraceptive agents	Structure of the contraceptive agents.
3	a chromatographic and spectrophotometric study of the products of the reaction of osmium tetroxide with unsaturated lipids	A chromatographic and spectrophotometric study of the products of the reaction of tetroxide d' osmium with unsaturated lipids.
3	ultrastructural studies of human and rabbit alpha m globulins	Ultrastructural studies of the alpha m globulins of human and rabbit.
3	intraphagocytic beta n acetylglucosaminidase properties of the enzyme and its activity on group a streptococcal carbohydrate in comparison with a soil bacillus enzyme	Comparison of the properties of the enzyme and its activity on the carbohydrates of d' a streptococcus and d' a soil bacillus, an intraphagocytic acetylglucosaminidase.
3	studies of chlorophyll lipid water systems	Study of lipid chlorophyll water systems.
3	a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin and chymotrypsin by using p nitrophenyl n2 acetyl n1 benzylcarbazate	A new method to determine the absolute molarity of trypsin and chymotrypsin solutions using benzyl p-nitrophenyl n2 acetyl n1 benzylcarbazate.
3	the behaviour of trypsin towards alpha n methyl alpha n toluene p sulfonyl l lysine beta naphthyl ester a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin	The behavior of trypsin vis-@-@ vis de l'apos; ester alpha n methyl alpha n toluene p sulfonyl lysine beta naphthyl is a new method for determining absolute molarity of trypsin solutions.
3	conformation and activity of chymotrypsin the ph dependent substrate induced proton uptake	Conformation and l' activity of chymotrypsin, the substrate dependent on ph, induce apos; proton absorption.
3	modification of lofland s colorimetric semiautomated serum triglyceride determination assessed by an enzymatic glycerol determination	Modification of the semi-automatic colorimetric determination of lofland serum triglycerides by glycerol enzyme determination.
3	structure and amount of positional isomers of monounsaturated fatty acids in human depot fat	Structure and quantity of fatty acids; positional isomers of monounsaturated fatty acids in human deposits.
3	gas liquid chromatographic analyses of 1 2 ethanediol monoethers and monoesters	Analysis by liquid chromatography in the gas phase of 12 monoether and monoester d' ethanediols.
3	characterization and synthesis of mono and diphytanyl ethers of glycerol	Characterization and synthesis of glycerol mono- and diphytanylic ethers.
3	determination of the molecular weight of apoprotein subunits from low density lipoprotein by gel filtration	Determination of molecular weight of low density lipoprotein apoproteins under-apoproteins by gel filtration.
3	the phosphorylation of 5 oligoadenylic acids by adenylate kinase and adenosine triphosphate	Phosphorylation of 5 oligoadenyl acids by apos; adenylate kinase and apos; adenosine triphosphate.
3	the mechanism of glucose 6 phosphate d myo inositol 1 phosphate cyclase of rat testis the involvement of hydrogen atoms	The mechanism of glucose 6 phosphate d'apos; inositol 1 phosphate cyclase rat testis involves apos; involvement of apos; apos atoms; hydrogen.
3	alkaline haematin and nitrogenous ligands	It's called alkaline hematin and nitrogen ligands.
3	ll a491 a monazomycin like antibiotic	He has a monazomycin 491 as his antibiotic.
3	mechanism of the bactericidal action produced by electrohydraulic shock	Apos mechanisms; bactericidal action produced by electrohydraulic shock.
3	the comparative toxicity of ddt and analogues to susceptible and resistant houseflies and mosquitos	A comparison of the toxicity of ddt and its analogues to houseflies and sensitive and resistant mosquitoes.
3	partial resolution of dl adenosine by template synthesis	Partial resolution of adenosine by template synthesis.
3	total synthesis of natural levo and enantiomeric dextro forms of prostaglandin el	A total synthesis of the natural and enantiomeric dextro forms of prostaglandin el.
3	purification of the alliin lyase of garlic allium sativum l	It's called the alloy lyase; it's called allium sativum ll.
3	the inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase by stilboestrol derivatives	L' inhibition of the nucleotidyltransferase of l' deoxyribonucleic acid by stilbestrol derivatives.
3	the osmotic behaviour of sephadex and its effects on chromatography	Osmotic behaviour of sephadex and its effect on chromatography.
3	physical and chemical studies of a low molecular weight form of urease	Physical and chemical studies of urease, a low molecular weight form of urease.
3	purification and properties of molecular weight variants of human placental alkaline phosphatase	Purification and properties of human placental alkaline phosphatase molecular weight variants.
3	the metabolism of aromatic acids by micro organisms a reassessment of the role of o benzoquinone as a product of protocatechuate metabolism by fungi	The metabolism of aromatic acids by microorganisms reevaluates the role of benzoquinone, or apos, as a product of protocatechuate metabolism by fungi.
3	the preparation and kinetics of lactate dehydrogenase attached to water insoluble particles and sheets	Preparation and kinetics of lactate dehydrogenase attached to water-insoluble leaves and particles.
3	evidence for histidine in the active site of papain	Evidence of apos; histidine in the active papain site.
3	the location of the active site histidine residue in the primary sequence of papain	The localization of the histidine residue of the active site in the primary sequence of papain.
3	structural stability and solvent denaturation of myoglobin	Structural stability and solvent denaturation of the myoglobin.
3	the inhibition of plasmin plasma kallikrein plasma permeability factor and the c 1r subcomponent of the first component of complement by serum c 1 esterase inhibitor	L' inhibition of the plasma permeability factor of plasminic kallikrein and the sub-@-@ component c1r of the primary complement component by apos; apos inhibitor; serum esterase c 1.
3	denaturation and renaturation of viral ribonucleic acd ii characterization of the products resulting from annealing r17 ribonucleic acid with denatured replicative form or with denatured replicative intermediate	Denaturation and renaturation of the apos; viral ribonucleic acid ii characterization of the products resulting from the annealing of the apos; r17 ribonucleic acid in a denatured replicative form or with a denatured replicative intermediate.
3	specificity of ribonuclease ch from chalaropsis species	Specificity of ch ribonuclease in chalaropsis species.
3	specificity of combination between mucopeptide precursors and vancomycin or ristocetin	Specific combination between mucopeptide precursors and vancomycin or ristoketin.
3	nondroplet ultrastructural demonstration of cytochrome oxidase activity with a polymerizing osmiophilic reagent diaminobenzidine dab	Ultrastructure not-droplet demonstrates apos; cytochrome oxidase activity at apos; aid of apos; osmiophilic polymeric reagent, diaminobenzidine dab.
3	protein aggregation studies of larger aggregates of c phycocyanin	Study of apos; aggregation of d&apos proteins; larger aggregates of phycocyanin c.
3	immunogenicity of deoxycholate disrupted endotoxins	The immunogenicity of deoxycholate has been shown to be disruptive to the endotoxins.
3	the complexing of lysozyme with poly c and other homopolymers	The complexation of lysozyme with polyc and d' other homopolymers.
3	a study of folate absorption and metabolism in man utilizing carbon 14 labeled polyglutamates synthesized by the solid phase method	A study of folate metabolism and absorption in men using carbon-14 labelled polyglutamates synthesized by the solid phase method.
3	fetal hemoglobin variants in mice	Variants of oral and fetal hemoglobin in mice.
3	studies on the prekallikrein kallikreinogen kallikrein enzyme system of human plasma ii evidence relating the kaolin activated arginine esterase to plasma kallikrein	Studies of the kallikreinogenic enzyme system kallikreinine prekallikreininin in human plasma ii have revealed a kaolin- and plasma kallikrein-activated association between arginine esterase and apos.
3	hydrolysis of 125 i labelled thyroglobulin by pancreatin pronase and pepsin	L' 125 i labelled thyroglobulin hydrolysis by pancreatic pronase and pepsin.
3	the displacement of calcium ions from phospholipid monolayers by pharmacologically active and other organic bases	The displacement of calcium ions from phospholipid monolayers by organic, pharmacologically active, and other organic bases.
3	separation of replicative intermediate from single stranded ribonucleic acid by sedimentation at low ionic strength	Replicative intermediate of l' single-strand ribonucleic acid by low ionic strength sedimentation.
3	paramyosin molecular length and assembly	Molecular length and assembly of the paramyosin.
3	effects of two oral iron preparations on results of the benzidine test for occult blood in stools	Effects of two oral iron preparations on benzidine test results for occult blood in stool.
3	reaction of nitrosoguanidine n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with tobacco mosaic virus and its rna	Reaction of nitrosoguanidine n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with tobacco mosaic virus and rna.
3	binding of neomycin and analogues by fatty acids in vitro	The binding of neomycin and its analogs by fatty acids in vitro.
3	catabolism of human gammag immunoglobulins of different heavy chain subclasses i catabolism of gammag myeloma proteins in man	Human immunoglobulin gammags of different heavy chain subclasses and catabolism of myeloma gammag in man.
3	a new hepatic protein inactivating glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	It's a novel hepatic protein that inactivates glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
3	intrachain disulphide bridges in immunoglobulin g heavy chains the fc fragment	Intrachain disulfide bridges in the apos; heavy chain immunoglobulin, the fc fragment.
3	the utilization of some halogenated aromatic acids by nocardia oxidation and metabolism	L' use of certain aromatic acids halogenated by nocardia oxidation and metabolism.
3	protein polyelectrolyte interactions the concanavalin a precipitin reaction with polyelectrolytes and polysaccharide derivatives	Concanavalin polyelectrolyte protein interactions a precipitin reaction with polyelectrolytes and polysaccharide derivatives.
3	the cell wall of bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346 composition of the mucopeptide component	The cell wall of the mucopeptide component of the bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346.
3	the determination of oestradiol and oestrone in the plasma of the domestic fowl by method involving the use of labelled derivatives	Determination of estradiol and estradiol; estrone in domestic poultry plasma by a method involving estradiol and estradiol; use of labelled derivatives.
3	lipids produced by epicoccum nigrum in submerged culture	The lipids produced by the epicoccum nigrum in submerged culture.
3	study of the methylation and lack of deamination of deoxyribonucleic acid by n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine	Methylation and apo studies; absence of deamination of deoxyribonucleic acid by n-methyl nitro n nitrosoguanidine.
3	complex formation between triphosphoinositide and experimental allergic encephalitogenic protein	Formation of d&apos is a complex between triphosphoinositide and experimental allergic encephalitogenic protein.
3	effect of formaldehyde on the immunochemical and biological activity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Effect of formaldehyde on apos; immunochemical and biological activity of apos; enterotoxin b of staphylococcus.
3	effect of formaldehyde on the immunogenicity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b for macaca mulatta	The effects of formaldehyde on the immune system; the immunogenicity of the immune system; the enterotoxin b of staphylococcus in macaca mulatta.
3	activation of hageman factor by l homocystine	Lamb factor activity by apos; homocystin l.
3	nitrazepam mogadon in blood serum and urine and librium in urine	Nitrazepam megadon in blood serum and serum; urine and librium in urine.
3	dehydration of prostaglandins study by spectroscopic method	Dehydration of prostaglandins is investigated using the spectroscopic method.
3	reactions of aromatic and sulfur amino acids in ribonuclease with hydrogen atoms in water solution	Reactions of aromatic and sulfur amino acids in ribonuclease with the atoms d'apos; hydrogen in aqueous solution.
3	staphylococcal nuclease size and specificity of the active site	Size and specificity of the staphylococcal nuclease of the active site.
3	hydrolysis at arginylproline in polypeptides by clostridiopeptidase b	L' hydrolysis of apos; arginylproline in polypeptides by clostridiopeptidase b.
3	esterases of the polymorphonuclear leukocyte capable of hydrolyzing acetyl dl phenyl alanine beta naphthyl ester relationship to the activatable esterase of chemotaxis	Polymonuclear leukocyte esterases have the ability to deactivate; hydrolyze the relationship between apos; apos ester; acetyl phenyl alanine beta naphthyl and apos; activable chemotaxis esterase.
3	interactions between the lysine rich histone f1 and deoxyribonucleic acid	Interactions between l' lysine- and l&apos-rich f1 histone; deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	the action of digitonin on rat liver mitochondria the effects on enzyme content	L' effect of digitonin on rat liver mitochondria on enzyme content.
3	ionic interaction of sulfatide with choline lipids	Ionic interaction of sulfatide with choline-like lipids.
3	evidence for histidine in the active sites of ficin and stem bromelain	The presence of histidine and apos in the active sites of twine and stem bromellain was demonstrated.
3	the effect of n bromosuccinimide on the sub unit structure of acidin and its complexes with biotin	Effect of n bromosuccinimide on the structure of sub--units of acid and its biotin complexes.
3	current concepts of hyperuricemia and gout	Concepts of hyperuricemia and droplet fever.
3	a new route to the imidazole 2 thiones from 2 thiohydantoins implications in the study of ergothioneine	A new pathway to apo; apo access; imidazole 2 thiones from 2 thiohydantoins involves apos; study of apos; ergothionein.
3	preparation properties and metabolism of retro 3 dehydroretinyl acetate	Key words:preparation properties and metabolism of l' retro acetate-3 dehydroetinyl.
3	reaction of tyrosine oxidation products with proteins of the lens	Reaction of d&apos products; oxidation of tyrosine with lens proteins.
3	cellulose refutation of a folded chain structure	The cellulose refutation d' a folded chain structure.
3	electron spin resonance evidence for enzymic reduction of oxygen to a free radical the superoxide ion	Electron paramagnetic resonance spectroscopy shows the existence of apos; an enzymatic reduction of apos; oxygen to a free radical, apos; superoxide ion.
3	cleavage by formamide of intercapsomer bonds in adenovirus types 4 and 7 virions and hemagglutinins	Formamide cleavage of intercapsomeric bonds in adenovirus virions 4 and 7 and hemagglutinins.
3	physical and biological properties of phage phi 29 deoxyribonucleic acid	Phage phi 29 deoxyribonucleic acid physical and biological properties.
3	morphology of the nucleoprotein component of rabies virus	Molecular characterization of the nucleoprotein component of the virus.
3	a study of immunoglobulin structure 3 an estimate of the variability of human light chains	A study of the structure of l' immunoglobulin 3, an estimate of the variability of the human light chains.
3	metabolism of antifertility steroids i norethynodrel	Metabolism of d&apos steroids; norethynodrel antifertility.
3	the active chemical state of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate in its reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase	L' glyceraldehyde phosphate 3 is chemically active in its reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase.
3	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin vii toxin stimulated hydrolysis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in mammalian cell extracts	Studies on the mode of action of vii toxin diphtheria toxin have stimulated the hydrolysis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in mammalian cell extracts.
3	magnesium sulfate interactions in seawater from solubility measurements	Magnesium sulphate interactions in seawater from solubility measurements.
3	sulfur containing nucleoside from yeast transfer ribonucleic acid 2 thio 5 or 6 uridine acetic acid methyl ester	The sulfur-containing nucleoside of yeast transfers l' ribonucleic acid 2 thio 5 or 6 l&apos methyl ester; uridine acetic acid.
3	pyrogenic principle of the ribonucleic acid from the yeast candida utilis	Pyrogenic principle of yeast; ribonucleic acid of yeast applied.
3	physical heterogeneity among bacillus subtilis deoxyribonucleic acid molecules carrying particular genetic markers	Physical heterogeneity among the molecules d' deoxyribonucleic acid of the subtilis bacillus with specific genetic markers.
3	complement inactivating proteinase s from clostridium histolyticum	A complement that inactivates the proteinases of the clostridium histolyticum.
3	the partial characterization of 1 oxygenated steroids from urine of a hypertensive newborn child	Partial characterization of 1 oxygenated steroids in urine d' a new @-@, born hypertensive.
3	total synthesis of dl 19 nor 16 17 dehydroprogesterone	Complete synthesis of dl 19 or 16,17 dehydroprogesterone.
3	on the mechanism of catalysis by vitamin b12	About the mechanism of vitamin b12 catalysis.
3	stereochemical analysis of the specificity of pancreatic rnase with polyformycin as substrate differentiation of the transphosphorylation and hydrolysis reactions	Stereochemical analysis of the specificity of pancreatic rnase with polyformycin as the differentiation substrate for transphosphorylation and d&apos reactions; hydrolysis.
3	deoxyribonuclease iv a new exonuclease from mammalian tissues	Deoxyribonuclease iv is a novel exonuclease in mammalian tissue.
3	7 dehydrostigmasterol and ergosterol the major sterols of an amoeba	Dehydrostigmasterol and ergosterol, the major sterols of amoeba.
3	intestinal absorption and lymphatic transport of cholesterol in the rat influence of the fatty acid chain length of the carrier triglyceride	Bowel absorption and lymphatic cholesterol transport in the rat influence the fatty acid chain length of the triglyceride transporter.
3	sphingolipids in bean leaves phaseolus vulgaris	Sphingolipids in leaves of bean Phaseolus vulgaris vulgaris.
3	quantitative analysis and comparison of the physical properties of o alkyl and s alkyl monoethers of glycerol	Quantitative analysis and comparison of the physical properties of the alkyl and the alkyl monoether of glycerol.
3	the mechanism of heparin stimulation of rat adipocyte lipoprotein lipase	Adipocyte-stimulation mechanisms; heparin of lipoprotein lipase from rat adipocytes.
3	long chain bases in the sphingolipids of atherosclerotic human aorta	Long-chain sphingolipid bases in the human atherosclerotic aorta.
3	gas liquid chromatographic analysis of free long chain aldehydes	Analysis by liquid chromatography in the gas chromatography of free long-chain aldehydes.
3	synthesis and desulfurization decarboxylation of cyclic thionocarbonates of glycerol 1 ethers	Synthesis and decarboxylation of the cyclic thionocarbonates of decarboxylated glycerol ether 1s.
3	alteration of physical chemical and biological properties of endotoxin by treatment with mild alkali	Modification of the physico@-@ chemical and biological properties of the endotoxin by mild alkali treatment.
3	molecular order of participation of inhibitors or activators in biological systems	The molecular order of the participation of inhibitors or activators in biological systems.
3	characterization of rapidly labelled ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli by deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid hybridization	Characterization of apos; rapidly labelled ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli by lacid hybridization; deoxyribonucleic acid with apos; ribonucleic acid.
3	chemical modification of glutamate dehydrogenase by 2 4 6 trinitrobenzenesulphonic acid	Chemical modification of glutamate dehydrogenase by acid; 2,46, trinitrobenzenesulfonic acid.
3	on the mechanism of pepsin action	On the mechanism of l' action pepsin.
3	negative cooperativity in regulatory enzymes	Negative enzyme cooperativity in regulatory enzymes.
3	the mechanism of action of ribonuclease	The mechanism of d' action of the ribonuclease.
3	lipid monolayers interactions with the apoprotein of high density plasma lipoprotein	Interactions of lipid monolayers with high density plasma lipoprotein apoproteins.
3	origin of some derivatives of retinoic acid found in rat bile	Origin of some l&apos derivatives; retinoic acid found in rat bile.
3	effect of phospholipase a treatment of low density lipoproteins on the dextran sulfate lipoprotein interaction	Effect of phospholipase, a low density lipoprotein treatment, on lipos; lipoprotein sulfate dextran interaction.
3	probes of dna structure and interactions effects of copper ii on ultraviolet induced pyrimidine dimer formation	DNA structure probes and effects of copper ii on the formation of trace-induced pyrimidine dimers; ultraviolet.
3	variations in sulfhydryl disulfide and protein content during synchronous and asynchronous growth of hela cells	Changes in sulfhydryl disulfide and protein content during the synchronous and asynchronous growth of helical cells.
3	the interaction of cytochrome c with monolayers of phosphatidylethanolamine	L' interaction of cytochrome c with phosphatidylethanolamine monolayers.
3	the separation prtial purificatio nd some properties of isoenzymes of aldolase from guinea pig cerebral cortex	The pre-clinical separation of certain properties of the isoenzymes from the cerebral cortical aldolase of guinea pig.
3	o quinones formed in plant extracts their reactions with amino acids and peptides	Quinones formed in plant extracts react with amino acids and peptides.
3	the use of maleic anhydride for the reversible blocking of amino groups in polypeptide chains	L' use of l' maleic anhydride for the reversible blockade of amino groups in the polypeptide chains.
3	mechanism of non enzymic transamination reaction between histidine and alpha oxoglutaric acid	The mechanism(s) of the non-enzymatic transamination reaction between apos; histidine and l' alpha oxoglutaric acid.
3	the influence of metal ions on the orthophosphatase and inorganic pyrophosphatase activities of human alkaline phosphatase	L' influence of metal ions on human alkaline phosphatase orthophosphatase and inorganic pyrophosphatase activities.
3	analogues of ribose 5 phosphate and 5 phosphoribosyl pyrophosphate the preparation and properties of ribose 5 phosphorothioate and 5 phosphoribosyl 1 methylenediphosphonate	The ribose 5 phosphate and 5 phosphoribosyl pyrophosphate analogs prepared ribose 5 phosphorothioate and 5 phosphoribosyl 1 methylenediphosphonate.
3	effects of adenosine phosphates and nicotinamide nucleotides on pyruvate carboxylase from baker s yeast	Effects of d&apos phosphates; adenosine and nicotinamide nucleotides on baker's yeast pyruvate carboxylase.
3	comparative studies of bile salts 16 deoxymyxinol a second bile alcohol from hagfish	Comparative studies of bile salts 16 deoxymyxinol, a second myxin bile alcohol.
3	the structure of an acylated inositol mannoside in the lipids of propionic acid bacteria	An acylated inositol mannoside in the lipids of propionic bacteria.
3	a shift in the optimum ph of pospholipase d produced by activating long chain anions	A change in the optimal pospholipase d ph produced by long chain anion activation.
3	mechanisms of inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in deoxyribonucleic acid by acridine dyes	Mechanism(s); inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in apo; deoxyribonucleic acid by acridinic dyes.
3	the hyperviscosity syndrome i in igg myeloma the role of protein concentration and molecular shape	Apos syndrome, myeloma hyperviscosity, the role of protein concentration and molecular form.
3	studies on testosterone metabolism in subjects with testicular feminization syndrome	Testosterone metabolism studies in subjects with testicular feminization syndrome.
3	adenine nucleotides and magnesium ions in relation to control of mammalian cerebral cortex hexokinase	Nucleotides of apos; adenine and magnesium ions in relation to the control of apos; mammalian cerebral cortical hexokinase.
3	o quinones formed in plant extracts their reaction with bovine serum albumin	Quinones formed in plant extracts are reactive with bovine serum albumin.
3	effects of magnesium manganese and adenosine triphosphate ions on pyruvate carboxylase from baker s yeast	Effects of manganese magnesium and apos; adenosine triphosphate on pyruvate carboxylase of bakers' yeast.
3	inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in dna by cationic molecules role of energy transfer	L' inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in apos; DNA by cationic molecules plays a role in the transfer of d' energy.
3	formation of vitamin k2 isoprenologues by staphylococcus aureus	Formation of isoprenologues vitamin k2 by staphylococcus aureus.
3	genetic and molecular properties of an infectious antibiotic resistance r factor isolated from klebsiella	Genetic and molecular properties of Klebsiella infectious antibiotic resistance factor isolated from Klebsiella.
3	the hydrolysis of monolayers of phosphatidyl me 14c choline by phospholipase d	L' hydrolysis of phosphatidyl monolayers 14c choline by phospholipase d.
3	amino acid incorporation by ribosomes and polyribosomes from wheat chloroplasts	Incorporation of amino acids by wheat chloroplast ribosomes and polyribosomes.
3	study of carbonic anhydrase using perturbed angular correlations of gamma radiation	Anhydrous anhydrase using perturbed angular correlations of gamma radiation.
3	properties of halves of immunoglobulin light chains	Half properties of d&apos light chains; immunoglobulin.
3	some optical properties of diadenosine 5 phosphates	Some optical properties of 5 diadenosine phosphates.
3	the nature of general base general acid catalysis in serine proteases	The nature of the general acid catalysis of bases in serine proteases.
3	chemical composition of exosporium from spores of bacillus cereus	Chemical composition of apos; exosporium of cereus bacillus spores.
3	the integrity of the ether linkage during thyroxine metabolism in man	Integrity of association with apos; ether during thyroxine metabolism in men.
3	two distinct groups of immunoglobulin a iga revealed by peptic digestion	Two distinct groups of apos; aiga immunoglobulin revealed by peptic digestion.
3	proton magnetic resonance studies of porphyrin iron 3 cyanides	Proton nuclear magnetic resonance studies of porphyrin iron cyanide 3.
3	on the mechanism of ribonuclease action	On the d&apos mechanism; action of ribonuclease.
3	new antibacterial agent isolated from the avocado pear	New antibacterial agent isolated from pear avocado.
3	microbiological assay and tissue distribution of beta thioguanine deoxyriboside in mice	Microbiological tests and tissue distribution of beta-thioguanine deoxyriboside in the mouse.
3	irradiation of thymine dimers in aqueous solution	L' aqueous solution irradiation of thymine dimers.
3	properties of 42s and 26s sindbis viral ribonucleic acid species	Properties of d&apos species; viral ribonucleic acid sindbis 42s and 26s.
3	electron microscopic observations on the ribonucleic acid of murine leukemia virus	Electron microscopic observations of murine leukemia virus ribonucleic acid.
3	studies on the nucleocapsid structure of a group a arbovirus	Studies on the structure of nucleocapsid d' a cluster of arboviruses.
3	trypsin and papain covalently coupled to porous glass preparation and characterization	Trypsin and papain are covalently associated with the preparation and characterization of the porous glass.
3	the effect of the prostaglandin f compounds on the contractility of the pregnant human uterus	The effect of prostaglandin f on the contractility of the human uterus.
3	stereochemistry of nucleic acids and their constituents ix the conformation of the antibiotic puromycin dihydrochloride pentahydrate	Stereochemistry of nucleic acids and their constituents ix conformation of the antibiotic puromycin dihydrochloride pentahydrate.
3	photoregulation of biological activity by photocromic reagents ii inhibitors of acetylcholinesterase	The photoregulation of apos; biological activity by photocromic reagents ii inhibitors of apos; acetylcholinesterase.
3	activation of rabbit liver fructose diphosphatase by coenzyme a and acyl carrier protein	Rabbit liver fructose diphosphatase activity by coenzyme a and rabbit acyl-containing protein.
3	replicative form ii dna of phi x174 resistance to exonucleolytic cleavage by e coli dna polymerase	Replicative form ii dna phi x174 resistance to exonucleolytic cleavage by e coli dna polymerase.
3	controlled deamidation of peptides and proteins an experimental hazard and a possible biological timer	Controlled deamidation of peptides and proteins is an experimental risk and can be a biological timer.
3	temporal resolution of individual steps in an enzymic reaction at low temperature	D&apos time resolution; individual steps in an enzymatic reaction at low temperature.
3	conversion of bacterial aldolase from vegetative to spore form by a sporulation specific protease	Conversion of vegetative bacterial aldolase to spore by a sporulation-specific protease.
3	hemoglobin nyu a delta chain variant alpha 2 delta 2 lys	L' haemoglobin nyu is a variant of the delta chain alpha 2 delta 2 lys.
3	very low density lipoproteins in intestinal lymph origin composition and role in lipid transport in the fasting state	Very low density lipoproteins in apo composition; intestinal lymphatic origin and role in lipid transport; fast.
3	autoxidation of insect lipids inhibition on the cuticle of the american cockroach	Autoxidation of the apos; inhibition of insect lipids on the American cockroach cuticle.
3	pancreatic ribonuclease poly g complexes complete inhibition of poly u hydrolysis	Polyg complexes of pancreatic ribonuclease (PCR) complete the apos; inhibition of apos; hydrolysis of poly u.
3	subunits of tamm horsfall glycoprotein	Under-tamm horsfall glycoprotein units.
3	a specific complex between a restriction endonuclease and its dna substrate	Specific complex between a restriction endonuclease and its DNA substrate.
3	an analysis of the electron spin resonance of low spin ferric heme compounds	An analysis of the electron paramagnetic resonance of low-spin ferric heme compounds has been carried out.
3	warfarin metabolism in man identification of metabolites in urine	Metabolism of human warfarin Identification of metabolites in urine.
3	relationships between chemical structure and affinity for acetylcholine receptors	Relationship between chemical structure and l' affinity for l&apos receptors; acetylcholine receptors.
3	heavy and light chain allotypic markers on rabbit homocytotropic antibody	Allotypic heavy- and light-chain markers on rabbit homocytotropic antibodies.
3	semisynthetic coumermycins structure activity relationships	The semi-synthetic coumermycines structure the relationships d' activity.
3	the heparin protein complex of ox liver capsule isolation and chemical characterization	The protein complex of l' heparin of l' isolation of beef liver capsule and chemical characterization.
3	variation in the n terminal sequence of heavy chains of immunoglobulin g from rabbits of different allotype	Variation in n-terminal heavy chains of apos; immunoglobulin g in rabbits of different allotypes.
3	studies on the reduction of a human 19s immunoglobulin m	Reduction studies of human immunoglobulin 19s m.
3	reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of electrons formation of radical anions from 7 7 8 8 tetracyanoquinodimethane and tetrachloro 1 4 benzoquinone	Reactions of vitamin a with electron acceptors for the formation of radical anions from 788 tetracyanoquinodimethane and of tetrachloro 14 benzoquinone.
3	reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of electrons interactions with iodine and the formation of iodide	Reactions of vitamin a with acceptors; electron interactions with iodine; iodine and formation; iodide.
3	studies on tryptophan synthetases from various strains of bacillus subtilis	Studies of the tryptophan synthetases of various strains of the subtilis bacillus.
3	competition of two substrates for a single enzyme a simple kinetic theorem exemplified by a hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase reaction	Competition of two substrates for a single enzyme, a simple kinetic theorem illustrated by a reaction d' hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase.
3	brain arylamidase purfication and characterization of the soluble bovine enzyme	Purification of the apos, cerebral arylamidase, and soluble bovine enzyme.
3	stepwise cleavage of rabbit immunoglobulin g by papain and isolation of four types of biologically active fc fragments	Stepwise cleavage of rabbit immunoglobulin by papain and l' isolation of four types of biologically active fc fragments.
3	conformation changes and dissociation of fc fragments of rabbit immunoglobulin g as a function of ph	Conformation changes and dissociation of rabbit immunoglobulin-g fragments as a function of ph.
3	the incorporation of a hydrogen atom at c 15 of cholesterol biosynthesized from squalene	A hydrogen atom at level c 15 of cholesterol biosynthesized from squalene.
3	effects of allopurinol and oxipurinol on purine synthesis in cultured human cells	Effects of allopurinol and oxipurinol on purine synthesis in cultured human cells.
3	aggregation of gamma g3 proteins relevance to the hyperviscosity syndrome	Aggregation of gamma g3 proteins in relation to d&apos syndrome; hyperviscosity.
3	immune reactions in polysaccharide media the effect of hyaluronate chondroitin sulphate and chondroitin sulphate protein complex on the precipitin reaction	The effect of chondroitin sulfate hyaluronate and chondroitin sulfate protein complex on the precipitin reaction.
3	the preferential loss of the polylysine or polyornithine stimulated activity of clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase during proteolysis	Preferential loss of polylysine or polyornithine stimulates apos; polynucleotide phosphorylase activity of clostridium perfringens during proteolysis.
3	the influence of the size and nature of basic activators on clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase catalysed polyadenylic acid synthesis	L' influence of size and nature of basic activators on clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase; polyadenylic acid.
3	mode of action of albocycline an inhibitor of nicotinate biosynthesis	Action of albocycline, an inhibitor of nicotinate biosynthesis.
3	specificity and evolutionary divergence of the antigenic structure of the polypeptide chain elongation factors	Specificity and evolutionary divergence of antigenic structure of d' polypeptide chain elongation.
3	biological studies with alpha dehydrobiotin	Biological studies with alpha-dehydrobiotine.
3	biochemical decomposition of the herbicide n 3 4 dichlorophenyl 2 methylpentanamide and related compounds	Biochemical decomposition of dichlorophenyl herbicide 3,4 methylpentanamide and related compounds.
3	comparative study of responses to neomycins b and c by microbiological and gas liquid chromatographic assay methods	Comparison of responses to neomycins b and c by gas- and microbiological-phase liquid chromatography.
3	loss of rubella antibody from immune globulin treated with kaolin	Loss of rubella antibodies in kaolin-treated immunoglobulins.
3	interactions of desensitized actomyosin with tropomyosin troponin a troponin b and polyanions	L&apos interactions; tropomyosin troponin a troponin b and polyanions desensitized actomyosin.
3	relative rates of hydrolysis by rat pancreatic lipase of esters of c2 c18 fatty acids with c1 c18 primary n alcohols	Relative rates of apo; pancreatic lipase hydrolysis of apo rat; esters of apo; c2 c18 fatty acids with primary c1 c18 alcohols.
3	reaction of acetyl alpha chymotrypsin and other esters with an ionizable nucleophile monoisonitrosoacetone	Reaction of l' acetyl alpha chymotrypsin and d' other ionizable nucleophilic monoisonitroso acetone esters.
3	the recombination of dimers of immunoglobulin peptide chains	The recombination of peptide chain dimers of immunoglobulin.
3	antibacterial effect of some azaphenanthrene compounds	An antibacterial effect of certain compounds of azaphenanthrene.
3	preparation of radioactive tay sachs ganglioside labeled in the sialic acid moiety	Preparation of ganglioside-labeled radioactive tay sachs in the sialic acid moiety.
3	gas liquid chromatography mass spectrometry of synthetic ceramides containing 2 hydroxy acids	A liquid chromatography in the gas phase mass spectrometry of synthetic ceramides containing 2 hydroxylic acids.
3	microbial transformation of 19 hydroxypregnanes	Microbial transformation of 19 hydroxypregnanes.
3	the conformation of cholinergic molecules at nicotinic nerve receptors	Conformation of cholinergic molecules to the nicotinic nerve receptors.
3	chemical composition of the cell wall of the h37ra strain of mycobacterium tuberculosis	Chemical composition of the cell wall of the mycobacterium tuberculosis strain h37ra.
3	terminal cross linking of dna strands by an enzyme system from escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4	Terminal cross-linking of DNA from bacteriophage t4 infected escherichia coli by an enzyme system.
3	diphenylhydantoin and diazepam molecular structure similarities and steric basis of anticonvulsant activity	Comparison of the molecular structures of diphenylhydantoin and diazepam and the steric basis of l' anticonvulsant activity.
3	specific alkylation of a histidine residue in carnitine acetyltransferase by bromoacetyl l carnitine	Specific d&apos alkylation; a histidine residue in the cell; carnitine acetyltransferase by bromoacetyl carnitine.
3	products of aminolysis and enzymic hydrolysis of the cephalosporins	Products of cephalosporin ester; aminolysis and enzymatic hydrolysis.
3	changes in proton magnetic resonance spectra during aminolysis and enzymic hydrolysis of cephalosporins	Changes in the proton nuclear magnetic resonance spectra during aminolysis and l' hydrolysis of cephalosporins.
3	inhibition of phosphofructokinase by quinone methide and alpha methylene lactone tumor inhibitors	L' inhibition of phosphofructokinase by quinone methide and inhibitors of l&apos tumors; alpha methylene lactone.
3	an approach to conformational analysis of peptides and proteins in solution based on a combination of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and conformational energy calculations	An approach of l' conformational analysis of peptides and proteins in solution based on a combination of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and d&apos calculations; conformational energy.
3	conversion of glycogen phosphorylase b to a by non activated phosphorylase b kinase an in vitro model of the mechanism of increase in phosphorylase a activity with muscle contraction	Conversion of glycogen phosphorylase b a by nonactivated phosphorylase b, an in vitro model of the glycogen phosphorylase d&apos mechanism; increase in apos; phosphorylase a activity with muscle contraction.
3	mechanism of activation by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate of a protein phosphokinase from rabbit reticulocytes	Apos mechanisms; apos activation; apos cyclic monophosphate adenosine 3-5; rabbit reticulocyte phosphokinase protein.
3	steric and electronic relationships among some hallucinogenic compounds	Steric and electronic relationships between hallucinogenic compounds.
3	polynucleotide ligase catalyzed joining of deoxyribo oligonucleotides on ribopolynucleotide templates and of ribo oligonucleotides on deoxyribopolynucleotide templates	Polynucleotide ligase catalyzes deoxyribo oligonucleotide union on ribopolynucleotide templates and oligonucleotide ribonucleotide union on deoxyribonucleotide templates.
3	reaction of diethyl pyrocarbonate with nucleic acid components i adenine	Reaction of diethyl pyrocarbonate with the i-nucleic acid components.
3	production of rubratoxin b by penicillium purpurogenum stoll	Production of rubratoxin b per penicillium purpurogenum stoll.
3	identification of mycobactins by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy	Mycobactin identification by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
3	a new class of chromophoric organomercurials and their reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	A new class of chromophoric organomercurics and their reactions with the glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
3	structural analysis of colanic acid from escherichia coli by using methylation and base catalysed fragmentation comparison with polysaccharides from other bacterial sources	Apos structural analysis; colanic acid; escherichia coli by methylation and comparison of base-catalyzed fragmentation with polysaccharides from other bacterial sources.
3	purification and properties of d 4 deoxy 5 oxoglucarate hydro lyase decarboxylating	Purification and properties of deoxy hydrolysate-4 oxoglucarate-5 decarboxylating lyase by decarboxylation.
3	anaerobic degradation of the benzene nucleus by a facultatively anaerobic microorganism	Anaerobic degradation of the benzene ring by a micro@-@ facultative anaerobic organism.
3	yields of hydrogenomonas eutropha from growth on succinate and fumarate	Yields of hydrogenomonas eutropha of growth on succinate and fumarate.
3	contribution of aromatic residue interactions to the stability of myoglobin v enhancement by aromatic compounds of the rate of heat denaturation	Contribution of the interactions of the aromatic residues to the stability of l' increase of myoglobin v by the aromatic compounds of the rate of thermal denaturation.
3	reactions between singlet oxygen and the constituents of nucleic acids importance of reactions in photodynamic processes	Reactions between the singlet oxygen and the nucleic acid components in photodynamic processes.
3	electron microscopic studies on streptococci i m antigen	Electron microscopy studies on apos; streptococcus antigen i m.
3	the immunogenicity of dinitrophenyl amino acids	Immunogenicity of dinitrophenyl amino acids.
3	electron microscopy of the nucleic acid of mouse mammary tumor virus	Electron microscopy of mouse mammary tumour virus (MMTV) nucleic acid.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 2 toxicity to adult mosquitos and the physical properties of some new carbamates	Assessment of compounds for insecticidal activity against adult mosquitoes 2 toxicity to adult mosquitoes and physical properties of selected newer carbamates.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 3 properties of some n methylthiolcarbamates	Evaluation of compounds for their insecticidal activity on adult mosquitoes: 3 properties of some n-methylthiolcarbamates.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 4 insecticidal activity and physical properties of some halogenated organophosphorus esters	Assessment of the insecticidal activity of certain mosquito-related compounds 4 and the physical properties of certain halogenated organophosphate esters.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 5 toxicity to adult mosquitos and residual properties of some pyrethroids	Evaluation of compounds for their insecticidal activity against adult mosquitoes 5 toxicity to adult mosquitoes and the residual properties of selected pyrethroids.
3	procedures for the assay of carbenicillin in body fluids	Procedures for measuring carbenicillin in body fluids.
3	the nature of the antigenic determinant in a genetic control of the antibody response	The nature of the antigenic determinant in a genetic control of antibody response.
3	physical and chemical changes in isolated chylomicrons prevention by edta	"""Physical changes-chemicals in isolated chylomicrons prevention by edta,"" J. Toxicol."
3	subterminal oxidation of aliphatic hydrocarbons	Subterminal oxidation of the aliphatic hydrocarbons.
3	evaluation of various substances to prevent adsorption of tuberculin purified protein derivative ppd to glass surfaces	Evaluation of various substances to prevent spinal cord injury; adsorption of tuberculin purified protein derivative ppd to the glass surface.
3	on the reconstitution of the crystalline components of the sea urchin fertilization membrane	The crystalline components of the sea urchin fertilization membrane are reconstituted.
3	direct isolation of the hyaline layer protein released from the cortical granules of the sea urchin egg at fertilization	To isolate directly the protein of the hyaline layer released from the cortical granules of the eggs; egg d' sea urchin during fertilization.
3	polyacetal carboxylic acids a new group of antiviral polyanions	Polyacetal carboxylic acids, a new group of polyanions antiviral.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation i measurement of oxidation by ultraviolet spectrophotometry and the thiobarbituric acid test	Ascorbic acid and copper in apos; linoleate oxidation i measurements of apos; ultraviolet spectrophotometry and test of apos; thiobarbituric acid.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation ii ascorbic acid and copper as oxidation catalysts	Ascorbic acid and copper in apo; linoleate ii oxidation L' ascorbic acid and copper as catalysts of apo; oxidation.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation 3 catalysts in combination	L' ascorbic acid and copper in the cell; linoleate oxidation catalyzes 3 in combination.
3	mass spectral discrimination between monoenoic and cyclopropanoid and between normal iso and anteiso fatty acid methyl esters	Mass spectral discrimination between methyl esters of monoenoic and cyclopropanoic fatty acids and between normal and anteiso is a distinction between methyl esters of fatty acids.
3	metabolism of tryptophan by pseudomonas aureofaciens 3 production of substituted pyrrolnitrins from tryptophan analogues	Tryptophan metabolism by pseudomonas aureofaciens 3 produces substituted pyrrolnitrins from tryptophan analogs.
3	reactive phosphate ester of the carcinogen 2 n hydroxy acetamido fluorene	Reactive phosphoric ester carcinogen 2 n hydroxy acetamido fluorene.
3	bactericidal action of 2 hydroxy 3 cyclohexylpropyl 1 4 naphthoquinone on bacillus megaterium	Bactericidal action of 2 hydroxy 3 cyclohexylpropyl 14 naphthoquinone on the megaterium bacillus.
3	some physical chemical and insecticidal properties of some o o dialkyl 3 5 6 trichloro 2 pyridyl phosphates and phosphorothioates	Some physical properties-chemicals and insecticides of certain phosphate and phosphorothioate d' o dialkyl 3 5 6 trichloro 2 pyridyl.
3	metabolism of benzoic acid by bacteria 3 5 cyclohexadiene 1 2 diol 1 carboxylic acid is an intermediate in the formation of catechol	The metabolism of l' benzoic acid by the bacterium 3,5 cyclohexadiene 1 2 diol 1 l' carboxylic acid is an intermediate in catechol formation.
3	configuration of the c 20 epimer of 7 8 dihydrobatrachotoxinin a	Configuration of the apos; epimer c 20 dihydrobatrachotoxin 7-8 a.
3	the non enzymic hydroxylation of phenylalanine to tyrosine by 2 amino 4 hydroxy 6 7 dimethyl 5 6 7 8 tetrahydropteridine	L' non-enzymatic hydroxylation of phenylalanine to tyrosine by 2 amino-4-hydroxy-6-dimethyl-5-7, 7-tetrahydropteridine.
3	a study of the formation of fluorescent derivatives of 4 hydroxyphenethylamine tyramine 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenethylamine 3 methoxytyramine and related compounds by reaction with hydrazine in the presence of nitrous acid	Study of the formation of the fluorescent derivatives of 4 hydroxyphenethylamine tyramine 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenethylamine 3 methoxytyramine and related compounds by reaction with l' hydrazine in the presence of apos; nitrous acid.
3	oligothymidylates formation by thermal condensation of o 2 5 cyclothymidine 3 phosphate	Formation of apos; oligothymidylates by thermal condensation of o 25 cyclothymidine 3 phosphate.
3	5 fluoro 2 deoxyuridylate covalent complex with thymidylate synthetase	Covalent complex fluoro 2 deoxyuridylate with the thymidylate synthetase.
3	structure activity relationships in some series of 2 alkyl 1 2 3 benzotriazinium compounds	D&apos relationships; structure activity in a few series of 2 benzotriazinium alkyl compounds.
3	on the mechanism of action of vitamin b 12 model studies thermal rearrangement of methyl 3 3 dimethylglycidate to methyl levulinate	The thermal rearrangement of methyl dimethylglycidate 3 to methyl levulinate is studied by a model on the action of vitamin b12.
3	microbial hydroxylation of 5 anilino 1 2 3 4 thiatriazole	Microbial hydroxylation of 5 anilino 134 thiatriazole.
3	purification and properties of 4 hydroxy 2 ketopimelate aldolase from acinetobacter	Purification and properties of 4 hydroxy 2 ketopimelate aldolase d' acinetobacter.
3	microbial transformation of methyl 5 6 butyl 2 benzimidazolecarbamate	Microbial transformation of methyl benzimidazolecarbamate 5-6 butyl.
3	activity of 6 methyl 8 substituted ergolines against the 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene induced mammary carcinoma	Breast carcinoma was induced by L' activity of 6 methyl 8-substituted ergolines against 712 anthracene dimethylbenz.
3	a new antibiotic xk 62 2 iii the structure of xk 62 2 a new gentamicin c complex antibiotic	A novel antibiotic xk 62 2 iii the structure of xk 62 2 a novel complex antibiotic with gentamicin c.
3	microbial reduction of 1 3 dioxo 2 methyl 2 3 0oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane to form 1 beta hydroxy 3 oxo 2beta methyl 2alpha 3 oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane an intermediate for steroid total syntheses	Microbial reduction of 13 dioxo 2 methyl 2 3,0oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane to form 1 β-hydroxy 3 oxo 2 beta methyl 2alpha 3 oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane, an intermediate for total steroid synthesis.
3	hydrogen bonding abilities of 2 4 dithiouridine derivatives	Hydrogen binding capacity of 24 dithiouridine derivatives.
3	2 chloroethanol formation as evidence for a 2 chloroethyl alkylating intermediate during chemical degradation of 1 2 chloroethyl 3 cyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea and 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea	The formation of 2 chloroethanol as evidence of the presence of 2-chloroethylene; an alkylating 2-chloroethylene intermediate on the chemical degradation of 12 chloroethylene, 3 cyclohexylene, 1 nitrosourea, and 12 chloroethylene, 3 trans-4-methylcyclohexylene, 1 nitrosourea.
3	morphometry of endocrine organs 1 karyometry of the chicken thyroid gland following administration of zinc and bismuth complexes of substituted bisthiourea	Endocrine organ morphometry 1 chicken thyroid gland karyometry after administration of zinc complexes and substituted bisthiourea bismuth.
3	metabolic function and properties of 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid 1 hydroxylase from pseudomonas acidovorans	Metabolic functions and properties of pseudomonas acidovorans 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid 1 hydroxylase.
3	purification and properties of gentisate 1 2 dioxygenase from moraxella osloensis	The purification and properties of the moraxella osloensis gentisate 12 dioxygenase.
3	sulfhydryl reactivity mechanism of action of several antiviral compounds selenocystine 4 2 propinyloxy beta nitrostyrene and acetylaranotin	Sulfhydryl reactivity mechanisms of several antiviral selenocystin 4 2 propinyloxy beta nitrostyrene and acetylaranotin compounds.
3	metallointercalation reagents 2 hydroxyethanethiolato 2 2 2 terpyridine platinum ii monocation binds strongly to dna by intercalation	The metallointercalation reagents 2 hydroxyethanethiolato 2 2 terpyridine platinum ii monocation binds strongly to the apos; DNA by intercalation.
3	kinetics of drug decomposition part xxxvi stability of 10 1 methyl 4 piperazinylpropyl phenothiazine derivatives on the grounds of kinetics of thermal degradation and hammett equation	Kinetics of the decomposition of the drug, part xxxvi stability of 10 methyl derivatives-4 piperazinylpropyl phenothiazine on the basis of the kinetics of thermal degradation and l' hammett equation.
3	accumulation of an intermediate in dna synthesis by hep 2 cells treated with methyl methanesulfonate	Apos accumulation; an intermediate in apos synthesis; DNA by methyl methanesulfonate treated liver cells 2.
3	cyclization of 13beta ethyl 3 methoxy 17beta ol 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraen 14 one and its 17 acetate derivative	Cyclization of 13beta ethylene 3 methoxy 17beta ol 8-14 sec. 1-3-5-9 gonatetraene 14-1 and its acetate derivative 17.
3	preparation of androsta 2 4 dien 17beta ol	Preparation of androsta 2-4 diene 17beta ol androsta 4 diene 17beta.
3	metabolism of nitrosamines in vivo iv isolation of 3 hydroxy 1 nitrosopyrrolidine from rat urine after application of 1 nitrosopyrrolidine	Nitrosamine metabolism in vivo iv isolation of 3 hydroxy 1 nitrosopyrolidine from rat urine after application of 1 nitrosopyrolidine.
3	sulfamic acid cleaning solution for 4 4 methylene bisorthochloroaniline moca	Cleaning solution for 4 methylene bisorthochloroaniline moca.
3	assay and relationship of ht 2 toxin and t 2 toxin formation in liquid culture	Analysis and relationship of the toxin ht 2 and toxin t2 formation in liquid culture.
3	biological proton magnetic resonance and ultraviolet spectroscopic evidence for a molecular complex of actinomycin d and 10 11 dihydro 3h naphth 1 2 g indazol 7 ol	Proton nuclear magnetic resonance and ultraviolet spectroscopy revealed apos; a d&apos molecular complex; actinomycin d and 10 dihydro 11h naphth 1 g; indazol 7 ol.
3	the search for new drugs in the group of xanthine derivatives xxxviii 1 3 dimethyl 8 alkyl 6h 7h 10h 1 2 4 triazepino 4 3 f purine 2 4 1h 3h diones and their derivatives	Search for new drugs xanthine derivatives xxxviii 1 3 dimethyl 8 alkyl 6h 7h 10h 1h 2h 4 triazepino 4 3 f purine 2h 4h 3 h diones and their derivatives.
3	structure of the modified nucleoside q isolated from escherichia coli transfer ribonucleic acid 7 4 5 cis dihydroxy 1 cyclopenten 3 ylaminomethyl 7 deazaguanosine	Modified nucleoside structure isolated from apos; transfer ribonucleic acid from apos; escherichia coli 7 4 5 cis dihydroxy 1 cyclopentene 3 ylaminomethyl 7 deazaguanosine.
3	hydrolysis of nucleoside phosphates iv the metal ion nucleic base interaction in the cu2 promoted dephosphorylation of the 5 di and 5 triphosphates of cytidine inosine and guanosine and their protection toward hydrolysis by coordination to cu 2 2 bipyridyl 2	L' hydrolysis of nucleoside phosphates; interaction of metal ions with nucleic bases in cu2; dephosphorylation of 5 di and 5 triphosphates of cytidine inosine and guanosine and their protection against apos; co-coordination hydrolysis with cu 2 bipyridyl cu.
3	dissociation of bovine 6s procarboxypeptidase a by reversible condensation with 2 3 dimethyl maleic anhydride application to the partial characterization of subunit iii	Bovine procarboxypeptidase a dissociation 6s by reversible condensation with etapos; dimethyl maleic anhydride 2 3 applied to partial characterization of-unit iii.
3	a new parenteral cephalosporin sk f 59962 7 trifluoromethylthioacetamido 3 1 methyl 1h tetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid chemistry and structure activity relationships	A new parenteral cephalosporin sk f 59962 7 trifluoromethylthioacetamido 3 1 methyl 1 h tetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephalic acid 4 carboxylic acid and relationships between l' structural activity and chemistry.
3	synthesis and biological activity of pyrido 2 3 e 1 4 diazepine and of pyrido 2 3 b 1 4 diazepine	Synthesis and biological activity of pyrido 2, 3 and 14 diazepine and pyrido 2, 3 b 1, 4 diazepine.
3	new 2 methyldialkylammoniumalkylthio 4 p substituted phenyl 3h 1 5 benzodiazepine iodides with antibacterial activity note i	New methylkylammoniumalkylthio iodide 4 p substituted with phenyl 3h15 benzodiazepines with an apo note; antibacterial activity i.
3	production of 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 11 gonatetraen 14beta ol 17 ones and 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 11 gonatetraen 17alpha ol 14 ones by microbial enzymes	Production of 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 sec 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraene 14beta 17 uns and 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraene 17alpha 14 uns by microbial enzymes.
3	transformation of 2 2 anhydro 1 beta d arabinofuranosylcytosine induced by hydrogen peroxide	D&apos-induced hydrogen peroxide transformation of 2 anhydro 1 beta arabinofuranosylcytosine.
3	fluorescence reactions of fluorescamine with levodopa and its derivatives fluorescence assay of 3 methoxy 4 hydroxyphenylalanine in levodopa dosage forms	Fluorescence reactions of fluorescamine with levodopa and its test fluorescence derivatives of 3 methoxy-4 hydroxyphenylalanine in dosage forms of levodopa.
3	nmr investigations of proline and its derivatives 4 proton magnetic resonance parameters and structure of acetyl proline amide	The nmr of proline and its derivatives has allowed us to study the parameters of proton 4 nuclear magnetic resonance and the structure of l&apos amide acetyl proline.
3	synthesis of 9 o acetyl and 4 9 di o acetyl derivatives of the methyl ester of n acetyl beta d neuraminic acid methylglycoside their use as models in periodate oxidation studies	The synthesis of the 9 o acetyl and 4 o acetyl derivatives of apos; methyl ester of napos; nacetyl beta methylglycoside neuraminic acid is used as a model in the periodate oxidation studies.
3	the structure of n 3 phenyl 5 1 2 3 4 oxatriazolio phenylamide at 105 k	Phenylamide n-3-5-1-3-4 oxatriazolio phenylamide at 105 k.
3	identification of the chemical structures of schizoflavins as 7 8 dimethyl 10 2 3 4 trihydroxy 4 formylbutyl isoalloxazine and 7 8 dimethyl 10 2 3 4 trihydroxy 4 carboxybutyl isoalloxazine	The chemical structures of schizoflavins have been identified as 7,8 dimethyl 10, 2, 3, 4 trihydroxy 4, formylbutyl isoalloxazine and 7,8 dimethyl 10, 2, 3, 4 trihydroxy 4, carboxybutyl isoalloxazine.
3	metabolism of some ethylenediamine derivatives with antiarrhythmic properties i absorption distribution in tissues and excretion of 14 c labelled n n bis 3 p methoxyphenoxy 2 hydroxypropyl ethylenediamine dimethanesulphonate mk 142 in rats	Metabolism of a few derivatives of l' ethylenediamine with antiarrhythmic properties; absorption into tissues and excretion of 14 c labelled n = 3 p = 2 p = 2 p = 2 p = 2 hydroxypropyl ethylenediamine dimethanesulfonate mk = 142 in the rat.
3	4 h 1 2 4 triazole derivatives with expected biological activity	Triazole derivatives of which biological activity is expected.
3	4 h 1 2 4 triazole derivatives with expected biological activity part iv synthesis of substituted 3 4 5 triaryl 1 2 4 triazoles	Triazole derivatives with expected biological activity, partial iv synthesis of 3,45, 1,2,4-triaryl-substituted triazoles.
3	studies on tocopherol derivatives v intestinal absorption of several d 1 3 4 3h2 alpha tocopheryl esters in the rat	Studies of the tocopherol derivatives and l' intestinal absorption of several 1-d, 3-h2 tocopherylated alpha esters in rats.
3	metabolism of 1 3 trifluoromethylphenyl 3 2 hydroxyethyl quinazoline 2 4 1h 3h dione h 88 i species differences in metabolism	Metabolism of 13 trifluoromethylphenyl 3 2 hydroxyethyl quinazoline 2 4.11 h 3 h h h dione h 88 specific differences in metabolism.
3	synthesis and properties on some 2 4 and 5 aminopyrimidines effect of nh2 and ortho c methylation on protolytic equilibria and electronic absorption spectra	The synthesis and properties of some aminopyrimidines 4 and 5 have a nh2 and c-methylation effect on protolytic equilibria and electron absorption d&apos spectra.
3	the molecular structure of 3 methoxy 9 10 leads to 19 abeo 1 3 5 10 estratrien 17 one	The molecular structure of 3 methoxy 910 gives 19 abeo 13510 estratriene 17.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of new pyridine derivatives 2 6 bis diphenyl and dibenzyl hydroxymethyl piperidines	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of new pyridine 2,6-bisdiphenyl and dibenzylhydroxymethylpiperidines derivatives.
3	search for potential amoebicides part iv some hydrazones derivatives of 2 nitro 4 5 dimethoxybenzhydrazide and of 1 4 bis alpha o acetylhydrazino phenethyl piperazine	Look for possible ambicides Part iv some hydrazones derived from 2 nitro 4 5 dimethoxybenzhydrazide and 1 bis alpha o acetylhydrazino phenethyl piperazine.
3	chemistry of nitrosoureas decomposition of deuterated 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea	Nitrosourea decay chemistry 13 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 deuterated nitrosourea.
3	the conversion of benzo alpha pyrene 4 5 oxide into 4 hydroxybenzo alpha pyrene in the presence of polyriboguanylic acid	Conversion of benzo alpha pyrene 4 oxide 5 to 4 hydroxybenzo alpha pyrene in the presence of d'apos; polyriboguanyl acid.
3	determination of 2 acetamido 2 deoxy d galactose and mechanism of formation of chromogens	Determination of 2 acetamido 2 deoxy galactose and mechanism of formation of chromogens.
3	treatment of diabetes insipidus with 1 deamino 8 d arginine vasopressin	Treatment of diabetes insipidus with 1 arginine vasopressin 8 desamino.
3	electron impact induced reactions of n6 3 methyl 2 butenyl adenosine and related cytokinins	L' electron impact induced reactions of n6 methyl 2-butenyladenosine and related cytokinins.
3	a search for antitumor compounds xi biologic studies antitumor properties of 19 new 9 aminoacridine and 1 or 3 nitro 9 aminoacridine derivatives	Investigation of Antitumor Compounds xi biological studies of the antitumor properties of 19 new derivatives of l' aminoacridine 9 and 1 or 3 l&apos derivatives; aminoacridine 9 nitro 9.
3	methylation analysis of glucosaminitol and glucosaminyl glucosaminitol disaccharides formation of 2 deoxy 2 n acetylacetamido glucitol derivatives	Methylation analysis of glucosaminitol and glucosaminyl glucosaminitol disaccharides yields 2 deoxy derivatives 2 n acetylacetamido glucitol.
3	the association of yeast phosphoglycerate kinase ec 2 7 2 3	Yeast phosphoglycerate kinase association ec 2.
3	synthesis of l fucose 2 3 and 4 sulphates	Synthesis of sulfates fucose 2, 3 and 4 of sulfate.
3	the effect of several 2 alkyl and 4 o methylanalogs of pyridoxol on mouse liver pyridoxal kinase activity	L' effect of several analogues 2 alkyl and 4 o methyl of pyridoxol on the apos; hepatic pyridoxal kinase activity of mouse.
3	antimetabolites produced by microorganisms xv synthesis of 2 methyl l arginine 2 methyl l ornithine and their enantiomers	Antimetabolites produced by xv syntheses of 2 methyl arginine 2 methyl l ornithine and their enantiomers.
3	biotransformation of 1 4 chlorophenyl 3 3 dimethyltriazene into 3 chloro 4 hydroxyaniline intramolecular hydroxylation induced chlorine migration during a catabolic degradation of a chemical carcinogen	The biotransformation of 14 chlorophenyl 3 - dimethyltriazene to 3 chloro 4 hydroxyaniline by intramolecular hydroxylation induces chlorine migration during the chemical carcinogen d&apos catabolite degradation.
3	type 1 and 2 synaptic junctions differences in distribution of concanavalin a binding sites and stability of the junctional adhesion	Differences in concanavalin a distribution in type 1 and 2 synaptic junctions and l&apos stability; junctional adhesion.
3	synthesis and some pharmacological properties of 2 tryptophan oxytocin	Synthesis and some pharmacological properties of 2 tryptophan products @-@ocytocin.
3	interaction of the carcinogen 3 3 dimethyl 1 phenyltriazene with nucleic acids of various rat tissues and the effect of a protein free diet	L' interaction of carcinogen 3-3 dimethyl 1 phenyltriazene with nucleic acids from various tissues of rats and l' protein-free diet.
3	comparison of the products of the reaction of 7 methylbenz a anthracene 5 6 oxide and rna with those formed in 7 methylbenz a anthracene treated cells	Comparison of the products from the reaction of 7 methylbenz to anthracene 56 and rna with those formed in 7 anthracene- and 7-methylbenz-treated cells.
3	studies on 4 hydroperoxycyclophosphamide nsc 181815 a simple preparation method and its application for the synthesis of a new class of activated sulfur containing cyclophosphamide nsc 26271 derivatives	Studies on l' hydroperoxycyclophosphamide 4 nsc 181815 a simple preparation method and its application to the synthesis of d' a new class of activated sulfur derivatives containing cyclophosphamide nsc 26271.
3	fragmentation of 3 oximino 4 chromanone	Fragmentation of 3 oximino-4 chromanone.
3	synthesis of new derivatives of the 4 5 diphenyloxazole series	Synthesis of new 4 series derivatives @-@5 diphenyloxazole.
3	new derivatives of 2 carboxychromanone 4 as potential antiinflammatory drugs i cis and trans beta 2 4 dihydroxybenzoylacrylic acids and their derivatives	New carboxychromanone derivatives 2-4 as potential anti-inflammatory i beta 2 cis and trans dihydroxybenzoylacrylic acids 4 and their derivatives.
3	spectinomycin modification i 7 epi 9 deoxy 4 r dihydrospectinomycin	Modification of Spectinomycin i 7 epi 9 deoxy 4 r dihydrospectinomycin.
3	some chemical and pharmacological properties of 2 methyl 5h 1 benzopyrano 2 3 b pyrid 5 one	Some chemical and pharmacological properties of 2 methyl 5h 1 benzopyrano 2 3 b pyrid 5.
3	formation of ethylenethiourea from 5 6 dihydro 3h imidazo 2 1 c 1 2 4 dithiazole 3 thione by microorganisms and reducing agents	Formation of ethylenethiourea from 5,6 dihydro 3h imidazo 2,1 c 1,14 dithiazole 3 thione by microorganisms and by reducing agents.
3	reversed ester analogues of pethidine isomeric 4 acetoxy 1 2 6 trimethyl 4 phenylpiperidines	Invert the analogous esters of the isomeric pethidine 4 acetoxy 1, 6 trimethyl 4 phenylpiperidines.
3	toxicity and mutagenicity of 2 4 6 trinitrotoluene and its microbial metabolites	Toxicity and mutagenicity of 24.6 trinitrotoluene and its microbial metabolites.
3	hydrolysis in 2 chloro 2 deoxy nucleosides nucleotides and polynucleotides to arabinose derivatives	Chloro nucleoside hydrolysis-2 deoxy and polynucleotides to arabinose derivatives.
3	alternative products in the reaction of 2 nitro 5 thiocyanatobenzoic acid with thiol groups	Alternatives in the reaction of l' nitro acid,-2 thiocyanatobenzoic acid, 5 with thiol groups.
3	preparation of fully active ficin from ficus glabrata by covalent chromatography and characterization of its active centre by using 2 2 depyridyl disulphide as a reactivity probe	Preparation of a fully active ficin from ficus glabrata by covalent chromatography and characterization of its active center using 2-depyridyl disulfide as a reactivity probe.
3	metabolism of 4c crufomate 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methyl methylphosphoramidate by the sheep	Sheep metabolism of crufomate 4c 4 tbutyl 2-chlorophenylmethylphosphoramidate.
3	mass spectral characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of crufomate 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methyl methylphosphoramidate metabolites	Mass spectrometric characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of chlorophenyl methylphosphoramidate metabolites, crufomate 4 tbutyl 2.
3	a search for new anticonvulsant compounds among 3 aryl 5 benzylidene derivatives of 2 thiohydantoin	Searches for new anticonvulsant compounds among 3 aryl benzylidene derivatives 5 and 2 thiohydantoin derivatives 5.
3	synthesis and rearrangements of d glucosyl esters of aspartic acid linked through the 1 or 4 carboxyl group	Synthesis and rearrangements of the d glucosyl esters of l' aspartic acid bound by the carboxyl groups 1 or 4.
3	the reaction of 7alpha 8beta dihydroxy 9beta 10beta epoxy 7 8 9 10 tetrahydrobenzo a pyrene with dna	The reaction of 7alpha 8beta dihydroxy 9beta 10beta epoxy 7-8-9-tetrahydrobenzo a pyrene with DNA.
3	selective n actylation of gentamicin antibiotics synthesis of 1 n acyl derivatives	N selective actylation of gentamicin antibiotic synthesis of acylated 1 n derivatives.
3	some new congeners of the anticancer agent 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea bcnu synthesis of bifunctional analogs and water soluble derivatives and preliminary evaluation of their chemotherapeutic potential	Some new ester congeners; anti-cancer agent 13bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea bcnu synthesis of bifunctional analogues and soluble derivatives; water and preliminary evaluation of their chemotherapeutic potential.
3	a radioimmunoassay method for 1 beta d arabinofuranosyluracil using antibodies directed against 1 beta d arabinofuranosylcytosine	Beta dapos radioimmunoassay; arabinofuranosyluracil 1 with apos; antibodies to beta dapos; arabinofuranosylcytosine 1.
3	coumarins xiv high resolution mass spectra of 3 4 disubstituted 3 4 dihydroseselins	Coumarins xiv high-resolution mass spectra of 3,4 of the disubstituted dihydroseselines.
3	anti inflammatory and antiproteolytic properties of 1 1 naphthylacetyl 3 substituted carbamides	Anti-inflammatory and anti-proteolytic properties of naphthylacetyl 3 and 1-substituted carbamides.
3	microbial transformation of 2 4 6 trinitrotoluene and other nitroaromatic compounds	Microbial transformation of 2,4,6 trinitrotoluene and d' other nitroaromatic compounds.
3	a new aminoglycoside antibiotic complex the seldomycins iii the structures of seldomycin factors 1 and 2	A new antibiotic aminoglycoside complex, seldomycin iii, structure of factors 1 and 2 of seldomycin.
3	metabolism of the pancreatic carcinogens n nitroso bis 2 oxopropyl amine and n nitroso bis 2 hydroxypropyl amine in the syrian hamster	Metabolism of pancreatic carcinogens n nitroso bis 2 oxopropylamine and n nitroso bis 2 hydroxypropylamine in Syrian hamster.
3	synthesis of 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro 2 4 dioxoquinazoline derivatives for pharmacological study	Synthesis of the derivatives 1-2-3-4 tetrahydro-2-4 dioxoquinazoline for pharmacological study.
3	methylation of adenosine in strongly alkaline medium preparation and properties of o methyl derivatives of adenosine and n6 methyladenosine	Methylation of l' adenosine in a highly alkaline preparation and properties of l' adenosine and n6 methyladenosine.
3	evaluation of 2 benzylidenecyclohexanones and 2 6 bis benzylidene cyclohexanones for antitumor and cytotoxic activity and as inhibitors of mitochondrial function in yeast metabolism studies of e 2 benzylidenecyclohexanone	Evaluation of 2-benzylidenecyclohexanones and 2-bis-benzylidene cyclohexanones for antitumor and cytotoxic activity and as inhibitors of mitochondrial function in yeast metabolism studies of 2-benzylidenecyclohexanone.
3	hypocholesterolemic agents iii inhibition of beta hydroxy beta methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase by half acid esters of 1 4 biphenylyl pentanol	Hypocholesterolemic Agents iii inhibition of beta-hydroxybeta methylglutaryl coenzyme reductase by esters half-acids of 14 pentanol biphenyl.
3	new compounds derivatives of methyl 2 aminoacetyl 4 5 dimethoxyphenylacetate	New compounds derived from methyl etapos; aminoacetyl 2, 4, 5, dimethoxyphenylacetate 5.
3	permanganate ion oxidations ix manganese intermediates complexes in the oxidation of 2 4 1h 3h pyrimidinediones	Oxidation of the apo; permanganate ion complex intermediate manganese ion in the apo; oxidation of pyrimidinediones pyrimidinediones by 24 hours.
3	antagonists of vitamin b6 simultaneous and stepwise modification of the 2 and 4 positions	Vitamin b6 antagonists modified both positions 2 and 4 simultaneously and stepwise.
3	2 carboxy 1 4 dihydro 4 oxoquinolyl oxamic acids and 2 carboxy 1 4 dihydro 4 oxobenzo h quinolyl oxamic acids as antiallergy agents	Two carboxy-1,4-dihydro-4-oxoquinolyloxamic acids and two carboxy-1,4-dihydro-4-oxobenzo-hquinolyloxamic acids as antiallergic agents.
3	synthesis and antiinflammatory activity of some 2 substituted 4 and 7 benzoxazoleacetic and alpha methylacetic acids	Synthesis and anti-@-@ inflammatory activity of 2 and 7 benzoxazoleacetic acids and alpha methylacetic acids.
3	semisynthetic cephalosporins synthesis and structure activity relationships of analogues with 7 acyl groups derived from 2 cyanomethylthio acetic acid or 2 2 2 2 trifluoroethyl thio acetic acid and their sulfoxides and sulfones	Semi-synthetic synthesis of cephalosporins and d&apos relationships; structure activity of analogues with 7 acyl groups derived from 2 cyanomethylthioacetic acid or 2 2 trifluoroethylthioacetic acid, and their sulfoxides and sulfones.
3	effect of sulfur substitution for the noncarbonyl oxygen in hemicholinium 3 and acetyl seco hemicholinium 3 synthesis biological activity and structure toxicity relationships	Effect of sulfur substitution of apos; noncarbonyl oxygen in apos; hemicholinium 3 and synthesis of apos; acetyl seco hemicholinium 3 on apos; biological activity and structural toxicity relationships.
3	5 11 dimethyl 2 9 bis phenylacetyl 5 11 diazatetracyclo 6 2 2 0 2 7 0 4 9 dodecane a potent novel analgesic	Dimethyl 2,9 bis phenylacetyl 5,111 diazatetracyclo 6,202,704,9 dodecane, a powerful new pain reliever.
3	synthesis of analogues of n 2 chloroethyl n trans 4 methylcyclohexyl n nitrosourea for evaluation as anticancer agents	Synthesis d' analogues of 2-chloroethyl n-trans-4-methylcyclohexyl n-nitrosourea for evaluation as anti-cancer agents.
3	intrachain reactions of a pair of reactive groups attached to polymer ends 3 intrachain charge transfer complex on polysarcosine chains having terminal electron donor and terminal electron acceptor groups in chloroform solution	The intrachain reactions d' a pair of reactive groups attached to a polymer terminate in an intrachain charge transfer complex on polysarcosine chains having donor groups d' terminal electrons and acceptor groups d' terminal electrons in solution in chloroform.
3	2 3 carbonates in the synthesis of uridine 5 deoxy and 2 5 dideoxy derivatives	Carbonates in the synthesis of uridine derivatives 5 deoxy and 25 didesoxy.
3	reaction of diazoalkanes with 1 substituted 2 4 dioxopyrimidines formation of o2 n 3 and o4 alkyl products	Reaction of the diazoalkanes with 1 dioxopyrimidines 4 leads to the formation of the o2 n 3 and o4 alkyl compounds.
3	the metabolism and toxicity of halogenated carbanilides biliary metabolites of 3 4 4 trichlorocarbanilide and 3 trifluoromethyl 4 4 dichlorocarbanilide in the rat	The metabolism and toxicity of halogenated carbanilides biliary metabolites of 3,4-trichlorocarbanilide and 3,4-trifluoromethyl-4-dichlorocarbanilide in the rat.
3	2 diazo 3 3 3 trifluoropropionyl chloride reagent for photoaffinity labeling	Trifluoropropionyl chloride reagent 2 diazo 3-3 for photoaffinity labeling.
3	deletion of hinge region of human myeloma igg1 molecule protein lec associated with nonexpression of g1m 3 and km 1 2 allotypes a possible genetic explanation at the dna level	Removal of the hinge region of the protein molecule lec of the human myeloma igg1 associated with the non--expression of allotypes g1m 3 and km 1, 2, a possible genetic explanation at the level of DNA.
3	synthesis of 1 4 naphthoquinones 4 aryl aroyl hydrazones of potential antimicrobial activity	Synthesis of 14 naphthoquinones 4 aryl aroyl hydrazones d' potential antimicrobial activity.
3	reaction of peptide 89 169 of bovine myelin basic protein with 2 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine	Peptide 89,169 of bovine myelin basic protein reacts with 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine.
3	synthesis and properties of mesoionic pyrimido 1 2 b a1pyridazine 2 4 diones and mesoionic pyridazino 2 3 a a1 s trizine 2 4 diones mesoionic analogs structurally related to fervenulin	Synthesis and properties of the mesoionic pyrimido 1-2 b a1pyridazine 2-4 diones and mesoionic pyridazino 2-3 a1 s trizine 2-4 mesoionic analogs structurally related to fervenulin.
3	stereochemistries of geometric isomers of 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenylvinyl phenol 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenyylamine corrections of the literature	The stereochemics of the geometric isomers of 4 bromo 1 2 diphenylvinyl phenol 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenylamine corrections in the literature.
3	studies on bovine adrenal estrogen sulfotransferase iii facile synthesis of 3 phospho and 2 phosphoadenosine 5 phosphosulfate	Studies of l&apos sulfotransferase; bovine adrenal estrogen iii facile synthesis of 3 phospho and 2 phosphoadenosine 5 phosphosulfate.
3	ir spectroscopic characterization of 2 thiohydantoins and 2 thiobarbiturates	Ir spectroscopic characterization of two thiohydantoins and two thiobarbiturates.
3	the isolation and identification of 2 methyl 2 4 thiazolidine dicarboxylate as a by product in the conversion of cysteine to glucose in the perfused rat liver	L' isolation and l' identification of the 2-methyl @-@-2-thiazolidine 4 dicarboxylate as a by-product in the conversion of cysteine to glucose in perfused rat liver.
3	7 2 aminomethylphenylacetamido 3 1 carboxymethyltetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid	Aminomethylphenylacetamido 3 1 carboxymethyltetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cepheme 4 carboxylic acid.
3	the reactions of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate with thiols and the holoenzyme of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and of inorganic phosphate with the acyl holoenzyme	Reactions of glyceraldehyde phosphate 3 with thiols and l' glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and inorganic phosphate holoenzyme with l' acyl.
3	the highly electrophilic character of 4 chloro 7 nitrobenzofurazan and possible consequences for its application as a protein labelling reagent	The highly electrophilic nature of nitrobenzofurazane 4 chloro 7 and its possible consequences for its application as a reagent for protein labeling.
3	investigations of the reaction kinetics in the formation of 7 chloro 2n nitrosomethylamino 5 phenyl 3h 1 4 benzodiazepine 4 oxide author s transl	Study of the kinetics of the reaction in the formation of 7 chloro 2n nitrosomethylamino 5 phenyl 3 h 1 h 4 benzodiazepine 4 s-translating-oxide.
3	kinetics and mechanisms of hydrolysis of 1 4 benzodiazepines ii oxazepam and diazepam	Kinetics and Mechanisms; Hydrolysis of 14 benzodiazepines ii oxazepam and diazepam.
3	polarographic study of new antibacterial isoxazolium salts 2 3 dialkyl 5 arylisoxazolium perchlorates	Polarographic study of perchlorate d' isoxazolium 2 3 dialkyl 5 arylisoxazolium antibacterial.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of some new 1 1 diarylacetic acid derivatives	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of some new derivatives 1 of l' diarylacetic acid.
3	research on nitrogen heterocyclic compounds x new method of synthesis of pyrrolo 1 2 a quinoline and its derivatives	Research on heterocyclic nitrogen compounds x new method for the synthesis of pyrrolo 1 a quinoline and its derivatives.
3	synthesis of 2 aminoisoindolin 1 ones with or without 6 substituents	Synthesis of 2 aminoisoindoline 1 with or without 6 amino substituents.
3	synthesis and pharmacological study of various 2 alkylaminoalkyl mercapto 5 aryl 1 3 4 oxadiazoles	A synthesis and pharmacological study of various 2 alkylaminoalkyl mercapto 5 aryl 1-3 oxadiazoles.
3	synthesis of 1 4 benzodiazepine and 1 5 benzodiazocine through oxidative fission of the double bond of indole derivatives	A synthesis of 14 benzodiazepine and 15 benzodiazocine by oxidative fission of the double bonding of l&apos derivatives; indole.
3	chemical and pharmacological research on pyran derivatives vii derivatives of naphto 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 c pyrazole and of 12h naphto 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 d pyrimidine	Chemical and pharmacological research on pyran derivatives vii derived from naphtho 1 5 6 pyran 2 3 c pyrazole and naphtho 1 5 6 pyran 2 3 d pyrimidine.
3	the crystal structure of 3 hydroxy 3 isobutyl 2 pyrrolidone 5 carboxylic acid lactam of 4 hydroxy 4 isobutylglutamic acid from reseda odorata l	The crystal structure of 3 hydroxy 3 isobutyl 2 pyrrolidone 5 lactam d' 4 isobutylglutamic carboxylic acid 4 reseda odorata l.
3	nucleosides cvi syntheses of 1 n methyl 5 beta d ribofuranosyl uracil 1 n methyl phi uridine and its identity with a metabolite elaborated by streptomyces platensis var clarensis	The cvi nucleosides synthesize 1 n methyl-5 beta ribofuranosyl uracil 1 n methyl phi uridine and their identity with a metabolite developed by streptomyces platensis var clarensis.
3	synthesis and biological activities of some 7 1 2 4 oxadiazolylacetylamino cephalosporins	Synthesis and biological activities of some 71,143 oxadiazolylacetylamino cephalosporins.
3	synthesis of certain 4 oxo 1 2 3 4 tetrahydroquinoline and benzazocine derivatives likely to possess analgesic activity	Synthesis of selected 4 oxo 1 2 3 4 tetrahydroquinoline and benzazocine derivatives, which may have an analgesic activity.
3	effect of overheating products of wood hydrolysis on 3 4 benzpyrene output	Effect of overheating of apo products; hydrolysis of wood on 3-4 benzpyrene.
3	metabolism of quaternary carbon compounds 2 2 dimethylheptane and tertbutylbenzene	Quaternary carbonaceous metabolism 2 dimethylheptane and tertbutylbenzene 2.
3	microbiological degradation of bile acids metabolites formed from 3 3a alpha hexahydro 7a beta methyl 1 5 dioxoindan 4 alpha yl propionic acid by streptomyces rubescens	Microbiological degradation of bile acid metabolites formed from 3a alpha hexahydro 7a beta-methyl 15 dioxoindan 4 alpha-@ yl-propionic acid by streptomyces rubescens.
3	derivatives of 2 bromo 6beta fluoropregna 1 4 diene 3 20 dione and their antiinflammatory activity	Derivatives of 2 bromo 6beta fluoropregna 1-4 diene 320 dione and their anti--inflammatory activity.
3	elucidation of the structure of the antineoplastic agents 2 formylpyridine and 1 formylisoquinoline thiosemicarbazones	Structural elucidation of the antineoplastic agents 2 formylpyridine and 1 formylisoquinoline thiosemicarbazones.
3	kinetics and mechanisms of hydrolysis of 1 4 benzodiazepines iii nitrazepam	Kinetics and mechanism(s); hydrolysis of 14 benzodiazepines iii nitrazepam.
3	comparative stereochemistry in the aziridine ring openings of n methylmitomycin a and 7 methoxy 1 2 n methylaziridino mitosene	Comparison of the stereochemistry of methylmitomycin a and methoxy 712 n methylaziridino mitosene aziridine ring openings.
3	a proton magnetic resonance investigation on 1 1 cytidine and guanosine silver i complexes	Proton nuclear magnetic resonance studies of the i1 complexes of cytidine and guanosine silver 1 have been carried out.
3	determination of benomyl carbendazim and 2 aminobenzimidazole 2 ab in plant materials part i apples red currants grapes kale and sugar beets	Determination of benomyl carbendazim and 2 aminobenzimidazole 2 ab in common cabbage and sugar beet red apples Part i plant material.
3	fluorescent probe studies of haptoglobin type 2 1	Apos fluorescent probe studies; haptoglobin type 2.
3	monomethylthio analogues of 1 2 4 5 trimethoxyphenyl 2 aminopropane	Monomethylthio analog of 1,255 trimethoxyphenyl 2-aminopropane.
3	regulation of peroxidation of mitochondrial membrane lipids initiated by fe2 ions by antoxidants of the 1 4 dihydropyridine series in experiments in vitro	The regulation of fe2-mediated peroxidation of mitochondrial membrane lipids by 14-series anoxidants dihydropyridine in in vitro experiments.
3	identification of 2 methyl 3 hydroxydecanoic and 2 methyl 3 hydroxytetradecanoic acids in the lipid x fraction of the bordetella pertussis endotoxin	Identification of 2 methyl 3 hydroxydecanoic acids and 2 methyl 3 hydroxytetradecanoic acids in lipid fraction x of l' bordetella pertussis endotoxin.
3	quinazolines and 1 4 benzodiazepines 81 s triazolo 4 3 a 1 4 benzodiazepines by oxidative cyclization of hydrazones	Quinazolines and 1 benzodiazepines 81 s triazolo 4-3 to 1 benzodiazepines by oxidative cyclization of the hydrazones.
3	2 formyl 1 4 benzodioxane preparation and reactivity	Preparation and reactivity of the 2-formyl-14 benzodioxanes.
3	anticonvulsant activity and selective inhibition of nad dependent oxidations by 1 4 disubstituted piperazines	Anticonvulsant activity and selective inhibition of nad-dependent oxidations by 14 disubstituted piperazines.
3	studies related to the metabolism of ergoline drugs structure determination and spectroscopic properties of 1 6 dimethyl 12 hydroxy 10alpha ergoline derivatives	Metabolism studies of structure determination and spectroscopic properties of derivatives 1-6 dimethyl 12 hydroxy 10alpha ergoline.
3	cyclic gaba gabob analogues ii synthesis of new 2 oxo and 2 5 dioxo delta3 pyrroline derivatives	Cyclic gabob analogues of gaba ii synthesize 2 oxo and 2 dioxo delta3 pyrroline derivatives.
3	cyclic hydrazides iv synthesis of 2 amino 3 4 dihydroisoquinolin 1 2h one	Cyclic hydrazides iv synthesis of 2 amino-3,4 dihydroisoquinoline 1:2 h 1.
3	2 acetyl 2 methyl 1 phenyl hydrazine a frequently occuring artifact in processing biological material after ingestion of drugs containing antipyrine author s transl	It is a common artifact in the treatment of biological material after the ingestion of drugs containing the antipyrine; it is a translative anti-pyrine.
3	potential biologically active agents x synthesis of 3 arylimino 2 indolinones and their 1 methyl and 1 morpholino piperidinomethyl derivatives as excystment and cysticidal agents against schizopyrenus russelli	Potentially biologically active agents x synthesis of 3 arylimino 2 indolinones and their 1 methylated and 1 morpholino piperidinomethyl derivatives as dekysting and cysticidal agents against schizopyrenus russelli.
3	hydroxylated metabolies of r s 1 tetrahydro 2 furanyl 5 fluorouracil ftorafur in rats and rabbits	Hydroxymetabolism of r 1 tetrahydro 2 furanyl 5 fluorouracil furoafur in rats and rabbits.
3	definition of cytochrome c binding domains by chemical modification ii identification and properties of singly substituted carboxydinitrophenyl cytochromes c at lysines 8 13 22 27 39 60 72 87 and 99	Characterization of cytochrome c binding domains by chemical modification ii Identification and properties of lysine-substituted c-carboxyldinitrophenyl cytochromes 8.
3	synthesis of 2 3 dinor pgfalpha metabolites	Metabolite synthesis pgfalpha at 2 dinors.
3	synthesis of 6 1 6 tri o mesitylenesulfonyl sucrose further examination of tri o tosylsucrose and the chemistry of 3 6 1 4 3 6 trianhydrosucrose	Synthesis of mesitylene sulfonyl sucrose, further examination of trio tosylsucrose and the chemistry of trianhydrosucrose.
3	inhibitors of bacillus subtilis dna polymerase iii 6 arylalkylamino uracils and 6 anilinouracils	Bacillus subtilis dna polymerase iii 6 uracils arylalkylamino and 6 anilinouracils inhibitors.
3	anomalous chemical shifts of methyl groups of 2 4 dimethylbenzo g quinoline	Anomalous chemical shifts of the methyl groups of 2,4-dimethylbenzo-g-quinoline.
3	imidazo 4 5 f quinolines iii antibacterial 7 methyl 9 substituted arylamino imidazo 4 5 f quinolines	Imidazo 4 quinolines 7 methyl 9 arylamino imidazo 4 quinolines 5 f quinolines 5 f quinolines.
3	bicyclic analogs of piperazine xii 1 synthesis of 3 8 diazabicyclo 3 2 1 octanes as potential antiparkinson agents	Bicyclic analogues of piperazine xii 1 syntheses 3-8 diazabicyclo 3-2 octanes as potential antiparkinson agents.
3	non steroid anti inflammatory agents stereoisomers of 2 4 biphenylyl 3 oxybutyric acid	Steroids anti-non-steroidal inflammatory of 24 biphenylyl 3 oxybutyric acid.
3	synthesis and antimitotic activity of 3 and 5 halogen substituted bis 2 aminophenyl disulfides and corresponding n alkyl derivatives	Synthesis and antimitotic activity of 3- and 5-halogen-substituted d' aminophenyl bis disulfides and corresponding n-alkyl derivatives.
3	synthesis of 2 substituted derivatives of 5h 1 2 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a 1 3 5 triazin 5 one	The synthesis of 2 substituted thiadiazolo derivatives from 5:12:3 to 13:5 triazine.
3	bufuralol a new beta adrenoceptor blocking agent part 1 synthesis and structure activity studies in a series of benzofuran 2 ethanolamines	Bufuralol, a novel beta-adrenergic receptor blocking agent, has carried out synthesis and d' structural activity of Part 1 in a series of benzofuranes 2 ethanolamines.
3	the possible utilization of the 1 amino 1 deoxy 2 ketose compounds between amino acids and carbohydrates as foodstuff integrators	Possible use of 1 amino 1 deoxy 2 ketose compounds between amino acids and carbohydrates as food integrators.
3	biopharmacological investigation of 6 6 methylene bis 2 2 4 trimethyl 1 2 dihydroquinoline mtdq a radical binding antioxidant of secondary amine type	Biopharmacological study of 6 methylene bis 2 4 trimethyl 1, 2 dihydroquinoline mtdq, a radical binding antioxidant of the secondary amine type.
3	polynitro aromatic compounds in analytical chemistry ii reaction of menadione with 2 4 dinitrophenylhydrazine	Polynitro aromatic compounds in analytical chemistry ii menadione reaction with 24 dinitrophenylhydrazine.
3	the effect on fungal growth of some 2 5 dihydroxy 1 4 benzoquinones	L' effect on the fungal growth of some 25 dihydroxy 14 benzoquinones.
3	interaction of poly 2 methyl 5 vinyl n ethylpyridinium bromide and heparin studied by means of ultraviolet and infrared spectroscopy	L' interaction of poly 2-methyl-5 vinyl n-ethylpyridinium with l' heparin was studied by ultraviolet and infrared spectroscopy.
3	interstrand cross linking of dna by 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea and other 1 2 haloethyl 1 nitrosoureas	The cross bond between the strands of l' DNA by 13 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea and 1 other 2-haloethyl 1 nitrosourea.
3	comparative electrophilicity mutagenicity dna repair induction activity and carcinogenicity of some n and o acyl derivatives of n hydroxy 2 aminoflourene	Comparison of potency; mutagenicity of apo; apo activity; repair induction of apo; DNA and carcinogenicity of selected n and o acyl derivatives of apo; hydroxy-2 aminoflourene.
3	kinetics and mechanism of degradation of some 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives part vi the use of hammett equation for kinetic investigation of 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives hydrolysis	The kinetics and the mechanism of degradation of some 2 derivatives of sulfanilamidopyrimidine part vi l' use of l' hammett equation for l' kinetic study of l' hydrolysis of 2 derivatives of sulfanilamidopyrimidine.
3	on the reactivities of the tryptophan residues of human alpha lactalbumin to 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide	On the reactivity of tryptophan residues of l' alpha human lactalbumin to d&apos bromide; hydroxy-2 nitrobenzyl.
3	evidence for bay region activation of chrysene 1 2 dihydrodiol to an ultimate carcinogen	Evidence of the apos; activation of the chrysene bay area 1-2 dihydrodiol to an ultimate carcinogen.
3	preparation of derivatives of l idose and l iduronic acid from 1 2 o isopropylidene alpha d glucofuranose by way of acetylenic intermediates	Preparation of glucofuranose derivatives; idose and idios; iduronic acid from 1 o isopropylidene alpha of glucofuranose, via acetylene intermediates.
3	some 1 2 diaminobenzene derivatives as reagents for gas chromatographic determination of selenium with an electron capture detector	Some 12 derivatives of diaminobenzene as reagents for the determination of selenium by an electron capture detector gas chromatography.
3	the 1h nmr spectra of mixed valence complexes of copper with derivatives of 1 amino 2 2 dimethyl 2 mercaptoethane	The 1h nmr spectra of copper mixed-valence complexes with 1 amino-2 dimethyl-2 mercaptoethane 2 derivatives are obtained by 1h nmr.
3	introduction of antigenic determining 2 4 dinitrophenyl residues into 4 thiouridine n3 3 l amino 3 carboxypropyl uridine and trna phe from e coli	Introduction of an antigen that determines 24 dinitrophenyl residues in 4 thiouridine n3 l carboxypropyl uridine and trna phe of e coli.
3	synthesis of oligonucleotides with sequences identical with or analogous to the 3 end of 16s ribosomal rna of escherichia coli preparation of m 6 2 a c c u c c and a c c u c m 4 2c via phosphotriester intermediates	It is recommended that the following be used as a starting point: synthesis of apos; oligonucleotides whose sequences are identical or analogous to those of apos; end 3 of ribosomes 16s of the preparation d'apos; escherichia coli of m 6 c c c c a c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c s s s s s s s s s s s s s s; intermediate phosphotriester intermediates.
3	substitution reactions of a water soluble metalloporphyrin with azide and 1 1 3 3 tetramethyl 2 thiourea	A metalloporphyrin substitution reagent soluble in apos; water with apos; azide and 133 tetramethyl 2 thiourea.
3	enzymic and immunochemical properties of lysozyme accurate definition of the antigenic site around the disulphide bridge 30 115 site 3 by surface simulation synthesis	Enzyme and immunochemical properties of the precise definition of lysozyme at the antigenic site around the disulfide bridge 30,115 site 3 by surface simulation synthesis.
3	structure elucidation of butyl 6alpha fluoro 11beta hydroxy 16alpha methyl 3 20 dioxo 1 4 pregnadien 21 oate fluocortin butylester author s transl	Structural elucidation of the translational butyl 6alpha fluoro 11beta hydroxy 16alpha methyl 320 dioxo 14 pregrenadiene 21 oate fluocortin butylester.
3	isolation and structure determination of the metabolites of 2 1 3 dimethyl xanthinyl 7 methyl 4 methyl morpholine a xantinol derivative from rat urine author s transl	Isolation and determination of the structure of metabolites of 2,13 dimethyl xanthinyl 7 methyl 4 morpholine, a derivative xantinol of l' rat urine.
3	sensitivity to a flame retardant tris 2 3 dibromopropyl phosphate firemaster lvt 23 p	Sensitivity to a fire retardant type 2-3 dibromopropyl phosphate Firemaster lvt 23 pt.
3	base and base sequence specificity of the binding of 4 hydroxyaminoquinoline 1 oxide to dna	Specificity of base and base sequence of apos-binding; d*apos oxide; hydroxyaminoquinoline 4-1 to apos; DNA.
3	oxidation products of n methyl 2 2 7 8 tetramethyl 6 amino chroman a model compound of n methyl gamma tocopheramine with potassium ferricyanide	The products d' oxidation of n methyl 2, 7, 8 tetramethyl 6 chromane is a model compound of n methyl gamma with potassium ferricyanide.
3	rac glycerol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphodiesterase a new soluble phosphodiesterase of mammalian tissues	Glycerol 1-2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphodiesterase, a new soluble mammalian tissue phosphodiesterase.
3	chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds two catechol 1 2 dioxygenases from a 3 chlorobenzoate grown pseudomonad	Chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds, two catechol 12 dioxygenases d' a pseudomonad grown in the presence of three chlorobenzoates.
3	chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds substituent effects on 1 2 dioxygenation of catechol	Chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds substituent effects on 12 catechol dioxygenation.
3	the effect of warfarin and vitamin k 1 on the carboxylation and glycosylation of prothrombin in vivo	L' effect of warfarin and vitamin k 1 on the in vivo carboxylation and glycosylation of prothrombin.
3	reaction of ovine prolactin with 2 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolemine	Reaction of ovine prolactin with 2 nitrophenylsulfenylsulfenyls-3 methyl-3 bromoindolemin.
3	synthesis and antitumor activity of halogen substituted 4 3 3 dimethyl 1 triazeno quinolines	Synthesis and antitumour activity of the substituted halogens 4 3 dimethyl 1 triazeno quinolines.
3	1 beta mercapto beta beta cyclopentamethylenepropionic acid 4 valine 8 d arginine vasopressin a potent and selective inhibitor of the vasopressor response to arginine vasopressin	A beta mercapto beta beta beta cyclopentamethylene propionic acid 4 valine 8 d arginine vasopressin, a potent selective inhibitor of vasopressin response to arginine vasopressin.
3	circular dichroism investigation of the l lysine n cu ii 1 1 systems with n 4 and n 25	Study of the circular dichroism of lysine 1 systems with n 4 and n 25 systems.
3	synthesis and biological activities of 10 substituted benzo b 1 5 naphthyridines	Synthesis and biological activities of 10 substituted naphthyridines.
3	reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formation of 2 3 dihydro 2 3 dihydroxyaflatoxin b1 from aflatoxin b1 by hepatic microsomes	Reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent on 2,3 dihydro 2,3 dihydroxyaflatoxin b1 from apos; aflatoxin b1 from liver microsomes.
3	nad p h dehydrogenase and its role in the vitamin k 2 methyl 3 phytyl 1 4 naphthaquinone dependent carboxylation reaction	Nad p h dehydrogenase and its role in the naphthaquinone-dependent carboxylation of vitamin k 2 methyl 3 phytyl 14 carboxylation.
3	catabolism of 2 4 5 trimethyoxybenzoic acid and 3 methoxycrotonic acid	Catabolism of 2,45, trimethyoxybenzoic acids, and 3 methoxycrotonic acids.
3	glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ixalpha in normal bile compared with post obstructive bile transformation of the 1 o acylglucuronide into 2 3 and 4 o acylglucuronides	The conjugates of l' bilirubin ixalpha glucuronic acid in normal bile compared to the bile transformation of l' acylglucuronide 1 o to acylglucuronides 3 and 4 o.
3	antimalarial 6 aminoquinolines vii 2 and 4 alkoxy derivatives of 6 4 diethylamino 1 methylbutylamino 5 8 dimethoxyquinoline author s transl	Antipaludean 6 aminoquinolines vii 2 and 4 alkoxy derivatives of 6 diethylamino 4 methylbutylamino 5 8 dimethoxyquinoline, transl.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of 1 3 and 5 substituted 2 pyrrolidinones	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of the substituted pyrrolidinones 1-3 and 5-2.
3	polarographic behaviour of 2 5 nitro 2 furyl 5 2 aminoethoxy pyrimidine derivatives	Polarographic behavior of 2 nitro 2 furyl 5 - aminoethoxy pyrimidine derivatives.
3	cancerostatics iii synthesis and some chemical transformations of 3 cyano 5 pyridyl 4 pyrid 2 one	Synthesis iii of cancer and some chemical transformations of cyano 3 pyridyl 5 pyridyl 4 pyridine 1.
3	acylation of benzoxazolin 2 ones and 3 hydroxy 1 2 benzisoxazoles	Benzoxazoline Acylation 2 unes et 3 hydroxy 1 2 benzisoxazoles.
3	synthesis of some 4 hydroxypiperazine and n n dibenzylhydroxylamine esters with potential local anaesthetic activity	Some 4 hydroxypiperazine and n dibenzylhydroxylamine esters with potential local anesthetic activity are synthesized.
3	synthesis of substituted 7 hydroxy 5h 1 3 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a pyrimidin 5 ones with anticipated antimicrobial activity	Synthesis of 7 hydroxy substituted 5h 1h 3h 4 thiadiazolo 3h 2 a pyrimidin 5 s with anticipated antimicrobial activity.
3	methoxylation of methyl 3alpha 7alpha dihydroxychol 4 en 24 oate and its 3beta epimer a contribution to chenodeoxycholic acid biogenesis	Methoxylation of methyl 3alpha 7alpha dihydroxychol 4 to 24 oate and its epimer 3beta contributes to the phenodeoxycholic acid biogenesis of l&apos.
3	effect of modification on physico chemical and biological properties of haptoglobin reaction with n bromusuccinimide and 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide	Effect of modification on physico-chemical and biological properties of l&apos reaction; haptoglobin with n bromusuccinimide and 2 nitrobenzyl bromide 5 hydroxy.
3	in vitro and in vivo evaluation of the toxicity of 1 4 naphthoquinone and 1 2 naphthoquinone derivatives against trypanosoma cruzi	In vitro and in vivo evaluation of the toxicity of 14 derivatives of naphthoquinone and 12 derivatives of naphthoquinone to trypanosome cruzi.
3	metabolism of 5 isopropyl 1 methyl 2 nitro 1h imidazole identification of some urinary metabolites in the dog	Metabolism of 5 isopropyl 1 methyl 2 nitro 1h imidazole identification of some of the urinary metabolites in the dog.
3	synthesis and antiinflammatory activity of 6 11 dihydro 11 oxodibenzo b e thiepinalkanoic acids and related compounds	Synthesis and anti-@-@inflammatory activity of 6 dihydro acids-11 oxodibenzo b e thiepinalkanoic acid and related compounds.
3	isolation of a new lipoxygenase metabolite of arachidonic acid 8 11 12 trihydroxy 5 9 14 eicosatrienoic acid from human platelets	Isolation of apos; a novel metabolite lipoxygenase from apos; arachidonic acid 8, 11, 12 trihydroxy 5, 9, 14 eicosatrienoic acid from human platelets.
3	cross linking of ribosomal proteins by 4 6 formyl 3 3 azidophenoxy butyrimidate a heterobifunctional cleavable cross linker	Cross-binding of ribosomal proteins by 46 formyl-33 azidophenoxy butyrimidate a cleavable heterobifunctional cross-linker.
3	reaction of ortho ortho dimethylphenacyl halides with formamide formation of 4 5 ortho ortho dimethylbenzoyl imidazoles	Reaction of ortho-dimethylphenacyl halides with formamide formation of 4 ortho-dimethylbenzoyl ortho-imidazoles.
3	bromination of 3 amino 1 2 4 benzothiadiazine 1 1 dioxide	Bromination of 3 amino 1, 2, 4 benzothiadiazine 1, 1 carbon dioxide.
3	the synthesis of methyl 3 alpha 7 alpha diacetoxy 11 oxo 5 beta cholan 24 oate	Synthesis of methyl 3 alpha 7 alpha diacetoxy 11 oxo 5 beta cholan 24 oate.
3	the oxygenation of 3 methyl 3h desacetoxycephalosporin c 7beta 5 d aminadipamido 3 methylceph 3 em 4 carboxylic acid to 3 hydroxymethyl 3h desacetylcephalosporin c by 2 oxoglutarate linked dioxygenases from acremonium chrysogenum and streptomyces clavuligerus	L' oxygenation of 3 methyl deacetoxycephalosporin c 3 h 7beta 5 d aminadipamido 3 methylceph 3 em 4 carboxylic acid 3 hydroxymethyl 3 h deacetylcephalosporin c by 2 linked oxoglutarate dioxygenases from apos; acremonium chrysogenum and streptomyces clavuligerus.
3	the metabolic fate of 2 14c folic acid and a mixture of 2 14c and 3 5 9 3h folic acid in the rat	The metabolic fate of l*apos; folic acid 2,14c and d*apos; a mixture of 2,14c and 3,59,3h in the rat.
3	treatment of lead poisoning by 2 3 dimercaptosuccinic acid	Treatment of apos; lead poisoning by 2-3 dimercaptosuccinic acid.
3	new cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta ketoacids i 7 beta ketoacylamino cephalosporins	New cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from keto acids beta i 7 beta cephalosporins beta-ketoacylamino.
3	new cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta ketoacids ii further modifications of 7 3 oxobutyrylamino cephalosporins	New cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from keto acids beta ii new modifications of 7 oxobutyrylamino cephalosporins.
3	synthesis and identification of products derived from the metabolism of the carcinostatic 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea by rat liver microsomes	Synthesis and identification of products derived from rat liver microsomal metabolism 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1.
3	affinity labeling of histamine n methyltransferase by 2 3 dialdehyde derivatives of s adenosylhomocysteine and s adenosylmethionine kinetics of inactivation	Marking of apos; affinity of apos; histamine n methyltransferase by 2 dialdehyde derivatives of apos; adenosylhomocysteine and apos; adenosylmethionine kinetics of apos; inactivation.
3	improved preparation and structural elucidation of the tryptophan cleavage reagent 2 2 nitro phenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine bnps skatole	Improvement of preparation and apo; structural elucidation of tryptophan cleavage reagent 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine bnps skatole.
3	metal ion buffer interactions stability of binary and ternary complexes containing 2 amino 2 hydroxymethyl 1 3 propanediol tris and adenosine 5 triphosphate atp	Stability of the buffer interactions of metal ions of binary and ternary complexes containing 2 amino-2 hydroxymethyl 1 3 propanediol tris et l' adenosine 5 triphosphate atp.
3	synthesis of some 2 5 disubstituted anilino 3 6 dichloro 1 4 benzoquinones as antimicrobial agents	Synthesis of some 25 anilino 36 dichloro 14 disubstituted benzoquinones as antimicrobials.
3	synthesis of some 2 styrylquinazoline derivatives structurally related to certain chemotherapeutic agents	Styrylquinazoline derivatives structurally related to certain chemotherapeutic agents are synthesized.
3	reaction of trnaphe from yeast with 1 fluoro 2 4 dinitrobenzene attachment sites of the potential antigenic determining 2 4 dinitrophenyl residues	Reaction of yeast trnaphe with 1 d&apos site; fluoro 2-4 dinitrobenzene attachment of l' dinitrophenyl residue determining antigen potential.
3	molecular structure of 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea	Molecular structure of 12 chloroethyl 3 trans-4-methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea.
3	synthesis and antibacterial activity of isomeric 6 and 7 acetyl 3 methyl 2 quinoxalinecarbozamide 1 4 dioxides	Synthesis and antibacterial activity of isomeric dioxins 6 and 7 acetyl 3 methyl-2 quinoxalinecarbozamide 1.
3	formation of an unstable covalent intermediate during the inhibition of electric eel acetylcholinesterase with 1 3 2 dioxaphosphorinane 2 oxides	Apos formation; an unstable covalent intermediate during apos; apos inhibition; apos acetylcholinesterase; electrical eel by 132 dioxaphosphorinane oxides 2.
3	crystal structure of 1 1 complex of barbital with 1 methylimidazole	Crystalline structure of barbital complex 1 with 1 methylimidazole.
3	cis and trans octa 1 5 dien 3 ol new attractants to the cheese mite tyrophagus putrescentiae schrank acarina acaridae idintified in trichothecium roseum fungi imperfecti	Octta 15 diene 3 ol novel cis- and trans-attracting ol for the mite Tyrophagus putrescentiae schrank acarina idintified in trichothecium roseum imperfecti.
3	gamma gamma 4 4 diamino 3 3 biphenylylenedioxy dibutyric acid dicarboxidine a safer substitute for benzidine type chromogens	Gamma gamma 4-4 diamino 3 3 biphenylylenedioxy dibutyric acid dicarboxidine, a safer substitute for benzidine-like chromogens.
3	antiallergy agents 1 1 6 dihydro 6 oxo 2 phenylpyrimidine 5 carboxylic acids and esters	Allergic Agents 1,16 dihydro 6 oxo 2 phenylpyrimidine 5 carboxylic acids and esters.
3	prodrugs of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyl adenine 2 synthesis and evaluation of a number of 2 3 and 3 5 di o acyl derivatives	Prodrogues of 9 beta arabinofuranosyl adenine 2 synthesis and evaluation of apos; a number of 23 and 3 derivatives of acyl derivatives.
3	new bronchodilators synthesis and bronchodilating activity of some 3 alkoxymethyl alpha n substituted aminomethyl 4 hydroxybenzyl alcohols	The synthesis of new bronchodilators and l' bronchodilator activity of some 3 l&apos-substituted hydroxybenzyl alcohols; alkoxymethyl alpha n aminomethyl 4 alcohols are substituted by l' hydroxybenzyl.
3	a laser flash photolysis study of the reactivities of the triplet states of 8 methoxypsoralen and 4 5 8 trimethylpsoralen with nucleic acid bases in solution	A laser flash photolysis study of the triplet state reactivities of 8 methoxypsoralene and 4 5 trimethylpsoralene with d' nucleic acids in solution was carried out.
3	the metabolism and excretion of curcumin 1 7 bis 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenyl 1 6 heptadiene 3 5 dione in the rat	Metabolism and apo; curcumin excretion 17 bis 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenyl 16 heptadiene 3 dione in the rat.
3	1 and 3 deamidino derivatives of dihydrostreptomycin and some 1 n acyl derivatives	Derivatives of deamidino 1 and 3 from dihydrostreptomycin and some 1 n-acyl derivatives.
3	chloroperoxidase catalysed oxidation of 4 chloroaniline to 4 chloronitrosobenze	Chloroperoxidase catalyzes apos; oxidation of 4 chloroanilines to 4 chloronitrosenes.
3	structure revision of disaccharidic conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in human bile and identification of phenylazo derivatives b4 b5 and b6 as 2 3 and 4 o acylglucuronides	Review the structure of the disaccharide conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in human bile and identify the phenylazo derivatives b4 b5 and b6 as 2-3 and 4 o acylglucuronides.
3	metabolism of 14c terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine by rats and goat	Metabolism of 14c terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine by rats and by goats.
3	mass spectral characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine metabolites from rats and goat	M.M. Spectral Characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of terbutryn 2 t-butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 s-triazine metabolites from rats and goats.
3	rearranged glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in post obstructive bile structure elucidation of azopigments beta and gamma as ethyl anthranilate n glycosides derived from 2 3 and 4 o acyl glucuronides	Rearranged from d&apos conjugates; bilirubin ix alpha glucuronic acid in apos; post-hazardization of beta and gamma azopigment bile structure in the form of glycoside anthranilates d' ethyl derivatives of glucuronides 2 and 4 acyls.
3	the uptake of 6 methoxy 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro beta carboline and its effect on 5 hydroxytryptamine uptake and release in blood platelets	L' absorption of 6 methoxy 134 tetrahydro beta carboline and its effect on apos; absorption and release of 5 hydroxytryptamine into the blood platelets.
3	chemical and pharmaceutical research on pyran derivatives x synthesis of 1 oxo 2 alkyl 3 dialkylamino 1h naphtho 2 1b pyrans	Chemical and pharmaceutical research on the pyran derivatives x synthesis of 1 oxo 2 alkyl 3 dialkylamino 1h naphtho 2 1b pyrans.
3	antiviral action of benzo de isoquinoline 1 3 diones 5 nitro 2 2 dimethylaminoethyl and 5 nitro 2 2 1 pyrrolidine ethyl derivatives	Antiviral action of isoquinoline benzo 1-3 diones 5 nitro 2 dimethylaminoethyl and 5 nitro 21 pyrrolidine ethyl derivatives.
3	new daunorubicin analogs 3 amino 2 3 6 trideoxy alpha and beta d arabino and 3 6 diamino 2 3 6 trideoxy alpha d ribo hexopyranosides of daunomycinone	New daunorubicin analogs 3 amino 2, 3, 6 trideoxy alpha and beta arabino and 3, 6 diamino 2, 3, 6 daunomycinone ribo hexopyranoside alpha trideoxy.
3	quinazolines and 1 4 benzodiazepines lxxxix haptens useful in benzodiazepine immunoassay development	Quinazolines and 14 xxxyl benzodiazepines useful for the development of benzodiazepine immunoassays.
3	the metabolism of benzyclane 1 benzyl 1 3 n n dimethylaminopropoxy cycloheptane in rat and man	The metabolism of benzyl 1,3-benzyl n-dimethylaminopropoxycycloheptan in rats and humans.
3	chemical and biological studies of 1 2 5 dihydroxy 4 methylphenyl 2 aminopropane an analogue of 6 hydroxydopamine	Chemical and biological studies of 125 dihydroxy, 4 methylphenyl, 2 aminopropane, an analog of 6 hydroxydopamine.
3	iso branched 2 and 3 hydroxy fatty acids as characteristic lipid constituents of some gliding bacteria	L' iso-branching fatty acids 2 and 3 are hydroxylated as lipid constituents characteristic of some slippery bacteria.
3	analysis of some older scandinavian formulations of 2 4 dichlorophenoxy acetic acid and 2 4 5 trichlorophenoxy acetic acid for contents of chlorinated dibenzo p dioxins and dibenzofurans	Analysis of older Scandinavian formulations of 24 dichlorophenoxyacetic acids and 25 trichlorophenoxyacetic acids for chlorinated dibenzo pines and dibenzofurans.
3	tumorigenicity of the diastereomeric benz a anthracene 3 4 diol 1 2 epoxides and the and enantiomers of benz a anthracene 3 4 dihydrodiol in newborn mice	Tumourigenic potency of the diastereoisomer benz a anthracene 3,4 diol 1,2 epoxides and enantiomers of anthracene 3,4 dihydrodiol benz in new mice-nées.
3	conformational analogues of dopamine synthesis and pharmacological activity of e and z 2 3 4 dihydroxyphenyl cyclopropylamine hydrochlorides	Conformational dopamine and l&apos synthesis analogs; pharmacological activity of dihydroxyphenylcyclopropylamine hydrochlorides e and z 2.
3	synthesis of fused 1 2 6 thiadiazine 1 1 dioxides as potential transition state analogue inhibitors of xanthine oxidase and guanase	Synthesis of dioxides 1-2-6 thiadiazine 11 fused as potential inhibitors of l' analogous transition state of xanthine oxidase and guanase.
3	synthesis and antiestrogenic activity of 3 4 dihydro 2 4 methoxyphenyl 1 naphthalenyl 4 2 1 pyrrolidinyl ethoxy phenyl methanone methanesulfonic acid salt	Synthesis and antiestrogenic activity of 34 l*apos salts; methanesulfonic dihydro acid 2 4 methoxyphenyl 1 naphthalenyl 4 1 pyrrolidinyl ethoxyphenyl methanone methanesulfonic acid 2.
3	antileukemic activity of derivatives of 1 2 dimethyl 3 4 bis hydroxymethyl 5 phenylpyrrole bis n methylcarbamate	Anti-leukemic activity of methyl derivatives-2 dimethyl-3-4 bis hydroxymethyl-5 phenylpyrrole bis methylcarbamate.
3	the identification of distinctive forms of human alpha 2 macroglobulin by using the numerical relationship between trypsin binding in alpha and beta modes	Identification of the distinctive forms of human macroglobulin alpha 2 using the numerical relationship between alpha and beta trypsin binding.
3	clobazam chemical aspects of the 1 4 and 1 5 benzodiazepines	"""Clobazam chemical aspects of the 14 and 15 benzodiazepines."" 3."
3	2 aminomethyl 2 decarboxyprostaglandin f2 alpha type analogs	Two alpha-like analogs of l' aminomethyl 2-carboxyprostaglandin f2 alpha-like analogs.
4	evidence of active transfer of certain non electrolytes across the human red cell membrane	Evidence of active transfer of some non--electrolytes through human erythrocyte membrane.
4	the adsorption of proteins on erythrocytes treated with tannic acid and subsequent hemagglutination by antiprotein sera	L' protein adsorption on potato-treated erythrocytes; tannic acid and l' subsequent hemagglutination by antiprotein sera.
4	a microspectrophotometric study of red cell nuclei during pyknosis	A microspectrophotometric study of the red cell nuclei during pyknosis.
4	the tonicity volume relations for systems containing human red cells and the chlorides of monovalent cations	Volume tonicity relationships for systems containing human red blood cells and monovalent cation chlorides.
4	the tonicity volume relations for human red cells subjected to the action of heat with special reference to prolytic k loss	Tone volume relationships for human red blood cells subjected to heat action with special reference to the prolytic loss of k.
4	age as effecting the osmotic and mechanical fragility of dog erythrocytes tagged with radioactive iron	Age affects the osmotic and mechanical fragility of radiologically labelled dog erythrocytes.
4	active transport into the human erythrocyte evidence from comparative kinetics and competition among monosaccharides	The active transport in human erythrocytes was demonstrated by comparative kinetics and by competition between monosaccharides.
4	diffractometric measurements of the tonicity volume relations of human red cells in hypotonic systems	Diffractometric measurements of-tonicity volume relationships of human red blood cells in hypotonic systems.
4	cation exchange in mammalian erythrocytes iii the prolytic effect of x rays on human cells	L' cation exchange in mammalian erythrocytes; prolytic effect of X-rays on the human cells.
4	electron microscope study of red cell membranes after experimental infection with the virus of foot and mouth disease	Electron microscopic study of erythrocyte membranes after experimental FMD infection.
4	accumulation of potassium by human red cells	Potassium accumulation by human red blood cells.
4	permeability properties of erythrocyte ghosts	The permeability properties of erythrocyte phantoms.
4	an analytical study of in vivo survival of limited populations of animal red blood cells tagged with radio iron	An analytical study of the in vivo survival of limited populations of E. coli; red blood cells; animals labeled with radioactive iron.
4	the sorption of influenza virus by chicken erythrocytes	The sorption of the influenza virus by chicken-derived erythrocytes.
4	quantitative aspects of the spontaneous elution of influenza virus from red cells	Quantitative aspects of the virus; spontaneous elution of the influenza virus from red blood cells.
4	the incorporation of n15 glycine by avian erythrocytes and reticulocytes in vitro	L' incorporation of glycine n15 into erythrocytes and avian reticulocytes in vitro.
4	the specific heat of red cells with special reference to the paracrystalline rat red cell	The specific heat of the red blood cells, especially the red blood cells of the paracrystalline rats.
4	volume changes ion exchanges and fragilities of human red cells in solutions of the chlorides of the alkaline earths	The volume modifies the ion exchange and fragility of human red blood cells in alkaline chloride solutions.
4	the specific heat and the heat of compression of human red cells sickled red cells and paracrystalline rat red cells	Red blood cells and red blood cells of paracrystalline rats were damaged by the specific heat and compressive heat of human red blood cells.
4	serological behaviour of influenza viruses i the effect of different fowl erythrocytes on the results of serological tests	Serological behaviour of influenza viruses; effect of different erythrocytes; birds on serological test results.
4	a method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes i description of method	Protein antigen coupling method to erythrocytes i description of the procedure.
4	a method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes ii use of the method in the diagnosis of tuberculosis	Method of coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes ii use of method in TB diagnosis.
4	the variation in the corpuscular hemoglobin concentration in the human red cell as measured by densitometry	Variation of hemoglobin concentration measured by densitometry in human red blood cells.
4	entrance of water into human red cells under an osmotic pressure gradient	Input of water into the human red blood cell (HRBC) under an osmotic pressure gradient.
4	the rate of exchange of tritiated water across the human red cell membrane	Dapos; exchange of urine; tritiated water through human erythrocyte membrane.
4	uphill transport induced by counterflow	It is an induced upward transport, but a current-transport.
4	the birefringence of the human red cell ghosts	The birefringence of human red blood cell ghosts.
4	iron particles in normal erythroblasts and normal and pathological erythrocytes	Iron-containing particles in normal erythroblasts and normal and pathological erythrocytes.
4	effect of antibody and complement on permeability control in ascites tumor cells and erythrocytes	Effect of antibody and complement on the control of permeability in ascitic tumor cells and erythrocytes.
4	studies on the hemolysis of red blood cells by mumps virus iv quantitative study of changes in red blood cell lipides and of virus lipides	Mumps virus hemolysis of red blood cells iv Quantitative study of changes in red blood cell and viral lipid lipids.
4	physiological characteristics of human red blood cell ghosts	Human red blood cell ghosts physiological characteristics.
4	the rate of uptake of carbon monoxide and of nitric oxide by normal human erythrocytes and experimentally produced spherocytes	The rate of absorption of carbon monoxide and carbon monoxide; nitrogen by normal human erythrocytes and spherocytes produced experimentally.
4	studies in histochemistry lvii determination of the total dry mass of human erythrocytes by interference microscopy and x ray microradiography	Histochemical Studies Lvii determination of the total dry weight of human erythrocytes by interference microscopy and X-ray microradiography.
4	determination of equivalent pore radius for human red cells by osmotic pressure measurement	Determination of equivalent interstitial radius for human red blood cells by measurement of the osmotic pressure.
4	efflux and influx of erythrocyte water	Dapos efflux and influx; erythrocyte water.
4	selective phagocytosis of nucleated erythrocytes by cytotoxic amebae in cell culture	Selective phagocytosis of cells; erythrocytes nucleated by cytotoxic amoebae in cell culture.
4	efflux of red cell water into buffered hypertonic solutions	Dapos efflux; erythrocyte water in buffered hypertonic solutions.
4	hereditary elliptocytosis in two maltese families	Hereditary Elliptocytosis in two Maltese families.
4	the cation content of phospholipides from swine erythrocytes	Cation content of phospholipids in pig erythrocytes.
4	the entrance of water into beef and dog red cells	L' entry of water into the red blood cell of beef and dog.
4	the electrophoretic velocity of human red cells of their ghosts and mechanically produced fragments and of certain lipid complexes	The electrophoretic velocity of human phantoms and mechanically produced fragments and certain lipid complexes.
4	a d like antigen in rhesus red blood cells and in rh positive and rh negative red cells	An antigen similar to d in rhesus red blood cells and rh-negative and rh-positive red blood cells.
4	a critical evaluation of red cell and plasma volume techniques in patients with burns	A critical evaluation of the globular and plasma volume techniques in burn patients.
4	inhibition of red cell sequestration by cortisone	L' inhibition of cortisone red cell sequestration.
4	shape and volume changes in frog erythrocytes following ultraviolet radiation	Changes in frog erythrocyte shape and volume as a result of ultraviolet radiation.
4	structure in nucleated erythrocytes	Erythrocyte structure nucleated.
4	the physics of blood flow in capillaries iii the pressure required to deform erythrocytes in acid citrate dextrose	Capillary blood flow physics iii the pressure required to deform erythrocytes in acid citrate dextrose.
4	effects of silicate polymers on erythrocytes in presence and absence of complement	Effects of silicate polymers on erythrocytes in the presence and absence of erythrocyte complementation.
4	the surface of the washed human erythrocyte as a polyanion	The surface of l' washed human erythrocyte in the form of polyanion.
4	an electron microscopic study of erythrophagocytosis	An electron microscopic study of etapos; erythrophagocytosis.
4	the apparent molecular weight of myelin forms prepared from normal red cells and some of its variations	Apparent molecular weight of myelin is formed from normal red blood cells and some of their variations.
4	extracellular and metabolic factors affecting the efflux and influx of erythrocyte water	Extracellular and metabolic factors affecting etiology; efflux and apo; efflux; erythrocyte water.
4	observations on the development of erythrocytes in mammalian fetal liver	Observations on fetal liver development of erythrocytes in mammals.
4	new genetically determined molecular form of erythrocyte esterase in man	Genetically determined new molecular form of erythrocyte esterase in humans.
4	the influence of ph and ionic strength on the electrokinetic stability of the human erythrocyte membrane	L' the influence of ph and ionic strength on the stability of the electrocinetics of the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	the viscosity of erythrocyte suspensions a review of theory	Viscosity of erythrocyte suspensions is a review of the theory.
4	erythrocyte automosaicism in some persons of known genotype	Some people with known genotype have erythrocyte autoscaemia.
4	the life span of erythrocytes in iron deficiency anaemia	Period of erythrocyte life in case of iron deficiency anemia.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and detoxification of hydrogen peroxide in human erythrocytes	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and peroxide detoxification; hydrogen in human erythrocytes.
4	variations in the lactic dehydrogenase of vertebrate erythrocytes	Vertebrate erythrocyte lactic dehydrogenase variations.
4	preparation of an inhibitor of viral hemagglutination from human erythrocytes	Preparation of apo; a human erythrocyte viral hemagglutination inhibitor.
4	lactic dehydrogenase genetic control in man	Genetic control of lactic dehydrogenase in humans.
4	erythrocyte acid phosphomonesterase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in caucasians	Caucasian deficiency of erythrocyte acid phosphomonesterase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
4	studies on the mode of action of excess of vitamin a vii changes in the fine structure of erythrocytes during haemolysis by vitamin a	Studies on the mode of action of vitamin ani modify the fine structure of erythrocytes during apo and vitamin ai hemolysis.
4	the variation in the structure of erythrocyte nuclei with fixation	Variation in the structure of fixed erythrocyte rings.
4	mechanical properties of the red cell membrane i membrane stiffness and intracellular pressure	Mechanical properties of red cell i-membrane stiffness and intracellular pressure.
4	interaction of mercury with human erythrocytes	Mercury interaction with human erythrocytes.
4	reversible agglomeraton used to remove dimethylsulfoxide from large volumes of frozen blood	Reversible agglomeraton used to remove dimethyl sulfoxide from large volumes of frozen blood.
4	the action of enzymes from clostridium tertium on the i antigenic determinant of human erythrocytes	L' action of tertial clostridium enzymes on the antigenic determinant i of human erythrocytes.
4	studies on lysosomes iii the effects of streptolysins o and s on the release of acid hydrolases from a granular fraction of rabbit liver	Lysosome studies, the effects of streptolysins o and s on the release of d&apos acidic hydrolases, a granular fraction of rabbit liver.
4	motion picture studies on degranulation of horse eosinophils during phagocytosis	Cinematographic studies on the degranulation of horse eosinophils (eosinophils) during phagocytosis.
4	relationship of erythrocyte to leukocyte antigens in chickens	Erythrocyte to leukocyte antigens in chickens.
4	reticulocyte release factor	Reticulocyte release factor.
4	the estimation of red cell volume with 51cr labelled erythrocytes and plasma volume with radioiodinated human serum albumin	L' estimated red blood cell volume with 51cr labelled erythrocytes and plasma volume with l' human serum albumin radioiodinated.
4	chromosome fibers from an interphase nucleus	Chromosome fibers d' an interphase nucleus.
4	the thalassaemia trait in an english family	It's called Thalassemia in an English family.
4	thalassaemia in scots	Thalassemia among the Scots.
4	the chemical constitution of compounds which protect erythrocytes against freezing damage	Chemical composition of compounds that protect erythrocytes from frost damage.
4	phase separation in suspensions flowing through bifurcations a simplified hemodynamic model	Phase separation in suspensions circulating through a simplified hemodynamic model bifurcations.
4	the assay of galactokinase and galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase activity in human erythrocytes a presumed test for heterozygous carriers of the galactosemic defect	L' assay; galactokinase and galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase activity in human erythrocytes is a putative test for heterozygous carriers of galactosemic defect.
4	phospholipid sugar complexes in relation to cell membrane monosaccharide transport	Phospholipid sugar complexes in relation to transport of membrane monosaccharides.
4	hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin i kinetics of the lytic reaction	Hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by alpha-I toxin from the purified staphylococcal lytic reaction.
4	hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin ii effects of inhibitors on the hemolytic sequence	Hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin ii effects of hemolytic sequence inhibitors.
4	erythrocytes 5 adenylic acid deaminase requirement for ammonia or monovalent metal ion	Errythrocytes 5 adenylate deaminase necessary for lacid; ammonia or lacid; monovalent metal ion.
4	angiotensinase with a high degree of specificity in plasma and red cells	It's a very specific type of angiotensinase in plasma and red blood cells.
4	actinomycin d effect on the immune response	The effect of apo; actinomycin d on the immune response.
4	urea apparent carrier mediated transport by facilitated diffusion in dogfish erythrocytes	L' urea, an apparent transporter, has facilitated transport by facilitating diffusion into dogfish erythrocytes.
4	galactosidase action on human blood group b active escherichia coli and on red cell substances	Galactosidase action on active human blood type b Escherichia coli and erythrocytes.
4	kinetics of water loss from cells at subzero temperatures and the likelihood of intracellular freezing	Kinetics of cell water loss at temperatures below zero and the likelihood of intracellular freezing.
4	phagocytosis in normal and anaemic blood	Phagocytosis in normal and anemic bloodstream.
4	application of a localized hemolysin reaction for specific detection of individual antibody forming cells	A localized reaction to apos; hemolysin for the specific detection of individual antibody-forming cells.
4	erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in caucasians new inherited variant	The glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase of erythrocytes in caucasians is a novel heritable variant.
4	sulfate transport in human red cells inhibition by some uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation	The transport of sulfate into human erythrocytes is inhibited by some uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation.
4	acid phosphatases of human red cells predicted phenotype conforms to a genetic hypothesis	The predicted acid phosphatases of human erythrocytes are consistent with a genetic hypothesis.
4	inhibition of specific binding of antibody to the rho d factor of red cells in antibody excess	Inhibition of specific binding of apos; antibody to red cell rho-factor (RCF) in apos; excess of apos; antibody.
4	two cases of thrombohaemolytic thrombocytopenic purpura associated with changes in red cell morphology	Two cases of thrombocytopenic thrombohemolytic purpura associated with changes in red blood cell morphology.
4	measurements of some cellular changes during the fixation of amphibian erythrocytes with osmium tetroxide solutions	Measurement of certain cellular changes during erythrocyte binding of amphibians with d*apos tetroxide solutions; osmium.
4	antiserum to leucocyte lysosomes its cytotoxic granulolytic and hemolytic activities	Antiserum to leukocyte lysosomes, its granulolytic and hemolytic cytotoxic activities.
4	water permeability of the fetal erythrocyte	Capos permeability; fetal erythrocyte water.
4	estimation of the life span of red blood cells	Estimation of red blood cell lifespan.
4	the occurrence and possible significance of haemoglobin in the chromosomal regions of mature erythrocyte nuclei of the newt triturus cristatus cristatus	Presence and potential importance of hemoglobin in chromosomal regions of mature erythrocyte nuclei of triturus cristatus cristatus in triturus triturus cristatus.
4	the role of temperate bacteriophage in the production of erythrogenic toxin by group a streptococci	The role of temperate bacteriophage in the production of streptococcal erythrogenic toxin.
4	preservation of antigen coated sheep erythrocytes by freezing for use in indirect hemagglutination procedure	Preservation of cold-coated sheep erythrocytes; antigen by freezing for apo; indirect hemagglutination.
4	a rapid micro method for recording red cell osmotic fragility by continuous decrease of salt concentration	A micro@-rapid method; recording osmotic fragility of red blood cells through a continuous decrease in saline concentration.
4	histone and dna in isolated nuclei from chicken brain liver and erythrocytes	L' histone and l' and DNA in isolated chicken liver and chicken erythrocyte nuclei.
4	a micro gel precipitin reaction for hashimoto s thyroiditis	A microgel precipitin reaction for the thyroiditis hashimoto s.
4	inherited variant of erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase in micronesians from guam and saipan	Variant inherited from erythrocyte micronesian carbonic anhydrase from guam and saipan.
4	osmotic properties of human red cells	Osmotic properties of human red blood cells.
4	uric acid transport system apparent absence in erythrocytes of the dalmatian coach hound	The l' uric acid transport system appears to be absent in the dalmatian body dog erythrocytes.
4	human erythrocyte lactate dehydrogenase 4 genetically determined variants	Variants of genetically determined human erythrocyte lactate dehydrogenase 4.
4	mosaic hemoglobin types in a pair of cattle twins	Typical mosaic hemoglobin in a pair of bovine twins.
4	staphylococcal alpha hemolysin detection on the erythrocyte membrane by immunofluorescence	Staphyloccal alpha hemolysin detection on the erythrocyte membrane by immunofluorescence.
4	function of the reticuloendothelial system i a study on the phenomenon of carbon clearance inhibition	Function of reticuloendothelial system i a study of gap phenomena; inhibition of carbon clearance.
4	the measurement of antibody in human malaria by a formolized tanned sheep cell haemagglutination test	Antibody measurement in human malaria by a test for hemagglutination of cells from formalized tanned sheep.
4	observations on the resistance in hb e thalassaemia disease to induced infection with plasmodium vivax	Observations on resistance to apos; plasmodium vivax infection in thalassemia.
4	oxime reactivation of erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibited by ethyl p nitrophenyl ethylphosphonate	Erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibited by apos; ethyl p-nitrophenyl ethylphosphonate is reactivated by apos.
4	studies on the oxidation reduction systems of the erythrocyte	Studies of epos reduction systems; erythrocyte oxidation.
4	active transport and enzymes of the erythrocyte membrane under protein deprivation	Active transport and erythrocyte membrane enzymes were deprived of protein.
4	iron kinetics and erythron development	Iron kinetics and development of erythrons.
4	m ssbauer effect in hemoglobin and some iron containing biological compounds	Effect of ssbauer in hemoglobin and certain iron-containing biological compounds.
4	the laser as a potential tool for cell research	The use of lasers as a potential tool for cell research.
4	the nature of bands in parasitized bovine erythrocytes	Banding patterns in parasitized bovine erythrocytes.
4	the distribution of parenteral iron haematinics in nonpregnant pregnant and lactating rats	Pregnant pregnant rats and lactating rats: the distribution of parenteral iron haematinics.
4	sex linkage of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in the horse and donkey	Sexual relationship of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in horse and l' donkey.
4	enzymatic release of folate activity from the red cells in megaloblastic anaemia of pregnancy	Enzymatic apos release; red cell folate activity in the apos; megaloblastic anaemia of pregnancy.
4	sex linkage of erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in two species of wild hares	Sexually transmitted trans-transmitted diseases: sex linkage of erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in two species of wild hares.
4	nucleoside phosphatases of fetal and maternal blood cells electron microscope study	Nucleoside phosphatases from fetal and maternal blood cells were studied by electron microscopy.
4	complement fixation on cell surfaces by 19s and 7s antibodies	Attachment of the complement to cell surfaces by 19s and 7s antibodies.
4	electronic separation of biological cells by volume	Electron separation of biological cells, by volume.
4	erythrocyte sensitization by blood group specific bacterial antigens	Sensitization of the erythrocytes by bacterial antigens specific to the blood groups.
4	the intracellular localization of heme by a fluorescence technique	The intracellular localization of l&apos was found by a fluorescence technique.
4	the cell generation cycle of the eleven day mouse embryo	The cell-generation cycle of the 11-day-old mouse embryo.
4	an investigation by electron microscopy of the nucleoside phosphatase activity of amphibian and mammalian erythrocytes	An electron microscopic study of amphibian and mammalian erythrocyte nucleoside phosphatase activity.
4	polymorphism of human lactate dehydrogenase isozymes	Human lactate dehydrogenase isozyme polymorphisms.
4	electrophoresis of hemoglobin in single erythrocytes	Apos; apos electrophoresis; hemoglobin in simple erythrocytes.
4	method of assay of red cell folate activity and the value of the assay as a test for folate deficiency	Dosage method; dosage test; erythrocyte folate activity and dosage; test as folate deficiency test.
4	structural aspects of human erythrocyte autoantibodies i l chain types and electrophoretic dispersion	Structural aspects of the human erythrocyte antibodies-auto, chain types and electrophoretic dispersion.
4	bilirubin acute effects in newborn rhesus monkeys	Acute effects of bilirubin in the rhesus monkeys new-born.
4	hemolysin of mycoplasma pneumoniae tentative identification as a peroxide	Mycoplasma pneumoniae hemolysin tentatively identified as peroxide.
4	the state of hemoglobin in sickled erythrocytes	Los; apo condition; hemoglobin in falsified erythrocytes.
4	purification of staphylococcal beta hemolysin and its action on staphylococcal and streptococcal cell walls	Staphylococcal blebbing and its action on staphylococcal and streptococcal cell walls.
4	nicotinamide nucleotides in the erythrocytes of patients suffering from pellagra	Nicotinamide nucleotides in erythrocytes of patients with pellagra.
4	the effect of lead on the fragility of the red cell incubated in vitro	The effect of lead on the fragility of red blood cells incubated in vitro.
4	mechanical properties of the red cell membrane ii viscoelastic breakdown of the membrane	Mechanical properties of erythrocyte membrane ii viscoelastic degradation of membrane.
4	an antibody against stored blood associated with cirrhosis of the liver and false positive serological tests for syphilis	An anti-preserved blood antibody associated with cirrhosis of the liver and false-positive serological tests for syphilis.
4	blood flow in the microvasculature of the conjunctiva of man	Blood flow in the microvasculature of the men's conjunctiva.
4	the kinetics of inhibition of erythrocyte cholinesterase by monomethylcarbamates	The kinetics of l' inhibition of erythrocyte cholinesterase by monomethylcarbamates.
4	plasma membranes phospholipid and sterol content	Contents of plasma membranes in phospholipids and sterols.
4	immune lysis of normal human and paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria pnh red blood cells 3 the membrane defects caused by complement lysis	Immune lysis of l' normal human nocturnal hemoglobinuria and paroxysmal erythrocytes pnh 3 membrane defects caused by the complementary lysis.
4	protein conformations in the plasma membrane	Protein conforming properties in the plasma membrane.
4	competition of haptens	Hapten competition.
4	congenital non spherocytic hemolytic anemia	Hemolytic anemia is a non-spherocytic condition.
4	antibodies affecting metabolism of chicken erythrocytes examination of schizophrenic and other subjects	Antibody affecting chicken erythrocyte metabolism Examination of schizophrenics and d' other subjects.
4	the effect of size of red cells on the kinetics of their oxygen uptake	L'apos; effect of red cell size on the kinetics of their intake of oxygen.
4	homoreactant a naturally occurring autoantibody in rabbits	Homoreactor, an auto-natural antibodies in rabbits.
4	separation and properties of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococci	A red blood cell sensitizing substance in streptococci.
4	nature of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococci	Nature of a red blood cell sensitizing substance from streptococcus.
4	serological studies of types a b and e botulinal toxins by passive hemagglutination and bentonite flocculation	Serological studies of botulinum toxins a b and e by passive hemagglutination and flocculation with bentonite.
4	heterogenetic antigens of gram positive bacteria	Heterogenetic antigens from gram-positive bacteria.
4	a colorimetric micro method for the determination of glutathione	One micro@-@ colorimetric method for glutathione determination.
4	effect of oxidized glutathione on some enzymes of erythrocytes and its relation to erythrocytic enzyme activity and electrophoretic mobility	Effect of oxidized glutathione on certain erythrocyte enzymes and its relationship to l' erythrocyte enzyme activity and electrophoretic mobility.
4	the nature of transcapillary exchange in the liver	The nature of the transcapillary exchange in the liver.
4	the mode of inhibition by calcium of cell membrane adenosine triphosphatase activity	The mode of action; calcium inhibition of the apos; cellular membrane adenosine triphosphatase activity.
4	plasma trapping in the centrifuged red cells of children with severe thalassaemia	Plasma trapping in centrifuged red blood cells of children with severe thalassemia.
4	transient holes in the erythrocyte membrane during hypotonic hemolysis and stable holes in the membrane after lysis by saponin and lysolecithin	Transient holes in the erythrocyte membrane during apos; hypotonic hemolysis; and stable holes in the membrane after lysis by saponin and lysolecithin.
4	heme stimulation of globin synthesis in a cell free system	Heme stimulation of globin synthesis in free cell-free system.
4	control of haem synthesis by feedback inhibition on human erythrocyte delta aminolaevulate dehydratase	Control of hematoma synthesis by delta aminolaevulate human erythrocyte dehydratase feedback inhibition.
4	antibody synthesis at the cellular level antibody induced suppression of 7s antibody synthesis	Antibody synthesis at the cellular level resulted in suppression of 7s antibody synthesis.
4	the production of erythrocyte autoantibodies in chimpanzees	Production of erythrocyte antibody in chimpanzees.
4	the mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to sheep erythrocytes i plaque forming cell and antibody response to single and multiple injections of antigen	The mechanism of tolerance to cell-forming plaque erythrocytes and antibody response to single and multiple injections of antigen in rats.
4	the mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to sheep erythrocytes ii the plaque forming cell and antibody response to multiple injections of antigen begun at birth	The mechanism of tolerance in the rat to sheep erythrocytes ii plaque-forming cells and antibodies response to multiple injections of antigen was initiated at birth.
4	cimulative hemagglutination by mycoplasma pneumoniae and other agglutinins	Cemulative hemagglutination by pneumoniae and d&apos mycoplasma; other agglutinins.
4	the fine structure of plasmodium falciparum and its host erythrocytes in natural malarial infections in man	The fine structure of plasmodium falciparum and its erythrocyte hosts in natural palaeont infections in men.
4	studies of cellular proliferation in human leukemia i estimation of growth rates of leukemic and normal hematopoietic cells in two adults with acute leukemia given single injections of tritiated thymidine	Cell Proliferation Studies in Human Leukemia i estimate growth rates of normal and leukemic hematopoietic cells in two adults with acute leukemia who received single injections of tritiated thymidine.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in erythrocytes of experimental animals	L' glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in laboratory animal erythrocytes.
4	skin grafts delayed rejection between pairs of cattle twins showing erythrocyte chimerism	Skin transplants delayed rejection between pairs of red cell chimerism-positive bovine twins.
4	anaphylatoxin in its relation to the complement system	Anaphylatoxin, in relation to the complementary system.
4	autoxidation as a cause of altered lipid distribution in extracts from human red cells	L' autoxidation as a cause of apo; alteration of lipid distribution in human red blood cell extracts.
4	microincision of sickled erythrocytes by a laser beam	Micro incision d'apos; erythrocytes distorted by a laser beam.
4	glutathione reductase in red blood cells variant associated with gout	Glutathione reductase in the erythrocytes is a gout-associated variant.
4	light chain heterogeneity of cold agglutinins	Cold agglutinin light chain heterogeneity.
4	the inhibitory effect of heme on heme formation in vivo possible mechanism for the regulation of hemoglobin synthesis	Lapos; inhibitory effect of apos; heme on apos formation; heme in vivo may be a regulatory mechanism for apos synthesis; hemoglobin.
4	erythrocyte abnormality in human myopathy	Erythrocyte anomaly in human myopathy?
4	metabolism of doubly labeled chylomicron cholesteryl esters in the rat	Metabolism of doubly labelled cholesterylated chylomicron esters in rats.
4	heterophile reactive antigen in infectious mononucleosis	Heterophilic reactive antigen in infectious mononucleosis.
4	hydroxyethyl starch extracellular cryophylactic agent for erythrocytes	Extracellular cryophylactic agent d' hydroxyethyl starch for erythrocytes.
4	globin composition and synthesis of hemoglobins in developing fetal mice erythroid cells	Composition of globins and hemoglobin synthesis in developing fetal mouse erythroid cells.
4	red cell slip at a wall in vitro	Slipping red blood cells to a single wall in vitro.
4	studies on the nonspecific depression of the immune response	Non-specific depression studies of the immune response.
4	hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes association of type ii with fetal hemoglobin	Hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes type ii association with fetal hemoglobin.
4	adjuvant activity of erythrocyte isoantigens	Adjuventive activity of the erythrocyte isoantigens.
4	malaria infection plasmodium iophurae changes in free amino acids	Palustre plasmodium iophurae infection changes in free amino acids.
4	peroxidative hemolysis of red blood cells from patients with abetalipoproteinemia acanthocytosis	Hemolysis of red blood cells of patients with apos; acanthocytosis at apos; abetalipoproteinemia.
4	quantitative determination of the neutral glycosyl ceramides in human blood	Quantitative determination of glycosyl ceramides in human blood.
4	composition of phospholipids and of phospholipid fatty acids and aldehydes in human red cells	Composition of phospholipids, phospholipid fatty acids and aldehydes in the human red blood cell.
4	the production of carbon monoxide from hemoglobin in vivo	Carbon monoxide production from the apos; hemoglobin in vivo.
4	fixed charge in the cell membrane	Fixed charge in the cell membrane?
4	the volume of vascular compartment in rat hind limb muscles	Volume of the vascular compartment in muscles of rat hind limbs.
4	erythrocyte transfer rna change during chick development	Change in the transfer of erythrocytes during chick development.
4	the diffraction pattern of dry blood smears	This is the diffraction pattern from the dry blood films.
4	serum red cell interactions at low ionic strength erythrocyte complement coating and hemolysis of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria cells	Low ionic erythrocyte interactions complete coating and apos; hemolysis of paroxysmal cells of the apos; nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	fatty acid transport and incorporation into human erythrocytes in vitro	Transport and L' fatty acid incorporation into human erythrocytes in vitro.
4	distribution of chylomicrons and albumin in dog kidney	Distribution of chylomicrons and d' albumin in the dog kidney.
4	erythrocyte energy metabolism in hereditary spherocytosis	Energetic metabolism of erythrocytes in hereditary spherocytosis.
4	surface area of human erythrocyte lipids reinvestigation of experiments on plasma membrane	Plasma membrane experiments were reexamined on the surface of human erythrocyte lipids.
4	chains of particles in shear flow	Particle chains of the apo chain; apo shear flow; apo flow; air.
4	red cells and rouleaux in shear flow	Uh, red blood cells and rollers in a shear flow.
4	the influence of antibodies on immunologic responses i the effect on the response to particulate antigen in the rabbit	L' influence of antibodies on immune responses; effect of antibodies on response to apos; particulate antigen in rabbits.
4	the immune response to sheep erythrocytes in the mouse i a study of the immunological events utilizing the plaque technique	The Immune Response to Sheep Erythrocytes in the mouse i a plaque-based study of immunological events.
4	relationships of x irradiation to the enhancement of candida albicans infections	Exposure to ionizing radiation; increase in candidiasis.
4	effect of ph on inhibition and spontaneous reactivation of acetylcholinesterase treated with esters of phosphorus acids and of carbamic acids	Effect of Ph on the inhibition and spontaneous reactivation of the apos; acetylcholinesterase treated with esters of d' phosphorus and d' carbamic acids.
4	studies on pneumonia virus of mice pvm in cell culture ii structure and morphogenesis of the virus particle	Pneumonia virus studies of pvm mice in cell culture ii virus particle structure and morphogenesis.
4	the influence of erythrophagocytosis on the interaction of macrophages and salmonella in vitro	L' influence of apos; erythrophagocytosis on apos; interaction of macrophages with Salmonella in vitro.
4	the effect of prefixation on the diameter of chromosome fibers isolated by the langmuir trough critical point method	L' effect of the Langmuir depression critical point method on the diameter of chromosomal fibers.
4	pinocytotic response of circulating erythrocytes to specific blood grouping antibodies	Pineocytotic reaction of circulating erythrocytes to specific blood cluster antibodies.
4	the ultrastructural basis of capillary permeability studied with peroxidase as a tracer	The ultrastructural basis of capillary permeability was studied with tracer peroxidase.
4	the mechanism of denucleation in circulating erythroblasts	The denucleation mechanism in circulating erythroblasts.
4	three cases of hemolytic anemia with erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency in alberta	Three cases of apo; hemolytic anemia with erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency in Alberta.
4	studies of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria erythrocytes increased lysis and lipid peroxide formation by hydrogen peroxide	Studies of nocturnal paroxysmal erythrocyte hemoglobinuria enhance lysis and lipid peroxide formation by hydrogen peroxide.
4	glutathione deficiency in sheep erythrocytes	Glutathione deficiency in sheep erythrocytes.
4	use of formalinized mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens and chicken erythrocytes in hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition studies	Use of formalized mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens and dapos; chicken erythrocytes in apo studies; inhibition of apo; hemagglutination and hemagglutination; hemagglutination.
4	selective solubilization of a protein component of the red cell membrane	Selective solubilization of apos, a protein component of erythrocyte membrane.
4	hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes	Hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes.
4	immunoglobulins in nzb bl mice i serum immunoglobulin levels and immunoglobulin class of erythrocyte autoantibody	Immunoglobulins in nzb bl mice immunoglobulin levels and immunoglobulin class of autoantibody erythrocyte.
4	interferon production by chick erythrocytes activated by cell fusion	Production of ectomycorrhizal fungus; production of ectomycorrhizal fungus by cell fusion activated chicken erythrocytes.
4	esters of serine and threonine in hydrolysates of histones and protamines and attendant errors in amino acid analyses of proteins	Serine and threonine esters in apos, histones and protamines hydrolysates and the corresponding errors in protein amino acid analysis.
4	agglutinating specificity for lw factor in guinea pig and rabbit anti rh serums	Agglutinating specificity for lw factor in anti @-@rh sera from guinea pigs and rabbits.
4	fire ant venom synthesis of a reported component of solenamine	Synthesis by venom of fire ant; a known component of solenamine.
4	mutarotase in erythrocytes isolation and properties	Erythrocyte isolation and properties.
4	heterogeneity of rabbit igm antibody as detected by c 1a fixation	Rabbit igmic antibody as detected by c1a binding.
4	studies of red cell stromal proteins in tay sachs disease	Studies of erythrocyte stromal proteins in Tay Sachs Disease.
4	an inherited molecular lesion of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase identification of a kinetically aberrant isozyme associated with premature hemolysis	An inherited molecular lesion of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase (EPK) identifies a kinetically aberrant isozyme associated with premature hemolysis.
4	effect of hemorrhage and retransfusion on intrarenal distribution of blood flow in dogs	Effect of hemorrhage and vomiting on the dog's intra-renal distribution of blood flow.
4	heterophile antibodies in human transplantation	Heterophilic antibodies in human transplantation.
4	studies on manganese 3 the biological half life of radiomanganese in man and factors which affect this half life	Manganese studies 3 the half@-@ biological life of radiomanganese in men and factors affecting this half-life.
4	disproportional synthesis of the adult duck s two hemoglobins during acute anemia	Non-proportional synthesis of both adult duck hemoglobins during acute anemia.
4	the interaction of triethyltin with components of animal tissues	L' interaction of triethyltin with animal tissue components.
4	control of lecithin biosynthesis in erythrocyte membranes	The control of lecithin biosynthesis in human erythrocyte membranes.
4	the adenylate kinase of human plasma erythrocytes and platelets in relation to the degradation of adenosine diphosphate in plasma	Human erythrocyte adenylate kinase and plasma platelets related to the degradation of l' adenosine diphosphate in plasma.
4	degradation of glycerophosphatides during storage of saline washed saline suspended red cells at 20 degrees c	Degradation of glycerophosphatids during storage of suspended red blood cells in saline washed at 20 degrees c.
4	glucose and glycogen metabolism in erythrocytes from normal and glycogen storage disease type iii subjects	Glucose and glycogen metabolism in the erythrocytes of normal subjects and subjects with apo; a type iii disease related to glycogen storage.
4	hereditary nonspherocytic hemolytic disease associated with an altered phospholipid composition of the erythrocytes	Hereditary nonspherocytic hemolytic disorder associated with altered erythrocyte phospholipid composition.
4	hereditary sideroblastic anemia and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in a negro family	Hereditary sideroblastic anemia and lack of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in a black family.
4	screening lead workers for the presence of stippled erythrocytes	Screening for stippled erythrocytes in primary care workers.
4	comparison of three simple methods for the assessment of free thyroid hormone	Comparison of three simple methods and evaluation of free thyroid hormones.
4	osmotic resistance of heat damaged erythrocytes	The erythrocytes were damaged by osmotic resistance to heat.
4	new method for detecting changes in the surface appearance of human red blood cells	A new method to detect changes in the surface appearance of human red blood cells.
4	dna protein binding in interphase chromosomes	DNA protein binding in the interphase chromosomes.
4	the effect of the unstirred layer on human red cell water permeability	The effect of the stationary layer on the permeability of human red blood cells.
4	1 2 3 h cholesterol as a tracer in studies of human cholesterol metabolism	Cholesterol is a cholesterol tracers used in studies of human cholesterol metabolism.
4	hypersensitivity specific immunologic suppression of the delayed type	Immunological suppression specific to the immune system; hypersensitivity of the delayed type.
4	effect of cell age on erythrocyte fatty acid composition in rats on different dietary regimes	Cell age on fatty acid composition of erythrocytes from rats fed different diets.
4	hyaline cast formation in patients treated with cephaloridine	Hyaline cast formation in patients receiving cephaloridine.
4	heaptic glutathione concentrations linked to ethionine toxicity in rats	Hepatic glutathione levels associated with toxicity of ethionine; ethionine in rat.
4	the influence of conjugation of cholic acid on its uptake and secretion hepatic extraction of taurocholate and cholate in the dog	L' influence of conjugation of l' cholic acid on uptake and secretion; hepatic extraction of taurocholate and cholate in dogs.
4	analysis of fatty acids of human red cells without lipid extraction	Fatty acid testing of human red blood cells without lipid extraction.
4	phylogenetic origins of antibody structure 3 antibodies in the primary immune response of the sea lamprey petromyzon marinus	Phylogenetic origin of structural 3 antibodies in the primary immune response of sea lamprey Petromyzon marinus.
4	the subunits in rabbit anti forssman igm antibody	Subs @-@units in l' anti Rabbit Forssman igm antibodies.
4	folate status throughout pregnancy and in postpartum period	Folate status throughout pregnancy and post @-@partum period.
4	differences between brucella antigens involved in indirect hemagglutination tests with normal and tanned red blood cells	Differences among brucella antigens involved in apo testing; indirect hemagglutination with normal and tanned red blood cells.
4	phospholipid exchange between plasma and erythrocytes in man and the dog	Exchanging phospholipids between plasma and erythrocytes in humans and dogs.
4	bile salts and cholesterol in the pathogenesis of target cells in obstructive jaundice	Cholesterol in the pathogenesis of the target cells in obstructed jaundice.
4	in vivo lability of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in gda and gdmediterranean deficiency	In vivo ability of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in deficiencies of gda and gditerranea.
4	the haemolytic effect of various regimens of primaquine with chloroquine in american negroes with g6pd deficiency and the lack of an effect of various antimalarial suppressive agents on erythrocyte metabolism	L' hemolytic effect of various primaquine regimens with chloroquine in American blacks with a deficiency of g6pd and l' absence of g6pd and l' effect of various antimalarial suppressants on erythrocyte metabolism.
4	oxygenation and ion transport in red cells	Oxygenation and ion transport in red blood cells.
4	the physical state of hemoglobin in sickle cell anemia erythrocytes in vivo	L'apos; physical state of apos; hemoglobin in red blood cell (red blood cell) infected with apos; sickle cell anemia in vivo.
4	interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with artificial and natural membranes	Interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with natural and artificial membranes.
4	an electron microscopic study of nuclear elimination from the late erythroblast	An electron microscopic study of late erythroblast nuclear elimination.
4	dna synthesis and mitosis in erythropoietic cells	Synthesis of l' DNA and mitosis in erythropoietic cells.
4	chronic hemolytic anemia due to cold agglutinins the mechanism of resistance of red cells to c hemolysis by cold agglutinins	Chronic hemolytic anemia caused by cold agglutinins, the mechanism of resistance of red blood cells to apos; hemolysis c by cold agglutinins.
4	heterogeneity of antibody response to salmonella lipopolysaccharide measured by passive hemagglutination and hemolysis in mice	Heterogeneity of the immune response to Salmonella lipopolysaccharide, as measured by passive hemagglutination and hemolysis in mice.
4	plasma 3s gamma 1 globulin identity with erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase b	Identity of gamma-1 globulin 3s of plasma with erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase b.
4	thermal studies of the rates of the reactions of carbon dioxide in concentrated haemoglobin solutions and in red blood cells a the reactions catalysed by carbonic anhydrase b the carbamino reactions of oxygenated and deoxygenated haemoglobin	Thermal studies of the reaction rates of carbon dioxide in concentrated solutions of apos; hemoglobin and red blood cells have apos-catalyzed reactions; carbonic anhydrase b carbamino reactions of apos; oxygenated and deoxygenated hemoglobin.
4	hemoglobin cc disease rheological properties or erythrocytes and abnormalities in cell water	The rheological properties of CD; hemoglobin or erythrocytes and abnormalities of the cell water.
4	everest ms measurement of digoxin in plasma and its use in diagnosis of digoxin intoxication	Ms. Everest measures digoxin in plasma and its use in digoxin intoxication diagnostics.
4	polycythaemia in coal miners with chronic lung disease	Polycythaemia in Coal Mining Workers with Chronic Lung Disease.
4	role of erythrocytes in the acute platelet response to operation	Role of erythrocytes in acute platelet response to surgery.
4	lactate dehydrogenase electrophoretic variant in a new guinea highland population	Electrophoretic variant of lactate dehydrogenase in a new population in the Guinea uplands.
4	stages in the incorporation of fatty acids into red blood cells	Apos stages; fatty acid incorporation into red blood cells.
4	separation and characterization of soluble adenovirus type 9 components	Separation and characterization of soluble components of Type 9 adenovirus.
4	steady state hemoglobin facilitated o2 transport in human erythrocytes	Hemoglobin at apos; state of repair; balance facilitated transport of apos; oxygen in human erythrocytes.
4	effect of frusemide lactose and urea on urinary cell loss	The effect of frusemide lactose and urea on the loss of urinary cells.
4	maximal erythrocyte and hemoglobin catabolism	Erythrocyte and eposal catabolism maximal; hemoglobin.
4	the thymus and recovery of the sheep erythrocyte response in irradiated mice	Thymus and recovery of sheep erythrocyte response in irradiated mice.
4	plasmodium falciparum phagocytosis by polymorphonuclear leukocytes	P. falciparum phagocytosis by polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
4	red blood cells why or why not	Why not red blood cells?
4	rheological comparison of hemoglobin solutions and erythrocyte suspensions	Rheological comparison of hemoglobin and erythrocyte suspensions.
4	lipid composition of subcellular particles of human blood platelets	Lipid composition of subcellular particles in human blood platelets.
4	dihydroorotic acid dehydrogenase introduction into erythrocyte by the malaria parasite	Dihydroorotic acid dehydrogenase introduced into erythrocytes by the malaria parasite.
4	hemadsorption of mumps virus examined by light and electron microscopy	Mumps virus hemadsorption as examined by light and electron microscopy.
4	blood volume changes in outdoor exercise of 8 10 hour duration	Changes in blood volume during apo; outdoor apo exercise; 8 to 10 hours duration.
4	on the shape of the erythrocyte	About the shape of erythrocytes.
4	the effect of antigenic competition on various manifestations of humoral antibody formation and cellular immunity	The effect of antigenic competition on various manifestations of the formation of humoral antibodies and anti-apos; cell immunity.
4	peptide hydrolase activities of the mucosa of human small intestine	Hydrolase peptide activity in the mucosa of the intestines; human hail.
4	red cell survival after heterograft valve surgery	Survival of red blood cells after heterogreated valve surgery.
4	factors affecting the passive hemagglutination titration dilution loops titration trays vibration diluents	The factors affecting the titration dilution loops of the passive hemagglutination plate are the vibration diluents of the titration plates.
4	interaction between red cell stroma and streptolysin o inhibition of cytotoxic activity	Interaction between erythrocyte stroma and streptolysin o inhibit lidos; cytotoxic activity.
4	enhancement of parainfluenza 2 virus hemagglutinin	Augmentation of the apo; parainfluenza hemagglutinin 2.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in chinese	Glucose deficiency 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in the Chinese.
4	haptoglobin and catalase loci in man possible genetic linkage	The human haptoglobin and catalase loci may be genetically linked.
4	primaquine induced changes in morphology of exoerythrocytic stages of malaria	Primaquine induced changes in the morphology of the exoserythrocyte malaria.
4	horse agglutinins in infectious mononueleosis 3 riterion for differential diagnosis	Horse agglutinins in infectious 3 riterion mononueleosis for differential diagnosis.
4	regulation of the immune response i reduction in ability of specific antibody to inhibit long lasting igg immunological priming after removal of the fc fragment	Immune response regulation i reduction of immune capacity; specific antibody; inhibit immune response; long-term immunologic priming after removal of the fc fragment.
4	erythrocytes in human transplantation effects of pretreatment with abo group specific antigens	Effects of transplantation of human erythrocytes; pretreatment with abo-specific antigen.
4	adenine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency a previously undescribed genetic defect in man	It's called adenine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency, a genetic defect never seen in men.
4	measurement of protein concentration by quantitative electron microscopy	Measurements of protein concentration by quantitative protein electron microscopy.
4	erythropoiesis in the rat differential rates of dna synthesis and cell proliferation	Erythropoies in the differential rates of DNA synthesis and cell proliferation in the rat.
4	human monocytes distinct receptor sites for the third component of complement and for immunoglobulin g	Human monocytes have distinct receptor sites for the third component of complement and for l' immunoglobulin g.
4	sickle cell anaemia sickle cell thalassaemia sickle cell haemoglobin c disease and asymptomatic haemoglobin c thalassaemia in one ghanaian family	Schizophrenia Schizophrenia Schizophrenia Hemoglobin c disease and hemoglobin c asymptomatic thalassemia in a Ghanaian family.
4	a comparison of the monospot with the paul bunnell test in infectious mononucleosis and other diseases	Comparison of the monospot virus with Paul Bunnell's test on infectious mononucleosis and other diseases.
4	genetics of diego blood groups in guatemalan indians use of antiserums to diego a and diebo b antigens	The diego blood group genetics of Guatemalan Indians use antisera for diego a and diebo b antigens.
4	penicillin induced haemolytic anaemia	Penicillin caused hemolytic anemia.
4	direct measurements of membrane potential and membrane resistance of human red cells	Direct measurement of membrane potential and membrane resistance in human red blood cells.
4	chemotactic and anaphylatoxic fragment cleaved from the fifth component of guinea pig complement	Chemotactic and anaphylatoxic fragments were cleaved from the fifth component of the guinea pig complement.
4	conformation of blood group and virus receptor glycoproteins from red cells and secretions	Conformation of blood group glycoproteins and red cell and secretion viral receptors.
4	automated technique for the detection of hemagglutinins to sheep erythrocytes	Automated detection of hemagglutinins in sheep erythrocytes.
4	studies in the enzymology of glutathione metabolism in human erythrocytes	Enzymological studies of glutathione metabolism in human erythrocytes.
4	effect of osmolality on the hydraulic permeability coefficient of red cells	Effect of osteo; osmolality on hydraulic permeability coefficient of red blood cells.
4	intraperitoneal blood transfusion in african adults with hookworm anaemia	Intraperitoneal blood transfusion in Apos-infected African adults; ankylostoma anemia.
4	absorption and utilization of polyglutamyl forms of folate in man	Absorption and apo; use of polyglutamylated forms of folate in humans.
4	active calcium and strontium transport in human erythrocyte ghosts	"""Active calcium and strontium transport in human erythrocyte ghosts"", Environ."
4	oxygen hemoglobulin dissociation curves effect of inherited enzyme defects of the red cell	Oxygenated hemoglobulin dissociation curves showed the effect of hereditary enzyme defects in red blood cells.
4	glutathione reductase stimulation in normal subjects by riboflavin supplementation	Stimulation of glutathione reductase in normal subjects by riboflavin supplementation.
4	effect of histoplasmosis on antibody response to an erythrocyte antigen	Effect of apos; histoplasmosis on immune response to erythrocyte antigen.
4	role of erythrocytes and serum in the nutrition of rickettsia quintana	The role of erythrocytes and serum in rickettsia-quintana nutrition.
4	mannose metabolism in the human erythrocyte	Mannose metabolism in human erythrocytes.
4	inherited deficiency of the third component of human complement c 3	Inherited deficiency of the third component of the human complement c.
4	assay of carbonic anhydrase by titration at constant ph	Apos test; carbonic anhydrase by constant ph titration.
4	mammary tumor virus antigen sensitive immunoassay	Immunologic test for breast tumour virus antigen.
4	the calcium content of human erythrocytes	The calcium content of human erythrocytes.
4	some aspects of adenosine triphosphate synthesis from adenine and adenosine in human red blood cells	Some aspects of the synthesis of l' adenosine triphosphate from l' adenine and l' adenosine in human red blood cells.
4	infective substructures of sendai virus from infected ehrlich ascites tumor cells	Infectious viral substructures sent from ehrlich ascites infected cancer cells.
4	rapid sensitive assay for staphylococcal enterotoxin and a comparison of serological methods	Rapid and sensitive testing for the apos; staphylococcal enterotoxin and serologic comparison.
4	effect of statolon induced interferon on antibody formation	Effect of the apos; statolon-induced interferon on antibody formation.
4	rate limiting processes in the bohr shift in human red cells	The processes of speed limitation in the bohr movement of human red blood cells.
4	fluid drop like transition of erythrocytes under shear	The fluid falls like the shear transition of erythrocytes.
4	the role of membrane lipids in the survival of red cells in hereditary spherocytosis	The role of membrane lipids in hereditary spherocytosis in red cell survival.
4	a study of nucleated erythrocytes by density gradient centrifugation in a zonal rotor	Nucleated erythrocytes studied by density gradient centrifugation in a zonal rotor.
4	adsorption of mycoplasma pneumoniae to neuraminic acid receptors of various cells and possible role in virulence	Adsorption of pneumoniae mycoplasma to l&apos receptors; neuraminic acid of various cells and possible role in virulence.
4	utilization of neuraminic acid receptors by mycoplasmas	Use of L&apos receptors; neuraminic acid by mycoplasmas.
4	immune adherence by the fourth component of complement	Immune adhesion by the fourth component of the complement.
4	effects of quaternary ammonium compounds on choline transport in red cells	Effects of quaternary d' ammonium compounds on choline transport in red blood cells.
4	bacteriocin hemolysin of streptococcus zymogenes	Bacteriocin hemolysin from streptococcus zymogenes.
4	passive hemolysis by serum and cobra venom factor a new mechanism inducing membrane damage by complement	L' passive hemolysis by serum and cobra venom factor is a novel mechanism that induces complement-induced membrane damage.
4	effect of altitude on oxygen binding by hemoglobin and on organic phosphate levels	Effect of pH; elevation on binding of pH; oxygen through pH; hemoglobin and organic phosphate levels.
4	inhibition of adenosine triphosphatase in sheep red cell membranes by oxidized glutathione	L' glutathione-induced inhibition; adenosine triphosphatase in sheep erythrocyte membranes.
4	micro determination of plasma and erythrocyte copper by atomic absorption spectrophotometry	Microscopic determination of copper in plasma and erythrocytes by apo spectroscopy; atomic absorption.
4	estimation of red cell folate activity	Estimation of risk; activity of erythrocyte folate.
4	standardized automated procedure for measurement of serum hemolytic complement activity	Standardized automated procedure for measuring serum hemolytic complement activity.
4	microtiter indirect hemagglutination procedure for identification of streptococcal m protein antibodies	Procedure for detection; indirect microtitre hemagglutination for apo; identification of antibodies to streptococcal protein m.
4	automated procedure for measuring antigenicity of extracted and intact influenza virus	Automated apo measurement procedure; antigenicity of apovirus; influenza virus extracted and intact.
4	effect of type of red blood cells on antistreptolysin o titer	Effect of apos type; erythrocyte on apos; anti-treptolysin oiter.
4	carbonic anhydrase isoenzymes in the erythrocytes and dorsolateral prostate of the rat	Lapos enzymes; carbonic anhydrase in rat erythrocytes and dorsolateral prostate.
4	glycosphingolipids with lewis blood group activity uptake by human erythrocytes	Glycosphingolipids with apo uptake; blood group activity from human erythrocytes.
4	deformation of red blood cells in capillaries	Deformation of red blood cells in the capillaries.
4	orientation and motion of amphiphilic spin labels in membranes	L' orientation and movement of amphiphilic spin labels in the membranes.
4	glycerol permeability of human fetal and adult erythrocytes and of a model membrane	Glycerol permeability of adult and fetal human erythrocytes and erythrocytes; a model membrane.
4	gene control of hematopoiesis i erythrocyte mosaicism and permanent immunological tolerance in allophenic mice	Genetic control of apo; hematopoiesis, erythrocyte mosaicism and permanent immunological tolerance in the allophenic mice.
4	active uptake of copper and zinc during haemodialysis	Active copper and zinc absorption during apos; hemodialysis.
4	metabolic dependence of red cell deformability	Metabolic dependencies of red blood cell deformability.
4	familial plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase deficiency	Plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase deficiency in family.
4	duplicate plating of immune cell products analysis of globulin class secretion by single cells	Duplicate analysis of the products of the immune cells of globulin class secretion by individual cells.
4	nonequilibrium facilitated oxygen transport in hemoglobin solution	The no-equilibrium facilitated the transport of the apos; oxygen in a solution of apos; hemoglobin.
4	plug effect of erythrocytes in capillary blood vessels	Erythrocyte blockage in capillary blood vessels.
4	disposal of plasma heme in normal man and patients with intravascular hemolysis	Disposition of apo; plasma heme in normal male and intravascular hemolysis patients.
4	the significance of erythrocyte antigen site density i hemagglutination	The significance of the density of the site of erythrocyte antigens i hemagglutination.
4	automation of the assay of folate in serum and whole blood	Automation of folate dosage in serum and whole blood.
4	substrate stabilization genetically controlled reciprocal relationship of two human enzymes	The reciprocal relationship of two human enzymes was genetically controlled by substrate stabilization.
4	adsorption of 3h fatty acid esters of streptococcal groups a and e cell wall polysaccharide antigens by red blood cells and their effect on hemagglutination	L' adsorption of d&apos esters; fatty acids 3h of polysaccharides from the walls of groups a and e of streptococci by red blood cells and their effect on hemagglutination.
4	effect of flavin compounds on glutathione reductase activity in vivo and in vitro studies	Effect of flavin on the apos; glutathione reductase activity in vivo and in vitro.
4	standardized viral hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition tests i standardization of erythrocyte suspensions	Standardized antibody testing; viral hemagglutination and immunoblotting; immunoblotting; hemagglutination; and standardization of erythrocyte suspensions.
4	standardized viral hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition tests ii description and statistical evaluation	Standardized testing for: viral hemagglutination and apo; apo inhibition; hemagglutination ii Description and statistical evaluation.
4	chloroquine resistance in malaria a deficiency of chloroquine binding	Chloroquine resistance in malaria is due to impaired binding of chloroquine.
4	the effects of deoxygenation of adult and fetal hemoglobin on the synthesis of red cell 2 3 diphosphoglycerate and its in vivo consequences	Effects of deoxygenation of adult and fetal hemoglobin on diphosphoglycerate 2 @-@3 synthesis of red blood cells and its consequences in vivo.
4	thermal inactivation of newcastle disease virus	Thermal inactivation of Newcastle disease virus.
4	variables of the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test system and their effect on antigen and antibody titers	Variables of the test system; inhibition of rubella; hemagglutination of rubella and its effect on antigen and antibody titres.
4	primary immunization of rh negative volunteers	Primary immunization of rhesus-negative volunteers.
4	carcinogen induced immune depression absence in mice resistant to chemical oncogenesis	The carcinogen induced apo placentae; absence of immune suppression in resistant mice; chemical oncogenesis.
4	the erythrocyte ghost is a perfect osmometer	Erythrocyte phantom is a perfect osmometer.
4	stimulation of mammalian erythropoiesis by 5beta h steroid metabolites	Stimulation of apo; erythropoiesis in mammals by 5beta steroidal metabolites h.
4	binding of dodecyl sulfate to proteins at high binding ratios possible implications for the state of proteins in biological membranes	The binding of dodecyl sulfate to proteins at high binding ratios may have implications for the protein status of the biological membranes.
4	optical activity of biological membranes scattering effects and protein conformation	Disseminating effects of l' optical activity of biological membranes and conformation of proteins.
4	precipitation of proteins by vinblastine and calcium ions	Protein precipitation by vinblastine and calcium ions.
4	failure of intravenous aspirin to increase gastrointestinal blood loss	Insufficient appetite; intravenous aspirin to increase gastro@-@ intestinal blood loss.
4	molecular species of lecithins from erythrocytes and plasma of man	The lecithin molecular species of erythrocyte and human plasma.
4	electron microscope analysis of young and old red blood cells stained with colloidal iron for surface charge evaluation	Electron microscopic analysis of young and old colloidal iron stained red blood cells for apos; surface charge assessment.
4	shear dependence of effective cell volume as a determinant of blood viscosity	Shear dependence of effective cell volume as a determinant of the blood viscosity.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficient red cells resistance to infection by malarial parasites	Erythrocyte-deficient glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase resists apos infection by malaria parasites.
4	membrane alterations in hemolysis internalization of plasmalemma induced by primaquine	Membrane changes in the apos; internalization of the apos; primaquine-induced hemolysis of the plasmalemma.
4	equine isoerythrolysis clinical pathological observations and transfusion of dam s red blood cells to her foal	Isoerythrolyse equine clinical pathological observations and transfusion of red blood cells from the mother to the foal.
4	the rate of the root shift in eel red cells and eel haemoglobin solutions	The rate of root displacement in the red cells of eel and solutions of eel; hemoglobin of eel.
4	a general method for the specific staining of intracellular antigens with ferritin antibody conjugates	General method of specific staining of apo; intracellular antigens by ferritin conjugates.
4	the detection of cell bound antibody on complement coated human red cells	The detection of cell-bound antibodies on complement-coated human red blood cells.
4	detection of agglutinins in chickens infected with jm leukosis virus	Detection of apo; agglutinins in chickens infected with leucosis virus.
4	rifampicin induced immune thrombocytopenia	The rifampicin induced an immune thrombocytopenia.
4	susceptibility to an avian leukosis sarcoma virus close association with an erythrocyte isoantigen	Avian leukosis sarcoma virus susceptibility closely associated with an erythrocyte isoantigen.
4	the transport of oxidized glutathione from the erythrocytes of various species in the presence of chromate	Transport of oxidized glutathione from erythrocytes of various species in the presence of chromate.
4	automated quantitative microhemagglutination assay for treponema pallidum antibodies	Automated, quantitative microhemagglutination tests for Treponema pallidum antibodies.
4	abnormal rheology of oxygenated blood in sickle cell anemia	Abnormal rheology of the oxygenated blood in the bloodstream; sickle cell anemia.
4	effect of 2 3 diphosphoglycerate on oxygen affinity of blood in sickle cell anemia	Effect of diphosphoglycerate 2-3 on apos; blood affinity for apos; oxygen in apos; sickle cell anemia.
4	in vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells i plaque technique of high sensitivity enabling access to the cells	Stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells in vitro, i.e., high-sensitivity technical plaque that allows access to the cells.
4	orotidinuria induced by allopurinol	Orotidinuria induced by etapos; allopurinol.
4	histocompatibility 2 h 2 polymorphism in wild mice	Histocompatibility 2 h 2 in wild mice.
4	determination of alpha tocopherol in erythrocytes by gas liquid chromatography	Determination of apos; alpha tocopherol in erythrocytes by liquid gas chromatography.
4	inside out red cell membrane vesicles preparation and purification	Preparation and purification of the erythrocyte membrane vesicles at the apos level; internal to those at-ci.
4	the growth characteristics of an ascitic plasmacytoma mp 5563 terminating by fistulous communication with the blood stream	The growth characteristics of an ascitic plasmacytome mp 5563 ending in blood flow through the fistula.
4	allantoic fluid as a source of arbovirus hemagglutinin	The allantoic fluid as a source of apos, apos hemagglutinin, arbovirus.
4	erythropoietic activity of steroid metabolites in mice	Erythropoietic activity of the steroid metabolites in mice.
4	quality control in haematology report of interlaboratory trials in britain	Report on quality control in hematology of round robin trials in Great Britain,-Brittany.
4	determination of urea permeability in red cells by minimum method a test of the phenomenological equations	Determination of the permeability of the urea in the red blood cells by a minimum method, a test of the phenomenological equations.
4	natural antibodies in sera of mink before and after the development of aleutian disease viral plasmacytosis	Natural antibodies in mink serum before and after development of viral plasmacytosis of Aleutian disease.
4	macrocytosis in down s syndrome and during long term anticonvulsant therapy	Macrocytosis in the lower to lower syndrome before and during long-term, anticonvulsant therapy.
4	assay of serum fibrin degradation products by agglutination inhibition of coated erythrocytes	Test of serum fibrin degradation products with apos; inhibition of apos; agglutination of coated erythrocytes.
4	reactive lysis the complement mediated lysis of unsensitized cells i the characterization of the indicator factor and its identification as c7	Lysis reactivates the complement-mediated lysis of unsensitized cells characterization of the indicator factor and its identification as c7.
4	isolation of the fundamental polypeptide subunits of biological membranes	Isolate biological membranes under-basic polypeptide units.
4	electrophoretic analysis of hemoglobin and isozymes in individual vertebrate cells	Electrophoretic analysis of l' hemoglobin and isozymes in individual vertebrate cells.
4	genetic transmission of viruses that incite mammary tumor in mice	Genetic transmission of viruses that induce a breast tumour in mice.
4	reduced catechol o methyltransferase activity in red blood cells of women with primary affective disorder	Reduction of apo; catechol o methyltransferase activity in erythrocytes of women with apo; a primary affective disorder.
4	solubilization and partial characterization of a phytohemagglutinin receptor site from human erythrocytes	Solubilization and partial characterization of human erythrocytes as a receptor site for phytohemagglutinin.
4	in vitro induction of lysosomal enzymes by phagocytosis	In vitro, phagocytosis will induce production of lysosomal enzymes.
4	a variant of rabbit phosphoglucose isomerase	Variant of the rabbit phosphoglucose isomerase.
4	comparison of the immune responsiveness of nzb and nzb x nzw f1 hybrid mice with that of other strains of mice	Comparison of the immune response of the f1 nzb and nzb x nzw mice with that of other mouse strains.
4	disruption of adenovirus type 7 by lithium iodide resulting in the release of viral deoxyribonucleic acid	Apos-disturbance; type 7 adenovirus by apos; lithium iodide resulting in release of apos; viral deoxyribonucleic acid.
4	quinacrine mechanisms of antimalarial action	Quinacrine malaria mechanisms; antimalarial action.
4	hundred day leukemia preferential induction in rat by pulse doses of 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene	In rats, 100-day-old leukemia promoted apos; induced by pulsed doses of 78,12-trimethylbenz to anthracene.
4	hapten carrier relationships of isoantigens a model for immunological maturation based on the conversion of haptens of carriers by antibody	The relationships of haptenes to isoantigen carriers are a model of immunological maturation based on the conversion of haptenes from carriers to antibodies.
4	the rate of osmotic influx of water by flexible and inflexible erythrocytes	The rate of osmotic influx from the skin; water from flexible and inflexible erythrocytes.
4	acetylsalicylic acid induced hemolysis and its mechanism	Acetylsalicylic acid induces apos; hemolysis and its mechanism.
4	the effect of cardiac disease on hemoglobin oxygen binding	Lactos; effect of heart disease on muscle binding; hemoglobin at apos; oxygen.
4	phenotypic mixing of envelope proteins of the parainfluenza virus sv5 and vesicular stomatitis virus	Phenotypic protein mixture; parainfluenza sv5 virus and vesicular stomatitis virus envelope.
4	thyroid hormone control of erythrocyte 2 3 diphosphoglyceric acid concentrations	Epos; thyroid hormone; erythrocyte diphosphoglyceric acid; diphosphoglyceric acid 2 and 3.
4	molecular mechanism of hemolytic anemia in homozygous hemoglobin c disease electron microscopic study by the freeze etching technique	Molecular mechanisms of apos; hemolytic anemia in apos; homozygous c hemoglobin studied by cryodiffusion electron microscopy.
4	peroxidase activity in rat liver microbodies after amino triazole inhibition	L' peroxidase activity in rat liver microbodies after apos; peroxidase inhibition by apos; amino triazole.
4	membrane splitting in freeze ethching covalently bound ferritin as a membrane marker	Membrane fracture by covalently freezing bound ferritin as a membrane marker.
4	vitamin b12 levels in erythrocytes in normal subjects and in pernicious anaemia	Vitamin b12 level in erythrocytes of normal subjects and apo; pernicious anemia.
4	the effect of heat on the a b and h antigenic strength of human red cells	L' effect of heat on antigenic force a b and h of human red blood cells.
4	mucopolysaccharide in the blood of a patient with neuroblastoma	Mucopolysaccharide in the blood of patients with apos; neuroblastoma.
4	cephalexin human studies of absorption and excretion of a new cephalosporin antibiotic	Human studies of cephalosporin; absorption and apos; excretion of apos; a novel cephalosporin antibiotic.
4	fine structure of the exoerythrocytic stage of plasmodium cynomolgi	Fine structure of the exoerythrocytic stage of plasmodium cynomolgi.
4	receptors for human gamma g globulin on human neutrophils	Gamma receivers-human globulin on human neutrophils.
4	diminished synthesis of an alpha chain mutant hemoglobin i alpha 16 lys leads to glu	The reduced synthesis of the alpha-chain mutant, l' hemoglobin i alpha 16 lys, leads to glu.
4	fatty acid composition of phospholipids from platelets and erythrocytes in multiple sclerosis	Fatty acid composition of platelet and erythrocyte phospholipids in multiple sclerosis.
4	reactivity of two gonococcal antigens in an automated microhemagglutination procedure	Reactivity of two gonococcal antigens in an automated microhemagglutination.
4	sensitized erythrocyte lysis sel test as an epidemiological tool for human leptospirosis serological surveys	Testing of sensitized erythrocytes as an epidemiological tool for serological investigations of human leptospirosis.
4	titration of cholera antitoxin in human sera by microhemagglutination with formalinized erythrocytes	Name of cholera antitoxin in human serum by microhemagglutination with formalized cholera erythrocytes.
4	genetic polymorphism of tetrazolium oxidase in dogs	Key words: genetic polymorphism of dog tetrazolium oxidase.
4	purine metabolism in heterozygous carriers of hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency	Purine metabolism in apos heterozygote carriers; guanine phosphoribosyltransferase hypoxanthine deficiency.
4	thermal damage to red cells	Uh, thermal damage to the red blood cells.
4	the interaction between human monocytes and red cells specificity for igg subclasses and igg fragments	Interaction between human monocytes and red cell specificity for human sub- @-@d&apos classes; igg and d&apos fragments; igg.
4	effect of ph on the physico chemical and immunologic properties of rabbit antibodies	Effect of ph on the physico-chemical and immunological properties of antibodies in rabbit.
4	studies of phosphorescent probes for proteins	Phosphorescent probe studies for proteins.
4	platelet adhesiveness after blood donation	Adhesive platelets after a blood donation.
4	favism association with erythrocyte acid phosphatase phenotype	Favism association with phenotype of phenotypic erythrocyte acid phosphatase.
4	carbonic anhydrase isoenzymes in the erythrocytes and uterus of the rabbit	Escherichia coli enzymes; carbonic anhydrase in rabbit erythrocytes and uteri.
4	two populations of rh groups together with chromosomally abnormal cell lines in the bone marrow	Two populations of groups of rh and abnormal cell lines in the bone marrow.
4	mechanisms of recovery from a generalized viral infection mousepox i the effects of anti thymocyte serum	Mechanisms of recovery; generalized viral infection with mosaepox effects; anti- @-@thymocyte serum.
4	lysis of erythrocytes by complement in the absence of antibody	Supplemental lysis of erythrocytes; absence of antibodies.
4	differential membranolytic effects of microcrystalline sodium urate and calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate	Differential membraneolytic effects of microcrystalline sodium urate and calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate.
4	production of ultrastructural membrane lesions by the fifth component of complement	Ultrastructural membrane lesion production by the fifth component of the complement.
4	plaque assay for pneumonia virus of mice	A plaque test for the pneumonia virus in mice.
4	use of formalinized sheep erythrocytes in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Use of formalized sheep erythrocytes in apos test; apos inhibition; rubella hemagglutination.
4	release of phospholipid fatty acid from human erythrocytes	Dapos release; phospholipid fatty acids from human erythrocytes.
4	the purification and properties of carbonic anhydrases from guinea pig erythrocytes and mucosae of the gastrointestinal tract	Purification and properties of dry anhydrases of guinea pig erythrocytes and digestive tract mucosa.
4	the dissociation of chicken erythrocyte deoxyribonuleoprotein and some properties of its partial nucleoproteins	The dissociation of chicken erythrocyte deoxyribonuleoproteins and certain properties of their partial deoxyribonuleoproteins.
4	unexpectedly large size of globin messenger ribonucleic acid	Unexpected large size, globin messenger ribonucleic acid.
4	indirect hemagglutination test for detection of antibodies to cytomegalovirus	Apos test; indirect hemagglutination to detect cytomegalovirus antibodies.
4	deoxyribonucleotide pools and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in mouse embryo cells infected with three classes of polyoma virus particles	Deoxyribonucleotide pools and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in embryonic cells of mice infected with three classes of virus particles of polyomes.
4	evaluation of liquid nitrogen storage for preservation of group a streptococcal m protein sensitized sheep red blood cells	Evaluation of the group's protein; storage of protein; liquid nitrogen for storage of the group's streptococcal protein has sensitized sheep red blood cells.
4	immunological basis of the adenovirus 8 9 cross reaction	The immunological basis of the adenovirus 8-9 (adenovirus 8) cross-reaction is a cross-reaction.
4	plasmodium falciparum in owl monkeys drug resistance and chloroquine binding capacity	Plasmodium falciparum in owl monkeys drug resistance and chloroquine binding capacity.
4	hemoglobin interaction modification of solid phase composition in the sickling phenomenon	Change in solid phase composition of apos; hemoglobin interaction in sickle cell phenomenon.
4	allopurinol alteration in pyrimidine metabolism in man	Alteration of pyrimidine metabolism by allopurinol in man.
4	studies on erythropoiesis in uremic and post transplant renal patients utilizing radioactive iron and chromium	Studies on etapos; erythropoiesis in transplanted uremic and post-uremic renal patients using radioactive iron and chromium.
4	thalassemia and g 6 pd deficiency in chinese canadians admission screening of a hospital population	"""Thalassemia and g6 pd deficiency in Chinese Canadian admission screening of a hospital population,"" American Journal of Public Health."
4	heme biosynthesis in intermittent acute prophyria decreased hepatic conversion of porphobilinogen to porphyrins and increased delta aminolevulinic acid synthetase activity	Heme biosynthesis in intermittent acute prophyria decreased the hepatic conversion of porphobilinogen to porphyrins and increased l' activity of l' aminolevulinic acid synthetase delta.
4	introduction of a heterologous nucleus into enucleated cytoplasms of cultured mouse l cells	Introduction of d' a heterologous nucleus in the enucleated cytoplasms of cultured mouse l cells.
4	primitive erythropoiesis in early chick embryogenesis ii correlation between hemoglobin synthesis and the mitotic history	Early erythropoiesis early in the apo; chicken embryogenesis ii correlation between the synthesis of apos; hemoglobin and apos; mitotic history.
4	sporozoite induced infections of plasmodium berghei administered by the oral route	Sporozoites were found to induce infections of orally administered plasmodium berghei.
4	some properties of an sh group essential for choline transport in human erythrocytes	Some of these properties are essential for the transport of choline in human erythrocytes.
4	on the possibility of nonthermal biological effects of pulsed electromagnetic radiation	The possibility of the non-thermal biological effects of pulsed electromagnetic radiation.
4	the significance of erythrocyte antigen site density ii hemolysis	L' importance of site density; erythrocyte antigen hemolysis.
4	phosphoribosyl transferase activity in normal subjects gout patients and children with mental retardation	L*apos; phosphoribosyltransferase activity in normal subjects with gout and children with diabetes; mental retardation.
4	human red blood cells prostaglandin e2 epinephrine and isoproterenol alter deformability	Prostaglandin e2, epinephrine and isoproterenol in human erythrocytes alter deformability.
4	quantitation of a slide test monotest for infectious mononucleosis	Quantification of apos; a monotonic blade test for infectious mononucleosis.
4	the erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity e c 1 6 4 2 of healthy blood donors	Lapos; erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity in healthy blood donors.
4	microangiopathic haemolytic anaemia the phenomenon of red cell adherence	Microangiopathic hemolytic anemia, apos phenomenon; adhesion of red blood cells.
4	protein loss and cell loss from the small intestinal mucosa	Loss of proteins and other cells from the small intestinal mucosa.
4	studies on the coordinate activity and liability of orotidylate phosphoribosyltransferase and decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and the effects of allopurinol administration	Studies on the coordination activity and responsibility of orotidylate phosphoribosyltransferase and decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and on the effects of the drug; administration of d' allopurinol.
4	effect of antibiotics on staphylococcal hemolysin production	Effect of antibiotics on production of apos; staphylococcal hemolysin.
4	bacteriophage types and o antigen groups of escherichia coli from urine	Bacteriophage types and groups; antigens or dapos; escherichia coli in the urine.
4	comparison of the streptozyme test with the antistreptolysin o antideoxyribonuclease b and antihyaluronidase tests	Comparison of the streptozyme assay with the anti-treptolysin/anti-deoxyribonuclease b and antihyaluronidase.
4	quantitative micro complement fixation test	Quantitative test for attachment of microcomplement.
4	automation of a hemagglutination inhibition test for parainfluenza 3 antibodies in bovine sera	Automation of apo; dapo test; inhibition of apo; hemagglutination for parainfluenza 3 antibodies in bovine sera.
4	macrophage digested antigen as inducer of delayed hypersensitivity	Macrophages digest the antigen as an inducer of delayed hypersensitivity.
4	the effect of valinomycin on the electrical properties of solutions of red cell lipids in n decane	L' valinomycin effect on the electrical properties of red cell lipids in decane n.
4	incorporation of radioactive seleno 75se methionine into mumps virus	Incorporation of radioactive selen 75se methionine into the mumps virus.
4	photo affinity labeling of specific acetylcholine binding sites on membranes	Photo-labeling d' affinity of specific l&apos binding sites; acetylcholine on membranes.
4	the localization of spectrin on the inner surface of human red blood cell membranes by ferritin conjugated antibodies	The localization of spectrin on the inner surface of human erythrocyte membranes by ferritin-conjugated antibodies.
4	acholeplasma axanthum sp n a new sterol nonrequiring member of the mycoplasmatales	Acholeplasma axanthum sp n a new sterol limb not required in the mycoplasma.
4	antigen specific cells in mouse bone marrow ii fluctuation of the number and potential of immunocyte precursors after immunization	Specific cells in mouse bone marrow; antigens in mouse bone marrow; changes in number and potential of precursors; immunocytes after immunization.
4	the apparent transfer of fatty acid from phosphatidylcholine to phosphatidylethanolamine in human erythrocytes	The apparent transfer of d' fatty acids from phosphatidylcholine to phosphatidylethanolamine in human erythrocytes.
4	actinomycin d before and during primary and secondary anti forssman immunoglobulin hemolysin responses in rabbits	Anti-actinomycin before and during responses to apos; hemolysin of apos; primary and secondary anti-Forsman immune globulin in rabbits.
4	the contrasting effects of cyclophosphamide and radiation on the immune responses of the mouse	The contrasting effects of cyclophosphamide and radiation on immune responses in mice.
4	erythroid cell differentiation and the inhibition of cytokinesis by cytochalasin	Erythroid cell differentiation and cytochalasin inhibition of cytokinesis.
4	developmental changes of erythropoiesis in cultured chick blastoderms	Developmental changes in ectopoietic structure in cultured chick blastoderms.
4	conversion of vitamin b 6 compounds to active forms in the red blood cell	Conversion of vitamin b 6 compounds into red blood cell active forms.
4	analysis of chemotaxis in white blood cells	Analysis of the chemotaxis in the white blood cells.
4	the potential use of xylitol in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency anemia	L' potential use of xylitol in apo; anemia due to a glucose deficiency 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
4	alteration in the rheologic properties of plasmodium knowlesi infected red cells a possible mechanism for capillary obstruction	It is possible that alteration of the rheological properties of the red blood cells infected by the plasmodium knowlesi may be a mechanism of hair obstruction.
4	erythropoiesis in the anemia of bone marrow failure	Erythropoiesis in apos; anemia of the apos; bone marrow failure.
4	mechanism of action of thyroid hormones on erythrocyte 2 3 diphosphoglyceric acid synthesis	Mechanisms of action; action of thyroid hormones on synthesis of l' erythrocyte diphosphoglyceric acid 2 and 3.
4	characterization of the a component of streptococcus zymogenes lysin	Characterization of the a-component of streptococcus zymogenes lysine.
4	aplastic anaemia acute myeloblastic leukaemia and oxymetholone	It's called aplastic anemia, acute myeloblastic leukemia, and oxymetholone.
4	electron microscopy of the ammoniacal silver reaction for histones in the erythropoietic cells of the chick	L' electron microscopic examination of the ammonia reaction of l' silver for histones in chick erythropoietic cells.
4	effect of paraoxon on erythrocyte metabolism as measured by oxygen uptake in vitro	Effect of paraoxon on erythrocyte metabolism as measured by apos; absorption of apos; oxygen in vitro.
4	structure of glycoproteins of human erythrocytes alkali stable oligosaccharides	Human erythrocyte glycoprotein structure: alkaline and stable oligosaccharides.
4	mechanical equilibrium of biological membranes	Mechanical balance of biological membranes.
4	drug displacement from protein binding source of the sulphadoxine liberated by phenylbutazone	Displacement of the drug from the protein binding source of phenylbutazone-released sulfadoxin.
4	method for increasing the regularity of isolation of infectious ribonucleic acid from influenza virus	Method to increase timeliness; influenza isolation; infectious ribonucleic acid from influenza virus.
4	effect of two factors source of sheep cells and concentration of amboceptor on the estimated titre of rheumatoid factor	The effect of two source factors of sheep cells and concentrations of amboceptors on the estimated rheumatoid factor titre.
4	studies on the primary structure of chicken erythrocyte histone fraction v	Studies of the primary structure of the histone v fraction of chicken erythrocytes.
4	effect of induced host anaemia on the viability and radiosensitivity of murine malignant cells in vivo	Effect of apo; induced anemia in the host on viability and radiosensitivity of murine malignant cells in vivo.
4	specificities of haemagglutinating antibodies evoked by members of the cephalosporin c family and benzylpenicillin	Specificity of antibodies evoked by members of the family of cephalosporins c and benzylpenicillins.
4	intersexes and sex determination in chickens	Intersex and sex determination tests in chickens.
4	gene selection in hemoglobin and in antibody synthesizing cells	Gene selection in hemoglobin and antibody synthesis cells.
4	folate metabolism in epileptic and psychiatric patients	Folate metabolism in epileptic and psychiatric patients.
4	porphyrin biosynthesis in the erythrocytes of patients with sideropenic anaemias	Porphyrin biosynthesis in erythrocytes of patients with apo; sideropenic anemia.
4	calcium binding by human erythrocyte membranes significance of carboxyl amino and thiol groups	Calcium binding by human erythrocyte membranes is important for both the amino carboxyl and thiol groups.
4	changes in fatty acid metabolism after erythrocyte peroxidation stimulation of a membrane repair process	Changes in fatty acid metabolism following peroxidative stimulation of membrane repair of d&apos erythrocytes.
4	translation of globin m rna in thalassemia and the s and c hemoglobinopathies	Translation of globin mna into thalassemia and hemoglobinopathies s and c.
4	the effect of copper on red cell enzyme activities	L' effect of copper on red blood cell enzyme activities.
4	the antibody response of mice to murine leukemia virus in spontaneous infection absence of classical immunologic tolerance akr mice complement fixing antibodies lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus immunofluorescence glomerular deposits of antigen antibody complexes	The immune response of mice to murine leukemia virus in the absence of spontaneous infection of classical immunologically tolerant mouse akr mice complements the immuneofluorescent choriomeningitis virus-fixing antibodies, which are glomerular deposits of the antigenic complexes.
4	carbon dioxide hydration activity of carbonic anhydrase kinetics of alkylated anhydrases b and c from humans metalloenzymes isoenzymes active sites mechanism	A mechanism of active sites is L' d&apos activity; carbon dioxide hydration of the kinetics of l' carbonic anhydrase of alkylated anhydrases b and c of the isoenzymes of human metalloenzymes.
4	cytochalasin b effects on cell morphology cell adhesion and mucopolysaccharide synthesis cultured cells contractile microfilaments glycoproteins embryonic cells sorting out	The effects of cytochalasin b on the adhesion of morphological cells and the synthesis of cultured mucopolysaccharides on contractile microfilaments glycoprotein cells embryo sifting.
4	protein synthesis its control in erythropoiesis	Synthesis of proteins, its control in the epos; erythropoiesis.
4	significance of transplacental hemorrhage in the induction of specific maternal unresponsiveness	L' importance of apo; transplacental hemorrhage in apo; induction of non-specific maternal response.
4	the orientation of dna within 80 angstrom chromatin fibers	L' orientation of apos; DNA at apos; interior of 80 angstrom chromatin fibers.
4	purification and characterization of the l component of streptococcus zymogenes lysin	Purification and characterization of the l component of the streptococcus zymogenes lysine.
4	erythropoietin effects on fetal mouse erythroid cells i cell population and hemoglobin synthesis	The effects of apo; erythropoietin on fetal mouse erythroid cells i cell population and synthesis of apo; hemoglobin.
4	the appearance of acetylcholinesterase in the myotome of the embryonic rabbit an electron microscope cytochemical and biochemical study	The development of acetylcholinesterase in the myotome of the embryo rabbit was the subject of a cytochemical and a biochemical study by electron microscopy.
4	cholesterol metabolism in the macrophage 3 ingestion and intracellular fate of cholesterol and cholesterol esters	Cholesterol metabolism in apos; macrophage 3 ingestion and intracellular cholesterol and cholesterol ester release.
4	deoxyribonucleic acid of anaplasma marginale	Deoxyribonucleic acid; marginal anaplasma.
4	interaction of human growth hormone and human erythrocyte membranes studies by intrinsic fluorescence	L' interaction of the human growth hormone and human erythrocyte membranes is studied by intrinsic fluorescence.
4	n acetyl d galactosaminyltransferase in human serum and erythrocyte membranes	N acetyl dgalactosaminyltransferase in human serum and erythrocyte membranes.
4	sensitive matrix gel diffusion test for the detection of australia antigen	Scattering test on sensitive matrix gel for detection of the antigen Australian.
4	effect of the purification of virus antigens on the production of specific complement fixing antibodies	Effect of purification of virus antigens on production of antibody-fixing specific complement.
4	use of a new buffer system with formalinized sheep erythrocytes in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Use of apo; a new buffer system with formalized sheep erythrocytes in the sheep skin test; apo-inhibition; rubella hemagglutination.
4	some effects of mucopolysaccharide stains on platelet aggregation	Some effects of mucopolysaccharide dyes on plaque aggregation.
4	interaction in the cerebral metabolism of the biogenic amines effect of intravenous infusion of l tryptophan on tryptophan and tyrosine in brain and body fluids	Interaction in brain metabolism of apos; effect of intravenous tryptophan infusion biogenic amines-1 on tryptophan and tyrosine in brain and body fluids.
4	daunorubicin metabolism estimation of daunorubicin reductase	Evaluation of the metabolism of daunorubicin reductase by daunorubicin.
4	oxidant injury of caucasian glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficient red blood cells by phagocytosing leukocytes during infection	Oxidative lesion of glucose-deficient red blood cells 6 caucasian phosphate dehydrogenase by leukocyte phagocytosis during infection.
4	phenyldiimide hemoglobin and heinz bodies	Phenyldiimide, hemoglobin and heinz body heinz.
4	ribonucleic acid polymerase activity in sendai virions and nucleocapsid	L&apos activity; ribonucleic acid polymerase in sendai virions and nucleocapsids.
4	hemagglutination inhibition with arboviruses relationship between titers and source of erythrocytes	Inhibition of apos; hemagglutination by arboviruses, relationship between the titres and the source of apos; erythrocytes.
4	the relationship between antigenic structure and the requirement for thymus derived cells in the immune response	Relationship between antigenic structure and the need for thymus-derived cells in the immune response.
4	in vivo studies in c4 deficient guinea pigs	In vivo studies in c4-deficient guinea pigs were carried out.
4	exchange transfusion with dextran 40 in polycythaemia secondary to hypoxic lung disease	Transfusion of dextran 40 into a polycytheemia cell secondary to hypoxic pulmonary disease.
4	the selective inhibition of macrophage phagocytic receptors by anti membrane antibodies	L' selective inhibition of macrophage phagocyte receptors by macrophage antibody-membranes.
4	studies on antibody producing cells iv ultrastructue of plaque forming cells of rabbit lymph	Studies of apo-producing cells; ultrastructural iv antibodies in plaque-forming cells of rabbit lymph.
4	complement fixation by a two component antibody system immunoglobulin g and immunoglobulin m anti globulin rheumatoid factor parodoxical effect related to immunoglobulin g concentration	Fixation of the complement by a d&apos system; antibody with two components, immunoglobulin g and immunoglobulin m, rheumatoid factor of l' immunoglobulin m, effect parodox related to the concentration of d' immunoglobulin g.
4	serum concentrations and allotypes of immunoglobulins in two lines of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis	Serum concentrations and allotypes of apo; immunoglobulins in two mouse lines genetically selected for synthesis of apo; antibodies low or high.
4	effect of propiolactone on sendai virus	Effect of propiolactone on the sendai virus.
4	some physical properties of k antigens of escherichia coli related to their biological activity	Some of the physical properties of the escherichia coli k antigens are related to their biological activity.
4	cross neutralization of leptospiral hemolysins from different serotypes	Cross-neutralization of leptospiral hemolysins of different serotypes.
4	electron microscope study of pnh red cells and aet treated normal red cells pnh like cells	L' electron microscopic study of pnh erythrocytes and treated pnh normal erythrocytes as being similar.
4	vitamin b 12 levels in erythrocytes in hypochromic anaemia	Vitamin b12 level in erythrocytes hypochromic anemia.
4	hemagglutinin from the l phase of neisseria meningitidis group b with observations on a serum inhibitor	Phase l hemagglutinin of neisseria meningitidis group b with observations on a serum inhibitor.
4	effect of 3 thienylalanine on antibody synthesis v immunosuppression in mice by short diet and drug treatments	Effect of 3 thienylalanine on the antibody synthesis and immunosuppression in mice by short diet and drug treatment.
4	immune response to sheep red blood cells in mice pretreated with mycobacterial fractions	The immune response to sheep erythrocytes in mice pretreated with sheep mycobacterial fractions.
4	purification of pneumolysin	Pneumolysin purification.
4	adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxin and colchicine on antibody formation in the hamster	Adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxin and colchicine on hamster-derived antibody.
4	age related susceptibility to haemophilus influenzae type b disease in rabbits	Age-related sensitivity to haemophilus influenzae type b disease in rabbits.
4	macrophage cytophilic antibody in mice mechanism of action of bacterial lipopolysaccharide on the uptake of immunoglobulins by mouse peritoneal cells	Cytophilic antibody to mouse macrophages, mechanism of action; action of bacterial lipopolysaccharide on mouse macrophages; uptake of apos; immunoglobulins by mouse peritoneal cells.
4	production of staphylococcal alpha toxin i relationship between cell growth and toxin formation	Staphylococcal alpha toxin production i relationship between cell growth and toxin formation i.
4	contribution of humoral and cellular factors to the resistance to experimental infection by pseudomonas aeruginosa in mice i interaction between immunoglobulins heat labile serum factors and phagocytic cells in the killing of bacteria	Contribution of cellular and humoral factors to resistance to apo; experimental infection by pseudomonas aeruginosa in mice i interaction between heat-labile serum factors of immunoglobulins and phagocyte cells in bacterial destruction.
4	enteropathogenicity of escherichia coli i evaluation of mouse intestinal loops	Evaluation of the risk; enteropathogenicity of Escherichia coli on mouse rings.
4	biochemistry of vibrio cholerae virulence ii skin permeability factor cholera enterotoxin production in a chemically defined medium	Biochemistry of virulence of vibrio cholerae i production of enterotoxin of cholera skin permeability factor in a chemically defined medium.
4	characteristics of streptolysin o action	Characteristics of the drug; action of streptolysin o.
4	protective role of smooth lipopolysaccharide in the serum bactericidal reaction	The protective role of smooth lipopolysaccharide in the serum lipopolysaccharide response.
4	immunochemical studies of organ and tumor lipids xix cytolytic action of antibodies directed against cytolipin r	Immunochemical studies of organ and tumour lipids xix cytolytic action of r-cytolytic antibodies.
4	fate of intravenously administered particulate and lipoprotein cholesterol in the rat	The fate of intravenous (IPV) particulate and lipoprotein cholesterol in rats.
4	quantitative two dimensional ultrastructural distribution of rh o d antigenic sites on human erythrocyte membranes	Two-dimensional quantitative ultrastructural distribution of rho d antigenic sites on human erythrocyte membranes.
4	induction of colonies of hemoglobin synthesizing cells by erythropoietin in vitro	Induction of colonies of cells synthesizing the apos; hemoglobin by the apos; erythropoietin in vitro.
4	biological roles of the two components of crotoxin	The biological roles of the two chemical components of crotoxin.
4	comparison of indirect hemagglutination and immunodiffusion tests for detecting type ii leukosis marek ine	Comparison of indirect hemagglutination and immunodiffusion tests for leukosis.
4	hemolytic interaction of newcastle disease virus and chicken erythrocytes i quantitative comparison procedure	Hemolytic interaction of the virus from Newcastle disease and chicken erythrocytes i quantitative comparison procedure.
4	modified hemagglutination inhibition test for rubella employing human group o erythrocytes	Modified apo tests; apo inhibition; rubella hemagglutination using human group erythrocytes.
4	further studies on the anti immunoglobulin g hemagglutination inhibition test for influenza	Other studies on apo testing; hemagglutination anti @-@immune globulin g for influenza.
4	acetylcholine binding to torpedo electroplax relationship to acetylcholine receptors	Relationship between the binding of l' acetylcholine to electroplax torpedoes and d&apos receptors; acetylcholine.
4	oxygen affinity in red cells changes induced in vivo by propranolol	L' l&apos affinity; red blood cell oxygen changes in vivo with propranolol.
4	detection of human and chick nuclear antigens in nuclei of chick erythrocytes during reactivation in heterokaryons with hela cells	Detection of human and chicken nuclear antigens in chicken erythrocyte nuclei during reactivation in heterokaryons with helical cells.
4	detection of cholesterol in cell membranes by use of bacterial toxins	The detection of cholesterol in cell membranes by cell walls; use of bacterial toxins.
4	comparison of fluorescent antibody induced by rubella virus in vaccinee and convalescent individuals	Comparison of rubella virus-induced fluorescent antibodies in immunized and convalescing individuals.
4	passive hemagglutination inhibition test for typing foot and mouth disease virus	Dapos testing; passive inhibition of the apo; hemagglutination for FMD virus typing.
4	indirect hemagglutination with mycoplasma antigens effects of ph on antigen sensitization of tanned fresh and formalinized sheep erythrocytes	Indirect hemagglutination with the mycoplasmic antigens, effects of ph on antigen sensitization of fresh and formalized tanned sheep erythrocytes.
4	immunologic memory cells of bone marrow origin increased burst size of specific immunocyte precursors	Bone marrow origin cells of immunological memory increased the size of specific immunocyte precursors.
4	galactosidase immunological activity of ribosome bound growing polypeptide chains	L' immunological activity of the ribosome-bound, growing-chain polypeptide galactosidase.
4	membrane microfilaments of erythrocytes alteration in intact cells reproduces the hereditary spherocytosis syndrome vinblastine colchicine strychnine electron microscopy cell rigidity	Erythrocyte alteration in intact cells mimicked the inherited cellular rigidity of the colchicine spherocytosis syndrome by electron microscopy.
4	light scattering at various angles theoretical predictions of the effects of particle volume changes	Light scattering at various theoretical angles predictions of the effects of particle volume changes.
4	erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and glutathione deficiency in sheep	Erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and glutathione deficiency in sheep.
4	the survival time of df 32 p labelled erythrocytes in adult male mink	Survival time of df 32%-labeled red blood cells in adult male mink.
4	inactivation of polykaryocytogenic and hemolytic activities of sendai virus by phospholipase b lysolecithinase	Inactivation of the polykaryocytogenic and hemolytic activities of sentinib virus by lysolecithinase b phospholipase.
4	actions of bretylium tosylate at the neuromuscular junction	The actions of tosylate occur at the neuromuscular junction.
4	permeability of red cell membranes to small hydrophilic and lipophilic solutes	Erythrocyte membrane permeability to small hydrophilic and lipophilic solutes.
4	the chemical reactions of the haemagglutinins and neuraminidases of different strains of influenza viruses 3 effects of proteolytic enzymes	The chemical reactions of neuraminidases and hemagglutinins of different strains of influenza virus 3 effects of proteolytic enzymes.
4	decrease of the 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine dopa decarboxylase activities in human erythrocytes and mouse tissues after administration of dopa	Decrease of the 3 4 activities of dihydroxyphenylalanine dopa decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and mouse tissues after etapos; dopa administration.
4	cell fractionation and arrangement on fibers beads and surfaces	Fractionation and l' cell arrangement on beads and on fibre surfaces.
4	proposal for classifying human strain navel and related simian mycoplasmas as mycoplasma primatum sp n	A proposal was made to classify mycoplasmas of the human Navel strain and related simian mycoplasmas as mycoplasma primatum sp n.
4	role of antibody and complement in the immune clearance and destruction of erythrocytes ii molecular nature of igg and igm complement fixing sites and effects of their interaction with serum	Role of antibodies and complement in immune clearance and erythrocyte destruction ii molecular nature of the immunos; igg and igmic binding sites and effects of their interaction with serum.
4	erythrocytosis in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Erythrocytosis in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
4	inosinic acid dehydrogenase activity in the lesch nyhan syndrome	Inosinic acid dehydrogenase in Lesch Nyhan syndrome.
4	unstable variant of nadh methemoglobin reductase in puerto ricans with hereditary methemoglobinemia	Unstable variant of nadh-methaemoglobin reductase in puerto ricans with hereditary methemoglobinemia.
4	glycoproteins isolation from cellmembranes with lithium diiodosalicylate	Isolation of glycoproteins from cell membranes with lithium diiodosalicylate.
4	characteristics of a bacteriocin derived from streptococcus faecalis var zymogenes antagonistic to diplococcus peumoniae	Characteristics of diplococcus peumoniae antagonistic bacteriocin derived from streptococcus faecalis var zymogenes.
4	beta hemolysin a persistent impurity in preparations of staphylococcal nuclease and enterotoxin	Hemolysin beta is a persistent impurity in staphylococcal nuclease and d' enterotoxin.
4	the isolation and functional identification of a protein from the human erythrocyte ghost	L' isolation and apos; functional identification of apos; a human erythrocyte phantom protein.
4	factors affecting the maturation of renal pah extraction in the new born dog	Factors influencing apo maturation; renal pah extraction in newborn-born.
4	erythrocyte function and marrow regulation in hemoglobin bethesda beta 145 histidine	Erythrocyte function and marrow regulation in beta-145 histidine hemoglobin.
4	histocompatibility studies in a closely bred colony of dogs ii influence of the dl a system of canine histocompatibility upon the survival of cardiac allografts	Dapos studies; histocompatibility in a narrowly elevated dog colony ii influences survival of cardiac allografts by the apo placentae system; canine histocompatibility.
4	mechanism of cytolysis by complement	Cytolysis mechanisms by complement.
4	the selective inhibitory effect of hyperthermia on the metabolism and growth of malignant cells	Lapos; selective inhibitory effect of apos; hyperthermia on metabolism and growth of malignant cells.
4	the structure of erythrocyte membranes studied by freeze etching ii localization of receptors for phytohemagglutinin and influenza virus to the intramembranous particles	The structure of erythrocyte membranes studied by freeze-etching ii location of phytohemagglutinin and influenza virus receptors in the intramembrane particles.
4	glutathione synthesis in human erythrocytes ii purification and properties of the enzymes of glutathione biosynthesis	Synthesis of glutathione in human erythrocytes ii purification and properties of glutathione biosynthetic enzymes.
4	passive antibody and the immune response factors which determine enhancement and suppression	Passive antibodies and immune response factors that determine their improvement and suppression.
4	macrophage melanoma cell heterokaryons iv unmasking the macrophage specific membrane receptor	Heterokaryons of macrophage melanoma cells iv unmasking the macrophage-specific membrane receptor.
4	antiviral activity and side effects of polyriboinosinic cytidylic acid complexes as affected by molecular size	Antiviral activity and side effects of polyriboinosinic cytidylate complexes are influenced by molecular size.
4	rescue of rous sarcoma virus from rous sarcoma virus transformed mammalian cells	The rescue of the red sarcoma virus from the red sarcoma virus has transformed mammalian cells.
4	regulation of the immune response i differential effect of passively administered antibody on the thymus derived and bone marrow derived lymphocytes	The immune response is regulated by the differential effect of the antibody administered passively to lymphocytes derived from the thymus and those derived from the bone marrow.
4	genetic variation in human erythrocyte acetylcholinesterase	Genetic variation of human erythrocyte acetylcholinesterase.
4	variations in the responses of c57bl 10j and a j mice to sheep red blood cells	Variations in responses of c57bl 10j and j mice to sheep erythrocytes.
4	preparation and further characterization of the mn glycoprotein of human erythrocyte membranes	Preparation and further characterization of human erythrocyte membrane mn glycoprotein.
4	regulation of antibody response by cells expressing histamine receptors	Regulation of antibody response by histamine receptor-positive cells.
4	the isoenzymes of carbonic anhydrase kinetic properties with particular reference to the functions in the intestinal tract	The isoenzymes of the kinetic properties of etapos; carbonic anhydrase in particular with respect to intestinal tract functions.
4	in vivo formation of h2o2 in red cells during exposure to hyperoxia	In vivo formation of h2o2 in red blood cells during apos; exposure to apos; hyperoxia.
4	homotropic cooperative binding of the first component of guinea pig complement to rabbit igg erythrocyte complexes a possible allosteric effect	The homotropic cooperative binding of the first component of the guinea pig complement to rabbit igg erythrocyte complexes may have an allosteric effect.
4	increased survival of sickle cell erythrocytes after treatment in vitro with sodium cyanate	Increased survival of falciform erythrocytes following in vitro treatment with sodium cyanate.
4	cell to cell interaction in the immune response ix regulation of hepten specific antibody class by carrier priming	Cell-to-cell interaction in immune response ix regulation of class of antibody; specific antibody of the apos; apos; carrier priming.
4	induction of tolerance to sheep red blood cells	Induction of tolerance to mutant sheep erythrocytes.
4	erythropoietic protoporphyria lipid peroxidation and red cell membrane damage associated with photohemolysis	Lipid peroxidation of erythropoietic protoporphy and alteration of the erythrocyte membrane associated with photohemolysis.
4	carbonic anhydrase interaction with ddt dde and dieldrin	Interaction of apos; carbonic anhydrase with dde and dieldrin.
4	origin of the vaccinia virus hemagglutinin	Origin of the apos; hemagglutinin of the vaccine virus.
4	alzheimer s disease in one monozygotic twin	Dapos disease; Alzheimer's in a monozygous twin.
4	separation and some properties of the major proteins of the human erythrocyte membrane	Separation and some properties of the main proteins of the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	human antibody response to lipopolysaccharides from neisseria gonorrhoeae	Reaction of human antibodies to lipopolysaccharides of neisseria gonorrhoeae.
4	the isolation of digoxin specific antibody and its use in reversing the effects of digoxin	It is important to note, however, that the use of digoxin-specific antibodies to reverse the effects of digoxin is not recommended.
4	spin labeled electron spin resonance study of the lipid containing membrane of influenza virus	Electron paramagnetic resonance study of influenza virus lipid membrane.
4	comparison of selective media for isolation of presumptive group d streptococci from human feces	Comparison of selective media for apo; isolation of putative group d streptococci from human feces.
4	antigenic properties of the envelope of influenza virus rendered soluble by surfactant solvent systems	The antigenic properties of the epos; envelope of the influenza virus were soluble by surfactant solvent systems.
4	decreased red cell uroporphyrinogen i synthetase activity in intermittent acute porphyria	Decrease in apo; uroporphyrinogenic activity i erythrocyte synthetase activity in acute intermittent porphyria.
4	a study of clofazimine in the rat	A study of clofazimine in rats.
4	active calcium ion uptake by inside out and right side out vesicles of red blood cell membranes	Active calcium uptake by external vesicles of the apos, the interior and the apos, and the right exterior of the red cell membranes.
4	experimental arteriosclerosis i fibrous plaque formation in primates an electron microscope study	Experimental Arteriosclerosis i fibrous plaque formation in primates, electron microscopic study.
4	genetic factors controlling anti sheep erythrocyte antibody response and immunoglobulin synthesis in backcross and f2 progeny of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis	Genetic factors controlling the antibody response to sheep erythrocytes and apos synthesis; immunoglobulins in backcross and f2 progeny of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis.
4	genetic control of the antibody response to type 3 pneumococcal polysaccharide in mice i evidence that an x linked gene plays a decisive role in determining responsiveness	The genetic control of the immune response to type 3 pneumococcal polysaccharide in mouse i shows that apos; an x-chromosome linked gene plays a critical role in determining responsiveness.
4	phenacetin induced hemolytic anemia	Phenacetin induced hemolytic anemia.
4	storage retrieval and inventory control of donor red cells in liquid nitrogen	Recovery and control of the apos; inventory of the donor's red blood cells in the apos; liquid nitrogen.
4	primary glomerular disease with extraglomerular vascular osmiophilic deposits	Primary glomerular disease with extraglomerular vascular osmiophilic deposits.
4	improved hemagglutination test for identifying type a strains of pasteurella multocida	In addition, it will be possible to test for hemagglutination to identify a strain of pasteurella multocida.
4	indirect hemagglutination test for chlamydial antibodies	Dapos test; indirect hemagglutination for chlamydial antibodies.
4	pneumococci producing beta hemolysis on agar	Pneumococci that produce hemolysis on agar.
4	haem biosynthesis studied in patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Study of hematoma in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
4	effect of the oral contraceptive preparation femigen on the erythrocyte and resin uptake of 131 i triiodothyronine	Effect of femigen oral contraceptive formulation on appetite; absorption of erythrocyte and resin of 131 i triiodothyronine.
4	erythropoietin production in cultures of goat renal glomeruli	The production of apos; erythropoietin in goat kidney glomeruli cultures.
4	globin messenger rna activity in erythroid precursor cells and the effect of erythropoietin	L' globin rna messenger activity in erythroid and l&apos precursor cells; effect of l' erythropoietin.
4	globin messenger rna induction during erythroid differentiation of cultured leukemia cells	Induction of apos; globin messenger RNA during erythroid differentiation of cultured leukemia cells.
4	effect of a modified kaolin treatment on serum immunoglobulins	Effect of modified kaolin therapy on serum immune globulin.
4	structures suggesting cell wall deficient forms detected in circulating erythrocytes by fluorochrome staining	Structures suggesting defective forms of cell wall tissue detected in circulating erythrocytes by fluorochrome staining.
4	hemagglutination inhibition for serogrouping of neisseria meningitidis	Hemagglutination inhibition for serogrouping neisseria meningitidis.
4	structure of membrane holes in osmotic and saponin hemolysis	Structure of the membrane holes in the apos; osmotic hemolysis and saponin.
4	hemoglobin concentration in normal diploid and intersex triploid chickens genetic inactivation or canalization	Concentration of apos; hemoglobin in normal diploid and triploid intersex chicken, genetic inactivation or genetic channelization.
4	effect of colchicine colcemid and vinblastine on the agglutination by concanavalin a of transformed cells	Effect of colchicine colcemid and vinblastine on apos; concanavalin agglutination has transformed cells.
4	phagocytosis of immune complexes by macrophages different roles of the macrophage receptor sites for complement c3 and for immunoglobulin igg	Phagocytosis of immune complexes by macrophages different roles of macrophage receptor sites for c3 complement and igg immunoglobulins.
4	a comparison of the trcii and latex particle tests for the titration of fr antigen	Comparison of Trisi and latex particle tests for antigen-induced titration.
4	kinetic studies of a doubly bound red cell antigen antibody system	Kinetic studies of a dual-linked antibody system-erythrocyte.
4	assays for porphyrins delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase and porphyrinogen synthetase in microliter samples of whole blood applications to metabolic defects involving the heme pathway	Determination of the delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase and porphyrinogen synthetase porphyrins in whole blood microlitres applied to metabolic defects involving the heme pathway.
4	activation of variants of hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyl transferase by the normal enzyme	Activation of l&apos variants; normal enzyme, hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyl transferase by apos.
4	thymus independence of slowly metabolized immunogens	Independence of the thymus of slowly metabolized immunogens.
4	stable reagent for the detection of antibody to the specific fraction i antigen of yersinia pestis	Antigen-resistant yersinia pestis; antibody to the specific fraction of yersinia pestis; antibody to yersinia pestis.
4	rheology of leukocytes leukocyte suspensions and blood in leukemia possible relationship to clinical manifestations	Rheology of leukocyte suspensions and blood in leukemia, possibly related to clinical manifestations.
4	measurement of the third component of complement bound to red blood cells in patients with the cold agglutinin syndrome	Measurement of the third component of the red cell complement in patients with L&apos syndrome; cold agglutinin.
4	autonomous erythropoiesis during erythroblastic crisis of chronic myelocytic leukemia	Autonomic erythropoiesis during the erythroblastic crisis of chronic myelocytic leukemia.
4	a cellular basis for genetically controlled immunologic unresponsiveness in mice tolerance induction in t cells	A cellular basis for the apos; genetically controlled immunological inactivity in t-cell mice induces tolerance.
4	identification and quantitation of the components of polyvalent inactivated influenza virus vaccines by immunodiffusion	Identification and quantification of components of inactivated influenza; immunodiffusion influenza multi-valent vaccines.
4	red cell size as measured by the coulter model s	Red blood cell size as measured by the Coulter s model.
4	immunosuppressive activity in patients with active chronic hepatitis and primary biliary cirrhosis treated with azathioprine	Labs; immunosuppressive activity in patients with apo; chronic active and inactive hepatitis; primary biliary cirrhosis with azathioprine.
4	metabolism of rickettsia typhi and rickettsia akari in irradiated l cells	Metabolism of rickettsia typhi and rickettsia akari in irradiated l-cells.
4	mycoplasma like organism parasite of red blood cells of an amphibian hydromantes italicus spelerpes fuscus	Mycoplasma as an erythrocyte parasite of Apos; a hydromating amphibian, italicus spelerpes fuscus.
4	the mechanism of folate transport in rabbit reticulocytes	Folate transport mechanisms in rabbit reticulocytes.
4	mechanism of allopurinol mediated increase in enzyme activity in man	The mechanism of allopurinol promoted apos; increase of the enzymes; enzymatic activity in men.
4	drug induced erythrocyte membrane internalization	The drug induced the internalization of the internalized erythrocyte membrane.
4	serological cross reactions between the hemagglutinin subunits of h0n1 and h1n1 influenza viruses detected with monospecific antisera	Serological cross-reactions between the sub--hemagglutinin units of both the h0n1 and h1n1 influenza viruses detected with monospecific antisera.
4	measles virus ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis effects of 6 azauridine and cycloheximide on viral replication	The effects of protein synthesis and apos; ribonucleic acid of measles virus; azauridine 6 and cycloheximide on viral replication.
4	glycoprotein biosynthesis in small intestine 3 enzymatic basis for the difference in the antigenicity of mucins	Glycoprotein biosynthesis in apos; small intestine 3 enzyme basis for difference in apos; antigenicity of mucins.
4	immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen produced by smooth and rough strains	Immunogenicity of apo; common antigen of enterobacteria produced by smooth and rough strains.
4	biochemical basis of the immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen	Biochemical basis of apo; immunogenicity of apo; common enterobacterial antigen.
4	factors affecting interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with membranes	Factors affecting the protein synthesis; interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with membranes.
4	carbamino compounds of haemoglobin in human adult and foetal blood	"""Caramino compounds of haemoglobin in human adult and fetal blood,"" JAMA, Vol."
4	the interactions of fibrinogen and dextrans with erythrocytes	Interactions of fibrinogen and dextrans with erythrocytes.
4	carbonic anhydrase polymorphism in a new jersey population of the white footed mouse peromyscus leucopus	Polymorphism in a new jersey population of white footed mouse peromyscus leucopus.
4	differential immune response to attenuated rubella virus vaccine	Differential immune response to rubella (MMR) attenuated vaccine.
4	high resolution autoradiography of malarial parasites treated with 3 h chloroquine	High-resolution autoradiography of the malaria parasites treated with 3 h chloroquine.
4	cytochemical localization of peroxidase activity in the developing erythrocyte	Cytochemical localization of l' peroxidase activity in developing erythrocytes.
4	selective effects of thermal injury on mouse peritoneal macrophages	Selective effects of thermal damage on peritoneal macrophages of mice.
4	effect of vitamin e on the immune response of hypoxic and normal chickens	The effect of vitamin e on the immune response of both normal and hypoxic chickens.
4	synthesis of globin chains in sickle thalassemia	Synthesis of the globin chains in thalassemic sickle cell disease.
4	direct antiglobulin reaction in abo haemolytic disease of the newborn	Direct reaction to apo; antiglobulin in the abo hemolytic disease of newborn @-@.
4	improved dextran sulfate calcium chloride method for the removal of nonspecific inhibitors with modifications for nonspecific agglutinin removal in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Calcium chloride dextran sulfate enhanced method for dosage; elimination of nonspecific inhibitors with modifications for dosage; nonspecific elimination of apos; agglutinin in apos test; inhibition of apos; hemagglutination of rubella.
4	magnesium deficiency in patients on long term diuretic therapy for heart failure	Magnesium deficiency in patients undergoing long-term diuretic therapy for apo placentae; heart failure.
4	a scanning and transmission electron microscope study of antigen binding sites on rosette forming cells	A transmission and scanning electron microscope study of the binding sites of antigen in rosette cells.
4	stimulation of igg antibody response in vitro by t cell replacing factor	In vitro stimulation of response to antibody; antibody igg by t-cell replacement factor.
4	incidence of haemagglutinating antibodies to meningococci in north west england	Incidence of meningococcal antibodies in the north-west of l' England.
4	effects of salicylates on blood changes in mycoplasma arthritis in rats	Effects of salicylates on blood changes in rat muscle; mycoplasma arthritis.
4	an anti curare effect of hexamethonium at the mammalian neuromuscular junction	An anti-curious effect of hexamethonium at the mammalian neuromuscular junction.
4	genus specific leptospiral antigen and its possible use in laboratory diagnosis	Leptospiral gender-specific antigen and its possible use in laboratory diagnosis.
4	a quantitative morphological analysis of the response of a transplantable rat fibrosarcoma to cyclophosphamide	A quantitative morphological analysis of the response of rat fibrosarcoma to cyclophosphamide.
4	the modification of cholinesterase activity by 5 5 dithiobis 2 nitrobenzoic acid included in the coupled spectrophotometric assay evidence for a non catalytic substrate binding site	The modification of apos; cholinesterase activity by apos; nitrobenzoic acid 5 dithiobis 2 is included in the apos; coupled spectrophotometric assay as evidence of apos; a noncatalytic substrate binding site.
4	epstein barr virus antibody in cases and contacts of infectious mononucleosis a family study	Epstein Barr antibody virus in cases and contacts of infectious mononucleosis in a family study.
4	hemolytic anemia and g6pd deficiency	Hemolytic anemia and g6pd deficiency.
4	selenium biochemical role as a component of glutathione peroxidase	Biochemical role of selenium as a component of glutathione peroxidase.
4	induction of immunoglobulin m synthesis and secretion in bone marrow derived lymphocytes by locally concentrated concanavalin a	Induction of synthesis and secretion of apos; immunoglobulin m in lymphocytes derived from bone marrow by concanavalin locally concentrated.
4	zinc transport in rabbit tissues some hormonal aspects of the turnover of zinc in female reproductive organs liver and body fluids	Zinc transport in rabbit tissues some hormonal aspects of zinc turnover in female hepatic reproductive organs and body fluids.
4	regulation of the immune response 3 kinetic differences between thymus and bone marrow derived lymphocytes in the proliferative response to heterologous erythrocytes	Regulation of the immune response 3 kinetic differences between thymus- and bone-marrow-derived lymphocytes in the proliferative response to heterologous erythrocytes.
4	sheep red cell binding to human lymphocytes treated with neuraminidase enhancement of t cell binding and identification of a subpopulation of b cells	Binding of sheep erythrocytes to neuraminidase-treated human lymphocytes increases binding of t and l&apos lymphocytes; identification of one sub-population of b lymphocytes.
4	properties of purified pneumococcal hemolysin	Pneumococcal hemolysin: properties of Pneumococcal hemolysin.
4	partial purification and properties of the two common inherited forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase	Partial purification and properties of the two common hereditary forms of human erythrocyte epicotylate kinase.
4	kinetic studies on the two common inherited forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase	Kinetic studies of the two common hereditary forms of human erythrocyte epicotylate kinase.
4	the ionogenic nature of the secretory granule membrane electrokinetic properties of isolated chromaffin granules	The ionogenic nature of the electokinetic properties of the membrane of isolated chromaffin granules.
4	hemagglutination inhibition of passively sensitized red blood cells	Apos inhibition; passively sensitized red blood cell hemagglutination.
4	influenza a neuraminidase antibody assay with sensitized erythrocytes	Antibody to influenza neuraminidase with sensitized erythrocytes.
4	blood volume determination in the mouse	Determination of blood volume in the mouse.
4	isoantigens a b and h in benign and malignant lesions of breast	Isoantigens a b and h in benign and malignant breast lesions.
4	cultivation techniques for the erythrocytic stages of malaria parasites	Culture techniques for erythrocyte stages of malaria parasites.
4	effects of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on the ultrastructure of human and rabbit erythrocytes	Effect of the purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on the ultrastructure of human and rabbit erythrocytes.
4	agglutination of african primate and rodent erythrocytes by adenoviruses reoviruses and enteroviruses	African primate and rodent erythrocyte agglutination by reoviruses and enteroviruses; adenoviruses.
4	microtitration of bacillus cereus hemolysin	Microtitration of apos; cereus cereus bacillus hemolysin.
4	fate of the nucleus of the marrow erythroblast	Fate of the nucleus of l' erythroblastoma of the bone marrow.
4	effect of metrifonate on blood cholinesterases in children during the treatment of schistosomiasis	The effect of metrifonate on children's blood cholinesterases during schistosomiasis treatment.
4	purification of erythropoietin responsive cells by immune hemolysis	Purification of cells sensitive to etapos; erythropoietin by immune hemolysis.
4	chemical characterization and surface orientation of the major glycoprotein of the human erythrocyte membrane	Chemical characterization and orientation of the major glycoprotein surface of the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	isolation and characterization of 17 hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase from human erythrocytes	Isolation and characterization of 17 human erythrocyte hydroxy steroid dehydrogenases.
4	characteristics of chloride transport in human red blood cells	Characteristics of the transport of chlorides in human red blood cells.
4	antibodies and soluble tumour specific antigens in blood and lymph of rats with chemically induced sarcomata	Specific soluble antibodies and tumour antigens in blood and lymph from chemically induced sarcoma rats.
4	the cytotoxic effect of mouse macrophages on syngeneic and allogeneic erythrocytes	L' cytotoxic effect of mouse macrophages on allogenic and syngenic erythrocytes.
4	air lead relation to lead in blood of black school children deficient in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	Relationship between lead in air and lead in blood of glucose-deficient black schoolchildren Phosphate dehydrogenase 6.
4	mechanisms of immune lysis of red blood cells in vitro i paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria cells	Mechanisms of apo; red blood cell immunization in vitro he paroxysmal cells; nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	effects of certain purified plasma proteins on the compatibility of glass with blood	Effects of purified plasma proteins on the compatibility of glass with blood.
4	electrophoretic mobility and agglutinability of red blood cells a new polymorphism in mice	Electrophoretic mobility and red cell agglutinability, a new polymorphism in the mouse.
4	functional characteristics of peyer s patch lymphoid cells ii lipopolysaccharide is thymus dependent	Thymus-dependent functional characteristics of peyer-spot lymphoid cells ii lipopolysaccharide.
4	the separation of peripheral blood cells of the horse	Uh, separation of the peripheral blood cells from the horse.
4	viscoelastic properties of the human red blood cell membrane i deformation volume loss and rupture of red cells in micropipettes	Human erythrocyte membrane viscoelastic properties i loss of deformation volume and rupture of red blood cells in micropipettes.
4	pentose phosphate pathway inhibition in blood cells during anticonceptive hormone therapy	Inhibition of the pentose phosphate pathway in blood cells during administration of contraceptive hormone therapy.
4	effects of suramin on complement blood clotting fibrinolysis and kinin formation	Effects of suramine on fibrinolysis and coagulation kinin formation in complementary blood.
4	the relationships between arterial oxygen flow rate oxygen binding by hemoglobin and oxygen utilization after myocardial infarction	Relationships between the flow rate; arterial oxygen; binding of the apos; oxygen through the apos; hemoglobin and apos; use of the apos; oxygen after myocardial infarction.
4	ozone and human blood	Ozone and human blood?
4	chemical action of influenza virus on the red blood cell membrane i action on membrane neuraminic acids	Erythrocyte membrane chemical action of influenza virus i action on membrane neuraminic acids.
4	microrheology and light transmission of blood iii the velocity of red cell aggregate formation	Microrheology and light transmission of blood iii red blood cell aggregation rate.
4	rapid flow cytofluorometric analysis of mammalian cell cycle by propidium iodide staining	Rapid-flow cytofluorometric staining of mammalian cell cycle by propidium iodide.
4	penitrem a intoxication of calves blood chemical and pathologic changes	Penitrem intoxication of calf blood changes chemicals and pathological.
4	observations on rabbit thymocytes and peripheral t cells ii rosette formation with rabbit erythrocytes	Observations on rabbit thymocytes and peripheral t-cells ii rosettes formed with rabbit erythrocytes.
4	difficulty in blood typing after infusion of plasma substitutes relationship to erythrocyte sedimentation rate and rouleaux formation	The difficulty of determining the blood type after plasma infusion replaces the relationship with erythrocyte sedimentation rate and rouleau formation.
4	the use of 51cr for sheep red blood cell survival studies	Use 51cr for sheep red blood cell survival studies.
4	metabolic changes in avian blood and their effects on determination of blood gases and ph	Metabolic changes in avian blood and their effects on blood gas determination and ph ph ph.
4	microcalorimetric measurements of heat production in whole blood and blood cells of normal persons	Microcalorimetric measurements of heat production in the whole blood and blood cells of normal people.
4	erythropoiesis inhibiting factor s in intact and haemolyzed red blood cells	Inhibiting factors for apo; erythropoiesis in intact and hemolyzed red blood cells.
4	distribution of the blood group antigens a and b on human spermatozoa	Blood group antigen distribution a and b on human spermatozoa.
4	erythrocyte receptors for plasmodium knowlesi malaria duffy blood group determinants	Erythrocyte recipients for blood group determinants of plasmodium knowlesi malaria duffy.
4	phagocytosis of colloidal carbon and heterologous red blood cells in the bone marrow of rats and rabbits	Colloidal carbon phagocytosis and heterologous red blood cells in the bone marrow of rats and rabbits.
4	blood volume	The volume of blood; hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem.
4	identification of strong sd a and sd a red cells by hemagglutinins from salvia horminum	Erythrocyte identification sd a and sd a strong by salvia horminum hemagglutinins.
4	the chemotherapy of rodent malaria xxii the value of drug resistant strains of p berghei in screening for blood schizontocidal activity	Malaria chemotherapy in rodents xxii the value of drug-resistant p berghei strains for screening for schizontocidal activity in blood.
4	new observations on the malaria parasites of rodents of the central african republic plasmodium vinckei petteri subsp nov and plasmodium chabaudi landau 1965	New observations on malaria parasites in rodents of the Republic of Apos; Central Africa plasmodium vinckei petteri subsp nov and plasmodium chabaudi landau 1965.
4	removal of leukocytes from whole blood and erythrocyte suspensions by filtration through cotton wool v results after transfusion of 1 820 units of filtered erythrocytes	The elimination of whole blood leukocytes and erythrocyte suspensions by filtering in cotton wool results from the transfusion of 1,820 units of filtered erythrocytes.
4	physiologic effects of transfusing red blood cells with high or low affinity for oxygen to passively hyperventilated anemic baboons systemic and cerebral oxygen extraction	Physiological effects of transfusion of apos; erythrocytes with low or high apo-binding affinity; oxygen to anemic baboons undergoing passive hyperventilation; extraction of apos; systemic and cerebral oxygen.
4	an evaluation of some factors affecting the detection of blood group antibodies by automated methods	Evaluation of automated methods for certain factors affecting the detection of blood group antibodies.
4	distribution of tocopherols in human plasma and red blood cells	Tocopherol distribution in human plasma and red blood cells.
4	in vitro incorporation of 1 14c acetate by blood cells of normal ducks and ducks infected with plasmodium lophurae	In vitro incorporation of d' acetate 1,14c into blood cells of normal ducks and plasmodium lophurae infected ducks.
4	guanine aminohydrolase in rat and mouse red cells a potent inhibitor of guanylation of trna	The guanine aminohydrolase of mouse and rat erythrocytes is a potent inhibitor of guanylation of trna.
4	cholesterol ester hydrolase in human red blood cells	Cholesterol ester hydrolase in human erythrocytes.
4	effect of zinc and cadmium on delta aminolevulinate dehydratase of red blood cells in protecting against enzyme losses during storage	Effect of zinc and cadmium on epos; amino-levulinate dehydratase delta of erythrocytes for protection against enzymatic loss during storage.
4	anesthetic solubility coefficients for maternal and fetal blood	Anesthetic solubility coefficients in maternal and fetal blood.
4	microinjection of thymidine kinase and bovine serum albumin into mammalian cells by fusion with red blood cells	Microinjection of thymidine kinase and d' bovine serum albumin into the mammalian cells by fusion with red blood cells.
4	factitious changes in binding of oxygen to hemoglobin when based on extracellular ph in the presence of certain blood additives like radiographic contrast media	Fake changes in the binding of l' oxygen to l' hemoglobin when based on the extracellular in the presence of certain blood additives such as X-ray contrast media.
4	effect of formaldehyde on the circular dichroism of chicken erythrocyte chromatin	Effect of formaldehyde on chicken erythrocyte chromatin circular dichroism.
4	blood parasites of small wild mammals in czechoslovakia	Blood parasites of wild mammals in Czechoslovakia.
4	variability of the iron copper and mercury contents of individual red blood cells	Variability of the content of iron-copper and mercury in the individual red blood cells.
4	electrophoretic mobility of the fetal red blood cell	Electrophoretic mobility of fetal red blood cells.
4	molecular features of organic anion permeablity in ox red blood cell	Molecular characteristics of bovine red blood cell permeability to organic anions.
4	the effect of egg white on the phospholipid level in blood plasma erythrocytes and beta lipoproteins of healthy children	Eggs; effect of albumen on phospholipid levels in healthy plasma erythrocytes and beta-lipoproteins; healthy children.
4	chemical modification of membrane proteins in relation to inhibition of anion exchange in human red blood cells	Chemical modification of membrane proteins in relation to anions; inhibition of anion exchange in human erythrocytes.
4	effects of riboflavin repletion during different developmental phases on behavioral patterns brain nucleic acid and protein contents and erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity of male rats	Effects of riboflavin replication during different phases of development on the behavioral profiles of nucleic acid and protein content of the brain and on l' glutathione reductase activity of erythrocytes of male rats.
4	photodynamic effects of protoporphyrin on the architecture of erythrocyte membranes in protoporphyria and in normal red blood cells	Photodynamic effects of protoporphyrin on the apos; erythrocyte membrane architecture in protoporphyria and normal red blood cells.
4	removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 2 degradation of ghosts by butanol and pyridine	Removal of blood group determinants of bovine erythrocyte membranes 2 phantom degradation by butanol and pyridine.
4	effect on cytotoxicity antibodies in potential transplant recipients of leucocyte poor blood transfusion	Effect on cytotoxicity antibodies in potential blood transfusion recipients; low blood leukocyte transfusion.
4	influences of exercise and endurance training on the oxygen dissociation curve of blood under in vivo and in vitro conditions	Influences of exercise and apo; exercise; exercise training; dissociation curve endurance of apo; blood oxygen under in vivo and in vitro conditions.
4	genetic disorders of human red blood cells	This is a genetic disorder of human red blood cells.
4	red blood cell acid phosphatase ambiguity in phenotype and activity estimations in the proof of the single allele states	Red cell acid phosphatase ambiguity in phenotype and activity estimates in the evidence of the single allele states.
4	blood group a activities of glycoprotein and glycolipid from human erythrocyte membranes	Human erythrocyte membrane glycoprotein and glycolipid activities.
4	adhesion of red blood cells to charged interfaces between immiscible liquids a new method	L' adhesion of red blood cells to charged non-miscible fluid interfaces is a new method.
4	decreased haem synthetase activity in blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria	Decreased liver function; apo activity; hemorrhagic synthetase in blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphy.
4	respiratory function of blood in hibernating and non hibernating hedgehogs	Respiratory function of blood in non-hibernating and hibernating hedgehogs.
4	oxygen transport by haemoglobin a comparison of whole blood washed erythrocytes and haemoglobin solution	Hemoglobin, a comparison between whole blood washed erythrocytes and the dapos solution; hemoglobin.
4	hemorheology erythrocyte aggregation and non newtonian properties of blood new rheological law and the validity of casson s law for blood	Hemorheology, l&apos, aggregation of erythrocytes and non-Newtonian properties of blood, the new rheological law and the validity of the law of casson for blood.
4	class differences in the antibody response of hlc and llc mice to sheep red blood cells	Class differences in immune response of hlc and llc mice to sheep erythrocytes.
4	comparison of electrophoretic mobility and membrane sialic acid content of erythrocytes from adult and umbilical cord blood	Comparison of electrophoretic mobility and membrane sialic acid content of umbilical cord blood erythrocytes with that of adult erythrocytes.
4	abnormal brain scans contribution of blood radioactivity to image	The abnormal brain scans the contribution of blood radioactivity to the body's image.
4	pharmacokinetics of haloalkylamines cyclization and distribution in blood in vitro and in vivo	Pharmacokinetics of cyclization and distribution of haloalkylamines in blood in vitro and in vivo.
4	consequences of the chronic administration of phenformine on the blood thiamine level in the dog	Consequences of Apos; chronic administration of phenformin to blood levels of thiamine in dogs.
4	transmembrane exchange of chloride with bicarbonate ion in mammalian red blood cells evidence for a sulphonamide sensitive carrier	L' transmembrane exchange of chloride with apos; bicarbonate ion in mammalian erythrocytes, indicating the presence of apos; a sulfonamide-sensitive carrier.
4	exit of anaplasma marginale from bovine red blood cells	Exit d' marginal bovine red blood cell anaplasm.
4	distribution of progesterone and its effect on human blood during storage	Distribution of progesterone and its effects on human blood during storage.
4	exchange transfusion in reye s syndrome with saline washed red blood cells	Swap transfusions into rye syndrome with red blood cells washed in saline water.
4	a simple kit for the preparation of 99mtc labeled red blood cells	A simple kit for preparing red blood cells labelled at 99 mtc.
4	relative activity of alpha tocopherol and gamma tocopherol in preventing oxidative red cell hemolysis	L' relative activity of l' alpha tocopherol and gamma tocopherol in the prevention of l' oxidative hemolysis of red blood cells.
4	oxygen transport in the blood of children with congenital heart defects	The transport of oxygen in the blood of children with congenital heart defects.
4	a comparison of intact human red blood cells and resealed and leaky ghosts with respect to their interactions with surface labelling agents and proteolytic enzymes	Comparison of intact human erythrocytes with resplicated and elusive phantoms for their interactions with surface-labelling agents and proteolytic enzymes.
4	gamma glutamyltransferase activity in the human red blood cell membrane author s transl	L' gamma glutamyltransferase activity in human erythrocyte membrane is reported.
4	fetal blood sampling in midtrimester pregnancies	Fetal blood sample collection in the middle trimester of pregnancy.
4	evaluation of the interaction between blood and foreign material in the pump oxygenator during open heart surgery in infants by scanning electron microscopy author s transl	Evaluation of apo; interaction between blood and extraneous material in apo; pump oxygen during open heart surgery in infants by scanning electron microscopy with apo translation; author.
4	blood volume changes in hypersplenic rats	Changes in blood volume in hypersplenic rats.
4	unusual response to abo incompatible blood transfusion	Unusual response to a blood transfusion incompatible with abo.
4	effect of combined application of carboxylin and sodium citrate on the restoration of blood proteins under conditions of experimental anemia	Effect of Lapos; combined application of carboxyline and sodium citrate on blood protein restoration under conditions of laboratory anemia.
4	permanent in series cardiac assistance with the dynamic aortic patch blood prosthesis interaction in long term canine experiments	Serial continuous cardiac assistance with the apos; interaction of dynamic aortic patch blood prosthesis in long-term canine experiments.
4	plasma and red blood cell phospholipids in chronic liver diseases	Plasma and erythrocyte phospholipids in chronic liver disease.
4	maturation and interrelationship of mouse mononuclear phagocytes in bone marrow peripheral blood and peritoneal cavity in terms of erythrophagocytic activity	Mature and inter-relationship of mouse mononuclear phagocytes in peripheral blood of the bone marrow and peritoneal cavity in terms of ectopic activity.
4	methionine adenosyltransferase cystathionine beta synthase and cystathionine gamma lyase activity of rat liver subcellular particles human blood cells and mixed white cells from rat bone marrow	L' rat liver subcellular particles, human blood cells and mixed rat bone marrow white blood cells, methionine adenosyltransferase cystathionine beta synthase and cystathionine gamma lyase activity.
4	redox metabolism of glutathione in the red blood cell	Metabolism of glutathione redox in red blood cells.
4	improved deformability of crenated red cells in hyperosmolar human blood by adenosine	Improvement of the deformability of deformed red blood cells in hyperosmolar human blood by apos adenosine.
4	biochemical and morphological changes in blood during growth of heifer during the 1st pregnancy and lactation in cows	Biochemical and morphological changes in blood during heifer growth during initial gestation and lactation in cows.
4	studies on the reconstitution of bovine erythrocyte superoxide dismutase v preparation and properties of derivatives in which both zinc and copper sites contain copper	Reconstitution studies of bovine erythrocyte superoxide dismutase v preparation and properties of derivatives in which copper and zinc sites contain copper.
4	relation between various phospholipase actions on human red cell membranes and the interfacial phospholipid pressure in monolayers	The relationship between various phospholipase actions on human erythrocyte membranes and interfacial phospholipid pressure in monolayers.
4	a study performed on batches of serum albumin used as diluents in rh testing a report to the international society of blood transfusion international committee for standardization in haematology by their albumin working party	A study conducted on lots of serum @-@albumin used as diluent in the rhinoceros test; a report to the International Society of Blood Transfusion (ISB) International Committee for the Standardization of Apos; hematology by their albumin working group.
4	deformation and fragmentation of human red blood cells in turbulent shear flow	Deformation and fragmentation of the human red blood cells in turbulent shear flow.
4	relationship between activation of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase by heating and blood lead level	Relationship between heating and blood lead levels; activation of the aminolevulinic acid delta dehydratase.
4	trypsin activated complex of human factor b with cobra venom factor cvf cleaving c3 and c5 and generating a lytic factor for unsensitized guinea pig erythrocytes ii physico chemical characterization of the activated complex	Trypsin-activated complex of human b factor with cobra venom cvf clone c3 and c5 and generate lytic factor for unsensitized guinea pig erythrocytes ii Physico-chemical characterization of the activated complex.
4	alterations in reactivity of the blood factors of cattle red cells after pronase treatment	Changes in the responsiveness of bovine red blood cell factors after pronase treatment.
4	evidence for origin of certain childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemias and lymphomas in thymus derived lymphocytes	Evidence of lymphosis; origin of some acute leukemias and lymphoblastic lymphoma in children in thymus-derived lymphocytes.
4	isolation and identification of a new metabolite of naltrexone in human blood and urine	Isolation and identification of naltrexone; a novel metabolite of naltrexone in human blood and urine.
4	relationship between lead concentration in blood and biological response for porphyrin metabolism in workers occupationally exposed to lead	Relationship between blood lead concentration and the biological response to porphyrin metabolism in occupationally exposed workers.
4	characterization of protoporphyrin in red blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria	Characterization of protoporphyrin in red blood cells of patients with a history of erythropoietic protoporphyria.
4	blood volume changes and production and destruction of erythrocytes in newborn dogs	Changes in volume of blood and production and destruction of erythrocytes in newly born dogs.
4	blood groups antigens plasma protein and red cell isoenzyme polymorphisms in south west scotland	The plasma protein antigens and erythrocyte isozyme polymorphisms in South Scotland-west.
4	mercury in red blood cells in relation to organic mercury in hair	Mercury in red blood cells vs. organic mercury in hair.
4	an experimental method correcting for absorption flattening and scattering in suspensions of absorbing particles circular dichroism and absorption spectra of hemoglobin in situ in red blood cells	Experimental method correcting for absorption flattening and diffusion in absorbing particle suspensions circular dichroism and apo spectra; apo absorption; in situ hemoglobin in red blood cells.
4	in vitro effect of lead in blood on the determination of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydrase	In vitro effect of lead in the blood on the determination of dehydrase of l' aminolevulinic acid delta.
4	experimental verification of a mathematical model of plasma protein and erythrocyte regeneration after blood loss	Experimental testing of apo; a mathematical model for plasma protein and erythrocyte regeneration following blood loss.
4	interaction of red blood cells with a polarized electrode evidence of long range intermolecular forces	L' interaction of the erythrocytes with a polarized electrode demonstrates the existence of long-range intermolecular forces.
4	homologous gene expression in intergeneric fox hybrids alopex lagopus x vulpes vulpes i comparative electrophoretic analysis of blood proteins and enzymes in arctic and silver foxes	Genic expression homologous in intergeneric hybrids of alopex lagopus x vulpes vulpes i foxes, comparative electrophoretic analysis of blood proteins and enzymes in arctic and silver foxes.
4	the effect of lead and cadmium on liver kidney and brain levels of cadmium copper lead manganese and zinc and on erythrocyte ala d activity in mice	Effects of lead and cadmium on cadmium, copper, manganese and zinc levels in the kidneys, brain and kidney; erythrocyte activity in mice.
4	action of glycosyl transferases upon bombay oh erythrocytes conversion to cells showing blood group h and a specificities	Glucosyltransferase action during the conversion of bombay oh erythrocytes into cells shows the h blood group and specificities.
4	erythrocyte agglutinins in the blood of certain ascidians	Erythrocyte agglutinins in the blood of some ascidians.
4	on the structure of agglutinated sheep red blood cell membranes	Membrane structure of agglutinated sheep erythrocytes.
4	some hereditary blood factors of the bengali muslim of bangladesh red cell enzymes haemoglobins and serum proteins	Some hereditary blood factors of Bangladeshi erythrocyte hemoglobin and serum protein bengali.
4	enrichment of erythrocytes of fetal origin from adult fetal blood mixtures via selective hemolysis of adult blood cells an aid to antenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies	Lapos; enrichment of erythrocytes; fetal origin from adult fetal blood mixtures by selective hemolysis of adult blood cells facilitates antenatal hemoglobinopathy diagnosis.
4	haematological values for the finnish reindeer	Hematological values for Finnish reindeer.
4	mechanisms of the acquired erythrocyte enzyme deficiencies in blood diseases	Mechanisms of erythrocyte enzyme deficiencies acquired in blood-borne diseases.
4	asparaginase entrapped in red blood cells action and survival	Asparaginase trapped in red blood cells action and survival.
4	mass spectrometric analysis of permethylated glycosphingolipids ii comparative studies on different blood group active and related erythrocyte membrane glycosphingolipids	Mass spectrometric analysis of permethylated glycosphingolipids ii comparative studies of different active blood groups and of related erythrocyte membrane glycosphingolipids.
4	development of immunity against antigens of the a and b blood groups during postembryogenesis in chickens	Development of immunity against blood-group antigens a and b during chicken embryogenesis.
4	rheological studies of hb ss blood influence of hematocrit hypertonicity separation of cells deoxygenation and mixture with normal cells	Rheological studies of apo; blood pressure; hematocrit on apo; hypertonicity Separation of deoxygenating cells and mixing with normal cells.
4	mechanisms of destruction of human rhesus sensitized red blood cells	The mechanisms of human rhesus destruction sensitize human blood red blood cells.
4	the influence of magnesium ions on pyruvate kinase deficient red blood cells	The influence of magnesium ions on pyruvate kinase-deficient erythrocytes.
4	studies on blood components of an air breathing siluroid fish heteropneustes fossilis bloch in relation to body weight	Studies of the blood components of a siluroid fish that breathes air, leaflet, heteropneustes fossilis bloch, in relation to body weight.
4	red blood cell catechol o methyl transferase and response to imipramine in unipolar depressive women	Red cell catechol o methyl transferase and response to imipramine in depressive women.
4	effect of anti inflammatory preparations on the process of thermogenesis in blood erythrocytes	Effect of anti-@-@ inflammatory preparations on the thermogenesis process in blood erythrocytes.
4	anti b activity of a lectin coexistent with blood group h like substance in seeds of euonymus sieboldiana	A lectin co-exists with a similar substance of the blood group h in the seeds of Apos; euonymus sieboldiana.
4	measurement of free erythrocyte protoporphyrin in blood collected on filter paper as a screening test to detect lead poisoning in children	Measurement of free erythrocyte protoporphyrin in blood taken from filter paper as a test for lead poisoning in children.
4	chemical characterization and distribution of abo blood group active glycoprotein in human erythrocyte membrane	Chemical characterization and distribution of active abo blood group glycoprotein in the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	hemagglutination inhibition studies for the evaluation of blood group antigens in ethanol soluble substances ess obtained from human baboon and vervet monkey red blood cells	Dapo studies; inhibition of apo; hemagglutination for apo; evaluation of blood group antigens in apo-soluble substances; ethanol from human baboon and monkey red blood cells.
4	pharmacokinetics of red blood cell phenothiazine and clinical effects acute dystonic reactions	Pharmacokinetics of erythrocyte phenothiazine therapy and clinical effects Acute dystonic reactions.
4	course of skin allografts in rabbits immunized by heterologous red blood cells	Allograft skin cells in rabbits immunized with heterologous red blood cells.
4	blood levels of lead and erythrocyte ala dehydrase in 200 employees of a turin metallurgical plant analysis of variables connected with alcohol drinking and smoking habits	Blood levels of lead and lead; erythrocyte ala dehydrating in 200 employees; a turin metallurgical plant; analysis of alcohol and tobacco consumption variables.
4	differentiation of red blood cells in vitro	Red cell differentiation in vitro.
4	one step separation of the sialoprotein possessing abh and mn blood group activities from human red cell membrane	One-step separation of the blood-grouping sialoprotein abh and mn from the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	identification of plant sterols in plasma and red blood cells of man and experimental animals	Identification of plant sterols in the plasma and red blood cells of the animals and experimental animals.
4	anti wrb and other autoantibodies responsible for positive direct antiglobulin tests in 150 individuals	Anti wrb and other auto-antibodies for direct positive antiglobulin testing in 150 people.
4	angular scattering analysis of the circular dichroism of biological cells 2 the red blood cell	Circular dichroism of biological cells 2 and red blood cells is analyzed by angular diffusion.
4	effects of ph during recombination of human erythrocyte membrane apoprotein and lipid	The effects of ph during recombination of the apos; apoprotein and human erythrocyte membrane lipids.
4	changes in vitro of the electrolyte content and erythrocyte volume of the venous blood of patients with chronic pneumopathy subjected to tonometry in oxygen	Changes in the in vitro electrolyte content and volume of venous blood erythrocytes in patients with chronic pulmonary disease using oxygen tonometry.
4	effect of broad and narrow spectrum fluorescent light on blood constituents	The effect of broad-spectrum, narrow-spectrum fluorescent light on blood components.
4	phenotypic expression of galactokinase deficiency in heterozygous and homozygous subjects in vivo and in vitro studies	Phenotypic expression of galactokinase deficiency in heterozygous and homozygous subjects in vivo and in vitro.
4	metabolism of 4 14c estrone by sheep erythrocytes around the time of parturition	Metabolism of 4 estrone 14c by sheep erythrocytes at parturition.
4	experiences at the blood transfusion center of the socialist republic of serbia in providing aimed transfusions	Experiences in the Blood Transfusion Centre of the Socialist Republic of Serbia to provide targeted transfusions.
4	case of rh e and kell antigen sensitization by blood transfusion	Transfusion sensitization to rh e and kell antigens.
4	the influence of the known radioprotective compounds on the metabolism of human red blood cell part ii the influence of cysteamine on enzymic systems	L' influence of known radioprotectants on the metabolism of part ii of human erythrocytes, l' influence of cysteamine on the enzyme systems.
4	effects of incorporated trypsin on anion exchange and membrane proteins in human red blood cell ghosts	Effects of trypsin incorporated into anion exchange and membrane proteins in phantom human red blood cells.
4	erythrocyte ph in respiratory and metabolic acid base disturbances studies on human blood in vitro	Erythrocyte ph in in vitro studies of respiratory and metabolic disturbances of acidic bases in human blood.
4	distribution of sulfonamides and sulfonamide potentiators between red blood cells proteins and aqueous phases of the blood of different species	Distribution of sulfonamides and potentiating sulfonamides between red blood cell proteins and aqueous phases of blood of different species.
4	problems in determination of oxygen dissociation of avian blood	Problems in determining dissociation of apos; oxygen in apos blood; bird by dissociation of apos; oxygen in the blood of apos; bird.
4	serial radionuclide determinations of the electron fraction with 99mtc labeled red blood cells	Serial determination of the electron fraction of radionuclides with 99 mtc labelled red blood cells.
4	hemolysis and hemolysis mechanisms in congenital dyserythropoietic anemia cda of type i ii iii	Mechanisms of apo; hemolysis and apo; hemolysis in apo; type iii cda congenital dyserythropoietic anemia iii.
4	polyamine distribution in cellular compartments of blood and in aging erythrocytes	Distribution of polyamines in cellular blood and aging erythrocytes.
4	attenuation measurements of whole blood and blood fractions in computed tomography	Measurements; attenuation of whole blood and blood fractions (BPF) by computed tomography.
4	the effect of calf lymph and bovine red blood cells on in vitro cultivation of theileria parva infected lymphoid cells	Effect of calf lymph and bovine red blood cells on the in vitro culture of Theileria parva infected lymphoid cells.
4	human red cell acid phosphatase quantitative evidence of a silent gene po and a danish population study	Phosphatase acid erythrocyte human, quantitative evidence of apos; existence of apos; a gene silent po and apos; Danish population study.
4	red cell volume measurements and acute blood loss in high risk newborn infants	"""Red cell volume measurements and acute blood loss in high risk newborn infants,"" Obstet Gynecol."
4	detection of babes negri bodies in blood erythrocytes of rabid white mice	Black baby body detection in red blood cells of rabid white mice.
4	visualization of the human cavernosum penis by using 99mtc labeled autologous red blood cells	Penis visualization of human cavernosum at apos; aid of autologous red blood cells labelled with 99mtc.
4	influence of oxygen and carbon dioxide on the plasma erythrocyte ph relationship in normal human whole blood	L' influence of oxygen and carbon dioxide (CO2) on the ph relationship of plasma erythrocytes in normal human whole blood.
4	use and analysis of saline washed red blood cells	Use and analysis of saline-washed red blood cells.
4	regional quality control	Quality control at the regional level.
4	the removal of leukocytes and platelets from whole blood	L-apos; elimination of leukocytes and platelets from whole blood.
4	ss blood group associated pas staining polymorphism of glycoprotein 3 from human erythrocyte membranes	The ss blood group associates glycoprotein 3 polymorphism of human erythrocyte membranes with staining at-@-@ pas.
4	nature of the union between sheep red blood cells and t lymphocytes	Nature of the disease; union of sheep red blood cells and T-cells.
4	potential difference and the distribution of ions across the human red blood cell membrane a study of the mechanism by which the fluorescent cation dis c3 5 reports membrane potential	Ion distribution and potential difference across the human erythrocyte membrane, a study of the mechanism by which the c3 5 fluorescent cation reports membrane potential.
4	red blood cell selection in chimeric mice	Selection of red blood cells in chimeric mice.
4	blood group determinations in forensic dentistry	Determination of blood types in a legal dentist's office.
4	fast cell size distribution analysis by laser flow microphotometry applications to ciliate populations	Rapid cell-size distribution analysis by laser flow microphotometry applications to ciliate populations.
4	routine freezing of red blood cells for transfusion in western australia	Systematic freezing of red blood cells (RBC) for transfusion in the west of the country; Australia.
4	carbonic anhydrase isozymes of blood and oviducal tissues of leghorn hens	Isozyme carbonic anhydrase of Leghorn chicken blood and oviducal tissue.
4	the blood groups serum groups red cell isoenzymes and haemoglobins of the sandawe and nyaturu of tanzania	The blood types include erythrocyte isoenzymes and haemoglobins from Tanzania sandawe and nyaturu.
4	the chemotherapy of rodent malaria xxiv the blood schizontocidal action of erythromycin upon plasmodium berghei	Malaria chemotherapy in xxiv l&apos rodents; blood schizontocide action of l' erythromycin on plasmodium berghei.
4	familial deficiency of glutathione reductase in human blood cells	Familial glutathione reductase in human blood cells.
4	peripheral blood elements found in an egyptian mummy a three dimensional view	And the peripheral blood elements found in an Egyptian mummy have a three-dimensional view.
4	erythrocyte morphology in genetic defects of the rh and kell blood group systems	Erythrocyte morphology in genetic defects of blood groups rh and kell.
4	characterization of the antibody response of the marmoset to sheep red blood cells	Characterization of marmoset immune response to sheep red blood cells.
4	studies on blood eosinophils ii patients with l ffler s cardiomyopathy	Studies in patients with eosinophilic cardiomyopathy ii in the blood.
4	the kurloff cell its differentiation in the blood and lymphatic system	The kurloff cell differentiates itself in the blood and the lymphatic system.
4	suppression of immune response to sheep red blood cells in mice treated with preparations of a tumor cell component and in tumor bearing mice	Suppression of the immune response to sheep erythrocytes in mice treated with tumor cell preparations and in tumor-carrying mice.
4	immunosuppressive activity of submaxillary gland extracts of the mouse i effect on antibody formation in response to sheep red blood cells	L' immunosuppressive activity d' extracts of gland under @-@mice maxillary has an effect on the formation of apos; antibodies in response to sheep erythrocytes.
4	complement and fc receptors on cord blood and adult neutrophils	Fc and complementary recipients on adult cord blood and neutrophils.
4	respiratory characteristics of blood from basenji dogs with classical erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency	Respiratory characteristics of blood from erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficient basenji dogs.
4	the red blood cell esterase d polymorphism in europe and asia	The polymorphism of l' red cell esterase in Europe and Asia.
4	antigenic relationships on the diphtheria toxin molecule antitoxin versus antitoxoid	Antigenic relationships on diphtheria toxin antitoxin versus antitoxoid molecule.
4	direct determination of ligand interactions with beta adrenergic receptors on intact turkey erythrocytes correlation of binding with biological activity	Direct determination of ligand interactions with beta-adrenergic receptors on intact turkey erythrocytes, correlation of turkey binding with etapos; biological activity.
4	long term of phenytoin effects on whole blood and red cell folate and haematological parameters	The long-term effects of phenytoin on whole blood and erythrocyte folate and hematological parameters.
4	detection of anti red blood cell antibodies by treatment of the cells with neuraminidase	Detection of apos; anti-erythrocyte antibody by neuraminidase treatment of cells.
4	quantitative determination of blood loss by means of 51 cr labeled erythrocytes in occult hemorrhages of the gastrointestinal tract	Quantitative determination of blood loss using 51-centimeter-labeled erythrocytes in occult haemorrhages of the gastro-intestinal tract.
4	survival of 51cr tagged red blood cells in patients with artificial heart valves author s transl	Survival of 51cr-labeled red blood cells in patients with artificial cardiac valves.
4	formation of glutathione conjugates of prostaglandin a1 in human red blood cells	Formation of prostaglandin a1 glutathione conjugates in human erythrocytes.
4	loading of human red blood cells with dna and rna	Charging the human red blood cells with DNA and rna.
4	changes in the erythrocyte membrane during blood preservation influence of progesterone	Changes in the erythrocyte membrane during storage of the blood influence progesterone.
4	effect of sodium para aminosalicylate on oxygen affinity in normal sickle and fetal human blood	Effect of sodium para aminosalicylate on appetite; affinity for acid; oxygen in normal and fetal human blood.
4	changes in red blood cell volume on fixation in glutaraldehyde solutions	Changes in red blood cell volume during binding to glutaraldehyde solutions.
4	the rational use of blood	L' rational use of the blood.
4	neuroleptic drug levels and therapeutic response preliminary observations with red blood cell bound butaperazine	Neuroleptic Drug Rate and Therapeutic Response Preliminary findings with red blood cell-bound butaperazin therapy.
4	lymphocyte subpopulations in the peripheral blood of patients with farmer s lung	Under-lymphocyte populations in peripheral blood of patients with lungs from farmers.
4	electrophoresis of glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases in erythrocytes from malaria infected animals	Glucose electrophoresis 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases in the erythrocytes of animals infected with malaria.
4	morphological features of red blood cells in subjects with sickle cell trait changes during exercise	The morphological characteristics of erythrocytes of sickle cell carriers changed during exercise.
4	clinical trials of immunization with the towne 125 strain of human cytomegalovirus	Clinical trials of apo; immunization with human cytomegalovirus towne strain 125.
4	multiple myeloma an immunologic profile i peripheral blood studies	Multiple myeloma and immunologic profile i studies of peripheral blood.
4	the blood groups and other heriditary blood factors of yemenite and kurdish jews	Blood types and other blood factors of Yemeni and Kurdish Jews.
4	acetylcholinesterase of erythrocytes in various blood diseases	Erythrocyte acetylcholinesterase in various blood diseases.
4	seasonal changes in the makeup of the red blood of healthy children	Seasonal changes in red blood composition among healthy children.
4	haematological changes associated with the mcleod phenotype of the kell blood group system	Hematological changes associated with mcleod phenotype of the kell blood group system.
4	electrokinetic properties of formed elements in blood exposed to physical factors	Electrokinetic properties of blood components exposed to physical factors.
4	physical chemical characterization of living cells by laser flow microfluorometry	Physico-characterization-chemical of living cells by laser flow microfluorometry.
4	the influence of the combination of coumarin and troxerutin on infantile blood parameter in lactation period short communication author s transl	Effects of the combination of coumarin and troxerutin on infant blood parameters in lactation.
4	the effects of zinc on the morphology of sickle red blood cell ghosts as observed by scanning electron microscopy	The effects of zinc on the morphology of ghosts of sickle cell red blood cells observed by scanning electron microscopy.
4	electronic measurement of red cell flow in micropipettes	Electronic measurement of globular flux in micropipettes.
4	the relationship between the red cell forms and surface area during thyroxine induced metamorphosis in rana cyanophlyctis	The relationship between red cell shape and surface during thyroxine administration induces metamorphosis in rana cyanophlyctis.
4	thiamine content and enzyme activity in blood cells in leukemia	Thiamine content and enzyme activity in the blood cells during leukemia.
4	purification of normal human eosinophils using the different binding capacities of blood leucocytes for complexed rabbit igg	Purification of normal human eosinophils using different binding capacities of blood leukocytes for complexed rabbit igg.
4	the substance reacting with srbc sheep red blood cells and rabbit igg isolation under mild conditions from rat thymus	The substance reacts with sheep red blood cells srbc and l' it is also isolated from rabbit igg under mild conditions from rat thymus.
4	blood of the common indian weaver birds ploceus philippinus and ploceus benghalensis linnaeus	The blood of the ploceus philippinus and ploceus benghalensis linnaeus of the Indian common weaver.
4	the human blood platelet its derivation from the red blood cell a morphologic study	The human blood platelet is derived from epos; erythrocyte is a morphological study.
4	regulation of blood pyridoxal phosphate in riboflavin deficiency in man	Effect of pyridoxal phosphate on riboflavin in men.
4	human lymphocyte subpopulations giant human red blood cell rosettes	Sub--human lymphocyte populations Giant rosettes of human red blood cells.
4	a carbohydrate deficient membrane glycoprotein in human erythrocytes of phenotype s s	A carbohydrate-deficient membrane glycoprotein in phenotype s human erythrocytes.
4	effects of selenium and vitamin e on blood selenium levels tissue glutathione peroxidase activities and white muscle disease in sheep fed purified or hay diets	Effects of selenium and vitamin e on blood levels of selenium, protein, tissue glutathione peroxidase activity and white muscle disease in sheep fed purified diets or hay.
4	phagocytosis of old red blood cells by macrophages from syngeneic mice in vitro	Syngenic mouse macrophages in vitro phagocytosis of old red blood cells.
4	turbulent flow of red cells in dilute suspensions effect on kinetics of o2 uptake	The turbulent flow of red blood cells in dilute suspension systems has an effect on the kinetics of apos; absorption of apos; oxygen.
4	anti lu14 a lutheran antibody defining the product of an allele at the lu8 blood group locus	Anti lu14 a Lutheran antibody that defines the d&apos product; an allele at the lu8 locus of the blood group.
4	blood group d antigen content of nucleated red cell precursors	Blood group nucleated red blood cell precursors antigen content d.
4	a photodecomposition fluorimetric method for determination of riboflavin in the various constitutents of blood	Fluorometric photodecomposition method for the determination of riboflavin in blood components.
4	distribution of riboflavin in blood in women and in prenates	Distribution of riboflavin in the blood of prenatal women and women.
4	stabilization of flow properties of blood with phenylbenzo gama pyrone derivatives flavonoids	Stabilization of the properties of d' flow of blood with flavonoids derived from phenylbenzo gama pyrone.
4	removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 3 action of proteolytic enzymes on intact cells	Removal of blood group determinants of bovine erythrocyte membranes 3 action of proteolytic enzymes on intact cells.
4	crossreactivity with sporozoites exoerythrocytic forms and blood schizonts of plasmodium berghei in indirect fluorescent antibody tests with sera of rats immunized with sporozoites or infected blood	Cross-reactivity with exoerythrocytic sporozoites and blood schizonts of plasmodium berghei in indirect fluorescence assays with sera from sporozoite- or infected rats.
4	factors affecting the exchange of tocopherol between red blood cells and plasma	Factors affecting tocopherol levels; tocopherol exchange between red blood cells and plasma.
4	relationship between blood zinc level and eeg changes under the influence of hyperpnea in normal subjects	Relationship between blood zinc and changes in apo; ego under apo; influence of apo; hyperpnea in normal subjects.
4	blood group abh specific macroglycolipids of human erythrocytes isolation in high yield from a crude membrane glycoprotein fraction	Apos-specific abh macroglycolipid blood type; isolation of human erythrocytes with high yield from apo; a crude fraction of membrane-bound glycoproteins.
4	transfer of bovine j blood group determinant onto erythrocytes isolation and identification of a blocker	Transfer of bovine blood group determinant (BGD) to apo; erythrocyte isolation and identification; a blocker.
4	selective depression of blood group antigens associated with hereditary ovalocytosis among melanesians	Selective depressive blood group antigens associated with apo; hereditary oocytosis in melanesians.
4	an automated method of differential red blood cell classification with application to the diagnosis of anemia	An automated method of differential classification of red blood cells for diagnosis of anemia.
4	uniform lateral orientation caused by flow forces of flat particles in flow through systems	Uniform lateral orientation caused by d*apos forces; flat particle flow in d*apos systems; flow.
4	altered humoral immune response to sheep red blood cells by sheep erythrocyte soluble hemolysate	Modification of the humoral immune response to sheep red blood cells by the sheep erythrocyte soluble hemolysate.
4	porphyrins in erythrocytes and blood plasma preliminary studies with qualitative thin layer chromatography	Porphyrins in erythrocytes and blood plasma Preliminary thin-layer qualitative chromatography studies.
4	the use of frozen thawed erythrocytes in blood banking a report of 28 months experience in a large transfusion service	The use of thawed frozen erythrocytes in blood banks is reported as a 28-month experience in a large transfusion service.
4	relationship between microvascular blood velocity and pressure distribution	Microvascular blood velocity and pressure distribution.
4	bovine peripheral blood monocyte cultures growth characteristics and cellular receptors for immunoglobulin g and complement	Growth characteristics of bovine peripheral blood monocyte cultures and immune globulin g and complement cell receptors.
4	an interpretation of human diaphorase isozymes in terms of three gene loci dia1 dia2 and dia3	An interpretation of human diaphorase isozymes in terms of three dia1 dia2 and dia3 gene loci is proposed.
4	autoxidation and effects of pro and antioxidants in lyophilized red blood cell membranes	Autoxidation and effects of pro and antioxidants in the lyophilized erythrocyte membranes.
4	transfer of bovine j blood group activity to human erythrocytes in vitro	Transfer of l&apos in vitro; bovine blood group activity to human erythrocytes.
4	an attempt to separate mononuclear cells fused with human red blood cell ghosts from a cell mixture treated with hvj sendai virus using a fluorescence activated cell sorter facs ii	Attempted separation of mononuclear cells fused with human phantom red blood cells; a combination of cells treated with Hvj sent to apos; a fluorescent activated cell sorter ii.
4	congenital dyserythropoietic anaemia types i and ii aberrant pattern of erythrocyte membrane proteins in cda ii as revealed by two dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Congenital dyserythropoietic anemia of types i and ii, aberrant pattern of erythrocyte membrane proteins in cda ii, as revealed by two-dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
4	scintigraphic assessment of vascularity and blood tissue barrier of human brain tumours	Scintigraphic evaluation of vascularity and blood tissue barrier in human brain tumours.
4	genetic structure of an isolated group of the indigenous population of northern siberia nganasans tavgiitsi of taymyr i history erythrocyte and serum blood systems isoenzymes	Genetic structure d' an isolated group from the indigenous population of northern Siberian taymyr tavgiitsi history of isozyme erythrocytes and serum blood systems.
4	the relationship between extra and intracellular lithium concentration in human red blood cells an in vitro study	The relationship between the concentration of extracellular and intracellular lithium in human erythrocytes was investigated in an in vitro study.
4	nuclear steady state rna from chicken immature red blood cells distribution of globin coding and poly a sequences	Nuclear DNA at apo; apo state; equilibrium from immature chicken erythrocytes; distribution of poly a and globin coding sequences.
4	relations between surface charge and in vitro lysis of red blood cells in paroxysmal nocturnal haemoglobinuria	Relationships between surface charge and lysis of red blood cells in apos in vitro; paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	angiotensinase activity in red blood cell membranes and intact adrenal cells	Angiotensinase activity in intact erythrocyte membranes and adrenal cells.
4	the present state of haemorheology methods findings and significance with regard to physiology and pathology of the blood circulation author s transl	L' current state of apo methods; discovered hemorheology and apo; importance with respect to the physiology and pathology of apo; author of translated blood circulation.
4	change of oxygen affinity of hemoglobin in different conditions of blood preservation	Modification of apos; apos affinity; hemoglobin for apos; oxygen under different blood storage conditions.
4	agglutination of the red blood cells after experimental glycolytic alteration	Agglutination of red blood cells (RBCs) after experimental glycolytic alteration.
4	a like specificity in tn activated erythrocytes of blood group b	Similar specificity in tn activated the red blood cells of blood group b.
4	changes in the membrane proteins of blood cells in the course of embryonal megaloerythropoiesis in relation to hemoglobin maturation	Changes in blood cell membrane proteins during embryonic megal erythropoiesis (EEM) in relation to the maturation of l' hemoglobin.
4	methemoglobin formation and binding to blood constituents as indicators for the formation availability and reactivity of activated metabolites derived from trans 4 aminostilbene and related aromatic amines	Methemoglobin formation and its binding to blood components were found to be indicators of the availability and reactivity of activated metabolites derived from trans @-@-4 aminostilbene and related aromatic amines.
4	antigens of the blood group i and i on the surfacc of chicken erythrocytes	Blood group antigens i and i on chicken erythrocyte surfacc.
4	transfusion requirements of patients with enzyme deficient red blood cells	Transfusion requirements for patients with red cell deficient enzymes.
4	identification of the cl transport site of human red blood cells by a kinetic analysis of the inhibitory effects of a chemical probe	Identification of the site of human red blood cell (HRBC) transport by kinetic analysis of the inhibitory effects of apos; a chemical probe.
5	the concentration of glucose in mammalian liver	Glucose levels in mammalian liver.
5	a continuous flow method for the determination of glucose uptake by excised rat diaphragm	A continuous flow method for determination of apos; glucose absorption by the excised rat diaphragm.
5	effect of galactose 1 phosphate on glucose oxidation by normal and galactosemic leukocytes	Effect of galactose phosphate 1 (galactose phosphate 1) on apos; glucose oxidation by normal and galactosemic leukocytes.
5	true glucose content of lumbar and ventricular cerebrospinal fluid	True glucose content of cerebrospinal fluid-lumbar and ventricular spinal cord.
5	enthalpy changes associated with the lactic fermentation of glucose	Changes in pH; enthalpy associated with lactic fermentation of glucose.
5	effects of veratrine and cocaine on cerebral carbohydrate amino acid interrelations	The effects of veratrin and cocaine on the amino acid relationships of brain carbohydrates.
5	glycogen synthesis from uridine diphosphate glucose the distribution of the enzyme in liver cell fractions	Glucose uridine synthesis of glycogen diphosphates the distribution of l' enzyme in liver cell fractions.
5	dissimilation of glucose and gluconic acid by pseudomonas natriegens	Glucose and sucrose dissimulation; gluconic acid by pseudomonas natriegens.
5	glucose dehydrogenation in bacteria a comparative study	Dehydrogenation of glucose in bacteria is a comparative study.
5	a growth stimulating factor for an epithelial cell line in a reduced serum medium	Growth-promoting factor; an epithelial cell line in reduced serum.
5	oxidative assimilation and distribution of glucose in bacillus cereus	Oxidative assimilation and glucose distribution in the cereus bacillus.
5	citric acid fermentation of sugars purified with chelating resin	Fermentation with lapos; citric acid of purified sugars with chelating resin.
5	the effect of exogenous energy sources on the synthesis of beta galactosidase in resting cell suspensions of escherichia coli	The effect of exogenous sources on the synthesis of beta galactosidase in resting cell suspensions escherichia coli.
5	glucose 6 phosphatase and the exchange of glucose with glucose 6 phosphate	Glucose 6 phosphatase and l' glucose exchange with glucose 6 phosphate.
5	intravenous nutrition a clinical evaluation of a 50 per cent dextrose in water solution containing 1 mg of hydrocortisone per 100 ml	Intravenous nutrition: clinical evaluation of apos; an aqueous solution containing 50% dextrose, containing 1 mg d*apos; hydrocortisone per 100 mL.
5	the inheritance of the glucose component of the phage nucleic acids	L' inheritance of the glucose component of phage nucleic acids.
5	tryptophanase tryptophan synthetase systems in escherichia coli ii effect of glucose	Tryptophanase tryptophan synthetase systems in escherichia coli glucose effect ii.
5	permeability of bacterial spores i characterization of glucose uptake	Bacterial spore permeability i characterization of the properties of glucose absorption.
5	inhibitory effects of carbohydrates on histamine release and mast cell disruption by dextran	Carbohydrate-inhibiting effects on histamine release and mast cell dextran disruption.
5	glucose uptake and dissimilation by x irradiated starved and division inhibited yeast	Absorption and dissimilation of glucose by starved and divided irradiated yeasts inhibit yeast.
5	biosynthesis and biosynthetic pathways of pentoses in escherichia coli	Pentose biosynthesis and biosynthetic pathways in escherichia coli.
5	enzymes of glucose and pyruvate catabolism in cells spores and germinated spores of clostridium botulinum	Glucose and pyruvate catabolism enzymes in the cellular spores and germinated spores of clostridium botulinum.
5	substrate specificity of a glucose permease of escherichia coli	Specificity of the cell substrate; glucose permease; escherichia coli.
5	conditions affecting bacillus megaterium spore germination in glucose or various nitrogenous compounds	Conditions affecting the germination of megaterium spores in glucose or various nitrogen compounds.
5	cysteine stimulation of glucose oxidation in thyroid tissue	Cysteine-stimulation of the apos; glucose oxidation in the thyroid tissue.
5	convulsive syndrome in rabbits injected with fat emulsion and heparin	Convulsive syndrome in rabbits injected with fatty emulsion and apos; heparin.
5	multicomponent substrate utilization by natural populations and a pure culture of escherichia coli	Use of multicomponent substrates by natural populations and pure culture of d' escherichia coli.
5	trachoma agent glucose utilization by purified suspensions	L' use of glucose as trachoma agent by purified suspensions.
5	fermentative activities of control and radiation killed spores of clostridium botulinum	The spores of Clostridium botulinum were killed by control and radiation fermentation activities.
5	freezing out technique applied to the concentration of biologically active materials	Applied freezing technique to the concentration of biologically active materials.
5	nutritional requirements for the production of herpes simplex virus i influence of glucose and glutamine of herpes simplex virus production by hela cells	The nutritional requirements for the production of the virus of the apos; herpes simplex i influences the glucose and glutamine of the production of the virus of the apos; herpes simplex by the helical cells.
5	glyoxylate metabolism in growth and sporulation of bacillus cereus	Metabolism of glyoxylate in growth and sporulation of the bacillus cereus.
5	carbohydrate and lipid content of radiation resistant and sensitive strains of escherichia coli	Carbohydrate and lipid content of both radiation-resistant and radiation-sensitive strains of Escherichia coli.
5	utilization of arginine as an energy source for the growth of streptococcus faecalis	Use of apos; arginine as a source of protein; energy for growth of streptococcus faecalis.
5	physiological changes occurring in yeast undergoing glucose repression	Physiological changes occurring in glucose suppressed yeast.
5	enzymatic utilization of glucose by a basidiomycete	Enzymatic use of glucose by the basidiomycete.
5	effect of glucose on the activity of hypothalamic feeding centers	Effect of glucose on body weight; activity of hypothalamic food centers.
5	isocitrate lyase and malate synthase in pseudomonas indigofera i suppression and stimulation during growth	Isocitrate lyase and malate synthase in indigofera pseudomonas i suppression and stimulation during growth.
5	studies on the physiology of rickettsiae iii glucose phosphorylation and hexokinase activity in coxiella burnetii	Studies on the physiology of glucose phosphorylation and apos; apos activity; hexokinase in coxiella burnetii.
5	purification and characterization of a growth stimulant for bacillus species	The cleaning and characterization of plants; a growth stimulant for the bacillary species.
5	2 ketogluconate fermentation by streptococcus faecalis	Fermentation of 2 ketogluconates by streptococcus faecalis.
5	nutritional requirements of bacillus popilliae	Nutritional needs of the popilliae bacillus.
5	accumulation of phosphorus compounds by mucor racemosus	L' accumulation of phosphorus compounds by the racemosus mucor.
5	control of isocitratase formation in rhizopus nigricans	Control of isos; isocitratase formation in the rhizopus nigricans.
5	in vitro inhibition of yeast growth by mouse ascites fluid and serum	In vitro, the inhibition of yeast growth by fluid from mice and serum.
5	green fluorescent pigment accumulated by a mutant of cellvibrio gilvus	Green fluorescent pigment accumulated by a cellvibrio gilvus mutant.
5	staphylococci in competition iv effect of starch and kind and concentration of sugar on staphylococcal growth in mixed populations	Competing Staphylococci iv effect of starch and the nature and concentration of sugar on staphylococcal growth in the mixed populations.
5	mechanism of glucose transport across the yeast cell membrane	Glucose transport mechanisms across the yeast cell membrane.
5	quantitative studies of the effect of organic substrates and 2 4 dinitrophenol on heterotrophic carbon dioxide fixation in hydrogenomonas facilis	Quantitative studies of the effect of organic substrates and 24 dinitrophenol on the heterotrophic carbon dioxide (CO2) fixation in apo; Hydroomonas facilis.
5	the frictional coefficients of the flows of non electrolytes through artificial membranes	Friction coefficients of non-@-@ electrolyte flows through the artificial membranes.
5	prediction of discrimination from generalization after variations in schedule of reinforcement	Prediction of discrimination from generalization after variations in the reinforcement schedule.
5	pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus subtilis	Pathways of glucose catabolism in the bacillus subtilis.
5	effect of bacterial polysaccharide accumulation on infiltration of water through sand	Effect of apos; accumulation of bacterial polysaccharides on apos; infiltration of apos; water in sand.
5	sequential substrate removal in response to qualitative shock loading of activated sludge systems	Sequential removal of the substrate in response to qualitative shock loading of activated sludge systems.
5	patterns of oxidative assimilation in strains of acetobacter and azotobacter	Dapos models; oxidative assimilation in d*apos; acetobacter and d*apos; azotobacter strains.
5	induced biosynthesis of alpha amylase by growing cultures of bacillus stearothermophilus	Biosynthesis of apos; alpha amylase was induced by cultures of growing stearothermophilus bacilli.
5	de novo synthesis of alpha amylase by bacillus stearothermophilus	De novo synthesis of alpha-amylase by stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	streptomycin formation by intact mycelium of streptomyces griseus	The formation of streptomycin by the intact mycelium of streptomyces griseus.
5	sugar transport in a psychrophilic yeast	Transporting sugar into a psychrophilic yeast.
5	physiology of the enterococci as related to their taxonomy	Physiology of Enterococci in relation to their taxonomic status.
5	nutrition of cellular slime molds iii specific growth requirements of polysphondylium pallidum	Cellular myxomycete feeding requirements iii specific growth requirements for polysphondylium pallidum.
5	biosynthesis of ribose and deoxyribose in pseudomonas saccharophila	Pseudomonas saccharophila ribose and deoxyribose biosynthesis.
5	intestinal disaccharidases absence in two species of sea lions	The absence of intestinal disaccharidases in two species of seals.
5	mechanisms in the inhibition of microorganisms by sorbic acid	Mechanical processes; microbial inhibition by sorbic acid.
5	glucose catabolism by bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus	Catabolism of glucose by bacillus popilliae and lenmorbus bacillus.
5	chemically defined synthetic media for sporulation and for germination and growth of bacillus subtilis	Synthetic chemically defined media for sporulation, germination and growth of bacillus subtilis.
5	pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus cereus	Pathways of glucose catabolism in the bacillus cereus.
5	changes in terminal respiratory pathways of intact cells of bacillus cereus at various stages of development	Changes in the end of the respiratory tract of intact cells of the bacillus cereus at various stages of development.
5	pathways for biosynthesis of a bacterial capsular polysaccharide iv capsule resynthesis by decapsulated resting cell suspensions	Bacterial capsular polysaccharide IV biosynthesis pathways by decapsulated resting cell suspensions.
5	purification and properties of n acetyl d glucosamine kinase from streptococcus pyogenes	The purification and properties of glucosamine kinase nacetyl from streptococcus pyogenes.
5	aerobic fermentation and the depletion of the amino acid pool in yeast cells	Aero-base fermentation and depletion of the pool of amino acids in yeast cells.
5	glucose transfer from adenosine diphosphate glucose to starch in preparations of waxy seeds	Glucose transfer from the apos; adenosine diphosphate glucose to the apos; starch in waxy seed preparations.
5	production of lipase by pseudomonas fragi in a synthetic medium	Pseudomonas fragi lipase production in a synthetic medium.
5	effect of carbohydrates in phosphate buffer on germination of bacillus stearothermophilus spores	Effect of carbohydrate in phosphate buffer on the germination of spores of the stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	dynamics of acridine orange cell interaction ii dye induced ultrastructural changes in multivesicular bodies acridine orange particles	The interaction of acridine orange cells ii the dye induces ultrastructural changes in the multivesicular bodies of acridine orange particles.
5	protection of renal function during surgery of the abdominal aorta	Protection of renal function during abdominal aortic surgery.
5	an evaluation of some commercial test papers and tablets for the determination of glucose in urine	Evaluation of selected commercial tests and tablets for determination of glucose in urine.
5	a synthetic acyl polysaccharide and the hemagglutination activity	Synthetic polysaccharide d' acyl and l' d&apos activity; hemagglutination.
5	action of dihydrostreptomycin and antagonism by cations	L' action of dihydrostreptomycin and l' cation antagonism.
5	viability and metabolism of staphylococcus aureus after freezing lyophilization and irradiation	Viability and metabolism of staphylococcus aureus after freeze-drying and freeze-drying; irradiation.
5	nutritional and regulatory aspects of serine metabolism in escherichia coli	The nutritional and regulatory aspects of the metabolism of serine in escherichia coli.
5	growth and extracellular polysaccharide production by rhizobium meliloti in defined medium	Growth and production of extracellular polysaccharides by rhizobium meliloti in defined medium.
5	immune diffusion analysis of the extracellular soluble antigens of two strains of rhizobium meliloti	Analysis of immune diffusion of extracellular soluble antigens from two strains of rhizobium meliloti.
5	bone cells biochemical and biological studies after enzymatic isolation	Biochemical and biological studies of bone cells after enzyme isolation.
5	patterns of oxidative assimilation in strains of pseudomonas and achromobacter	Apos models; oxidative assimilation in Pseudomonas and Apos strains; achromobacter.
5	electron transport components of streptomycin dependent escherichia coli	Components of the transport of streptomycin-dependent electrons; escherichia coli.
5	glucose metabolism of two strains of mycoplasma laidlawii	Metabolism of glucose in two strains of mycoplasma laidlawii.
5	inhibitory action of phage k on staphylococcal dehydrogenases i effect on various strains of staphylococcus aureus including members of the phage typing series	The inhibitory action of phage k on the staphylococcal dehydrogenases i has effects on various strains of staphylococcus aureus, including members of the phage series.
5	induction of alpha amylase of bacillus stearothermophilus by maltodextrins	Induction of the apo; alpha amylase of stearothermophilus bacillus by maltodextrins.
5	kinases of streptococcus faecalis i enzyme localization	Streptococcus kinases faecalis i localization of apos; enzyme i.
5	selective inhibition of proline induced pigmentation in washed cells of serratia marcescens	L' selective inhibition of proline induces pigmentation in washed serratia marcescens cells.
5	turbidity change during glucose permeation in escherichia coli	Modification of turbidity during glucose permeation in the Escherichia coli.
5	metabolic role of the br factor in butyribacterium rettgeri	Metabolic role of br factor in butyribacterium rettgeri.
5	conversion of glucose c14 to propionate by the rumen microbiota	Conversion of glucose c14 to propionate by microflora of rumen.
5	oxidative assimilation by bacillus megaterium	Oxidative assimilation by the bacillus megaterium technique.
5	influence of growth medium on assimilatory activities of escherichia coli	The effect of the growth medium on the activity of plants; assimilation of plants; and, escherichia coli.
5	comparative physiology of antibiotic resistant strains of staphylococcus aureus	Comparison of the physiology of strains of antibiotic-resistant Staphylococcus aureus.
5	biosynthesis of serine in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Serine biosynthesis in Escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
5	carbohydrate nutrition and sporulation of allescheria boydii	Glucid nutrition and apple sporulation; allescheria boydii.
5	isolation of toxigenic strains of clostridium novyi from soil	Isolate toxigenic strains of Clostridium novyi from soil.
5	effect of catalase and cultural conditions on growth of beggiatoa	Effect of catalase and cultural conditions on beggiatoa growth.
5	factors that influence toxigenicity of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Factors that influence the toxigenicity of Pseudomonas aeruginosa virus.
5	benzo a pyrene uptake by bacteria and yeast	Absorption of benzo a pyrene by bacteria and pyrene yeasts.
5	actinomycin d inhibition of protein synthesis unrelated to effect on template rna synthesis	Apos inhibition; actinomycin d protein synthesis unrelated to apos; effect on rna matrix synthesis.
5	the role of polyphosphates in the transport mechanism of glucose in yeast cells	The role of polyphosphates in the cellular mechanism of glucose transport in yeast cells.
5	effect of glucose on the capacity of escherichia coli to be infected by a virulent lamba bacteriophage	The effect of glucose on the ability of Escherichia coli d&apos to become infected with a virulent bacteriophage.
5	growth stasis by accumulated l alpha glycerophosphate in escherichia coli	Growth stage due to apos; accumulation of apos; alpha glycerophosphate in Escherichia coli.
5	extracellular polysaccharides of algae effects on life support systems	Extracellular polysaccharides from effects of algae on life support systems.
5	fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus i carbohydrate sources for the production of protease and streptomycin	Fermentation studies with griseus streptomycin carbohydrate sources for protease and streptomycin production.
5	production of calcium gluconate by penicillium chrysogenum in submerged culture	Calcium gluconate production by penicillium chrysogenum in submerged culture.
5	adaptive changes in enzyme activity and metabolic pathways in adipose tissue from meal fed rats	Adaptive alterations of liver enzymes; enzyme activity and metabolic pathways in fat tissue of meal-fed rats.
5	effect of phenol on bacillus subtilis spores at elevated temperatures	The effect of phenol on the spores of the bacillus subtilis at high temperatures.
5	the use of gas liquid chromatography in the analysis of neutral monosaccharides in hydrolysates of gastric mucopolysaccharides	Use of liquid-gas chromatography for analysis of neutral monosaccharides in gastric mucosal hydrolysates.
5	effects of intravenous infusions of acetate beta hydroxybutyrate triglyceride and other metabolites on the composition of the milk fat and blood in cows	Effect of intravenous infusions of apo, beta-acetate, beta-acetate, beta-hydroxybutyrate, triglyceride and d' other metabolites on milk fat and blood composition in cows.
5	constitution viability and lactate dehydrogenase in stationary phase l cell suspension cultures	Constitution viability and lactate dehydrogenase in suspension cultures of stationary l phase cells.
5	sorbose counterflow as a measure of intracellular glucose in baker s yeast	Sorbose vs-flux as a measure of intracellular glucose in baking yeast.
5	morphology of mycoplasma laidlawii type a ii effect of glucose on growth and cellular morphology	Morphology of mycoplasma laidlawii type effects of glucose on growth and cell morphology.
5	quantitative studies on glycolytic enzymes in lactobacillus plantarum ii intracellular concentrations of glycolytic intermediates in glucose metabolizing washed cells	Quantitative studies of glycolytic enzymes in lactobacillus plantarum ii intracellular concentrations of etapos; glycolytic intermediates in washed glucose-metabolizing cells.
5	host parasite relationships among group a streptococci i hyaluronic acid production by virulent and avirulent strains	Relationships between streptococcal group parasites and production of apos; hyaluronic acid by virulent and avirulent strains.
5	fate of the mesosomes of bacillus megaterium during protoplasting	The fate of mesosomes of the megaterium bacillus during protoplasty.
5	metabolism of intracellular polysaccharide by streptococcus mitis and its relation to inducible enzyme formation	Metabolism of intracellular polysaccharide by streptococcus mitis and its relationship to inducible enzyme formation.
5	the chemotherapy of cardiac arrest	Apos chemotherapy; cardiac arrest.
5	mechanism of action of nalidixic acid on escherichia coli	Mechanisms; action of acid; nalidixic acid on escherichia coli.
5	metabolic nonequivalence of the two glucose moieties of cellobiose in cellvibrio gilvus	The non-metabolic equivalence of the two glucose moieties of cellobiose in cellvibrio gilvus.
5	fumarate reduction and its role in the diversion of glucose fermentation by streptococcus faecalis	Fumarate reduction and its role in diversion of glucose fermentation by streptococcus faecalis.
5	lactate degrading system in butyribacterium rettgeri subject to glucose repression	Lactate degrading system in glucose-repressed Butyribacterium rettgeri.
5	biochemistry of nitrate respiration in pseudomonas stutzeri i aerobic and nitrate respiration routes of carbohydrate catabolism	The biochemistry of nitrate respiration in pseudomonas stutzeri he aerobic and nitrate respiratory tract of carbohydrate catabolism.
5	cyst formation and poly beta hydroxybutyric acid accumulation in azotobacter	Cyste formation and l' beta acid accumulation-hydroxybutyric acid in the azotobacteria.
5	oxidation and assimilation of carbohydrates by micrococcus sodonensis	Oxidization and assimilation of carbohydrates by micrococcus sodonensis, p.
5	factors affecting the formation of cobamide coenzymes in clostridium tetanomorphum	Factors affecting cobamid coenzyme formation in clostridium tetanomorphum.
5	fructose 6 phosphate reductase from salmonella gallinarum	Salmonella gallinarum 6 phosphate reductase fructose.
5	morphological aberration of arthrobacter globiformis cells due to biotin deficiency	Morphological aberration of the d&apos cells; arthrobacter globiformis due to biotin deficiency.
5	production and characterization of multiple layered populations of animal cells	Production and characterization of multilayered populations of animal cells.
5	regulation of cockroach fat body metabolism by the corpus cardiacum in vitro	Regulation of fat body metabolism of cockroaches by the heart body in vitro.
5	intestinal metabolism of fatty acids	Fatty acid metabolism in the intestines.
5	the biosynthesis of streptomycin the origin of the c formyl group of streptose	The biosynthesis of streptomycin originated from the c-formyl group of streptosis.
5	estimation of the pentose cycle in the perfused cow s udder	Estimation of the cycle of pentosis in the perfused cow's udder.
5	the metabolism of glucose by the rabbit lens in the presence and absence of oxygen	The metabolism of glucose by rabbit lentils in the presence and absence of glucose; oxygen.
5	the cell walls of group d streptococci i the immunochemistry of the type 1 carbohydrate	Cell walls of type 1 carbohydrate immunochemistries.
5	autonomic mediation of the effect of raised arterial glucose upon free fatty acids	Self-limiting modification of fatty acids; effect of increased arterial glucose on free fatty acids.
5	chemotaxis in bacteria	Chemo-taxis in bacteria.
5	feedback inhibition of glycerol kinase a catabolic enzyme in escherichia coli	Retroinhibition of glycerol kinase (Glycerol kinase), a catabolite enzyme in escherichia coli.
5	effect of oxygen supply rates on growth of escherichia coli	Effect of oxygen levels on the growth of escherichia coli.
5	effect of tryptophan on growth and morphology of hansenula schneggii cells	Effect of tryptophan on growth and cell morphology of Hansenula schneggii.
5	effects of prolonged incubation of isolated fat cells on their response to hormones stimulating lipolysis and glucose metabolism	Effects of apos; prolonged incubation of isolated fat cells on their response to lipolysis- and glucose-promoting hormones.
5	sorbitol pathway presence in nerve and cord with substrate accumulation in diabetes	Presence of a sorbitol pathway in the nerve and spinal cord with diabetes substrate accumulation.
5	polysaccharide produced by the genus pullularia ii trans alpha glucosidation by acetone cells of pullularia	Polysaccharide produced by pullularia ii trans alpha glucosidation by acetonic cells of pullularia.
5	nitrite reductase of escherichia coli specific for reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	D' nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific escherichia coli reduced nitrite reductase.
5	endogenous metabolism of azotobacter agilis	Endogenous metabolism of etapos; azotobacter agilis.
5	respiration of mengovirus infected l 929 cells	Respiration of infected mengovirus l 929 cells.
5	the effect of inhibitors on intestinal transfer of glucose and fluid	L' effect of inhibitors on intestinal glucose and fluid transfer.
5	respiratory activity and maintenance of cell suspensions of rat liver	Respiratory activity and maintenance of rat liver cell suspensions.
5	brain transplantation prolonged survival of brain after carotid jugular interposition	Brain graft prolonged brain survival after carotid jugular interposition.
5	ornithine transcarbamylase enzymes occurrence in bacillus licheniformis	Ornithine transcarbamylase enzymes were present in the bacillus licheniformis.
5	sequential substrate removal in a dilute system by heterogeneous microbial populations	Sequential removal of substrate from a dilute system by heterogeneous microbial populations.
5	heterotrophic growth and production of xanthophylls by chlorella pyrenoidosa	Heterotrophic growth and xanthophyll production by chlorella pyrenoidosa.
5	effect of diet on the activity of several enzymes in extracts of rumen microorganisms	Dietary effect on apos; activity of several enzymes in extracts of rumen microorganisms.
5	isolation identification and metabolic role of the sudanophilic granules of zoogloea ramigera	Identification and metabolic role of the zoogloea ramigera Sudanophilic granules.
5	carbohydrate catabolism of mima polymorpha i supplemental energy from glucose added to a growth medium	Carbohydrate catabolism of polymorpha mimo mimo mimo supplements; energy from glucose added to growth medium.
5	altered end product patterns and catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Modification of the final product profile and catabolite repression in Escherichia coli.
5	physiology of growth and sporulation in bacillus cereus i effect of glutamic and other amino acids	Physiology of growth and sporulation in cereal bacillus glutamic and other amino acid effect.
5	effects of organic matter on the growth of thiobacillus intermedius	Growth effects of organic matter on thiobacillus intermedius.
5	colorado tick fever virus in cell culture ii physical and chemical properties	Colored tick fever virus in cell culture ii chemical and physical properties.
5	susceptibility and resistance of several fungi to microbial lysis	The susceptibility and resistance of many fungal species to microbial lysis.
5	influence of exogenous substrates on the endogenous respiration of pseudomonas aeruginosa	L' influence of exogenous substrates on endogenous respiration of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	purification and properties of adenosine 5 triphospae d glucose 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver	Purification and properties of rat liver adenosine 5 triphospae glucose 6 phosphotransferase.
5	studies on lipogenesis in vivo effect of dietary fat or starvation on conversion of 14 glucose into fat ad turnover of newly synthsized fat	Apos studies; in vivo effect of dietary fat lipogenesis or fasting on conversion of 14 glucose to newly synthesized fat turnover.
5	effects of insulin induced hypoglycaemia on the fate of glucose carbon atoms in the mouse	Apos effects; apos-induced hypoglycaemia; insulin on the fate of glucose carbon atoms in mice.
5	the effect of different hormonal conditions on the concentration and oxidoreduction state of the nicotinamide nucleotides of rat liver	Los; effect of different hormonal conditions on concentration and weight; state of onset; nicotinamide nucleotide oxidation in rat liver.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in liver from foetal and neonatal sheep	Carbohydrate metabolism in liver from fetal and neonatal sheep.
5	carbon dioxide effects on glucose catabolism by mixed microbial cultures	Effects of carbon dioxide (CO2) on glucose catabolism by mixed microbial cultures.
5	changes in the intracellular concentrations of adenosine phosphates and nicotinamide nucleotides during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast on different carbon sources	Changes in the intracellular concentrations of d' adenosine and nicotinamide nucleotides during the yeast aerobic growth cycle at different carbon sources.
5	clearing factor lipase in adipose tissue factors influencing the increase in enzyme activity produced on incubation of tissue from starved rats in vitro	The lipase of the clear factor in adipose tissue factors influences lipid fixation; increase in apos; enzyme activity produced during apos; incubation of tissue from food-deprived rats in vitro.
5	acceleration of renal gluconeogenesis by ketone bodies and fatty acids	Acceleration of renal gluconeogenesis by keto bodies and by fatty acids.
5	factors affecting the rate of killing of escherichia coli by repeated freezing and thawing	Factors affecting the rate of repeated freezing and thawing of Escherichia coli.
5	replication of mycoplasma pneumoniae in broth culture	Replication of mycoplasma pneumoniae in a culture broth.
5	relationship of carbon dioxide to aspartic acid and glutamic acid in actinomyces naeslundii	Carbon dioxide, l' aspartic acid and l' glutamic acid in actinomyces naeslundii.
5	circumvention of the mycobactin requirement of mycobacterium paratuberculosis	Circumvention of mycobacterium paratuberculosis mycobacterium requirement.
5	enzymes of glucose catabolism in a member of the psittacosis group	Glucose catabolism enzymes in a member of the psittacosis group.
5	volatile fatty acid requirement of a strain of listeria monocytogenes	Volatile fatty acids are required for a strain of listeria monocytogenes.
5	the fate of acetyl groups derived from glucose in the isolated perfused goat udder	The fate of glucose-derived acetyl groups in isolated perfused goat pistachio.
5	the development of invertase activity in slices of the root of beta vulgaris l washed under aseptic conditions	The development of l' activity of l' invertase in slices of bea vulgaris root washed under aseptic conditions.
5	the biosynthesis of polysaccharides incorporation of d 1 14c glucose and d 6 14c glucose into plum leaf polysaccharides	Polysaccharide biosynthesis incorporating 1,140c glucose and 614c glucose into plum leaf polysaccharides.
5	glucosylated nucleotide sequences from t even bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acids	Nucleotide glucosylated sequences from deoxyribonucleic acids of bacteriophage t.
5	some properties of fructose 1 6 diphosphatase of rat liver and their relation to the control of gluconeogenesis	Some properties of the rat liver fructose 16 diphosphatase and its relation to the control of gluconeogenesis.
5	rate of utilization of glucose and compartmentation of alpha oxoglutarate and glutamate in rat brain	Rate of onset; glucose utilization and compartmentalization of oxoglutarate alpha and glutamate in rat brain.
5	citrate and the conversion of carbohydate into fat activities of citrate cleavage enzyme and acetate thiokinase in livers of normal and diabetic rats	Citrate and the conversion of carbohydrate into carbohydrate fatty activities; citrate and l&apos cleavage enzyme; acetate thiokinase in the liver of normal and diabetic rats.
5	microbial growth on c1 compounds synthesis of cell constituents by methane and methanol grown pseudomonas methanica	Microbial growth on c1 compounds synthesized cell components by methane and cultured pseudomonas methanica.
5	properties of phosphofructokinase from rat liver and their relation to the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis	The properties of rat liver phosphofructokinase and their relationship to control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis.
5	taste reception in the goat sheep and calf	Taste the reception at sheep and goat calves.
5	carp myogens of white and red muscles gross isolation on sephadex columns of the low molecular weight components and examination of their participation in anaerobic glycogenolysis	White and red carp myogenes crude sephadex column isolation of low molecular weight components and examination of their participation in anaerobic glycogenolysis.
5	further studies on the regulation of amino sugar metabolism in bacillus subtilis	D' other studies on the regulation of sugar metabolism in subtilis.
5	incorporation of c14 from carbon dioxide into sugar phosphates carboxylic acids and amino acids by clostridium thermoaceticum	Incorporation of c14 from carbon dioxide into phosphate sugars, carboxylic acids, and amino acids by Clostridium thermoaceticum.
5	effects of growth rate and limiting substrate on glucose metabolism in escherichia coli	Growth rate and limiting substrate effects on glucose metabolism in escherichia coli.
5	release of nitrogenous substances by brewer s yeast iv energetics in shock excretion of amino acids	Release of nitrogen-containing substances by the yeast brewer iv energy in the apos; shock excretion of amino acids.
5	repression of tryptophanase synthesis in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli repression of tryptophanase synthesis.
5	the incorporation of labelled amino sugars by bacillus subtilis	L' incorporation of the amino sugars labelled by the bacillus subtilis.
5	glutathione peroxidase in lens and a source of hydrogen peroxide in aqueous humour	Glutathione peroxidase in the lens and a source of hydrogen peroxide in the water humour.
5	synthesis of the carbohydrate of mucus in the golgi complex as shown by electron microscope radioautography of goblet cells from rats injected with glucose h3	Electron microscopy radioautography of caliciform cells from rats injected with h3 glucose showed mucus carbohydrate synthesis in the golgi complex.
5	radioautographic comparison of the uptake of galactose h and glucose h3 in the golgi region of various cells secreting glycoproteins or mucopolysaccharides	Radioautographic comparison of the apo; absorption of h-galactose and h3 glucose in the Golgi region of various glycoprotein or mucopolysaccharide secreting cells.
5	sites of glycogen synthesis in rat liver cells as shown by electron microscope radioautography after administration of glucose h3	The sites of glycogen synthesis in rat liver cells were revealed by electron microscopy of h3 glucose administration.
5	nitrate ions potentiation of increased permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction	Nitrate ions potentiated the increased sugar permeability associated with muscle contraction.
5	bacterial nutritional approach to mechanisms of oxygen toxicity	Bacterial nutritional approach to the mechanisms of oxygen toxicity.
5	aging of escherichia coli	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	effects of inhibition and repression on the utilization of substrates by heterogeneous bacterial communities	The effects of apo; inhibition and repression on apo; substrate utilization by heterogeneous bacterial communities.
5	a transglucosylase of streptococcus bovis	Transglucosylase from streptococcus bovis.
5	endocrine factors in endometrial carcinoma a preliminary report	Canadian Endocrine Discharge Abstract: Preliminary report on endocrine factors in endometrial carcinoma.
5	entry of glucose carbon into amino acids of rat brain and liver in vivo after injection of uniformly 14 c labelled glucose	L' entry of glucose carbon into amino acids of the brain and liver of rat in vivo after l' injection of glucose uniformly labelled at 14 c.
5	the route of ethanol formation in zymomonas mobilis	The pathway for formation of ethanol in zymomonas mobilis.
5	sucrose utilization by zymomonas mobilis formation of a levan	Use of sucrose by zymomonas mobilis formation d' levan.
5	activities of some enzymes concerned with citrate and glucose metabolism in transplanted rat hepatomas	Activity of certain enzymes involved in citrate and glucose metabolism in hepatoma of transplanted rats.
5	changes in dry weight protein deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid and reserve and structural carbohydrate during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast	Changes in the ribonucleic acid content of yeast; deoxyribonucleic acid, dry weight proteins, and structural carbohydrate reserves during the yeast aerobic growth cycle.
5	the immunochemistry of shigella flexneri lipopolysaccharides a quantitative analysis of their monosaccharide constituents	The lipopolysaccharide immunochemistry of Shigella flexneri is a quantitative analysis of their monosaccharide components.
5	synthesis of reserve materials for endogenous metabolism in streptococcus faecalis	Synthesis of storage material for endogenous metabolism in streptococcus faecalis.
5	amino acid utilization by alcaligenes viscolactis for growth and slime production	Alkaligenic viscolactis uses amino acids for growth and mucus production.
5	evidence for centers in the central nervous system that regulate fat mobilization in dogs	Evidence of the existence of centers in the central nervous system that regulate the mobilization of fat in dogs.
5	the permeability of the gastric mucosa of dog	The permeability of the dog's gastric mucosa.
5	the influence of thyroid gland on amino acid accumulation and protein synthesis by rat small intestine in vitro	L' influence of thyroid gland on amino acid accumulation and protein synthesis in the rat intestine; rat small intestine in vitro.
5	the inhibition of streptococci by lactoperoxidase thiocyanate and hydrogen peroxide the effect of the inhibitory system on susceptible and resistant strains of group n streptococci	L' inhibition of streptococci by lactoperoxidase thiocyanate and peroxide; hydrogen, l' effect of the inhibitory system on resistant and susceptible strains of the streptococci group.
5	a continuous fermentation technique for studying the kinetics of sugar uptake by baker s yeast	Continuous fermentation technique for yeast; study of yeast cell kinetics; absorption of sugar by baking yeast.
5	enzymatic basis for d arbitol production by saccharomyces rouxii	Enzymatic basis for the production of d-reflex by saccharomyces rouxii.
5	influence of aeration and of pantothenate on growth yields of zymomonas mobilis	L' influence of aeration and pantothenate on the growth yields of zymomonas mobilis.
5	major products of glucose dissimilation by pseudomonas natriegens	The principal products of glucose dissimilation by Pseudomonas natriegens.
5	effect of various conditions on accumulation of oxytetracycline in escherichia coli	The effect of various conditions on the accumulation of oxytetracycline in Escherichia coli.
5	phenethyl alcohol i effect on macromolecular synthesis of escherichia coli	The effect of apos; phenethyl alcohol on macromolecular synthesis of apos; escherichia coli.
5	type specific polysaccharide antigens of group b streptococci ii the chemical basis for serological specificity of the type ii hcl antigen	The specific polysaccharide antigens of group b ii streptococci are the chemical basis of the serological specificity of the type ii hcl antigen.
5	increased plasma arginine vasopressin in clinical adrenocortical insufficeincy and its inhibition by glucosteroids	Plasma arginine vasopressin increased in the adrenal clinical bluessincy and its inhibition by glucosteroids.
5	glucose titration studies in patients with chronic progressive renal disease	Glucose titration studies in patients with diabetes mellitus; chronic progressive renal failure.
5	on the mechanism of the splay in the glucose titration curve in advanced experimental renal disease in the rat	On the mechanism of splay in the glucose titration curve in rat advanced experimental renal diseases.
5	studies on the biochemistry of penicillium charlesii influence of various dicarboxylic acids on galactocarolose synthesis	Studies of the biochemistry of penicillium charlesii influence the synthesis of galactocarolose by various dicarboxylic acids.
5	influence of ethanol on the metabolism of perfused normal fatty and cirrhotic rat livers	The effects of ethanol on the metabolism of livers from normal, perfused, fat and cirrhotic rats.
5	some properties of rat liver glucose adenosine triphosphate phosphotransferases	Some properties of the rat liver glucose adenosine triphosphate phosphotransferases.
5	influence of glutamic acid on the endogenous respiration of bacillus subtilis	Influence of l' glutamic acid on endogenous respiration of subtilis bacillus.
5	glucose c14 metabolism of dormant and activated ascospores of neurospora	Metabolism of the c14 glucose of dormant and activated neurospores.
5	chemical degradation of dipicolinic acid c14 and its application in biosynthesis by penicillium citreo viride	The chemical degradation of l' dipicolinic acid c14 and its application in the biosynthesis by viride penicillium citreo.
5	influence of lipid components of mycoplasma laidlawii membranes on osmotic fragility of cells	L' influence of lipid components of membranes of mycoplasma laidlawii on osmotic fragility of cells.
5	anatomical connections between medial and lateral regions of the hypothalamus concerned with food intake	Anatomical connections between the middle and lateral regions of the apos; hypothalamus involved in the apos; ingestion of food.
5	anomeric bond character in the pyranose sugars	Characterization of the anomeric bond in pyranose sugars.
5	the relationship of pregnancy vaginal candidiasis and glucose metabolism	Relationship between vaginal candidiasis during pregnancy and glucose metabolism.
5	toxigenicity of clostridium histolyticum	The toxigenicity profile of clostridium histolyticum.
5	relationship of lipoprotein lipase activity to triglyceride uptake in adipose tissue	Relationship between l' lipoprotein lipase activity and l' absorption of triglycerides in fat.
5	ethanolamine phosphoglycerides effect on the properties of myelinoid lecithin water systems	Apos; ethanolamine phosphoglycerides affect the properties of aqueous lecithin-based myelin systems.
5	sex differences in taste preference for glucose and saccharin solutions	Gender differences in the taste preference for glucose and saccharin solutions.
5	growth of a thermophilic bacterium on hydrocarbons a new source of single cell protein	D&apos growth; a thermophilic bacteria on hydrocarbons, a new source of unicellular proteins.
5	cell permeability a factor in the biotin oleate relationship in lactobacillus arabinosus ii effect of oleic acid and other surfactants on free biotin uptake	Cellular permeability is a factor in the biotin oleate relationship in lactobacillus arabinosus ii, l' effect of l' oleic acid and d' other surfactants on apos; absorption of free biotin.
5	transaminase activity and other enzymatic reactions involving pyruvate and glutamate in chlamydia psittacosis trachoma group	L' transaminase and d' other enzyme reactions involving pyruvate and glutamate in the chlamydia psittacosis trachoma group.
5	cell wall constituents of leuconostoc citrovorum and leuconostoc mesenteroides	Cell wall components of leuconostoc citrovorum and leuconostoc mesenteroides.
5	function of growth factors for rumen microorganisms i nutritional characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium	Growth factor function for rumen microorganisms i nutritional characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium.
5	mechanisms of pathogenesis in listeria monocytogenes infection 3 carbohydrate metabolism	Pathogenesis mechanisms in Listeria monocytogenes infection 3 carbohydrate metabolism.
5	effect of glucose on the formation of the membrane bound electron transport system in haemophilus parainfluenzae	Effect of glucose treatment on the formation of the membrane-bound electron transport system in apos; haemophilus parainfluenzae.
5	pathway of glucose fermentation in relation to the taxonomy of bifidobacteria	Glucose-fermentation pathway in relation to the taxonomy of bifidobacteria.
5	metabolic requirements for microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus megaterium	Metabolic requirements for sporogenesis of megaterium microcycle.
5	comparative study of the cell walls of the yeastlike and mycelial phases of histoplasma capsulatum	Comparative study of cell walls of the yeast-like and mycelial phases of the yeast–mycelial phase of the apos; histoplasma capsulatum.
5	comparison of growth and primary shunt product formation by claviceps purpurea cultured on succinic acid and glucose as carbon sources	Comparison of growth and formation of the claviceps purpurea derivative primary product grown on succinic acid and glucose as carbon sources.
5	effect of growth rate and substrate limitation on the composition and structure of the cell wall of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of growth rate and substrate limitation on the cell wall composition and cell wall structure of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	methane production from glucose in vitro by mixed rumen bacteria	Production of methane from glucose in vitro by mixed rumen bacteria.
5	metabolic phases during the development of granulation tissue	During the development of granulation tissue, metabolic phases occur.
5	metabolic relationships of the isolated fractions of the pectic substances of actively growing sycamore cells	Metabolic relationships of fractions isolated from actively growing sycamore cells pectic substances.
5	effect of available water on thermal resistance of three nonsporeforming species of bacteria	Effect of water available on the thermal resistance of three species of bacteria not-sporforming.
5	the beta glucosidase of the yeast cell surface	Beta yeast cell surface glucosidase.
5	relationship between fatty acid and glucose utilization in ehrlich ascites tumor cells	Relationship between fatty acids and glucose utilization in ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
5	hyperglycemia during intravenous fluid therapy a clue to the presence of diabetes mellitus	L' hyperglycemia during intravenous fluid therapy is an indication of diabetes mellitus.
5	effect of ingestion of saline glucose and ethanol on mobilization and hepatic incorporation of epididymal pad palmitate 1 14c in rats	Effect of drugs; salt glucose and d*apos ingestion; ethanol on mobilization and apos; hepatic uptake of rat epididymal cushion palmitate 14C.
5	distribution of c 14 from glucose 1 c 14 in the lipid fractions of debaryomyces hansenii	Distribution of c 14 from glucose 1 c 14 in lipid fractions of debaryomyces hansenii.
5	galactose repression of beta galactosidase induction in escherichia coli	Galactose repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli induction.
5	a radioautographic study of glyceride synthesis in vivo during intestinal absorption of fats and labeled glucose	A radioautographic study of glyceride synthesis in vivo during the intestinal absorption of labelled glucose and fat.
5	studies on the respiratory metabolism of isolated human adipose cells	Respiratory metabolism studies of isolated human fat cells.
5	the fate of isotopic carbon in kidney cortex synthesizing glucose from lactate	The fate of isotopic carbon in the glucose-synthesizing renal cortex from lactate.
5	transfer of propionate by rat small intestine in vitro	Propionate is transmitted in vitro via the apos; rat small intestine.
5	energy supply and cell yield in aerobically growth microorganisms	The contribution of energy and cell performance in aerobic growth microorganisms.
5	mechanisms of protection of trehalase against heat inactivation in neurospora	Mechanisms to protect trehalase against slime; heat inactivation in neurospora.
5	cell walls of group d streptococci ii chemical studies on the type 1 antigen purified from the autolytic digest of cell walls	Cell walls of group d ii streptococci have been studied chemically on apos; type 1 antigen purified by autolytic cell wall digestion.
5	synchrony of nuclear replication in individual hyphae of aspergillus nidulans	Synchronization of nuclear replication in individual d' aspergillus nidulans hyphae.
5	catabolite repression in the facultative chemoautotroph thiobacillus novellus	Catabolic repression in facultative thiobacillus novellus chemoautotroph.
5	urea production and putrescine biosynthesis by escherichia coli	Production of urea and putrescine biosynthesis by Escherichia coli.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in streptomycetes ii isolation and enzymatic synthesis of trehalose	Carbohydrate metabolism in streptomycetes ii isolation and synthesis of enzyme from trehalose.
5	deoxyribonucleic acid repair replication after ultraviolet light or x ray exposure of bacteria	Repair replica by l' deoxyribonucleic acid after exposure to ultraviolet light or bacterial X-rays.
5	role of a cell wall glucan degrading enzyme in mating of schizophyllum commune	Role of an enzyme that degrades cell wall glucan in common schizophyllum mating.
5	streptococcal sialidase i isolation and properties of sialidase produced by group k streptococcus	Sialidase isolations i streptococci and sialidase properties produced by group k streptococcus.
5	effect of glucose on carbon dioxide assimilation and substrate oxidation by ferrobacillus ferrooxidans	Effect of glucose on respiration; carbon dioxide assimilation and respiration; substrate oxidation by ferrobacillus ferrooxidans.
5	effect of different nutritional conditions on the synthesis of tricarboxylic acid cycle enzymes	Effect of different nutritional conditions on the synthesis of enzymes of the cycle of l' tricarboxylic acid.
5	release of proteinase from mycelium of mucor hiemalis	Release of mycelial proteinase from the mucor hiemalis.
5	glucose catabolism in micrococcus sodonensis	The glucose catabolism of micrococcus sodonensis.
5	the effect of uranyl nitrate on intestinal transfer of hexoses	Lapos; effect of uranyl nitrate on hexose intestinal transfer.
5	glucose metabolism during ontogeny of intestinal active sugar transport in the chick	Glucose metabolism during apo; ontogenesis of intestinal transport of active sugars in chick.
5	immunochemical studies on the group and type antigens of group f streptococci and the identification of a grouplike carbohydrate in a type ii strain with an undesignated group antigen	Immunochemical studies on group and type antigens of group f streptococci and identification of d' a group-like carbohydrate in a type ii strain with an antigen of non-designated group.
5	properties of the glutamate transport system in escherichia coli	The properties of the glutamate transport system of escherichia coli.
5	the cell wall of rickettsia mooseri i morphology and chemical composition	Rickettsia mooseri cell wall morphology and chemical composition i.
5	factors affecting the pathways of glucose catabolism and the tricarboxylic acid cycle in pseudomonas natriegens	Factors affecting the pathways of glucose catabolism and the cycle of l' tricarboxylic acid in pseudomonas natriegens.
5	gluconate metabolism in escherichia coli	Gluconate metabolism in Escherichia coli.
5	comparative glucose catabolism of xanthomonas species	Comparison of glucose catabolism in the xanthomonas species.
5	mode of filamentous growth of leucothrix mucor in pure culture and in nature as studied by tritiated thymidine autoradiography	Filamentous growth pattern of leucothrix mucorum in pure culture and in field cultures as studied by tritiated thymidine autoradiography.
5	d arabinose countertransport in bakers yeast	D arabinose vs-transport in the baking yeast.
5	catabolite repression and pyruvate metabolism in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli catabolite repression and pyruvate metabolism.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in leukocytes vii metabolism of glucose acetate and propionate by human plasma cells	Carbohydrate metabolism in leukocytes vii metabolism of both acetate and glucose propionate by human plasma cells.
5	basal plasma glucagon levels of man	Baseline levels of human plasma glucagon.
5	studies on the intracerebral toxicity of ammonia	Intra-cerebral toxicity studies of chloroform; ammonia.
5	cerebral blood flow and metabolism in the wernicke korsakoff syndrome	Cerebral blood flow and metabolism in Wernicke syndrome Korsakoff.
5	a function of the golgi apparatus in polysaccharide synthesis and transport in the root cap cells of wheat	A function of the l' golgi apparatus in the synthesis and transport of polysaccharides in wheat cap cells.
5	the precursors of the xylene ring in riboflavine	Precursors of the xylene ring in riboflavin.
5	formation of glucose from hexoses pentoses polyols and related substances in kidney cortex	Glucose formation from polyol pentose hexoses and related substances in the renal cortex.
5	energy requirement for l glutamate uptake and utilization by hansenula subpelliculosa cells	Hansenula subpelliculosa cells require energy to absorb and utilize glutamate.
5	metabolism of d mannose in aerobacter aerogenes evidence for a cyclic pathway	Dnose metabolism in aerobacter aerogenes indicates the existence of a cyclic pathway.
5	effect of sugars on transport of alanine in intestine	Effect of sugars on the transport of alanine in the intestine.
5	the role of humoral factors in the dumping syndrome experimentally induced dumping before and after portal systemic shunt	The role of humoral factors in the dumping syndrome will experimentally induce dumping before and after the systemic gate shunt.
5	aerobic metabolism of streptococcus agalactiae	Aerobic metabolism of Streptococcus agalactiae.
5	protein synthesis in sonically damaged escherichia coli	Protein synthesis in ultrasound-damaged escherichia coli.
5	effect of glucose on the oxidation of beta nitropropionic acid by aspergillus flavus	Effect of glucose on body weight; effects of glucose; oxidation of glucose; nitropropionic beta-acidosis by glucose; aspergillus flavus.
5	chemically characterized media for study of foot and mouth disease virus in baby hamster kidney cells	Chemically characterized apo media; foot-and-mouth disease virus in baby hamster kidney cells.
5	production and stabilization of cells of bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus	Production and stabilization of popilliae and lentimorbus bacillus cells.
5	characteristics of the vegetative growth of bacillus popilliae	Characteristics of vegetative growth of the Popilliae bacillus.
5	pilot plant glycerol production with a slow feed osmophilic yeast fermentation	Glycerol production in pilot plant with slow fermentation of slow-feeding osmophilic yeasts.
5	staphylococcal alpha toxin effects on artificial lipid spherules	Effects of staphylococcal alpha toxin on artificial lipid spherules.
5	studies on the effect of experimental nonketotic diabetes mellitus on antibacterial defense i demonstration of a defect in phagocytosis	Dos studies; effect of experimental non-keto diabetes mellitus on antibacterial defense i showing a phagocytosis defect.
5	polydipsia elicited by the synergistic action of a saccharin and glucose solution	Apos-induced polydipsia; synergistic action of saccharin and glucose solution.
5	the effect of deprivation of glucose on the ultrastructure and function of the superior cervical ganglion of the rat in vitro	The effects of glucose deprivation on the ultrastructure and function of rat superior cervical ganglion in vitro.
5	membranes of animal cells ii the metabolism and turnover of the surface membrane	Animal cell membranes metabolism and renewal of the surface membrane.
5	glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes ii the macromolecular state of leukocyte glycogen	Glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes; macromolecular glycogen status of leukocytes.
5	the importance of glucose in the oxidative metabolism of the testis of the conscious ram and the role of the pentose cycle	L' the importance of glucose in the oxidative metabolism of conscious sheep testes and the role of the pentose cycle.
5	brain metabolism during fasting	Brain metabolism during the fast.
5	influence of ph on the growth characteristics of neisseria gonorrhoeae in continuous culture	L' influence of ph on growth characteristics of Neisseria gonorrhoeae in continuous culture.
5	organic acid production by basidiomycetes 3 cultural conditions for l malic acid production	Production of organic acids by basidiomycetes 3 cultural conditions for the production of potatoes; malic acid l.
5	sweet sensitive protein from bovine taste buds isolation and assay	Sugar-sensitive protein from potato; bovine taste and taste papilla isolation; assay.
5	further properties and possibel mechanism of action of adenosine 5 triphosphate d glucose 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver	Other properties and possible mechanisms of rat liver phosphotransferase; action of adenosine 5 glucose triphosphate 6 rat liver phosphotransferase.
5	studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates incorporation of hexose into glycogen	Study of glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates; incorporation of glycogen in pigeon liver; hexose into glycogen.
5	studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates glycogen synthesis from glucose monophosphates and uridine diphosphate glucose	Glycogen synthesis studies in pigeon liver homogenates; glycogen synthesis from glucose monophosphates and d&apos diphosphate; uridine; glucose.
5	the glucoamylase of coniophora cerebella	Coniophora cerebella glucoamylase.
5	effect of thyroidectomy on pathways of glucose metabolism in lactating rat mammary gland	The effect of thyroidectomy on glucose metabolism pathways in the lactating rat mammary gland.
5	identification of guanosine diphosphate derivatives of d xylose d mannose d glucose and d galactose in mature strawberry leaves	Identification of guanosine diphosphate derivatives of dxylose mannose glucose and dxylose galactose in mature strawberry leaves.
5	regulation of development of hepatic glucokinase in the neonatal rat by the diet	Diet regulation of hepatic glucokinase development in neonatal rats.
5	metabolic changes during phosphate deprivation in euglena in air and in oxygen	Metabolic changes during phosphate deprivation in euglena; euglena in air and oxygen.
5	carbohydrate metabolism of the perfused rat liver	Carbohydrate metabolism in perfused rat liver.
5	divergent effects of actinomycin d on cortisol and on glucose stimulation of glycogenesis in mouse liver	Distinct effects of actinomycin d on cortisol and on the stimulation of glycogenesis by glucose in mouse liver.
5	the composition and physicochemical properties of bovine nasal septa protein polysaccharide complex	Physical composition and properties-polysaccharide complex septa-bovine nasal protein.
5	mechanism of conversion of aspartate into glutamate in cerebral cortex slices	Mechanisms for conversion of aspartate to glutamate in cerebral cortical slices.
5	the influence of fructose and its metabolites on ethanol metabolism in vitro	The influence of fructose and its metabolites on metabolism of ethanol in vitro.
5	pectic polysaccharides of growing plant tissues	Pectic polysaccharides from growing plant tissue.
5	preparation of enriched fractions from cerebral cortex containing isolated metabolically active neuronal and glial cells	Preparation of enriched cerebral cortical fractions containing metabolically active isolated glial and neuronal cells.
5	microbial growth on c1 compounds uptake of 14c formaldehyde and 14c formate by methane grown pseudomonas methanica and determination of the hexose labelling pattern after brief incubation with 14c methanol	Microbial growth on c1 absorption of formaldehyde 14c and formate 14c by methane-grown pseudomonas methanica and determination of labeling pattern at l' hexose after brief incubation with methanol 14c.
5	further studies on intestinal active transport during semistarvation	Additional studies on active intestinal transport during semistarvation were conducted.
5	respiratory inhibition in chlorella produced by purified polyethylene glycol 1540	Respiratory inhibition in chlorinella produced by purified polyethylene glycol 1540.
5	the effect of infusions of plasma and of saline on the renal response to water loading in sodium depleted dogs	The effect of plasma and saline infusions on the renal response to saline loading; water in sodium-depleted dogs.
5	regulation of staphylococcus aureus lactate dehydrogenase	Staphylococcus aureus lactate dehydrogenase regulation.
5	effects of the rare earth cerium on escherichia coli	Rare Terran cerium effects on escherichia coli.
5	radioautographic study of cell wall deposition in growing plant cells	L' radioautographic study of cell wall deposition in growing plant cells.
5	effects of fatty acids ketone bodies lactate and pyruvate on glucose utilization by guinea pig cerebral cortex slices	Effects of lactate and pyruvate keto fatty acids on glucose utilization by guinea pig cerebral cortical slices.
5	a study of three enzymes acting on glucose in the lens of different species	A study of three glucose-acting enzymes in the lens of different species.
5	evaluation of the glycogenolytic effect of alpha amylase using radioautography and electron microscopy	Evaluation of apos; glycogenolytic effect of apos; alpha amylase by radioautography and electron microscopy.
5	elution of loosely bound acid phosphatase from staphylococcus aureus	L' elution of the weakly bound acid phosphatase of staphylococcus aureus.
5	studies on lipogenesis in vivo lipogenesis during extended periods of re feeding after starvation	Study of the in vivo lipogenesis of lipogenesis during prolonged periods of time; feeding after fasting.
5	pyruvate accumulation in growth inhibited cultures of aerobacter aerogenes	Pyruvate accumulation in growth was inhibitory to apos; Aerobacter aerogenes cultures.
5	stimulation of pentose phosphate pathway dehydrogenase enzyme activities in ethionine treated mice	Stimulation of pentose phosphate pathway dehydrogenase enzyme activity in ethionine mice treated with ethionine.
5	lipogenesis in human adipose tissue	It's called lipogenesis in human fat tissue.
5	hepatic triglyceride secretion in relation to lipogenesis and free fatty acid mobilization in fasted and glucose refed rats	Hepatic triglyceride secretion in relation to lipogenesis and free fatty acid mobilization in fasting and glucose-retarded rats.
5	sporulation of the thermophilic anaerobes	Sporulation of thermophilic anaerobes.
5	occurrence and metabolism of scylloinositol in the locust	Presence and metabolism of scylloinositol in desert locusts.
5	enzymic hydrolysis of the carbon fluorine bond of alpha d glucosyl fluoride by rat intestinal mucosa localization of intestinal maltase	Enzymatic hydrolysis of fluoride @-@-fluorine carbon binding; alpha-d-glucosyl by localization of intestinal maltase in the intestinal mucosa of the rat.
5	the effect of thyroidectomy on the pattern of fatty acids synthesized by mammary gland from lactating rats	Effects of thyroidectomy on the pattern of fatty acids synthesized by the mammary gland of lactating rats.
5	contribution of propionate to glucose synthesis in sheep	Contribution of propionate to glucose synthesis in the sheep.
5	metabolic activities of the isolated perfused rat kidney	Isolated perfused rat kidney metabolic activity.
5	mechanisms of regulation of urease biosynthesis in proteus rettgeri	Mechanisms for regulation of biosynthesis of protein rettgeri urease.
5	adenosine triphosphate linked control of pseudomonas aeruginosa glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	Pseudomonas aeruginosa glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase adenosine triphosphate.
5	the influence of saline loading on renal glucose reabsorption in the rat	L' influence of saline loading on renal glucose reabsorption in rat.
5	glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes i characteristics of the synthesis and turnover of glycogen in vitro	Glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes i characteristics of glycogen synthesis and turnover in vitro.
5	structure of the cell wall of lactobacilli role of muramic acid phosphate in lactobacillus fermenti	Cell wall structure of the lactobacilli role of l' muramic acid phosphate in lactobacillus fermenti.
5	correlated changes of some enzyme activities and cofactor and substrate contents of pea cotyledon tissue during germination	There was a correlation between changes in certain enzyme activities and the cofactor and substrate contents of pea cotyledons during germination.
5	conversion of u 14c glucose into carbon dioxide glycogen cholesterol and fatty acids in liver slices from embryonic and growing chicks	The conversion of glucose u 14c into carbon dioxide, glycogen, cholesterol and fatty acids in thin slices of embryonic and growing chick liver.
5	the effect of starvation and starvation followed by feeding on enzyme activity and the metabolism of u 14c glucose in liver from growing chicks	The effects of fasting and fasting followed by feeding, feeding, and enzyme activity and glucose metabolism in the liver of growing chicks.
5	pool sizes of metabolic intermediates and their relation to glucose repression of beta galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli	The size of d&apos pools; metabolic intermediates and their relationship to glucose repression of beta galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli.
5	comparison of oxidative metabolism in starved fat fed and carbohydrate fed rats	Comparison of oxidative metabolism in fasting and fasting rats.
5	intracellular protein breakdown in non growing cells of escherichia coli	Dissolution of intracellular proteins in non-growth cells of Escherichia coli.
5	effect of carbonyl cyanide m chlorophenylhydrazone on respiration and respiration dependent phosphorylation in escherichia coli	Effects of carbonyl cyanide m chlorophenylhydrazone on respiration and respiration in escherichia coli.
5	electron opaque bodies and fat droplets in mouse liver after fasting or glucose injection	Electron-opaque body and fat droplets in mouse liver after glucose injection or fasting.
5	nonselective incorporation into sporangium of either older or younger chromosome of the vegetative cell during sporulation in bacillus cereus	L' nonselective incorporation into the d&apos sporangium; older or younger vegetative cell chromosome during sporulation in the bacillus cereus.
5	renal contribution to thoracic duct lymph in dogs	Renal contribution to thoracic canal lymph in dogs.
5	effects of epinephrine corticotropin and thyrotropin on lipolysis and glucose oxidation in rat adipose tissue	Effects of corticotropin and thyrotropin in apos; epinephrine on lipolysis and apos; glucose oxidation in rat fat tissue.
5	distribution of radioactive glycerol and fatty acids among adipose tissue triglycerides after administration of glucose u 14c	Distribution of radioactive glycerol and fatty acids among triglycerides of adipose tissue after apos; administration of glucose u 14c.
5	regulation of glutamine synthetase x effect of growth conditions on the susceptibility of escherichia coli glutamine synthetase to feedback inhibition	Control of glutamine synthetase; effect of glutamine synthetase x growth conditions on the sensitivity of glutamine synthetase d' escherichia coli to glutamine inhibition.
5	biosynthesis of streptococcal cell walls n acetyl d muramic acid	Biosynthesis of cell walls of n- Streptococcus acetyl-duramic acid.
5	biochemical basis of obligate autotrophy in blue green algae and thiobacilli	Biochemical basis of the plant; required autotrophy in green blue-green algae and thiobacilli.
5	pyruvate metabolism in sarcina maxima	Metabolism of pyruvate in sarcina maxima.
5	anaerobic growth yields of aerobacter cloacae and escherichia coli	Anaerobic growth yields cloacal aerobics and escherichia coli.
5	glucose metabolism by human placental villi	Glucose metabolism by the human placental villus.
5	the biosynthesis of intestinal mucins the effect of salicylate on glycoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colonic and human gastric mucosal tissues in vitro	Bowel mucin biosynthesis, the effect of salicylate on glycoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colon and intestinal mucous membranes; human stomach in vitro.
5	lactogenesis in the rat metabolism of uridine diphosphate galactose by mammary gland	Lactogenesis in liver metabolism; uridine diphosphate galactose by the mammary gland in rats.
5	short latency antidiuresis following the initation of food ingestion	Acute antidiuresis following os; induction of apos; ingestion of apos; food.
5	phosphate dependence of monosaccharide transport in nocardia	Phosphate dependence of monosaccharide transport in the nocardia.
5	n acetylglucosamine assimilation in escherichia coli and its relation to catabolite repression	N-acetylglucosamine assimilation in escherichia coli and its relation to catabolite repression.
5	relationship between sugar structure and competition for the sugar transport system in bakers yeast	Relationship between sugar structure and competition for sugar transport system in baking yeast.
5	metabolic and morphological observations on the effect of surface active agents of leukocytes	Metabolic and morphological observations on apos; effect of active surfactants of leukocytes.
5	water permeability of thin lipid membranes	The permeability of the thin lipid membranes to water.
5	carbohydrate composition of the phenol soluble lipopolysaccharides of citrobacter freundii	Carbohydrate composition of citrobacter freundii phenol-soluble lipopolysaccharides.
5	synthesis of teichoic acids vii synthesis of teichoic acids during spore germination	Synthesis of apo; teichoic acids vii synthesis of apo; teichoic acids during spore germination.
5	inhibition of histoplasma capsulatum by candida albicans and other yeasts on sabouraud s agar media	L' inhibition of apos; histoplasma capsulatum by albicans and d' other yeasts on swelled agar.
5	regulation and timing of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in hyphae of aspergillus nidulans	Synthesis regulation and synchronization; deoxyribonucleic acid in d&apos hyphae; aspergillus nidulans.
5	encystment and polymer production by azotobacter vinelandii in the presence of beta hydroxybutyrate	Polymer encystment and production by nitrogen; azotobacter vinelandii in the presence of beta-hydroxybutyrate.
5	pathways of glucose metabolism by rough and smooth variants of bacillus stearothermophilus	The metabolic pathways of glucose by rough and smooth variants of the bacterium stearothermophilus.
5	mode of action of myxin on escherichia coli	Dapos mode; action of hagfish on fish; escherichia coli.
5	membrane lipid changes during formation of a functional electron transport system in staphylococcus aureus	Membrane lipids changed during the formation of apos, a functional electron transport system in Staphylococcus aureus.
5	control of malate synthase formation in rhizopus nigricans	Control of malate synthase formation in the rhizopus nigricans.
5	transient repression of the lac operon	Transient repression of l' lake operon.
5	cell wall composition in relation to the taxonomy of some actinoplanaceae	The composition of the cell wall in relation to the taxonomy of certain actinoplanaceous species.
5	release of sporangiospores by a strain of actinoplanes	Release of sporangiospores by a sporangiospore strain; actinoplanes.
5	disaccharide absorption by amphibian small intestine in vitro	L' absorption of disaccharides by amphibians and amphibians; small intestine in vitro.
5	regulatory effect of pyruvate on the glucose metabolism of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum	Regulatory effect of pyruvate on glucose metabolism in Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum.
5	radiorespirometric studies of leucothrix mucor	Radiorespirometric studies of the leucothrix mucorum.
5	observations on the mechanisms of glucosuria during glucose loads in normal and nondiabetic subjects	Observations on the mechanisms of glucosuria during glucose loading in nondiabetic and normal subjects.
5	effects of diet on hepatic triglyceride synthesis	Dietary effects on hepatic triglyceride synthesis.
5	sporulation of bacillus stearothermophilus	Sporulation of the stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	formation of isoamylase by pseudomonas	D&apos formation; pseudomonas isoamylase activity.
5	lipid metabolism in the testis of the ram	Lipid metabolism in testicles of ram.
5	effect of atractyloside on glucose and pyruvate metabolism in rat diaphragm muscle	Effect of apos; atractyloside on glucose and pyruvate metabolism in the rat diaphragm.
5	rates of entry and oxidation of acetate glucose d beta hydroxybutyrate palmitate oleate and stearate and rates of production and oxidation of propionate and butyrate in fed and starved sheep	Rates of entry and death; oxidation of oleate and stearate beta hydroxybutyrate glucose acetate and production rates; oxidation of propionate and butyrate in fed and starved sheep.
5	the time course of the synthesis of adenosine triphosphate in ehrlich ascites tumour cells and the effect of 2 4 dinitrophenol	L' temporal evolution of l&apos synthesis; adenosine triphosphate in d&apos tumor cells; ehrlich and l&apos ascites; effect of 24 dinitrophenol.
5	studies on brain cortex slices differences in the oxidation of 14 c labelled glucose and pyruvate revealed by the action of triethyltin and other toxic agents	Cerebral cortical studies reveal differences in the oxidation of 14-c-labelled glucose and pyruvate in the brain, as revealed by apos; action of triethyltin and d' other toxic agents.
5	the subcellular distribution and properties of hexokinases in the guinea pig cerebral cortex	The subcellular distribution and properties of hexokinases in the cerebral cortex of the guinea pig.
5	some properties of phosphofructokinase from kidney cortex and their relation to glucose metabolism	Some of the properties of renal cortical phosphofructokinase and their relationship to glucose metabolism.
5	reagentless substrate analysis with immobilized enzymes	Analysis of nonreactive substrates with immobilized enzymes.
5	fine structure of the a and d cells of the rabbit endocrine pancreas in vivo and incubated in vitro i mechanism of secretion of the a cells	The fine structure of rabbit endocrine pancreatic a and d cells in vivo and incubated in vitro i cell secretion a.
5	effects of metabolic inhibitors on contraction of rabbit detrusor muscle	Effects of metabolic inhibitors on rabbit detrusor muscle contraction.
5	quantitative assay of polysaccharide components obtained from cell wall lipopolysaccharides of xanthomonas species	Quantitative assay of polysaccharide components obtained from lipopolysaccharides of cell wall xanthomonas species.
5	an in vitro effect of triiodothyronine on rat adipose tissue	The effect of triiodothyronine on rat body fat in vitro.
5	aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of sewage and activated sludge ii method of characterization of activated sludge bacteria	Aerobic Sewage and Activated Sludge Heterotrophic Bacterial Populations ii Method for characterization of activated sludge bacteria.
5	differential dialysis culture for separation and concentration of a macromolecular product	Differential dialysis culture for macromolecular separation and concentration of apos.
5	carbon balance of a mannitol fermentation and the biosynthetic pathway	Carbon balance; mannitol fermentation and biosynthetic pathway.
5	the mechanism of thyrotrophin action in relation to lipid metabolism in thyroid tissue	The mechanism of action of thyrotrophine on lipid metabolism in thyroid tissue.
5	the effect of sodium depletion of the renal response to water loading in dogs	The effect of the sodium depletion of the renal response to the loading of water in the dog.
5	mammary and whole animal metabolism of glucose and fatty acids in fasting lactating goats	"Toxicol, J., ""Mammary and whole animal metabolism of glucose and fat acids in fasting capats."""
5	nutritional characteristics of the atypical mycobacteria	Nutritional characteristics of atypical mycobacteria.
5	regulation of arginine and proline catabolism in bacillus licheniformis	Regulation of l' arginine and proline catabolism in the bacillus licheniformis.
5	ratio of teichoic acid and peptidoglycan in cell walls of bacillus subtilis following spire germination and during vegetative growth	The ratio of l' teichoic acid and peptidoglycan in the cell walls of the subtilis bacillus after spire germination and vegetative growth.
5	fermentation of glucose lactose galactose mannitol and xylose by bifidobacteria	Fermentation de glucose lactose galactose mannitol et xylose de bifidobacteria.
5	enzyme pattern and aerobic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae under various degrees of glucose limitation	The enzymatic profile and aerobic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae under various levels of glucose limitation.
5	site and characteristics of electrolyte loss and effect of intraluminal glucose in experimental canine cholera	Site and characteristics of intra-luminal glucose electrolyte loss and effect in the experimental canine cholera.
5	phospholipid spherules liposomes as a model for biological membranes	Phospholipid liposome spherules as a model for biological membranes.
5	stimulation of the labellar sugar receptor of the fleshfly by mono and disaccharides	Stimulation of the fly's lip-sugar receptor by mono- and disaccharides.
5	dietary regulation of galactose metabolizing enzymes adaptive changes in rat jejunum	Dietary regulation of galactose-metabolizing enzymes, adaptive changes in rat jejunum.
5	lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes of sperm cells and tests	Sperm lactate dehydrogenase enzymes and tests.
5	regulation and function of lactate oxidation in streptococcus faecium	Regulation and function of l' lactate oxidation in Streptococcus faecium.
5	oxidation of d amino acids by a particulate enzyme from pseudomonas aeruginosa	Oxidation of amino acids d by a particulate enzyme of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	relation of catalase to substrate utilization by mycoplasma pneumoniae	Relationship between catalase and l' substrate utilization by pneumoniae mycoplasma.
5	direct pathway to the brain	Direct pathway to the brain, sir.
5	hemoglobin function in stored blood	Uh, hemoglobin function in the stored blood.
5	effect of early nutrition on the development of rat epididymal fat pads cellularity and metabolism	Effect of early nutrition on cellularity and metabolism of rat epididymal adipose pads.
5	studies on the enzymic n acylation of amino sugars in the sheep colonic mucosa	Studies on apos; enzymatic acylation of amino sugars in sheep colonic mucosa.
5	biochemical effects of the hypoglycaemic compound pent 4 enoic acid and related non hypoglycaemic fatty acids carbohydrate metabolism	Biochemical effects of the hypoglycemic compound enoic acid pent 4 and related nonhypoglycemic fatty acids on carbohydrate metabolism.
5	pneumococcal c substance a ribitol teichoic acid containing choline phosphate	Pneumococcus c: ribitol acid-teichoic, containing choline phosphate.
5	the glycerol teichoic acid from walls of staphylococcus epidermidis i2	L' teichoic glycerol acid of staphylococcus epidermidis i2 walls is present.
5	effect of sublethal heat on the metabolic activity of staphylococcus aureus	Effect of sublethal heat on metabolic activity of staphylococcus aureus.
5	growth of ferrobacillus ferrooxidans on organic matter	Growth of the ferrobacillus ferrooxidans on organic matter.
5	effects of temperature on composition and cell volume of candida utilis	Effects of temperature on the composition and cell volume of candida utilisa.
5	attached growth of sphaerotilus and mixed populations in a continuous flow apparatus	Growth of sphaerotilus and mixed populations has been fixed in a flow-through apparatus.
5	effects of colicins e1 and k on cellular metabolism	Effects of e1 and k on cellular metabolism.
5	effect of dextrose in medium for the preparation of mycoplasma gallisepticum plate antigens	Effect of dextrose in media for preparation of mycoplasma gallisepticum plaque antigens.
5	an electrophysiological analysis of the action of carbohydrates on the sugar receptor of the blowfly	Electrophysiological analysis of the carbohydrate action on the sugar receptor of the fly.
5	the effect of chlorpromazine on cerebral glucose atp adp amp and atpase in the mouse	The effect of chlorpromazine on the growth of cerebral glucose at the adp amp and atpase in mice.
5	heterogeneity of human platelets i metabolic and kinetic evidence suggestive of young and old platelets	Heterogeneity of human platelets i metabolic and kinetic evidence, suggesting young and old platelets.
5	thyroid stimulating hormone and prostaglandin e1 stimulation of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in thyroid slices	Apos stimulation; thyroid hormone and prostaglandin e1 monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 in thin slices of the thyroid.
5	some determinants of the effects of val 5 angiotensin ii amide on glomerular filtration rate and sodium excretion in dogs	Some determinants of the effects of l' angiotensin val5 ii amides on the rate of glomerular filtration and l' sodium excretion in the dog.
5	sporulation in bacillus subtilis biochemical changes	The sporulation of the bacillus subtilis changes biochemically.
5	clearing factor lipase in adipose tissue a possible role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of its activity	Clear factor lipase in adipose tissue may play a role in regulating l&apos activity; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	changes in the concentrations of some phosphorylated intermediates and stimulation of glycolysis in liver slices	Changes in the concentrations of certain phosphorylated intermediates and stimulation of glycolysis in thin slices of liver.
5	growth of mixed cultures on mixed substrates i continuous culture	Growth of the mixed cultures on mixed substrates i continuous culture.
5	hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol in canine endotoxin shock	Hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol on dog-induced endotoxinogenic shock.
5	inhibition of glycosidases by aldonolactones of corresponding configuration the specificity of alpha l arabinosidase	L' inhibition of glycosidases by the aldonolactones of configuration corresponding to the specificity of the apos; alpha arabinosidase.
5	factors affecting the glucose 6 phosphate inhibition of hexokinase from cerebral cortex tissue of the guinea pig	Factors affecting the apos; glucose inhibition 6 phosphate of the apos; brain cortical tissue hexokinase of the guinea pig.
5	biosynthesis of intestinal mucins effect of puromycin on mucoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colonic mucosal tissue	Puromycin has an effect on the biosynthesis of intestinal mucin by sheep colon mucosal tissue.
5	attempts to detect lycopersene formation in yeast	Assays for the detection of lycopersenic acid formation in yeast.
5	oral maintenance of water electrolyte and acid base balance in cholera a preliminary report	The oral maintenance of the apos; balance between the electrolyte of the apos; water and acid base in cholera made the subject of a preliminary report.
5	adenosine phosphates and the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in yeast	Adenosine phosphates and control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in yeast.
5	dextran induced agglutination of streptococcus mutans and its potential role in the formation of microbial dental plaques	Dextran induced agglutination of streptococcus mutans and its potential role in microbial dental plaque formation.
5	immunochemistry of the cell walls of listeria monocytogenes	L' cell wall immunochemistry of listeria monocytogenes.
5	glucose dependent secretion and destruction of hydrogen peroxide by mycoplasma pneumoniae	The glucose-dependent secretion and destruction of the peroxide d' hydrogen by the pneumoniae mycoplasma.
5	effects of carbon dioxide on growth and maltose fermentation by bacteroides amylophilus	Effects of carbon dioxide on bacteroid amylophilus growth and maltosis fermentation.
5	malate utilization by a group d streptococcus physiological properties and purification of an inducible malic enzyme	Malate use by a group of streptococci with physiological properties and purification of the inducible malic enzyme.
5	inhibitory effect of 2 deoxy d glucose on the formation of the cell wall in yeast protoplasts	An inhibitory effect of 2 glucose deoxy on cell wall formation in yeast protoplasts.
5	acidaminococcus gen n acidaminococcus fermentans sp n anaerobic gram negative diplococci using amino acids as the sole energy source for growth	Acidaminococcus gen n acidaminococcus fermentans sp. anaerobic gram-negative diplococci using amino acids as the sole source of energy for growth.
5	sporulation of yeast harvested during logarithmic growth	Yeast sporulation harvested during logarithmic growth.
5	the metabolic fate of the products of citrate cleavage adenosine triphosphate citrate lyase and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate linked malate dehydrogenase in foetal and adult liver from ruminants and non ruminants	The metabolic fate of the cleavage products of l&apos citrate; adenosine triphosphate citrate lyase and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate bound malate dehydrogenase in adult and fetal liver of ruminants and non-ruminants.
5	glucose catabolism of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae	Glucose catabolism in erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae.
5	carbohydrate formation from various precursors in noenatal rat liver	The formation of carbohydrates from various precursors in rat liver.
5	the exopolysaccharide of klebsiella aerogens a3 s1 type 54 the isolation of o acetylated octasaccharide tetrasaccharide and trisaccharide	L' airborne klebsiella exopolysaccharide type 54, type 54, isolates the acetylated or octasaccharide tetrasaccharide and the trisaccharide.
5	studies on the lipid content and phosphate requirement of glucose and acetate grown escherichia coli	Studies of lipid content and phosphate requirements of glucose and acetate grown on Escherichia coli.
5	multiple forms of bacterial nadp specific isocitrate dehydrogenase	Bacterial isocitrate isocitrate dehydrogenase nadp specific to bacteria.
5	protease production by species of entomophthora	Protease production by Apos species; entomophthora.
5	constancy of uptake during the cell cycle in escherichia coli	Consistency of apos; cell cycle uptake in escherichia coli.
5	repression by glucose of acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli b	Glucose repression of acetohydroxyacid synthetase in escherichia coli b.
5	kinases in leuconostoc mesenteroides	Leuconostoc mesentéroide kinases.
5	metabolism of carbohydrates by pasteurella pseudotuberculosis	Carbohydrate metabolism by pasteurella pseudotuberculosis.
5	differences in the utilization of glycerol and glucose by mycobacterium phlei	Differences in glycerol and glucose utilization by phlei mycobacteria.
5	galactose transport in saccharomyces cerevisiae i nonmetabolized sugars as substrates and inducers of the galactose transport system	Galactose transport in unmetabolized sucrose cerevisiae i as substrates and inducers of the galactose transport system.
5	formation of dulcitol in aerobic dissimilation of d galactose by yeasts	Dulcitol formation during aerobic dissimilation of galactose by the yeasts.
5	microcalorimetric study of glucose permeation in microbial cells	Microcalorimetric study of cellular glucose permeation in microbial cells.
5	the lipid composition of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b	Fatty composition of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b.
5	effect of lysozyme on resting spores of bacillus megaterium	Effect of lysozyme on resting spores of the megaterium bacillus.
5	histochemical localization of renal trehalase demonstration of a tubular site	Histochemical localization of renal trehalase activity demonstrates the existence of a tubular site.
5	enterotoxin b synthesis by replicating and nonreplicating cells of staphylococcus aureus	The synthesis of l' enterotoxin b by replication and non-replication of staphylococcus aureus cells.
5	alteration of glucose metabolism of arthrobacter crystallopoietes by compounds which induce sphere to rod morphogenesis	Modification of glucose metabolism in the apos; arthrobacter crystallopoietes by compounds that induce spherical morphogenesis to the rod.
5	molecular basis of transient repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Molecular basis for the transient repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli.
5	synergistic and product induction of the enzymes of tryptophan metabolism in pseudomonas acidovorans	Synergistic induction and production of tryptophan metabolism enzymes by pseudomonas acidovorans.
5	role of exogenous adenosine triphosphate in catabolic and synthetic activities of chlamydia psittaci	Role of l' exogenous adenosine triphosphate in the catabolic and synthetic activities of chlamydia psittaci.
5	conversion of glucose 1 phosphate to 3 keto glucose 1 phosphate by cells of agrobacterium tumefaciens	Conversion of glucose 1 phosphate into 3 keto glucose 1 phosphate by cells d' agrobacterium tumefaciens.
5	effect of divalent cations on the uptake and oxidation of substrates by pseudomonas aeruginosa	Effect of divalent cations on absorption and apo; substrate oxidation by Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	molar growth yields of certain lactic acid bacteria as influenced by autolysis	The molar growth yields of some of the lactic acid bacteria are influenced by autolysis.
5	induction of adenosine deaminase in escherichia coli	Apos induction; adenosine deaminase in Escherichia coli.
5	serine requirement in leukemic and normal blood cells	Need serine in both leukemic and normal blood cells.
5	ribonucleic acid biosynthesis in adult and infant rat brain in vitro	Biosynthesis of apos; ribonucleic acid (RNA) in adult rat brain and new-born in vitro.
5	glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the small intestine the effect of glucose on hexokinase activity	Glucose metabolism in the mucosa; small intestine; effect of glucose on intestines; glucose activity; hexokinase.
5	identification of micrococcaceae in clinical bacteriology	Micrococcaceae identification in clinical bacteriology.
5	studies on the physiological and structural characteristics of rat intestinal mucosa mitochondrial structural changes during amino acid absorption	Studies of the physiological and structural characteristics of mitochondrial structural changes in the rat intestinal mucosa during apo and apo; amino acid absorption.
5	an in vitro study of the intestinal absorption of pyridinium aldoximes	An in vitro study of intestinal absorption of pyridinium aldoximes.
5	taste stimuli a behavioral categorization	The flavor is what stimulates behavioral categorization.
5	the chemical composition of the lipopolyacarideof pseudomonas aeruginosa	Chemical composition of pseudomonas aeruginosa lipopolyacaride.
5	catabolite repression of the lac operon separt epressionof two enzymes	Catabolic repression of l' epression of the part of l' lac operon of two enzymes.
5	mitochondrial autonomy incorporation of monosaccharides into glycoprotein by isolated mitochondria	Incorporation of monosaccharides into glycoprotein by isolated mitochondria is a form of d' mitochondrial autonomy.
5	human hormone production in vitro	Production of human hormones in vitro.
5	the effect of 2 4 dinitrophenol on adipose tissue metabolism	L' effect of 24 dinitrophenol on body fat metabolism.
5	studies on the existence of a pathway in liver and muscle for the conversion of glucose into glycogen without glucose 6 phosphate as an intermediate	Studies on the existence of liver and muscle pathways for the conversion of glucose to glucose without glucose 6 phosphate intermediates.
5	role of adenosine monophosphate in regulation of metabolic pathways of perfused rat liver	The role of l' adenosine monophosphate in the regulation of the metabolic pathways of perfused rat liver.
5	degradation of uric acid by certain aerobic bacteria	Degradation of l' uric acid by certain bacteria aerobic.
5	paraffin oxidation in pseudomonas aeruginosa i induction of paraffin oxidation	Oxidation of paraffin in pseudomonas aeruginosa i induction of apos; oxidation of paraffin.
5	inhibition by methylphenidate of transport across the yeast cell membrane	L' inhibition of transport across the cell membrane of the yeast by methylphenidate.
5	neisseria lactamicus sp n a lactose fermenting species resembling neisseria meningitidis	Neisseria lactamicus sp n a lactose-fermenting species resembling Neisseria meningitidis.
5	role of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylation in acetobacter xylinum	Role of carboxylation of phosphoenolpyruvate in apos; acetobacter xylinum.
5	uptake of glucose l 14c by pullularia pullulans	Glucose uptake I-14c by pullularia pullulans.
5	biosynthesis of riboflavine in corynebacterium species the purine precursor	Riboflavin biosynthesis in species of corynebacteria, the precursor of purine.
5	possible mechanisms of action of an anti pasteurella pestis factor	Mechanisms of action; possible action; an anti-pasturely pestis factor.
5	effect of phenylbutazone on phagocytosis and intracellular killing by guinea pig polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Effect of phenylbutazone on phagocytosis and intracellular destruction by polymorphonuclear leukocytes of guinea pig.
5	production of l asparaginase ii by escherichia coli	Dissolve asparaginase; asparaginase II by escherichia coli.
5	gratuitous synthesis of beta lactamase in staphylococcus aureus	Free synthesis of beta lactamase from staphylococcus aureus.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism hormonal and dietary control of the oxidative and non oxidative reactions of the cycle in liver	The pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism both regulates hormonal and dietary oxidative and nonoxidative cycle reactions in the liver.
5	uridine diphosphate d glucose dehydrogenase of aerobacter aerogenes	Glucose diphosphate uridine dehydrogenase d' Aerobacter aerogenes.
5	acceleration of gluconeogenesis from propionate by dl carnitine in the rat kidney cortex	Acceleration of gluconeogenesis from propionate by carnitine dl (dl) in rat renal cortex.
5	a circadian rhythm in the disappearance of thyroxine from the blood in the calf and the thyroidectomized rat	The circadian rhythm of thyroxine disappearance from blood in calves and thyroidectomized rats.
5	cerebrosides of human aorta isolation identification of the hexose and fatty acid distribution	Cerebroside; isolation of the apos; identification of the apos; hexose and the distribution of the fatty acids.
5	early effects of feeding excess vitamin a mechanism of fatty liver production in rats	Early effects of apo; diet; excess of vitamin a mechanism of foie gras production in rats.
5	cell wall composition of the yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis	Composition of yeast cell wall and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis.
5	change in the absorbancy of bacterial suspensions before initiation of growth	Change in pH; absorbance of bacterial suspensions prior to growth.
5	glucose catabolism in rhizobium japonicum	The glucose catabolism of rhizobium japonicum.
5	two forms of d glycerate kinase in escherichia coli	Two forms of glycerate kinase d found in escherichia coli.
5	stimulation of fermentation and yeast like morphogenesis in mucor rouxii by phenethyl alcohol	Stimulation of fermentation and yeast-like morphogenesis in russet mucorum by phenethyl alcohol.
5	molar growth yield of streptococcus faecalis on pyruvate	Molar growth rate of streptococcus faecalis on pyruvate.
5	sporulation of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum under conditions of restricted growth	Sporulation of Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum under growth-restricted conditions.
5	modified biochemical tests for characterization of l phase variants of bacteria	Modified biochemical assays for characterization of phase l bacterial variants.
5	effect of triperidol on carbohydrate and amino acid metabolism in rat brain cortex slices	The effect of triperidol on carbohydrate and amino acid metabolism in thin slices of rat cerebral cortex.
5	compartmentation between glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in rat liver	Comparison of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in rat liver.
5	structural requirements for active intestinal transport spatial and bonding requirements at c 3 of the sugar	Structural requirements for active intestinal transport, space requirements and c3 binding of sugar.
5	changes in the concentrations of hepatic metabolites on administration of dihydroxyacetone or glycerol to starved rats and their relationship to the control of ketogenesis	Changes in hepatic metabolite levels during administration of dihydroxyacetone or glycerol to starved rats and their relation to control of ketogenesis.
5	comparative intermediary metabolism of vegetative cells and microcysts of myxococcus xanthus	Intermediate comparative metabolism of vegetative cells and xanthus myxococci microcysts.
5	production of a capsular polysaccharide by a marine filamentous fungus	Production of capsular polysaccharide by a filamentous marine fungus.
5	influence of gas environment on catabolic activities and on reoxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate in chlamydia	Influence of l' gaseous environment on the catabolic activities and reoxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate in Chlamydia.
5	control of dimorphism in mucor by hexoses inhibition of hyphal morphogenesis	Mucor dimorphism was found to be controlled by apos; inhibition of hyphal morphogenesis by hexoses.
5	molar growth yields as evidence for oxidative phosphorylation in streptococcus faecalis strain 10cl	Molar growth was evidence of oxidative phosphorylation in strain 10cl of streptococcus faecalis.
5	trehalose phosphate synthesis in streptomyces hygroscopicus purification of guanosine diphosphate d glucose d glucose 6 phosphate 1 glucosyl transferase	Trehalose phosphate synthesis in streptomyces hygroscopicus purification of glucose guanosine diphosphate 6 phosphate 1 glucosyl transferase.
5	autotrophy in nitrosocystis oceanus	Autotrophy in nitrosocystis oceanus?
5	citrate pyruvate and lactate contaminants of commercial serum albumin	"""Pyruvate citrate and lactate contaminants of commercial serum albumin"", Int."
5	the effects of ph on the labellar sugar receptor of the fleshfly	The effects of ph on the mouthwash sugar receptor.
5	effect of physiological variations in free fatty acid concentration on the binding of thyroxine in the serum of euthyroid and thyrotoxic subjects	Effect of physiological changes in free fatty acid concentration on thyroxine binding in serum of euthyroid and thyroid animals.
5	influence of ph and metal cations on aggregative growth of non slime forming strains of zoogloea ramigera	L' influence of ph and metal cations on the aggregate growth of strains of zoogloea ramigera that do not form mucus.
5	simple method for rapid determination of antibiotic blood levels	A simple method to quickly determine blood levels of antibiotics.
5	control of respiration and metabolism in growing klebsiella aerogenes the role of adenine nucleotides	Control of respiration and metabolism in growing klebsiella aerogenes, the role of the adenine nucleotides.
5	glycogenesis and glyconeogenesis in human platelets incorporation of glucose pyruvate and citrate into platelet glycogen glycogen synthetase and fructose 1 6 diphosphatase activity	Glycogenesis and glyconeogenesis in human platelets, incorporation of glucose pyruvate and citrate into glycogen glycogen synthetase platelets and fructose 16 diphosphatase.
5	glucose production by lamprey meninges	Glucose production by the lamprey meninges.
5	effect of culture medium composition and ph on the production of m protein and proteinase by group a streptococci	Effect of culture medium composition and ph on m protein and proteinase production by streptococci.
5	effects of ultraviolet radiation on respiration and growth in radiation resistant and radiation sensitive strains of escherichia coli b	The effects of ultraviolet radiation on the respiration and growth of resistant and radiation-sensitive strains of Escherichia coli.
5	glycolytic and related enzymes in clostridial classification	Glycolytic and related enzymes in Clostridial Classification.
5	control of synthesis of malate dehydrogenase in aerobacter aerogenes	Mastery of the synthesis of malate dehydrogenase activity in aerobacter aerogenes.
5	induction of spherule formation in physarum polycephalum by polyols	Induced spherule formation in physarum polycephalum by polyols.
5	glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the small intestine changes of hexokinase activity during perfusion of the proximal half of rat small intestine	Glucose metabolism in the mucosa; small intestine Changes in weakness; apo activity; hexokinase during infusion of the proximal half of the apo; rat small intestine.
5	production and catabolite repression of the constitutive polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase of aeromonas liquefaciens	Production and catabolic repression of trans-cellulose reductase (cellulose reductase) component; polygalacturonic acid (polygalacturonic acid); Aeromonas liquefaciens.
5	relationship between glucose utilization and growth rate in bacillus subtilis	Relationship between glucose utilization and subtilis bacillus growth rate.
5	regulation of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Control of lidocysteine; staphylococcal enterotoxin b.
5	catabolic activities of neisseria meningitidis utilization of glutamate	Catabolic activity of glutamate utilization neisseria meningitidis.
5	multiple impairment of glycolysis in veillonella alcalescens	Multiple alterations of glycolysis of veillonella alcalescens.
5	nonoxidative pentose phosphate pathway in veillonella alcalescens	Non-oxidative pathway of pentose phosphate in veillonella alcalescens.
5	macromolecular synthesis during microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus cereus t	Macromolecular synthesis during sporogenesis of microcycle of cereus t.
5	carbohydrate accumulation during the sporulation of yeast	Accumulation of carbohydrates during yeast sporulation.
5	metabolic turnover of the polar lipids of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b	Metabolic renewal of polar lipids of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b.
5	gargoylism hydrolysis of beta galactosides and tissure accumulation of galactose and mannose containing compounds	Gargoylism hydrolysis of beta-galactosides and tissue accumulation of galactose- and mannose-containing compounds.
5	practical physiological schema for the identification of herellea vaginicola and its differentiation from similar organisms	Practical physiological diagram for apos; identification of apos; herela vaginicola and its differentiation from apos; similar organisms.
5	microbial production of xylitol from glucose	Microbial production of xylitol from the glucose.
5	a method for the quantitative determination of neutral glycosphingolipids in urine sediment	Method for quantitative determination of neutral glycosphingolipids in urinary sediments.
5	growth of histoplasma capsulatum vi maintenance of the mycelial phase	Growth of the apos; histoplasma capsulatum vi sustains the mycelial phase.
5	action of diethylstilbestrol on staphylococci further observations on the effect of resting cells	L' action of diethylstilbestrol on staphylococci is apos; object d' other observations on apos; effect of resting cells.
5	isolation and partial characterization of a major inositol containing lipid in baker s yeast mannosyl diinositol diphosphoryl ceramide	Isolation and partial characterization of apos; a major lipid containing apos; inositol in mannosyl diinositol diphosphoryl yeast, bakery ceramide.
5	compartmentation in the induction of the hexose 6 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	In vitro comparison; phosphate transport system induction; hexose 6 phosphate d' escherichia coli.
5	separation and identification of soluble nucleotides in cambial and young xylem tissue of larix decidua mill	Separation and identification of cambium- and juvenile xylem-soluble nucleotides of larix decidua mill.
5	the role of the cytoplasmic redox potential in the control of fatty acid synthesis from glucose pyruvate and lactate in white adipose tissue	The role of cytoplasmic redox potential in the regulation of fatty acid synthesis from pyruvate glucose and lactate in white adipose tissue.
5	glucose metabolism during the menstrual cycle glucose tolerance during the one cycle and under the effect of ovulatory suppressants	Glucose Metabolism during the menstrual cycle Glucose intolerance during and below menstrual cycle; effect of ovulatory suppressants.
5	parathyroid hormone 3 5 amp ca and renal gluconeogenesis	Parathyroid hormone 3,5 ca and renal gluconeogenesis.
5	effects of glucose on glycogen synthetase phosphorylase and glycogen deposition in the perfused rat liver	Effect of glucose on glycogen synthetase phosphorylase and glycogen deposition in perfused rat liver.
5	ionizing radiation initiated degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria a possible role for defective prophage	The ionizing radiation triggered the degradation of l' deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria, a possible role for defective prophage.
5	interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin and the estrogenic hormone diethylstilbestrol	Interaction of the alpha-staphylococcal toxin and the estrogenic hormone, estrogenic diethylstilbestrol.
5	measurement of adipose tissue metabolites in vivo	In vivo measurement of body fat metabolites.
5	the metabolism of d glyceraldehyde by the lens	The metabolism of d-glyceride by the lens.
5	glucose metabolism in the superovulated rat ovary in vitro effects of luteinizing hormone and the role of glucose metabolism in steroidogenesis	Glucose metabolism in the ovaries of superovulated rats, the in vitro effects of luteinizing hormone (LH) and the role of glucose metabolism in steroidogenesis.
5	uptake of monosaccharides by guinea pig cerebral cortex slices	Capture of monosaccharides by slices of guinea pig cerebral cortex.
5	a survey of infantile gastroenteritis	Gastro survey @-@Entrise infantile.
5	studies on the pathogenesis of acute inflammation ix the influence of hyperosomolality secondary to hyperglycemia upon the acute inflammatory response induced by thermal injury to ear chambers of rabbits	Studies on the pathogenesis of apo; acute inflammation; influence of apo; secondary hyperosomolarity to apo; hyperglycemia on acute inflammatory response induced by thermal lesion of rabbit ears.
5	the effects of dietary conditions and glycerol concentration on glycerol uptake by rat liver and kidney cortex slices	Effects of dietary conditions and glycerol concentration on apo; glycerol absorption by rat kidney liver and renal cortical slices.
5	composition of pseudomonas aeruginosa slime	Composition of Pseudomonas aeruginosa mucus.
5	the biochemical status of metabolites of alkane utilizing pseudomonas organisms	The biochemical status of the metabolites of etapos; alkane using pseudomonas organisms.
5	inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in disrupted spheroplast of escherichia coli	Inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in a dislocated spheroplast of apos; escherichia coli.
5	glucose induced crypticity toward succinate metabolism in saccharomyces lactis	Glucose induced crypticity favoring succinate metabolism in the saccharomyces lactis.
5	automatic assessment of respiration during growth in stirred fermentors	Automatic evaluation of respiration during growth in agitation-induced fermenters.
5	respiration and glucose oxidation in human and guinea pig leukocytes comparative studies	Breathing and glucose oxidation in leukocytes from guinea pigs and humans have been investigated in comparative studies.
5	tricarboxylic acid cycle enzymes and morphogenesis in blastocladiella emersonii	Lapos cycle enzymes; tricarboxylic acid and morphogenesis in blastocladiella emersonii.
5	bacteria shaped gymnoplasts protoplasts of bacillus subtilis	Protoplasts of the gymnoplasts of bacillus subtilis were formed by bacteria.
5	variation in composition of yeast phosphohexosans	Variation in the composition of yeast phosphohexosan products.
5	bacteriology of manganese nodules iv induction of an mno2 reductase system in a marine bacillus	The bacteriology of the manganese nodules iv l'apos; induction d'apos; a mno2 reductase system in a marine bacillus.
5	volutin granules in zoogloea ramigera	Volutin granules in zoogloea ramigera.
5	conversion of carbohydrate to fat in adipose tissue an energy yielding and therefore self limiting process	The conversion of carbohydrates into fat in adipose tissue is an energetic process that generates energy and therefore is limited to it-itself.
5	cerebral blood flow and metabolism in hepatic cirrhosis before and after portacaval shunt operation	Cerebral blood flow and metabolism in liver cirrhosis before and after stroke; operation of portacaval shunt.
5	yeast cell wall synthesis	Synthesis of yeast cell wall.
5	studies of newly synthesized ribosomal ribonucleic acid of escherichia coli	Studies of l' newly synthesized ribosomal ribonucleic acid in Escherichia coli.
5	pathways of glycogen synthesis in novikoff ascites hepatoma cells	Glycogen synthesis in dapos cells; novikoff ascitic hepatoma.
5	metabolic studies of isolated human eccrine sweat glands	Metabolic studies of isolated human eccrine sweat glands.
5	medium for differential count of the anaerobic flora in human feces	Medium for the differential counting of anaerobic flora in human feces.
5	characterization of clostridia by gas chromatography differentiation of species by trimethylsilyl derivatives of whole cell hydrolysates	Characterization of clostridia by gas chromatography, differentiation of species by d&apos trimethylsilyl derivatives; whole-cell hydrolysates.
5	regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli during diauxie lag accumulation of heterogeneous ribonucleic acid	Regulation of l&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli during apos; late accumulation of l' heterogeneous ribonucleic acid during diauxis.
5	acetoacetate metabolism in infant and adult rat brain in vitro	Metabolism of acetoacetate in the brain of newborn and adult rats in vitro.
5	molecular weights and metabolism of rat brain proteins	Molecular mass and protein metabolism of rat brain.
5	the operation of the gamma aminobutyrate bypath of the tricarboxylic acid cycle in brain tissue in vitro	The action of gamma aminobutyrate on the cycle of l' tricarboxylic acid in brain tissue in vitro.
5	effects of added nucleotides on renal carbohydrate metabolism	Dosage effects; addition of nucleotides to renal carbohydrate metabolism.
5	relationship of staphylococcal toxins and enzymes with serological and phage types	Relationship between toxins and staphylococcal enzymes and both serological and phage types.
5	obesity absence of satiety aversion to sucrose	Obesity lacking d'apos; aversion of satiety to sucrose.
5	the fuel of respiration of rat kidney cortex	You know, the breathing fuel of the rat's renal cortex.
5	formation of hydrogen peroxide by group n streptococci and its effect on their growth and metabolism	Formation of d&apos peroxide; hydrogen by group n streptococci and its effect on their growth and metabolism.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism enzyme profiles and transient and steady state content of intermediates of alternative pathways of glucose metabolism in krebs ascites cells	The pentose phosphate pathway of enzyme profiles of glucose metabolism and the level of l' transient and stable state of intermediates of alternative pathways of glucose metabolism in ascitic krebs cells.
5	synthesis of glycoprotein glycolipid protein and lipid in synchronized l5178y cells	Synthesis of glycoprotein glycolipid protein and lipids in l5178y synchronized cells.
5	pancreozymin bioassay in man based on pancreatic enzyme secretion potency of specific amino acids and other digestive products	Pancreozymin bioassay in apos; man based on pancreatic enzyme secretory ability of apos; specific amino acids and d' other digestive products.
5	comparative metabolism of vegetative and sporulating cultures of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum	Comparative metabolism of vegetative and sporulating cultures of Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism influence of a growth hormone secreting pituitary tumour on the oxidative and non oxidative reactions of the cycle in liver	The pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism influences a pituitary tumor secreted by a growth hormone on liver oxidative and nonoxidative cycle reactions.
5	partial characterization of a biologically active steroid glycosideisolated from the starfish marthasterias glacialis	Partial characterization of a biologically active glycoside steroid isolated from the apos; starfish marthasterias glacialis.
5	biosynthesis of amino acids in clostridium pasteurianum	Amino acid biosynthesis in Clostridium pasteurianum.
5	exopolysaccharide colanic acid and its occurrence in the enterobacteriaceae	Exopolysaccharide colanic acid and its presence in enterobacteria.
5	cobaltous ion effect on diauxie	Impact of pH; cobalt ion on diameter.
5	evidence against necessary phosphorylation during hexose transport in aspergillus nidulans	Evidence against the necessary phosphorylation during hexose transport in l'apos; aspergillus nidulans.
5	protoplasts obtained from candida tropicalis grown on alkanes	Protoplasts from candida tropicalis grown on alkanes.
5	carbohydrate transport in clostridium perfringens type a	Carbohydrate transport in clostridium perfringens a.
5	glucose degradation in clostridium perfringens type a	Glucose degradation in a-type clostridium perfringens.
5	the use of dietary restricted rat intestine for active transport studies	L' use of the intestines of dietary-restricted rats for active transport studies.
5	inhibition of translation of preformed lac messenger ribonucleic acid by t4 bacteriophage	Inhibition of translation of t4 bacteriophage-preformed messenger lac ribonucleic acid.
5	the effects of isoniazid on the carbohydrates of mycobacterium tuberculosis bcg	The effects of l-apos; isoniazide on carbohydrates of the bcg tuberculous mycobacterium.
5	regulation of sugar transport in isolated bacterial membrane preparations from escherichia coli	The regulation of sugar transport in isolated Escherichia coli – Escherichia coli bacterial membrane preparations.
5	phenol biosynthesis in higher plants gallic acid	The biosynthesis of phenol in higher plants; gallic acid.
5	dietary protein and the control of fatty acid synthesis in rat adipose tissue	Key words: dietary proteins and control of fatty acid synthesis in rat adipose tissue.
5	fecal streptococci on barley and malt kernels and instant malted milk powder	Fecal streptococci on dried barley and malt grains and instant milk malt powder.
5	product inhibition of the fermentative formation of glutamic acid	Inhibition by the product of the fermentation formation of l' glutamic acid.
5	rapid detection of sublethally impaired cells of enterobacteriaceae in dried foods	Rapid detection of d' enterobacteria (@-@) that are ethically altered in dried food.
5	thymineless death in escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid replication and the immune state	Thymine-free death in replication of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid of apos; Escherichia coli and in immune status.
5	malate utilization by a group d streptococcus regulation of malic enzyme synthesis by an inducible malate permease	Malate used by a group of streptococci to regulate the synthesis of l' malic enzyme by an inducible malate permease.
5	stimulation of galactokinase synthesis in escherichia coli by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Stimulation of galactokinase synthesis in Escherichia coli by adenos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	immunochemistry of the capsular polysaccharide of an acinetobacter	L' acinetobacter immunochemistry of capsular polysaccharide.
5	undamped oscillations of pyridine nucleotide and oxygen tension in chemostat cultures of klebsiella aerogenes	Undamped pyridine nucleotide and voltage oscillations; oxygen in chemostat cultures of klebsiella aerogenes.
5	dissimilation of methionine by fungi	Methionine dissimulation by the fungi.
5	involvement of phosphoenolpyruvate in lactose utilization by group n streptococci	L' involvement of phosphoenolpyruvate in apos; lactose utilization by n-group streptococci.
5	the emision of corrosive vapours by wood hot water extracted o acetylated hemicelluloses from sweet chestnut castnaea sativa and wych elm ulmus glabrau and a discussion of o acetyl group changes occurring in these woods during incubation at 48 degrees and 100 per cent relative humidity	Emission of corrosive vapours by spoilage; hot wood water from acetylated hemicelluloses from sativa chestnut and l' ulmus glabrau and a discussion of acetyl group changes occurring in these woods during spoilage; 48-degree and 100% incubation; relative humidity.
5	compartmentation of glutamate metabolism in brain evidence for the existence of two different tricarboxylic acid cycles in brain	The compartmentalization of glutamate metabolism in the brain indicated the existence of two different cycles of apos; tricarboxylic acid in the brain.
5	carabolite repression of the lac operon repression of translation	The carabolic repression of the repression of l' lac opera of the translation.
5	induction of enzymes in dormant spores of aspergillus oryzae	Induction of apos; enzymes in dormant spores of apos; aspergillus oryzae.
5	inducible gamma butyrobetaine degrading enzymes in pseudomonas species ak 1	Inducible enzymes degrading gamma-butyrobetaine in Pseudomonas ak 1 species were inducible.
5	pathways of anaerobic acetate utilization in escherichia coli and aerobacter cloacae	Chemin de l'apos; anaerobic use of acetate in escherichia coli and aerobacter cloacae.
5	effect of glucose ingestion on the metabolism of free fatty acids in human subjects	Effect of glucose ingestion on free fatty acid metabolism in humans.
5	tissue distribution of glycosphingolipids in a case of fabry s disease	Tissue distribution of glycosphingolipids in one Fabry s Disease.
5	metabolism of d and l glyceraldehyde in adipose tissue a stereochemical probe for glycerokinase activity	The metabolism of d and l glyceraldehyde in adipose tissue, a stereochemical probe for the apos; glycerokinase activity.
5	mechanism of activation of catabolite sensitive genes a positive control system	Mechanisms of activation of catabolite-sensitive genes, a positive control system.
5	identification of members of the family enterobacteriaceae by the r b system	Identification of enterobacterial family members by the system r b.
5	effect of glucose and low oxygen tension on l asparaginase production by a strain of escherichia coli b	Effect of glucose and glucose; low oxygen tension on apo production; asparaginase 1 by apos strain; escherichia coli b.
5	heterogeneity among strains of mycoplasma granularum and identification of mycoplasma hyosynoviae sp n	Heterogeneity among mycoplasma granularum strains and identification of mycoplasma hyosynoviae sp.
5	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 11a 43	Substance specific to type of pneumococcus type 11a.
5	disappearance of isocitrate lyase enzyme from cells of chlorella pyrenoidosa	Apos disappearance; isocitrate lyase enzyme from chlorineella pyrenoidosa cells.
5	catalase dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage during phagocytosis	Catalase-dependent peroxidative metabolism in alveolar macrophage during phagocytosis.
5	effect of renal insufficiency on the active transport of calcium by the small intestine	Effect of apo; renal insufficiency on active calcium transport via mucosa; small intestine.
5	enhancement of phagocytosis in bovine milk leukocytes in vitro	L' increase in phagocytosis in bovine milk leukocytes in vitro.
5	black beauty out of mycobacterium fortuitum cruz	Black beauty extracted from mycobacterium fortuitum cruz.
5	the role of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent malate dehydrogenase and isocitrate dehydrogenase in the supply of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate for steroidogenesis in the superovulated rat ovary	The role of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate-dependent malate dehydrogenase and isocitrate dehydrogenase in apos; supply of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced for steroidogenesis in apos; ovary of superovulated rat.
5	composition of the cellular envelopes of anabaena cylindrica	Composition of the cell envelopes of the anabaena cylindrica.
5	steady state measurement of the turnover of amino acid in the cellular proteins of growing escherichia coli existence of two kinetically distinct reactions	Measure at baseline; state; equilibrium of turnover of amino acids in escherichia coli cellular growth proteins exists in two kinetically distinct reactions.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in spirochaeta stenostrepta	Carbohydrate metabolism in spirochaeta stenostrepta.
5	control of colanic acid synthesis	Control of the synthesis of l' colanic acid.
5	high yield preparation of isolated rat liver parenchymal cells a biochemical and fine structural study	High yield preparation of isolated rat liver parenchyma cells for fine biochemical and structural study.
5	the biosynthesis of steryl glucosides in plants	The biosynthesis of the steryl glucosides in plants.
5	studies of the effect of metoclopramide and apomorphine on gastric emptying and secretion in man	Studies of the apos; effect of metoclopramide and apos; apomorphine on gastric emptying and secretion in men.
5	regulation of lipogenesis stimulation of fatty acid synthesis in vivo and in vitro in the liver of the newly hatched chick	The regulation of the stimulation of lipogenesis of fatty acid synthesis in vivo and in vitro in newly hatched chick liver.
5	factors that modify the metabolism of ethanol in rat liver and adaptive changes produced by its chronic administration	Factors affecting liver metabolism; ethanol in rat liver and adaptive changes produced by chronic administration.
5	the effect of nitrogen mustard intoxication on glucose absorption from the small intestine of the rat	The effects of apo; mustard intoxication; nitrogen on appetite; glucose absorption from appetite; rat's small intestine.
5	growth stimulants in plant extracts for leuconostoc citrovorum	Growth promoters for leuconostoc citrovorum (leuconostoc citrovorum) plant extracts.
5	lyophilization of cell free marek s disease herpesvirus and a herpesvirus from turkeys	Lyophilization of apo; herpesvirus of acellular and dapo mares disease; herpesvirus from turkeys.
5	glutathione dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage	Glutathione-dependent peroxidative metabolism in alveolar macrophage.
5	amino acid requirements of aeromonas	Amino acid requirements for Aeromonas.
5	biosynthesis of glycosaminoglycans in bovine cornea the effet of uridine diphosphate xylose	Glycosaminoglycan biosynthesis in bovine cornea; effect of apos; uridine diphosphate xylose xylose.
5	carbohydrate composition of vesicular stomatitis virus	Carbohydrate composition of vesicular stomatitis virus.
5	fatty acid synthetase activity in mycobacterium phlei regulation by polysaccharides	L' fatty acid synthetase activity in polysaccharide regulation of mycobacterium phlei.
5	improved chemically defined basal medium cmrl 1969 for primary monkey kidney and human diploid cells	Chemically defined improved baseline medium, cmrl 1969 for primary monkey kidney and human diploid cells.
5	resistance of bacillus subtilis spores to inactivation by gamma irradiation and heating in the presence of a bactericide i suitability of viable count procedures	Resistance of spores of bacillus subtilis to apos; inactivation by gamma irradiation and heating in the presence of apos; a bactericide suitable for viable enumeration methods.
5	enzymes of glucose metabolism in normal mouse pancreatic islets	Enzymes of glucose metabolism in pancreatic islets of normal mice.
5	selective inhibition of glucose oxidation by triethyltin in rat brain in vivo	L' selective inhibition of apos; oxidation of glucose by triethyltin in rat brain in vivo.
5	glucose metabolism in mouse pancreatic islets	Glucose metabolism in pancreatic islets of mice.
5	interconvertible forms of glycogen phosphorylase in neurospora crassa	Interconvertible forms of glycogen phosphorylase in the neurospora crassa.
5	lipid metabolism in the perfused chicken liver lipogenesis from glucose acetate and palmitate	Lipid metabolism in lipogenesis of perfused chicken liver from glucose acetate and palmitate.
5	the composition of beta lactamase i and beta lactamase ii from bacillus cereus 569 h	Beta lactamase i and beta lactamase ii composition of the bacillus cereus 569 h.
5	adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and catabolite repression in the Escherichia coli.
5	revised identification of the chromophore of a cell division factor from crown gall tumor cells of vinca rosea l	Revised identification of the d&apos chromophore; a cell division factor from the tumor cells of the crown gall of vinca rosea l.
5	effect of 2 deoxyglucose on cell wall formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae and its relation to cell growth inhibition	Effect of 2 deoxyglucose on cell wall formation in sucrose cerevisiae and its relationship to l' inhibition of cell growth.
5	influence of ribosides on ultraviolet resistance of escherichia coli role of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in the ultraviolet resistance enhancement after amino acid prestarvation	The influence of ribosides on cell wall resistance; ultraviolet radiation; escherichia coli role in cell wall synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid in cell wall; increase in cell wall resistance; ultraviolet after amino acid preconditioning.
5	enzymes of carbohydrate metabolism in thiobacillus species	Enzymes of carbohydrate metabolism in the thiobacillus species.
5	giant cysts and cysts with multiple central bodies in azotobacter vinelandii	Multiple central body giant cysts and cysts in l'apos; azotobacter vinelandii.
5	variation in the proportion of 50s and 30s ribosomal subunits at different growth rates	Change in the proportion of sub-ribosomal units 50s and 30s at different growth rates.
5	kinetics of exogenous induction of the hexose 6 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	Kinetics of the enzymes; exogenous induction of the hexose phosphate transport system 6 d' escherichia coli.
5	chromosome replication and the division cycle of escherichia coli b r	Chromosome replication and divisional cycle of escherichia coli b r.
5	medical management of chronic renal disease	Medical management of chronic kidney disease.
5	biochemical and biophysical aspects of human platelet adhesion to collagen fibers	Biochemical and biophysical aspects of the apos; adhesion of human platelets to collagen fibres.
5	induction and repression of l arabinose isomerase in salmonella typhimurium	Induction and repression of apos; apos isomerase; arabinosis in Salmonella typhimurium.
5	preparation and ultraviolet light induced transformation of an antifungal mixture of heptaene antibiotics of streptomyces surinam	Ultraviolet light and preparation induce transformation of an antifungal mixture of heptaene antibiotics of streptomyces surinam.
5	r b enteric differential system for identification of enterobacteriaceae	Enteric difference system r b for apos; identification of enteric bacteria.
5	microbiological study of copiamycin	Microbiological study of copiamycin.
5	metabolism of the glycosyl diglycerides and phosphatidylglucose of staphylococcus aureus	Metabolism of glycosyl diglycerides and staphylococcus aureus phosphatidylglucose.
5	utilization of glucose in heterotrophic media by thiobacillus intermedius	Glucose utilization in heterotrophic media by thiobacillus intermedius.
5	regulation of glucose metabolism in thiobacillus intermedius	Regulation of glucose metabolism in thiobacillus intermedius.
5	respiratory metabolism of a petite negative yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h	Respiratory metabolism of apos; a small negative schizosaccharomyces yeast pombe 972h.
5	biosynthesis of alpha ketoglutarate by the reductive carboxylation of succinate in bacteroides ruminicola	Biosynthesis of l' alpha-ketoglutarate by reductive carboxylation of succinate in bacteroids ruminicola.
5	glycogen metabolism in chlamydia infected hela cells	Helical cells are infected by glycogen metabolism in chlamydia.
5	radiometric method for detection of bacteremia	Radiometric method of detection of bacteremia.
5	role of carbon and nitrogen sources in bacterial growth and sporulation	Role of carbon and nitrogen sources in plant growth and sporulation.
5	preparation of labeled aflatoxins with high specific activities	Preparation of labelled aflatoxins with high specific activities.
5	the regulation of triglyceride synthesis and fatty acid synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue effects of altered dietary and hormonal conditions	Regulation of triglyceride and fatty acid synthesis in effects on epididymal adipose tissue of dietary and hormonal modified rats.
5	tryptophan catabolism during sporulation in bacillus cereus	Tryptophan catabolism during sporulation of the bacillus cereus.
5	necessity of calcium ion for cell division in lactobacillus bifidus	Necessity of l' calcium ion for cell division in lactobacillus bifidus.
5	metabolic regulation in glucose limited chemostat cultures of escherichia coli	Glucose metabolic regulation limited chemostat cultures of Escherichia coli.
5	effect of type of carbohydrate on amino acid accumulation and utilization by tetrahymena	Effect of amino acid type; carbohydrate on protein accumulation and amino acid utilization by tetrahymena.
5	partial purification and characterization of glycogen phosphorylase from dictyostelium discoideum	Partial purification and characterization of dictyostelium discoideum glycogen phosphorylase.
5	listeria monocytogenes in nature	Listeria monocytogenes in the wild.
5	pigment formation for differentiating cryptococcus neoformans from candida albicans	Pigment differentiation of cryptococcus neoformans from candida albicans.
5	distribution of the phosphoenolpyruvate glucose phosphotransferase system in bacteria	Distribution of the phosphoenolpyruvate glucose phosphotransferase system in the bacteria.
5	induction morphogenesis and germination of the chlamydospore of candida albicans	Induced morphogenesis and germination of candida albicans chlamydospore.
5	cell density dependent changes of glycolipid concentrations in fibroblasts and loss of this response in virus transformed cells	Changes in glycolipid concentration in cell-density-dependent fibroblasts and loss of this response in virus-transformed cells.
5	elaboration of the matrix glycoprotein of enamel by the secretory ameloblasts of the rat incisor as revealed by radioautography after galactose 3 h injection	Preparation of the matrix glycoprotein of the apos; enamel by the ameloblasts secretory of the apos; incisor of the rat as revealed by radioautography after a 3 h injection of galactose.
5	sporulation of bacillus subtilis in continuous culture	Cultured sporulation of the bacillus subtilis continued.
5	roles of acetate and pyruvate in the metabolism of streptococcus diacetilactis	Roles of l' acetate and pyruvate in the metabolism of streptococcus diacetilactis.
5	long term starvation survival of rod and spherical cells of arthrobacter crystallopoietes	Long-term fasting survival of rodlets and spherical cells of os; arthrobacter crystallopoietes.
5	intracellular substrates for endogenous metabolism during long term starvation of rod and spherical cells of arthrobacter crystallopoietes	Intracellular substrates for endogenous metabolism during long-term deprivation of rods and spherical cells; arthrobacter crystallopoietes.
5	feedback inhibition of l glutamine d fructose 6 phosphate amidotransferase by uridine diphosphate n acetylglucosamine in neurospora crassa	Retroactive inhibition of glutamine fructose 6 phosphate amidotransferase by etapos; uridine diphosphate n acetylglucosamine in neurospora crassa.
5	isolation and serological characterization of a cell wall antigen of rothia dentocariosa	Isolation and serological characterization of a rothia dentocariosa wall antigen.
5	cytochrome content of two pseudomonads containing mixed function oxidase systems	Cytochrome content of two pseudomonads containing mixed-function oxidase systems.
5	synchronous growth of enteric bacteria	Synchronous growth of enteric bacteria, please.
5	composition of human cerebrospinal fluid cerebroside	Composition of cerebroside in human cerebrospinal fluid.
5	pathway of carbon flow during fatty acid synthesis from lactate and pyruvate in rat adipose tissue	The carbon flux pathway during fatty acid synthesis from lactate and pyruvate in rat adipose tissue.
5	beta galactoside transport in bacterial membrane preparations energy coupling via membrane bounded d lactic dehydrogenase	Beta-galactosides are transported in bacterial membrane preparations by energy coupling via membrane-bound d-lactic-dehydrogenase.
5	iron its intracellular localization and possible role in cell division	Its intracellular location and possible role in cell division.
5	liver metastases an experimental study	Liver mets, experimental study.
5	cultivation of mycoplasmas on glass	This is mycoplasma culture on glass.
5	human alveolar macrophages comparison of phagocytic ability glucose utilization and ultrastructure in smokers and nonsmokers	Comparison of human alveolar macrophages of phagocytic capacity, of glucose and lacid utilization, ultrastructure in smokers and non-smokers.
5	reduced brain glucose with normal plasma glucose in salicylate poisoning	Reduced cerebral glucose with normal plasma glucose during poisoning with salicylate.
5	autolysis of bacillus cereus cell walls and isolation of structural components	Autolysis of cell walls of bacillus cereus and isolation of structural components.
5	effects of molybdate and selenite on formate and nitrate metabolism in escherichia coli	Effects of molybdate and selenite on formate and nitrate metabolism in Escherichia coli.
5	cell wall composition in corynebacterium bovis and some other corynebacteria	Composition of cell wall of corynebacterium bovis and d' other corynebacteria.
5	biosynthesis during recovery of heat injured salmonella typhimurium	Biosynthesis during recovery of heat-damaged Salmonella typhimurium.
5	heterotrophic growth of blue gren algae in dim light	Heterotrophic growth d' blue frog algae under low light.
5	isolation culture and fermentation characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium var bryantivar n from the rumen of sheep	Isolation, culture and fermentation characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium var bryantivar from sheep rumen.
5	regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	relationships between disaccharide hydrolysis and sugar transport in amphibian small intestine	Relationship between disaccharide hydrolysis and sugar transport in the intestines of amphibians.
5	electron microscope radioautographic study of glycogen synthesis in the rabbit retina	Radioautographic electron microscopic study of glycogen synthesis in rabbit retina.
5	inactivation of fructose 1 6 diphosphatase by glucose in yeast	Inactivation of fructose 16 diphosphatase activity by glucose in yeast.
5	reactivative action of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid or dipicolinic acid on inactive glucose dehydrogenase obtained from heated spores of bacillus subtilis	Reactive reaction of l' ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid or l' dipicolinic acid on inactive glucose dehydrogenase obtained from heated spores of the bacillus subtilis.
5	2 keto 3 deoxygluconate an intermediate in the fermentation of gluconate by clostridia	An intermediate in the fermentation of gluconate by clostridia.
5	folate replacement by tetrahydrohomopteroate in triazine resistant bacteria	Folate replacement by tetrahydrohomopteroxide in triazine-resistant bacteria.
5	studies on type ii glycogenosis effects of cortisone derivatives on acid glucosidase	Studies of the type ii glycogenic effects of cortisone derivatives on acid glucosidase.
5	a polymer of glucose and n acetylgalactosamine 1 phosphate in the wall of micrococcus sp a1	Glucose and phosphate polymer d' acetylgalactosamine 1 in micrococcus sp a1 wall.
5	the interaction in vitro between polymorphonuclear leukocytes and mycoplasma	L' in vitro interaction between polymorphonuclear leukocytes and the mycoplasma.
5	studies on the compartmentation of lipid in adipose cells i subcellular distribution composition and transport of newly synthesized lipid liposomes	Lipid compartmentalization studies in fat cells i, subcellular distribution composition, and transport of newly synthesized lipid liposomes.
5	evidence for the presence of a pool of glycerides with a rapid rate of turnover in brown fat from newborn rabbits	Evidence of the presence of a glyceride pool with a rapid turnover rate in newborn rabbits.
5	a stimulation study of brain compartments metabolism of glutamate and related substances in mouse brain	A study of the metabolism of glutamate and related substances in the mouse brain.
5	listeria monocytogenes meningitis an opportunistic infection	Meningitis with listeria monocytogenes is an opportunistic infection.
5	purification properties and regulation of glutamic dehydrogenase of bacillus licheniformis	Purification and regulation of the glutamine dehydrogenase activity of the bacillus licheniformis.
5	mechanism for regulating the distribution of glucose carbon between the embden meyerhof and hexose monophosphate pathways in streptococcus faecalis	Mechanisms to regulate the distribution of glucose between embden meyerhof and hexose monophosphate pathways in streptococcus faecalis.
5	regulation of sugar transport in neurospora crassa	Regulation of neurospora crassa sugar transport.
5	hyphal wall compositions of marine and terrestrial fungi of the genus leptosphaeria	Composition of hyphal walls of marine and terrestrial fungi of the genus leptosphaeria.
5	lactate production in the perfused rat liver	Lactate production in perfused rat liver.
5	allosteric activation of brain hexokinase by magnesium ions and by magnesium ion adenosine triphosphate complex	Allosteric activation of the apos; brain hexokinase by magnesium ions and by the adenosine triphosphate complex of the apos; magnesium ion.
5	the uptake and efflux of glycine from rat cerebral cortex slices	Absorption and apo; glycine efflux from rat cerebral cortical slices.
5	hydrogen peroxide utilization in myeloperoxidase deficient leukocytes a possible microbicidal control mechanism	Use of peroxide d' hydrogen in myeloperoxidase-deficient leukocytes as a possible microbicidal control mechanism.
5	poly hydroxybutyrate biosynthesis and the regulation of glucose metabolism in azotobacter beijerinckii	Polyhydroxybutyrate biosynthesis and regulation of glucose metabolism in beijerinckii.
5	comparison of some metabolic parameters in the perfused and the incubated rat diaphragm muscle with diaphragm muscle in vivo	Comparison of certain metabolic parameters in perfused rat and incubated rat diaphragm muscle in vivo.
5	immunochemistry of the common antigen of enterobacteriaceae kunin relation to lipopolysaccharide core structure	L' immunochemistry of apos; common antigen of enterobacterial kunin with respect to central lipopolysaccharide structure.
5	quantitative radioautography of sugar transport in intestinal biopsies from normal humans and a patient with glucose galactose malabsorption	Quantitative radioautography of sugar transport in normal and normal human intestinal biopsies; a patient with malabsorption of glucose galactose.
5	renal failure in surgical patients treatment with intravenous essential amino acids and hypertonic glucose	Renal insufficiency in surgical patients treated with intravenous essential amino acids and hypertonic glucose.
5	rate studies of polysaccharide biosynthesis from guanosine diphosphate d glucose and guanosine diphosphate d mannose	Studies of the rate of polysaccharide biosynthesis from glucose guanosine diphosphate and mannose guanosine diphosphate.
5	carbohydrate intolerance in infants with diarrhea	Glucose intolerance; carbohydrate intolerance in infants with diarrhea.
5	nutrition of mouse ascites tumor cells in primary culture ii specific requirement for glucose	Tumour cell nutrition; primary culture of mouse ascites ii specific glucose requirement.
5	nuclease production and lysostaphin susceptibility of staphylococcus aureus and other catalase positive cocci	Nuclease production and lysostaphin sensitivity of other catalase-positive cocci of staphylococcus aureus and d&apos.
5	growth and metabolism of l cells in a chemically defined medium in a controlled environment culture system i effects of o2 tension on l cell cultures	Growth and metabolism of l cells in a chemically defined medium in an environment-controlled culture system i effects of tension o2 on cultured l cells.
5	regulation of gluconeogenesis during exposure of young rats to hypoxic conditions	The regulation of gluconeogenesis during exposure of young rats to conditions of hypoxia.
5	the diffusion capsule a novel device for the addition of a solute at a constant rate to a liquid medium its application to metabolic regulation	The diffusion capsule is a new device for the addition of d&apos, a solute at a constant rate to a liquid medium, and its application to the regulation of metabolism.
5	acrylamide gel electrophoresis of intracellular proteins during early stages of sporulation in bacillus subtilis	L' d&apos gel electrophoresis; intracellular protein acrylamide during the early stages of sporulation in bacillus subtilis.
5	fatty acid composition of cladosporium resinae grown on glucose and on hydrocarbons	Fatty acid composition of cladosporium resinae, grown on glucose and hydrocarbons.
5	electrophoretic heterogeneity of bacterial nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate specific isocitrate dehydrogenases	Electrophoretic heterogeneity of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate specific bacterial isocitrate dehydrogenases.
5	physiology of sporeforming bacteria associated with insects iv glucose catabolism in bacillus larvae	Physiology of insect-associated spore-forming bacteria iv Glucose catabolism in bacillus larvae.
5	nutritional requirements of arizona citrobacter and providencia	Moose nutrition needs; Arizona citrobacter and providence.
5	studies on the division cycle of mammalian cells v modifications of time parameters by different steady state culture conditions	Studies on the cycle of division of mammalian cells v modification of temporal parameters by different culture conditions at apo; state d' equilibrium.
5	accumulation of untranslated lactose specific messenger ribonucleic acid during catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Lapos; accumulation of apos; ribonucleic acid, an untranslated lactose messenger, during catabolite repression in escherichia coli.
5	induction and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase in streptococcus faecalis	Induction and regulation of etapos; nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific for 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase in streptococcus faecalis.
5	transfer of alanine isomers by rat small intestine	Transmission of apos isomers; alanine via apos; rat small intestine.
5	nuclease activities of mycoplasma gallisepticum as a function of culture age in different media	L' gallisepticum mycoplasma nuclease activity as a function of age; culture age in different media.
5	transmethylation of sterols in aerobically adapting saccharomyces cerevisiae	Transmethylation of sterols in aerobically adaptive saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	purification and characterization of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase from plasmodium berghei	Phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase purification and characterization of plasmodium berghei.
5	development of respiration and mitochondria in mucor genevensis after anaerobic growth absence of glucose repression	Development of respiration and mitochondria in mucosal genesis following anaerobic growth without glucose repression.
5	fermentation of agmatine in streptococcus faecalis occurrence of putrescine transcarbamoylase	Streptococcus faecalis occurrence of putrescine transcarbamoylase.
5	enzymatic basis for differentiation of rhizobium into fast and slow growing groups	An enzyme basis for differentiation of rhizobia into fast- and slow-growing groups.
5	studies on the diversity of inositol containing yeast phospholipids incorporation of 2 deoxyglucose into lipid	Studies on the diversity of yeast lipids; incorporation of 2 deoxyglucose into yeast lipids containing yeast inositol phospholipids.
5	carbon and sulphur utilization during growth of pseudomonas fluorescens on potassium d glucose 6 o sulphate as the sole sulphur source	Use of carbon and sulfur during growth of pseudomonas fluorescens on glucose 6 o potassium sulfate as sole source of sulfur.
5	fatty acids of mycobacterium kansasii	Fatty acids of the mycobacterium kansasii.
5	production of extracellular polysaccharide matrix by zoogloea ramigera	Production of the extracellular polysaccharide matrix by zoogloea ramigera.
5	transverse septum formation in budding cells of the yeastlike fungus candida albicans	A transverse septum formed in the budding cells of the yeast fungus candida albicans.
5	effect of glutamate on exogenous citrate catabolism of neisseria meningitidis and of other species of neisseria	Effect of glutamate on catabolism of exogenous neisseria meningitidis citrate and d' other species of neisseria.
5	resistance of zygorhynchus species to lysis	Lysis resistance of zygorhynchus species.
5	metabolic effects of the major component of bovine growth hormone	Metabolic effects of the major component of body fat; bovine growth hormone.
5	amino acid metabolism in exercising man	Amino acid metabolism in exercise of humans.
5	the effect of polystyrene beads on cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate concentration in leukocytes	The effects of polystyrene beads on the concentration of cyclic adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in leukocytes.
5	motor neurone disease further evidence for an abnormality of nerve metabolism	Another evidence of apos, an abnormality of nerve metabolism, is motor neuron disease.
5	high aflatoxin production on a chemically defined medium	High apos; aflatoxin production on chemically defined medium.
5	antifungal activity of substituted nitrobenzenes and anilines	Antifungal activity of substituted nitrobenzene and substituted aniline.
5	impairment of glycine absorption by glucose and galactose in man	Lapos; alteration of glycine; absorption of glycine by glucose and galactose in humans.
5	cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate during glucose repression in the rat liver	Cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate levels during glucose repression in rat liver.
5	haem synthesis during mitochondrogenesis in yeast	Synthesis of the apos; hematoma during the course of mitochondrogenesis in yeast.
5	some biological properties of pneumococcus type 37 and the chemistry of its capsular polysaccharide	Some of the biological properties of type 37 pneumococcus and the chemistry of its capsular polysaccharide.
5	cultural estimation of yeasts on seaweeds	Cultural estimate of yeasts on the seaweed.
5	anaerobic roll tube media for nonselective enumeration and isolation of bacteria in human feces	Roll-tube anaerobic media for non-selective counting and isolation of bacteria from human feces.
5	utilization of carbon sources by pullularia pullulans for the elaboration of extracellular polysaccharides	Use of carbon sources by pullularia pullulans for cell bios; development of extracellular polysaccharides.
5	role of ph and nitrogen limitation in the elaboration of the extracellular polysaccharide pullulan by pullularia pullulans	Role of ph and nitrogen limitation in the development of pullulan extracellular polysaccharide by pullularia pullulans.
5	comparison of schaedler agar and trypticase soy yeast extract agar for the cultivation of anaerobic bacteria	Comparison of the schaedler agar and trypticase soybean agar yeast extract for culture of anaerobic bacteria.
5	chemically defined medium for the growth of clostridium perfringens	Chemically defined medium for growth of clostridium perfringens.
5	influence of glucose levels on the in vitro phagocytosis of bacteria by human neutrophils	Influence of glucose levels on in vitro bacterial phagocytosis by human neutrophils.
5	effect of adrenocorticosteroid on glucose metabolism in bcg sensitized alveolar macrophages	Effect of apos; adrenocorticoid on glucose metabolism in bcg-sensitized alveolar macrophages.
5	effect of diuresis on staphylococcus aureus kidney infections in mice	Effect of diuresis on staphylococcus aureus renal infections in mice.
5	regulation of secondary metabolite biosynthesis catabolite repression of phenoxazinone synthase and actinomycin formation by glucose	Regulation of secondary metabolite biosynthesis, catabolic repression of phenoxazinone synthase and d&apos formation; actinomycin by glucose.
5	control of stable ribonucleic acid chain initiation in escherichia coli during diauxie lag	Apos control; apos chain initiation; stable ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli during the latency period of the diauxis.
5	characterization and regulation of pyruvate carboxylase of bacillus licheniformis	Characterization and regulation of pyruvate carboxylase of the bacillus licheniformis.
5	role of metabolic energy in the transport of galactosides by streptococcus lactis	The role of l' metabolic energy in the transport of galactosides via streptococcus lactis.
5	synthesis of phosphoenolpyruvate from propionate in sheep liver	Synthesis of phosphoenolpyruvate from propionate in the liver of sheep.
5	characterization of insoluble protein fractions of mitochondria from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Characterization of the insoluble protein fractions of saccharomyces cerevisiae mitochondria.
5	fluorometric studies of oxidative metabolism in isolated papillary muscle of the rabbit	Fluorometric studies of oxidative metabolism in isolated rabbit papillary muscle.
5	the maltase glucoamylase and transglucosylase activities of acid glucosidase from rabbit muscle	L' rabbit muscle maltase and transglucosylase acid glucosidase activity.
5	insolubilized enzymes kinetic behaviour of glucose oxidase bound to porous glass particles	Kinetic behavior of glucose oxidase insolubilized enzymes bound to porous glass particles.
5	the regulation of growth hormone secretion from the isolated rat anterior pituitary in vitro the role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	The regulation of the secretion of l' growth hormone of l' anterior pituitary isolated from rat in vitro the role of l' adenosine 3,5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	fat transport and lymph and plasma lipoprotein biosynthesis by isolated intestine	Isolated intestine: fat transport and lipoprotein biosynthesis of lymph and plasma.
5	technique for measuring 14 co 2 uptake by soil microorganisms in situ	In-situ measurement technique; absorption of 14oC by soil microorganisms.
5	l asparaginase synthesis by erwinia aroideae	Synthesis of l-asparaginase by erwinia aroideae.
5	factors influencing l asparaginase production by erwinia aroideae	Factors influencing the production of asparaginase l by erwinia aroideae.
5	galactose utilization in galactosemia	L' use of galactose in galactosemia.
5	stimulation of glucose transport in cultures of density inhibited chick embryo cells	Stimulation of glucose transport in density cultures also inhibits chick embryo cells.
5	differential sensitivities of the two malate dehydrogenases and the maltose permease to the effect of glucose in saccharomyces carlsbergensis	The differential sensitivities of the two malate dehydrogenases and maltose permease at apos; effect of glucose treatment in saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	turnover of putrescine in a pseudomonas species	Putrescine turnover in a pseudomonas species.
5	nature of col e 1 plasmid replication in escherichia coli in the presence of the chloramphenicol	Nature of replication of plasmid type 1 in escherichia coli in the presence of chloramphenicol.
5	induction and characterization of galactosidase in an extreme thermophile	Induction and characterization of the galactosidase in an extreme thermophile.
5	relationship between yield of protoplasts and growth phase in saccharomyces	Relationship between protoplast yield and growth phase in the saccharomyces.
5	sensitivity of the 14 co 2 radiometric method for bacterial detection	Sensitivity of the 14-bit radiometric method for bacterial detection.
5	stimulation of lactic streptococci in milk by galactosidase	Stimulation of streptococci in milk by galactosidase.
5	fate of carbon passing through the glucose pool of rumen digesta	Destination of the carbon passing through the rumen digesta glucose pool.
5	influence of culture media on the antistaphylococcal activity of fosfomycin	Influence of culture media on apo; antistaphylococcal activity of fosfomycin.
5	automated radiometric detection of bacteria in 2 967 blood cultures	Automated detection of bacteria in 2,967 blood cultures.
5	clostridium perfringens i sporulation in a biphasic glucose ion exchange resin medium	Clostridium perfringens i sporulation in glucose ion exchange resin – biphasic medium.
5	evaluation of the modified r b system for identification of enterobacteriaceae	Assessment of modified rb system for apo; enterobacterial identification.
5	growth factor requirements of ruminal cellulolytic bacteria isolated from microbial populations supplied diets with or without rapidly fermentable carbohydrate	The growth factor requirements of cellulolytic rumen bacteria isolated from microbial populations provided diets with or without rapidly fermentable carbohydrates.
5	the response of infants to carbohydrate oral loads after recovery from diarrhea	The response of infants to oral carbohydrate loads after the cure of diarrhea.
5	sickling reversed and blocked by urea in invert sugar	Trepanocytosis reversed and blocked by urea in the invert sugar.
5	serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer i basal levels and effect of food and atropine	Serum gastritis in children; duodenal ulcer baseline and baseline; effect of food and food; atropine.
5	the inhibition of plant and animal adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterases by a cell division promoting substance from tissues of higher plant species	L' inhibition of adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterases in plants and animals by a cell division favoring a substance from tissues of higher plant species.
5	coexistence of two asexual strains on a single resource	Coexistence of two asexual strains on the same resource.
5	monosaccharide and chitin content of cell walls of histoplasma capsulatum and blastomyces dermatitidis	The monosaccharide and chitin content of the cell walls of apos; histoplasma capsulatum and blastomyces dermatitidis.
5	subcellular fractionation by differential and zonal centrifugation of aerobically grown glucose de repressed saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Aerobically grown subcellular fractionation by differential and zonal centrifugation of glucose from repressed succharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	distribution and correlation of events during thermal inactivation of bacillus megaterium spores	Distribution and correlation of events during the thermal inactivation of megaterium-containing spores.
5	hyphal wall synthesis in aspergillus nidulans effect of protein synthesis inhibition and osmotic shock on chitin insertion and morphogenesis	Effect of apos; inhibition of protein synthesis and osmotic shock on apos; chitin insertion and morphogenesis on apos; aspergillus nidulans.
5	relationship between energy substrate utilization and specific growth rate in aspergillus nidulans	Relationship between yeasts; energy substrate utilization and specific growth rate in yeasts; aspergillus nidulans.
5	utilization of glucose and the effect of organic compounds on the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	The use of glucose and the effects of organic compounds on the thiobacillus ferrooxidans chemolithotroph.
5	heterotrophic metabolism of the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Heterotrophic metabolism of the thiobacillus ferrooxidan chemolithotrophs.
5	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity of thiobacillus ferrooxidans chemolithithotroph.
5	metabolism of glutamine by the intact functioning kidney of the dog studies in metabolic acidosis and alkalosis	Glutamine metabolism by intact kidney in studies of metabolic acidosis and lacidosis; alkalosis in dogs.
5	isolation and properties of phagocytic vesicles ii alveolar macrophages	Alveolar macrophages ii. isolation and properties of phagocytic vesicles.
5	abnormal bactericidal metabolic and lysosomal functions of chediak higashi syndrome leukocytes	Abnormal bactericidal and metabolic functions of chediak higashi syndrome leukocytes.
5	cell wall composition and deoxyribonucleic acid similarities among the anaerobic coryneforms classical propionibacteria and strains of arachnia propionica	Cell wall composition and similarities of the cell wall; deoxyribonucleic acid between the anaerobic coryneforms of classical propionibacteria and the strains of d' arachnia propionica.
5	growth of obligate autotrophic bacteria on glucose in a continuous flow through apparatus	The growth of obligate autotrophic bacteria on glucose in a continuous flow of glucose through the cell.
5	factors affecting the level of alanine racemase in escherichia coli	Factors which influence alanine racemase levels in escherichia coli.
5	glycerol turnover and oxidation in man	Turnover and failure rates; glycerol oxidation in humans.
5	oral rehydration of children with acute diarrhoea	Oral rehydration for children with acute diarrhea.
5	observations on cell volume ultrastructure mitochondrial conformation and vital dye uptake in ehrlich ascites tumor cells effects of inhibiting energy production and function of the plasma membrane	L' observation of the mitochondrial conformation of cell volume and apos; vital dye absorption in ehrlich ascites tumor cells has the effect of d' inhibiting production of apos; plasma membrane energy and function.
5	regulation of staphylococcal enterotoxin b effect of thiamine starvation	Regulation of drugs; effect b of drugs; staphylococcal enterotoxin resulting from thiamine deprivation.
5	induction of galactokinase in saccharomyces cerevisiae kinetics of induction and glucose effects	Induction of galactokinase in the kinetics of etapos; induction of saccharomyces cerevisiae and effects of glucose.
5	a biochemical subdivision of one phage type of salmonella typhimurium	Biochemical subdivision of plants; a type of phage of salmonella typhimurium salmonella.
5	multiple forms of pseudomonas multivorans glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases differences in size pyridine nucleotide specificity and susceptibility to inhibition by adenosine 5 triphosphate	In multiple forms, pseudomonas multivorans glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases differ in the specificity of size nucleotide pyridines and their susceptibility to l' l&apos inhibition; adenosine 5 triphosphate.
5	structure and chemical composition of prospheroplast envelopes of saccharomyces cerevisiae and hansenula anomala	Structure and chemical composition of prospheroplast sheaths of saccharomyces cerevisiae and hansenula anomala.
5	recovery of exocellular acid phosphatase activity on saccharomyces mellis after treatment of the organism with reagents that affect the cell surface	Recovery of the apos; exocellular acid phosphatase activity on saccharomyces mellis after treatment of the apos; organism with reagents affecting cell surface.
5	hydroxyproline heterooligosaccharides in chlamydomonas	"""Hydroxyproline heterooligosaccharides in chlamydomonas,"" Chlamydomonas, Vol."
5	development of tetracycline resistant staphylococcus aureus in gnotobiotic mice	Tetracycline-resistant staphylococcus aureus in gnotobiotic mice.
5	control of the production of exo beta n acetylglucosaminidase by bacillus subtilis b	Control of acetylglucosaminidase production; exo beta n acetylglucosaminidase by bacillus subtilis b.
5	the development of the respiratory chain of saccharomyces carlsbergensis during respiratory adaptation	The development of the respiratory chain of the saccharomyces carlsbergensis during the course of the apos; respiratory adaptation.
5	subcellular fractionation by zonal centrifugation of glucose repressed anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Subcellular fractionation by zonal centrifugation of glucose represses the anaerobic growth of the saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	changes in enzyme activities and distributions during glucose de repression and respiratory adaptation of anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Changes in activity and distribution of enzymes during repression by glucose and l' respiratory adaptation of anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	effect of halofenate and clofibrate on growth and lipid synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of halofenate and clofibrate on growth and lipid synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	lysis of saccharomyces cerevisiae with 2 deoxy 2 fluoro d glucose an inhibitor of the cell wall glucan synthesis	Lysis of saccharomyces cerevisiae with 2 deoxy 2 fluoro glucose, an inhibitor of glucan synthesis in the cell wall.
5	inhibition of the metabolism of streptococci and salmonella by specific antisera	Inhibition of streptococcal and salmonella metabolism by specific antisera.
5	repression of in vivo synthesis of the mitochondrial elongation factors t and g in saccharomyces fragilis	Repression of in vivo synthesis of t- and g-mitochondrial elongation factors in saccharomyces fragilis.
5	effect of polyoxin d on chitin synthesis and septum formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of polyoxin d on chitin synthesis and septum formation in the saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	effects of oxygen tension and glucose repression of mitochondrial protein synthesis in continuous cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of oxygen tension and glucose repression of mitochondrial protein synthesis in continuous culture of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	nitrogen repression of the allantoin degradative enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Lapos repression; nitrogen repression of lapos-degrading enzymes; allantoin repression in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	effect of cell density on lactose synthesis in bovine mammary cell cultures	Effect of cell density on lactose synthesis in bovine mammary culture.
5	active transport of exogenous s adenosylmethionine and related compounds into cells and vacuoles of saccharomyces cerevisiae	An active transport of exogenous adenosylmethionine and related compounds in the cells and vacuoles of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biosynthesis of fosfomycin by streptomyces fradiae	Fossfomycin biosynthesis by streptomyces fradiae.
5	the regulated catabolism of endogenous and exogenous phosphatidylinositol by saccharomyces cerevisiae leading to extracellular glycerophosphorylinositol and inositol	Regulated catabolism of endogenous and exogenous phosphatidylinositol by sucroseomyces cerevisiae gave extracellular glycerophosphorylinositol and inositol.
5	copurification of l ascorbate 2 sulfate sulfohydrolase and arylsulfatase activities from the liver of a marine gastropod charonia lampas	Copurification of the sulfohydrolase activities of apos; ascorbate 2 and apos; arylsulfatase from apos liver; a marine gastropod, charonia lampas.
5	galactose and glucose metabolism in galactokinase deficient galactose 1 p uridyl transferase deficient and normal human fibroblasts	Galactose and glucose metabolism in normal and galactose 1 p uridyltransferase- and galactokinase-deficient human fibroblasts.
5	duodenal control of gastric emptying in the milk fed calf	Duodenal control of gastric emptying in milk-fed calves.
5	autolytic enzymes in hyphae of aspergillus nidulans their action on old and newly formed walls	Autolytic enzymes in d' aspergillus nidulans hyphae are active on old and newly formed walls.
5	adenylate energy charge in saccharomyces cerevisiae during starvation	The energetic charge of l' adenylate in saccharomyces cerevisiae during fasting.
5	glutamate oxidation of 6c3hed lymphoma effects of l asparaginase on sensitive and resistant lines	L' glutamate oxidation of the effects of apos; asparaginase l on lymphoma 6c3hed in both susceptible and resistant lines.
5	in vivo biosynthesis of peptidophosphogalactomannan in penicillium charlesii	In vivo biosynthesis of peptidophosphogalactomannan in penicillium charlesii.
5	biotin uptake by cold shocked cells spheroplasts and repressed cells of saccharomyces cerevisiae lack of feedback control	L' uptake of biotin by spheroplasts from heat-shocked and repressed cells of cerevisiae saccharomyces n' is not feedback controlled.
5	carbon metabolism under conditions of regulated penicillin biosynthesis	Carbon metabolism under controlled conditions of penicillin biosynthesis.
5	microbodies in methanol assimilating yeasts	Microgranules in methanol absorbing the yeasts.
5	effect of acetaldehyde upon the oxidative degradation of glucose by baker s yeast	The effect of the drug substance on the oxidative degradation of glucose by baking yeast.
5	coordinate regulation of adenylate cyclase and carbohydrate permeases by the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in salmonella typhimurium	Coordinate the regulation of l' adenylate cyclase and carbohydrate permeases by the phosphoenolpyruvate carbohydrate phosphotransferase system in Salmonella typhimurium.
5	a new method of obtaining zygotes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	A new method for obtaining zygotes from cerevisiae saccharomyces.
5	multiple forms of mitochondrial alcohol dehydrogenase in saccharomyces cerevisiae	In a variety of forms, the mitochondrial alcohol dehydrogenase (MAD) is present in the saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the response of a bioelectrochemical cell with saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolizing glucose under various fermentation conditions	The response of a bio-electrochemical cell to succharomyces cerevisiae metabolizing glucose under various fermentation conditions.
5	is phlorizin or its aglycon the inhibitor of intestinal glucose transport a study in normal and lactase deficient man	Phlorizine or its aglycone is the inhibitor of the intestinal transport of glucose that is studied in normal, lactase-deficient men.
5	development of mitochondrial membranes in anaerobically grown yeast cells	Mitochondrial membrane development in anaerobically grown yeasts.
5	effect of ornithine alpha oxoglutarate on brain metabolism in patients with chronic liver disease	The effect of apos; ornithine alpha oxoglutarate on cerebral metabolism in patients with apos; chronic liver disease.
5	factors affecting the palmitoyl coenzyme a desaturase of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Factors affecting palmitoyl coenzyme a saccharomyces cerevisiae desaturase.
5	effect of gal4 gene dosage on the level of galactose catabolic enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of the dosage of the gal4 gene on the level of galactose catabolite enzymes in succharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biogenesis of mitochondrial membranes neurospora crassa during cellular differentiation ultrastructural changes accompanying differentiation	Biogenesis of neurospora crassa mitochondrial membranes during the ultrastructural differentiation accompanying differentiation.
5	studies on the mechanism of metabolic stimulation in polymorphonuclear leucocytes during phagocytosis ii presence of the nadph2 oxidizing activity in a myeloperoxidase deficient subject	Studies of the mechanism of metabolic stimulation in polymorphonuclear leukocytes during phagocytosis ii the presence of l&apos oxidizing activity of nadph2 in a myeloperoxidase-deficient subject.
5	supplementary intravenous alimentation in the premature infant weighing less than 1 500 grams	Additional intravenous feeding to premature infants weighing less than 1500 grams.
5	effect of anisole anethole butylhydroxyanisole and safrole on intestinal absorption in the rat author s transl	Anisole anethole butylhydroxyanisole and safrole effect on intestinal absorption in translated rat author s.
5	wall mannan of saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolic stability and release into growth medium	Parietal Mannan of the metabolic stability of saccharomyces cerevisiae and its release into the growth medium.
5	effect of aeration on the activity of gluconeogenetic enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae growing under glucose limitation	Effect of gluconeogenic enzymes in the saccharomyces cerevisiae grown under glucose limitation.
5	gonadectomy and the development of age dependent polydipsia and the intake of nacl solutions in the swr j mouse	Gonadectomy and development of age- and age-dependent polydipsy; ingestion of nacl solutions in swr j mice.
5	the accumulation of succinate by the yeast brettanomyces bruxellensis	L' succinate accumulation by the yeast brettanomyces bruxellensis.
5	comparative studies on sporulation promotive actions on cyclic amp theophylline and caffeine in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Comparative studies of the stimulatory actions of sporulation on theophylline and caffeine of l' cyclic ampoule in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	energy metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae discrepancy between atp balance and known metabolic functions	Energy metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae, divergence between saccharomyces cerevisiae, and equilibrium of atp and known metabolic functions.
5	mechanism of 2 deoxy d glucose inhibition of cell wall polysaccharide and glycoprotein biosyntheses in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Mechanisms of glucose deoxygen inhibition of cell wall polysaccharide and cell wall glycoprotein biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	resistance to pediococcus cerevisiae to amethopterin as a consequence of changes in enzymatic activity and cell permeability ii permeability changes to amethopterin and other folates in the drug resistant mutant	Apos resistance of pediococcus cerevisiae; amethopterin as a result of changes in apos; enzymatic activity and cell permeability ii changes in apos permeability; amethopterin and dapos; other folate in drug resistant mutant.
5	l asparaginase activity of mycobacterium phlei under various growth conditions	L' potato activity; phlei mycobacterial asparaginase l under various growth conditions.
5	self assembly of extracellular tubular structures of non protein nature produced by an actinomycete	Self-assembly of nonprotein extracellular tubular structures produced by an actinomycete.
5	regulation of acetyl coa synthetase of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Acetyl coa synthetase of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	site of initial glycosylation of mannoproteins from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Initial glycosylation site of mannoproteins of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	inhibition of glucan and levan synthesis and neuraminidase activity of oral streptococci by monkey antiserums	L' inhibition of glucan and levan synthesis and l' oral streptococcal neuraminidase activity by monkey antisera.
5	the isolation and characterization of peroxisomes microbodies from baker s yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	Isolation and characterization of peroxisome microbodies of the bakery yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	morphogenic effects of alpha factor on saccharomyces cerevisiae a cells	Morphogenic effects of alpha factor on a-cell saccharomyces cerevisiae a.
5	diaglycerol biosynthesis in everted sacs of rat intestinal mucosa	Diaglycerol biosynthesis in flipped sacs of rat intestinal mucosa.
5	localizations of beta glucuronidase activity in sections and cultures of human gliomas	Localization of beta glucuronidase activity in human glioma sections and human glioma cultures.
5	isolation and composition of an alkali soluble glucan from the cell walls of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Isolation and composition of an alkali-soluble glucan from saccharomyces cerevisiae cell walls.
5	the preflow technic a new method of pharmacoradiography of the mesenteric area	The preflow technique is a new method for the mesenteric region of the brain.
5	effect of some aldoses on growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae inhibited with molybdenum	The effect of certain aldoses on the growth of the saccharomyces cerevisiae is inhibited by molybdenum.
5	transport of 2 deoxy d galactose in saccharomyces fragilis	Transport of 2 deoxy galactose in succharomyces fragilis.
5	significant reduction in the incidence of phlebitis with buffered versus unbuffered cephalothin	Significantly reduced liver function; incidence of phlebitis with buffered versus unbuffered cephalothin.
5	the influence of conditions of growth on the endogenous metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae effect on protein carbohydrate sterol and fatty acid content and on viability	L' influence of growth conditions on endogenous metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae has an effect on the sterols and fatty acids content of protein carbohydrates and on viability.
5	augmentation of ethanol absorption by mono and disaccharides	Increase in apo; apo absorption; ethanol by mono and disaccharides.
5	gluconeogenesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae determination of fructose 1 6 bisphosphatase activity in cells grown in the presence of glycolytic carbon sources	In succharomyces cerevisiae, gluconeogenesis is used to determine apos; fructose 16 bisphosphatase activity in cells grown on glycolytic carbon sources.
5	the substrate constant for the ammonium ion of growing saccharomyces cerevisiae	The substrate constant for the ammonium ion in the growing saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	micromethod for the determination of glucose with glucose dehydrogenase in the autoanalyzer author s transl	Micro-method for glucose determination with glucose dehydrogenase in the apos; auto-transl author analyzer.
5	inactivation by glucose of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Glucose inactivation of saccharomyces cerevisiae phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase.
5	inhibition by 5 thio d glucopyranose of protein biosynthesis in vitro in spermatids from rat testis	Glucopyranose 5 thio inhibited protein biosynthesis in rat testis spermatids in vitro.
5	survival of pleomorphic sarcoma 37 transplanted virgin female dba 2j mice effects produced by high blood glucose levels alone and in combination with drugs	Survival of pleomorphic sarcoma 37 transplanted virgin female dba 2j mice produced by high blood glucose levels alone and combination with drugs.
5	comparative study of the effect of ethyl apovincaminate and xantinol nicotinate in cerebrovascular diseases immediate drug effects on the concentrations of carbohydrate metabolites and electrolytes in blood and csf	Comparative study of the effects of apos; apos; apos; apovincaminate; ethyl and xantinol nicotinate on the immediate effects of drugs on concentrations of carbohydrate metabolites and apos; electrolytes in blood and csf in cerebrovascular diseases.
5	dextran degrading bacteria in human oral cavity and their activity against insoluble glucan from streptococcus mutants	Dextran-degrading bacteria in the human oral cavity and their activity against the insoluble glucan of streptococcal mutants.
5	clinical value of washed platelet concentrates in patients with non hemolytic transfusion reactions	Clinical value of washed platelet concentrates in patients with non-hemolytic transfusion reactions.
5	biosynthesis of the dimethylbenzene moiety of riboflavin and dimethylbenzimidazole evidence for the involvement of c 1 of a pentose as a precursor	The biosynthesis of the dimethylbenzene moiety of riboflavin and dimethylbenzimidazole demonstrates the apos; involvement of c1 d' pentose as a precursor.
5	mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase of the fission yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h changes in activity and inhibitor sensitivity in response to catabolite repression	L' fission yeast mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h changes apos; activity and sensitivity to apos; inhibitor in response to catabolite repression.
5	physiological effects of an antimycotic azasterol on cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Physiological effects of antimycotic azasterol on saccharomyces cerevisiae cultures.
5	the digestion of yeast cell wall polysaccharides in veal calves	Digestion of yeast cell wall polysaccharides from meat-eating calves.
5	the mechanism of catabolite inhibition of invertase by glucose in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The mechanism of apos; catabolic glucose inhibition of apos; invertase in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	transport of ribitol and d glucose in the yeast candida guillermondii	Ribitol and d-glucose transport in the yeast candida guillermondii.
5	induction of respiratory deficient mutants in saccharomyces cerevisiae by mono and diazido analogs of ethidium	Induction of respiratory defective mutants in cerevisiae saccharomyces by mono and diazido analogs of l' ethidium.
5	value of methods used in the etiological diagnosis of pleural exudates	Value of methods used in etiologic diagnosis of pleural exudates.
5	high aerobic glycolysis of rat hepatoma cells in culture role of mitochondrial hexokinase	High aerobic glycolysis of rat hepatoma cells in the culture of mitochondrial hexokinase.
5	allantoin transport in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Transport of l' allantoin in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the identification characterization and mapping of a gene for flocculation in saccharomyces sp	A gene for flocculation in saccharomyces sp.
5	plating medium for differentiation salmonella arizonae from other salmonellae	Cultivation medium for the differentiation of salmonella arizonae d' other salmonellae.
5	l methionine as an ethylene precursor in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Methionine as a precursor of ethylene in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	on the mode of action of a new antifungal antibiotic aculeacin a inhibition of cell wall synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	On the mode of action, a novel antifungal antibiotic aculeacin, an inhibition of cell wall synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	physiology and biochemistry of streptomycetes xi different incorporation of d glucose u 14c into the paromomycin isomers and the precursors of paromomycin i	Physiology and biochemistry of streptomycetes xi differ in their incorporation of glucose u 14c into paromomycin isomers and paromomycin precursors i.
5	effects of ethylene on the metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of ethylene on the metabolism of the saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	apparent half lives of sugar transport proteins in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The half-apparent life of sugar transport proteins in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	promoter and attenuator related metabolic regulation of the salmonella typhimurium histidine operon	Metabolic regulation related to promoter and apo; Salmonella typhimurium histidine operon; Salmonella typhimurium inhibitor.
5	biosynthesis of fatty acids and sterols in relation to the antibiotic formation in oudemansiella mucida	Biosynthesis of the fatty acids and sterols in relation to the formation of antibiotics in l'apos; oudemansiella mucida.
5	kinetics of glucose repression of yeast cytochrome c	Kinetics of the repression of yeast cytochrome c by glucose.
5	alcohol dehydrogenase activity of the subcellular fractions of torulopsis candida yeasts grown on glucose and hexadecane	L&apos activity; alcohol dehydrogenase of subcellular fractions of yeasts, torulopsis candida, grown on glucose and hexadecane.
5	the effect of the water activity of the milieu on rates of glucose uptake by the osmophilic yeasts saccharomyces rouxii and debaryomyces hansenii	L' effect of apo; water activity of medium on apo levels; glucose absorption by osmophilic yeasts saccharomyces rouxii and debaryomyces hansenii.
5	relationship of glycolytic intermediates glycolytic enzymes and ammonia to glycogen metabolism during sporulation in the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	Relationship between glycolytic intermediates and glycolytic enzymes as well as ammonia and glycogen metabolism during sporulation in the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the influence of certain growth conditions on the phosphatase activity of streptococcus mutans grown in batch and continuous culture	L' influence of certain growth conditions on cultured streptococcus mutans phosphatase activity in batch and continuous culture.
5	effects of glucose and chromium iii concentrations in the medium on the uptake of 51cr by brewer s yeast	Effect of concentrations of glucose and chromium iii in the medium on absorption of 51cr by brewing yeast.
5	flow microfluorometry study of diauxic batch growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Flow microfluorometry study of discontinuous diauxic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	mathematical model of cell growth and phosphatase biosynthesis in saccharomyces carlsbergensis under phosphate limitation	Mathematical model of cell growth and phosphatase biosynthesis in phosphate limited saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	effect of carbon composition of the fermented medium on the synthesis of volatile acids by the yeast saccharomyces carlsbergensis 776	The effect of the carbon composition of the fermented medium on volatile acid synthesis by saccharomyces carlsbergensis 776.
5	in situ study of the glycolytic pathway in saccharomyces cerevisiae	In situ study of the glycolytic pathway of sucroseomyces cerevisiae.
5	biosynthesis and regulation of fructose 1 6 bisphosphatase and phosphofructokinase in saccharomyces cerevisiae grown in the presence of glucose and gluconeogenic carbon sources	Biosynthesis and regulation of fructose 16 bisphosphatase and phosphofructokinase in sucrose cerevisiae grown on glucose and gluconeogenic carbon sources.
5	regulation of saccharomyces cerevisiae nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent glutamate dehydrogenase by proteolysis during carbon starvation	The phosphate-dependent regulation of glutamate dehydrogenase by saccharomyces cerevisiae nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by proteolysis during carbon starvation.
5	regulation of alpha amylase biosynthesis in pichia burtonii b	Regulation of biosynthesis of alpha-amylase in pichia burtonii b.
5	effect of anaerobiosis and glucose on the content of haem and its precursors in intact yeast cells	Effect of the drug; anaerobiosis and glucose on the contents of the drug; hematocrit and its precursors in intact yeast cells.
5	characterization of two salmonella newport bacteriophages	Characterization of two bacteriophages salmonella newport.
6	metabolic and ultrastructural changes induced in adipose tissue by insulin	Metabolic and ultrastructural changes in the adipose tissue induced by insulin.
6	the fourth international standard for insulin	The fourth international standard for lacidosis; insulin.
6	insulin induced accumulation of d xylose against an apparent concentration gradient in diaphragm muscle in vivo	Insulin induced accumulation of xylose against an apparent diaphragm concentration gradient in vivo.
6	effects of insulin on the permeability of d and l xylose and d and l arabinose in rat diaphragm muscle	Effects of apos; insulin on the permeability of d and xylose and of d and arabinose in rat diaphragm muscle.
6	the effect of insulin alloxan diabetes and anoxia on the ultrastructure of the rat heart	The effect of alloxan insulin diabetes and anoxia on the ultrastructure of the heart.
6	hepatic glucokinase a direct effect of insulin	Hepatic glucokinase is a direct effect of insulin.
6	effect of hormones on the turnover of polysaccharides in connective tissues	Effect of hormones on polysaccharide turnover in connective tissue.
6	observations on the etiology and therapy of brittle diabetes	Observations on the Etiology and Treatment of Diabetes Mellitus.
6	isolation of an insulin secretion granule fraction	Isolate a granular fraction of secretion of insulin.
6	insulin action in alloxan diabetes modified by actinomycin d	Lapos; action of apos; insulin in alloxan diabetes mellitus; actinomycin d.
6	insulin induced glomerulosclerosis in the rabbit	Insulin induced glomerulosclerosis in rabbits.
6	the requirement for hydrocortisone in antibody forming tissue cultivated in serum free medium	The need for apos; hydrocortisone in tissues forming antibodies grown in a serum-free medium.
6	removal of interfering nucleotides from brain extracts containing substance p effect of drugs on brain concentrations of substance p	Removing interfering nucleotides from brain extracts containing the substance p affects the levels of p-substance in the brain.
6	studies on gastrin	Gastrin studies.
6	lobuloalveolar differentiation in mouse mammary tissues in vitro	The lobulo differentiation-alveolar in mouse mammary tissue in vitro.
6	iodoinsulin used to determine specific activity of iodine 131	Iodoinsulin used to determine the pH; specific activity of iodine; iodine 131.
6	jet injection of insulin vs the syringe and needle method	Injection of drugs; injection of insulin by jet vs. syringe and needle.
6	insulin inducer of pyruvate kinase	Insulin inducer of pyruvate kinase.
6	association of acute local reactions to insulin with an insulin binding gamma i m antibody	Association of acute local reactions to apos; Insulin with gamma antibody; Insulin.
6	acromegaly the effects of various steroid hormones on the insulin induced growth hormone response	The effects of various steroid hormones on the response of the apos-induced growth hormone, insulin.
6	stimulation by insulin of the formation of ribonucleic acid and protein by mammary tissues in vitro	Apos stimulation; insulin of protein and ribonucleic acid formation by the breast tissue in vitro.
6	the effects of secretin pancreozymin and gastrin on insulin and glucagon secretion in anesthetized dogs	The effects of pancreozymin and gastrin on secretion of insulin and glucagon in anesthetized dogs.
6	human placental lactogen studies of its acute metabolic effects and disposition in normal man	Studies of human placental lactogen for its acute metabolic effects and disposition in normal humans.
6	a receptor mechanism for the inhibition of insulin release by epinephrine in man	A receptor mechanism for seizures; inhibition of insulin release from seizures; epinephrine in seizures; man.
6	a comparison of the effects of tolazamide and tolbutamide upon blood glucose and serum insulin and lipid levels in diabetic subjects	Comparison of the effects of tolazamide and tolbutamide on glucose, insulin and serum lipid levels in diabetes.
6	hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland sequence of action of hormones in relation to cell cycle	Hormone-dependent differentiation of the sequence d' action of mammary versus cell cycle hormones.
6	growth hormone deficiency in man an isolated recessively inherited defect	Apos deficiency; growth hormone in men, an isolated, recessively inherited growth hormone abnormality.
6	assessment of hypothalamic pituitary function in endocrine disease	Evaluation of the hypothalamic pituitary function in endocrine diseases.
6	glycogen synthetase activity in liver regulation by the autonomic nerves	L' glycogen synthetase activity in the hepatic regulation by autonomic nerves.
6	the renal handling of insulin	Renal manipulation of insulin.
6	insulin biosynthesis evidence for a precursor	In addition, there is evidence of the biosynthesis of insulin for a precursor.
6	studies on insulin biosynthesis subcellular distribution of leucine h3 radioactivity during incubation of goosefish islet tissue	Studies on the subcellular distribution of leucine h3 radioactivity in apos biosynthesis; insulin during apos; and incubation of islet tissue in geese and geese.
6	the significance of basal insulin levels in the evaluation of the insulin response to glucose in diabetic and nondiabetic subjects	Follow-up; importance of baseline insulin levels in apo; assessment of apo response; glucose insulin in diabetic and nondiabetic subjects.
6	a possible role for the adenylcyclase system in insulin secretion	The adenylate cyclase system may play a role in insulin secretion.
6	role of insulin in endogenous hypertriglyceridemia	The role of insulin in the immune system; endogenous hypertriglyceridemia.
6	proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci 3 substrate specificity of streptococcus lactis intracellular proteinase	Milky Streptococcal Proteinase Enzymatic System 3 substrate specificity of intracellular Streptococcus lactis proteinase.
6	concentrations of free glucogenic amino acids in livers of rats subjected to various metabolic stresses	Concentrations of free glucogenic amino acids in the liver of rats under various metabolic stresses.
6	use of helical wheels to represent the structures of proteins and to identify segments with helical potential	Use of helical wheels to represent protein structures and identify segments with helical potential.
6	plasma growth hormone concentration in corticosteroid treated children	"""Statistics Canada, Catalogue No. 82-003, Catalogue No. 82-003"" (Catalogue No. 75-001@ XPF) 2."
6	immunological and biological properties of iodoinsulin labeled with one or less atoms of iodine per molecule	Immunological and biological properties of iodines; iodines labelled with one or less atoms; iodine per molecule.
6	the carbohydrate components of hydrolysates of gastric secretion and extracts from mucous glands of the gastric body mucosa and antrum	The glucidic components of the hydrolysates of the gastric secretion and extracts of the mucous glands of the mucosa of the gastric body and of the intestine.
6	isolation and a partial amino acid sequence of insulin from the islet tissue of cod gadus callarias	Isolation and partial sequence of proteins; amino acids of the enzymes; insulin from the tissue of gadus callarias of cod.
6	degradation of insulin in vitro by liver and epididymal adipose tissue from obese hyperglycaemic mice	The degradation of l' insulin in vitro by the liver and epididymal adipose tissue of obese hyperglycemic mice.
6	the sedimentation of rat skeletal muscle ribosomes effect of hydrocortisone insulin and diet	Sedimentation effect of rat skeletal muscle ribosomes; insulin hydrocortisone and diet.
6	the effect of vagal stimulation on plasma insulin and glucose levels in the baboon	The effect of vagal stimulation on the baby's insulin and glucose levels in the baby's blood.
6	proteins in denaturing solvents gel exclusion studies	Proteins in denaturing solvents studies d' exclusion of studies gel.
6	the relationship between endogenous serum insulin concentration and glucose uptake in the forearm muscles of nondiabetics	The relationship between concentrations of endogenous serum insulin and glucose consumption in apo muscles; before @-@non-diabetic arms.
6	adrenergic receptor control mechanism for growth hormone secretion	Adrenergic receptor control mechanisms for the secretion of the growth hormone.
6	hormonal dependence of dna synthesis in mammary carcinoma cells in vitro	A study of the role of DNA synthesis in mammary carcinoma cells in vivo.
6	the origin of acetylcholine released from guinea pig intestine and longitudinal muscle strips	L' origin of apos; acetylcholine released from apos; guinea pig intestine and longitudinal guinea pig muscle strips.
6	rat mammary gland differentiation in vitro in the absence of steroids	The differentiation of rat mammary glands in vitro into the absence of steroids.
6	elevated serum human growth hormone and decreased serum insulin in prediabetic males after intravenous tolbutamide and glucose	Human serum growth hormone and serum insulin decrease in pre-diabetic men following intravenous administration of tolbutamide and glucose.
6	sterol like compound from sensory ganglia effect of a nerve growth factor and insulin on its biosynthesis	Sterol as a component of the sensory ganglia as an effect of d&apos, nerve growth factor and insulin on its biosynthesis.
6	effect of insulin and tolbutamide on growth rate blood glucose and body composition of lambs	The effect of insulin and tolbutamide on the growth rate, blood sugar levels and body composition of lambs.
6	serum growth hormone levels and the response of diabetic retinopathy to pituitary ablation	Serum levels of apos; growth hormone and response of diabetic retinopathy to apos; ablation of the apos; pituitary.
6	high 24 hour level of serum growth hormone in juvenile diabetics	High rates of diabetes; serum growth hormone for 24 hours in young diabetics.
6	antagonism of reserpine induced emesis in pigeons a screening method for antidepressant activity	L' antagonism of the apos; reserpine-induced emesis in pigeons is a method of detection of the apos; antidepressant activity.
6	effect of actinomycin d on virus induced ribonucleic acid polymerase formation in foot and mouth disease virus infected baby hamster kidney cells	Effect of apo; actinomycin d on virus-induced protein formation; viral ribonucleic acid polymerase in the kidney cells of baby hamsters infected with FMD.
6	mitotic division in pancreatic beta cells	It's called a mitotic division in the pancreatic beta cells.
6	mechanism of estrogenic action in acromegaly	Mechanisms of onset; estrogenic action in apos; acromegaly.
6	insulin delivery rate into plasma in normal and diabetic subjects	Dosage rates; plasma insulin administration in normal and diabetic subjects.
6	growth hormone secretion during sleep	The secretion of the growth hormone during sleep.
6	prevention of radiation induced creatinuria by insulin	Creatinuria prevention induced by ionizing radiation; insulin.
6	resistance changes in lipid bilayers immunological applications	Changes in resistance in the immunological applications of lipid bilayers.
6	insulin biosynthesis in the rat demonstration of two proinsulins	Insulin biosynthesis in the demonstration of two proinsulines in rats.
6	insulin and glucose studies after one year of treatment with a sequential type oral contraceptive	Study of insulin and glucose levels after one year of treatment with a sequential oral contraceptive.
6	altered permeability of the peritoneal membrane after using hypertonic peritoneal dialysis fluid	Alteration of peritoneal membrane permeability post os; use of hypertonic peritoneal dialysis fluid.
6	insulin secretion in cardiogenic shock	The secretion of insulin in cardiogenic shock.
6	characterization of response of circulating glucagon to intraduodenal and intravenous administration of amino acids	Characterization of the response of circulating glucagon to apos; intraduodenal and intravenous administration of apos; amino acids.
6	leucyl beta naphthylamide splitting enzymes in the mammalian endocrine pancreas	"""Leucyl beta naphthylamide splitting enzymes in the endocrine pancreas mammalian,"" Arch."
6	hypoglycemic activity of endotoxin ii mechanism of the phenomenon in bcg infected mice	Mechanisms of apo; hypoglycemic apo activity; endotoxin ii in bcg virus infected mice.
6	glucagon test for insulinoma a chemical study in 25 cases	Glucagon testing for apos; Insulin is a chemical study in 25 cases.
6	oral glucose tolerance and related factors in a normal population sample i blood sugar plasma insulin glyceride and cholesterol measurements and the effects of age and sex	Oral glucose tolerance and related factors in a normal population sample: plasma glycerin levels and cholesterol measurements and effects of age and sex.
6	fibrinolytic response to moderate exercise in young male diabetics and non diabetics	"""Fibbrinolytic response to moderate exercise in young male diabetics and not-diabetics,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
6	circadian variation of glucose insulin and free fatty acids during long term use of oral hypoglycaemic agents in diabetes mellitus	Circadian variation of glucose, insulin and free fatty acids during apo; long-term use of apo; oral hypoglycemic agents in diabetes mellitus.
6	liver and kidney metabolism during prolonged starvation	Liver and kidney metabolism during prolonged food deprivation.
6	lactose synthetase progesterone inhibition of the induction of alpha lactalbumin	L' inhibition by lactose synthetase progesterone of apos; induction of apos; alpha lactalbumin.
6	hypothalamic pituitary function in depressive illness insensitivity to hylycaemia	Hylycemic hypophyseal hypothalamic in depressive disease insensitive to apos.
6	plasma insulin during remission in juvenile diabetes mellitus	L' plasma insulin during remission in juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	metabolism of parathyroid hormone degradation of 125i labelled hormone by a kidney enzyme	Metabolism of apo degradation; parathyroid hormone; 125i-labelled hormone with a renal enzyme.
6	a specific anti proinsulin serum and the presence of proinsulin in calf serum	Specific antiproinsulin serum and the presence of proinsulin in the calf serum.
6	potentiation of insulin action in normal subjects by a pituitary polypeptide	The potentiation of l' action of l' insulin in normal subjects by a pituitary polypeptide.
6	seasonal incidence of diabetes mellitus	Seasonal incidence of diabetes mellitus.
6	physicochemical characteristics of insulin secretion granules	Physical-chemical characteristics of the secretion granules of d' insulin.
6	isolation and properties of secretory granules from rat islets of langerhans i isolation of a secretory granule fraction	Isolation and properties of secretory granules of langerhans islets i, isolation d' fraction of secretory granules.
6	effects of polypeptide and protein hormones on lipid monolayers i effect of insulin and parathyroid hormone on monomolecular films of monooctadecyl phosphate and stearic acid	Effects of Protein and Polypeptide Hormones on Lipid Monolayers Insulin and Lipos; Parathyroid hormone on monomolecular films of monooctadecyl phosphate and dapos; stearic acid.
6	modification of hormonal responses to arginine by alpha adrenergic blockade	Modification of hormonal responses to arginine by alpha-adrenergic blockade.
6	effect of endotoxin and cortisone on synthesis of ribonucleic acid and protein in livers of mice	Effect of endotoxin and cortisone on the synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and proteins in mouse liver.
6	biosynthesis of an insulin precursor by islet tissue of cod gadus callarias	Biosynthesis d' a precursor of l' insulin by the tissue of the gadus callarias of cod.
6	the sequence of amino acids in insulin isolated from islet tissue of the cod gadus callarias	The sequence of amino acids in isolated insulin from cod gadus callarias islet tissue.
6	effect of pertussis vaccination on the sensitivity of mice to insulin bicarbonate and co2	The effect of pertussis vaccination on susceptibility of mice to bicarbonate insulin and co-infectant.
6	the effect of dietary and hormonal conditions on the activities of glycolytic enzymes in rat epididymal adipose tissue	The effect of dietary and hormonal conditions on body weight; activity of glycolytic enzymes in the epididymal adipose tissue of the rat.
6	quantal secretion from adrenal medulla all or none release of storage vesicle content	Adrenal medullary quantum secretion releases, in whole or in part, the contents of storage vesicles.
6	blood glucose and insulin relationships in the human mother and fetus before onset of labour	Relationships between blood glucose and glucose; insulin in the mother and fetus prior to labour.
6	insulin sensitivity and vascular disease in maturity onset diabetics	"""Insulin sensitivity and vascular disease in maturity onset diabetics,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
6	some ultrastructural effects of insulin hydrocortisone and prolactin on mammary gland explants	Ultrastructural effects of hydrocortisone insulin and prolactin on mammary gland explants.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by infusion of free fatty acids	Stimulation of the secretion of insulin by infusion of free fatty acids.
6	phosphorylation of liver histone following the administration of glucagon and insulin	Hepatic histone phosphorylation following glucagon and dapos administration; insulin.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy vi plasma fuels insulin liver composition gluconeogenesis and nitrogen metabolism during late gestation in the fed and fasted rat	Carbohydrate metabolism during pregnancy is responsible for the liver composition of apo; insulin gluconeogenesis and metabolism of apo; nitrogen in late gestation in fed rats and fasted rats.
6	response to insulin of the intact stomach in patients with duodenal ulcer	Response to oral insulin; intact stomach in patients with duodenal ulcers.
6	template activity of liver chromatin increased by in vivo administration of insulin	Hepatic chromatin matrix activity increased with apos; in vivo administration of apos; insulin.
6	insulin and corticoid response to intravenous fructose in relation to glucose tolerance	Intravenous fructose corticoid and insulin reactions in relation to glucose tolerance.
6	diabetogenic action of streptozotocin relationship of dose to metabolic response	Diabetogenic action of the-response dose relationship between streptozotocin and metabolic response.
6	serum growth hormone levels and size of pituitary tumour in untreated acromegaly	Serum rates of apo; growth hormone and pituitary tumour size in untreated acromegaly.
6	proteins and insulin release a dual role of amino acids and intestinal hormones	Proteins and insulin release a dual role of amino acids and the intestinal hormones.
6	biosynthesis of insulin in bovine fetal pancreatic slices the incorporation of tritiated leucine into a single chain proinsulin a double chain intermediate and insulin in subcellular fractions	The biosynthesis of the apos; insulin in bovine fetal pancreatic slices leads to apos; incorporation of tritiated leucine into a single chain, proinsulin, a double-chain intermediate, and lapos; insulin into subcellular fractions.
6	effectiveness of hypoglycemic agents in guinea pigs exposed to mixed gamma neutron radiations	Effectiveness of hypoglycemic agents in guinea pigs exposed to mixed neutron gamma radiation.
6	maximal acid response of pavlov pouches to food and histamine	Maximum acid reaction of the pavlov pouches to food and to l' histamine.
6	regulation of liver tyrosine aminotransferase by endogenous factors in the mouse	Hepatic tyrosine aminotransferase regulation by endogenous factors in mice.
6	the role of the antrum and the vagus nerve in the formation of gastric mucosal histamine	The role of beetle and vagus nerve in the formation of gastric mucous histamine.
6	cortisol and growth hormone secretion in relation to linear growth patients with still s disease on different therapeutic regimens	The secretion of cortisol and d*apos; growth hormone in linear growth patients with apo; a life-threatening, multi-drug-induced disease.
6	penetration of pseudomonas aeruginosa by sodium chloride and its relation to the mechanism of optical effects	Penetration of pseudomonas aeruginosa by sodium chloride and its relationship to the optical effects mechanism.
6	kinetics of amino acid transport across bone marrow cell membranes	The kinetics of amino acid transport across cellular bone marrow membranes.
6	clinical and endocrine side effects of methylprednisolone acetate as used in hay fever	Clinical and endocrine side effects of the drug; methylprednisolone acetate used for hay fever.
6	adrenal function in hypothyroidism	Adrenal function in apos; hypothyroidism.
6	increased release of gut glucagon in reactive hypoglycaemia	Increased release of intestinal glucagon into the apos; reactive hypoglycemia.
6	impaired glucose tolerance a late effect of insulin shock treatment	L*apos; impaired glucose tolerance is a delayed effect of shock-induced insulin treatment.
6	rate of disappearance of endogenous insulin from the circulation after removal of insulinomas	Rate of disappearance of apo; endogenous insulin from bloodstream; insulin-free.
6	pathophysiology of post gastrectomy hypoglycaemia	Pathophysiology of apos; hypoglycemia-gastroctomy.
6	hormones and obesity changes in insulin and growth hormone secretion following surgically induced weight loss	Hormones and obesity, changes in the secretion of insulin and dolipos; growth hormone following surgery; loss of surgical weight.
6	the hormonal regulation of enzymes in penatal and postnatal rat liver effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	The hormonal regulation of enzymes in the effects of l' adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate on the liver of both postnatal and penatal rats.
6	plasma insulin in pancreatic disease	L&apos®; plasma insulin in pancreatic diseases.
6	interrelationships of blood sugar and ketones in insulin treated diabetics	An association between glycemia and ketones in insulin-treated diabetics.
6	abnormal serum growth hormone response to exercise in juvenile diabetics	An abnormal response of apo; serum growth hormone to apo; exercise in young diabetics.
6	factors affecting the response to insulin in the normal subhuman pregnant primate	Factors influencing the response to l' insulin in primate under-normal human gestational.
6	early recognition of heterozygotes for the gene for dystrophia myotonica	Early recognition of heterozygotes for myotonic dystrophy gene.
6	increase in activity of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in mouse mammary tissue cultured in insulin	Increased glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in mammary tissue of mice cultured in the mouse; insulin.
6	regulation of glycolysis and l glycerol 3 phosphate concentration in rat epididymal adipose tissue in vitro role of phosphofructokinase	In vitro phosphofructokinase plays a role in the regulation of glycolysis and glycerol 3 phosphate concentration in rat epididymal adipose tissue.
6	prolactin evidence that it is separate from growth hormone in human blood	Prolactin proves that it is separated from the growth hormone in human blood.
6	pheniformin in insulin dependent diabetics	The effects of pheniformin on insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	the control by insulin of amino acid accumulation in muscle	Apos control; insulin of the apos; amino acid accumulation in the muscle.
6	a novel action of insulin on phosphoprotein formation by mammary gland explants	A new action of l' insulin on phosphoprotein formation by explants of mammary glands.
6	insulin secretion in heart failure	The secretion of insulin in heart failure.
6	effect of histalog insulin and reserpine on gastric emptying and secretion in man	Histalogical insulin and reserpine effect on gastric emptying and secretion in men.
6	hormonal induction and regulation of lactose synthetase in mouse mammary gland	Hormonal induction and regulation of mouse mammary gland lactose synthetase.
6	cell communication calcium ion and cyclic adenosine monophosphate	Calcium ion cell communication and monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine.
6	protein hydrocarbon interactions interactions of various proteins with pure decane	Protein hydrocarbons of various proteins with the pure decane.
6	glucagon levels and metabolic effects in fasting man	Glucagon and metabolic effects in fasting individuals.
6	significance of early and late positive responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in patients with intact vagi	The importance of early and late positive responses to insulin hypoglycemia in patients with intact blood vessels.
6	insulin response to carbohydrate ingestion after gastric surgery with special reference to hypoglycaemia	Apos response; insulin to apos; carbohydrate ingestion after gastric surgery, especially apos; hypoglycemia.
6	diabetes mellitus and sexual ateliotic dwarfism a comparative study	Diabetes mellitus and sexual ateliotic dwarfism, a comparative study.
6	relation of gastric secretory response in man to dose of insulin	The relationship between gastric secretory response in men and the dose of insulin.
6	ketonaemia in uncontrolled diabetes mellitus	Ketonaemia in no-control diabetes mellitus.
6	the influence of an oral contraceptive on glucose f f a triglyceride and insulin levels after glucose loading	L' influence of oral contraceptive on glucose levels; triglyceride and d' insulin after a glucose load.
6	glucose and insulin secretory response patterns following diet and tolazamide therapy in diabetes	Glucose response models; insulin following dosing; diet and dosage; tolazamide treatment for diabetes.
6	development of vascular lesions in insulin treated animals fed a normal diet	The development of vascular lesions in the animals treated with lapos; insulin was fed a normal diet.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by medium chain triglycerides in patients with cirrhosis	Stimulation of apos secretion; insulin by medium chain triglycerides in patients with cirrhosis.
6	hypothalamic pituitary adrenal function in patients treated with long term depot tetracosactrin	Hypothalamic adrenal function in patients treated with long-term deposition of tetracosactrin.
6	an effect of insulin on adipose tissue adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterase	An effect of insulin on apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate cyclic phosphodiesterase of adipose tissue.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin response in atherosclerosis	Glucose tolerance and response to apos; insulin in apos; atherosclerosis.
6	growth hormone investigation in patients with mental dysfunction	L'apos; study of the growth hormone effect in patients with mental disorders.
6	dose response relationships of insulin hypoglycaemia and gastric acid in man	Dose ratio-effect of apos; hypoglycemia at apos; insulin and lacid; gastric acid in apos; male.
6	the selective nerve stain leucomethylene blue as an intraoperative aid to achieving complete vagotomy	The selective nerve stains the leucomethylene blue as an intraoperative aid to complete a complete vagotomy.
6	amino acid transport in hepatoma cell cultures during tyrosine aminotransferase induction	Final acid transport in hepatoma cell cultures during induction tyrosine aminotransferase.
6	posttranscriptional control of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis by insulin	The post-transcriptional control of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis by insulin.
6	development of insulin sensitivity by mouse mammary gland in vitro	The development of sensitivity to l*apos; insulin by the mouse mammary gland in vitro.
6	intraperitoneal insulin for control of blood sugar in diabetic patients during peritoneal dialysis	Intraperitoneal insulin for glycemic control in diabetic patients during peritoneal dialysis.
6	control of basal insulin secretion with special reference to the diagnosis of insulinomas	Control of basal insulin secretion with particular attention to insulin diagnosis.
6	autonomic control of insulin secretion and the treatment of heart failure	Self-control of insulin secretion and treatment of heart failure.
6	diabetes after removal of insulin tumours of pancreas a long term follow up survey of 11 patients	Diabetes after apo; liver tumour removal; pancreatic insulin, a long-term follow-up survey of 11 patients.
6	the effects of caerulein on insulin secretion in anaesthetized dogs	Effects of caerulein on insulin secretion in anesthetized dogs.
6	diabetes and growth of tumour transplants	Diabetes and tumour transplant growth.
6	recurrent ulceration after vagotomy and drainage with electrical stimulation test 1957 69	Recurrent ulceration after vagotomy and electrical stimulation drainage 1957 69 test.
6	direct measurement of proinsulin in human plasma by the use of an insulin degrading enzyme	Direct measurement of proinsulin in human plasma at baseline; aid; a degradative enzyme; insulin.
6	the effect of experimental insulin deficiency on glucagon secretion	The effects of an experimental insulin deficiency on glucagon secretion.
6	a rapid and direct method for the quantitative determination of tryptophan in the intact protein	Rapid and direct method of quantitative determination of tryptophan in intact protein.
6	changes in carbohydrate metabolism during the administration of progestational hormones	Changes in carbohydrate metabolism during progestin administration.
6	glucose tolerance and serum insulin in identical twins of diabetics	Glucose tolerance and serum insulin in identical twin diabetics.
6	effect of adrenergic blocking or stimulating agents on plasma growth hormone immunoreactive insulin and blood free fatty acid levels in man	Effect of inhibitors or adrenergic stimulants on insulin levels; immune-reactive and immunoreactive insulin; free fatty acids; plasma growth hormone in men.
6	relative effects of pregnancy estradiol and progesterone on plasma insulin and pancreatic islet insulin secretion	Relative effects of estradiol and progesterone on apos secretion; plasma insulin and apos; apos insulin; pancreatic islets.
6	effect of insulin and acute diabetes on plasma ffa and ketone bodies in the fasting rat	Effect of insulin and acute diabetes on plasma faeces and keto bodies of fasted rats.
6	starvation in human pregnancy hypoglycemia hypoinsulinemia and hyperketonemia	Inanition in hypoinsulinemia and hyperketonemia.
6	proinsulin crystallization and preliminary x ray diffraction studies	Proinsulin crystallization and preliminary X-ray diffraction studies.
6	genetic control of the immune response of guinea pigs to limiting doses of bovine serum albumin relationship to the poly l lysine gene	Genetic control of the immune response of guinea pigs to dose limits on bovine serum albumin related to the polylysine gene.
6	evidence for an effect of inulin on the peripheral utilization of ketone bodies in dogs	Evidence of an effect of apos; inulin on apos; peripheral use of keto bodies in dogs.
6	use of diazoxide in hypertension with renal failure	Lapses; use of diazoxide in the liver; hypertension with renal insufficiency.
6	the effect of administration of human growth hormone on the plasma growth hormone cortisol glucose and free fatty acid response to insulin evidence for growth hormone autoregulation in man	The effects of insulin; the administration of apo; human growth hormone on glucose; plasma growth hormone and free fatty acid response to apo; insulin is evidence of apo; self-regulation of apo; growth hormone in apo; man.
6	growth inhibition of tumour implants by associated surface active agents	Growth inhibition of tumour implants by active surface-active agents.
6	effect of lipids on growth hormone secretion in humans	Effect of lipids on lipids secretion; growth hormone in humans.
6	the development of the dorsal and ventral mammalian pancreas in vivo and in vitro	The development of the pancreas of ventral and dorsal mammals in vivo and in vitro.
6	clinical and metabolic study in diabetic patients treated with glibenclamide	Clinical and metabolic studies in diabetic patients treated with Glibenclamide.
6	selective proximal vagotomy with and without pyloroplasty	Selective proximal vagotomy with and without pyloroplasty.
6	proinsulin like component of circulating insulin in the basal state and in patients and hamsters with islet cell tumors	Proinsulin as a component of the apo; circulating insulin at baseline and in patients and hamsters with islet cell tumours.
6	metabolic studies in the african pygmy	Metabolic studies in African pygmies.
6	some quantitative aspects of the labelling of proteins with 125 i by the iodine monochloride method	Some quantitative aspects of protein labeling with 125 i by the d' iodine monochloride method.
6	fitting discrete probability distributions to evolutionary events	Adjust discrete probability distributions to the evolutionary events.
6	changes in the postoperative insulin test in relation to recurrent duodenal ulceration	Changes in apos; postoperative insulin test vs. apos; recurrent ulceration of duodenal.
6	influence of contraceptives on the carbohydrate metabolism in female diabetics	L' the influence of contraceptives on carbohydrate metabolism in female diabetics.
6	the rate limiting step of protein synthesis in vivo and in vitro and the distribution of growing peptides between the puromycin labile and puromycin non labile sites on polyribosomes	L&apos is a limiting step in in vivo and in vitro protein synthesis and the distribution of growing peptides between the puromycin and non-puromycin labile sites on the polyribosomes.
6	study on dioxan separation in the radioimmunoassay of human growth hormone human chorionic gonadotrophin adrenocorticotrophic hormone and insulin	Study of the separation of dioxanes in the radioimmunoassay of the human chorionic human chorionic growth hormone, lacid, adrenocorticotropic hormone and lacid; insulin.
6	insulin induced hypoglycaemia in migraine	Insulin induced hypoglycemia in the migraine.
6	brain serotonin content increase following ingestion of carbohydrate diet	Serotonin content of the brain increases after taking a carbohydrate diet.
6	medroxyprogesterone acetate and carbohydrate metabolism measurement of glucose insulin and growth hormone during 6 months time	Medroxyprogesterone acetate and carbohydrate metabolism of glucose and lacid; growth hormone for 6 months.
6	diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance blood sugar and plasma insulin levels morning afternoon and evening	Diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance and insulin levels in plasma in the morning after-noon and in the evening.
6	methamphetamine induced insulin release	Methamphetamine induced the release of insulin.
6	the gastric secretory response to insulin an all or none phenomenon	It's called insulin, and the gastric secretory response to insulin is an all-or-nothing phenomenon.
6	isolation of the insulin receptor of liver and fat cell membranes detergent solubilized 125 i insulin polyethylene glycol precipitation sephadex	Lapses; liver insulin and fat membrane detergent receptor isolation solubilized 125 i d' polyethylene insulin glycol precipitation sephadex.
6	myocardial infarction and carbohydrate metabolism relating to diabetes mellitus	Myocardial infarction and carbohydrate metabolism linked to diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin infusion test of gastric acid secretion	Dapos infusion test; secretory insulin; gastric acid.
6	insulin sepharose and the dynamics of insulin action	It's called insulin-sepharose and the dynamics of insulin-stimulating enzymes.
6	hypoalaninemia a concomitant of ketotic hypoglycemia	Hypoalanemia concomitant with ketotic hypoglycemia.
6	studies on the secretion of newly synthesized proinsulin and insulin from isolated rat islets of langerhans	Proinsulin and apo secretion studies; newly synthesized insulin from isolated rat langerhans.
6	obesity evidence of decreased secretion of glucagon	Obesity shows a decrease in glucagon secretion.
6	genetic forms of pituitary dwarfism	Genetic forms of pituitary dwarfism.
6	gastrin studies in gastric ulcer	Gastrinic studies on the gastric ulcer.
6	studies of prolactin secretion in human pregnancy	Studies of prolactin secretion during human pregnancy.
6	action of insulin and growth hormone on protein synthesis in muscle from non hypophysectomized rabbits	L' action of insulin and apos; growth hormone on protein synthesis in unhypophysectomized rabbit muscle.
6	the effect of acetoacetate on plasma insulin concentration	Lapos; effect of apos; acetoacetate on plasma concentration of apos; insulin.
6	abnormal insulin response in patients with small vessel disease	An abnormal insulin-like reaction in patients with apo; a small vessel disease.
6	insulin response to glucose in patients with peripheral vascular disease arteritis and raynaud s phenomenon	Insulin response to glucose in patients with apos; vascular peripheral arteritis and apos; gap phenomenon.
6	kinetic analysis of insulin action on amino acid uptake by isolated chick embryo heart cells	Kinetic analysis of apos; action of insulin on the uptake of apos; amino acids by isolated heart cells; chick embryos.
6	left ventricular performance after acute myocardial infarction	Left ventricular performance after acute infarction of myocardium.
6	effect of posture on glucose tolerance after gastric surgery	Effect of posture on glucose tolerance after gastric surgery.
6	further studies on streptozotocin therapy for a multiple hormone producing islet cell carcinoma	D' other studies of streptozotocin d&apos treatment; multi-hormone islet carcinoma of the pancreas.
6	studies on the hormone sensitive lipase of adipose tissue	Hormone-sensitive lipase studies in adipose tissue.
6	endocrine response to substitution of corticotrophin for oral prednisolone in asthmatic children	The effect of corticotropic drugs on prednisolone levels in asthmatic children.
6	cyclic changes in insulin needs of an unstable diabetic	Cyclical changes in the requirement for insulin d' an unstable diabetic.
6	hormone calcium interactions with the plasma membrane of rat liver cells	Interactions of etapos; calcium hormone with plasma membrane of rat liver cells.
6	the effect of calcium and other salts upon the release of glucagon like immunoreactivity from the gut	Causation; effect of calcium and other salts on glucagon release such as glucos; immunoreactivity of the intestine.
6	the metabolism of proinsulin and insulin by the liver	Proinsulin and lacid metabolism; insulin metabolism by the liver.
6	isoelectric focusing of proteins in the native and denatured states anomalous behaviour of plasma albumin	Isoelectric focusing of proteins in native and denatured states exhibits abnormal plasma albumin behavior.
6	the effect of insulin on free amino acid pools and protein synthesis in rat skeletal muscle in vitro	The effects of apos; insulin on free amino acid pools and protein synthesis in rat skeletal muscle in vitro.
6	relationship between organization of mammary tumors and the ability of tumor cells to replicate mammary tumor virus and to recognize growth inhibitory contact signals in vitro	Relationship between the organization of breast tumours and the ability of tumour cells to replicate the tumour virus and recognize inhibitory contact signals of growth in vitro.
6	diabetic amyotrophy a follow up study	Diabetic Amyotrophy, follow-up study.
6	the relation of growth hormone to altered carbohydrate metabolism in women taking oral contraceptives	Relationship between glucose; growth hormone and glucose; impaired carbohydrate metabolism in women using oral contraceptives.
6	radioimmunoassay of human fibrinopeptide a	Radioimmunoassay of human fibrinopeptide a.
6	a bovine pancreatic enzyme catalyzing the conversion of proinsulin to insulin	A bovine pancreatic enzyme that catalyzes the conversion of proinsulin to insulin.
6	studies of the development of diabetic ketosis in the rat	Developmental studies of diabetic ketosis in the rat.
6	resistance to symptomatic insulin reactions after fasting	Resistance to symptomatic insulin reactions following fasting.
6	insulin release by emiocytosis demonstration with freeze etching technique	Release of insulin by emiocytosis is demonstrated by the freeze-etch technique.
6	lipoprotein lipase activity in the adipose tissue of rats adapted to controlled feeding schedules	L' lipoprotein lipase activity in fat tissue of s&apos rats; adapted to a controlled diet.
6	staphylococcal protease a proteolytic enzyme specific for glutamoyl bonds	Staphylococcal protease is a glutamoyl specific proteolytic enzyme.
6	control of the synthesis of fatty acid synthetase in rat liver by insulin glucagon and adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Control of l&apos synthesis; fatty acid synthetase in rat liver by insulin glucagon and l' cyclic adenosine 3,5 monophosphate.
6	secretion and endocytosis in insulin stimulated rat adrenal medulla cells	The secretion and endocytosis in the insulin stimulate the adrenal medulla cells of the rat.
6	an enteroglucagon tumour	Entero-lucagonary tumor.
6	changes in plasma insulin related to the type of dietary carbohydrate in overweight hyperlipidemic male patients	Changes in glucose; plasma insulin related to overweight hyperlipidemic men's type of dietary carbohydrate.
6	non ketotic hyperosmolar coma with insulin resistance in a 12 year old girl	Non-ketotic hyperosmolar coma with resistance to apos; insulin in 12-year-old female.
6	the effect of experimental diabetes mellitus and insulin replacement on hepatic ultrastructure and protein synthesis	L' effect of experimental diabetes mellitus and insulin replacement on apos; hepatic ultrastructure; and protein synthesis.
6	plasma gastrin and acid secretion in man following stimulation by food meat extract and insulin	Plasma gastrin and apo acid secretion in men following apo stimulation; meat extract and insulin.
6	serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer ii effect of insulin hypoglycaemia	Serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer; apos effect; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	the influence of the individual surgeon and of the type of vagotomy upon the insulin test after vagotomy	Lapos; influence of surgeon and type of vagotomy on post vagotomy insulin test.
6	effects of hypo and hyper thyroidism on liver composition blood glucose ketone bodies and insulin in the male rat	Effects of hypo and apo; hyperthyroidism on liver composition, glucose, keto bodies, and apo; insulin in male rat.
6	oligopeptidases of brush border membranes of rat small intestinal mucosal cells	Brush border membrane oligopeptidases of rat small bowel mucosal cells.
6	tolbutamide therapeutic trials and clinical practice	Tolbutamide®: therapeutic trials and clinical practice.
6	the immediate effects of insulin and fructose on the metabolism of the perfused liver changes in lipoprotein secretion fatty acid oxidation and esterification lipogenesis and carbohydrate metabolism	Immediate effects of insulin and fructose on the metabolism of hepatic changes perfused in the liver; oxidation and esterification of fatty acids secreted by lipoproteins and carbohydrate metabolism.
6	exocrine secretory responses of the pancreas to insulin and to a meat meal in dogs	Exocrine secretory reactions of the pancreas to insulin and a dog meat meal.
6	comparison of corticotrophin and corticosteroid response to lysine vasopressin insulin and pyrogen in man	Comparison of the response of corticotropin and corticosteroids to lysine vasopressin insulin and pyrogen in men.
6	effect of oral hypoglycaemic agents on glucose tolerance in pancreatic diabetes	Effect of oral hypoglycemic agents on glucose tolerance in pancreatic diabetes.
6	acute reversal of experimental diabetic ketoacidosis in the rat with decanoylcarnitine	Acute reversal of apos; experimental diabetic ketoacidosis in rats with decanoylcarnitine.
6	the reaction of protein amino groups with methyl 5 iodopyridine 2 carboximidate a possible general method of preparing isomorphous heavy atom derivatives of proteins	The reaction of the amino groups of proteins with l' methyl iodopyridine 5 2 carboximizes a possible general method for the preparation of isomorphic derivatives of d' heavy atoms of proteins.
6	sequential degradation of insulin by rat liver homogenates	Sequential deterioration of the apos; insulin by rat liver homogenates.
6	is prolactin mitogenic for mammary epithelium	Prolactin is mitogenic to the mammary epithelium.
6	insulinopenic diabetes in africa	Insulin-positive diabetes in Africa.
6	evaluation of 1 fluoro 2 nitro 4 trimethylammoniobenzene iodide a protein solubilizing reagent	Evaluation of l' iodide of 1 fluoro 2 nitro 4 trimethylammoniobenzene, a protein-solubilizing reagent.
6	the mode of action of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in mammalian islets of langerhans effects of insulin secretagogues on islet cell protein kinase activity	The mode of action of apos; cyclic adenosine 35 monophosphate in islets of mammalian langerhans effects of secretagogues of apos; insulin on apos; protein kinase activity of islet cells.
6	studies on the enzymology of purified preparations of brush border from rabbit kidney	Immunoassay studies; enzymology of purified rabbit kidney brush border preparations.
6	the effect of estrogens on carbohydrate metabolism glucose insulin and growth hormone studies on one hundred and seventy one women ingesting premarin mestranol and ethinyl estradiol for six months	The effects of estrogens on carbohydrate metabolism, glucose, insulin and insulin studies; growth hormone in one hundred and seventy-one women who ingested mestranol and apos; pre-arin ethinylestradiol for six months.
6	glucagon initiated human growth hormone release a comparative study	Glucagon has initiated release of the human growth hormone (HGH), a comparative study.
6	the role of the sympathetic nervous system in hypoglycaemia stimulated gastric secretion	The role of the sympathetic nervous system in the apos; hypoglycemia stimulated gastric secretion.
6	the contribution of embryo extract to myogenesis of avian striated muscle in vitro	The contribution of DNA extracts; embryo to striated muscle myogenesis; birds in vitro.
6	affinity chromatography and purification of the insulin receptor of liver cell membranes	Apos chromatography; liver receptor affinity and purification; insulin from liver cell membranes.
6	distribution of free and antibody bound peptide hormones in two phase aqueous polymer systems	Distribution of free and antibody-bound peptide hormones in two-phase aqueous polymer systems.
6	effect of vagotomy on ascorbic acid nutrition in patients with peptic ulcer	Effect of vagotomy on nutrition; ascorbic acid in patients with diabetes; gastroduodenal ulcer.
6	insulin and the regulation of adipose tissue acetyl coenzyme a carboxylase	Insulin and apos regulation; acetyl coenzyme of adipose tissue a carboxylase.
6	effect of insulin upon the cellular character of rat adipose tissue	Effect of insulin on cellular character of rat adipose tissue.
6	normalization effect of preceding protein meals on diabetic oral glucose tolerance in eskimos	The normal effect of previous protein meals on oral glucose tolerance in diabetic eskimos.
6	glucagon stimulating activity of 20 amino acids in dogs	An activity that stimulates the glucagon of 20 amino acids in dogs.
6	effect of insulin on the growth pattern and adenylate cyclase activity of bhk fibroblasts	Effect of drug; insulin on growth pattern and enzymes; drug activity; adenylate cyclase of bhk fibroblasts.
6	the effects of varying the extent of the vagotomy on the myoelectrical and motor activity of the stomach	Effects of vagotomy variation; extent of vagotomy on the intestines; myoelectrical and motor activity of the intestine.
6	an evaluation of the hollander test by graded vagotomy in the dog	Evaluation of the Hollander vagotomy test in dogs.
6	competitive binding of somatomedin to the insulin receptors of adipocytes chondrocytes and liver membranes	Somatomedin binds competitively to adipocyte, chondrocyte and liver membrane insulin receptors.
6	failure of glucagon release in infants of diabetic mothers	Insufficient release of glucagon in infants of diabetic mothers.
6	the prevalence of diabetes in a rural population of jamaican adults	The prevalence of diabetes mellitus in a rural population of Jamaican adults.
6	prediction of the amount of secondary structure in a globular protein from its aminoacid composition	Prediction of the amount of secondary structure in a globular protein from its amino acid composition.
6	the ontogenesis of human fetal hormones i growth hormone and insulin	Human fetal hormone ontogenesis, human growth hormone ontogenesis, and human insulin.
6	oral glucose tolerance and hormonal response in heroin dependent males	Oral glucose tolerance and hormonal response in male heroin addicts.
6	side effects of various drugs acting on the eye	Eye-related side effects of various drugs.
6	placental lactogen levels in diabetic pregnancy	Rate of lactogen in diabetic pregnancies.
6	nyctohemeral growth hormone levels in children with growth retardation and inflammatory bowel disease	Levels of apo; nycto-hemeral growth hormone in children with apo; growth retardation and apo; inflammatory bowel disease.
6	evolution of diabetes mellitus in a case of friedreich s ataxia	Diabetes mellitus in a case of friedreichic ataxia.
6	metabolism of proinsulin insulin and c peptide in the rat	Metabolism of both proinsulin and c-peptide in the rat.
6	diabetic clinics today and tomorrow mini clinics in general practice	Diabetic Clinics today and tomorrow mini-clinics in general practice.
6	interactions of insulin corticosterone and prolactin in promoting milk fat synthesis by mammary explants from pregnant rabbits	Insulin corticosterone and prolactin interactions in promoting milk fat synthesis by mammary explants in pregnant rabbits.
6	parenchymal cells from adult rat liver in nonproliferating monolayer culture i functional studies	Parenchymal cells from adult rat liver in single-layer, non-proliferating cell cultures i functional studies.
6	the influence of long term oral contraception on blood sugar and serum insulin author s transl	Lapos; influence of long-term oral contraception on blood glucose and transcribed serum insulin therapy.
6	the role of the sympathetic innervation in the control of plasma glucagon concentration in the calf	The role of l' sympathetic innervation in the control of plasma glucagon levels in calves.
6	gastrin in portal and peripheral venous blood after feeding in man	Gastrin in portal blood and peripheral venous after feeding in the men.
6	virus induced diabetes mellitus i hyperglycemia and hypoinsulinemia in mice infected with encephalomyocarditis virus	The virus induced diabetes mellitus hyperglycemia and hypoinsulinemia in encephalomyocarditis infected mice.
6	change in glucose and insulin after six months treatment with the oral contraceptive demulen	Glycemic and insulin changes after six months of treatment with the Demulen oral contraceptive.
6	pancreatic beta cell replication induced by glucocorticoids in subhuman primates	Glucocorticoid-induced pancreatic beta cell replication in primates-humans.
6	influence of glucocorticoids on glucagon secretion and plasma amino acid concentrations in man	The influence of glucocorticoids on glucagon secretion and glucocorticoid plasma amino acid concentrations in humans.
6	affinity binding of intact fat cells and their ghosts to immobilized insulin	The affinity of intact fat cells and their phantoms binds to the immobilized insulin.
6	effect of glucagon on net splanchnic cyclic amp production in normal and diabetic men	The effect of glucagon on the net production of splanchnic cyclic light bulbs in normal and diabetic men.
6	regulation of human lipolysis in vivo observations on the role of adrenergic receptors	Human lipolysis regulation, in vivo observations on the role of adrenergic receptors.
6	the rapid changes of hepatic glycolytic enzymes and fructose 1 6 diphosphatase activities after intravenous glucagon in humans	The rapid changes in the activities of hepatic glycolytic enzymes and fructose 1-6 diphosphatase after the apos; intravenous injection of glucagon in the apos; human.
6	effects of weight reduction on obesity studies of lipid and carbohydrate metabolism in normal and hyperlipoproteinemic subjects	Effects of weight reduction on lipid and carbohydrate metabolism studies; obesity in normal and hyperlipoproteinemic subjects.
6	the different effects on the serum lipids and fecal steroids of high carbohydrate diets given orally or intravenously	Effects on serum lipids and fecal steroids of high-carbohydrate diets administered orally or intravenously.
6	metabolic effects of exogenous glucocorticoids in fasted man	Metabolic effects of exogenous glucocorticoids in fasting man.
6	rapid intravenous sodium acetoacetate infusion in man metabolic and kinetic responses	Rapid intravenous infusion of d*apos; sodium acetoacetate in metabolic and kinetic responses of men.
6	effect of estrogen gestagen drug combinations on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism i effect of ovosiston	Effect of combinations of estrogen, oestrogen, and gestagen on carbohydrate and fat metabolism.
6	effect of insulin on pyruvate metabolism in epididymal adipose tissue of the rat correlation of intracellular pyruvate contents and pyruvate dehydrogenase activity	Effect of apos; insulin on pyruvate metabolism in epididymal adipose tissue of the correlation between the intracellular pyruvate content and l' pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in the rat.
6	binding of parathyroid hormone to bovine kidney cortex plasma membranes	Attachment of the apos; parathyroid hormone to bovine renal cortical plasma membranes.
6	the binding of cationic detergent to insulin zinc insulin and iso insulin	Zinc insulin and iso insulin binding of the cationic detergent.
6	effects of epinephrine adrenocorticotrophic hormone and theophylline on adenosine 3 5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase activity in fat cells	Effects of apos; epinephrine adrenocorticotropic hormone and theophylline on apos; apos activity; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase in fat cells.
6	diurnal variation on oral glucose tolerance insulin and growth hormone changes with special reference to women taking oral contraceptives	Diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance L' insulin and l' growth hormone change, especially in women who use oral contraceptives.
6	gel filtration studies on immunoreactive gastrin in serum from zollinger ellison patients	Immunoreactive gastrin gel filtration studies in serum of patients with zollinger Ellison.
6	regulation of hepatic glycogen synthesis during fetal development roles of hydrocortisone insulin and insulin receptors	Regulation of hepatic glycogen synthesis during the fetal developmental roles of l&apos receptors; insulin and hydrocortisone.
6	early differentiation of glucagon producing cells in embryonic pancreas a possible developmental role for glucagon	Early differentiation of glucagon-producing cells in the embryonic pancreas could play a role in glucagon development.
6	role of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in the early transport changes induced by serum and insulin in quiescent fibroblasts	Role of l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in early serum- and l&apos-induced transport changes; insulin in quiescent fibroblast.
6	stimulation by insulin of rna synthesis in chick fibroblasts	Immunostimulation; insulin for rna synthesis in chicken fibroblasts.
6	glucodynamic hormones modify the recovery period after lateral hypothalamic lesions	Glucodynamic hormones altered the recovery period from lateral hypothalamic lesions.
6	lack of glucagon response to hypoglycemia in diabetes evidence for an intrinsic pancreatic alpha cell defect	In addition, there is evidence of a lack of responsiveness of glucagon to apos, hypoglycemia in diabetics, and an intrinsic defect in pancreatic alpha cells.
6	fuels hormones and liver metabolism at term and during the early postnatal period in the rat	Feeds hormones and liver metabolism at term and early postpartum in rats.
6	characteristics of membrane bound and free hepatic ribosomes from insulin deficient rats i acute experimental diabetes mellitus	Characteristics of free-living and membrane-bound hepatic ribosomes of insulin-deficient rats i diabetic acutely experimental diabetes mellitus.
6	effect of fenfluramine on human growth hormone release	Effect of fenfluramine on potato release; human growth hormone.
6	adrenergic modulation of pancreatic glucagon secretion in man	An adrenergic modulation of the secretion of pancreatic glucagon in men.
6	diabetes in mice after coxsackie b 4 virus infection	Diabetes in mice after infection with coxsackie b4 virus.
6	stimulation by insulin of cell elongation and microtubule assembly in embryonic chick lens epithelia	Apos stimulation; apos insulin; cell elongation and elongation; microtubule assembly in the apos; embryonic epithelium of the chicken lens.
6	adrenal corticosteroids enhance production of type c virus induced by 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine from cultured mouse fibroblasts	The adrenal corticosteroids stimulated deoxyuridine-induced c-type virus production by 5 iodo 2 from cultured murine fibroblasts.
6	cell culture of mammalian endometrium and synthesis of blastokinin in vitro	Cell culture of l' mammalian endometrium and blastokinin synthesis in vitro.
6	steroid aerosols in asthma an assessment of betamethasone valerate and a 12 month study of patients on maintenance treatment	Steroid aerosols in asthma, betamethasone valerate evaluation and 12-month study in patients receiving apo treatment; maintenance.
6	diabetes mellitus associated with epidemic of infectious hepatitis in nigeria	Sugar diabetes associated with an epidemic of hepatitis; infectious hepatitis in Nigeria.
6	remission of diabetes mellitus during pregnancy	Reduce diabetes mellitus during pregnancy.
6	accelerated triglyceride secretion a metabolic consequence of obesity	Accelerated triglyceride secretion is a metabolic consequence of obesity.
6	endocrine studies in anencephaly	Endocrine studies to anencephaly.
6	effect of proximal gastric vagotomy on gastric acid secretion and plasma gastrin	Effect of proximal gastric vagotomy on gastric acid and plasma gastrin secretion.
6	the gastric secretory response to a continuous insulin infusion in the dog	The gastric secretory response to continuous insulin infusion in dogs.
6	awareness and experience of general practitioners of selected drug interactions	Knowledge and experience of general practitioners in some drug interactions.
6	pituitary extracts and steroid hormones in the control of 3t3 cell growth	Pituitary extracts and steroid hormones control the growth of 3t3 cells.
6	pyrazinoate excretion in the chimpanzee relation to urate disposition and the actions of uricosuric drugs	L' pyrazinoate excretion in relation to chimpanzee and dosage; uricosuric drug action.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by long chain free fatty acids a direct pancreatic effect	Stimulation of d&apos secretion; insulin by free long-chain fatty acids, a direct pancreatic effect.
6	comparison of effects of long term corticotrophin and corticosteroid treatment on responses of plasma growth hormone acth and corticosteroid to hypoglycaemia	Comparison of the effects of apo; long-term corticotropin and corticosteroid treatment on the responses of apo, acth plasma growth hormone and corticosteroids to apo; hypoglycemia.
6	diabetic ketoacidosis presenting as neurosurgical emergencies	Diabetic ketoacidosis with neurosurgical emergencies.
6	control of pineal indole biosynthesis by changes in sympathetic tone caused by factors other than environmental lighting	The control of pineal indole biosynthesis by changes in sympathetic tone, caused by other than pineal indole; ambient lighting.
6	control of the initiation of dna synthesis in 3t3 cells serum factors	Control of apo; initiation of synthesis of apo; DNA in serum factors of 3t3 cells.
6	effects of high dose medroxyprogesterone treatment given for endometrial carcinoma on carbohydrate metabolism and liver function	The effects of high-dose Medroxyprogesterone treatment with tap carcinoma endometrium on carbohydrate metabolism and liver function.
6	growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in primary monolayer culture vi studies with conditioned medium and its functional interactions with serum factors	Mastery of growth of fetal rat hepatocytes differentiated in primary culture studies in monolayer vi with conditioned medium and its functional interactions with serum factors.
6	growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in primary monolayer culture vii hormonal control of dna synthesis and its possible significance to the problem of liver regeneration	Growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in the mono-layer vii primary culture regulates hormone synthesis of l' DNA and its possible importance in the liver regeneration problem.
6	carbohydrate and lipid studies during six months treatment with megestrol acetate measurements of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and triglycerides	Carbohydrate and lipid studies during six months of drug therapy; megestrol acetate for measurement of apo; apo growth hormone; insulin and blood glucose triglycerides.
6	substrate turnover during prolonged exercise in man splanchnic and leg metabolism of glucose free fatty acids and amino acids	Substrate turnover during dapos; prolonged exercise in splanchnic metabolism and legs of lapos; man of free fatty acids and amino acids of glucose.
6	spontaneous and amino acid stimulated glucagon secretion in the immediate postnatal period relation to glucose and insulin	Amino and spontaneous acids stimulated glucagon secretion in the immediate postnatal period relative to glucose and the insulin.
6	the effects of glucagon and insulin on adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentrations in an organ culture of mature rat liver	Effects of glucagon and insulin on concentrations of cyclic adenosine 3 and 5 monophosphate in a culture of mature rat liver organs.
6	spermidine in hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland in vitro	Spermidine in hormone-dependent differentiation of the mammary gland in vitro.
6	prolactin receptors in estrogen receptor deficient mammary carcinoma	Prolactin receptors in estrogen receptor deficiency mammary carcinoma.
6	the effect of adrenergic blockade on the glucagon responses to starvation and hypoglycemia in man	Lapos; effect; adrenergic blockade on glucagon responses to fasting and sedation; hypoglycemia in the apos; man.
6	regulation of glucose synthesis in hormone sensitive isolated rat hepatocytes	Regulation of glucose synthesis in isolated hormone-sensitive rat hepatocytes.
6	effect of estrogen gestagen combinations on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism iv effect of estrone cyanate combination preparations	Effect of combination d' gestagenic estrogen(s) on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism iv effect of combination d' estrone(s)-cyanate on lipid metabolism iv.
6	studies on the depletion and accumulation of microvilli and changes in the tubulovesicular compartment of mouse parietal cells in relation to gastric acid secretion	Depletion and apo studies; microvillus accumulation and changes in the tubulovesicular compartment of mouse parietal cells in relation to d' gastric acid secretion.
6	gastric acid secretion and risk of recurrence of duodenal ulcer within six to eight years after truncal vagotomy and drainage	The risk of recurrence of the duodenal ulcer within six to eight years after vagotomy and drainage.
6	the molecular weight and properties of a neutral metallo endopeptidase from rabbit kidney brush border	The molecular weight and properties of a neutral metallopeptidase from apos; rabbit kidney brush border.
6	combined test for assessment of anterior pituitary function	Combined test for l' evaluation of the previous pituitary function.
6	concomitant effects of insulin on surface membrane conformation and polysome profiles of serum starved balb c 3t3 fibroblasts	Concomitant effects of apos; insulin on surface membrane conformation and polysomic patterns of serum-deprived Balb c3t3 fibroblasts.
6	somatostatin hypothalamic inhibitor of the endocrine pancreas	Hypothalamic inhibitor of endocrine pancreatic somatostatin.
6	correlation between serum gastrin concentration and rat stomach histidine decarboxylase activity	Correlation between serum gastrin concentration and gastrin levels; apos activity; histidine decarboxylase; rat stomach.
6	the purification and specificity of a neutral endopeptidase from rabbit kidney brush border	Purification and specificity of a neutral endopeptidase from apos; a rabbit kidney brush border.
6	vagal control of glucagon release in man	Vagal control of glucagon release in men.
6	long term effects of the estrogen gestagen combination preparation ovosiston on glucose level in the insulin tolerance test	Long-term effects of the combined gestagenic estrogen preparation oosiston on the glucose level in the tolerance test to l' insulin.
6	immunoreactive gastrin components in human serum	Immunoreactive components of gastrin in human serum.
6	the effect of vagotomy and drainage on the small bowel flora	Effect of vagotomy and drainage on flora of the small intestine.
6	progressive deterioration of glucose tolerance in the aged	Progressive deterioration of glucose tolerance in elderly individuals.
6	plasma adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate response to glucagon in thyroid disease	Adenosine 3-5 plasma cyclic monophosphate response to glucagon in the thyroid.
6	transplantation of islets of langerhans in diabetic rhesus monkeys	Transplantation of islets of langerhans into diabetic rhesus monkeys.
6	digestive and endocrine functions after partial duodeno pancreatectomy	Digestive and endocrine functions following partial duodeno pancreatectomy.
6	the purity of commercial insulin preparations	The purity of the commercial insulin preparations.
6	unsuccessful treatment of acromegaly with medroxyprogesterone acetate	Unsuccessful treatment of the apos; acromegaly with the apos; medroxyprogesterone acetate.
6	electrophoretic patterns of serum albumins collected from hereditary obese and diabetic mice	The electrophoretic profiles of serum albumins collected from both obese and hereditary diabetic mice.
6	failure of injected growth hormone to increase plasma glucose and insulin concentration in the puppy	Insufficient dosage; growth hormone injected to increase plasma glucose and glucose; insulin in pup.
6	sulfonylurea induced factitious hypoglycemia in a nondiabetic nurse	The sulfonylurea caused dummy hypoglycemia in a nondiabetic nurse.
6	effect of splanchnic nerve stimulation on glucagon and insulin output in the dog	Dapos effect splanchnic nerve stimulation on glucagon and insulin production in dogs.
6	plasma adrenaline and serum gastrin studies in insulin induced hypoglycemia and after adrenaline infusions	Studies of plasma epinephrine and serum gastrin in insulin induced hypoglycemia and adrenaline infusions.
6	lack of dietary regulation of jejunal glycolytic enzymes and disaccharidases in obesity the role of insulin	No regulation of jejunal glycolytic enzymes and disaccharidases in the diet; obesity the role of l' insulin.
6	pathomorphologic biochemical and diagnostic aspects of gastrinomas zollinger ellison syndrome	Determinants of gastrinomas zollinger ellison syndrome.
6	membrane receptors as general markers for plasma membrane isolation procedures the use of 125 i labeled wheat germ agglutinin insulin and cholera toxin	Membrane receptors as general markers for apo processes; plasma membrane insulation; apo use; wheat germ agglutinin labelled 125 i and cholera toxin.
6	effects of alloxan diabetes anti insulin serum diabetes and non diabetic dehydration on brain carbohydrate and energy metabolism in young mice	Anti-insulin diabetes alloxan diabetes and non-diabetic dehydration on brain carbohydrate and energy metabolism in young mice.
6	growth control in primary fetal rat liver cells in culture	Growth control in primary liver cells of the fetal rat in culture.
6	glycerol intolerance in a child with intermittent hypoglycemia	Glycerol intolerance in a child with apos; intermittent hypoglycemia.
6	stimulation of division of sparse and confluent 3t3 cell populations by a fibroblast growth factor dexamethasone and insulin	Stimulation of the division of confluent, low-numbers 3t3 cell populations by fibroblast growth factor, dexamethasone and insulin.
6	effect of a fibroblast growth factor insulin dexamethasone and serum on the morphology of balb c 3t3 cells	Effect of a fibroblast growth factor, dexamethasone insulin and serum, on the morphology of 3rd-ct3 balb cells.
6	hyperplasia of rat mammary gland in vitro	Rat mammary gland hyperplasia in vitro.
6	mode of insulin action	Mode of action; action of insulin.
6	factors influencing the prognosis of vascular disease in insulin deficient diabetes of long duration a seven year follow up	Factors influencing the prognosis of vascular disease in long-term, insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	effect of lipids on glucagon secretion in man	The effects of lipids on glucagon secretion in humans.
6	parathyroid hormone receptors of renal cortex specific binding of biologically active 125i labeled hormone and relationship to adenylate cyclase activation	Lapos receptors; parathyroid hormone specific binding to the renal cortex of lapos; biologically active 125i-labeled hormone and its association with lapos; lapos activation; adenylate cyclase.
6	macroglossia transient neonatal diabetes mellitus and intrauterine growth failure a new distinct entity	Macroglossia transient novel-ne Diabetes mellitus and l' growth failure intra-uterine a new distinct entity.
6	initial effect of injury on ketone bodies and other blood metabolites	The initial effect of the lesion on the body's ketones and other blood metabolites.
6	effects on plasma and brain tryptophan in the rat of drugs and hormones that influence the concentration of unesterified fatty acid in the plasma	Effects on plasma and cerebral tryptophan in the rat of drugs and drugs; hormones that influence plasma concentration; nonesterified fatty acids.
6	the effect of parietal cell and truncal vagotomy on gastric and duodenal contractile activity of the unanesthetized dog	L' effect of parietal cells and trunal vagotomy on the apos; gastric and duodenal contractile activity of unanesthetized dog.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin response during and after elective skeletal surgery	Glucose tolerance and response to insulin during and after elective bone surgery.
6	insulin responses to oral carbohydrate in true prediabetics and matched controls	Responses of insulin to oral carbohydrate in true pre-diabetics and matched controls.
6	carbohydrate tolerance and insulin responses in obstructive jaundice	Carbohydrate tolerance and response to acid; insulin in obstructive jaundice.
6	the role of the autonomic innervation in the control of glucagon release during hypoglycaemia in the calf	The role of l' autonomous innervation in the control of glucagon release during apos; hypoglycemia in the calf.
6	effects of medroxyprogesterone acetate on carbohydrate metabolism	Effects of Apos; Medroxyprogesterone acetate on carbohydrate metabolism.
6	effects of oral alanine feeding on blood glucose plasma glucagon and insulin concentrations in small for gestational age infants	Effects of oral alanine feeding on the plasma glucose glucagon and insulin concentrations in small gestational age infants.
6	aspects of glycolipid metabolism during chronic renal insufficiency effects of dialytic treatments of short duration 3 4 hours on alternate days	The effects of apo; chronic renal failure on glycolipid metabolism as a result of short-term, alternating dialysis for 3-4 hours a day.
6	growth hormone responses to hypoglycemia in postmenopausal depressed women	The responses of the growth hormone to hypoglycemia in postmenopausal women depress women.
6	glucagon role in the hyperglycemia of diabetes mellitus	Role of glucagon in diabetes mellitus hyperglycemia.
6	beta cell culture on synthetic capillaries an artificial endocrine pancreas	Beta cell culture on synthetic capillaries, endocrine-induced pancreas.
6	insulin induced augmentation of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity	An increase in lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity was induced by insulin.
6	prolactin receptors in rat liver possible induction by prolactin	Prolactin receptors in rat liver may be induced by prolactin.
6	the pituitary acth gh lh fsh tsh and prolactin reserves in patients with cushing s syndrome	L'acuitaire d'acuitaire gh lh fsh tsh et prolactin reserves dans les patients ayant une syndrome de cushing.
6	induction of drinking by insulin in the rat	Induction of Consumption of Insulin in Rat.
6	the effect of hydrocortisone phosphate methylprednisolone and phenytoin on pancreatic insulin release and hepatic glutathione insulin transhydrogenase activity in the rat	The effects of epos; hydrocortisone phosphate methylprednisolone and phenytoin on the release of apos; pancreatic insulin and on apos; hepatic glutathione insulin transhydrogenase activity in the rat.
6	plasma and cerebrosponal fluid amino acid levels in diabetic ketoacidosis before and after corrective therapy	Levels of apo; amino acids of plasma and cerebrospinal fluid in apo; diabetic ketoacidosis before and after corrective treatment.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man i effects in normal subjects	Modification of the metabolism of fatty acids by glucagon in humans; effects in normal subjects.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man ii effects in insulin deficient diabetics	Modification of the metabolism of fatty acids by glucagon in men; ii effects in diabetic patients with insulin deficiency.
6	bromocriptine treatment of acromegaly	Treatment of apos; acromegaly with bromocriptine.
6	digestion of insulin derivatives with subtilisin a kinetic study	Digestion of the derivatives of l' insulin with the subtilisin, kinetic study.
6	glucose tolerance in newborn infants of healthy mothers its relationship to the mothers insulin response to glucose infusion	Glucose tolerance in new-born to healthy mothers, its relation to the maternal insulin response to the glucose infusion.
6	dynamic evaluation of growth hormone gh and prolactin hprl secretion in active acromegaly with high and low gh output	A dynamic evaluation of the secretion of the growth hormone gh and prolactin hprl in acromegaly active with high and low gh.
6	blood glucose and plasma insulin and glucagon response during intravenous glucose tolerance test in newborn infants affected by erythroblastosis foetalis	Plasma insulin and glucagon response and glycosm during intravenous glucose tolerance testing in newborn e.g. epos; erythroblastosis fetalis.
6	preclinical abnormality of left ventricular function in diabetes mellitus	Preclinical anomaly of left ventricular function in diabetes mellitus.
6	renal tubular acidosis during therapy for diabetic ketoacidosis	Renal tubular acid during treatment of diabetes; diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	endocrine tumor of the pancreas composed of argyrophil and b cells a correlated light immunofluorescent and ultrastructural study	Endocrine tumour of the pancreas composed of argyrophils and b-cells, immunofluorescent study in the light and correlated ultrastructural study.
6	on the mechanism of hormone action in 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene induced mammary tumor i prolactin and progesterone effects on estrogen receptor in vitro	On the mechanism of l' hormonal action in 712 dimethylbenz a mammary tumor induced by l' anthracene i prolactin and progesterone effects on the estrogen receptor in vitro.
6	maternal fetal plasma glucose relationships in late monkey pregnancy	Fetal fetal plasma glucose relationships in late monkey pregnancy, JAMA, Vol.
6	the role of ca 2 and cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in insulin release induced in vitro by the divalent cation ionophore a23187	The role of monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 and d' ~2 in apos release; in vitro insulin induced by apos; cationic ionophore divalent a23187.
6	elongation of the interchain disulfide bridges of insulin a synthetic analog	L' elongation of the disulfide interchain bonds of l' insulin a synthetic analog.
6	the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gtp synthesis in rat kidney cortex the role of acid base balance and glucocorticoids	Regulation of the synthesis of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gtp in rat renal cortex, the role of l' glucocorticoid and acid base equilibrium.
6	anosmia and hypogonadism with ovarian mosaicism	Anosmia hypogonadism with ovarian mosaicism.
6	vitrectomy a new challenge for the anesthesiologist	The vitretomy is a new challenge for the anesthesiologist.
6	mitogenic effect of fibroblast growth factor on early passage cultures of human and murine fibroblasts	Mitogenic effect of fibroblast growth factor on first-pass cultures of human and murine fibroblasts.
6	chronic depression of serum concentrations of sialic acid in alloxan induced diabetic rats	Chronic decrease in serum levels of d*apos; sialic acid in alloxan-induced diabetic rats.
6	insulinoma with low circulating insulin levels the diagnostic value of proinsulin measurements	Insulinoma with low blood sugar levels; circulating insulin, a diagnostic value of proinsulin measurements.
6	experimental diabetic ketoacidosis sequential changes of metabolic intermediates in blood liver cerebrospinal fluid and brain after acute insulin deprivation in the streptozotocin diabetic rat	Experimental diabetic ketoacidosis sequential changes in the metabolic intermediates in cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord and blood-liver brain following acute insulin deficiency in the streptozotocin diabetic rat.
6	the insulin response to intravenous fructose in relation to blood glucose levels	The insulin response to intravenous fructose in relation to the levels of blood glucose.
6	altered tissue response to glucagon in obesity	Changes in tissue response to glucagon in obesity.
6	the effect of hypoglycemia on tsh release in man	Apos; effect of apos; hypoglycaemia on tsh release in apos; male.
6	the effect of alpha msh on plasma growth hormone cortisol and tsh in children	The effect of alpha msh on apos; plasma cortisol and tsh growth hormone in children.
6	relationships among the secretion of acth gh and cortisol during the insulin induced hypoglycemia test in the normal and obese child	The relationship between the secretion of apos; acth gh and cortisol during drug testing; hypoglycemia induced by apos; insulin in apos; normal and normal child; obese child.
6	comparison of cylic and linear forms of somatostatin in the inhibiton of growth hormone insulin and glucagon secretion	Comparison of cylic and linear forms of somatostatin in apos; inhibitor of secretion of apos; insulin and glucagon of apos; growth hormone.
6	abnormal pancreatic alpha cell function in first degree relatives of known diabetics	Anomalies in pancreatic alpha cell function in the first-degree parents of known diabetics.
6	plasma insulin and glucose levels in diabetic rats prior to and following islet transplantation	Plasma glucose and insulin levels in diabetic rats before and after islet transplantation.
6	dietary induced hypertrophic hyperplastic obesity in mice	Nutrition in mice; hypertrophic hyperplastic obesity.
6	hormonal regulation of lobulo alveolar growth functional differentiation and regression of whole mouse mammary gland in organ culture	Hormonal regulation of functional differentiation of alveolar growth and regression of the mammary gland of whole mice in organ culture.
6	effect of adrenalectomy and insulin insufficiency upon the adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate system of the rat mammary glands	Effect of adrenalectomy and dapos; insulin deficiency on the rat monophosphate cycling system; adenosine 3-5 rat mammary glands.
6	postprandial blood glucose and insulin in cows fed high grain	Postprandial glycemia and insulin in cows fed a high grain.
6	insulin goes metric a time for reveiw	L' insulin becomes metric at some point for awakening.
6	isoproterenol and epinephrine induced changes in blood glucose and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats the influence of alteration in endogenous insulin levels and state of nourishment	Lacidosis; isoproterenol and epinephrine; epinephrine induced changes in blood and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats; influence of apo; alteration of apo; endogenous insulin and nutritional status.
6	cyproheptadine induced depletion of insulin in the rat	Cyproheptadine induced insulin depletion in the rat.
6	comparative adenylate cyclase activities in homogenate and plasma membrane fractions of morris hepatoma 5123tc h	Comparison of the activities of l' adenylate cyclase in the homogenate and plasma membrane fractions of l' Morris hepatoma 5123c hc.
6	cell cycle associated changes in receptors for ige during growth and differentiation of a rat basophilic leukemia cell line	The cell cycle has been associated with changes in the receptors of the plant;ige during growth and differentiation of plants; a line of basophilic leukemic cells of the rat.
6	effect of insulin on the proliferation of cultured primate arterial smooth muscle cells	Effect of apos; insulin on proliferation of cultured primate arterial smooth muscle cells.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in dystrophia myotonica	Carbohydrate metabolism in dystrophia myotonica.
6	effects of exercise and of food restriction on the development of spontaneous obesity in rats	Effects of exercise and dietary restriction on the development of diabetes mellitus; spontaneous obesity in rats.
6	mucormycosis of the craniofacial structures	Mucormycosis of craniofacial structures.
6	a study of carbohydrate metabolism in postnecrotic cirrhosis liver	A study of the carbohydrate metabolism in postnecrotic cirrhosis liver.
6	basal and reactive proinsulin and insulin secretion in overweight women author s transl	Reactive basal proinsulin and insulin secretion in overweight women.
6	the effect of synthetic somatostatin in normal and acromegalic males	L' effect of synthetic somatostatin in normal males and in acromegalic males.
6	persistent pancreatic glucagon but not insulin response to arginine in pancreatectomized dogs	Pancreatic glucagon, but not insulin response to arginine, in the pancreatic dogs.
6	characterization of the plasma lipoproteins of the genetically obese hyperlipoproteinemic zucker fatty rat	Characterization of plasma lipoproteins in genetically obese hyperlipoproteinemic zucker fatty rat.
6	inhibition by somatostatin of glucagon and insulin release from the perfused rat pancreas in response to arginine isoproterenol and theophylline evidence for a preferential effect on glucagon secretion	Somatostatin inhibition of the release of glucagon and apos; infused rat pancreatic insulin in response to apos; isoproterenol isopropenol and theophylline arginine showed apos; presence of apos; a preferential effect on glucagon secretion.
6	stimulation of the uptake of alpha aminoisobutyric acid in rat thymocytes by l triiodothyronine a comparison with insulin and dibutyryl cyclic amp	Stimulation of l' absorption of l' alpha acid-aminoisobutyric acid in rat thymocytes by triiodothyronine as compared to l' insulin and l' cyclic ampoule dibutyryl.
6	radioimmunoassay of canine growth hormone enzymatic radioiodination	Radioimmunoassay of enzyme radioiodination of canine growth hormone.
6	diabetes mellitus distinguishing between patients receiving insulin and those requiring insulin therapy	Diabetes mellitus (DM) is a type of diabetes mellitus that differentiates between patients receiving insulin and those requiring insulin therapy.
6	production of chylomicron like lipoproteins from endogenous lipid by the intestine and liver of diabetic dogs	Production of chylomicron lipoproteins from endogenous lipids by intestines and liver of diabetic dogs.
6	studies of the rate of regression of the glomerular lesions in diabetic rats treated with pancreatic islet transplantation	Studies of the rate of regression of glomerular lesions in pancreatic islet transplants of diabetic rats.
6	long term primary culture of mouse mammary tumor cells production of virus	Long-term primary culture of mammary tumour cells from virus producing mice.
6	plasma lipids and glucose insulin relationship in non insulin requiring diabetics with and without retinopathy	Plasma lipids and glucose insulin relation in non-insulin requiring diabetics with and without retinopathy.
6	the relationship between the concentration of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and the anti lipolytic action of insulin in isolated rat fat cells	The relationship between concentration of apos; cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate and apos; anti-lipolytic action of apos; insulin in isolated rat fat cells.
6	the effect of oxytetracycline on insulin resistance in obese mice	Apos; effect of apos; oxytetracycline on apos; insulin resistance in obese mice.
6	insulin release from the perfused rat pancreas mode of action of tolbutamide	Key words: release of apo; insulin from perfused rat pancreas, dose–response mode; action of tolbutamide.
6	cell mediated immunity to insulin and its polypeptide chains in insulin treated diabectics	Cellular immunity to insulin and its polypeptide chains in insulin-treated diabetic patients.
6	associations between oral clefts and drugs taken during pregnancy	The combination of medications and oral cracks taken during pregnancy.
6	role of glucagon and other hormones in development of diabetic ketoacidosis	Role of glucagon and other hormones in diabetes mellitus development; diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	serial determinations of human placental lactogen in the management of diabetic pregnancy	Series of determinations of human placental lactogen for the treatment of diabetic pregnancies.
6	pituitary function after treatment of intracranial tumours in children	Post-treatment pituitary function of intracranial tumours in children.
6	glucagon secretion in primary endogenous hypertriglyceridemia before and after clofibrate treatment	Glucagon secretion into primary endogenous hypertriglyceridemia before and after clofibrate treatment.
6	effects of insulin tolbutamide and glucagon on activities of jejunal carbohydrate metabolizing enzymes in humans	Effects of l' insulin tolbutamide and glucagon on the activities of jejunal carbohydrate-metabolizing enzymes in humans.
6	the effect of alanine infusions on growth hormone insulin and glucose in protein calorie malnutrition	Lapos; effect of infusions of apos; alanine on apos; insulin and glucose of apos; growth hormone in protein malnutrition-caloric.
6	normal serum lipids in renal transplant patients	Kidney transplant patients normal lipid serum.
6	development of the obese hyperglycemic syndrome in mice with a growth hormone deficiency	Development of obese hyperglycemic syndrome in growth hormone deficient mice.
6	characterization of pancreatic islet monoamine oxidase	Pancreatic islet monoamine oxidase characterization.
6	hepatic steatosis and the elevated plasma insulin level in patients with endogenous hypertriglyceridemia	High levels of hepatic steatosis; plasma insulin in patients with apo; endogenous hypertriglyceridemia.
6	regional adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in young and middle aged women	Regional cellularity of adipose tissue in relation to metabolism in young and middle-aged women.
6	growth hormone responses following double pulse oral glucose administration in various clinical states	Responses of the growth hormone following apo; oral administration of double-pulse glucose in various clinical conditions.
6	chromatographic heterogeneity of insulin extracted from insulomas	Chromatographic heterogeneity of apos; insulin extracted from the insulomas.
6	effect of alanine and glycine on glucagon secretion in postabsorptive and fasting obese man	Effect of alanine and glycine on glucagon secretion in adults; obese man fasting and fasting-sorption.
6	effects of glucocorticoids on pituitary hormonal responses to hypoglycemia inhibition of prolactin release	Effects of glucocorticoids on the pituitary hormonal responses to apos; hypoglycemic inhibition of prolactin release.
6	development and validation of a radioimmunoassay for peptides related to beta melanocyte stimulating hormone in human plasma the lipotropins	Development and validation of a radioimmunoassay of peptides bound to beta-stimulated melanocyte stimulation hormone in human plasma, lipotropins.
6	plasma glucagon and alanine responses to acute insulin deficiency in man	Plasma alanine and glucagon responses to acute insulin deficiency in men.
6	long term infusion of growth hormone release inhibiting hormone in acromegaly effects on pituitary and pancreatic hormones	Long-term oral infusion of the apo-release hormone; growth hormone inhibits the effects of apos; acromegaly on pituitary and pancreatic hormones.
6	serum insulin and growth hormone response patterns in monozygotic twin siblings of patients with juvenile onset diabetes	Models of response to serum insulin and growth hormone therapy in monozygous twins of patients with juvenile diabetes.
6	an exploratory study of some behavioural consequences of insulin induced hypoglycaemia	An exploratory study of some of the behavioural consequences of low blood sugar; hypoglycemia induced by insulin.
6	simple glaucoma and diabetic disease	Single glaucoma and diabetic illness.
6	metabolic aspects of obesity	Metabolic aspects of obesity.
6	kinetics of hemodiafiltration i in vitro transport characteristics of a hollow fiber blood ultrafilter	Kinetics of the intestine; hemodiafiltration i characteristics of in vitro transport; a hollow fiber blood ultrafilter.
6	fetal brain growth selective action by growth hormone	Selective action of fetal brain growth by the growth hormone.
6	hyperosmolar nonketotic syndrome and steroid diabetes occurrence after renal transplantation	Nonketotic hyperosmolar syndrome and steroidal diabetes following renal transplantation.
6	comparison of injection techniques for soluble and protamine zinc insulins in diabetes mellitus	Comparison of zinc-soluble and protamine-soluble insulin injection techniques in diabetes mellitus.
6	the functional state of the hypothalamo hypophyseal system in tumors of the pituitary and diencephalic area	L' functional state of the hypophysial hypothalamo system in l' pituitary and dienephaly tumors.
6	incidence of diseases of the cardiovascular system in patients with diabetes during various types of therapy	Incidence of liver disease; cardiovascular system in diabetic patients during various types of therapy.
6	clinical and pathological studies in a growth hormone deficient dwarf	Clinical and pathological studies on a dwarf deficient in growth hormone.
6	insulin iontophoresis in cystic fibrosis	Insulin in cystic fibrosis.
6	septal rage mitigation by pre surgical treatment with p chlorophenylalamine	Reducing the incidence of septal rabies by preoperative treatment with p-chlorophenylalamine.
6	suppression of human growth hormone secretion by melatonin and cyproheptadine	Suppression of secretion of the human growth hormone melatonin and cyproheptadine.
6	hepatic autography in uncontrolled experimental diabetes and its relationships to insulin and glucagon	Hepatic autography in experimental uncontrolled diabetes and its relation to insulin and glucagon.
6	insulin effect on creatine transport in skelatal muscle 38464	The effect of insulin on creatine transport in skelatal muscle.
6	hormone and glucose responses to serial cardiac puncture in rats 38465	The hormonal and glycemic responses to serial cardiac puncture were observed in 38465 rats.
6	insulin secretion in malignant hyperpyrexia	The secretion of insulin in the body; malignant hyperpyrexia.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin secretion in patients with parathyroid disorders effect of serum calcium on insulin release	Glucose tolerance and apo secretion; insulin in patients with parathyroid disorders; effect of serum calcium on release of apos; insulin.
6	prevention of human diabetic ketoacidosis by somatostatin evidence for an essential role of glucagon	The prevention of human diabetic acid ketosis by somatostatin demonstrates the essential role of glucagon.
6	inhibition of l dopa induced growth hormone stimulation by pyridoxine and chlorpromazine	The inhibition of dopa l induced stimulation of the growth hormone by pyridoxine and chlorpromazine.
6	late complications of diabetes mellitus consequence of immunologic reactions	Late complications of diabetes mellitus as a result of immunological reactions.
6	in vivo interaction of the kunitz protease inhibitor and of insulin with subcellular structures from rat renal cortex	In vivo interaction of l' inhibitor of kunitz protease and l' insulin with the subcellular structures of the rat renal cortex.
6	aspects of glycolipid metabolism in chronic renal insufficiency effects of intravenous glucose loading	The role of glycolipid metabolism in chronic renal failure of intravenous glucose load.
6	effects of diuril and dilantin on blood glucose and insulin levels in late pregnancy	The effects of diuril and dilantin on blood glucose levels and the effects of insulin on late pregnancy.
6	oral glucose tolerance in patients with jaundice	Oral glucose tolerance in patients with severe jaundice.
6	pulmonary artery thrombosis during hormonal contraceptive therapy treatment with urokinase	Cervical cancer; pulmonary artery in the course of dosing; hormonal contraceptive treatment with urokinase.
6	inhibition of replication of normal adrenocortical cells in culture by adrenocorticotropin	L' inhibition of replication of normal cultured adrenal cells by adrenocorticotropin.
6	biochemical aspects of a study of 100 obese white subjects	Biochemical aspects of apos; study of 100 obese white subjects.
6	influence of antrectomy on gastrin release and gastric secretion in conscious monkeys	L' influence of l' antrectomy on gastrin release and gastric secretion in conscious monkeys.
6	insulin receptor role in the resistance of human obesity to insulin	Role of oral receptors; insulin in oral resistance; human obesity; insulin.
6	a followup report of a prospective evaluation of vagotomy pyloroplasty and vagotomy antrectomy for treatment of duodenal ulcer	Follow-up Report; prospective assessment of vagotomous and dapo pyloroplasty; vagotomous antrectomy for the treatment of apo; duodenal ulcer.
6	permanent neonatal diabetes mellitus a case report with plasma insulin studies	Permanently occurring neonatal diabetes mellitus: case reports with studies on insulin-induced diabetes mellitus.
6	a case of leprechaunism and an analysis of some clinical manifestations of this syndrome	This is a case of leprechaunism and an analysis of certain clinical manifestations of this syndrome.
6	lipo atrophy of the ankles and its relation to other lipo atrophies	Ankle lipo wasting and its relation to other lipo atrophies.
6	circadian rhythms of the endocrine pancreas a quantitative biochemical and immumocytochemical study	Circadian rhythms of the endocrine pancreas, quantitative endocrine biochemical and immumocytochemical studies.
6	absence of insulin resistance in 4 cases of mild juvenile diabetes a preliminary report	No resistance to the drug; insulin in 4 cases of mild juvenile diabetes.
6	congenital generalized lipodystrophy	Generalized congenital lymphodystrophy.
6	endocrinological aspects at follow up studies in neonatal hypoglycaemia	Endocrinological aspects at follow-up-up studies in neonatal hypoglycaemia.
6	neuropathology of the oesophagus in diabetes mellitus	Neuropathology of esophagus in diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin activity of the blood the action on it of various loads and the effect of blood serum on the effect of insulin relative to fatty tissue in chronic pancreatitis	Lapos; insulin activity; blood insinuations; action of various loads and lesions on it; effect of blood serum on plaque; effect of plaque; insulin vs. fat tissue in chronic pancreatitis.
6	effect of an energy reduced dietary regimen in relation to adipose tissue cellularity in obese women	Effect of reduced dietary intake; energy compared to cellularity of fat in obese women.
6	increased disaccharidase activity in human diabetics	Increased insulin levels; disaccharidase activity in human diabetics.
6	introductory remarks nutrient hormone enzyme interactions	Introductory remarks Enzymatic interactions of nutritive hormones.
6	exocrine pancreatic function in juvenile diabetics	Exocrine pancreatic function in juvenile diabetics.
6	use and abuse of gastric function tests by british and american gastric surgeons	Misuse of gastric function tests by both English and American gastric surgeons.
6	variability of serum gastrin levels in zollinger ellison syndrome studies with two antisera to gastrin	The variability of serum gastrin levels in studies of Zollinger Ellison syndrome with two gastrin antisera.
6	abo blood groups and serum gastrin	Blood types and abo serum gastrin.
6	hypothalamic stimulation induces acid secretion hypoglycemia and hyperinsulinemia	Hypothalamic stimulation induces acid secretion, hypoglycemia, and apos; hyperinsulinemia.
6	concentration of urine by the hibernating marmot	Concentration of abs; urine in hibernating groundhogs.
6	evolution of diabetic ketoacidosis in gross obesity	Lapses; progression of apo; diabetic ketoacidosis in adults; overall obesity.
6	disorders in the development of the crystalline lens in chick embryos following exposure to insulin	Disturbances in the development of lentils in chick embryos exposed to insulin.
6	failure of insulin hypoglycemia to produce rise in serum prolactin	Failure of apos; hypoglycemic insulin to produce a rise in serum prolactin.
6	rapid effects of insulin on uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants	Rapid effects of apos; insulin on metabolism of apos; uridine in mammary gland explants.
6	effect of vagotomy on electrical activity of the small intestine of the dog	Effect of vagotomy on body weight; electrical activity of the dog; small intestine.
6	immunoassay of serum polypeptide hormones by using 125i labelled anti immunoglobulin g antibodies	Immunoassay of serum polypeptide hormones at 125i; antibody antibody at 125i; antibody antibody antibody antibody antibody to 125i.
6	spontaneous changes in growth hormone and insulin levels in newborn infants	Spontaneous changes in birth weight; insulin and d*apos; growth hormone in newborns.
6	regulation of enzyme turnover during tissue differention studies on the effects of hormones on the turnover of fatty acid synthetase in rabbit mammary gland in organ culture	Regulation of tissue turnover; enzyme during tissue retention difference studies on the effects of hormones on tissue turnover; fatty acid synthetase in the rabbit mammary gland in cultured organs.
6	insulin precursors a historical synopsis first diabetes treatment trials using pancreas extracts	The Precursors of L' Insulin, a historical synopsis of early diabetes mellitus treatment trials using pancreatic extracts.
6	two cases of acute pandysautonomia	Two cases of acute-independence pandys.
6	plasma triglyceride clearing in obese children	Plasma triglyceride clearance in obese children.
6	effect of oral contraceptives and vitamin b6 deficiency on carbohydrate metabolism	Effect of oral contraceptives and vitamin b6 deficiency on the carbohydrate metabolism.
6	insulin therapy in patients with systemic insulin allergy	Insulin therapy in patients with a systemic allergy to insulin.
6	hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia associated with a neurofibrosarcoma	Hypoglycemic hyperinsulinemia associated with neurofibrosarcoma.
6	use of the lactose ethanol tolerance test in diabetes	Use of the liposis tolerance test; lactose ethanol in diabetes.
6	mechanisms of platelet aggregation inhibition caused by sulfonylurea compounds 4 discussion summary and literature	Mechanism(s); inhibition of plaque; platelet aggregation due to sulfonylurea compounds 4 Discussion summary and publication.
6	proinsulin and insulin secretion in obese females before and after administration of metformin	Proinsulin and dapos secretion; insulin in obese women before and after pregnancy; administration of metformin.
6	a controlled study of the hypoglycemic and insulinopoietic effect of glipizide and glibenclamide in non diabetic human subjects	A controlled study of the hypoglycemic and insulinopoietic effect of glipizide and glibenclamide on nondiabetic human subjects.
6	effect of the antrum and vagus nerve on the stimulation of the rat stomach by betazol in the perfusion test	Effect of vagus nerve and antrum on stimulation of the rat stomach by betazol in the infusion test.
6	effect of abnormal glucose tolerance in pregnancy on infant mortality rate and morbidity a prospective study	Effect of abnormal glucose tolerance during pregnancy on infant and child mortality and morbidity.
6	influence of pregnancy on the kinetics of insulin	L' influence of pregnancy on insulin kinetics.
6	differences in proliferative activity of rat and human prostate in culture	Differences in the proliferative activity of human and cultured rat prostate.
6	proteolytic degradation of insulin and glucagon	Proteolytic degradation of insulin and of glucagon.
6	insulin degradation xv use of different assay methods for the study of mechanism of action of glutathione insulin transhydrogenase	Deterioration of dosage; insulin x use of different methods; assay for dosage; study of mechanism; action of dosage; insulin transhydrogenase glutathione.
6	difference derivative absorbance spectrophotometry as a technique to measure state changes of phenylalanine residues in proteins	Spectrophotometry; derived differential absorbance as a technique for measuring changes in pH; state of phenylalanine residues in proteins.
6	survival and growth in a woman with untreated hypothalamic panhypopituitarism of 21 years duration	Survival and growth in a woman with 21-year untreated hypothalamic hypopituitarism.
6	mixed endocrine pancreatic tumors producing several peptide hormones	Multiple peptide hormones produced by mixed endocrine pancreatic tumors.
6	hormone substrate responses to total fasting in lean and obese mice	The hormones respond to total starvation in the presence of substrates in lean and obese mice.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part i diurnal plasma glucose profile in normal and diabetic women	Carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy, part i diurnal plasma glucose profile in normal and diabetic women.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part ii relation between maternal glucose tolerance and glucose metabolism in the newborn	Carbohydrate metabolism during pregnancy Part ii relationship between maternal glucose tolerance and glucose metabolism in newborn-born.
6	adrenal catecholamines content in fetal and newborn rats	Levels of adrenal catecholamines in fetal rats and new @-@.
6	carrier solutions for low level intravenous insulin infusion	Carrier solutions for intravenous infusion of low-level insulin.
6	the pancreatic insulin content and its relationship to plasma glucose and free fatty acid concentrations in the embryo and neonatal chick	Pancreatic insulin content and its relation to plasma glucose and d&apos concentrations; free fatty acids in the embryo and newborn chick.
6	hyperglucagonaemia in the surgical patient	Hyperglycemia in the operative patient.
6	alcohol and its drug interactions	Alcohol and its interactions with drugs.
6	thyroid autoimmunity increased frequency in relatives of insulin dependent diabetes patients	L' auto-thyroid immunity increased the frequency in parents of insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	disappearing diabetes	The demise of diabetes.
6	vagal impairment of gastric secretion in diabetic autonomic neuropathy	L' vagal alteration of gastric secretion in diabetic autonomic neuropathy.
6	effect of trimethoprim sulfamethoxazole on blood insulin and glucose concentrations of diabetics	Effect of trimethoprim sulfamethoxazole on blood levels of insulin and glucose in diabetics.
6	biochemical characterization of carcinogen induced mammary hyperplastic aveolar nodule and tumor in the rat	Biochemical characterization of the carcinogen-induced AVN and hyperplastic mammary tumours in rats.
6	clinical secretory and motor effects of selective proximal vagotomy a three year follow up	Clinical effects of secretors and motors; selective proximal vagotomy, followed by three years.
6	studies on the duct ligated pancreas as allograft for islet cell function	Studies of the ligated channel of the pancreas as an allograft for islet cell function.
6	human placental lactogen concentration during physiological fluctuations of serum glucose in normal pregnant and gestational diabetic women	Level of human placental lactogen during physiological fluctuations of serum glucose in normal pregnant and gestational diabetic women.
6	lipoatrophy produced in mice and rabbits by a fraction prepared from the urine from patients with congenital generalized lipodystrophy	Lipoatrophy produced in mice and rabbits by a fraction prepared from the urine of patients with generalized congenital lipodystrophy.
6	double antibody radioimmunoassay of serum insulin effect of use of hormone depleted human serum	Dual antibody radioimmunoassay of the apos; effect of the apos; serum insulin on the apos; use of hormone depleted human serum.
6	effects of abdominal surgery under general anaesthesia and of postoperative analgesic therapy on splanchnic exchange of some blood borne energy metabolites	Effects of general anesthesia abdominal surgery and postoperative analgesic therapy on blood glucose; splanchnic exchange of certain blood energy metabolites.
6	fluorometry of citrate in serum with use of citrate pro 3s lyase	Citrate Fluorometry in serum using pro 3s lyase citrate.
6	insulin release in cystic fibrosis	The release of apos; insulin in cystic fibrosis.
6	selective impairment of growth hormone response to physiological stimuli	Selective deterioration of apo response; growth hormone to physiological stimuli.
6	hypogonadism and parathyroid adenoma in congenital poikiloderma rothmund thomson syndrome	Hypogonadism and parathyroid adenoma in congenital poikiloderma thomson rothmund syndrome.
6	plasma free fatty acid turnover in total lipodystrophy	Plasma free fatty acid turnover in total lipodystrophy.
6	quantitation of free total and antibody bound insulin in insulin treated diabetics	Lapos; antibody-bound insulin; free total insulin was quantitated in insulin-treated diabetics.
6	muscular exertion a test of pituitary function in children	Muscle exercise is a test of the pituitary function in children.
6	lymphopenic infectious mononucleosis	Infectious lymphopenic mononucleosis.
6	phagocytic properties of exudative microphages from animals with alloxan diabetes and insulin induced hypoglycemia	The phagocytic properties of exudative microphages of animals with diabetes alloxan and dapos; hypoglycemia induced by insulin.
6	effects of medium chain triglycerides on portal and arterial levels of insulin ffa and glucose in patients with pancreatic disease	Effects of medium chain triglycerides on portal and arterial ff insulin levels and glucose levels in patients with pancreatic disease.
6	oestradiol uptake and retention and high affinity binding sites in cultured rabbit uterus	Absorption and retention of estradiol and high affinity binding sites in the cultured rabbit uterus.
6	urate synthesis in the perfused chick liver	Lapos synthesis; urate in perfused chicken liver.
6	pituitary function in chronic alcoholism	The pituitary function in the apos; chronic alcoholism.
6	surgical disconnection of the medial basal hypothalamus and pituitary function in the rhesus monkey ii gh and cortisol secretion	Surgical disconnection of the medial basal hypothalamus and rhesus monkey pituitary function ii gh and cortisol secretion.
6	characteristics of the prolactin stimulation of uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants	Characteristics of prolactin stimulation of apos; uridine metabolism in explants of mammary glands.
6	mechanism of action of gliquidone author s transl	Discovered mechanisms; action of translative gliquidone.
6	albumin fibrinogen and transferrin synthesis in isolated rat hepatocyte suspensions a model for the study of plasma protein synthesis	The synthesis of l' albumin, fibrinogen, and transferrin in isolated rat hepatocyte suspensions is a model for the study of plasma protein synthesis.
6	the properties and extracellular location of 5 nucleotidase of the rat fat cell plasma membrane	The extracellular properties and localization of rat fat cell plasma membrane 5 nucleotidase.
6	the effect of hypoglycemia on hypothalamic thyrotropin releasing hormone hrh in the rat	Lapos; effect of apos; hypoglycemia on release of hypothalamic thyrotropin; rh hormone in rat.
6	glucagon and insulin release from the allografted canine pancreas	Release of glucagon and insulin from allografted canine pancreas.
6	growth hormone catecholamines in affective disease	L' catecholamine growth hormone in affective diseases.
6	role of insulin as a portal factor in maintaining the viability of liver	The role of lapos; insulin as a portability factor for apos; insulin in maintaining liver viability.
6	confirmation of impaired early insulin response to glycemic stimulus in nonobese mild diabetics	Confirmation of an alteration in the early insulin response to glycemic stimulus in non-obese mild diabetics.
6	insulin therapy in phenformin associated lactic acidosis a case report biochemical considerations and review of the literature	Insulin therapy in the absence; lactic acidosis associated with phenformin one case reports biochemical considerations and a review of the literature.
6	plasma renin activity and blood volume in uncontrolled diabetes ketoacidosis a state of secondary aldosteronism	Lapos; plasma renin activity and blood volume in uncontrolled diabetes mellitus acid ketoacidosis; secondary aldosterone.
6	basement membrane thickness in muscle capillaries of normal and spontaneously diabetic macaca nigra	L' thickness of the basement membrane of the muscle capillaries of normal and spontaneously diabetic macaca.
6	inordinately high levels of serum immunoreactive insulin in monoclonal immunoglobulinemia on the problem of big big insulin	Excessively high levels of immunoreactive serum insulin in the body; monoclonal immune globulinemia on the large insulin problem.
6	comparison of the lipolytic effects of insulin and proinsulin on isolated fat cells	Comparison of the lipolytic effects of insulin and proinsulin on isolated fat cells.
6	plasma glucagon levels during rapid exsanguination with and without adrenergic blockade	Plasma glucagon level during rapid exsanguination with and without adrenergic blockade.
6	progestogen induced diabetes in the dog	Progestogen induced diabetes in the dog.
6	long term effect of highly selective vagotomy on basal and maximal acid output in man	Long-term effect of highly selective vagotomy on baseline and maximum production of apos; acid in men.
6	metabolic responses following isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction in arteriosclerotic breeder vs non arteriosclerotic virgin and ovariectomized female rats	Metabolic responses to isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction in arteriosclerotic reproductive rats compared with ovariectomized, nonarteriosclerotic virgin female rats.
6	a controlled randomized trial of highly selective vagotomy versus selective vagotomy and pyloroplasty in the treatment of duodenal ulcer	A randomized trial of high-selective vagotomy versus selective vagotomy and pyloroplastis in the treatment of dualenal ulcer.
6	cord plasma glucose and insulin concentrations and maternal fetal relations	Glucose and d&apos levels; umbilical plasma insulin and maternal fetal relationships.
6	comparison of blood glucose and insulin concentrations in man after intravenous injection of 1 0 0 1 and 0 01 mg of glucagon author s transl	Comparison of blood glucose and insulin levels in men after intravenous injection of 10 and 01 mg glucagon in translation.
6	the immediate and delayed effects of different types of vagotomy on human gastric myoelectrical activity	Immediate and delayed effects of different types of vagotomy procedures on human gastric myoelectrical activity.
6	hormonal regulation of incorporation of alanine u 14c into glucose in human fetal liver explants effect of dibutyryl cyclic amp glucagon insulin and triamcinolone	The hormonal regulation of apos; the incorporation of alanine u 14c into glucose in human fetal liver explants; the effect of dibutyryl glucagonic acid, insulin and triamcinolone.
6	age adjusted analysis of insulin responses during normal and abnormal glucose tolerance tests in children and adolescents	An age-adjusted analysis of insulin responses during normal and abnormal glucose tolerance testing in children and adolescents.
6	immunoreactive glucagon responses to intravenous tolbutamide in chronic pancreatitis	Immunoreactive glucagon responses to intravenous (IVT) tolbutamide in chronic pancreatitis.
6	factitial panniculitis and necrotizing fasciitis in juvenile diabetes	Panniculitis mimosa and necrotizing fasciitis in juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	actions of insulin epinephrine and dibutyryl cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate on fat cell protein phosphorylations cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate dependent and independent mechanisms	Apos; action of epinephrine insulin and cyclic dibutyryl adenosine 5 monophosphate on apos-dependent and apos-independent lipid protein phosphorylations; cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate.
6	lipids and lipoproteins in normal dogs and in dogs with secondary hyperlipoproteinemia	Lipids and lipoproteins in normal dogs and dogs with secondary hyperlipoproteinemia.
6	formation of a covalent intermediate between alpha chymotryspin and the b chain of insulin during enzyme catalyzed hydrolysis	Formation of apos; a covalent intermediate between apos; alpha-chymotryspine and the b-chain of apos; insulin during apos; enzyme-catalyzed hydrolysis.
6	studies on the action of hormones on the intestinal transport of l histidine	Hormone action on the intestinal transport of lidos; histidine l.
6	pituitary hormonal reserve in patients presenting hyperprolactinemia intrasellar masses and amenorrhea without galactorrhea	Hormone hyperpituitary in patients with intrasolar mass hyperprolactinemia and amenorrhea without galactorrhea.
6	hormonal and metabolic changes induced by elevated plasma free fatty acids in term pregnancy i effect on maternal blood glucose insulin and human placental lactogen circulating levels	The hormonal and metabolic changes induced by elevation of plasma free fatty acids during term pregnancy have an effect on the levels of insulin and lactogen circulating in maternal blood and in the human placenta.
6	failure of somatostatin to inhibit tolbutamide induced insulin secretion in patients with insulinomas a possible diagnostic tool	Failure of somatostatin d*apos; inhibition of tolbutamide has induced insulin secretion in patients with insulin; insulin is a possible diagnostic tool.
6	hormonal control of ketogenesis rapid activation of hepatic ketogenic capacity in fed rats by anti insulin serum and glucagon	Hormonal control of rapid activation of hepatic ketogenic capacity in rats fed anti-insulin and glucagon serum.
6	effects of insulin and dietary myoinositol on impaired peripheral motor nerve conduction velocity in acute streptozotocin diabetes	Effects of insulin and dietary myoinositol on apos; impaired peripheral motor nerve conduction velocity in acute, streptozotocin diabetes.
6	effect of ketone infusions on amino acid and nitrogen metabolism in man	Effect of infusions of ketone on amino acid and nitrogen metabolism in humans.
6	experimental study of dibutyryl cyclic amp its metabolic effects observed in anesthetized human subjects	L' experimental study of the dibutyryl cyclic amplifier, dibutyryl, its metabolic effects observed in anesthetized human subjects.
6	under responsiveness of growth hormone secretion after l dopa and deep sleep stimulation in obese subjects	Under-reactivity of oral secretion; post-dopa growth hormone and deep sleep stimulation in obese subjects.
6	effect of hydrocortisone and dexamethasone on xylose uptake by isolated rat soleus muscle	The effect of etapos; hydrocortisone and dexamethasone on xylose uptake by isolated rat soleus muscle.
6	possible intervention of insulin cyclic amp and glucocorticoids in protein sparing action of dietary carbohydrate in rats	Possible intervention of lapos; cyclic ampoule of lapos; insulin and glucocorticoids in appetite; protein reserve action of dietary carbohydrates in rats.
6	effect of dietary cholesterol on hepatic lipogenesis and plasma insulin and free fatty acid levels in rats	Effect of dietary cholesterol on hepatic lipogenesis and plasma levels of insulin and d*apos; free fatty acids in rats.
6	hormonal control of cyclic 3 5 amp levels and gluconeogenesis in isolated hepatocytes from fed rats	Hormonal control of 35 amperic cyclic levels and gluconeogenesis in isolated hepatocytes from fed rats.
6	metabolic and hormonal consequences of exchange transfusion via the umbilical artery or vein	Metabolic and hormonal consequences of apo; exchange transfusion via artery or umbilical vein.
6	glycerol major contributor to the short term protein sparing effect of fat emulsions in normal man	Glycerol contributes greatly to apos; short-term protein saving effect of fat emulsions in the normal man.
6	mechanisms for development of diabetic hypertriglyceridemia in streptozotocin treated rats effect of diet and duration of insulin deficiency	Mechanisms of insulin development; diabetic hypertriglyceridemia in streptozotocin-treated rats Dietary effect and duration of insulin deficiency.
6	enzyme linked immunoassay i novel method for synthesis of the insulin beta d galactosidase conjugate and its applicability for insulin assay	Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay i new method for the synthesis of the insulin beta conjugate galactosidase and its insulin test applicability.
6	binding and degradation of 125i insulin by rat hepatocytes	Binding and degradation of l' insulin 125i by rat hepatocytes.
6	effect of serum on phenylalanine hydroxylase levels in cultured hepatoma cells	Effect of serum on hepatoma cultured cell phenylalanine hydroxylase levels.
6	the effect of hydrocortisone and insulin on the activity and isoenzyme of tyrosine alpha ketoglutarate transaminase in cytostructures of rat liver	The effects of apos; hydrocortisone and apos; insulin on apos; activity and apos; isozyme of tyrosine alpha ketoglutarate transaminase in rat liver cytostructures.
6	pyruvate kinase from kidney medulla of rabbits in insulin deficiency	Renal medulla pyruvate kinase from insulin-deficient rabbits.
6	correction of endocrine metabolic disorders in oncologic patients the effect of biguanides phenformin and adebita miskleron and diphenin	To correct endocrine-mediated metabolic disorders in cancer patients; the effect of biguanides phenformin and adebita miskleron and diphenin.
6	effects by heme insulin and serum albumin on heme and protein synthesis in chick embryo liver cells cultured in a chemically defined medium and a spectrofluorometric assay for porphyrin composition	Effects of heme insulin and apos; serum albumin on synthesis of apos; heme and protein in hepatic cells of apos; chick embryos cultured in chemically defined medium and spectrofluorometric assay to determine porphyrin composition.
6	metabolism of riboflavin and its nucleotides in rat liver subcellular fractions in alloxan diabetes	Metabolism of riboflavin and its nucleotides in the rat liver subcellular fractions of alloxan diabetes.
6	gangrene of the newborn a case report	A report on the gangrene of the new-was born.
6	abdominal pain in diabetic metabolic decompensation clinical significance	Abdominal pain in diabetic metabolic decompensation clinically significant.
6	the accuracy of methods of diagnosis in patients with suspected recurrent ulcer after vagotomy	Accuracy of diagnostic procedures in patients suspected of having a recurrent vagotomy ulcer.
6	gastric inhibitory polypeptide gip stimulated by fat ingestion in man	Gip gastric inhibitory polypeptide stimulated by apos; fat ingestion in the apos; man.
6	altered hypothalamic pituitary adrenal responsiveness to dexamethasone insulin tolerance test in active acromegaly	Change of adrenal hypothalamic hypophysial response to apos tolerance test; insulin dexamethasone in apos; active acromegaly.
6	radioreceptor inactive growth hormone associated with stimulated secretion in normal subjects	Inactive growth hormone radio receptors associated with stimulated secretion in normal subjects.
6	circulating nsila s in man preliminary studies of stimuli in vivo and of binding to plasma components	Nsila s circulating in human tissues Preliminary studies of in vivo stimuli and plasma component binding.
6	the inhibitory effect of somatostatin on growth hormone insulin and glucagon secretion in diabetes mellitus	The inhibitory effect of somatostatin on the secretion of insulin and glucagon in diabetes mellitus.
6	metabolism of peripheral nerve myelin in experimental diabetes	Peripheral nerve myelin metabolism in experimental diabetes.
6	differential effect of hormones on macromolecular synthesis and mitosis in chick embryo cells	Distinctive effect of hormones on macromolecular synthesis and on mitosis in chick embryos.
6	hypoglycemic conditioned reflex in rats preliminary study of its mechanism	Hypoglycemic-conditioned Reflex in Rat, preliminary study of its mechanism.
6	serum free growth of htc cells containing glucocorticoid and insulin inducible tyrosine aminotransferase and cytoplasmic glucocorticoid receptors	Serum free growth of htc cells containing cytoplasmic glucocorticoid receptors and tyrosine aminotransferase.
6	sex steroid influence on triglyceride metabolism	Influence of sex steroids on triglyceride metabolism.
6	glucocorticoids and the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase guanosine triphosphate in the rat	Glucocorticoids and regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase guanosine triphosphate in rats.
6	biochemical changes in cultured foetal rat liver explants	Biochemical changes in fetal rat liver explants cultured.
6	acute and long term tocolysis by means of buphenin dilatol in insulin dependent pregnant diabetics	Acute and long-term tocolysis by buphenin dilatol in insulin-dependent pregnant diabetics.
6	studies on new sulfonylurea derivatives and their metabolites in isolated langerhans s islets of the rat pancreas author s transl	Studies of the novel sulfonylurea derivatives and their metabolites in isolated islets of rat pancreatic langerhans.
6	clinical usefulness of gastric acidity studies	Apos; clinical utility of apo studies; gastric acidity.
6	peripheral metabolism of insulin proinsulin and c peptide in the pregnant rat	Peripheral metabolism of insulin, proinsulin, and c-peptide in the pregnant rat.
6	on hepatic and extrahepatic postheparin serum lipase activities and the influence of experimental hypercortisolism and diabetes on these activities	The hepatic and extrahepatic activities of serum lipase post-heparin and apos influence of the apos experimental hypercortisolism and diabetes on these activities.
6	spontaneous diabetes mellitus in macaca cyclopis and mandrillus leucophaeus case reports	Spontaneous diabetes mellitus in Macaca cyclopis and mandrillus leucophaeus cases.
6	estradiol dependent collagenolytic enzyme activity in long term organ culture of human breast cancer	L' collagenolytic enzymatic activity dependent on apos; estradiol in cell culture; long-term organs of human breast cancer.
6	metabolic actions of vasopressin glucagon and adrenalin in the intact rat	L' metabolic action of vasopressin glucagon and l' adrenaline in intact rat.
6	blood glucose serum insulin and glucagon response to arginine in premature infants	Blood glucose, insulin and glucagon response to arginine in early childhood.
6	gastric acid output pepsin output and lean body mass in normal and duodenal ulcer subjects	Production of apos; gastric acid, pepsin production and lean weight in normal and duodenal ulcer patients.
6	antibody to cultured human insulinoma cells in insulin dependent diabetes	Antibody to cells cultured from apo; human insulin in insulin-dependent diabetes.
6	pathogenesis of nonketotic hyperosmolar diabetic coma	This is a pathogenesis of nonketo diabetic hyperosmolar coma.
6	potentiation of carbon tetrachloride induced hepatotoxicity in alloxan or strepto zotocin diabetic rats	The potentiation of carbon tetrachloride induced hepatotoxicity in alloxan- and streptozotocin-induced diabetic rats.
6	modification by propranolol of cardiovascular effects of induced hypoglycaemia	Propranolol modification of the cardiovascular effects of lacid; induced hypoglycaemia.
6	effect of meal feeding on the daily variations of insulin glucose and nadp linked dehydrogenases in rats	Effect of apo; ingestion of food on daily changes in glucose insulin and larval dehydrogenases in rats.
6	influence of treatment with diet alone on oral glucose tolerance test and plasma sugar and insulin levels in patients with maturity onset diabetes mellitus	Influence of diet-only treatment on oral glucose tolerance test and plasma glucose and insulin levels in patients with mature diabetes mellitus.
6	the endocrine pancreas in varanus niloticus ultrastructural and cytochemical electron microscopic study and x ray microdiffraction	The endocrine pancreas in varanus niloticus was studied ultrastructurally and cytochemically by electron microscopy and microdiffraction x-ray.
6	the historic role of insulin in the physiopathology of the metabolic complications from pancreatic diabetes therapeutic implications for somatostatin	The historical role of insulin in the pathophysiology of the metabolic complications of pancreatic diabetes for somatostatin.
6	gas chromatographic and mass spectrometric detection of low molecular weight aliphatic alcohols in urine of normal individuals and patients with diabetes mellitus	Gas chromatographic detection and mass spectrometry of low molecular weight aliphatic alcohols in diabetic patients; urine; normal individuals and patients with diabetes mellitus.
6	dose response study of the inhibiting effect of somatostatin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in normal subjects and acromegalic patients	Dose-response study; inhibitory effect of somatostatin on the secretion of insulin and d' growth hormone in normal subjects and in patients with acromegaly.
6	serum lipids in acromegaly	Serum lipids in the apos; acromegaly.
6	hypoglycaemia associated with an intrathoracic fibrosarcoma	Hypoglycemia associated with intrathoracic fibrosarcoma.
6	depressive symptoms and the glucose tolerance test and insulin tolerance test	Glucose and insulin tolerance testing and depression symptoms.
6	feeding behavior in monkeys with spontaneous diabetes mellitus	Dietary behaviour in monkeys with diabetes mellitus.
6	specific insulin binding to chloroplasts isolated from acetabularia mediterranea	The specific binding of l' insulin to chloroplasts isolated from l' acetabular mediterranea.
6	metabolic effects of calcitonin in the newborn	Metabolic effects of calcitonin in newer @-@born.
6	restriction of hepatic gluconeogenesis and ureogenesis from threonine when at low concentrations	Restriction of hepatic gluconeogenesis and apo; ureogenesis from threonine at low concentrations.
6	influence of darkness on insulin binding in the unicellular algae acetabularia mediterranea	Influence of epos; obscurity on the binding of eposin; insulin in the apos; unicellular acetabularia mediterranea.
6	effect of insulin on electric activity of sheep jejunum	Effect of apos; insulin on apos; electrical activity of the sheep's jejunum.
6	in vitro stimulation of human breast tissue by human prolactin	In vitro stimulation of human breast tissue by human breast prolactin.
6	mortality factors in diabetes a 20 year mortality study	Mortality factors in diabetes 20-year mortality study on mortality.
6	aberrations in hollander test response after incomplete vagotomy compensating effect of antral resection in the dog	The effect of antral resection on the vagotomy of rats and dogs in the United States.
6	ultrastructure of the adrenal medulla of normal and insulin treated hamsters	Adrenal medulla ultrastructure of normal and insulin-treated hamsters.
6	the effects of morphine and nalorphine on the plasma 11 hydroxycorticosteroid response to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in patients with rheumatoid arthritis	The effects of morphine and nalorphine on the plasma response 11 hydroxycorticosteroid to apos; hypoglycemic induced insulin in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
6	altered pulmonary capillary permeability complicating recovery from diabetic ketoacidosis	L' alteration of pulmonary capillary permeability complicates recovery from diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	drug interference and the role of anesthesia in such interference	Drug interference and role of l*apos; anaesthesia in this interference.
6	continuous daily blood sugar profile in relation to serum insulin in subjects with normal metabolism and ideal or normal weight author s transl	Continuous daily profile of blood glucose in relation to serum insulin levels in subjects with normal metabolism and ideal or normal weight.
6	plasma levels of hgh insulin and nefa in diabetic children author s transl	Plasma levels of insulin and nefa in diabetic children are reported by the author.
6	insulin plasma aminoacid imbalance and hepatic coma	Insulin deficiency; insulin plasma amino acid deficiency and hepatic coma.
6	a case report of turner s syndrome with ring x chromosome	This is a report of Turner's syndrome with a x-chromosome ring.
6	qualitative abnormality of insulin secretion in a case with insulinoma	A qualitative abnormality in the secretion of insulin in an insulin-induced case.
6	a case of acromegaly improved by pituitary apoplexy	A case of apos; acromegaly enhanced by apos; apoplexy.
6	hypothalamic pituitary functions in patients with idiopathic pituitary dwarfism	Acute hypophyseal hypothalamic functions in patients with idiopathic dwarf pituitary gland.
6	the growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in anorexia nervosa and control underweight or normal subjects	The response of the growth hormone to insulin induced hypoglycemia in the nervous anorexia and normal or low-weight control subjects.
6	influence of atropine metiamide and vagotomy on camp of resting and stimulated gastric mucosa	Influence of l' metiamide atropine and vagotomy on resting camp and gastric mucosal stimulation.
6	automatic treatment of radioimmunoassay data an experimental validation of the results	Automatic processing of data; radioimmunoassay, experimental validation of results.
6	a low response of pituitary growth hormone secretion in the patient with diabetes mellitus after intravenous administration of l dopa author s transl	Low response of the secretion of the apos; pituitary growth hormone in the diabetic patient after the apos; intravenous administration of the translation of the apos; author of the dopa.
6	oral diazoxide contraindicated in severe hypertension with renal failure	Oral Diazoxide versus-indicated in cases of diabetes; severe hypertension with renal failure.
6	adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in juvenile onset diabetes mellitus	Adipose tissue cellularity in early onset diabetes mellitus.
6	the excretion of proinsulin and insulin in urine	Lapses; proinsulin and insulin excretion; insulin in urine.
6	the effect of phenformin on amino acid induced insulin secretion in diabetics	The effect of phenformin on amino acids induces insulin-induced apos secretion in diabetics.
6	the plasma insulin and growth hormone response to oral glucose diurnal and seasonal observations in the antarctic	L' plasma insulin and oral glucose response; growth hormone diurnal and seasonal observations in the Antarctic.
6	serum iri in insulin treated diabetics during a 24 hour period	Serum iri in diabetics treated with 24 hours of insulin.
6	the contractile capacity of the myocardium the effect of insulin on it and indices of central hemodynamics in patients with diabetes mellitus	The contractile capacity of the myocardium, the effect of insulin on the myocardium and its indices, and central hemodynamics in diabetes mellitus patients.
6	effect of metergoline a powerful and long acting antiserotoninergic agent on insulin secretion in normal subjects and in patients with chemical diabetes	The effect of metergoline, a potent long-acting anti-serotonergic agent, on the secretion of apos; insulin in normal subjects and in patients with chemical diabetes.
6	demonstration of anti a component antibody a possible means to differentiate patients with auto antibodies to endogenous insulin from insulin treated patients	Antibody demonstration is a possible way to differentiate patients with auto-antibodies to apo; endogenous insulin from apo-treated patients; insulin.
6	effect of hypophysectomy on protein synthetic activity of free and bound hepatic ribosomes from insulin deficient rats	Effect of apos; hypophysectomy on apos; protein synthesis activity of free and bound liver ribosomes from insulin-deficient rats.
6	effect of duration of insulin deficiency on membrane bound and free ribosomes from livers of diabetic rats	Effect of duration of insulin deficiency on hepatic free and membrane-bound ribosomes of diabetic rats.
6	human c peptide in normal and diabetic subjects	Human c-peptide in normal and diabetic subjects.
6	increased kidney size and glomerular filtration rate in untreated juvenile diabetes normalization by insulin treatment	Increased kidney size and glomerular filtration rate in the normalization of juvenile diabetes not treated with insulin.
6	assessment of the somatotropic function of the hypophysis in patients with hypophyseal nanism and gonadal dysgenesis by using the insulin tolerance and arginine tolerance tests	Evaluation of the somatotropic function of apos; pituitary in patients with pituitary dwarfism and gonadal dysgenesis at apos; helps with apos, insulin and apos tolerance tests; arginine.
6	blood sugar and plasma immunoreactive insulin levels in healthy pregnant women undergoing the glucose tolerance test	Dapos levels; plasma immunoreactive insulin and blood glucose levels in healthy pregnant women who are tested for glucose tolerance.
6	effect of glucagon on esophageal motor function	Effect of glucagon on esophageal motor function.
6	kinetics of steroid induction and deinduction of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis in cultured hepatoma cells	Kinetics of apos; induction and desinduction of steroids from tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis in cultured d&apos cells; hepatoma.
6	clinical investigations of the effect of tolbutamide and glibenclamide on pancreatic glucagon secretion author s transl	Clinical investigations of l' effect of tolbutamide and glibenclamide on pancreatic glucagon secretion.
6	serum insulin changes in arteriosclerotic breeder female rats versus non arteriosclerotic virgin rats	Effect of arteriosclerotic and non-arteriosclerotic virgin rats on insulin change.
6	c peptide analysis in diagnosis of factitial hypoglycemia in an insulin dependent diabetic	Analysis of c-peptides in diagnosis of insulin-induced hypoglycaemia in an insulin-dependent diabetic.
6	clinical experiences with monocomponent insulins	Clinical experiments with insulin monocomposants.
6	trial treatment of diabetic retinopathy by inhibition of pituitary somatotropin secretion with map	Experimental treatment of diabetic retinopathy by inhibiting pituitary somatotropin secretion using a pituitary map.
6	significance of the 2 deoxy d glucose test on the differentiation of hypoglycemia in childhood author s transl	L' importance of 2 glucose deoxy test on differentiation of apos; hypoglycemia in translated children.
6	prolonged control of hypoglycaemia by l asparaginase in islet cell carcinoma producing insulin and gastrin	Prolonged control of asparaginases; hypoglycemia in islet carcinomas producing insulin and gastrin.
6	insulin and hydrocortisone effects on viability and glycogen stores of postnatal rat liver organ culture	Effects of apos; insulin and apos; hydrocortisone on viability and glycogen stores of postnatal rat liver organs.
6	insulinoma aids to management	Insulinoma helps with management.
6	studies on the role of insulin in the regulation of glyceride synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue	Studies on the role of insulin in regulating glyceride synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue.
6	intraportal insulin protects from the liver injury of portacaval shunt in dogs	Intraportal insulin protects against hepatic injury caused by portacaval shunt in dogs.
6	functional subdivision of islets of langerhans and possible role of d cells	Under-functional division of langerhans islets and possible role of d cells.
6	hormone receptors 5 binding of glucagon and insulin to human circulating mononuclear cells in diabetes mellitus	Hormonal receptors 5 bind glucagon and insulin to circulating human mononuclear cells in diabetes mellitus.
6	utilization of intravenous maltose	He's using intravenous maltosis.
6	blood glucose and plasma insulin levels during prolonged pentobarbitone anaesthesia in the rat	Glucose and d*apos levels; plasma insulin during apos; prolonged pentobarbitone anesthesia in the rat.
6	effect of beta and beta2 adrenoreceptor stimulants infused intrapancreatically on glucagon and insulin secretion	Adrenoceptor beta and beta2 stimulants have had an intra-pancreatic effect on glucagon and d' insulin secretion.
6	studies on the reversibility of oral trypsin inhibitor induced changes of rat pancreatic exocrine enzyme activity and insulin secretory capacity	Reversibility studies with the oral trypsin inhibitor induced changes in the apos; pancreatic exocrine enzymatic activity and the secretory capacity of the apos; insulin in the rat.
6	retention of endocrine function by an insulin secreting pancreatic islet cell tumour from syrain hamster through serial transplantation in nude mice	Retention of endocrine function by insulin secreting syrain hamster pancreatic islet tumour by serial transplantation in nude mice.
6	physiological mechanisms for cardiac control by nutritional intake after early maternal separation in the young rat	Physiological mechanisms of cardiac control in young rats; nutritional intake after early separation from the mother.
6	blood sugar level and immunoreactive insulin in the blood plasma in pregnant women with supposed prediabetes in the dynamics of a normal glucose tolerance test	Blood sugar level and immunoreactive insulin in blood plasma in pregnant women whose prediabetes is assumed to be glucose-tolerant.
6	hormonal and pyridoxine induction of threonine dehydratase in the rat liver	Hormonal induction and pyridoxine of threonine dehydratase in rat liver.
6	lipid mobilizing hormones of the hypothalamus and pituitary	Hormones mobilizing lipids of the apos; hypothalamus and the apos; pituitary.
6	central factors in the control of insulin and glucagon secretion	Central factors controlling secretion of insulin and glucagon.
6	the plasma cortisol and corticotropin response to hypoglycemia following adrenal steroid and acth administration	The response of plasma cortisol and corticotropin to hypoglycemia, adrenal and dapos steroid administration, and acth.
6	exaggerated growth hormone response to arginine infusion in huntington s disease	Apos infusion; arginine in apos; growth hormone in exaggerated response to Huntington's disease.
6	function of the duct ligated canine pancreatic allograft	Canine pancreatic allograft ligated duct function.
6	behaviour of the duct ligated canine pancreas during hypothermic albumin perfusion	Channel behavior ligated the canine pancreas during hypothermic infusion of apos; albumin.
6	twenty four hour preservation of the duct ligated canine pancreatic allograft	For 24 hours preservation of the canine pancreatic allograft.
6	endocrinology and metabolism in uremia and dialysis a clinical review	Endocrinology and metabolism in the liver; uremic and dialysis a clinical revision.
6	insulin metabolism insulin sensitivity and hormonal responses to insulin infusion in patients taking oral contraceptive steroids	Metabolism of oral contraceptive drugs; insulin Sensitivity to oral contraceptive drugs; insulin and hormonal responses to oral contraceptive drug infusion; insulin in patients taking oral contraceptive drugs.
6	effect of insulin induced hypoglycemia upon plasma renin activity in man	The effects of apo; insulin-induced hypoglycemia; insulin on apo; plasma renin activity in men.
6	parietal cell vagotomy	Vagotomy of parietal cells.
6	culture of cells in beem capsules a new technique for electron microscopic study of monolayer cultures	The culture of cells in beem capsules is a new technique for the electron microscopy of monolayer cultures.
6	intragastric pressure volume relationship before and after proximal gastric vagotomy	Relationship of intragastric pressure volume before and after proximal gastric vagotomy.
6	conditioning insulin effects	Conditioning the effects of insulin.
6	induction of t lymphocyte responses to a small molecular weight antigen i failure to induce tolerance in azobenzenearsonate aba specific t cells in guinea pigs with an aba conjugate of a copolymer of d glutamic acid and d lysine d gl	Induction of t-cell responses to low molecular weight antigen i has failed to induce tolerance in t-cell specific apo; azobenzenearsonate in guinea pigs with aba dapos conjugate; d-apos copolymer; glutamic acid and d-lysin.
6	nutritional and metabolic studies in humans with 1 3 butanediol	Nutrition and metabolic studies in humans with 13 butanediol.
6	influence of 1 3 butanediol on blood glucose concentration and pancreatic insulin content of streptozotocin diabetic rats	Effect of 1,3-butanediol on the blood glucose concentration and pancreatic insulin content of streptozotocin diabetic rats.
6	radioimmunoassay review of basic principles	Radioimmunoassay of basic principles.
6	radioimmunoassay of insulin	Radioimmunoassay of Insulin.
6	cellular and circulating immunity to diabetic basement membrane a negative finding	Cellular and circulating immunity to the diabetic basement membrane, a negative result.
6	studies of the relationship between renin secretion and the sympathetic nervous system responsiveness in man author s transl	Studies of the relationship between renin secretion and sympathetic nervous system responsiveness in humans.
6	serum immunoreactive insulin after the oral administration of single dose of tolbutamide i peripheral vein immunoreactive insulin in normal subjects and mild diabetics author s transl	Immunoreactive serum insulin following oral administration of immunoreactive tolbutamide i peripheral insulin-reactive vein in normal subjects and mild diabetes mellitus transl.
6	serum immunoreactive insulin after the oral administration of single dose of tolbutamide ii pancreatic vein immunoreactive insulin in dogs author s transl	Immunoreactive serum insulin after dosing; oral administration of a single dose of tolbutamide; immunoreactive insulin pancreatic vein in translating dogs.
6	dietary therapy and insulin secretory response to glucose in adult onset non obese diabetic subjects	Food therapy and insulin glucose secretory response in non-obese adult subjects with type 2 diabetes.
6	determination of total insulin tiri in plasma of insulin treated diabetics and newborn infants of insulin treated diabetic mothers	Determination of insulin total drawn into plasma of diabetic patients treated with insulin; insulin and newborns born from diabetic mothers treated with insulin.
6	dynamics of insulin release by perfused hamster mesocricetus auratus pancreases effects of hypophysectomy bovine and human growth hormone and prolactin	The dynamics of insulin release from the hamster-infused mesocricetus auratus pancreas causes the effects of apos hypophysectomy, bovine and human growth hormone, and prolactin.
6	aspects of the adrenal function in the domestic fowl	Aspects of adrenal function in domestic poultry.
6	insulin degradation by isolated fat cells and their subcellular fractions	The degradation of l' insulin by isolated fat cells and their subcellular fractions.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man iii role of pharmacologic limitation of ffa availability	Modification of glucagon-mediated fatty acid metabolism in humans iii role of pharmacological limitation of ffa availability.
6	short term treatment of alloxan diabetic rats with intrajejunal administration of water in oil in water insulin emulsions	Short-term treatment of alloxan-induced diabetic rats with intrajunal dosing; water in alcohol; oil in oil; insulin water emulsions.
6	twenty four hour serum growth hormone levels in maturity onset diabetics	Serum level of diabetes mellitus; growth hormone for 24 hours in early-maturity diabetics.
6	organ culture of foetal rat pancreas effects of parabiotic culture with foetal adrenal glands	A parabiotic culture with fetal adrenal glands and fetal rat pancreatic organs.
6	bacteriuria findings in diabetics	Bacteriuria in diabetics.
6	effects of diabetes mellitus on bone mass in juvenile and adult onset diabetes	The effects of diabetes mellitus on bone mass in both juvenile and adult diabetes.
6	effect of gastro entero pancreatic endocrine hormones on the histogenesis of gastric cancer in rats induced by n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with special reference to development of scirrhous gastric cancer	The effect of gastro-endocrine hormones-enteric on the intestines; histogenesis of gastric cancer in rats induced by n-methyl n-nitrosoguanidine, particularly with respect to scirous gastric cancer development.
6	islet transplantation in diabetic rats receiving corticosteroids	Islet transplantation in diabetic rats receiving the corticosteroids.
6	formaldehyde ozone induced fluorescence in gastrin producing tumours	L' ozone formaldehyde induced fluorescence in gastrin-producing tumours.
6	isolation of intact liver parenchymal cells by a modified enzymatic method	Isolate intact parenchyma cells from the liver by a modified enzymatic method.
6	the influence of plasma triglycerides on human growth hormone response to arginine and insulin a study in hyperlipemics and normal subjects	L' influence of plasma triglycerides on response of l' human growth hormone to l' arginine and l' insulin has been studied in hyperlipemic and normal subjects.
6	blood glucose and serum insulin levels in lean and genetically obese mice	Glycaemia and serum insulin levels in both lean and genetically obese mice.
6	the role of cortisol and growth hormone in the counter regulation of insulin induced hypoglycemia	Both cortisol and lapos; growth hormone play a role in counteracting apos regulation; apos-induced hypoglycemia; insulin.
6	experimental hyperthyroidism in dogs evaluation and effects on blood sugar serum insulin and free fatty acids during glibenclamide infusion test	"""Experimental hyperthyroidism in dogs assessment and effects on blood glucose insulin and free fat acids during glibenclamide infusion tests"", Glibenclamide, M.J. et al."
6	the effect of fatty acids and ketone bodies on the biosynthesis of insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of obese hyperglycemic mice	L' effect of fatty acids and keto bodies on biosynthesis of insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of obese hyperglycemic mice.
6	the effect of insulin on amino acid incorporation into exocrine pancreatic cells of the rat	The effect of insulin on apos; incorporation of amino acids into exocrine rat pancreatic cells.
6	interaction of endogenous growth hormone cortisol and catecholamines with blood glucose in children with brittle diabetes mellitus	Interaction of l' endogenous growth hormone cortisol and catecholamines with blood glucose in children with fragile diabetes mellitus.
6	stimulation of growth hormone secretion by levodopa propranolol in children and adolescents	Stimulation of cell wall secretion; growth hormone by levodopa propranolol in children and adolescents.
6	plasma growth hormone insulin and glucagon responses to arginine infusion in children and adolescents with idiopathic short stature isolated growth hormone deficiency panhypopituitarism and anorexia nervosa	The responses of insulin and glucagon in apos; plasma growth hormone to infusion of apos; arginine in idiopathic small children and adolescents isolated pan-hypopituitarism due to apos deficiency; growth hormone and apos; anorexia nervosa.
6	propranolol augmented exercise induced human growth hormone release	Propranolol has increased human growth hormone release induced by exercise.
6	acute suppressive effect of human growth hormone on basal insulin secretion in man	Acute suppressive effect of the human growth hormone on the secretion of basal insulin in humans.
6	effects of synthetic somatostatin on endotoxin induced changes of growth hormone cortisol and insulin in plasma blood sugar and blood leukocytes in man	Effects of synthetic somatostatin on apo-induced changes; apo endotoxin; cortisol and apo growth hormone; insulin in blood sugar and leukocytes in men.
6	growth hormone secretion and sulfation factor activity in pseudohypoparathyroidism	The secretion of l' growth hormone and l' sulfation factor activity in pseudohypoparathyroidism.
6	laron dwarfism growth and immunoreactive insulin following treatment with human growth hormone	Laron growth dwarfism and immune-reactive insulin after treatment with human growth hormone (HGH) etapos.
6	change in secretion of somatotropic hormone and insulin in myocardial infarct	Change in myocardial myocardial infarction, insulin and dapos secretion, somatotropic hormone.
6	carbohydrate tolerance plasma insulin growth hormone and lipid levels in indian and black diabetics	Carbohydrate tolerance Growth hormone and plasma lipid levels of apos; insulin in diabetic Indian and black patients.
6	growth and hormone control mechanisms in osteosarcoma evidence for a new therapeutic approach	Mechanisms of hormonal control and growth in osteosarcoma, a new therapeutic approach.
6	a comparative study of serum growth hormone and plasma cortisol levels in stimulation tests with insulin and propranolol glucagon	A comparative study of serum hormone and plasma cortisol levels in insulin and propranolol glucagon stimulation tests.
6	increased immunoreactive plasma and urinary growth hormone in growth retardation with defective generation of somatomedin a laron s syndrome	Immunoreactive plasma and urinary growth hormone increase in growth retardation with defective generation of laron syndrome somatomedin.
6	growth hormone and prolactin secretion in the carcinoid syndrome	Hormone of growth and prolactin secretion in the carcinoid syndrome.
6	growth hormone secretion in chronic schizophrenia	The secretion of the apo; growth hormone in chronic schizophrenia.
6	the effects of insulin and growth hormone on the release of somatomedin by the isolated rat liver	The effects of insulin and the growth-promoting hormone on the release of somatomedin from isolated rat liver.
6	the stimulating effect of cyclic amp glucagon and insulin on guanidine acetate n methyltransferase activity in rat liver and pancreas	L' stimulant effect of glucagon; cyclic ampoule and apos; insulin on apos; guanidine acetate n methyltransferase activity in rat liver and pancreas.
6	intravenous metyrapone testing evaluation of growth hormone and adrenocorticotrophic hormone in children	An evaluation of the effects of intravenous meteocorticotropic hormone (IPH) and growth hormone (ILH) in children.
6	l dopa growth hormone and adipokinesis in the lean and the obese	Dopa growth hormone and adipokinesis in the skin and in the skin.
6	serum growth hormone serum immunoreactive insulin and blood glucose response to oral and intravenous diazepam in man	Serum immunoreactive insulin-independent growth hormone and glycemic response to oral and intravenous diazepam in men.
6	plasma growth hormone and insulin during early lactation in cows fed silage based diets	Plasma growth hormone and insulin at the onset of lactation in cows fed Dapos-based diets; cured.
6	a modification of the unlabeled antibody enzyme method using heterologous antisera for the light microscopic and ultrastructural localization of insulin glucagon and growth hormone	Modification of the enzymatic method of unlabelled antibodies with heterologous antisera for light microscopy and ultrastructural localization of apos; insulin glucagon and apos; growth hormone.
6	growth hormone insulin and sugar in the blood plasma of bulls interrelated diurnal variations	L' insulin d' growth hormone and sugar in the blood plasma of interdependent, interdependent, diurnal bulls.
6	effect of alcohol administration on plasma growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycemia	Effect of apo; administration of apo; alcohol on response of apo; plasma growth hormone to apo; hypoglycemic induced insulin.
6	growth hormone release by glycine injected intravenously in 22 healthy sexually immature children	Release of the growth hormone glycine was injected intravenously into 22 healthy sexually immature children.
6	altered growth hormone release in huntington s chorea	Modification of release of the growth hormone Huntington Disease.
6	effect of lipids on insulin growth hormone and exocrine pancreatic secretion in man	The effect of lipids on insulin, lacid, growth hormone, and exocrine pancreatic secretion in men.
6	follicle stimulating hormone thyrotrophin human growth hormone and prolactin in hyperemesis gravidarum	Thyrotrophin-stimulating follicular hormone, human growth hormone and prolactin in the apos; hyperemesis gravidarum.
6	the effect of somatostatin on plasma insulin and growth hormone levels in basal conditions and after glucagon in normal and acromegalic subjects	Somatostatin effect on plasma levels of insulin and d*apos; growth hormone under baseline conditions and after glucagon in normal and acromegalic subjects.
6	glucagon insulin and growth hormone response in obese women	The effect of glucagon insulin on the growth hormone response in obese women. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/index_e.html.
6	growth hormone response in fetal alcohol syndrome	The response of the growth hormone to d'apos syndrome; fetal alcoholism.
6	propranolol effect on plasma glucose free fatty acid insulin and growth hormone in graves disease	The effect of propranolol on insulin and cholesterol; free growth hormone; plasma glucose fatty acids in severe diseases.
6	diabetes mellitus in gonadal dysgenesis studies of insulin and growth hormone secretion	Sugar diabetes in studies of gonadal dysgenesis of insulin and d*apos secretion; growth hormone.
6	automated approach to radioimmunoassays of somatotropin human growth hormone and insulin	An automated approach to the measurement of radioimmunoassays of insulin and lidos; human growth hormone somatotrophin.
6	growth hormone levels in diabetes correlation with the clinical control of the disease	Dapos levels; growth hormone in the correlation of diabetes with clinical control of disease.
6	secretion of growth hormone in hyperthyroidism	Apos secretion; growth hormone in the apos; hyperthyroidism.
6	effects of methyldopa on prolactin and growth hormone	Effects of methyldopa on prolactin and lidos; growth hormone.
6	effects of growth hormone thyroxine and age on diaphragm muscle from dwarf mice	Effects of thyroxine, growth hormone, and age on dwarf mouse diaphragm.
6	the influence of thyroid function on the diabetogenic action of triamcinolone in man glucose insulin and growth hormone patterns after on oral glucose load	Influence of thyroid function on the diabetogenic action of triamcinolone in insulin man and growth hormone patterns following oral glucose loading.
6	hormonal regulation of fetal brain cell proliferation presence in serum of a trophin responsive to pituitary growth hormone stimulation	Hormonal regulation of the presence of proliferating fetal brain cells in the serum of the pituitary growth hormone, a hormone reactive trophin.
6	a comparison of the effect of levodopa and somatostatin on the plasma levels of growth hormone insulin glucagon and prolactin in acromegaly	Comparison of apo; effect of levodopa and somatostatin on plasma levels of apo; insulin glucagon, growth hormone, and prolactin in apo; acromegaly.
6	provocative tests for growth hormone release	Growth hormone release challenge tests.
6	effect of prolactin on growth and the estrogen receptor level of human breast cancer cells mcf 7	Effect of prolactin on growth and receptor levels of estrogen in human breast cancer cells.
6	effect of the antihistaminic agents meclastine and dexchlorpheniramine on the response of human growth hormone to arginine infusion and insulin hypoglycemia	Effect of the antihistamine agents mesclastine and dexchlorpheniramine on the response of apos; human growth hormone to apos infusion; arginine and apos; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	plasma insulin and growth hormone concentrations in pregnant sheep i diurnal variations in mid and late pregnancy	Dapos plasma concentrations; insulin and dapos; gravid ewe growth hormone i diurnal changes in mid- and late gestation.
6	plasma insulin and growth hormone concentrations in pregnant sheep ii post absorptive levels in mid and late pregnancy	Plasma concentrations of insulin and d*apos; growth hormone in pregnant ewesii after pregnancy; mid- and late-term pregnancy absorption.
6	insulin and growth hormone responses in neonatal hyperglycemia	Insulin and insulin-like responses; growth hormone in neonatal hyperglycemia.
6	retinopathy and plasma growth hormone levels in idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetes	Retinopathy and dapos; plasma growth hormone in the liver; idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetes.
6	prolactin binding to r3230ac mammary carcinoma and liver in hormone treated and diabetic rats	Prolactin binds to r3230ac mammary carcinoma and liver in diabetic and hormone-treated rats.
6	effects of somatostatin on basal levels of plasma growth hormone and insulin in acromegalics dose response studies and attempted total growth hormone suppression	Effects of somatostatin on baseline levels of lacid; growth hormone and lacid; plasma insulin in dose studies-acromegalic response and attempt total suppression of lacid; growth hormone.
6	depression of growth hormone and cortisol response to insulin induced hypoglycemia after prolonged oral delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol administration in man	The decrease in the response of growth hormone and cortisol to insulin caused hypoglycemia after apos; prolonged oral administration of delta tetrahydrocannabinol in men.
6	influence of l prolyl l leucyl glycine amide on growth hormone secretion in normal and acromegalic subjects	L' influence of leucyl glycine amide on glycine secretion; growth hormone in normal and acromegalic subjects.
6	short term effects of norethisterone oenanthate and medroxyprogesterone acetate on glucose insulin growth hormone and lipids	Short-term effects of norethisterone oenanthate and norethisterone apos; medroxyprogesterone acetate on glucose, l' insulin, l' growth hormone and lipid.
6	changes in glucose insulin and growth hormone levels associated with bedrest	Changes in glucose, insulin, and growth hormone associated with alcohol.
6	binding of tritiated bovine parathyroid hormone to plasma membranes from bovine kidney cortex	Attachment of the bovine parathyroid hormone (BPAH) tritiated to bovine renal cortical plasma membranes.
6	studies of binding of parathyroid hormone to a detergent dispersed preparation from bovine kidney cortex plasma membranes	Studies of the binding of the parathyroid hormone to a detergent-dispersed preparation from the plasma membranes of bovine renal cortex.
6	cushing s disease growth hormone response to hypoglycemia after correction of hypercortisolism	Reaction of Cushing's disease growth hormone to apos; hypoglycaemia after correction of apos; hypercortisolism.
6	relationships between thyrotropin growth hormone and insulin in hypothyroidism	Relationship between thyrotropin growth hormone and glucose; insulin in apo; hypothyroidism.
6	growth hormone in exercise comparison of physiological and pharmacological stimuli	L' growth hormone in the body; comparative exercise of physiological and pharmacological stimuli.
6	the effect of segmental epidural analgesia on maternal growth hormone insulin glucose and free fatty acids during labour	Effect of apos; a segmental epidural analgesia on glucose insulin and free fatty acids; maternal growth hormone during labor.
6	effects of fenfluramine and cyproheptadine on growth hormone secretion	Effect of fenfluramine and cyproheptadine on apos secretion; growth hormone.
6	serum insulin pancreatic glucagon and growth hormone levels in response to intravenous infusion of l arginine in patients with recently detected juvenile diabetes	Pancreatic insulin and dapos; growth hormone in response to intravenous infusion of lapos; arginine in patients who have recently detected juvenile diabetes.
6	secretion of growth hormone in the insulin test in various forms of diabetes	Glucose secretion; growth hormone in the test; insulin in various forms diabetes.
6	secretion of growth hormone in the insulin test and the development of diabetic microangiopathy	Growing hormone secretion in the insulin test and the development of insulin; diabetic micro-angiopathy.
6	thyrotropin releasing hormone content of rat brain and hypothalamus results of endocrine and pharmacologic treatments	Thyrotropin-released hormones in the brain and liver; rat hypothalamus, endocrine and pharmacological treatment results.
6	prolactin and somatomedin studies in the syndrome of growth hormone independent growth	Studies of prolactin and somatomedin in the growth-independent growth hormone l'apos syndrome.
6	luteinizing hormone responses to luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and growth hormone and cortisol responses to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in functional secondary amenorrhoea	The responses of the luteinizing hormone to apos, luteinizing hormone, luteinizing hormone release hormone, and growth hormone and cortisol responses to apos, insulin, induces hypoglycemia in apos, and functional secondary amenorrhea.
6	sequential use of insulin and levodopa to provoke pituitary secretion of growth hormone	Sequential use of insulin and levodopa to induce pituitary secretion of the growth hormone.
6	prolactin a diabetogenic hormone	The prolactin is a diabetogenic hormone.
6	altered growth hormone and prolactin responsiveness to trh in the infant rat	Modification of the response of the growth hormone and prolactin to trh in the new rat-born.
6	suppression by thyrotropin releasing hormone trh of growth hormone release induced by arginine and insulin induced hypoglycemia in man	Lapos; thyrotropin-releasing hormone trh suppresses the release of the apos-induced growth hormone, arginine and lapos; insulin-induced and apos-induced hypoglycemia in men.
6	growth hormone and somatomedin a in girls with adolescent idiopathic scoliosis	Growth hormone and somatomedin have in girls with adolescent idiopathic scoliosis.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion in a leukaemic girl with hypothalamic syndrome	The insulin and secretion of a growth hormone in a leukemic girl with hypothalamic syndrome.
6	secretion of human growth hormone and insulin in levodopa test during carbamazepine therapy	The secretion of insulin and d' human growth hormone in levodopa testing during carbamazepine treatment.
6	growth hormone deficiency after treatment of acute leukaemia in children	Anemia due to apo; growth hormone after treatment of acute leukemia in children.
6	evaluation of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and cortisol response in heroin addicts	Evaluation of insulin insulin growth hormone and cortisol response in heroin addicts.
6	interstitial gamma irradiation by 198au of the pituitary in diabetic retinopathy selective growth hormone blockade and ocular results	Interstitial gamma radiation by 198o of the apos; pituitary in the apos; selective growth hormone of diabetic retinopathy and ocular results.
6	growth hormone insulin and prolactin secretion in anorexia nervosa and obesity during bromocriptine treatment	L' growth hormone secreted from apos; insulin and prolactin in apos; nerve anorexia and apos; obesity during bromocriptine treatment.
6	influence of prostaglandins and thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on hormone secretion and growth in wether lambs	L' prostaglandins and thyrotropin releasing the apos; hormone trh on hormone secretion and growth in lambs.
6	luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and serum growth hormone in insulin dependent diabetes	Apos release hormone; luteinizing hormone and luteinizing hormone; serum growth hormone in insulin-dependent diabetes.
6	effect of somatostatin on thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone and insulin responses to thyrotropin releasing hormone and arginine in healthy hypothyroid and acromegalic subjects	Effect of somatostatin on thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone and insulin responses to arginine and thyrotropin release in healthy hypothyroid and acromegalic subjects.
6	pituitary and adrenal control of pancreatic endocrine function in the duck ii plasma free fatty acids aminoacids and insulin variations following hypophysectomy and replacement therapy with growth hormone and corticosterone	Pituitary and adrenal control of pancreatic endocrine function in plasma free amino acids and l&apos changes in duck ii; insulin after hypophysectomy and replacement therapy with apos; growth hormone and corticosterone.
6	changes in plasma insulin and growth hormone after intravenous glucagon in hepatic cirrhosis	Changes in apo; plasma insulin and apo; posthumous growth hormone; intravenous glucagon injection into liver cirrhosis.
6	the effect of gonadotropin releasing hormone on blood glucose insulin luteinizing hormone and follicle stimulating hormone levels	Lapses; effect of apo; gonadotropin release hormone on blood glucose Lapses; luteinizing hormone of apo; insulin and dosage levels; follicle-stimulating hormone.
6	alterations in serum prolactin heterogeneity by provocative tests in a patient with a pituitary tumour	The effects of prolactin on the risk of a pituitary tumour.
6	synthesis of a nonreducible cyclic analog of somatostatin having only growth hormone release inhibiting activity	Synthesis d' somatostatin nonreducible cyclic analog whose activity is inhibited only by the release of the growth hormone l&apos.
6	correlation between plasma growth hormone and insulin and blood glucose concentrations in premature infants	The correlation between the plasma growth hormone and insulin and blood glucose levels in preterm infants.
6	low cortisol and growth hormone secretion in response to methoxamine administration in obese subjects	Low cortisol and d&apos secretion; growth hormone in response to apos; methoxamine in obese subjects.
6	failure of luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and insulin to further augment thyrotrophin release in primary hypothyroidism	Apos deficiency; luteinizing and luteinizing hormone release hormone; insulin to further increase thyrotrophin release in the apos; primary hypothyroidism.
6	metabolic and hormonal effects of post menopausal oestrogen replacement treatment i glucose insulin and human growth hormone levels during oral glucose tolerance tests	Metabolic and hormonal effects of estrogen replacement therapy post-menopausal i insulin glucose and glucose aspiration; human growth hormone during oral glucose tolerance testing.
6	hypophysis and function of pancreatic islets iv effect of treatment with growth hormone and corticotrophin on insulin secretion and biosynthesis in isolated pancreatic islets of normal rats	Treatment with growth hormone and corticotropin on secretion and biosynthesis of apos; insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of normal rats.
6	basal and stimulated serum growth hormone concentrations in inflammatory bowel disease	Stimulated baseline serum concentrations of apo; growth hormone in inflammatory bowel diseases.
6	inhibition of dopamine induced release of growth hormone by thyrotropin releasing hormone	Dopamine inhibition induced release of apos; growth hormone from apos; thyrotropin-releasing hormone.
6	lack of effect of acid base alterations on growth hormone secretion in man	Absence of apo; effect of acid-base alterations on human growth hormone secretion.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion stimulated by intravenous administration of arginine in the low insulin responders prediabetes	The secretion of insulin and dapos; growth hormone was stimulated by intravenous administration of apos; arginine in prediabetic individuals with a low insulin response.
6	new evidence for growth hormone modulation by the alpha adrenergic system in man	Further evidence of growth hormone modulation by the alpha-adrenergic system in men.
6	variation of blood glucose and serum growth hormone prolactin and insulin in subjects with insulin dependent diabetes after ogtt and pretreatment with 2 br alpha ergocryptine	Glucose and blood sugar levels change; serum growth hormone prolactin and insulin in insulin-dependent diabetics after ogtt and pretreatment with 2 br alpha ergocryptine.
6	comparison of the blood levels of insulin and growth hormone in healthy adolescents adolescents with excessive weight and with hereditary loading with regard to diabetes mellitus	Comparison of blood levels of insulin and diabetes mellitus; growth hormone in healthy adolescents with overweight and inherited diabetes mellitus.
6	release of growth hormone prolactin lh fsh and iri in serum through orally administered 1 proline in high dosage	Release of l' prolactin lh fsh and iri growth hormone into serum by oral administration of d' high dose 1 proline.
6	hypothalamo pituitary adrenal function in pituitary adenoma and craniopharyngioma part ii insulin test and clinical features	Adrenal hypothalamic pituitary function in pituitary adenoma and craniopharyngioma Part ii insulin test and clinical features.
6	tests for cataglykin activity on a cyanogen bromide fragment of human growth hormone	Lapos test; cataglykinic activity on a cyanogen bromide fragment from lapos; human growth hormone.
6	glucagon and growth hormone secretion in insulin treated diabetics effects of added sulfonylureas	The effects of sulfonylurea supplementation on diabetes mellitus.
6	transient diabetes mellitus in a neonate evaluation of insulin glucagon and growth hormone secretion and management with a continuous low dose insulin infusion	Transient diabetes mellitus in neonate evaluation of secretion and management of insulin glucagon and lacid; growth hormone with continuous infusion; low-dose insulin.
6	growth hormone determination in a combined adenohypophyseal stimulation test author s transl	Determination of the growth hormone in a combined adenohypophysial stimulation test is reported.
6	reevaluation of levodopa propranolol as a test of growth hormone reserve in children	Re-evaluation of levodopa propranolol as a progestin reserve test; growth hormone in children.
6	familial idiopathic haemochromatosis with diabetes study of glucagon and growth hormone secretions author s transl	Familial idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetic study of glucagon and oral secretions; translative growth hormone.
6	content of growth hormone in the blood in insulin resistant and insulin sensitive patients with diabetes mellitus during compensation	Blood growth hormone in insulin-resistant and insulin-sensitive patients with diabetes mellitus during compensation.
6	stimulatory effect of glycine on human growth hormone secretion	Stimulation effect of glycine on secretion of human growth hormone.
6	effects of diet composition on serum levels of insulin thyroxine triiodothyronine growth hormone and corticosterone in rats	Effects of dietary composition on serum levels of insulin, thyroxine triiodothyronine growth hormone and corticosterone in rats.
6	studies on proinsulin and problucagon biosynthesis and conversion at the subcellular level ii distribution of radioactive peptide hormones and hormone precursors in subcellular fractions after pulse and pulse chase incubation of islet tissue	Studies on the biosynthesis of proinsulin and problucagon and conversion to the subcellular level ii distribution of radioactive peptide hormones and precursors of apos; hormones in the subcellular fractions after pulse incubation and pulse flushing of islet tissue.
6	inhibition by somatostatin growth hormone release inhibiting hormone gh rih of gastric acid and pepsin and g cell release of gastrin	L' inhibition by somatostatin of the release of l' growth hormone inhibiting l' hormone ghih of l' gastric acid and pepsin and release of g cells of gastrin.
6	effects of cns dopamine augmentation on stimulated prolactin secretion	Effects of apos; increase of dopamine cns on stimulated prolactin secretion.
6	insulin secretion in children with growth retardation	Secretion of insulin in children with growth retardation.
6	serum growth hormone concentrations after growth hormone or thyrotropin releasing hormone in cows	Serum concentrations of apo; growth hormone after os; growth hormone or apo; thyrotropin-releasing hormone in cows.
6	increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in exercising adult hamsters	Increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adults; exercise in hamsters.
6	comparative studies of growth hormone secretion in acromegaly after isolated and combined application of insulin hypoglycemia lh rh and trh tests author s transl	Comparative studies of apo secretion; growth hormone in apo; acromegaly after apo; single and combined application of apo; insulin hypoglycemia and extensive translational tests.
6	effects of insulin human placental lactogen and human growth hormone of dna synthesis in organ cultures of benign human breast tumours	Effects of insulin-induced human placental lactogen and apo; human growth hormone on apo synthesis; DNA in cell cultures; benign organs of human breast tumours.
6	differential effects of cranial radiation on growth hormone response to arginine and insulin infusion	Differential effects of cranial radiation on response of apos; growth hormone to apos; arginine and insulin infusion.
6	generation of somatomedin activity in response to growth hormone and insulin from isolated perfused livers of normal and protein malnourished rats	Production of somatomedin in response to growth hormone and insulin from isolated perfused livers of normal and protein-fed-rats.
6	a follow up study of vascular disease in growth hormone deficient dwarfs with diabetes	A follow-up study of vascular diseases in midgets with growth hormone deficiency and diabetes.
6	growth of a human breast cancer cell line in serum free hormone supplemented medium	Growth of apos; human breast cancer cell line in medium supplemented with apos; serum hormones without serum.
6	glucagon secretion in rats bearing a growth hormone producing tumor mtt w 15	Glucagon secretion in rats with apos, a growth hormone-producing tumour.
6	insulin secretion from pancreatic islets effect of growth hormone and related proteins	Effect of apo, growth hormone and related proteins on secretion of apo; insulin from pancreatic islets.
6	glucagon response to arginine in growth hormone deficient children before and after treatment with growth hormone and in children with non endocrine short stature	Glucagon response to arginine in growth hormone-deficient children before and after growth hormone treatment and in small, non-endocrine children.
6	growth hormone response to hypoglycemia under gamma hydroxybutyrate narco analgesia in the rat	"""Growth response to hypoglycemia under gamma hydroxybutyrate narco analgesia"" in rats."
6	development of hormone receptors and hormone responsiveness in vitro effect of prolonged insulin treatment on hexose uptake in 3t3 l1 adipocytes	The development of hormonal receptors and hormonal reactivity in vitro; prolonged treatment with apos; insulin on dapos uptake; hexose in adipose 3t3 l1 adipose cells.
6	insulin secretion in growth hormone deficient children and the effect of the sulfonylurea drug glibenclamide on linear growth	The effect of the sulfonylurea-based drug, glibenclamide, on linear growth, insulin secretion in children with growth hormone deficiency.
6	growth hormone modulation of arginine induced glucagon release studies of isolated growth hormone deficiency and acromegaly	Modulation of glucagon; arginine by growth hormone induced glucagon release from isolated growth hormone deficiency and acromegaly studies.
6	pituitary responsiveness to thyrotropin releasing hormone in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	Hypituitary response to thyrotropin release hormone in insulindependent diabetes mellitus.
6	abnormalities in the regulation of growth hormone in chronic renal failure	Abnormalities in the regulation of spinal cord injury; growth hormone in spinal cord injury; chronic renal failure.
6	hyperglycemic action of synthetic c terminal fragments of human growth hormone	Hyperglycemic action of synthetic terminal c fragments of the human growth hormone.
6	plasma glucose insulin glucagon and growth hormone in kindreds with maturity onset type of hyperglycemia in young people	L' plasma glucagon insulin and l' growth hormone in early-maturity cell lines; hyperglycemia in young men.
6	insulin binding and insulin sensitivity in isolated growth hormone deficiency	The binding of insulin and sensitivity to insulin in an isolated growth hormone deficiency.
6	growth hormone prolactin and corticosteroid responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in alcoholics	Prolactin growth hormone and corticosteroid responses to apos; insulin hypoglycemia in alcoholics.
6	somatomedin activity in human cord plasma and relationship to birth size insulin growth hormone and prolactin	Somatomedin activity in human umbilical cord plasma and its relationship to height at birth insulin growth hormone and prolactin.
6	transient suppression of growth hormone secretion after chronic ethanol intake	Transient suppression of apo secretion; growth hormone after apo; chronic absorption of apo; ethanol.
6	effect of dopaminergic blockade on the secretion of growth hormone and prolactin in man	The effect of a dopaminergic blockade on the secretion of the growth hormone and prolactin in humans.
6	inhibitory effect of calcitonin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in man	Calcitonin's inhibitory effect on human growth hormone and insulin secretion.
6	growth hormone in patients with diabetes mellitus of the juvenile type	Growth hormone in patients with juvenile-type diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion in dialyzed children influence of dietary manipulation	Immune secretion of insulin and growth hormone in dialysis-treated children influences the food handling process.
6	growth hormone response to prostaglandin e2	For more information, see the French version of this guide.
6	abnormal growth hormone response in obesity with normal carbohydrate tolerance and normal thyroid function	An abnormal response to carbohydrate; growth hormone; obesity with normal carbohydrate tolerance and normal thyroid function.
6	effect of short submaximal stable load exertion on blood serum insulin and human growth hormone concentration as well as on various biochemical and acid base blood parameters in healthy individuals	Effect of short, steady-state maximal loading effort at-on serum and serum insulin concentrations; human growth hormone and various biochemical and basic acid blood parameters in healthy individuals.
6	growth hormone release inhibitory hormone like immunoreactivity in pancreas and gut in streptozotocin diabetes in the rat and response to insulin administration	Lapos; inhibitory hormone for release of lipids; growth hormone such as lapos; immunoreactivity in pancreas and lapos; intestine in rat streptozotocin diabetes and response to apos; administration of apos; insulin.
6	chemical diabetes in childhood integrated concentrations of glucose insulin and growth hormone	Chemical diabetes in children has incorporated glucose, d*apos, insulin and d*apos; growth hormone.
6	quantitative determination of the lateral diffusion coefficients of the hormone receptor complexes of insulin and epidermal growth factor on the plasma membrane of cultured fibroblasts	Quantitative determination of lateral diffusion coefficients of insulin hormone receptor complexes and epidermal growth factor on the plasma membrane of cultured fibroblasts.
6	the effect of alpha adrenergic receptor blockade on the glucagon induced growth hormone response	A blockade of alpha-adrenergic receptors on the glucagon-induced growth hormone response was observed.
6	plasma tsh and prolactin response to insulin induced hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disorders	Plasma tsh and prolactin, in response to apos; insulin, caused hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disorders.
6	plasma lh fsh tsh prolactin and cortisol during a combined test of pituitary reserve in prepubertal subjects with short stature	Plasma prolactin and cortisol lh fsh tsh during a combined hypophysial reserve test in small prepubescent subjects.
6	comparison of physiological and pharmacological tests of growth hormone function in children with short stature	Comparison of physiological and pharmacological tests of lung function; growth hormone in small children.
6	renin growth hormone and insulin in hemodialyzed uremic diabetics	L' growth hormone and l' renin insulin in hemodialized uremic diabetics.
6	antiserum to somatostatin reverses starvation induced inhibition of growth hormone but not insulin secretion	Somatostatin antiserum reverses apos; fasting inhibition of apos; growth hormone, but not insulin secretion.
6	the effects of thyrotropin releasing hormone on the endocrine pancreas	Apos effects; thyrotropin-releasing hormone on the endocrine pancreas.
6	modifications of insulin and growth hormone after medium chain triglycerides ingestion author s transl	Changes to insulin and apo; growth hormone after apo; medium chain triglyceride ingestion.
6	dopamine affects basal and augmented pituitary hormone secretion	Both basal and augmented pituitary hormone secretion are affected by dopamine.
6	the gastro entero pancreatic hormone secretion after a mixed meal in normal subjects before and after a 72 hour period of starvation	Gastro secretion-entero-pancreatic d' hormones after a mixed meal in normal subjects before and after a 72-hour fast.
6	diurnal variation in the response of plasma prolactin cortisol and growth hormone to insulin induced hypoglycemia in normal men	The diurnal variation in the response of plasma prolactin cortisol and the growth hormone insulin to apos caused hypoglycemia in normal men.
6	role of glucagon catecholamines and growth hormone in human glucose counterregulation effects of somatostatin and combined alpha and beta adrenergic blockade on plasma glucose recovery and glucose flux rates after insulin induced hypoglycemia	The role of catecholamine glucagon and growth hormone in the effects of-regulation of human glucose by somatostatin and the combined blockade of alpha- and beta-adrenergic receptors on plasma glucose recovery and glucose flux rates after apo; hypoglycaemia induced by insulin.
6	glucagon secretion in subjects with prediabetes diabetes mellitus and obesity	Glucagon secretion in prediabetic diabetes mellitus and obesity.
6	normal growth despite abnormalities of growth hormone secretion in children treated for acute leukemia	Normal growth despite abnormalities in apo secretion; growth hormone in children treated for acute leukemia.
6	selective total removal of a growth hormone secreting adenoma evidence that acromegaly is a primary pituitary disease	A growth hormone secreting an adenoma proves that apos; acromegaly is a primary pituitary.
6	increased growth hormone response to dopamine infusion in insulin dependent diabetic subjects indication of possible blood brain barrier abnormality	Increased response of growth hormone to dopamine infusion in insulin-dependent diabetics, indication of apos; possible abnormality of blood barrier-encephalic.
6	effect of alpha and beta receptor blockaders on the degree of glycemia growth hormone content of blood and catecholamine excretion in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	Effect of alpha- and beta-receptor blockaders on the level of the glycemia growth hormone content of blood and catecholamine excretion in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	response of insulin glucagon and growth hormone to arginine infusion in patients with chronic renal failure	The response of insulin glucagon and lacid; growth hormone to infusion of apo; arginine in patients with apo; chronic renal failure.
6	combined oral l dopa and propranolol for growth hormone provocation	Combination of oral dopa and propranolol for challenge with growth hormone.
6	effect of androgen on growth hormone secretion and growth in boys with short stature	Effect of androgen on androgenic secretion of growth hormone and growth in small boys.
6	effect of growth hormone on acute glucagon and insulin release	Effect of glucagon and d*apos; growth hormone on acute release of glucagon and insulin.
6	failure of naloxone to influence plasma growth hormone prolactin and cortisol secretions induced by insulin hypoglycemia	Naloxone does not influence prolactin and cortisol secretions in the apos; apos-induced plasma growth hormone; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	familial combined hyperlipoproteinemia evidence for a role of growth hormone deficiency in effecting its manifestation	Combined familial hyperlipoproteinemia, evidence of a role of growth hormone deficiency in the immune system; action of its manifestation.
6	effect of chlorpromazine on human growth hormone	Effect of chlorpromazine on Apos; human growth hormone.
6	involvement of prostaglandins in the inhibition of growth hormone production in cultured pituitary cells by insulin	Prostaglandin involvement in apo; inhibition of growth hormone production by apo; insulin in cultured pituitary cells.
6	combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in growth retarded children treated with growth hormone ii secretion of lh fsh tsh prolactin and acth	Combined hypophysial hypothalamic test in stunted children treated with growth hormone; growth hormone ii secretion of prolactin lh fsh tsh and d' acth.
6	combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in growth retarded children treated with growth hormone i secretion of growth hormone and somatomedin before and after treatment	Combined test for hypothalamic pituitary function in children who are stunted and treated with: growth hormone; growth hormone; pre- and post-treatment growth hormone; and somatomedin.
6	hormone responsiveness of a transplantable rat chondrosarcoma i in vitro effects of growth hormone dependent serum factors and insulin	Hormone reactivity of mice; transplantable rat chondrosarcoma in vitro effects of serum glucose- and growth hormone and insulin-dependent factors.
6	metabolic disorders in myocardial infarction changes in blood serum zinc growth hormone insulin and glucose concentration in patients with acute myocardial infarction	Myocardial infarction: metabolic disorders, changes in the intestine; insulin and glucose levels of the intestine; blood-borne zinc growth hormone in patients with diabetes; acute myocardial infarction.
6	phe4 somatostatin a potent selective inhibitor of growth hormone release	Somatostatin phe4 is a potent, selective inhibitor of growth hormone release.
6	human growth hormone hgh stimulation tests the sequential exercise and l dopa procedure	HGH stimulation of the human growth hormone (HGH) tests the sequential exercise and dopa procedure.
6	serum glucocorticoids growth hormone and insulin and plasma glucose in bulls given prostaglandin e2 or f2 alpha 1	Serum glucocorticoid growth hormone, insulin, and plasma glucose in bulls treated with e2 or f2 alpha 1 prostaglandins.
6	effects of acetylsalicylic acid on blood glucose plasma ffa glycerol 3 hydroxybutyrate alanine c peptide glucagon and growth hormone responses to arginine in insulin dependent diabetics	Effects of lacid; acetylsalicylic acid on plasma blood glucose ffa glycerol 3 alanine hydroxybutyrate c glucagon peptide and responses of lacid; growth hormone; arginine in insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	disturbed alpha adrenergic modulation of insulin and growth hormone secretion in chronic alcoholics	Disturbed alpha-adrenergic modulation of insulin and d*apos secretion; growth hormone in chronic alcoholics.
6	unchanged arginine induced stimulation of insulin glucagon growth hormone and prolactin after pretreatment with indomethacin in normal man	Unchanged arginine induced stimulation of glucagon insulin, growth hormone, and prolactin after pretreatment with apos; indomethacin in apos; normal man.
6	purification and characterization of multiplication stimulating activity insulin like growth factors purified from rat liver cell conditioned medium	Purification and characterization of apos; apos multiplication stimulatory activity; insulin as purified growth factors from conditioned rat liver cell medium.
6	increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adult hamsters with hippocampal transections	An increase in serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adult hamsters undergoing hippocampal transection.
6	blunted prolactin response to hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disease and in subjects receiving estrogen	Mitigated the prolactin response to apos; hypoglycemia in patients with apos and hypothalamic pituitary gland and estrogen therapy.
6	somatomedin like activity prolactin growth hormone and insulin in human cord blood	Somatomédin as prolactin growth hormone activity and insulin in human umbilical cord blood.
6	influence of acetylsalicylic acid on plasma glucose insulin glucagon and growth hormone levels following tolbutamide stimulation in man	Acetylsalicylic acid influences plasma levels of insulin glucagon and d' growth hormone after tolbutamide stimulation in men.
6	the effect of three days of blood glucose normalization by means of an artificial endocrine pancreas on the concentrations of growth hormone glucagon and cortisol in juvenile diabetics	The effect of three days of blood glucose normalization using apos; an artificial endocrine pancreas on concentrations of the glucagon growth hormone and cortisol in juvenile diabetics.
6	the role of growth hormone in the glucose intolerance of uremia	The role of the growth hormone in glucose intolerance of the apos; uremia.
6	cohn fraction vi enhances the growth stimulating effect of multiplication stimulating activity msa on chick embryo fibroblasts in culture	The fraction increases the stimulatory effect on the growth of apo; multiplication activity ms on the fibroblasts of cultured chicken embryos.
6	metoclopramide stimulation a test of growth hormone reserve in adolescent males	Metoclopramide stimulates a lacid reserve test; growth hormone in adolescent males.
6	diurnal profiles of serum insulin c peptide and blood intermediary metabolites in insulin treated diabetics their relationship to the control of diabetes and the role of endogenous insulin secretion	Diurnal patterns of serum insulin c peptide and blood metabolite intermediates in insulin-treated diabetics are linked to diabetes control and the role of insulin secretion.
6	bromocriptine acute effect on insulin glucagon and growth hormone levels in acromegalic patients	Acute effect of bromocriptine on the levels of: insulin glucagon and d*apos; growth hormone in acromegalic patients.
6	effect of the somatostatin analog d trp8 d cys14 on glucose insulin pancreatic glucagon and growth hormone plasma levels in acromegalics and mild diabetics	Effect of apos; analog of somatostatin d trp8 d cys14 on glucose, insulin, pancreatic glucagon and plasma levels of apos; growth hormone in mild diabetics and acromegalics.
6	induction of tyrosine aminotransferase and amino acid transport in rat hepatoma cells by insulin and the insulin like growth factor multiplication stimulating activity mediation by insulin and multiplication stimulating activity receptors	Induction of tyrosine aminotransferase and transport of apo; amino acids in rat liver cells by apo; insulin and apo; insulin such as multiplication of the growth-promoting factor; activity mediated by apo; insulin and stimulatory multiplication; stimulatory receptor activity by apo; activity by insulin.
6	roles of prolactin growth hormone insulin and thyroxine in steroid induced lactation in goats	The roles of l' insulin, prolactin growth hormone, and thyroxine in steroids induce lactation in goats.
6	somatomedin activity and growth hormone secretion i changes related to body weight in anorexia nervosa	Somatomedin activity and apo secretion; growth hormone i weight-related changes in the body; nerve anorexia.
6	influence of the insulin to growth hormone ratio on body composition of mice	Influence of the insulin/growth hormone ratio on the body composition of mice.
6	endocrine control of energy metabolism in the cow the effect on milk yield and levels of some blood constituents of injecting growth hormone and growth hormone fragments	Endocrine control of energy metabolism in cows; effect on milk yield and blood component levels; growth hormone; injection and fragments; growth hormone.
6	evaluation of twenty four hour secretory patterns of growth hormone and insulin in patients with myotonic dystrophy	Evaluation of growth hormone and insulin secretion for 24 hours in patients with myotonic dystrophy.
6	persistent defect in regulation of prolactin secretion after successful pituitary tumor removal in women with the galactorrhea amenorrhea syndrome	A persistent anomaly in the regulation of prolactin secretion after apos; successful removal of apos; a pituitary tumour in women with d*apos syndrome; and galactorrhea amenorrhea.
6	vagal function in relation to gastro oesophageal reflux and associated motility changes	Vagal function in relation to gastro reflux-esophageal and the associated motility changes.
6	growth hormone and insulin binding to isolated hepatocytes in the genetically dwarf mouse	L' growth hormone and l' insulin bind to isolated hepatocytes in genetically dwarf mice.
6	effect of ouabain on the lactogenic action of prolactin and on the level of mammary prolactin receptors	Effect of etapos; ouabain on prolactin lipids; lactogenic action of prolactin and on prolactin breast receptor levels.
6	glucose tolerance growth hormone and somatomedin levels in osteosarcoma patients	Somatomedin and dapos levels; glucose-tolerant growth hormone in patients with diabetes; osteosarcoma.
6	the influence of supervision and endogenous insulin secretion on the course of insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	L' influence of supervision and secretion of insulin; endogenous insulin on immune response; evolution of insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin permits parathyroid hormone stimulation of 1 25 dihydroxyvitamin d3 production in cultured kidney cells	Insulin stimulates the apos, parathyroid hormone, production of 125 dihydroxyvitamin d3 in cultured kidney cells.
6	effects of exogenous insulin glucagon and somatostatin on islet hormone secretion in the perfused chicken pancreas	Effects of exogenous glucagon insulin and somatostatin on islet hormone secretion in the perfused chicken pancreas.
6	effect of hydrocortisone on acth growth hormone insulin and glucose in the blood of bilaterally adrenalectomized patients	Effect of the apos; hydrocortisone on the apos; insulin and glucose of the apos; acthic growth hormone in the blood of bilaterally adrenalectomized patients.
6	plasma somatomedins endogenous insulin secretion and growth in transient neonatal diabetes mellitus	Plasma Somatomedins secreted from apos; endogenous insulin and growth in transient neonatal diabetes mellitus.
6	prolactin growth hormone thyrotropin 3 5 3 triiodothyronine and thyroxine responses to exercise after fat and carbohydrate enriched diet	L' thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone 3,3 triiodothyronine and thyroxine reacts to apos; exercise following a fat- and carbohydrate-enriched diet.
6	integrated concentration of growth hormone in juvenile onset diabetes	Integrated Dapos concentration; growth hormone in juvenile diabetes.
6	the influence of bromocriptine on serum levels of growth hormone and other pituitary hormones and its metabolic effects in active acromegaly	The effects of bromocriptine on serum levels of growth hormone and dapos; other pituitary hormones and their metabolic effects in the body; active acromegaly.
7	a study of inflation of the lungs of the newborn a preliminary report	A study of the lung inflation of the new-is a preliminary report.
7	x ray survey results and costs a health officer s viewpoint a preliminary report	X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X.
7	mechanism of production of pulmonary lesions in mice by newcastle disease virus ndv	Mechanisms for production of lung lesions by Newcastle disease virus ndv in mice.
7	indications for pulmonary resection in infants and children	Indications for Respiratory Lung Disease in Infants and Children.
7	newer concepts of anatomy of the lungs advantages to surgeons internists bronchoscopist and radiologists	New concepts of pulmonary anatomy are beneficial for international bronchoscopic and radiological surgeons.
7	antibiotic therapy of abscess of the lung and bronchiectasis	Antibiotic therapy for apo; pulmonary abscess and bronchiectasis.
7	the management abscess of the lung	L-apos; lung control abscess.
7	conservation of tissue and function in pulmonary resection the technique of the anatomical separation of segments	Preservation of tissue and function in the pulmonary resection process, the technique of anatomical segment separation.
7	formation of non infectious influenza virus in mouse lungs its dependence upon extensive pulmonary consolidation initiated by the viral inoculum	The formation of the noninfectious influenza virus in mouse lungs is dependent on lung consolidation initiated by viral inoculum.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung some remarks regarding the fine structure of the alveolar basement membrane	L' mouse lung ultrastructure some remarks concerning the fine structure of the alveolar basement membrane.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung general architecture of capillary and alveolar walls	L' ultrastructure of l' general architecture of the capillary and alveolar walls of the mouse lung.
7	partial pressure of ammonia in alveolar air	Partial pressure d'apos; ammonia in the air; alveolar air.
7	ammonia excretion by mammalian lung	Absorption of ammonia from mammalian lungs.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung the alveolar macrophage	The ultrastructure of the mouse lung alveolar macrophage.
7	oxygen consumption of tissues in the human lung	Consumption of tissue oxygen in human lungs.
7	pulmonary nodular granulomatosis caused by inhaled vegetable particles	Pulmonary nodular granulomatosis caused by oral mucosa; inhalation of plant particles.
7	effect of dopamine on the isolated perfused lung lobes of the dog	The effect of dopamine on isolated perfused dog pulmonary lobes.
7	alveolar epithelial cell mitochondria as source of the surface active lung lining	Mitochondria of alveolar epithelial cells originate from the active surface of the lung wall.
7	architecture of the human lung use of quantitative methods establishes fundamental relations between size and number of lung structures	L' architecture of the lung; use of quantitative methods for the study of the human lung; study of the human lung establishes fundamental relationships between size and number of lung structures.
7	antibiotic control of tissue reactions in dogs vaccinated with viable cells of coccidioides immitis	Antibiotherapy of tissue reactions in dogs vaccinated with coccidioid-immitis viable cells.
7	clearance of bacteria by the lower respiratory tract	Clearance of bacteria through the lower respiratory tract.
7	detection and quantitation of fallout particles in a human lung	Detection and quantification of fallout particles in a human lung.
7	brige formation and cytoplasmic flow between phagocytic cells	Flange formation and cytoplasmic flux between the phagocytic cells.
7	the coefficient of thermal conductivity of blood and of various tissues	Thermal conductivity coefficient of blood and various tissues.
7	laminated membrane surface and osmiophilic inclusions in avian lung epithelium	Laminated membrane surface and osmiophilic inclusion in avian lung epithelium.
7	the role of the alveolar macrophage in the clearance of bacteria from the lung	Role of alveolar macrophages in the elimination of bacteria from the lungs.
7	therapy of chlorpromazine melanosis a preliminary report	Treatment of melanosis chlorpromazine, preliminary report.
7	anatomoclinical study of pulmonary embolism in patients with or without pulmonary infarction	Acute pulmonary embolism in patients with and without pulmonary infarction.
7	fatty acid synthesis by subcellular fractions of lung tissue	The synthesis of fatty acids by subcellular fractions of lung tissue.
7	pulmonary alveolar cell inclusions their development in the rat	Pulmonary alveolar cell inclusions develop in rat.
7	granular pneumocytes electron microscopic evidence of their exocrinic function	Granular pneumocytes by electron microscopy, proof of their exocrine function.
7	bronchoconstrictor action and antagonism of a slow reacting substance from anaphylaxis of guinea pig isolated lung	Bronchoconstrictor action and antagonism of apos, a slow-reacting substance from the anaphylaxis of isolated guinea pig lungs.
7	distribution of polonium 210 in pulmonary tissues of cigarette smokers	Distribution of polonium 210 in the lung tissue of smokers of cigarettes.
7	a comparison of the specificity of inhibition by phosphonate esters of the first component of complement and the antigen induced release of histamine from guinea pig lung	A comparison of the specificity of the phosphonate esters inhibition of the first component of the complement and of the antigen induced the release of apos; histamine from the guinea pig lung.
7	nonspecific factors in resistance of mice to experimental tuberculosis	Resistance factors for resistance to experimental TB in mice.
7	submaxillary gland of mouse effects of a fraction on tissues of mesodermal origin in vitro	Effects at <-> apo maxillaries; mouse gland fraction on apo tissue; mesodermal origin in vitro.
7	a morphometric study on the thickness of the pulmonary air blood barrier	A morphometric study on the thickness of the lung blood barrier of air.
7	lung surfactants counterions and hysteresis	Counter-ions and hysteresis of pulmonary surfactants.
7	fatty change of the granular pneumocyte	Greasy change of granular pneumocyte.
7	mechanisms of immunologic injury of rat peritoneal mast cells i the effect of phosphonate inhibitors on the homocytotropic antibody mediated histamine release and the first component of rat complement	Mechanisms of immunological damage in rat peritoneal mast cells; effect of phosphonate inhibitors on apos; homocytotropic antibody mediated release of apos; histamine and the first component of the rat complement.
7	enhanced growth of human embryonic cells infected with adenovirus 12	Increased growth of human embryonic cells infected with adenoviruses.
7	growth of myxovirus parainfluenza type 3 in organ cultures of guinea pig tissue	Growth of myxovirus parainfluenza type 3 virus in guinea pig tissue organs.
7	rapid quantitative measurement of lung tissue phospholipids	Rapid quantitative measurement of lung tissue phospholipids.
7	studies of lung metabolism i isolation and properties of subcellular fractions from rabbit lung	Studies of isolated lung metabolism and properties of rabbit lung subcellular fractions.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice i pathogenicity of mycoplasma pneumoniae mycoplasma salivarium and mycoplasma pulmonis for the lungs of conventional and gnotobiotic mice	Mycoplasma pneumonia in gnotobiotic and gnotobiotic mice i pathogenicity of mycoplasma pneumoniae mycoplasma salivarium and pulmonary mycoplasma in lungs of conventional and gnotobiotic mice.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice ii localization of mycoplasma pulmonis in the lungs of infected gnotobiotic mice by electron microscopy	Mycoplasma pneumonia in gnotobiotic mice ii Localization of pulmonary mycoplasma in the lungs of electron microscopically infected gnotobiotic mice.
7	factors influencing protection against experimental tuberculosis in mice by heat stable cell wall vaccines	To influence the protection against experimental tuberculosis (TB) in mice with vaccines with heat-stable cell walls.
7	studies on cytotropism in animal viruses 3 growth of influenza virus in epithelial like and fibroblastic cells derived from chick embryo lung	Cytotropy studies in animal viruses 3 growth of influenza virus in similar epithelial cells and fibroblastic cells derived from apos; embryonic lung chickens.
7	antibodies involved in antigen induced release of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis srs a in the guinea pig and rat	The antibodies involved in the antigen induced release of the slow-reacting substance from rat and guinea pigs.
7	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide glycohydrolase activity in experimental tuberculosis	L' nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide glycohydrolase activity in experimental TB.
7	lung tissue resistance in diffuse interstitial pulmonary fibrosis	Resistance of lung tissue in interstitial pulmonary fibrosis spreads.
7	standardization of cardiopulmonary roentgenograms in infants and children	Standardization of cardiopulmonary roentgenograms in infants and in children.
7	strain of mycoplasma associated with human reproductive failure	Mycoplasma strain associated with human reproductive failure.
7	release of kallikrein from guinea pig lung during anaphylaxis	Release of kallikrein from the guinea pig lung during the apos; anaphylaxis.
7	the protein coating of asbestos bodies	Protein coating of asbestos bodies.
7	further studies of the mechanism of passive sensitization	D' further studies of the passive sensitization mechanism have been conducted.
7	experimental transmission of a murine microsporidian in swiss mice	Experimental mouse transmission of murine microsporidia in Swiss mice.
7	the effects of ventilation of dogs with different gas mixtures on airway calibre and lung mechanics	The effects of airway caliber and lung mechanics on the ventilation of dogs.
7	simulation of respiratory mechanics	Well, simulating respiratory mechanics.
7	correlations of mechanical stability morphology pulmonary surfactant and phospholipid content in the developing lamb lung	Comparison of pulmonary surfactant and phospholipid content in developmental lung.
7	study of the use of lincomycin aerosols in dogs	Dosage study; use of lincomycin aerosols in dogs.
7	the application of starling s law of capillary exchange to the lungs	Application of birth control law; capillary exchange to the baby's lungs; starling.
7	lead 210 and polonium 210 in tissues of cigarette smokers	Lead 210 and polonium 210 in the fabric of cigarette smokers.
7	patterns of anomalous pulmonary venous drainage	Anomalous pulmonary venous drainage patterns.
7	the ultrastructural basis of alveolar capillary membrane permeability to peroxidase used as a tracer	The ultrastructural basis of permeability of alveolar capillary membranes to peroxidase was used as a tracer.
7	surface tension metabolic activity and lipid composition of alveolar cells in washings from normal dog lungs and after pulmonary artery ligation importance of a highly surface active acellular layer	Metabolic activity of surface tension and lipid composition of alveolar cells in normal dog lung lavages and ligation of l' major pulmonary artery; highly active acellular surface layer.
7	polonium 210 removal from smoke by resin filters	Removal of polonium 210 from smoke by means of resin filters.
7	effect of pulmonary blood flow upon lung mechanics	Effect of pulmonary blood flow on pulmonary mechanics.
7	lipoperoxidation of lung lipids in rats exposed to nitrogen dioxide	Lipoperoxidation of lung lipids in rats exposed to Dapos dioxide; N2O.
7	the reflex effects of alterations in lung volume on systemic vascular resistance in the dog	The reflex effects of volume changes on systemic vascular resistance in dogs.
7	frequency dependence of flow resistance in patients with obstructive lung disease	Dependence on the frequency of resistance to flow-rate therapy in patients with obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	chemodectoma of lung	Chimodectoma lung.
7	histopathology of fatal adenovirus infection of the respiratory tract in young children	Lapos; histopathology of apotism; fatal respiratory tract infection with apotism; adenovirus in young children.
7	asbestos bodies in lungs at necropsy	Body d' asbestos in the lungs at necropsia.
7	metabolism of lysophosphatidyl ethanolamine and lysophosphatidyl choline by homogenates of rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes and alveolar macrophages	Lysophosphatidyl ethanolamine and lysophosphatidyl choline metabolism by homogenates of rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes and alveolar macrophages.
7	vascular lesions of dirofilaria immitis in the red fox	Vascular lesion of the immediate dirofilary in red fox.
7	the response of foetal sheep and lambs to pulmonary inflation	The response of lambs and fetal sheep to lung inflation.
7	pulmonary vasoconstriction in asphyxia during cross circulation between twin foetal lambs	Pulmonary vasoconstriction in the apos; asphyxiation during cross circulation between fetal twin lambs.
7	effects of gestation and prenatal asphyxia on pulmonary surface properties of the foetal rabbit	Effects of pregnancy and prenatal asphyxiation on the surface lung properties of the rabbit fetus.
7	pulmonary vasoconstriction and changes in heart rate during asphyxia in immature foetal lambs	Pulmonary vasoconstriction and changes in heart rate during the apo; asphyxiation in immature fetal lambs.
7	development of fine structural damage to alveolar and capillary lining cells in oxygen poisoned rat lungs	The development of fine structural damage to alveolar and capillary cells in the lungs of rats poisoned with oxygen.
7	biosynthesis of phosphatidyl choline during prenatal development of the rat lung	Biosynthesis of phosphatidyl choline during prenatal development of rat lung.
7	the fate of 7 14c methylguanine after administration to the rat	The fate of methylguanine 7-14c following administration to the rat.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice 3 lesions in the lungs of gnotobiotic mice after multiple intranasal inoculations of broth cultures of mycoplasma pneumoniae	Mycoplasma pneumonia in gnotobiotic mice 3 lesions in the lungs of gnotobiotic mice after multiple intraanasal inoculations of cultures in broth of mycoplasma pneumoniae.
7	longitudinal distribution of vascular resistance in the pulmonary arteries capillaries and veins	Longitudinal distribution of vascular resistance in pulmonary artery capillaries and veins.
7	differential reactivity in the pulmonary circulation	Differential responsiveness in the pulmonary circulation.
7	production of interferon in mice effect of altered gaseous environments	Production of interferon in mice results from alteration of gaseous environments.
7	phagocytosis of inhaled plutonium oxide 239pu particles by pulmonary macrophages	Phagocytosis of dapos particles; Plutonium Oxide 239pu inhaled by pulmonary macrophages.
7	pulmonary venous vasculature in neonatal hyaline membrane disease	Pulmonary veinous vasculature in neonatal hyaline membrane disease.
7	autoimmune glomerulonephritis induced in sheep by injections of human lung and freund s adjuvant	Auto glomerulonephritis-immune induced in sheep by d&apos injections; Freund adjuvant and human lung.
7	further studies on the histidine histamine relationship in vivo effects of endotoxin and of histidine decarboxylase inhibitors	Other studies on the in vivo relationship between histidine histamine and the effects of apos; endotoxin and inhibitors of apos; histidine decarboxylase.
7	pathogenicity and neurological effects of oidiodendron kalrai for mice	Pathogenicity and neurological effects of oidiodendron kalrai in mice.
7	acute granulomatous response produced in mice by trehalose 6 6 dimycolate	Acute granulomatous response produced by trehalose 6 dimycolate 6 dimycolate in mice.
7	immunopathology of lymphocytic choriomeningitis viurs infection of newborn mice antithymocyte serum effects on glomerulonephritis and wasting disease	Lymphocytic Choriingitis virus infection in newborn anti-thymocyte mice: an epidemiological study of glomerulonephritis and wasting disease.
7	goblet cell increase in rat bronchial epithelium after exposure to cigarette and cigar tobacco smoke	Augmentation of caliciform cells of the rat bronchial epithelium after exposure to cigar and cigarette smoke.
7	correlation between lung asbestos count at necropsy and radiological appearances	Correlation between number of lung asbestos at time of diagnosis; autopsy and radiological appearance.
7	growth and intracellular development of a new respiratory virus	Growth and intracellular development d'apos; a new, breathing virus.
7	morphogenesis of avian infectious bronchitis virus and a related human virus strain 229e	Morphogenesis of the avian and avian infectious bronchitis virus; a related strain of human virus 229.
7	thymidine kinase from normal simian virus 40 transformed and simian virus 40 lytically infected cells	The thymidine kinase of normal simian virus 40 transformed and the simian virus 40 lytically infected the cells.
7	new assay procedure for separation of mycoplasmas from virus pools and tissue culture systems	New method d' test for separation of viral pool mycoplasmas and tissue culture systems.
7	morphological and lipid analysis of the alveolar lining material in dog lung	Morphological and lipid analysis of alveolar coating material in dog lungs.
7	blow of the pilot whale	Whale pilot blow, please.
7	enzymes of the lung i detection of esterase with a new cytochemical method	Detection of apos; esterase by lung enzymes; aid; a new cytochemical method.
7	characteristics and lipid requirements of coagulant proteins extracted from lung and brain the specifity of protein component of tissue factor	Lipid characteristics and requirements of clotting proteins extracted from the lungs and brain specificity of the protein component of tissue factor.
7	role of pasteurella pneumotropica and mycoplasma pulmonis in murine pneumonia	Pasteurella pneumotropica and mycoplasma pulmonis in murine pneumonia.
7	fluorescent cell counting as an assay method for respiratory syncytial virus	Fluorescent cell counts as a method of detection; respiratory syncytial virus analysis.
7	frequency dependence of compliance as a test for obstruction in the small airways	Compliance is frequency-dependent as a test for small airway obstruction.
7	maximum expiratory flow rates in induced bronchoconstriction in man	Maximum expiratory flow rate in men and women in induced bronchoconstriction.
7	detection of allergy to penicillin and other antigens by in vitro passive sensitization and histamine release from human and monkey lung	Detection; allergy to penicillin and dapos; other in vitro passive sensitization antigens and release of apos; histamine in the lungs of humans and monkeys.
7	the determination of total body exchangeable o2 stores	Determination of the total mass of exchangeable reserves of oxygen.
7	paraquat poisoning lung transplantation	Paraquat poisons lung transplants.
7	cytomegalic inclusion disease in the adult	Apos disease; cytomegalic inclusion in adults.
7	alveolar macrophages reduced number in rats after prolonged inhalation of lead sesquioxide	Alveolar macrophages were reduced in rats following prolonged inhalation of lead sesquioxide.
7	experimental carcinogenesis of the lung ii influence of phenols in the production of carcinoma	The experimental carcinogenesis of lung ii influences the phenolics in the production of carcinomas.
7	receptors sensitive to carbon dioxide in lungs of chicken	Chicken lung carbon dioxide sensitive receptors.
7	experimental adenovirus infection in calves	Experimental adenovirus infection of calves.
7	enhanced virus transformation of hamster embryo cells in vitro	Increased viral transformation of hamster embryonic stem cell lines in vitro.
7	elastic properties of the centrilobular emphysematous space	Elastic properties of l' emphysema space centrolobular.
7	the resistance of collateral channels in excised human lungs	Resistance of collateral channels in excised human lungs.
7	reflex cardiovascular depression produced by stimulation of pulmonary stretch receptors in the dog	Reflex cardiovascular depression caused by dapo receptor stimulation; pulmonary stretch in dogs.
7	ventilatory mechanics and expiratory flow limitation during exercise in normal subjects	Expiratory flow limitation and ventilatory mechanisms during exercise; exercise in normal subjects.
7	mitotic and nonmitotic multiple layered perfusion cultures	Mitotic and not-mitotic layered infusion cultures.
7	cardiovascular responses in apnoeic asphyxia role of arterial chemoreceptors and the modification of their effects by a pulmonary vagal inflation reflex	Cardiovascular responses in the role of apneic arterial chemoreceptor asphyxia and modification of their effects by a pulmonary vagal inflation reflex.
7	traube hering waves in the pulmonary circulation of the dog	Traube hering waves in the dog's pulmonary circulation.
7	effects of nitrogen dioxide on pulmonary cell population	The effects of Dapos dioxide; nitrogen on the lung cell population.
7	the activity of lung irritant receptors during pneumothorax hyperpnoea and pulmonary vascular congestion	Lapos; dapo receptor activity; pulmonary irritants during apo; pneumothorax hyperpnea and pulmonary vascular congestion.
7	reaction of urethane with nucleic acids in vivo	Reaction of etapos; urethane with nucleic acids in vivo.
7	morphogenetic aspects of multilayering in petri dish cultures of human fetal lung fibroblasts	Morphogenetic aspects of the multilayer in can-culture cultures of human fetal lung fibroblasts.
7	cell killing by actinomycin d in relation to the growth cycle of chinese hamster cells	The destruction of cells by actinomycin d in relation to the growth cycle of Chinese hamster cells.
7	natural resolution of air sac lesions caused by mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys	A natural resolution of the lesions of the air sacs caused by mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys.
7	pneumonic pasteurellosis of cattle microbiology and immunology	Pneumonic pasteurella from microbiology and bios; cattle immunology.
7	a study of bovine virus diarrhea mucosal disease virus by plaque technique	A study of the bovine diarrhea-mucosal disease virus by a plaque technique.
7	effects of beta adrenergic receptor blockade on airway conductance and lung volume in normal and asthmatic subjects	Effects of beta-adrenergic receptor blockade on respiratory conductance and lung volume in both normal and asthmatic subjects.
7	pulmonary complications of oxygen therapy	Pulmonary complications of apo; oxygen therapy.
7	in vivo inactivation of lysozyme by ozone	In vivo inactivation of lysozyme by etapos; ozone.
7	effect of long term administration of ay 9944 an inhibitor of 7 dehydrocholesterol delta 7 reductase on serum and tissue lipids in the rat	Apos effect; long-term administration of apos; 9944 a 7 dehydrocholesterol delta 7 reductase inhibitor to rat serum and tissue lipids.
7	role of the kidney in staphylococcal enterotoxemia	The role of the kidney in the immune system; staphylococcal enterotoxemia.
7	immunofluorescence identification of thermopolyspora polyspora the causative agent of farmer s lung	Identification of thermopolyspora polyspora, l' causative agent of the lung of the farmer.
7	elimination of sodium 24 and potassium 42 interferences in activation analysis of biological samples	Disposal of interference by sodium 24 and potassium 42 in laboratory analysis; activation of biological samples.
7	the effect of vagotomy vagal cooling and efferent vagal stimulation on breathing and lung mechanics of rabbits	The effect of vagotomy cooling and efferent vagal stimulation on respiration and lung mechanics of rabbits.
7	the role of the vagus nerves in the respiratory and circulatory responses to intravenous histamine and phenyl diguanide in rabbits	The role of vagus nerves in respiratory and circulatory responses to intravenous histamine and phenyl diguanide in rabbits.
7	pathological changes in virus infections of the lower respiratory tract in children	Pathological changes in viral infections of children's lower respiratory tract.
7	5 hydroxytryptamine a cytospecific growth stimulator of cultured fibroblasts	Five hydroxytryptamine, a cytospecific growth promoter for cultured fibroblasts.
7	changes in blood gas tensions and functional residual capacity chronic asthmatics treated with disodium cromoglycate	Changes in blood gas tensions and functional residual capacity in disodium cromoglycate-treated chronic asthmatics.
7	characterization of human anti glomerular basement membrane antibodies eluted from glomerulonephritic kidneys	Characterization of anti-@glomerular antibodies from the human basement membrane eluted from the glomerulonephritic kidneys.
7	pulsatile uptake of co in the human lung	I mean, the pulsatile uptake of co in the human lung.
7	elimination of toxicity from polyvinyl trays after sterilization with ethylene oxide	Polyvinyl acetate sterilization to eliminate toxicity of polyvinyl trays; ethylene oxide.
7	adaptation of a roller tube apparatus to accommodate cultivation of cells in roller bottles	This product is designed to be used in a variety of applications, including the use of a roller tube system to grow cells in roller bottles.
7	evidence for excision of ultraviolet induced pyrimidine dimers from the dna of human cells in vitro	It was found that in vitro excision of the pyrimidine dimers induced by the apos; ultraviolet was detected in the apos; DNA of human cells.
7	a microsurgical methodology for human cells in vitro evolution and applications	A micro-surgical methodology for the evolution and applications of human cells in vitro.
7	mechanisms of histamine release by compound 48 80	Mechanisms of release of l' histamine by compound.
7	cell surface coatings and membrane potentials of malignant and nonmalignant cells	Both malignant and non-malignant cell surface coatings and membrane potentials.
7	pulmonary surfactant and evolution of the lungs	This is pulmonary surfactant and lung evolution.
7	permeability of lung capillaries to macromolecules in foetal and new born lambs and sheep	Permeability of pulmonary capillaries to macromolecules in newborn and fetal lambs and sheep.
7	x ray sensitivity of synchronized chinese hamster cells irradiated during hypoxia	X radiosensitivity of synchronized Chinese hamster cells irradiated during apo; hypoxia.
7	growth of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in human diploid cell strain wi 38	Growth of potato virus; Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis in human diploid cell line Wi 3.
7	cholelithiasis in singapore i a necropsy study	Cholelithiasis in Singapore i a necropsy study.
7	emphysema in coal workers pneumoconiosis	Emphysema in workers of pneumoconiosis pneumoconiosis coal.
7	granuloma formation induced in mice by chemically defined mycobacterial fractions	Granuloma formation induced in mice by mycobacterial, chemically defined fractions.
7	alterations in the mechanical properties of the lung during dyspnea in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease	Changes in the mechanical properties of the lung during the dyspnea in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	acute effects of inhaled isoproterenol on the mechanical characteristics of the lungs in normal man	Acute effects of inhaled isoproterenol on mechanical characteristics of the lungs; normal male.
7	house dust mite asthma results of challenge tests on five criteria with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus	Asthma caused by dust mites in the home, results of five-criteria challenge tests with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus.
7	serum reagins and leucocyte response in patients with house dust mite allergy	Serum reagins and leukocyte response in patients with indoor dust mite allergies.
7	the effect of isoproterenol on airway obstruction in cystic fibrosis	Lapos; effect of apos; isoproterenol on plaques; airway obstruction in cystic fibrosis.
7	human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus i conversion from polio sensitivity to polio resistance accompanying loss of human gene dependent polio receptors	Human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus i conversion from susceptibility to polio to resistance to polio accompanying loss of human gene-dependent polio receptors.
7	human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to polio virus ii polio sensitivity and the chromosome constitution of the hybrids	Human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus ii Polio sensitivity and chromosome constitution of hybrids.
7	adsorption of foot and mouth disease virus by muscle kidney lung and brain from infant and adult mice	FMD virus adsorption by mouse kidney muscle lung and brain again-born and adult.
7	replication of repetitious dna and the s period	Reproduction of DNA, repetitive DNA, and DNA of the period s.
7	capsid mosaics of intermediate strains of human adenoviruses	Capsid mosaics of intermediate human adenovirus strains.
7	bronchograms and tracheograms of seals under pressure	Bronchograms and tracheograms of pressure seals.
7	pulmonary absorption and retention of kanamycin after repeated inhalation administration of kanamycin aerosol	Chest absorption and retention of kanamycin after dosing; repeated inhalation administration of kanamycin; aerosol.
7	chikungunya virus infection of cell monolayers by cell to cell and extracellular transmission	Chikungunya virus infection of cell-like monolayers by intercellular and extracellular transmission.
7	relative sensitivities of viruses to different species of interferon	Relative sensitivity to different species of viruses; interferon.
7	desmosterol as the major sterol in l cell mouse fibroblasts grown in sterol free culture medium	Desmosterol is the major sterol in mouse cell fibroblasts grown in culture media without sterols.
7	separation by gel chromatography of naturally occurring phosphatidylcholine mixtures according to number of ethylenic linkages	Gel chromatographic separation of natural phosphatidylcholine mixtures according to ethylene bond number.
7	direct assessment of viral aerosols on cell cultures	Direct evaluation of viral aerosols on cellular cultures.
7	congenital absence of the pulmonary valve	Congenital absence of pulmonary valve.
7	enhancement of inflammation and histamine formation by actinomycin d	Stimulation of apo; inflammation and formation of apo; histamine by apo; actinomycin d.
7	histamine formation in rat gastric mucosa and lung after injecting reserpine or adrenaline	Formation of histamine in the gastric mucosa and lungs of rats following injection of reserpine or d*apos; adrenaline.
7	comparison of transformation and t antigen induction in human cell lines	Comparison of transformation and apo; induction of apo; antigen t in human cell lines.
7	detection of postoperative bronchopleural fistulas by radionuclide fog inhalation	Detection of bronchopleural fistulas by inhalation of radionuclide mist.
7	acromegalic pneumonomegaly lung growth in the adult	An acromegalic pneumonome, pulmonary growth in the adult.
7	ascaris suum infection in calves i clinical signs	Ascaris suum infection in calves and clinical signs.
7	ascaris suum infection in calves 3 pathology	Infection ascaris suum in calves 3 pathology.
7	gamma irradiated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccines	Vaccines against the disease; Venezuelan equine encephalitis gamma-irradiated.
7	identification of mineral particles in pneumoconiotic lungs	Identification of the mineral particles in pneumoconiotic lungs.
7	shock lung	Shock louse!
7	antibody production in milk serum after virus instillation of goat mammary gland iv experiments with protective properties of specific influenza antibody associated with lactogammaglobulin	Production of antibody in the milk serum after viral instillation of goat mammary gland iv experiments with specific anti-influenza antibody to lactogamaglobulin.
7	studies with the light microscope and electron microscope of lung macrophages in rabbits inoculated with an attenuated stain of mycobacterium microti	Light and electron microscopic studies of pulmonary macrophages of rabbits inoculated with attenuated microti mycobacteria staining.
7	effect of poly i c on experimental respiratory infection in hamsters	Effect of poly i c on lung cancer; experimental respiratory infection in hamsters.
7	experience with electron microscopy in the differential diagnosis of smallpox	Electron microscopy experience in differential diagnosis of smallpox.
7	comparison of various methods for preparation of viral serological antigens from infected cell cultures	Comparison of various methods for the preparation of viral antigens from cultures of infected cells.
7	comparison of the pulmonary bactericidal capacity of mice and rats aganist strains of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Comparison of the pulmonary bactericidal capacity of aganist rats and mice strains of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
7	lipoprotein inhibitor of newcastle disease virus from chicken lung	Chicken lung Newcastle disease virus (CDSV) lipoprotein inhibitor.
7	viral aggregation resulting in the failure to correctly identify an unknown rhinovirus	The virus aggregation s' is translated by the inability of d' correctly identify an unknown rhinovirus.
7	relative antiviral resistance induced in homologous and heterologous cells by cross reacting interferons	Relative antiviral resistance has been induced in homologous and heterologous cells by cross-reacting interferons.
7	fatal fat embolism following replacement arthroplasty for transcervical fractures of femur	Lapos; fatal fat embolism following apos replacement; arthroplasty for transervical fractures of the femur.
7	a simple sensitive protein binding assay for guanosine 3 5 monophosphate	Simple sensitive protein binding test for guanosine 3-5 monophosphate.
7	viruses as an aid to cancer therapy regression of solid and ascites tumors in rodents after treatment with bovine enterovirus	Viruses as a cancer treatment aid decreases solid and ascending tumours in rodents after treatment with bovine enterovirus.
7	biochemical and cytological evidence for triple hybrid cell line formed from fusion of three different cells	A cell line that hybridizes by the fusion of three different cells, showing both biochemical and cytological evidence of the formation of apos.
7	on the differential cytotoxicity of actinomycin d	On the differential cytotoxicity of l' actinomycin d.
7	mixed function oxidation in tumors	Mixed-function oxidization in tumors.
7	inhibition of metastatic spread by i c r f 159 selective deletion of a malignant characteristic	Metastatic propagation inhibition by selective suppression i c r f f 159 d' a malignant feature.
7	three size classes of intracellular adenovirus deoxyribonucleic acid	D&apos 3 size classes; intracellular adenovirus deoxyribonucleic acid.
7	transformation of murine cells by two slow viruses visna virus and progressive pneumonia virus	Transformation of murine cells by two slow viruses, the visna virus and the progressive pneumonia virus.
7	priming a nonantiviral function of interferon	Boot d' a non antivirus interferon function.
7	respiratory disease in a colony of rats i the natural disease	Respiratory disease in a rat colony and natural disease.
7	the pulmonary vasopressor response to decreases in blood ph in intact dogs	Pulmonary vasopressor response to decreases in blood ph in intact dogs.
7	factors influencing pulmonary methane excretion in man an indirect method of studying the in situ metabolism of the methane producing colonic bacteria	The pulmonary excretion of methane in humans, an indirect method, and the study of in situ metabolism of methane-producing colonic bacteria.
7	an eosinophil leukocyte chemotactic factor of anaphylaxis	A chemotactic factor; anaphylaxis of eosinophilic leukocytes.
7	induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes after fusion with interphase cells	Nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes after fusion with interphase cells.
7	de novo fatty acid synthesis and elongation of fatty acids by subcellular fractions of lung	De novo fatty acid synthesis and l' fatty acid elongation by subcellular fractions of the lung.
7	mapping of a human genetic regulator element by somatic cell genetic analysis	Mapping of somatic cell genetic analysis as a human genetic regulator.
7	ultrastructural analysis of mitotic spindle elongation in mammalian cells in vitro direct microtubule counts	L' ultrastructural analysis of apos; mitotic spindle elongation in mammalian cells in vitro, directly counts microtubules.
7	the cellular site of action of angiotensin	The cellular site of apos; action of apos; angiotensin.
7	tuberculous morbidity in swiss albino mice immunized with bcg	Tuberculosis Morbidity in Swiss albino mice immunized with bcg.
7	5 hydroxytryptamine metabolism in sheep	Metabolism 5 hydroxytryptamine in the sheep.
7	effect of beta adrenoceptor blocking compounds propranolol practolol and lb 46 on isoprenaline induced changes in regional blood flow in the rat	L' effect of beta adrenergic receptor blockers propranolol practolol and lb 46 on l' isoprenaline induced changes in regional blood flow in the rat.
7	error theory and ageing in human diploid fibroblasts	L&apos theory; error and aging of human diploid fibroblast cells.
7	gas exchange in renal failure ii pulmonary gas exchange during peritoneal dialysis	Renal insufficiency ii Lung gas exchange during peritoneal dialysis.
7	study of the secular trend in asbestos bodies in lungs in london 1936 66	A study of the age-old trend in the lungs in London.
7	chromosome pulverization in micronuclei induced by tritiated thymidine	Chromosome sputtering at micronuclei induced by tritiated thymidine.
7	biosynthesis of vasopressin in vitro and ultrastructure of a bronchogenic carcinoma patient with the syndrome of inappropriate secretion of antidiuretic hormone	Vasopressin biosynthesis in vitro and apo; ultrastructure of a patient with apo; bronchogenic carcinoma with the syndrome of inappropriate apo secretion; antidiuretic hormone.
7	cigarette smoking objective evidence for lung damage in teen agers	Cigarette smoking: objective evidence of lung injury in the elderly.
7	isolation characterization and surface chemistry of a surface active fraction from dog lung	Characterization of the apos; isolation and surface chemistry of apos; a fraction of active surface from dog lungs.
7	bronchiolitis obliterans bronchiectasis and other sequelae of adenovirus type 21 infection in young children	Adenovirus infection type 21: bronchiolitis obliterrante bronchiectase and other sequelae in young children.
7	smoking risks of different tobaccos	Risks associated with smoking different types of tobacco.
7	ultrastructure of the nucleolus during the chinese hamster cell cycle	L' nucleolus ultrastructure during the Chinese hamster cell cycle.
7	permeability of lung capillaries and alveoli to non electrolytes in the foetal lamb	For example, the permeability of the lung capillaries and alveoli to non-@-@ electrolytes in the apos; fetal lamb.
7	mumps virus replication in chick embryo lung cells properties of ribonucleic acids in virions and infected cells	Reproduction of the mumps virus in the lung cells of chickens; embryo of chickens; properties of ribonucleic acids in virions and infected cells.
7	depression of laryngeal reflexes during keatmine anaesthesia	Decreased laryngeal reflexes during oral administration; keatmine anesthesia.
7	the pathology of parietal pleural plaques	The pathology of pleural wall plates.
7	effects of elastase collagenase and papain on structure and function of rat lungs in vitro	Effects of elastase, collagenase, and papain on the structure and function of rat lungs in vitro.
7	role of plasma lipoproteins in cortisone induced fat embolism	The role of plasma lipoproteins in cortisone induced an adipose embolism.
7	thyroid hormone influence upon lung surfactant metabolism	The influence of thyroid hormones on the metabolism of pulmonary surfactants.
7	induced changes in the rates of uridine 3 h uptake and incorporation during the g 1 and s periods of synchronized chinese hamster cells	Changes were induced in apo-, absorption-, and apo-, incorporation of uridine during g1 and s periods of synchronized Chinese hamster cells.
7	the role of non myelinated vagal afferent fibres from the lungs in the genesis of tachypnoea in the rabbit	The role of nonmyelinated vagal afferents in the lungs in the genesis of tachypnea in rabbits.
7	template activity of chromatin during stimulation of cellular proliferation in human diploid fibroblasts	L' chromatin matrix activity during cell proliferation stimulation in human diploid fibroblasts.
7	the effect of high oxygen tensions on the mechanical properties of rat lungs	The effects of high blood pressure on the mechanical properties of rat lungs.
7	standardization of human diploid fibroblast cultivation centrifugation procedure	Standardization of centrifugation procedure for cultures of human diploid fibroblasts.
7	effect of chlorite oxidized oxyamylose on influenza virus infection in mice	Effect of apos; chlorite-oxidized oxyamylosis (CHO) on apos; Influenza virus infection in mice.
7	effect of relative humidity on dynamic aerosols of adenovirus 12	Relative humidity on the dynamic aerosols of the organism; adenovirus 12.
7	immunity to aerosol challenge in guinea pigs immunized with gamma irradiated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccines	Immunity to apo; administration of aerosols to gamma-irradiated Venezuelan equine encephalitis in immunized guinea pigs.
7	synergistic effect of herpes simplex virus and cytosine arabinoside on human chromosomes	Synergistic effect of herpes simplex virus and cytosine arabinoside on human chromosomes.
7	sites of pulmonary vasomotor reactivity in the dog during alveolar hypoxia and serotonin and histamine infusion	The sites of pulmonary vasomotor reactivity in dogs during apos; alveolar hypoxia and infusion of serotonin and d' histamine.
7	homologous interference by incomplete sendai virus particles changes in virus specific ribonucleic acid synthesis	L' homologous interference by incomplete sentai virus particles changes in the synthesis of virus-specific l' ribonucleic acid.
7	delayed hypersensitivity type granuloma formation and dermal reaction induced and elicited by a soluble factor isolated from schistosoma mansoni eggs	Delayed formation of hypersensitivity-like granulomas and the dermal reaction are both induced and elicited by a soluble factor isolated from schistosoma mansoni eggs.
7	subhuman primate diploid cells possible substrates for production of virus vaccines	Diploid primate cells at-human level could serve as substrates for the production of antiviral vaccines.
7	three dimensional structure identified from single sections	Three-dimensional structure identified from individual sections.
7	isolation of echoviruses with human embryonic lung fibroblast cells	Isolate echovirus at the apos; helps human embryonic lung fibroblasts.
7	fatal adenovirus pneumonia in infants correlation of histologic and electron microscopic observations	Fatal adenovirus pneumonia in infants, correlation between histological and electron microscopic observations.
7	neutralizing antibodies to cytomegaloviruses in normal simian and human sera	Neutralizing antibody to cytomegalovirus in normal human and simian sera.
7	inhibition of influenza virus and interferon response intranasally with statolon	Intranasal inhibition of the response of the influenza virus and l'apos; interferon per statolon.
7	respiratory movements and rapid eye movement sleep in the foetal lamb	Respiratory movements and rapid eye movement are common in the fetal lamb.
7	inhibition or enhancement of immunological injury of virus infected cells	Inhibition or augmentation of immunological lesions of virus-infected cells.
7	antiviral activity of a bis benzimidazole against experimental rhinovirus infections in chimpanzees	Antiviral Activity d' a benzimidazole bis against experimental rhinovirus infections in chimpanzees.
7	characterization of the growth of herpes simplex virus in human lymphoid cells	Characterization of the growth of lidos virus; herpes simplex in human lymphoid cells.
7	propagation and purification of high titer human cytomegalovirus	Propagation and purification of human cytomegalovirus.
7	morphologic development of fetal rabbit lung and its acceleration with cortisol	Morphological development of the fetal rabbit lung and acceleration with cortisol.
7	genetics of human mouse somatic cell hybrids linkage of human genes for lactate dehydrogenase a and esterase a 4	Genetics of human mouse somatic cell hybrids binding the human lactate dehydrogenase a and l' esterase a 4 lactate dehydrogenase a genes.
7	ischaemic enterocolitis an expression of the intravascular coagulation syndrome	Ischemic enterocolitis, expression of intravascular clotting syndrome.
7	assignment of three human genes to chromosomes ldh a to 11 tk to 17 and idh to 20 and evidence for translocation between human and mouse chromosomes in somatic cell hybrids thymidine kinase lactate dehydrogenase a isocitrate dehydrogenase c 11 e 17 and f 20 chromosomes	L' assignment of three human genes to ldh chromosomes at 11 tk at 17 and idh at 20 and l' translocation between human and mouse chromosomes in lactate dehydrogenase a isocitrate dehydrogenase c 11 and f 20 hybrids of thymidine kinase cells.
7	rabies virus in nasal mucosa of naturally infected bats	Rabies virus in the nasal mucosa of naturally infected bats,-mice.
7	release of dopamine from bovine lung by specific antigen and by compound 48 80	Dopamine release from bovine lungs by specific antigen and compound.
7	angiotensin i metabolism by plasma membrane of lung	Metabolism of apos; angiotensin i by lung plasma membrane.
7	metabolic control mechanisms in mammalian systems xv studies on the role of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in estrogen action on the uterus	Metabolic control mechanisms in mammalian systems xxe studies on the role of apos; adenosine 3,5 monophosphate in apos; estrogen action on apos; uterus.
7	suppression of urethan induced lung adenomas in mice treated with trehalose 6 6 dimycolate cord factor and living bacillus calmette gu rin	Elimination of urethane-induced pulmonary adenomas in mice treated with trehalose 6 factor dimycolate cord and live bacillus calm guin.
7	murine leukemia virus restriction in fused permissive and nonpermissive cells	Limiting murine leukemia virus (MLV) in fused permeable and nonpermeable cells.
7	induction of prophase in interphase nuclei by fusion with metaphase cells	Prophase induction in interphase nuclei by fusion with metaphase cells.
7	alteration in cell proliferation in mouse lung following urethane exposure ii effects of chronic exposure on terminal bronchiolar epithelium	Modification of cell proliferation in the mouse lung following exposure to urethane ii adverse effects; chronic exposure to apos; terminal bronchiolar epithelium.
7	ultrastructural changes in the alveolar epithelium in response to freund s adjuvant	Ultrastructural changes in apos; alveolar epithelium in response to apos; adjuvant freund.
7	elevated plasma activity of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme 3 ldh 3 in experimentally induced immunologic lung injury	High plasma l' lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme 3 ldh3 in experimentally induced immunological lung injury.
7	regional lung function in patients with hepatic cirrhosis	Regional lung function in hepatic cirrhosis patients.
7	effect of cigarette tar upon tissue culture cells neoplastic transformation of hamster lung cells by tobacco tar in tissue culture	Cigarette tar effects on tissue culture cells Neoplastic transformation of hamster lung cells by tobacco tar in tissue culture.
7	effects of biliary obstruction on pulmonary ultrastructure in the rat	Effects of oral mucosal cancer; biliary obstruction in the lung; ultrastructural effects in the rat.
7	effect of various combinations of antibacterial drugs on enzyme activity in guinea pig tissues	Effect of various combinations of antibacterial drugs on immune cells; enzymatic activity in guinea pig tissue.
7	study of the nucleoprotein fraction of lung tissue in experimental berylliosis using gel filtration	Study by gel filtration of the nucleoprotein fraction of lung tissue in experimental berylliosis.
7	the protein and lipid composition of arterial elastin and its relationship to lipid accumulation in the atherosclerotic plaque	The protein and lipid composition of the apos; arterial elastin and its relationship to the apos; lipid accumulation in the aposclerotic plaque.
7	epidemic listeriosis in the newborn	Epidemic listeriosis in the new @-@, born.
7	the lung in hemorrhagic shock iv the role of neutrophilic polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Lung in hemorrhagic shock iv the role of polymorphonuclear neutrophil leukocytes.
7	intravasation of fat from the bone marrow cavity	Intravasation of fats from the bone marrow cavity.
7	intra and extracellular compartmentalization of the surface active fraction in dog lung	Intra- and extracellular comparison of the fraction of active surface in dog lungs.
7	the effect of sendai virus infection on bactericidal and transport mechanisms of the murine lung	The effect of apo; transmitted virus infection on murine lung transport and bactericidal mechanisms.
7	a virus from epidemic vomiting disease	A virus from apos; an epidemic of vomiting.
7	nitrosamine induced carcinogenesis the alkylation of n 7 of guanine of nucleic acids of the rat by diethylnitrosamine n ethyl n nitrosourea and ethyl methanesulphonate	Nitrosamine induced carcinogenesis of rat nucleic acid guanine n-7 alkylation by diethylnitrosamine n ethyl nitrosourea and methanesulfonate d'apos; ethyl.
7	pulmonary aspiration after fibre endoscopy of the upper gastrointestinal tract	Pulmonary aspiration following endoscopy of gastrointestinal tract fibers-upper intestinal.
7	inhibition of angiotensin i converting enzyme by venom peptides	Apos inhibition; apos conversion enzyme; angiotensin i by venom peptides.
7	nonviral microbodies with viral antigenicity produced in cytomegalovirus infected cells	A non-viral microbodies with viral antigenicity produced in cells infected with a cytomegalovirus.
7	susceptibility to spontaneous pneumonitis in an inbred strain of beige and satin mice	"""Pneumopathic pneumonitis in a self-bred strain of beige and satin mice"", American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
7	elimination of mycoplasma contaminants from virus stocks by treatment with nonionic detergents	Mycoplasmic contaminants are removed from virus stocks by treatment with non-ionic detergents.
7	freeze etch studies of the plasma membrane of pulmonary endothelial cells	Freeze and burn plasma membrane studies of pulmonary endothelial cells.
7	delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol localization in body fat	The localization of tetrahydrocannabinol delta 9 to body fat.
7	induction of choline phosphotransferase and lecithin synthesis in the fetal lung by corticosteroids	Induction of choline phosphotransferase and lecithin synthesis in fetal lung by corticosteroids.
7	amniotic fluid lecithin sphingomyelin ratio and fetal lung development	Sphingomyelin ratio-amniotic fluid lecithin and fetal lung development.
7	collagen substrata for studies on cell behavior	Collagen substrate for use in cellular behaviour studies.
7	microculture plaque assay for human and simian cytomegaloviruses	Microculture Plate Testing (MCT) for human and simian cytomegaloviruses.
7	early clinical experience with bleomycin in the united kingdom in series of 105 patients	Past clinical experience with bleomycin in the U.K. in serial numbers of 105 patients.
7	pasteurella haemolytica of cattle serotype production of beta galactosidase and antibacterial sensitivity	Pasteurella haemolytica from bovine serotypes of beta galactosidase production and antibacterial susceptibility.
7	effects of ultrasonic nebulization on pulmonary mechanics and blood gases in obstructive pulmonary disease	Effects of ultrasonic nebulization on lung mechanics and blood gases in obstructive bronchopneumopathy.
7	role of cord factor trehalose 6 6 dimycolate in allergic granuloma formation in rabbits	Role of trehalose 6-6 dimycolate in the formation of allergic granulomas in rabbits.
7	etiology of chronic pneumonia in rats and a study of the experimental disease in mice	Etiology of chronic pneumonia in rats and study of experimental pneumonia in mice.
7	chromatid breakage differential effect of inhibitors of dna synthesis during g 2 phase	The differential effect of the disruption of chromatids by inhibitors of the synthesis of l' DNA during phase g 2 of the g phase.
7	fetal renal structure and the genesis of amniotic fluid disorders	Fetal renal structure... and the genesis of amniotic fluid disorders.
7	virological studies of sudden unexplained infant deaths in glasgow 1967 70	Virological studies of unexplained sudden infant death syndrome in Glasgow, 1967.
7	lung mechanics and frequency dependence of compliance in coal miners	Pulmonary mechanics and the frequency dependence of coal mine compliance.
7	use of pulmonary hydrogen h 2 measurements to quantitate carbohydrate absorption study of partially gastrectomized patients	Use of pulmonary measurements of apo; hydrogen 2 to quantify apo; carbohydrate absorption in partially gastrointestinal patients.
7	indirect hemagglutination test for varicella zoster infection	Dapos testing; indirect hemagglutination for apos; varicella zoster infection.
7	immunogenicity of egg grown influenza vaccine inhibition by immunization of recipients with host antigen	Eggs; immunogenicity of apo; inhibition of influenza vaccine produced from eggs; immunization of recipients with the host; antigen.
7	respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide treated mice ii decreased virulence of pr8 influenza virus	Respiratory Diseases in Cyclophosphamide-treated Mice ii decreased virulence of pr8 influenza virus.
7	hyperoxia influence on lung mechanics and protein synthesis	Hyperoxia influences lung mechanics and protein synthesis.
7	hyperoxia a stereologic ultrastructural examination of its influence on cytoplasmic components of the pulmonary granular pneumocyte	L' hyperoxia is an ultrastructural stereological examination of its influence on the cytoplasmic components of the pulmonary granular pneumocyte.
7	passive protection of mice against intracerebral infections with bordetella pertussis	Passive protection of mice against bordetella pertussis intracerebral infections.
7	the pulmonary clearance of bacteria by calves and mice	Pulmonary clearance of the bacteria by calves and mice.
7	the tissue localization of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkey embryos	Tissue localization of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkey embryos.
7	respiratory disease in a colony of rats ii isolation of mycoplasma pulmonis from the natural disease and the experimental disease induced with a cloned culture of this organism	Respiratory disease in a rat colony ii isolation of pulmonary mycoplasma from natural and experimental disease induced by cloned culture of this organism.
7	the nature of the toxic reaction of influenza virus towards lung tissue	The nature of the toxic response of the influenza virus to the body's lung tissue.
7	the influence of the route of immunization on the protection of mice infected intracerebrally with bordetella pertussis	L' influence of mucosal pathway; immunization on intracerebral protection of pertussis virus infected mice.
7	effect of glucocorticoids on histamine metabolism in mice	Effect of glucocorticoids on glucose metabolism; histamine in mice.
7	sendai virus induced transcriptase from infected cells polypeptides in the transcriptive complex	Sendai virus induces transcriptase from infected cell polypeptides in transcription complex.
7	the release of spasmogenic substances from human chopped lung tissue and its inhibition	Spasmogenic release from minced human lung tissue and its inhibition.
7	studies of the pulmonary vagal control of central respiratory rhythm in the absence of breathing movements	Studies of pulmonary vagal control of central breathing rhythm in the absence of respiratory movements.
7	the virulence of t mycoplasmas isolated from various animal species assayed by intramammary inoculation in cattle	The virulence of isolated t-mycoplasmas from various animal species was evaluated by intramammary inoculation in cattle.
7	interferon studies with japanese and u s rubella virus strains	Studies on the immune system; interferon with strains of rubella virus in Japan and the United States.
7	antigen mediated fusion of specifically sensitized rabbit alveolar macrophages	Antigen-mediated fusion of specifically sensitized rabbit alveolar macrophages.
7	membrane dynamics in the action of dibutyryl adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and testosterone on mammalian cells	Membrane dynamics of l' action of dibutyryl adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and testosterone on mammalian cells.
7	cryptococcus neoformans of unusual morphology	Cryptococcus neoformans d'apos; an unusual morphology.
7	appearance in trypsinized normal cells of reactivity with antibody presumably specific for malignant cells	L' appearance in normal trypsinized cells of reactivity with a presumably malignant cell specific antibody.
7	bedside determination of left atrial pressure	Determination of left atrial pressure at the bedside.
7	bubble stability test compared with lecithin assay in prediction of respiratory distress syndrome	Compared to the lecithin test, the bubble stability test predicts a respiratory distress syndrome.
7	effects of histamine 5 hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin on the vascular system of isolated lungs of the guinea pig and the influence of phenylbutazone on these effects	The effects of histamine 5 hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin on isolated guinea pig lungs and the influence of phenylbutazone on these effects.
7	the inactivation of bradykinin in the pulmonary circulation of isolated lungs	L' inactivation of bradykinin in the pulmonary circulation of the isolated lungs.
7	a dual action of histamine on guinea pig lung vessels	The double action of l' histamine on guinea pig pulmonary vessels.
7	lipid metabolism by rat lung in vitro utilization of citrate by normal and starved rats	Lipid metabolism in rat lungs, citrate use in vitro by normal and starving rats.
7	experimental paracoccidioidomycosis in mice	Paracoccidioidomycosis experimental in mice.
7	experimental pneumococcal infection in embryonated eggs previously infected with influenza c virus	Pneumococcal infection in embryo eggs previously infected with influenza c.
7	murine resistance to inhaled neisseria meningitidis after infection with an encephalomyocarditis virus	Murine resistance to inhaled neisseria meningitidis after infection with encephalomyocarditis virus.
7	an outbreak of adenovirus type 7 infection in children in montreal	Outbreak of E. coli, a type 7 adenovirus infection in Montreal children.
7	adenylate rich sequences in sendai virus transcripts from infected cells	Adenylate-rich sequences were present in sentai virus transcripts from infected cells.
7	the bradykininase activities of extracts of dog lung	The bradykininase activity of apos; extracts from dog lungs.
7	dispersal of rabbit lung into individual viable cells a new model for the study of lung metabolism	The dispersal of rabbit lungs into individual viable cells is a new model for pulmonary metabolism.
7	the fluorescent antibody technique in the diagnosis of equine rhinopneumonitis virus abortion	Fluorescent antibody technique in diagnosis of equine rhinopneumonite virus abortion.
7	hypoxic changes in conducting tissue of the heart in sudden death in infancy syndrome	Hypoxic changes in the conducting tissue of the heart during early childhood syndrome; sudden death.
7	concentration of herpesviruses	Herpesvirus concentration.
7	the experimental production of hyaline membranes in premature rhesus monkeys	The experimental production of hyaline membranes in rhesus monkeys.
7	effect of hypersensitivity pneumonitis on the pulmonary defense mechanisms of guinea pig lungs	Effect of apos pneumonitis; hypersensitivity on lung defense mechanisms of the guinea pig lungs.
7	types of afferent nervous activity which may be measured in the vagus nerve of the sheep foetus	Type of afferent nerve activity that can be measured in the vagus nerve of the fetus of sheep.
7	pulmonary fibrosis following therapy with melphalan for multiple myeloma	Pulmonary fibrosis following melphalan treatment for multiple myeloma.
7	pathological findings after right lung transplantation in a patient with fibrosing alveolitis	Effect of fibrosing alveolitis on breast cancer.
7	effect of cortisone administration on experimental nocardiosis	Effect of use of cortisone on experimental nocardiosis.
7	ultrastructure of ehrlichia canis	L' ultrastructure d' ehrlichia canis.
7	self regulation of growth in three dimensions	Auto-is the name of the company that regulates three-dimensional growth.
7	sudden and unexpected deaths in infants histology and virology	Sudden and unexpected death in infants with histology and virology.
7	trephine lung biopsy	Trepanin lung biopsy.
7	immunofluorescent staining of lung biopsy in fibrosing alveolitis	The immunofluorescent staining of the lung biopsy in the fibrotic alveolitis.
7	pulmonary contusion in children due to rubber bullet injuries	Pulmonary contusion in children caused by rubber gunshot wounds.
7	role of relative humidity in the synergistic effect of a sulfur dioxide aerosol mixture on the lung	Role of pH; relative humidity in pH; synergistic effect of pH; mixture of pH; sulfur dioxide aerosols on the lungs.
7	fine structure of cryptococcus neoformans grown in vivo as observed by freeze etching	L' ultrastructure of cryptococcus neoformans cultured in vivo was also observed by freeze-etching.
7	relative roles of irritant type j and pulmonary stretch receptors in lung reflexes	Relative roles of apo; j-type irritant and apo receptors; pulmonary stretch in the pulmonary reflexes.
7	regulation of respiration by bronchopulmonary receptors in conscious dogs	Respiratory regulation by bronchopulmonary receptors in conscious dogs.
7	studies on the central effects of hering breuer reflexes	Studies on the central effects of brewing reflexes.
7	afferent vagal impulses in anaphylactic bronchial asthma	Afferent vagal impulses in the epos; anaphylactic bronchial asthma.
7	the cyanide gasp and spontaneous deep breaths	Cyanide blast and spontaneous deep breaths.
7	ten years experience in running a pulmonary function laboratory	Ten years of experience in lung management; a laboratory for lung function.
7	cytomegalovirus replication in cells pretreated with 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine	Replication of cytomegalovirus in cells pretreated with 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine.
7	growth characteristics of cytomegalovirus in human fibroblasts with demonstration of protein synthesis early in viral replication	Cytomegalovirus growth characteristics in human fibroblasts with demonstration of protein synthesis early in viral replication.
7	light microscopic and ultrastructural study of the adverse effects of oxygen therapy on the neonate lung	Light microscopic and ultrastructural study of adverse effects of oxygen therapy on the lungs of newborns.
7	a combined scanning and transmission electron microscopic study of alveolar epithelial development of the fetal rabbit lung	A combined scanning and transmission electron microscopy study of alveolar epithelial development in rabbit fetal lung.
7	antiviral effects of aphidicolin a new antibiotic produced by cephalosporium aphidicola	Antimicrobial effects of aphidicolin, a novel antibiotic produced by cephalosporium aphidicola.
7	isolation and characterization of lamellar bodies and tubular myelin from rat lung homogenates	Isolation and characterization of lamellar bodies and tubular myelin in rat pulmonary homogenates.
7	use of technetium 99m tc as a bacterial label in lung clearance studies	The use of technetium 99 mtc as a bacterial marker in pulmonary clearance studies.
7	a sequence of biochemical events in the antigen induced release of chemical mediators from sensitized human lung tissue	A sequence of biochemical events in the antigen induced release of chemical mediators from the sensitized human lung tissue.
7	measurement of respiratory volume for virus retention studies in mice	Respiratory volume measurement for viral retention studies in mice.
7	induction of labour in sheep and in humans by single doses of corticosteroids	Induction of labor in sheep and humans by single doses of corticosteroids.
7	role of the mast cell in the pulmonary pressor response to hypoxia	Role of mast cell in pulmonary pressor response to apos; hypoxia.
7	rimantadine therapy of influenza a infection in mice	Treatment with rimantadine for influenza, an infection in mice.
7	the effect of phospholipids on anaphylactic histamine release	Effect of phospholipids on anaphylactic release of histamine.
7	the optical and electron microscopic determination of pulmonary asbestos fibre concentration and its relation to the human pathological reaction	Determination, by light and electron microscopy, of the concentration of lung asbestos fibres and its relation to the pathological response in humans.
7	serotonin producing neuroepithelial bodies in rabbit respiratory mucosa	Serotonin produced neuroepithelial bodies in the rabbit respiratory mucosa.
7	contributions of loss of lung recoil and of enhanced airways collapsibility to the airflow obstruction of chronic bronchitis and emphysema	Contribution of lung recoil and hemorrhage loss; improvement of airway collapsibility; air flow obstruction; chronic bronchitis and emphysema; emphysema.
7	effects of bradykinin and indomethacin on cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in lung slices	Effects of bradykinin and apos; indomethacin on cyclic gmp and apos; cyclic ampoule in the lung slices.
7	antibacterial mechanisms of the lower respiratory tract i immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion	Antibacterial mechanisms of lower respiratory immune globulin synthesis and secretion i.
7	cytoplasmic receptor for glucocorticoids in lung of the human fetus and neonate	Cytoplasmic receptor of glucocorticoids in the lungs of the human fetus and the new fetus.
7	lung surface active fraction as a model system for macromolecular ultrastructural studies with crotalus atrox venom	The active fraction of the pulmonary surface as a model system for macromolecular ultrastructural studies with atrox crotalus venom.
7	characterization of bleomycin resistant dna	Characterization of the apos; bleomycin-resistant DNA.
7	hemagglutination assay of antibodies associated with pulmonary acariasis in rhesus monkeys macaca mulatta	Hemagglutination of antibody associated with apos; pulmonary acarosis in Rhesus macaca macatta monkey.
7	human papovavirus bk strain biological studies including antigenic relationship to simian virus 40	Biological studies of the human papovavirus bk strain, including the antigenic relationship with simian virus.
7	intermittent dna synthesis and periodic expression of enzyme activity in the cell cycle of wi 38	Intermittent synthesis of apo; DNA and periodic expression of apo; enzyme activity in wi cell cycle.
7	contrast between the environmental ph dependencies of prophasing and nuclear membrane formation in interphase metaphase cells	The contrast between the environmental dependencies of prophase and nuclear membrane formation in interphase contrasts.
7	clinical radiologic and histopathologic studies on pulmonary toxicity induced by treatment with bleomycin nsc 125066	Clinical histopathological and radiological studies of pulmonary toxicity induced by bleomycin treatment.
7	ferromagnetic contamination in the lungs and other organs of the human body	Ferromagnetic contamination of the lungs and skin; other organs of the human body.
7	immune enhancement of pulmonary bactericidal activity in murine virus pneumonia	Unpublished report prepared for the Division of Immunization; Epidemiology and Surveillance; Epidemiology.
7	pathogenicity of allescheria boydii for mice	Pathogenicity of apos; Allescheria boydii to mice.
7	role of immunity in viral induced bacterial superinfections of the lung	The role of lapos; immunity in viral-induced bacterial over-infections of the lungs.
7	synergistic effect in viral bacterial infection combined infection of the murine respiratory tract with sendai virus and pasteurella pneumotropica	Symptoms; viral bacterial infection combined with murine respiratory infection with sendai virus and pasteurella pneumotropica.
7	an ultrastructural analysis of nocardia during experimental infections in mice	Ultrastructural analysis of nocardia during experimental mouse infections.
7	attempts to detect homologous autointerference in vivo with influenza virus and vesicular stomatitis virus	Apos testing; auto-inference homologue in vivo with potato virus; influenza and vesicular stomatitis virus.
7	granulomatous hypersensitivity to trehalose 6 6 dimycolate cord factor in mice infected with bcg	Granulomatous hypersensitivity to trehalose 6-6 dimycolate cord factor in bcg-infected mice.
7	inhibition of cathepsin d type proteinase of macrophages by pepstatin a specific pepsin inhibitor and other substances	L' inhibition of pancreatic macrophage cathepsin type D proteinase by pepstatin, a specific pepsin inhibitor, and d' other substances.
7	sources of cyclic nucleotides in plasma	Sources of cyclic nucleotides in the plasma.
7	experimental lung injury i bacterial pneumonia ultrastructural autoradiographic and histochemical observations	Experimental Pulmonary Damage i bacterial pneumonia ultrastructural observations autoradiographic and histochemical observations.
7	guanylate cyclase inhibition by light in retinal photoreceptors	Inhibition of guanylate cyclase in retinal photoreceptors by light.
7	development and evaluation of a direct fluorescent antibody method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii infections in experimental animals	Development and evaluation of a method of direct immunofluorescence for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii infections in laboratory animals.
7	immunologic events in experimental hypersensitivity granulomas	Immunological effects in potato granulomas; experimental hypersensitivity.
7	an experimental model of pulmonary arterial granulomatous inflammation	Experimental model of apos; granulomatous inflammation of the lung artery.
7	pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone a correlated light and electron microscopic study	Pulmonary lesions in ozone-exposed rats were investigated in a correlative light and electron microscopic study.
7	morphometric evaluation of pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone	Morphometric evaluation of lung lesions in rats exposed to ozone.
7	pulmonary blood flow distribution at different lung volumes and body positions	Distribution of pulmonary blood flow at different lung volumes and body positions.
7	haemodynamic changes at different lung volumes	We've got hemodynamic changes at different lung volumes.
7	supersaturation with bilirubin followed by colloid formation and disposition with a hypothesis on the etiology of kernicterus	Bilirubin oversaturation followed by colloid formation and disposition with the hypothesis of kernicterus etiology.
7	amphetamine in human plasma a sensitive and specific enzymatic assay	Amphetamine in human plasma, a specific, sensitive enzyme test.
7	heparan sulphate sulphotransferase properties of an enzyme from ox lung	"""Heparan sulphate sulphate sulphotransferase properties of an enzyme from oxol lung,"" Environ."
7	herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells i sequence of viral replication	Virus of l' herpes simplex and replication of human cytomegalovirus in wi 38 cells i sequence of viral replication.
7	in vitro binding of retinol to rat tissue components	In vitro binding of retinol to tissue components of rat.
7	molecular nature of mammalian cell dna in alkaline sucrose gradients	Molecular nature of the protein; DNA of mammalian cells in alkaline sucrose gradients.
7	pulmonary gas exchange in nonnative residents of high altitude	Lung gas exchange among non-aboriginal highland residents.
7	early response of lung to low levels of ozone	Early response of lungs to low ozone levels.
7	fate of angiotension i in the total bufo melanostictus	The fate of angiotension i in total melanostictus bufo.
7	specificity of a bcg induced pulmonary granulomatous response in rabbits	The specificity of apos; bcg induced a pulmonary granulomatous response in rabbits.
7	enhanced effect of repeated administration of bacterial vaccine against viral respiratory infection	Increased effect; repeated administration of bacterial vaccine; respiratory viral infection.
7	experimental induction of anergy to coccidioidin by antigens of coccidioides immitis	Experimental induction of coccidioidinine anergy by coccidioid immitis antigens.
7	antibody response to a human diploid cell rabies vaccine	Immune response to human diploid cell rabies vaccine.
7	early development of and pathology associated with strongylus edentatus	The early development and pathology of the Strongylus edentatus.
7	pneumothorax in pulmonary eosinophilic granuloma	Pneumothorax in pulmonary eosinophilic granuloma.
7	cell free translation of paramyxovirus messenger rna	Cell-free translation of the paramyxovirus messenger rna.
7	acute systemic anaphylaxis in the calf	Acute, systemic anaphylaxis in the calf.
7	growth inhibition and morphological changes caused by lipophilic acids in mammalian cells	Inhibition of growth and morphological changes caused by lipophilic acids in the mammalian cells.
7	assessment of fetal lung maturity by estimation of amniotic fluid palmitic acid	Estimation of fetal lung maturity by amniotic liquid palmitic acid.
7	direct fluorescent antibody method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii pneumonitis from sputa or tracheal aspirates from humans	Dapos method; direct immunofluorescence for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii pneumonia (PRC) from sputa or dapos; tracheal aspiration of humans.
7	bacterial growth in vivo an important determinant of the pulmonary clearance of diplococcus pneumoniae in rats	In vivo bacterial growth is an important determinant of pulmonary clearance of diplococcus pneumoniae in rats.
7	inhibition of murine leukemia virus replication by poly vinyluracil and poly vinyladenine	L' inhibition of replication of murine leukemia virus by polyvinyluracil and polyvinyladenine.
7	human regulatory gene for inducible tyrosine aminotransferase in rat human hybrids	Inducible human tyrosine aminotransferase regulatory gene in rat human hybrids.
7	epidemiological and quantitative relationships between mesothelioma and asbestos on tyneside	Epidemiological and quantitative relationships between mesothelioma and apos; asbestos on tyneside.
7	viscosity of cellular protoplasm	Cellular protoplasm viscosity, please.
7	assignment of the gene for adenine phosphoribosyltransferase to human chromosome 16 by mouse human somatic cell hybridization	Assignment of the adenine phosphoribosyltransferase gene to human chromosome 16 by human somatic cell hybridization in mice.
7	role of extrapulmonary conversion in mediating the systemic pressor activity of angiotensin i	Role of extrapulmonary conversion in the mediation of apos; systemic apos pressor activity; angiotensin i.
7	variation in the life span of clones derived from human diploid cell strains	Variation in the life span of clones derived from strains of human diploid cells.
7	prophasing of interphase nuclei and induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes in hela and chinese hamster homo and heterokaryons	Interphase prophylaxis of nuclei and induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes in homos and heterokaryons of Chinese hamster and helix.
7	adaption to hyperoxia influence on protein synthesis by lung and on granular pneumocyte ultrastructure	L' adaptation to apos; hyperoxia influences the synthesis of proteins by the lungs and apos; granular pneumocyte ultrastructure.
7	disability and coal workers pneumoconiosis	Handicapped and pneumoconiosis pneumoconiosis coal workers.
7	alpha 1 antitrypsin deficiency correlation between biochemical tests and phenotypes in one family	Correlation between biochemical tests and apos phenotypes; same family for alpha deficiency-1 antitrypsin.
7	release of rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs and prostaglandins induced by chemical or mechanical stimulation of guinea pig lungs	The release of rabbit aorta, rcs and prostaglandins, induced by chemical or mechanical stimulation of the guinea pig lungs.
7	qualitative and quantitative aspects of the biosynthesis of ribonucleic acid and of protein in the liver and the lung of the syrian golden hamster	Qualitative and quantitative aspects of protein and ribonucleic acid biosynthesis in the liver and lung of the Syrian golden hamster.
7	the effects of diethylnitrosamine on ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis in the liver and lung of the syrian golden hamster	Effects of diethylnitrosamine on synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and proteins in liver and lung of Syrian golden hamster.
7	some effects of burimamide on the isolated perfused pulmonary circulation of the guinea pig	Some effects of burimamide on the perfused circulation of the lungs isolated from the guinea pig.
7	soap abortion and fat embolism	Abortion in soap and a fat embolism?
7	cytologic changes in dogs lungs induced by chronic exposure to ozone	Cytological changes in dog lungs induced by chronic ozone exposure.
7	method for storing toxoplasma gondii rh strain in liquid nitrogen	Method for rh toxoplasma gondii strain storage in liquid nitrogen.
7	ultrastructural changes in hamster tracheal ring cultures exposed to mycoplasma pneumoniae	Ultrastructural changes in hamster tracheal rings culture exposed to pneumoniae mycoplasma.
7	early pathological changes associated with fasciola hepatica infections in white tailed deer	Preterm changes associated with fasciola hepatica infections in white tail.
7	genetic variation in coumarin hydroxylase activity in the mouse mus musculus	Genetic variation of l' coumarin hydroxylase activity in mouse musculus.
7	allografted lungs in matched dogs with induced pulmonary hypertension	L' pulmonary allograft in dogs with induced pulmonary hypertension.
7	spectrum of asthma in children i clinical and physiological components	Asthma Spectrum in Children i clinical and physiological components.
7	ectopic acth production in carcinoma of the lung	Ectopic acth production in carcinoma of the lung.
7	superoxide dismutase activity in leukocytes	L' superoxide dismutase activity in white blood cells.
7	the distribution between gamma glutamylhydrozamate synthetase and l glutamine hydroxylamine glutamyltransferase activities in rat tissues studies in vitro	Distribution between glutamylhydrozamate synthetase and glutamine hydroxylamine glutamyltransferase activities in rat tissue in vitro studies.
7	lung collagen heterogeneity	Pulmonary collagen heterogeneity.
7	effective treatment for paraquat poisoning in rats and its relevance to treatment of paraquat poisoning in man	Effective treatment of oral infections; paraquat poisoning in rats and its relevance to the treatment of oral infections; paraquat poisoning in men.
7	metabolic differences between normal and neoplastic cells effects of aminonucleoside on cytoplasmic messenger rna	Metabolic differences between the effects of the aminonucleosides on normal and neoplastic cells of the cytoplasmic messenger rna.
7	purification and properties of the cathepsin d types proteinase from beef and rabbit lung and its identification in macrophages	Purification and properties of bovine and rabbit lung proteinase type cathepsin and its identification in macrophages.
7	studies with radioactive endotoxin ii clearance of 3h labelled endotoxin from the blood of calves	Studies with radioactive endotoxin ii clearance of apo; labelled 3 h endotoxin of calf blood.
7	immunofluorescent studies of bovine hypersensitivity pneumonitis	Disease studies; immunofluorescent pneumonitis; bovine hypersensitivity.
7	properties of intracytoplasmic a particles isolated from oncornavirus producing human cells	Intracytoplasmic particle properties isolated from oncornavirus producing human cells.
7	herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells ii an ultrastructural study of viral penetration	Virus; herpes simplex and replication of human cytomegalovirus in cells wi 38 ii, ultrastructural study of viral penetration.
7	rectal and gastric involvement in a case of sarcoidosis	Rectal and gastric involvement in sarcoidosis.
7	the use of immunoadsorbent columns for the isolation of antibodies specific for antigens associated with human bronchogenic carcinoma	Use of d&apos columns; immunoadsorbents to isolate antibodies specific to the antigens associated with the human bronchogenic carcinoma.
7	evidence for different gestation dependent effects of cortisol on cultured fetal lung cells	Evidence of different cortisol-dependent gestational effects on cultured fetal lung cells.
7	biosynthetic pathway of desmosines in elastin	Biosynthetic pathway of desmosins in elastin.
7	effects of intravenous administration of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis histamine bradykinin and prostaglandin f2alpha on pulmonary mechanics in the guinea pig	Effects of apos; intravenous administration of the slow-reacting substance of apos; histamine bradykinin and prostaglandin f2alpha on the pulmonary mechanics of the guinea pig.
7	positive control of transformed phenotype in hybrids between sv40 transformed and normal human cells	Positive control of transformed phenotype in hybrid between transformed and normal human sv40 cells.
7	cell cycle analysis in 20 minutes	We're running a cell cycle analysis in 20 minutes.
7	fibrosing alveolitis and treatment with sulphasalazine	Fibrosing alveolite and sulphasalazine treatment.
7	pulmonary bacterial susceptibility in the burned rat	Pulmonary bacterial susceptibility in burned rat.
7	aspiration of blood and pulmonary host defense mechanisms	Pulmonary aspiration and defense mechanisms of the lung host.
7	pulmonary platelet aggregates associated with sudden death in man	Pulmonary platelet aggregates associated with sudden death in the male.
7	clearance of candida albicans from the bloodstream of rabbits	Canda albicans removed from the bloodstream of rabbits.
7	human beta d n acetylhexosaminidases a and b expression and linkage relationships in somatic cell hybrids	The expression and binding relationships of human beta d' acetylhexosaminidases a and b in somatic cell hybrids.
7	the effect of corrective surgery on pulmonary function in scoliosis	L*apos; effect of corrective surgery on pulmonary function in scoliosis.
7	differences in the character and intensity of morphologic changes in the peritoneal cavity and lungs resulting from experimental exposure to cement dust	Differences in nature and timing; intensity of morphological changes in the peritoneal cavity and lungs resulting from the apos; experimental exposure to cement dust.
7	lipoid pneumonia in infants and children in south india	Lipoid pneumonia in infants and children in the south of the country.
7	adrenaline induced acute massive pulmonary oedema in the dog	Adrenaline caused acute pulmonary edema in the dog.
7	comparison by controlled clinical trial of streptokinase and heparin in treatment of life threatening pulmonay embolism	Comparison by controlled clinical trial of streptokinase and apos; heparin in the treatment of apos; pulmonary embolism threatening life.
7	genetic control of mitochondrial thymidine kinase in human mouse and monkey mouse somatic cell hybrids	Genetic control of mitochondrial thymidine kinase in mouse-monkey hybrid somatic cells.
7	plaque assay for avirulent lentogenic strains of newcastle disease virus	Plate testing of slow-growing, avirulent strains of the Newcastle disease virus.
7	histopathology of one stage bilateral lung allografts	Bacteriological characteristics of the lung: a comparative study.
7	the effect of carbon dioxide in the airways and alveoli on ventilation a vagal reflex studied in the dog	The effect of carbon dioxide in the airways and alveoli on ventilation is a vagal reflex that has been studied in dogs.
7	the effect of edema hydrocortisone acetate concurrent viral infection and immunization on the clearance of pasteurella hemolytica from the bovine lung	The effect of the oedema hydrocortisone acetate co-occurring with viral infection and apos; immunization on the clearance of the pasteurella hemolytica of the bovine lung.
7	influence of the ventilation mechanics on the hematocrit value i research in rabbits subjected to experimental pneumothorax	The influence of ventilation mechanics on the value of hematocrit in experimental pneumothorax-treated rabbits.
7	growth of mammalian cells on substrates coated with cellular microexudates i effect on cell growth at low population densities	The growth of mammalian cells on substrates coated with cellular microexudates i has an effect on the growth of cells at low population densities.
7	differentiation of smallpox and camelpox viruses in cultures of human and monkey cells	Differentiation of smallpox and camel pox viruses in human cell and monkey culture.
7	autopsy data and their total evaluation	Data from post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem and post-mortem; post-mortem evaluation; post-mortem evaluation; post-mortem evaluation; evaluation was obtained by ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee eii ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee eii ee ee ee ee ee eii ee ee ee ee ee ee ee eii ee ee ee ee ee ee eii ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee ee e
7	modified spinning top homogeneous spray apparatus for use in experimental respiratory disease studies	A modified, homogeneous rotary top spray unit for use in experimental respiratory disease studies.
7	phospholipid biosynthesis the activity of phosphatidic acid phosphohydrolase in the developing lung and amnionic fluid	Phospholipid biosynthesis is apos; phosphate phosphohydrolase activity; phosphatidic acid in developing lung and amnionic fluid.
7	functional evaluation of lung mitochondria	A functional evaluation of the pulmonary mitochondria.
7	collagen in the lung development of a technology applicable to human lung disease	Collagen in lung development; a technology that is applicable to human lung diseases.
7	pharmacologic regulation of alveolar surfactant in fetal and newborn rabbits acth heroin isoxsuprine and glucocorticoid	Drug regulation of alveolar surfactant in fetus and new-rabbits born acth heroin isoxsuprine and glucocorticoids.
7	the destruction of type 2 pneumocytes by airborne influenza pr8 a virus its effect on surfactant and lecithin content of the pneumonic lesions of mice	Destruction of type 2 pneumocytes by pr8 virus has airborne influenza, its effect on the surfactant and lecithin content of mouse pneumonic lesions.
7	comparison of the cardiopulmonary effects of subcutaneously administered epinephrine and terbutaline in patients with reversible airway obstruction	Comparison of the cardiopulmonary effects of apos; administration of epinephrine and terbutaline to patients with epinephrine; reversible obstruction of the airway.
7	pulmonary mycotoxicosis	Pulmonary mycotoxicosis.
7	fatal lung scan in a case of pulmonary hypertension due to obliterative pulmonary vascular disease	Fatal lung scan in case of apo; pulmonary hypertension due to pulmonary vascular disease.
7	pulmonary function studies in ex heroin users	Pulmonary function studies of former heroin addicts.
7	the use of spontaneous ventilation with constant positive airway pressure in the treatment of salt water near drowning	L' use of self-ventilation with constant positive respiratory pressure in the treatment of aspiration; salt water near drowning site.
7	the chest abdomen sign in familial dysautonomia	L' abdomen indicates family independence.
7	clinical aspects of atypical mycobacterial infection	Clinical aspects of apo; atypical mycobacterial infection.
7	importance of physical properties of benzo a pyrene ferric oxide mixtures in lung tumor induction	Importance of the physical properties of benzo a pyrene ferric oxide mixtures in the apos; induction of lung tumours.
7	effects of cigarette smoking on aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase activity in lungs and tissues of inbred mice	Effects of tobacco use on appetite; activity of appetite; hydroxylase of aryl hydrocarbons in the lungs and tissues of inbred mice.
7	suggestive evidence for in vivo binding of specific antitumor antibodies of human melanomas	Evidence suggesting in vivo binding of anti-tumour antibodies specific to human melanoma.
7	aminochlorthenoxycycline levels in experimental acute inflammation of the respiratory tree	Rates of apos; aminochlorthenoxycycline in the apos; experimental acute inflammation of the apos; respiratory tree.
7	bronchopulmonary aminochlorthenoxycycline levels in experimental burns of the respiratory tree	Apos bronchopulmonary level; aminochlorthenoxycycline in experimental apo burns; respiratory tree.
7	techniques of radiotherapy in so called operable carcinoma of the breast	Radiation therapy techniques in so-called operable breast carcinoma.
7	endogenous c type virus of a mouse cell line and its defectiveness	An endogenous virus of the type c d'apos; a mouse cell line and its defectivity.
7	diffuse and focal oxygen pneumonitis a preliminary report on the threshold of pulmonary oxygen toxicity in man	Focal and diffuse lung cancer due to apos; oxygen, a preliminary report on the threshold for lung toxicity in men.
7	tryptamine receptors in rat pulmonary artery	Tryptamine receptors in the rat pulmonary artery.
7	pulmonary mechanical effects of experimental lung embolism and their modification by bronchodilator drugs in the guinea pig	Pulmonary mechanical effects of experimental pulmonary embolism and its modification by guinea pig bronchodilators.
7	characterization of particulate and soluble guanylate cyclases from rat lung	Characterization of particulate and soluble rat lung guanylate cyclases.
7	viral respiratory infections of horses structure and function of lungs in relation to viral infection	Viral respiratory infections in horses and the structure and function of the lungs related to viral infection.
7	early changes in lungs of rats exposed to 70 per cent o2	Early changes in the lungs of rats exposed to 70% o2.
7	five fluorocarbons for administration of aerosol bronchodilators	Five fluorocarbons for apos; aerosol bronchodilator administration.
7	prostaglandin inactivation in guinea pig lung and its inhibition	Inactivation of prostaglandins in the guinea pig lung and its inhibition.
7	clinically useful method for the isolation of respiratory syncytial virus	Clinically useful for apo; isolation of respiratory syncytial virus.
7	evaluation of four antiviral agents in the treatment of herpes simplex encephalitis in a rat model	The evaluation of four antiviral agents in the treatment of apos; herpes simplex encephalitis in a model rat.
7	dissociation of the immunologic release of histamine and slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis from human lung using cytochalasins a and b 1	Dissociation of apos; histamine and slow reaction substance from apos; human lung anaphylaxis to apos; cytochalasin aid a and b 1.
7	antibody mediated cytotoxicity after measles virus infection	Antibody-mediated cytotoxicity after infection with measles virus.
7	migration and embolization of macrophages to the lung a possible mechanism for colloid uptake in the lung during liver scanning	Migration and liver function; embolization of macrophages in the lung, a possible mechanism for lung cancer; absorption of colloids in the lung during liver scintigraphy.
7	production and characteristics of 125xe a new noble gas for in vivo studies	125xe production and characteristics of a new rare gas for in vivo studies.
7	liver scan showing intense lung uptake in neoplasia and infection	Hepatic scan showing extensive pulmonary absorption in neoplasia and lupus; infection.
7	does rna pass from mesenchyme to epithelium during an embryonic tissue interaction	Rna changes from mesenchyme to apos; epithelium during apos; embryonic tissue interaction.
7	extension of the lifespan of cultured normal human diploid cells by vitamin e	Extension of the life span of normal human diploid cells grown with vitamin e.
7	experimental meconium aspiration effects of glucocorticoid treatment	Experimental effects of glucocorticoid treatment on the meconium aspiration.
7	relationship between fibrinolysis of cultured cells and malignancy	Relationship between fibrinolysis of cultured cells and malignancy.
7	human cytomegalovirus stimulates host cell rna synthesis	The synthesis of host cell rna is stimulated by human cytomegalovirus.
7	paragonimus kellicotti infection in wild carnivores in southwestern ontario i prevalence and gross pathologic features	Infection paragonimus kellicotti in wild carnivores in the south-west of l' Ontario and general pathological characteristics.
7	tuberculosis in lesser flamingoes in kenya	Infection with tuberculosis in small flamingoes.
7	prevalence of dictyocaulus viviparus infection in rocky mountain elk in teton county wyoming	Prevalence of elk; dictyocaulus viviparus infection in mountain elk in Teton Wyoming County.
7	optimum end expiratory airway pressure in patients with acute pulmonary failure	Optimum expiratory end-point pressure in patients with chronic lung disease; acute pulmonary insufficiency.
7	land edwards membrane oxygenator without pump as total lung prosthesis	Land border membrane oxygenator without a total lung prosthesis pump.
7	glomerulonephritis associated with antibody to glomerular basement membrane	Glomerulonephritis is associated with antibody activity against the glomerular basement membrane.
7	effect of continuous positive airway pressure on breathing pattern of infants with respiratory distress syndrome	Effect of continued positive respiratory pressure on the respiratory profile of infants with Respiratory Distress Syndrome.
7	peripheral metabolism of bovine parathyroid hormone in the dog	Acute peripheral metabolism of the apos; bovine parathyroid hormone in dogs.
7	congenital bronchopulmonary foregut malformation with anomalous pulmonary artery	Congenital bronchopulmonary malformation of the intestine; anterior intestine with anaphylactic abnormality; pulmonary artery.
7	ventilatory control in myxedema and hypothyroidism	Ventilatory control of myxedema and apos, hypothyroidism.
7	direct isolation of mycoplasmas and acholeplasmas from sera and kidneys of calves	Direct isolation of mycoplasma and acholeplasm from serum and kidney of calves.
7	respiratory function in liver cirrhosis spirometry blood gas analysis and radioisotope study with xenon 133	Respiratory function in hepatic cirrhosis spirometry analyses blood gases and radioisotope study with xenon 133.
7	a simple method of inflation fixation and air drying of lungs	A simple method of attaching air to your lungs; inflation and drying.
7	cytomegalovirus interference in vitro	In vitro cytomegalovirus interference.
7	effects of pattern of ventilation on pulmonary metabolism and mechanics	The effects of ventilation on the metabolism and mechanics of the lungs.
7	the effect of pre existing pulmonary vascular disease on the response to mechanical ventilation with peep following open heart surgery	Lapos; effect pre-existing pulmonary vascular disease on mechanical ventilation response with peep after open heart surgery.
7	anti herpesvirus action of isoprinosine	Action-isoprinosine herpesviruses.
7	evaluation of the effect of respiratory movements of the organs on the resolution index	Evaluation of weight; effect of respiratory movements of organs on weight; resolution index.
7	variability of closing volume measurements in normal man	The variability of measurements of volume of closure in normal males.
7	the n2 closing volume test in population studies sources of variation and reproducibility	The closure volume test n2 in population studies is a source of variation and reproducibility.
7	diffusing capacity membrane diffusing capacity capillary blood volume pulmonary tissue volume and cardiac output measured by a rebreathing technique	Membrane diffusion capacity capillary blood volume diffusion capacity lung volume volume and cardiac output measured by rebreathing technique.
7	the effects of proteolytic enzymes on the tensile strength of human lung	The effects of proteolytic enzymes on the tensile strength of the human lungs.
7	the beta adrenoceptors of the lung mediating inhibition of antigen induced histamine release	The antigen-induced release of apos; histamine is induced by the adrenergic receptors of the lung, which are involved in the inhibition of apos.
7	pulmonary vascular changes associated with isolated mitral stenosis in india	Pulmonary vascular changes associated with isolated mitral stenosis in l'apos; India.
7	cryostat microtomy of lung tissue in an expanded state	Freeze-stable microtomy of the lung tissue to apos; enlarged state.
7	interstitial pulmonary edema following bromocarbamide intoxication	Interstitial pulmonary edema from bromocarbamide poisoning.
7	pulmonary emboli prevention diagnosis and treatment	Diagnosis and treatment of pulmonary embolism and prevention.
7	citrate formation by rat lung mitochondrial preparations	Citrate formation by mitochondrial rat lung preparations.
7	cellular aspects of local antibody response in rabbits	The cellular aspects of the rabbit's local immune response.
7	the part played by cell mediated immunity in mycoplasma respiratory infections	The role of cell-mediated immunity in the development of mycoplasmic respiratory infections.
7	role of respiratory viruses in childhood mortality	Role of respiratory viruses in infant mortality.
7	effects of alpha and beta receptor stimulating and blocking agents on experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation	Effects of beta- and alpha-receptor blocking and stimulation agents on experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation.
7	comparative effects of proteinase inhibitors plasminogen antiactivators heparin and acetylsalicylic acid on the experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation induced by thormbin	Comparative effects of proteinase inhibitors, plasminogen antiactivators, heparin and acetylsalicylic acid on experimental thormbin-induced disseminated intravascular coagulation.
7	the lung colony assay extension to the lewis lung tumour and the b16 melanoma radiosensitivity of b16 melanoma cells	The lung colony test was extended to the lung tumour of Lewis and the radiosensitivity of melanoma b16 of melanoma cells.
7	formation of cysteinyldopa from glutathionedopa in melanoma	Cysteine formation-yldopa from glutathioneedopa in the melanoma.
7	lung expansion and the formation of the alveolar lining layer in the fullterm newborn rabbit	Pulmonary expansion and formation of the alveolar layer of the lining in the new-term rabbit.
7	relationship of ehrlichia canis infected mononuclear cells to blood vessels of lungs	Relationship between infected mononuclear cells in apos; ehrlichia canis and blood vessels in the lungs.
7	the effect of in utero decapitation on the morphological and physiological development of the fetal rabbit lung	L' effect of in utero decapitation on the morphological and physiological development of rabbit fetal lung.
7	effects of airway versus arterial co2 changes on lung mechanics in dogs	Effects of airway versus arterial co2 changes on the pulmonary mechanics of dogs.
7	interrelations between pulmonary liquid volumes and lung compliance	Interrelationship between fluid volumes of the lungs and pulmonary compliance.
7	influence of cycloheximide on the lung	L' influence of cycloheximide on lungs.
7	pulmonary diffusing capacity and capillary blood volume in aging dogs	Pulmonary diffusion capacity and capillary blood volume in aging dogs.
7	lung mechanics in hypervolemic pulmonary edema	Pulmonary mechanics in apos; hypervolemic pulmonary edema.
7	distribution of ventilation perfusion ratios in dogs with normal and abnormal lungs	Distribution of airway ventilation ratios in dogs with normal and abnormal lungs.
7	branching pattern of airways and air spaces of a single human terminal bronchiole	Connecting pattern of airways and airways in a unique human terminal bronchiole.
7	human air space shapes sizes areas and volumes	L' human airspace is made up of zone sizes and volumes.
7	cell mediated cytotoxicity to human pulmonary neoplasms	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity in human pulmonary neoplasms.
7	aerosol metallic paints deliberate inhalation a study of inhalation and or ingestion of copper and zinc particles	Metal Paints in Aerosol by Intentional Inhalation Study of the effects of inhalation or inhalation; ingestion of copper and zinc particles.
7	pulmonary granulomatous pneumocystosis following renal transplantation report of a case	Pulmonary granulomatous pneumocysts, following renal transplant.
7	neonatal pneumopericardium	Neonatal pneumopericardium.
7	lymphangiomyomatosis report of a case with ureteral involvement and chyluria	Lymphangiomyomatosis with both urethral and chyluria has been reported.
7	the mucosubstance coating the pneumonocytes in the lungs of xenopus laevis and lacerta viridis	The mucosubstance that covers the pneumonocytes in the lungs of xenopus laevis and lacerta-viridis.
7	ultrastructure of the lung in loeffler s pneumonia	Ultrastructural lung in Loeffler's pneumonia.
7	a prospective evaluation of the lecithin sphingomyelin ratio and the rapid surfactant test in relation to fetal pulmonary maturity	A prospective evaluation of the lecithin ratio-sphingomyelin and the rapid test of surfactants in relation to fetal lung maturity.
7	amniotic fluid phospholipids and fatty acids in normal pregnancies relation to gestational age and neonatal condition	In normal pregnancies, amniotic fluid phospholipids and fatty acids are related to gestational age and the neonatal condition.
7	endocrine influences on pulmonary maturation and the lecithin sphingomyelin ratio in the fetal baboon	Endocrine influences on lung maturation and lecithin ratio-sphingomyelin in the fetal baboon.
7	fetal maturity biochemical analyses of amniotic fluid	Biochemical analysis of fetal maturity of amniotic fluid.
7	influence of lung parenchyma on collapsibility of dog bronchi	Influence of lung parenchyma on the collaptability of the canine bronchi.
7	lung lavage using a single lumen endotracheal tube	Pulmonary lavage with the help of a single-light endotracheal tube.
7	increased sheep lung vascular permeability caused by pseudomonas bacteremia	Increased pulmonary vascular permeability of sheep caused by bacteremia to pseudomonas.
7	the relation of endogenous adenosine cyclic 3 5 monophosphate to the antagonistic effects of adenosine and colchicine on cell shape	The relationship between monophosphate d' cyclic endogenous adenosine 3-5 and the antagonistic effects of etapos; adenosine and colchicine on cell shape.
7	distribution and seasonal prevalence of bovine lungworms in selected areas in western montana	Distribution and seasonal prevalence of bovine pulmonary worms in certain regions of west montana.
7	lung function consequences of dust exposure in asbestos cement manufacturing plants	Effects on lung function; exposure to dust in manufacturing plants; asbestos @ cement.
7	bacterial contamination of organic dusts effects on pulmonary cell reactions	Effects of bacterial contamination of organic dusts on the reactions of lung cells.
7	reaction of cultured adult and fetal lung to prednisolone and thyroxine	Reaction of fetal and adult lungs to both prednisolone and thyroxine.
7	ultrastructural alterations observed in mouse lung after prolonged he o2 exposure	Ultrastructural alterations have been observed in the mouse lung following prolonged exposure to sulfur dioxide.
7	increased susceptibility to pulmonary oxygen toxicity after cholesterol biosynthesis inhibition	Increased sensitivity to pulmonary toxicity of the apos; oxygen after the apos; inhibition of cholesterol biosynthesis.
7	phosphatidyglycerol in rat lung ii comparison of occurrence composition and metabolism in surfactant and residual lung fractions	Phosphatidyglycerol in rat lung tissue ii compares the composition and metabolism of surfactant and residual lung fractions.
7	changes in the number of binding sites for ribonucleic acid polymerase in chromatin of wi 38 fibroblasts stimulated to proliferate	Changes in the number of ribonucleic acid polymerase binding sites in chromatin of 38 stimulated wi fibroblasts.
7	location and abundance of poly a sequences in sendai virus messenger rna molecules	Localization and abundance of poly a sequences in rna messenger molecules of the sendai virus.
7	differential feulgen deoxyribonucleic acid hydrolysis patterns of herpes simplex virus type 1 and type 2 infected cells	Differential models of apo; hydrolysis of apo; deoxyribonucleic feulgenic acid of cells infected with apoviruses; type 1 and type 2 herpes simplex.
7	immune complexes in cystic fibrosis	Immune complexes in cystic fibrosis?
7	ultrastructure of rabbit lung intravenously infected with mycobacterium simiae weiszfeiler no 52	The ultrastructure of rabbit lung tissue infected intravenously with the mycobacterium simiae weiszfeiler no.
7	the mechanism of damage to neutrophils in allergic reactions in tuberculosis	The mechanism of neutrophil damage in allergic reactions to tuberculosis.
7	failure of pentamidine isethionate to provide chemoprophylaxis against pneumocytis carinii infection in rats	Insufficient dosage of pentamidine isethionate to provide anti-aposal chemoprophylaxis; pneumocytis carinii infection in rats.
7	acute immunologic pulmonary alveolitis	Acute immunologic pulmonary alveolitis.
7	association of asbestos and bronchogenic carcinoma in a population with low asbestos exposure	Association of asbestos and bronchogenic carcinoma in a population exposed to low levels of asbestos.
7	characterization of lung surfactant factors promoting formation of artifactual lipid protein complexes	Characterization of pulmonary surfactant factors promoting artificial lipid protein complex formation.
7	chromatographic analyses of 3 methylcholanthrene metabolism in adult and fetal mice and the occurrence of conjugating enzymes in the fetus	Chromatographic analysis of metabolism of 3 methylcholanthrenes in adult and fetal mice and analysis of the presence of conjugated enzymes in the fetus.
7	in vitro metabolism and microsome mediated mutagenicity of dialkylnitrosamines in rat hamster and mouse tissues	In vitro metabolism and microsomal-mediated mutagenicity of dialkylnitrosamines in hamster and rat mouse tissues.
7	peptidyl proline hydroxylase in adult developing and neoplastic rat tissues	Pepidyl proline hydroxylase in tissues of developing and neoplastic adult rats.
7	aminopeptidases and arylamidases in normal and cancer tissues in humans	The use of aminopeptidases and arylamidases in normal and cancerous tissues in humans.
7	baroreceptor and chemoreceptor influences on heart rate during the respiratory cycle in the dog	Baroreceptor and chemoreceptor influences on the dog heart rate during the breathing cycle.
7	rhinovirus rna polymerase products and kinetics of appearance in human diploid cells	Products of the rhinovirus rna polymerase and kinetics of l' appearance in human diploid cells.
7	demonstration that the atria ventricles and lungs each are responsible for a tonic inhibition of the vasomotorcenter in the dog	The results of this study demonstrate that the ventricles of the atrium and lungs are each responsible for a tonic inhibition of vasomotorization in dogs.
7	continuous inhibition of renin release in dogs by vagally innervated receptors in the cardiopulmonary region	L' continued inhibition of renin release in dogs by vagally innervated renin receptors in the cardiopulmonary region.
7	arterial lysosomes and connective tissue in primate atherosclerosis and hypertension	Arterial lysosomes and connective tissue in primate atherosclerosis and apos; hypertension.
7	abolition of natural tolerance and the influence of the chemical allergen beryllium on autoimmune processes	Removal of natural tolerance and apo; influence of beryllium chemical allergen on auto-immune processes.
7	maximal oxygen uptake lung volume and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide and hypoxia in a pair of identical twin athletes	The maximum volume of pulmonary consumption of oxygen and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide and lapos; hypoxia in identical twin athletes.
7	a new radiologic sign of subpulmonic effusion	A new radiological sign with a pulmonary-effusion.
7	goodpasture s syndrome author s transl	Translation of the apo placentae; author of Goodpasture syndrome.
7	filaroides hirthi sp n nematoda metastrongyloidea from the lung of the dog	Filaroides hirthi sp nematoda metastrongyloidea from dog lung.
7	pulmonary emphysema and liver disease occurrence in an alpha antitrypsin deficient adult	Pulmonary infection due to emphysema and liver disease in an adult patient with an alpha antitrypsin deficiency.
7	methods to preclude aspiration or swallowing of dental appliances	Methods to prevent aspiration or aspiration; dental device ingestion.
7	the pathogenesis of infections of the mouse caused by virulent and avirulent variants of an influenza virus	Mouse infections caused by virulent and avirulent variants of the influenza virus.
7	the role of cardiac sympathetic discharges during the pulmonary depressor reflex	The role of cardiac sympathetic discharges during the course of the pulmonary depressor reflex.
7	certain problems of intensive therapy of acute myocardial infarct	Some acute treatment issues for acute myocardial infarction.
7	principles of early postoperative management of patients after open heart surgery	The principles of the early postoperative treatment of patients after open heart surgery.
7	multiple herpesvirus simiae isolation from a rhesus monkey which died of cerebral infarction	Multiple Virus Virus Simiae Is Is Isolation of Apoes; a rhesus monkey that died of a cerebral infarction.
7	influence of cotton dust inhalation on free lung cells in rats and guinea pigs	Influence of abs; inhalation of cotton dust on free lung cells of rats and guinea pigs.
7	the role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the division of wi 38 cells the cellular response to prostaglandin e1 and the effects of an cyclic adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate analogue and prostaglandin e1 on cell division	The role of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in wi 38 cell division, cell response to prostaglandin e1 and the effects of d' a cyclic analog of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and prostaglandin e1 on cell division.
7	variations in pulmonary antibacterial defenses among experimental animals	Variations in antibacterial defenses of the lungs in laboratory animals.
7	inhibition by derivatives of phloretin of anaphylactic histamine release from human lung tissue and of prostaglandin f2alpha induced bronchoconstriction	The inhibition by phloretin derivatives of anaphylactic histamine from human lung tissue and prostaglandin f2alpha induced bronchoconstriction.
7	histamine in the tissues of the marsupial setonix brachyurus the quokka	Histamine in the tissues of marsupial setonix brachyurus the quokka.
7	radiographically determined lung volumes at full inspiration and during dynamic forced expiration in normal subjects	Lung volume in normal subjects was determined by x-ray at maximum, inspiration and during forced dynamic expirations.
7	cardiac and pulmonary effects of acebutolol	Cardiac and pulmonary effects of apos; acebutol.
7	oxygen toxicity in the newborn the effect of prolonged 100 per cent o2 exposure on the lungs of newborn mice	Toxicity to apo; newborn-oxygen effects; prolonged exposure to 100% d' O2 on the lungs of newborn-mice.
7	pulmonary insufficiency induced by oleic acid in the sheep a model for investigation of extracorporeal oxygenation	Pulmonary failure induced by apos; oleic acid in sheep, a model for apos; study of apos; extracorporeal oxygenation.
7	isolation and some serological and epidemiological data on the viruses recovered from patients with subacute thyroiditis de quervain	Isolation and some serologic and epidemiologic data on viruses recovered from patients with subacute quervain thyroiditis.
7	effects of prolonged administration of chlorphentermine on the rat lung	Effects of chlorphentermine; prolonged administration of chlorphentermine to the lungs of rats.
7	detection by means of cell fusion of macromolecular synthesis involved in the reconstruction of the nuclear envelope in mitosis	Detection by cell fusion of macromolecular synthesis involved in reconstruction of the nuclear envelope during mitosis.
7	collagen in the human lung quantitation of rates of synthesis and partial characterization of composition	Collagen in the human lung, quantification of synthetic rates and partial characterization of composition.
7	histamine release formation of prostaglandin like activity srs c and mast cell degranulation by the direct lytic factor dlf and phospholipase a of cobra venom	L' histamine releases the formation of prostaglandins such as srsc activity and degranulation of mast cells by the direct lytic factor dlf and phospholipase has cobra venom.
7	metabolism and autoradiographic distribution of delta 8 and delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol in some organs of the monkey callithrix jacchus	Metabolism and autoradiographic distribution of tetrahydrocannabinol delta 8 and delta 9 in organs of the callithrix monkey jacchus.
7	liquid breathing trials and animal studies with a demand regulated liquid breathing system	Liquid respiration tests and animal studies with demand-driven liquid respiration systems.
7	automated system for measurement of mechanics of breathing	Respiratory mechanics automated measurement system.
7	gamma ray densitometry in the analysis of hemodynamic function	Gamma Densitometry (GD) in the apos; hemodynamic function analysis.
7	quantitative comparison of techniques used to measure complement mediated cytotoxicity of nucleated cells	Quantitative comparison of the techniques used to measure complement-mediated cytotoxicity of nucleated cells.
7	edge sharpness and enhancement of electron radiographs ergs produced with powder cloud development	The sharpness of the edges and l' the improvement of the electronic x-rays ergs produced with the development of cloud powders.
7	experimental immune complex disease of the lung the pathogenesis of a laboratory model resembling certain human interstitial lung diseases	It is a complex, immunological, experimental disease of the lungs, the pathogenesis of apos; a laboratory model resembling certain human interstitial lung diseases.
7	induction of blood eosinophilia by pulmonary embolization of antigen coated particles the relationship to cell mediated immunity	Induction of eosinophilia; blood eosinophilia by pulmonary embolization of cell-mediated particles coated with eosinophilia; antigen relationship; cell-mediated immunity.
7	intralobar pulmonary sequestration in lymphoid and vascular hamartia	Intraalobar pulmonary sequestration in lymphoid and vascular hamartia.
7	intracellular supravital stain delocalization as an assay for antibody dependent complement mediated cell damage	The delocalization of intracellular supravital staining as a test for detecting antibody-mediated complement-mediated cellular damage.
7	quantitative extraction of tubocurarine gallamine and decamethonium from biological materials	Quantitative extraction of gallamine and decamethonium tubocurarines from biological materials.
7	effects of therapeutic irradiation delivered in early childhood upon subsequent lung function	Effects of apo; therapeutic irradiation administered in early childhood on the subsequent pulmonary function.
7	chemoreceptor reflexes in preterm infants ii the effect of gestational and postnatal age on the ventilatory response to inhaled carbon dioxide	Chemo-receptor reflexes in preterm infants; effect of pregnancy; gestational and postnatal age on ventilatory response; inhalation of carbon dioxide.
7	extravascular lung water following hemorrhagic shock in the baboon comparison between resuscitation with ringer s lactate and plasmanate	Extravascular pulmonary water following hemorrhagic shock in the resuscitation comparison with serum lactate and plasmanate.
7	cultivation and survival studies of neisseria gonorrhoeae in a human diploid cell strain	Culture and survival studies of neisseria gonorrhoeae in human diploid cell line.
7	a new model for neonatal pulmonary hemorrhage research	A new model for research on neonatal pulmonary hemorrhage.
7	the significance of circulating glycerol as a precursor of pulmonary phosphatidylcholine in the developing mammalian lung	L' importance of the circulating glycerol as a precursor of pulmonary phosphatidylcholine in developing mammalian lungs.
7	lamb fetal pulmonary fluid i validation and significance of method for determination of volume and volume change	Validation and significance of the method for the determination of volume and volume changes in the fetal lung fluid (FFL); lamb i.
7	lamb fetal pulmonary fluid ii fate of phosphatidylcholine	Fetal lung fluid d' lamb ii become a phosphatidylcholine.
7	the enzymes of lecithin biosynthesis in human neonatal lungs iv phosphorylcholine cytidyltransferase	The enzymes of lecithin biosynthesis in human neonatal lung tissue iv phosphorylcholine cytidyltransferase.
7	cerebral etiology of the acute respiratory distress syndrome diphenylhydantoin prophylaxis	Cerebral etiology of acute respiratory distress syndrome, diphenylhydantoin prophylaxis.
7	increased rna synthesis in nuclear monolayers of wi 38 cells stimulated to proliferate	Increased rna synthesis in nuclear monolayers of stimulated 38 wi cells.
7	inhibition by levamisole of metastases by cells transformed by herpes simplex virus type i	L' levamisole inhibition of metastasis by l&apos virus transformed cells; herpes simplex type i.
7	differential effects of prostaglandins a1 and a2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in the dog	Differential effects of prostaglandins a1 and a2 on the pulmonary vascular resistance in dogs.
7	alveolar lavage cytology in transplanted lungs i staining methods and findings in dogs with autografts and allografts without immunosuppression	"""Alveolar washing cytology in transplanted lungs: staining methods and findings in dogs with autografts and allografts without immunosuppression"", J Med."
7	pulmonary problems in duchenne muscular dystrophy diagnosis prophylaxis and treatment	Acute pulmonary problems in the diagnosis of muscular dystrophy in duchenne prophylaxis and treatment.
7	diagnostic approaches in metastatic lung disease	Diagnostic approaches to metastatic lung disease.
7	vasoactive intestinal polypoptide inactivation in liver and potentiation in lung of anesthetized dogs 384699	Inactivation of vasoactive intestinal polypoptides in the liver and lung potentiation in anesthetized dogs 384699.
7	metabolic and dosimetric studies after inhalation of 227th in rats with regard to the risk of lung and bone tumors	Metabolic and dosimetric studies on the risk of lung and bone tumours in rats following inhalation of 227e.
7	pulmonary radiographic abnormalities in shock roentgen clinical pathological correlation	Chest radiographic abnormalities in the clinical pathological correlation of shock roentgen.
7	gallstone in the lung	There's gallstones in the lungs.
7	experimental infection of calves with respiratory syncytial virus	Experimental infection of calves with the respiratory syncytial virus.
7	experimental infection of lambs with an aerosol of pasteurella haemolytica	Experimental infection of the lambs with a pasteurella haemolytica aerosol.
7	a model of the pathways of inhaled medicaments to their receptor sites	A model of the pathways of the inhaled drugs to their receptor sites.
7	intraspecies differences in lung metabolism and granular pneumocyte mitochondria	Intraspecific differences in pulmonary metabolism and granular pneumocyte mitochondria.
7	gas transport efficacy of gills lungs and skin theory and experimental data	L' efficiency of gill gas transport, lung and skin theory and experimental data.
7	postnatal growth of the mammalian lung lack of influence by carbon monoxide exposure	Postnatal growth of mammalian lungs is not influenced by carbon monoxide exposure.
7	progress in fetal assessment	Status report; fetal evaluation.
7	a determination of the minimum radiopacification necessary for radiographic detection of an aspirated or swallowed object	Determination of the minimum radiopacification necessary for the radiographic detection of an object that has been sucked or swallowed.
7	treatment of crenosomiasis in dogs	Treatment of dogs with crenosomiasis.
7	mode of action of chlorambucil initial metabolic studies using carbon 14 isotope labeling rheumatological implications of their results	Action of initial metabolic studies of chlorambucil using carbon isotope labeling 14 rheumatological implications of their results.
7	sarcoid reactions in pulmonary neoplasms	Sarcoid reactions in pulmonary neoplasms?
7	isolation of type c virions from a normal human fibroblast strain	Isolate C-type Virions; a normal human fibroblast strain.
7	pulmonary edema in patients with sepsis	Pulmonary edema (LED) in patients with sepsis.
7	bronchial venular leakage during endotoxin shock	You know, bronchial venous leak during endotoxin shock.
7	on glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharide in a case of pulmonary fibrosis author s transl	In the case of translative pulmonary fibrosis, on glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharide.
7	lactate formation by the avian lung tissue	Lactate formation by avian lung tissue.
7	comprehensive lung function test for outpatients a present day review and its application	Complete lung function testing for outpatients current day examination and its application.
7	inflation reflex in the rat	This is an inflationary rat reflex.
7	dual camera studies of pulmonary function with computer processing of data	Dual-camera studies of lung function with computer data processing.
7	the fat embolism syndrome	The lapos syndrome; fat embolism.
7	clearing patterns of pulmonary infarction and slowly resolving pneumonia	Clearance patterns of lung infarction and slow-resolution pneumonia.
7	methacholine a 7 day inhalation toxicity study with primates	Methacholine, inhalation toxicity study of apos; 7 days duration in primates.
7	effects of intratracheal instillation of dactinomycin on pulmonary edema and phosphatase activity of the lung lavage fluid in rats	Effects of apos; intratracheal instillation of dactinomycin on the apos; pulmonary edema and l' rat lung lavage phosphatase activity.
7	conditioned medium from plateau phase cells effect on growth of proliferative cells and on repair of potentially lethal radiation damage	Conditioning from plateau phase cells has an effect on proliferative cell growth and repair of potentially lethal radiation damage.
7	idiopathic progressive pulmonary fibrosis	It's called progressive, idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis.
7	absorption of phenol red from the human lung	L-apos; absorption of phenol red from human lungs.
7	growth and development of human fetal trachea and lung in immune deprived mice	Growth and development of the fetal trachea and lung in immunocompromised mice.
7	patho histological findings on pulmonary biopsy in patients after mitral commissurotomy and morphometric studies of the upper and lower pulmonary lobes author s transl	Pathological histological studies of lung biopsy in patients after mitral commissurotomy and upper and lower pulmonary lobe morphometric studies.
7	increase of dermatan sulfate in a case of pulmonary fibrosis	Dermatane sulfate increase in a case of pulmonary fibrosis.
7	zwoegerziekte virus the causative agent for progressive interstitial pneumonia maedi and meningo leucoencephalitis visna in sheep	The zwoegerziekte virus is the causative agent of both progressive interstitial pneumonia and meningo leukoencephalitis in sheep.
7	evolution of spirographic patterns in pulmonary bilaterally denervated dogs	Evolution of spirographic patterns in pulmonary dogs, bilaterally and bilaterally denervated.
7	the effect of n nitrosomethylurea on organ cultures of human embryonal lung tissue	Lapos; effect of nitrosomethylurea on human embryonic lung tissue organ cultures.
7	the effect of n nitrosomethylurea on organ cultures of human embryonal lung tissue	Lapos; effect of nitrosomethylurea on human embryonic lung tissue organ cultures.
7	the metabolism of 3 h cortisone and 3 h cortisol by the isolated perfused rat and guinea pig lungs	The metabolism of 3-h cortisone and 3-h cortisol by isolated, perfused rat and guinea pig lungs.
7	cellular proliferation induced in the lung by cadmium aerosol	Cellular proliferation induced by cadmium aerosols in the lungs.
7	asbestos exposure and multiple primary tumors	Exposure to asbestos and multiple primary tumours.
7	alpha antitrypsin pi types in postmortem blood	Alfa antitrypsin pi types in the blood post-mortem.
7	hyperlucent lung after radiation therapy	Lungs are hyper-lucid after radiation.
7	iniencephalus apertus report of a case author s transl	Iniencephalus apertus report d' caseworker s translations.
7	biosynthesis of collagen and mode of action of d penicillamine author s transl	Collagen biosynthesis and mode of action; action of penicillamine s transl.
7	spontaneous perforation of the proximal colon following lung surgery	Spontaneous perforation of the proximal colon following surgery of the lungs.
7	pulmonary tumourlets	Lung tube.
7	corticosteroids in clinical and experimental lung transplantation	Corticosteroids in both clinical and experimental lung transplantation.
7	purification and some properties of arginase from human lung	Purification and certain properties of the human lung arginase.
7	accumulation of alprenolol in some polypeptide hormone producing cells and in melanin containing tissues	L' accumulation of apos; alprenolol in some apo-producing cells; polypeptide hormones and melanin-containing tissues.
7	dual infections of mice visceral larva migrans and sublethal infection with japanese encephalitis virus	Dual infection of migrating, visceral, larval mice and sublethal infection with the Japanese encephalitis virus.
7	the pathology of naturally occurring bovine schistosomiasis in the sudan	Bovine schistosomiasis disease d' natural origin in South Sudan.
7	pulmonary complications of acute myocardial infarct therapeutic orientation	Pulmonary complications of the spinal cord; acute therapeutic orientation of the spinal cord; myocardial infarction.
7	naturally occurring tyzzer s disease bacillus piliformis infection in horse foals	Natural infection with Tyzzer's disease bacillus in horse foals.
7	a case of polytetrafluoroethylene poisoning in cockatiels accompanied by polymer fume fever in the owner	One case of polytetrafluoroethylene poisoning in cockatiels with polymer fume fever in the homeowner.
7	an evaluation of the inhalation toxicity of one commercial proteolytic enzyme preparation	Inhalation toxicity evaluation of apos; a commercial proteolytic preparation of enzymes.
7	histamine induction and release following proteolytic enzyme exposure	Induction and release of apos; histamine following apos; exposure to proteolytic enzymes.
7	hematologic responses to prolonged extracorporeal circulation ecc with microporous membrane devices	Hematological reactions to prolonged extracorporeal circulation with devices with microporous membranes.
7	antihistaminic action of trans delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol	Antihistamine action in trans delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol.
7	cardiophrenic adenopathy in hodgkin disease	Cardiophrenic lymphadenopathy in Hodgkin's disease.
7	pneumatoceles following hydrocarbon ingestion report of three cases and review of the literature	The Pneumatocles that followed, ingestion of hydrocarbons, were the subject of an investigation; a report of three cases and a review of the literature.
7	effect of the exposure to cold on the extrathyroidal conversion of l thyroxine to triiodo l thyronine and on intramitochondrial alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity in thyroidectomized rats on l thyroxine	Effect of apos; exposure to cold on the extrathyroid conversion of thyroxine to triiodo lronine and on l' activity of intramitochondrial alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in thyroidectomized rats.
7	characteristics of proliferative cells from young old and transformed wi 38 cultures	Growing cell characteristics of young old and transformed cultures wi 38 cultures.
7	alterations in chromatin functions during aging in vitro	Modifications of chromatin functions during in vitro aging.
7	relationship between cell kinetic changes and metabolic events during cell senescence in vitro	The relationship between cellular kinetic changes and metabolic events during cell senescence in vitro.
7	time lapse cinemicrophotographic studies of cell division patterns of human diploid fibroblasts wi 38 during their in vitro lifespan	Chronological cinemicrophotographic studies of the cell division patterns of human diploid fibroblasts during their lifetime in vitro.
7	the amniotic fluid foam test l s ratio and total phospholipids in the evaluation of fetal lung maturity	The foam amniotic fluid tests the ratio and total phospholipids in the fetal lung; assessment of lung maturity.
7	inhalatory infection of mice with influenza a0 pr8 virus i the site of primary virus replication and its spread in the respiratory tract	Influenza Influenza Influenza A8 Influenza Influenza Mouse Infection at the site of primary replication of the virus and airway spread.
7	effect of 60amino 6 deoxy d glucose hydrochloride on influenza infection in mice	The effect of glucose hydrochloride 60amino 6 deoxy d on apos; Influenza infection in mice.
7	interferon production by rabies strains isolated from wild rodents	Production of rabies; interferon by rabies strains isolated from wild rodents.
7	depression of pulmonary 5 hydroxytryptamine uptake by metabolic inhibitors	Reduction of apos; absorption of apos; hydroxytryptamine 5 by metabolic inhibitors.
7	bacteremia and postmortem microbiology in burned children	Bacteremia and postmortem microbiology in burn children.
7	pulmonary infection due to disruption of the pharyngeal bacterial flora by antibiotics in hamsters	Pulmonary infection due to the disruption of pharyngeal bacterial flora by antibiotics in hamsters.
7	risk of respiratory distress syndrome as determined by amniotic fluid lecithin concentration	Risk of respiratory distress syndrome as determined by the concentration of lecithin in the amniotic fluid.
7	amniotic fluid phospholipids and fetal lung maturity i assessment of various methods of determining lecithin and sphingomyelin	Evaluation of Amniotic fluid phospholipids and fetal lung maturity i of various lecithin and sphingomyelin determination procedures.
7	pulmonary embolism associated with surgically proved deep venous thrombosis	Pulmonary embolism associated with surgically proven, deep vein thrombosis.
7	experimental investigations on the effectiveness of fenbendazole in parasitic helminths of the stomach intestines and lung of cattle author s transl	Experimental studies on the efficacy of fenbendazole in helminths of bovine stomach and lung guts have been carried out.
7	a comparison of two heated water bath humidifiers	Comparison of two hot water bath humidifiers.
7	evaluation of infant ventilators	Valuation of ventilators; child ventilator; child of the child; team of volunteers; evaluation.
7	isolation of two turkey influenza a viruses in minnesota	Isolation of two turkey flu viruses in Minnesota.
7	acute copper toxicosis in the canada goose	Acute copper poisoning in Canadian geese.
7	candida tropicalis infecting the respiratory tract of turkeys in israel	Canda tropicalis is a disease that infects the respiratory tract of turkeys in the intestines.
7	the effects of cosmic particle radiation on pocket mice aboard apollo xvii v preflight studies on tolerance of pocket mice to oxygen and heat part ii effects on lungs	The effects of cosmic radiation on the hand-held mice on board of apos; apollo xvii v pré@-@ light studies on the tolerance of hand-held mice to apos; oxygen and heat part ii effects on the lungs.
7	the effects of cosmic particle radiation on pocket mice aboard apollo xvii appendix iii evaluation of viscera and other tissues	Effects of cosmic radiation on hand-held mice on board the apos; Appendix iii of the apos; apollo xvii, evaluation of the viscera and apos; other tissues.
7	influence of hypothalamic hyperphagia on tolerance of lung to explosive decompression	Influence of the apos; hypothalamic hyperphagia on lung tolerance to explosive decompression.
7	giant cell carcinoma of lung a cytologic evaluation	Giant cell lung carcinoma, cytological evaluation.
7	quantitation in morphology possibilities and limits	Quantification in the morphological possibilities and limits in the possibilities and limits.
7	ultrastructural studies on cells of hamster lung cultures after chronic exposure to whole smoke or the gas vapour phase of cigarettes	Ultrastructural studies of hamster lung culture cells following chronic exposure to whole smoke or gaseous phase of cigarettes.
7	postmortem fixation of human lungs for electron microscopy	Post-fixation @-@mortem in human lungs for electron microscopy.
7	lung growth after unilateral pneumonectomy quantitation of collagen synthesis and content	Pulmonary growth following unilateral pneumonectomy quantification of collagen synthesis and content.
7	isolation and chemical characterization of collagen in bovine pulmonary tissues	Isolation and chemical characterization of collagen in bovine lung tissue.
7	acid base disorders application of total body carbon dioxide titration in anesthesia	Application of basic acidic-titration disorders of total body carbon dioxide in the anesthesia.
7	isolation and characterization of acidic structural glycoproteins in pulmonary tissues	Isolation and characterization of acidic lung structural glycoproteins.
7	subcellular localization of pulmonary antiotensin converting enzyme kininase ii	Subcellular localization of the apos; conversion enzyme of the apos; pulmonary antiotensin kininase ii.
7	advances in the treatment of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis	Progress in treatment of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis.
7	methyl iodide intoxication a case report	Report of cases; poisoning; methyl iodide.
7	tracheal mucous transport in beagles after long term exposure to 1 ppm sulfur dioxide	Long-term exposure to 1 ppm sulfur dioxide following tracheal mucous transport in beagles.
7	long term exposure to sulfur dioxide sulfuric acid mist fly ash and their mixtures results of studies in monkeys and guinea pigs	Long-term exposure to sulfur dioxide, fog, sulphuric acid, fly ash and their mixtures results from studies in monkeys and guinea pigs.
7	primary amyloidosis of the respiratory tract	Primary amyloidosis of the respiratory tract?
7	pulmonary responses of unilateral positive end expiratory pressure peep on experimental fat embolism	The pulmonary responses to the positive unilateral expiratory pressure at the end of the experiment were observed during an experimental course of adipose embolism.
7	epidemiological implications of environmental cadmium i the probable utility of human hair for occupational trace metal cadmium screening	Epidemiological implications of cadmium exposure in the environment; likely utility of human hair for the detection of cadmium in trace metals in the workplace.
7	orbital and conjunctival involvement in multiple myeloma report of a case	Orbital and conjunctival involvement in the reporting of multiple myeloma.
7	cytomegalovirus studies of autopsy tissue i virus isolation	Cytomegalovirus studies in laboratory tissues; autopsy and virus isolation.
7	cytomegalovirus studies of autopsy tissue ii incidence of inclusion bodies and related pathologic data	Studies of cytomegaloviruses in autopsied tissues ii Incidence of included bodies and related pathological data.
7	unusual ultrastructural features of a leiomyosarcoma of the lung	Unusual ultrastructural characteristics of leiomyosarcoma in the lungs.
7	unusual ultrastructural features of leiomyosarcoma of the lung	Unusual ultrastructural characteristics of lung leiomyosarcomas.
7	herpetic tracheobronchitis cytologic and virologic detection	Cytological and virologic detection of herpes tracheobronchitis.
7	changes in functional residual capacity of the lung after operation	Changes in lung functional residual capacity after surgery.
7	inhibition of cardiolipin synthesis following infection with herpes simplex virus	Inhibition of cardiolipin synthesis following apovirus infection; herpes simplex.
7	eosinophilic gastroenteritis with malabsorption extensive villous atrophy recurrent hemorrhage and chronic pulmonary fibrosis	Gastro-eosinophilic enteritis with widespread malabsorption villositary atrophy recurrent hemorrhage and chronic fibrosis of the lungs.
7	radiologic evaluation of the premature newborn rabbit after pharyngeal deposition of surfactant	Radiological evaluation of premature rabbit again-born after pharyngeal deposition of d' surfactant.
7	oncocytes a system of serotoninocytes	Oncocytes, it's called a serotonin cell system.
7	pathological anatomy of pneumonia in mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children	Pathological anatomy of pneumonia in adults; pneumonia in children.
7	collagen metabolism in rat lungs during chronic intermittent exposure to oxygen	Collagen metabolism in lungs of rats during apo; chronic intermittent exposure to apo; oxygen.
7	transversal and longitudinal lecithin sphingomyelin ratios in amniotic and lung fluids of fetal lambs	Longitudinal and transverse ratio of lecithin sphingomyelins in amniotic and pulmonary fluids of fetal lambs.
7	extraction and preliminary characterization of a human bronchogenic carcinoma antigen	Extraction and preliminary characterization of an antigen from human bronchogenic carcinoma.
7	study of the antigenic cross reactivity between carcinoembryonic antigen and nonspecific cross reacting antigens nca and nca 2	Study of the antigenic cross-reactivity between the carcinoembryonic antigen and the nonspecific crossed antigens nca and nca 2.
7	enzymatic formation of inosine 3 5 monophosphate and of 2 deoxyguanosine 3 5 monophosphate inosinate and deoxyguanylate cyclase activity	Enzymatic formation of etapos; inosine 3,5 monophosphate and deoxyguanosine 2, 3,5 monophosphate inosinate and deoxyguanylate cyclase.
7	lipoprotein lipase in rat lung the effect of fasting	Lipoprotein lipase in the rat lung, the effect of fasting.
7	pulmonary lymphangiomyomatosis a review	Pulmonary lymphangiomyomatosis.
7	differential in vivo pulmonary degradation of prostaglandins e1 b1 and a1	Differential in vivo pulmonary degradation of prostaglandins e1 b1 and a1.
7	enzymic n acetylation of 2 4 toluenediamine by liver cytosols from various species	Enzyme acetylation of 24 toluenediamine by hepatic cytosols of various species.
7	roentgenographic findings in fucosidosis type 2	Rotentgenography results in Type 2 fucoside.
7	the circle system without absorber use with controlled ventilation	The circular system without use of d' absorbor with controlled ventilation.
7	new advances in pulmonary gas exchange	New developments in lung gas exchange and lung gas exchange.
7	inhibition of benzo alpha pyrene metabolism catalyzed by mouse and hamster lung microsomes	Inhibition of pyrene benzo alpha metabolism catalyzed by mouse and hamster lung microsomes.
7	characterization of a rat lung microsomal fraction obtained by sepharose 2b ultrafiltration	Characterization of rat lung microsomal fraction obtained by serpharose ultrafiltration 2b.
7	excretion of carbon 14 labeled aflatoxin b1 via bile urine and intestinal contents of the chicken	L' 14C-labelled aflatoxin b1 via l' biliary urine and intestinal contents of chicken.
7	coincidence of sarcoidosis and hashimoto s thyroiditis	Coincidence of drug overdose and overdose; hashimoto thyroiditis.
7	occult pulmonary hemorrhage in anticoagulated patients	Occult lung hemorrhage in anticoagulated patients.
7	adult respiratory distress syndrome in postoperative patients study of pulmonary pathology in shock lung with prophylactic and therapeutic implications	Lapse respiratory distress syndrome; adult in postoperative patients, study of lung pathology in shock lungs with prophylactic and therapeutic implications.
7	respiratory tract disease from thermosetting resins study of an outbreak in rubber tire workers	Respiratory Disease Caused by Thermosetting Resins Study of an outbreak in rubber tire workers.
7	do the severity and duration of rheumatoid arthritis influence pulmonary ventilation	Do the severity and duration of rheumatoid arthritis affect respiratory ventilation?
7	fatal self administration of sodium azide	Fatal administration of d' sodium azide.
7	maternal and transplacental kinetics of trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole separately and in combination	Maternal and transplacental kinetics of trimethoprim and of sulfamethoxazole separately and in combination.
7	monolayer cultures of human prostatic cells	Monolayer cultures of human prostate cells.
7	localization of polycyclic hydrocarbon carcinogens in the lung following intratracheal instillation in gelatin solution	The localization of carcinogenic polycyclic hydrocarbons in the lungs after the implantation; intratracheal instillation in a gelatin solution.
7	species differences in the effect of benzo alpha pyrene ferric oxide on the respiratory tract of rats and hamsters	Species differences in apo; effect of benzo alpha pyrene ferric oxide on respiratory tract of rats and hamsters.
7	occurrence of hemangiosarcomas in beagles with internally deposited radionuclides	Presence of apos; hemangiosarcomas in beagles with internal deposits of radionuclides.
7	damage and repair of dna in various tissues of the rat induced 4 nitroquinoline 1 oxide	Alteration and repair of apos; DNA in various tissues of the rat induced nitroquinoline oxides 1.
7	d valine as a selective agent for normal human and rodent epithelial cells in culture	Valine as a selective agent for normal epithelial cells in humans and rodents in culture.
7	drying and irradiation of calf and horse serum i influence on the growth of cell cultures and mycoplasmas	Drying and irradiation of calf and horse serum influence the growth of both cell cultures and mycoplasmas.
7	effect of increased vascular pressure on lung fluid balance in unanesthetized sheep	Effect of increased vascular pressure on unanaesthetized sheep; lung fluid balance.
7	effect of exercise on dilution estimates of extravascular lung water and on the carbon monoxide diffusing capacity in normal adults	Effect of pH; exercise on estimates of dilution of extravascular lung water and carbon monoxide diffusion capacity in normal adults.
7	the echocardiographic assessment of pulmonary artery pressure and pulmonary vascular resistance	L' echocardiographic evaluation of pulmonary arterial pressure and pulmonary vascular resistance.
7	desquamative fibrosing alveolitis unresponsive to steroid or cytotoxic therapy	Fibrosing desquamative alveolite insensitive to steroidal or cytotoxic therapy.
7	mechanism of the serotonin effect on lung transvascular fluid and protein movement in awake sheep	Mechanisms of apos; effect of serotonin on the movement of lung proteins and transvascular fluid in awake sheep.
7	effect of thyroid hormones on activity of nonspecific phosphohydrolases in blood serum tissues and liver mitochondrial fraction of white rat	Effect of thyroid hormones on apos; nonspecific phosphohydrolase activity in blood serum tissue and hepatic mitochondrial fraction of white rat.
7	pulmonary fungal infection complicating treated malignant disease	Pulmonary fungal infection that complicates the treatment of malignant disease.
7	a study of various changes in transfer ribonucleic acid methylase activity during adenovirus 12 transformation in vitro	A study of various changes in apos; apos activity; transfer ribonucleic acid methylase during transformation of apos; adenovirus 12 in vitro.
7	cryptogenic fibrosing alveolitis	Cryptogenic fibrosing alveolite.
7	pulmonary granulomas in a patient with pulmonary veno occlusive disease	Pulmonary granulomas in a patient with pulmonary venocclusive disease.
7	cardiopulmonary changes following 24 36 hours of hyperoxia	Cardio-respiratory changes after 24:36 hours of onset; hyperoxia.
7	development of a live attenuated varicella vaccine	Development of a live, attenuated varicella vaccine.
7	application of a live attenuated varicella vaccine to hospitalized children and its protective effect on spread of varicella infection	Application of live attenuated varicella vaccine to hospitalized children and its protective effect on the spread of the disease; varicella infection.
7	purification and separation of enveloped and unenveloped herpes simplex virus particles	Purification and separation of enveloped and unwrapped particles of apovirus; herpes simplex.
7	regional pulmonary function before and after pneumonectomy using 133xenon	Regional lung functions before and after 133xenon pneumonectomy.
7	volume controlled lung lavage in a woman with cystic fibrosis	Volume-controlled pulmonary lavage treatment in a woman with cystic fibrosis.
7	doxycycline concentrations in lung tissue bronchial wall and bronchial secretions	Doxycycline concentrations in lung wall and bronchial secretions.
7	visualization of doxycycline in lung tissue and sinus secretions by fluorescent techniques	Visualization of doxycycline in lung tissue and sinus secretions by means of fluorescent techniques.
7	the occurrence of mercury in amphibia	The occurrence of mercury poisoning in amphibians.
7	hydatid disease transmission in california a study of the basque connection	Hydatidine disease transmission in California, Basque connection study.
7	fatal disseminated adenovirus infection in a renal transplant recipient	Fatal adenovirus infection disseminated in a renal transplant recipient.
7	the influence of environmental agents on prostaglandin biosynthesis and metabolism in the lung inhibition of lung 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase by exposure of guinea pigs to 100 per cent oxygen at atmospheric pressure	Environmental influences on prostaglandin biosynthesis and metabolism in humans; pulmonary inhibition of 15 lung hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase by apo; exposure of guinea pigs to 100% d; oxygen at atmospheric pressure.
7	respiratory function in pregnant obese women	Respiratory function in pregnant, obese women.
7	the influence of pulmonary growth and development on paediatric respiratory diseases	L' influence of lung growth and development on respiratory diseases in children.
7	factors affecting the concentration of combustible gases in the colon during colonoscopy	Factors affecting the concentration of combustible gases in the colon during the course of colonoscopy.
7	effect of the protease inhibitor aprotinin on pulmonary function and on the inhibitory activity of sputum in patients with chronic obstructive bronchitis	The effect of apos; protinin, a protease inhibitor, on lung function and lung function; inhibitory activity of apos; sputum in patients with chronic obstructive bronchitis.
7	ventilation and blood gas studies during experimentally produced mendelson s syndrome in the dog	Ventilation and blood gas studies during these experiments have produced the dog's mendelson syndrome.
7	change in end tidal position in children after suxamethonium	Changes in the position of the terminal tide in children after the onset of sux-methonium.
7	thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog i demonstration of microthrombi in lung	Thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog i microthrombi demonstration in the lung.
7	thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog ii cardiorespiratory changes during spontaneous and controlled ventilation	Thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in dogs and dogs ii cardiorespiratory changes during spontaneous and controlled ventilation.
7	growth and development of the fetal rhesus monkey vi morphometric analysis of the developing lung	Growth and development of lapos; fetal viometric morphometric analysis of developing lung rhesus monkey.
7	characteristics of bovine lung as observed by scanning electron microscopy	Characteristics of bovine lung observed by scanning electron microscopy.
7	determination of fluorocarbon 11 and fluorocarbon 12 in post mortem tissues a case report	Determination of the fluorocarbon 11 and fluorocarbon 12 in postmortem tissues.
7	studies on the immune response and pathogenesis of sendai virus infection of mice iii the effects of cyclophosphamide	Studies on the immune response and pathogenesis of the virus transmitted by cyclophosphamide in mice.
7	ultrasonic pulmonary densitometry preliminary studies	Ultrasonic lung densitometry baseline studies.
7	changes in template activity and structure of nuclei from wi 38 cells in the prereplicative phase	Changes in apos; matrix and nuclear structure activity of wi 38 cells during pre-replication.
7	xero radiography of the thorax author s transl	X X X-rays of apos; thorax author s translations.
7	radiological features of the rectal manifestations of myelofibrosis author s transl	Radiological characteristics of rectal manifestations of myelofibrosis translation of l&apos.
7	diagnosis of neisseria infections by defined immunofluorescence methodologic aspects and applications	Diagnosis of neisseria infections by immunofluorescent aspects and defined methodological applications.
7	direct association of messenger rna with microsomal membranes in human diploid fibroblasts	L' direct association of the rna messenger with microsomal membranes in human diploid fibroblasts.
7	idiopathic scoliosis mechanical properties of the respiratory system and the ventilatory response to carbon dioxide	Idiopathic scoliosis mechanical properties of the respiratory system and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide.
7	effects of a molecular change in collagen on lung structure and mechanical function	Effects of collagen on lung structure and mechanical function.
7	experimental pulmonary fibrosis induced by soluble immune complex and 60 oxygen atmosphere	An experimental pulmonary fibrosis induced by a soluble immune complex and an atmosphere of 60 oxygen.
7	behaviour of local and systemic immunoglobulins in patients with lung cancer	Local and systemic immune globulin behaviour in patients with lung cancer.
7	bovine parainfluenza type 3 virus infection ultrastructural aspects of viral pathogenesis in the bovine respiratory tract	Ultrastructural aspects of viral pathogenesis in bovine respiratory tract infection with type 3 bovine parainfluenza virus.
7	pulmonary perfusion ventilation and gas exchange during modified cobalt 60 teletherapy of operated on breast carcinomas	Ventilation by pulmonary infusion and lapos; gas exchange during modified cobalt 60 teletherapy of lapos; operation on breast carcinomas.
7	nicotine inhibition of the metabolism of 3 4 benzopyrene a carcinogen in tobacco smoke	L' inhibition by nicotine of the metabolism of 34 benzopyrene, a carcinogen in tobacco smoke.
7	survival of synchronized chinese hamster cells exposed to radiation of different linear energy transfer	Survival of synchronized Chinese hamster cells exposed to radiation from various linear transfers of radiation.
7	differential diagnosis of a round infiltrative tubercular focus and pulmonary tuberculoma	Differential diagnosis of a round, infiltrating tubercular core and pulmonary tuberculoma.
7	dyspnea in the patient with cardiopulmonary disease	Dyspnea in patients with cardiopulmonary disease.
7	streptomycin and kanamycin level in the blood and lungs of guinea pigs when the antibiotics are administered by inhalation and intramuscularly	Streptomycin and kanamycin levels in the blood and lungs of guinea pigs when inhaled and intramuscularly administered antibiotics.
7	treatment of influenza infection of mice by using rimantadine hydrochlorides by the aerosol and intraperitoneal routes	Treatment of apos; mouse influenza infection with aerosol and intraperitoneal rimantadine hydrochloride.
7	indications for mediatinoscopy author s transl	Indications for translation by authors of mediatinoscopy.
7	effect of metopirone on the synthesis of lung surfactant in does and fetal rabbits	The effect of metopirone on surfactant synthesis in rabbits and fetal rabbits.
7	effects of chronic oral contraceptive treatment on the conversion of angiotensin i to angiotensin ii in the rat	Effects of chronic oral contraceptive therapy on conversion of angiotensin i to angiotensin ii in rats.
7	age smoking inhalation and pulmonary function	Smoking cessation; tobacco inhalation and lung function in older smokers.
7	effect of maternal malnutrition on surface activity of fetal lungs in rats	Effect of maternal malnutrition on apos; fetal lung surface activity in rats.
7	modification of respiratory center output in the unanesthetized fetal sheep in utero	Change in respiratory center flow rate in unanaesthetized fetal sheep in utero.
7	residual levels and biochemical changes after ventilation with perfluorinated liquid	Residual levels and biochemical changes after ventilation with the aid of a perfluorous liquid.
7	effect of continuous postive pressure ventilation cppv on edema formation in dog lung	Effect of continuous postive pressure ventilation on the formation of oedema in dog lungs.
7	experimentally reversed pulmonary blood flow implications for the surgical management of complex forms of congenital heart disease	Effects of Lapse; experimental reversal of pulmonary blood flow on surgical treatment of complex forms of congenital heart disease.
7	obstructive pulmonary emphysema evolution of various parameters of pulmonary function and its correlation	Evolution of lung function; obstructive pulmonary emphysema of various parameters of lung function and its correlation.
7	antitussive drugs i cardiopulmonary effects of codeine	Antitussive drugs i cardiopulmonary effects of codeine.
7	antitussive drugs ii bronchopulmonary effects of dextromethorphan and doxylamine	Antitussive drugs ii bronchopulmonary effects ofxtromethorphan, and doxylamine.
7	biotransformation and biliary excretion of imipramine in rats under various experimental conditions	Biotransformation and biliary excretion of imipramine in rats under a variety of conditions.
7	pulmonary alveolar proteinosis and histoplasmosis report of three cases	There have been three cases of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis and histoplasmosis.
7	pulmonary angiotensin converting enzyme structural and catalytic properties	Lapses; pulmonary angiotensin converts the structural and catalytic properties of the enzyme.
7	glucocorticoid receptors in lung comparison between nonactivated and activated forms of the cytoplasmic glucocorticoid binding protein and their relationship to the nuclear binding protein of fetal rabbit lung	Glucocorticoid receptors in the lung comparison between activated and nonactivated forms of cytoplasmic glucocorticoid binding protein and their relationship to the fetal rabbit lung nuclear binding protein.
7	compatible bone marrow transplantation and immunologic reconstitution of combined immunodeficiency disease	Transplantation of compatible bone marrow and immunological reconstitution of apos; combined immunodeficiency.
7	bronchiolar emphysema in a child at the age of 1 1 2 months	Bronchiolar emphysema in 1 year olds and 2 months olds.
7	diabetic feto and embryopathies	Diabetic feto and embryopathies.
7	method for the functional evaluation of contrasted vessels of the lungs with the aid of stereoroentgenogrammetry and morphometry	Dapos method; functional evaluation of opposing vessels from lungs to apos; help with stereoentgenogrammetry and morphometry.
7	clinicopathologic characterization of herpesvirus saimiri malignant lymphoma in new zealand white rabbits	"""Clinical characterization of herpesviruses saimiri malignant lymphoma in new zealand white rabbits"", Journal of Infectious Diseases, Vol."
7	iodination of herpesvirus nucleic acids	Iodization of nucleic acids in herpesviruses.
7	enhanced inactivation of prostaglandin e2 by the rabbit lung during pregnancy or progesterone treatment	Increased prostaglandin e2 inactivation by rabbit lung during pregnancy or progesterone treatment.
7	the effect of intrauterine phrenic nerve division on the development of the lungs and diaphragm in fetal rabbits	Effect of intra-@uterine phrenic nerve division on lung and diaphragm development in fetal rabbit.
7	congenital respiratory tract defects in lambs	Birth defects of the respiratory tract in lambs.
7	cure regression and cell survival a comparison of common radiobiological endpoints using an in vitro tumour model	Comparison of common radiobiological parameters with in vitro tumour model.
7	gas chromatographic evaluation of the volatile constituents of lung brain and liver tissues	Gas chromatographic evaluation of volatile components of the pulmonary brain and liver tissue.
7	radiographic manifestations of malignant mixed uterine tumors	X-ray evidence of mixed uterine malignant tumours.
7	correction by hyaluronidase of the interstitial tissue transport defect during shock a new approach to therapy	The correction by l'apos; hyaluronidase of l'apos; anomaly of interstitial transport during shock constitutes a new therapeutic approach.
7	quantitative studies on cell mediated immunity in the pleural cavity of guinea pigs	Quantitative studies of cell-mediated immunity in the pleural cavity of guinea pigs.
7	physiological pathological correlations in coal workers pneumoconiosis	Physiological correlations in pneumoconiosis workers.
7	toxicity of platinum iv salts for cells of pulmonary origin	Toxicity of platinum salts iv to rat liver cells; pulmonary origin.
7	the relative roles of platelets and macrophages in clearing particles from the blood the value of carbon clearance as a measure of reticuloendothelial phagocytosis	The relative roles of platelets and macrophages in blood particle removal the value of carbon clearance as a measure of reticuloendothelial phagocytosis.
7	a role for the eosinophil in acquired resistance to schistosoma mansoni infection as determined by antieosinophil serum	A role of the eosinophilic organism in acquired resistance to schistosoma mansoni infection as determined by antiteosinophil serum.
7	congenital lung malformations a unified concept and a case report	Congenital Lung Defects A unified concept and case report.
7	host parasite relationships in experimental airborne tuberculosis v lack of hematogenous dissemination of mycobacterium tuberculosis to the lungs in animals vaccinated with bacille calmette gu rin	Parasitic relationships between host and experimental airborne tuberculosis (AVT) v lack of blood-borne spread of TB in the lungs in animals vaccinated with guin calf bacillus.
7	a comparison of chlormethiazole and diazepam as intravenous sedatives for fibre endoscopic examination of the upper gastrointestinal tract	Comparison of chlomethiazole and diazepam as intravenous sedatives for l' endoscopic examination of gastro tract fibers-upper intestinal.
7	morphine administration to pregnant rabbits effect on fetal growth and lung development	Administration of morphine to pregnant rabbits has an effect on fetal growth and lung development.
7	interpreting chest radiographs without visual search	Interpreting a chest x-ray without a visual search.
7	proceedings changes in the disease pattern of pulmonary tuberculosis	Changes in the profile of pulmonary tuberculosis disease.
7	absorption distribution and excretion of trifluoperazine in rats	Distribution of trifluoperazine absorption and excretion in the rat.
7	the rabbit fetal lung as a glucocorticoid target tissue	Rabbit fetal lung tissue as a glucocorticoid target tissue.
7	mechanisms of bronchial hyperreactivity in normal subjects after upper respiratory tract infection	Mechanisms of death; bronchial hyperresponsiveness in normal subjects following upper respiratory tract infection.
7	lung damage caused by phospholipase c and the changes in phospholipids in the rat lung	Pulmonary injury caused by phospholipase c and changes in rat lung gland phospholipids.
7	effect of injection of a phosphorylcholine containing compound from nippostrongylus brasiliensis on the infestation of the rat by this parasite	Effect of apos; injection of apos; a compound containing phosphorylcholine from nippostrongylus brasiliensis on apos; infestation of rat by this parasite.
7	pulmonary edemas anatomic study	Anatomical study of pulmonary edema.
7	particulate environmental matter as seen in lung sections	Particulate matter in the environment, as seen in the pulmonary sections.
7	gestational changes in pulmonary vascular responses in fetal lambs in utero	Gestational changes in pulmonary vascular responses in the fetal lambs in utero.
7	a study of the inhalation of pentachlorophenol by rats part i a method for the determination of pentachlorophenol in rat plasma urine and tissue and in aerosol samples	Study of apo; inhalation of pentachlorophenol by rats, part i dos; a method for determination of pentachlorophenol in urine and plasma tissues of rats and in aerosol samples.
7	early diagnosis of cardiac insufficiency with the spiroergometric method	Early diagnosis of the apos; heart failure by spiroergometric method.
7	clinico pharmacological examination of gentamycin in thoracic surgery	Clinical pharmacological examination of gentamicin in the thoracic.
7	calcium independent modulation of cyclic gmp and activation of guanylate cyclase by nitrosamines	Calcium-independent modulation of cyclic gmp and activation of guanylate cyclase by nitrosamines.
7	an investigation of the chest radiographs in a controlled trial of busulphan cyclophosphamide and a placebo after resection for carcinoma of the lung	A study of chest radiographs in a controlled busulphan cyclophosphamide trial and a resection placebo for lung carcinoma.
7	pulmonary pathology in acute respiratory insufficiency lung biopsy as a diagnostic tool	Acute respiratory failure pulmonary pathology in the lung biopsy as a diagnostic tool.
7	pulmonary vasomotor nerve responses in isolated perfused lungs of macaca mulatta and papio species	The pulmonary vasomotor nerve responses in perfused lungs isolated from macaca mulata and papio species.
7	freeze etch study of collagen i native collagen from tendon and lung of rats	Cryogenic study of the native collagen of the tendon and lungs of rats.
7	effect of angiotensin on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in isolated dog lung	The effect of angiotensin on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in the isolated lung of dogs.
7	uremic lung lesions as a form of chronic edema	Acute pulmonary uremic lesions are a form of chronic edema.
7	pulmonary damage following pulmonary microembolism in the dog effect of various types of treatment	Lung injury due to a pulmonary microembolism in the lung; canine effect of various types of treatment.
7	thoracoabdominal aortic aneurysm presenting as a solitary pulmonary nodule	Aneurysm of the intestine; aneurysm of the thoracic aorta-abdominal, in the form of apos; a solitary pulmonary nodule.
7	morphological effects in rats following a 22 day space flight	Morphological effects in rats after 22 days of space flight.
7	in vitro antagonism of the mediators of allergy by a benzopyrano benzopyran carboxylic acid pr d 92 ea	In vitro antagonism of d&apos mediators; an allergy to benzopyrano benzopyranic acid carboxylic acid s92ea d.
7	an ultrastructural study of the pathogenesis of tissue injury in limited wegener s granulomatosis	An ultrastructural study of the pathogenesis of tissue lesions in Wegener's granulomatosis (Wegener's granulomatosis) limited.
7	gm2 ganglioside in fetal tay sachs disease brain cultures a model system for the disease	Gm2 ganglioside in Tay Sachs disease fetal brain cultures d' a model system for disease.
7	the hydrolysis of biologically active peptides by bovine lung tissue factor thromboplastin	L' hydrolysis of biologically active peptides by thromboplastin, a pulmonary tissue factor, is a method used.
7	fluid flow in the human foetal lung a theoretical model	Fluid flux in the human fetal lung-- a theoretical model.
7	immunology of the lung	Lapses; lung immunology.
7	chronic eosinophilic pneumonia ultrastructural evidence of marked immunoglobulin production plus macrophagic ingestion of eosinophils and eosinophilic lysosomes leading to intracytoplasmic charcot leyden crystals	Chronic eosinophilic pneumonia, ultrastructural evidence of apos; a marked apos production; immunoglobulin and eosinophilic macrophage ingestion; eosinophils and eosinophilic lysosomes leading to intracytoplasmic charcoal leyde crystal formation.
7	action of isoprenaline on the mechanical properties of lungs and airways in healthy people and patients with obstructive lung diseases	The effect of isoprenaline on the mechanical properties of the lungs and respiratory tract in healthy individuals and patients with obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) isoprenaline.
7	emphysema as possible explanation for the alteration of expiratory po2 and pco2 curves	This is a possible explanation for the alteration of both the p2 and p2 expiratory curves.
7	tuberculosis in scotland a national sample survey 1968 70 2 a two year follow up of newly diagnosed respiratory tuberculosis notified in 1968	Tuberculosis in Scotland, 1968 National Sampling Survey 70,2 after two years of follow-up of new cases of respiratory TB reported in 1968.
7	cell division and tissue repair following localized damage to the mammalian lung	Cell division and tissue repair following localized mammalian lung damage.
7	scanning electron microscopy of the lungs of vitamin e deficient rats exposed to a low concentration of ozone	Lung scanning electron microscopy of vitamin-deficient rats exposed to low concentrations of ozone.
7	further studies on the mechanism of adrenaline induced lipolysis in lipid micelles	D' other studies on the mechanism of l' adrenaline induce lipid micelle lipolysis.
7	transbronchoscopic cryosurgery of respiratory structures experimental and clinical studies	Transbronchoscopy cryosurgery of experimental and clinical respiratory structures.
7	comparative mutagenicity of n nitrosamines in a semi solid and in a liquid incubation system in the presence of rat or human tissue fractions	Comparison of the mutagenicity of n-nitrosamines in a solid-state medium and in a urine system; liquid incubation in the presence of human or rat tissue fractions.
7	evidence for regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity and cholesterol synthesis in nonhepatic tissues of rat	Evidence for the regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme reductase and the synthesis of cholesterol in non-hepatic tissues of the rat.
7	continuity of a rabbit antigen between generations	The continuity of rabbit antigen between generations.
7	lung ph and pulmonary absorption of nonvolatile drugs in the rat	Pulmonary absorption of non-volatile drugs in the rat.
7	increased elastic recoil as a determinant of pulmonary barotrauma in divers	Increase in the elastic recoil as a determinant of pulmonary barotrauma in divers.
7	the formation of histotypic structures from monodisperse fetal rat lung cells cultured on a three dimensional substrate	Formation of histotypic structures from monodisperse fetal rat lung cells grown on three-dimensional substrate.
7	experimental morphological study of the vaccination process following aerosol application of lyophilized live influenza a2 hong kong and b ussr vaccines	Experimental morphological study of the vaccination process after infection; aerosol application of live vaccines lyophilized against influenza a2 hong kong and b ussr.
7	lung inflation and alveolar permeability to non electrolytes in the adult sheep in vivo	In vivo pulmonary influx and alveolar permeability to non-electrolytes in adult sheep.
7	morphologic and biochemical study of pulmonary changes induced by bleomycin in mice	Morphological and biochemical study of bleomycin-induced pulmonary changes in the mouse.
7	studies on the migratory route of paragonimus siamensis in the bandicoot bandicota indica	Study of the migration route of paragonimus siamensis in indica bandicoot bandicota indica.
7	new neonatal problems of blood coagulation and fibrinolysis ii thromboplastic effect of amniotic fluid and its relation to lung maturity	New neonatal blood clotting and fibrinolysis problems ii Thromboplastic effect of amniotic fluid and its relation to lung maturity.
7	effect of inhaling medication vapors from a colds preparation on murine pulmonary bacterial defense systems	Effect of apo; inhalation of drug fumes from apo; a cold preparation on murine pulmonary bacterial defence systems.
7	pulmonary function in premature lambs during the first few hours of life	Pulmonary functions in premature lambs during early life.
7	role of peridural anesthesia in thoracic surgery	Role of oral anesthesia; epidural anesthesia in thoracic surgery.
7	immunisation with a polyvalent pneumococcal vaccine reduction of adult respiratory mortality in a new guinea highlands community	Immunization with vaccines; a versatile pneumococcal vaccine to reduce adult respiratory mortality in a new upland community in Guinea.
7	a study in the pharmacodynamics of oxytetracycline in the chicken	Pharmacodynamic study of apos; oxytetracycline in chicken.
7	pathomorphology of lung alterations in calves naturally infected with the virus of infectious rhinotracheitis	Pathomorphology of pulmonary alterations in calves born naturally infected with the infectious rhinotetracheitis virus.
7	sarcoidosis initially occurring as apical infiltrate and pleural reaction	Sarcoidosis begins as apical infiltration and pleural response.
7	needle aspiration biopsy a critical appraisal eight years and 3 267 specimens later	Aspiration biopsy by needle, a critical evaluation eight years later and 3,267 specimens later.
7	morphological macro micro electronoptical changes and cytoenzyme changes after ligation of the pulmonary artery pulmonary veins and both in dogs	Microelectron microscopic morphological changes and cytoenzymatic changes after pulmonary vein ligation of the pulmonary artery and both in dogs.
7	a critical assessment of the roles of circulating hydrogen ion and lactate in the production of exercise induced asthma	A critical evaluation of the roles of circulating hydrogen ion and lactate in asthma production and exercise.
7	pulmonary allescheriasis report of a case from ontario canada	Pulmonary allescheriasis reported from one case of lung cancer; Ontario Canada.
7	the effects of ephedrine on the physiological and psychological responses to submaximal and maximal exercise in man	The effects of ephedrine on physiological and psychological responses to apos; maximum and maximum exercise in men.
7	gallegostronglyus ibicensis n gen n sp nematoda metastrongylidae a lung parasite of mus musculus linnaeus 1758 rodentia muridale in ibiza balearic islands author s transl	Gallegostronglyus ibicensis ngen n sp nematoda metastrongylidae, a musculus linnaeus 1758 rodentia muridale lung parasite from the ibiza balearic islands.
7	induction of monooxygenases in rhesus monkeys by 3 methylcholanthrene metabolism and mutagenic activation of n 2 acetylaminofluorene and benzo a pyrene	Monooxygenase in rhesus monkeys by metabolism of 3 methylcholanthrenes and mutagenic activation of n 2 acetylaminofluorene and benzo a pyrene.
7	physical properties and biochemistry of lung surfactant following vagotomy	The physical and biochemical properties of the pulmonary surfactant after a vagotomy.
7	circadian rhythms in lung resistance and dynamic lung compliance of healthy children effects of two bronchodilators	Circadian lung-resistance rhythms and dynamic pulmonary compliance of healthy children with two bronchodilators.
7	systemic collateral and pulmonary artery stenosis in patients with congenital pulmonary valve atresia and ventricular septal defect	Pulmonary arterial stenosis and systemic collateralal artery stenosis in patients with congenital pulmonary valvular atresia and defective ventricular septation.
7	response of immature baboon fetal lung to intra amniotic betamethasone	Fetal lung reaction of immature baboon to intra-@-amniotic betamethasone.
7	inhibiting effect of caffeine on spontaneous and urethan induced lung tumors in strain a mice	Caffeine inhibitory effect on spontaneous and apos-induced lung tumours; urethane in the mouse a strain.
7	morphological effects of chronic tracheal ligation and drainage in the fetal lamb lung	Morphological effects of chronic pulmonary tracheal ligation and drainage in the fetal lamb.
7	biochemical composition and heterogeneity of heparan sulfates isolated from ah 130 ascites hepatoma cells and fluid	Biochemical composition and heterogeneity of sulfates from apos; heparan isolated from apos cells; ascitic hepatoma ah 130 and fluid.
7	effects of sputum on pulmonary function	Effects of sputum on lung function.
7	sphingolipid composition and catabolism in human fetal tissues	Composition and catabolism of sphingolipids in human fetal tissue.
7	inspiration chest radiography by lateral recumbency	X-ray of the chest cavity; inhalation by lateral rest.
7	severe asthma prevention is better than cure	It's better to be safe than to cure severe asthma.
7	human body buoyancy a study of 98 men	The buoyancy of the human body: study of 98 men.
7	determining fetal lung maturity a sensitive surfactant method	Determining the fetal lung maturity is a sensitive surfactant method.
7	restrictive ventilatory defect in a patient with primary pulmonary hypertension	Infectious respiratory infections in a patient with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease; primary pulmonary hypertension.
7	innervation and cytochemistry of the neuroepithelial bodies in the ciliated epithelium of the toad lung bufo marinus	The innervation and cytochemistry of neuroepithelial bodies in the ciliated lung epithelium of bufo marinus marinus toads.
7	pulmonary function in coal workers with caplan s syndrome and non rheumatoid complicated pneumosoniosis	Pulmonary functions in coal workers with Caplan and Apos syndrome; complicated, non-rheumatic pneumosoniosis.
7	farber s disease as a ceramidosis clinical radiological and biochemical aspects	Farber's disease as a type of ceramidosis clinical aspects radiological and biochemical clinical aspects.
7	remote results of surgical treatment of chronic nonspecific suppurative lung diseases under conditions of extreme north	Results remote from the surgical treatment of non-specific chronic suppurative lung diseases under extreme northern conditions.
7	isolated perfused dog lungs a comparative stereologic comparison with normal dog lungs	Stereological comparison between isolated perfused lungs of dogs and normal lungs of dogs.
7	energy status of the rat lung after exposure to elevated po2	Energy status of the rat's lung following exposure to elevated po2.
7	determination of disaturated lecithin in rhesus monkey amniotic fluid as an index of fetal lung maturity	Determination of disaturated lecithin in rhesus monkey amniotic fluid as index of fetal lung maturity.
7	vaccination against canine bordetellosis using an aluminum hydroxide adjuvant vaccine	Vaccination against canine bed-like illness using apo-based adjuvant vaccine; dapo hydroxide; aluminum.
7	occlusion pressure in acute bronchospasm induced by methylcholine	Acute bronchospasm occlusion induced by methylcholine.
7	primary lymphoma of lung	Primary lung lymphoma.
7	ventilation perfusion lung imaging in diaphragmatic paralysis	Pulmonary imaging by intravenous ventilation in diaphragmatic paralysis.
7	absorption of inhaled antigen into the circulation of isolated lungs from normal and immunized rabbits	L' absorption of inhaled antigen into the isolated lungs of normal and immunized rabbits.
7	control of the myocardial contractile state by carotid chemo and baroreceptor and pulmonary inflation reflexes in conscious dogs	Mastery of the apo; myocardial contractile state by chemo carotid, baroreceptor reflexes and pulmonary inflation in conscious dogs.
7	ultrastructural changes in the lungs after chronic experimental intoxication with benzine and ethyline vapour	Ultrastructural changes in the lungs following chronic experimental intoxication with benzine and d*apos; ethylene oxide vapour.
7	experimental scleroma a histopathological study	Experimental sclerosis, histopathological study.
7	effect of intrapulmonary hematocrit maldistribution on o2 co2 and inert gas exchange	Effect of poor distribution of intraprandial hematocrit on CO2 and inert gas exchange.
7	uptake metabolism and efflux of l alpha acetylmethadol laam by rat lung tissue	Dapos metabolism; absorption and efflux of alpha-acetylmethadol laamin by rat lung tissue.
7	pathologic changes and pathogenesis of parascaris equorum infection in parasite free pony foals	Pathological changes and pathogenesis of parascaris equorum in free pony foals.
7	dna synthesis in the human diploid cell strain wi 38 during in vitro aging an autoradiography study	Synthesis of DNA in human diploid strain wi 38 during in vitro aging, autoradiographic study.
7	a case of lung myiasis caused by larvae of megaselia spiracularis schmitz diptera phoridae	A case of pulmonary myiasis caused by megaselia spiracularis schmitz larvae will diptera phoridae.
7	effect of allogenic serum from pregnant pneumonectomized rats on embryonic lung tissue	Effect of allogeneic serum from pregnant pneumonectomized rats on embryonic lung tissue.
7	legionnaires disease clinical and pulmonary histopathologic features of a sporadic case	Clinical and pulmonary disease of the legionnaires, a sporadic case.
7	bronchofiberscopy in asthmatics a method for minimizing risk of complications	Bronchofiberscopy in asthmatics is a method of minimizing complications.
8	histochemical changes in lymphocytes during the production of antibodies in lymph nodes of rabbits	Histochemical changes in lymphocytes during apo production; antibodies in lymph nodes of rabbits.
8	the lymphocytic origin of a plasma factor responsible for hypersensitivity in vitro of tuberculin type	Lapos; lymphocytic origin; a plasma factor responsible for in vitro hypersensitivity of tuberculin type.
8	protein concentration in normal mouse lymphocytes thymocytes and mouse and human leukemic cells as measured by interference microscopy	Protein concentration in normal mouse lymphocytes, thymocytes and leukemia cells of mice and d' humans, as measured by interfering microscopy.
8	studies on tubercle bacillus histiocyte relationship v passive transfer of cellular resistance	Studies on the histiocyte tubercular bacillus v-transfer relationship of cellular resistance.
8	the in vivo reutilization of lymphocytic and sarcoma dna by cells growing in the peritoneal cavity	In vivo reuse of DNA from lymphocytes and sarcoma by cells growing in the peritoneal cavity.
8	lymphocyte glycogen content in various diseases	Dissolved lymphocyte glycogen in a variety of diseases.
8	immune response and mitosis of human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro	Immune response and mitosis of peripheral blood lymphocytes in human blood in vitro.
8	studies on the isolation of metaphase chromosomes	Studies on apos and metaphase chromosome isolation.
8	cellular specificity in the homograft reaction	Cell specificity in the cell homograft reaction.
8	reaction of lymphocytes with purified protein derivative conjugated with fluorescein	Lymphocyte reaction with purified protein derivative conjugated to fluorescein.
8	lymphocyte interaction a potential histocompatibility test in vitro	Lapos; lymphocyte interaction is a test for potential histocompatibility in vitro.
8	histocompatibility and immunologic competence in renal homotransplantation	Histocompatibility and immunologic competence in renal cell therapy; kidney homotransplantation.
8	the cellular origin of human immunoglobulins gamma 2 gamma 1m gamma 1a	L' cellular origin of human gamma 2 gamma 1m gamma 1a immunoglobulins.
8	further studies on adoptive transfer of sensitivity to skin homografts	D' other studies on the adoptive transfer of sensitivity to cutaneous homografts were conducted.
8	transformation of adult allogeneic small lymphocytes after transfusion into newborn rats	Transformation of small adult allogenic lymphocytes following transfusion in newborn rats, @-@.
8	electron microscopy of the bursa of fabricius of the embryonic chick with particular reference to the lympho epithelial nodules	Electron microscopy of the embryonic chick fabricius bursa with special emphasis on lymphatic epithelium.
8	tuberculin hypersensitivity studies with radioactive antigen and mononuclear cells	Studies of tuberculin hypersensitivity with radioactive antigen and mononuclear cells.
8	role of the thymus in immune reactions in rats ii suppressive effect of thymectomy at birth on reactions of delayed cellular hypersensitivity and the circulating small lymphocyte	The role of thymus in immune responses in the rat ii L' suppressive effect of thymectomy at birth on the reactions d' delayed cellular hypersensitivity and on circulating small lymphocytes.
8	ataxia telangiectasia	Ataxia telangiectasia.
8	circulating small lymphocytes immunologically competent cells with limited reactivites	Small circulating lymphocytes, immunologically competent cells with limited reactivity.
8	serologic typing of human lymphocytes with immune serum obtained after homografting	Serological type of human lymphocyte, aid of immune serum obtained after homograft.
8	reutilization of lymphocyte dna by cells of intestinal crypts and regenerating liver	Reuse of the apo; lymphocytic DNA by intestinal crypt and regenerating liver cells.
8	proliferative activity of the lymphatic tissues of rats as studied with tritium labeled thymidine	Growing activity of rat lymphatic tissues, as studied with tritium-labeled thymidine.
8	homograft immunity in pregnancy survival rates in rabbits born of ova transplanted into sensitized mothers	L' immunogenicity homograft in pregnancy survival rates in female-born rabbits; transplanted ovules to sensitized mothers.
8	antigenic material persistence in hypersensitive cells	The persistence of antigenic material in hypersensitive cells.
8	delayed hypersensitivity in man transfer by lymphocyte preparations of peripheral blood	Hypersensitivity delays the transfer of men through peripheral blood lymphocyte preparations.
8	the effect of skin homograft rejection on recipient and donor mixed leukocyte cultures	Effect of mucosal rejection; skin homograft on recipient/donor mixed leukocyte cultures.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ii induction of blast transformation with antisera to six igg allotypes and summation with mixtures of antisera to different allotypes	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro ii induction of blast transformation with antisera against six igg allotypes and summation with mixtures of d' antisera against different allotypes.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 3 proteins rna and dna synthesis by lymphocyte cultures after stimulation with phytohaemagglutinin with staphylococcal filtrate with antiallotype serum and with heterologous antiserum to rabbit whole serum	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro 3 proteins rna and synthesis by lymphocyte cultures stimulated with phytohemagglutinin with staphylococcal filtrate with antiallotype serum and heterologous antiserum against whole rabbit serum.
8	feulgen hydrolysis of normal cells and mouse ascites tumor cells	Feulgen hydrolysis of normal and tumour cells from mouse ascites.
8	allograft survival effect of antiserums to thymus glands and lymphocytes	Antimicrobial resistance to thymus glands and lymphocytes in rats and dogs.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro iv blast transformation of the lymphocytes from newborn rabbits induced by antiallotype serum to a paternal igg allotype not present in the serum of the lymphocyte donors	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro iv blast transformation of antiallotype serum-induced newborn rabbit lymphocytes-into a paternal igg allotype not present in lymphocyte donor serum.
8	mitosis induction by cultures of human peripheral lymphocytes	Induction of mitosis by human peripheral lymphocyte cultures.
8	electron microscopic observations on antibody producing lymph node cells	Electron microscopic observations on antibody-producing lymph node cells.
8	acid phosphatase rich granules in human lymphocytes induced by phytohemagglutinin	Phytohemagglutinin induces acid phosphatase-rich granules in human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte lifetime in women	Lymphocyte lifespan in women.
8	occurrence of lymphopenia in heart failure	Incidence of lymphopenia in meningococcal cells; heart failure.
8	immunologic competence of thoracic duct cells i delayed hypersensitivity	The immunological competence of the thoracic canal cells delayed the onset of hypersensitivity.
8	follicular lymphosarcoma brill symmers disease	Glowing symmetry disease of follicular lymphosarcoma.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro i stimulation of blast transformation with an antiallotype serum	Studies of rabbit lymphocytes in vitro i stimulation of the blastic transformation with antiallotype serum.
8	the origin of the cells in the efferent lymph from a single lymph node	Origin of efferent lymph node cells from a single lymph node.
8	the fine structure of mitosis in rat thymic lymphocytes	The fine structure of mitosis in thymic lymphocytes.
8	the interaction of mycoplasmas with mammalian cells ii monocytes and lymphocytes	L' interaction of mycoplasmas with mammalian cells monocytes and lymphocytes.
8	effect of previous irradiation on the transformation of blood lymphocytes	The effect of apo; previous irradiation on blood lymphocyte transformation.
8	synthesis of nonribosomal rna by lymphocytes a response to phytohemagglutinin treatment	Lymphocyte synthesis of non-ribosomal rna in response to phytohemagglutinin treatment.
8	lymphocytes from thymectomized rats immunologic proliferative and metabolic properties	Lymphocytes from thymectomized rats exhibited both proliferative and metabolic immunological properties.
8	kidney homografts uptake of fluorochrome labeled tissue extracts by lymph node cells	Renal homografts also capture fluorochrome-labelled tissue extracts from lymph node cells.
8	adenosylmethionine elevation in leukemic white blood cells	Lapos; elevation of apos; adenosylmethionine in leukemic white blood cells.
8	virus replication and high titered interferon production in human leukocyte cultures inoculated with newcastle disease virus	Virus replication and high production of apos; interferon in human leukocyte cultures inoculated with the Newcastle disease virus.
8	histochemical demonstration of gamma glutamyl transpeptidase activity in bone marrow and blood cells	Histochemical demonstration of apos; gamma glutamyl transpeptidase activity in bone marrow and in blood cells.
8	the carriage of immunological memory by small lymphocytes in the rat	Immunological memory transport by small lymphocytes in the rat.
8	functional anatomy of the lymphocyte in immunological reactions in vitro	Functional lymphocyte anatomy in immunological reactions in vitro.
8	studies on human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro i biological and physicochemical properties of the pokeweed mitogen	Human peripheral blood lymphocyte studies in vitro i biological and physico properties-chemicals of the host plant mitogen.
8	studies on human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro ii morphological and biochemical studies on the transformation of lymphocytes by pokeweed mitogen	Lymphocyte studies of human peripheral blood in vitro ii Morphological and biochemical studies of lymphocyte transformation by lice mitogen.
8	l asparaginase toxicity to normal and leukemic human lymphocytes	Toxicity of apos; asparaginase-1 for normal and leukemic human lymphocytes.
8	the ultrastructure and function of the cells in lymph following antigenic stimulation	L' ultrastructure and function of antigen-stimulated lymphatic cells.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro vi the induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera to rabbit iga and igm	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro vi llapos; induction of blast transformation with antisera of sheep against iga and l' rabbit igm.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro v the induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera to rabbit igg subunits	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro; induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera at-rabbit igg units.
8	effect of cycloheximide on protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis in cultured human lymphocytes	Effect of cycloheximide on protein and l&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid in human lymphocytes in culture.
8	mouse isoantigens separation of soluble tl thymus leukemia antigen from soluble h 2 histocompatibility antigen by column chromatography	Mouse isoantigens separation de l'apos; soluble leukemic antigen tl thymus de l'apos; antigen d'apos; soluble histocompatibility h 2 by column chromatography.
8	cytotoxic potential of stimulated human lymphocytes	Cytotoxic potential of stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	chromosomal breakage induced by extracts of human allogeneic lymphocytes	This is a chromosomal break induced by extracts from human allogeneic lymphocytes.
8	cell bound immunity to autologous and syngeneic mouse tumors induced by methylcholanthrene and plastic discs	L' cell-associated immunity against autologous and syngenic tumours of mice induced by methylcholanthrene and plastic disks is bound to the cells.
8	the effect of malnutrition on the inflammatory response as exhibited by the granuloma pouch of the rat	L*apos; effect of malnutrition on the inflammatory response as evidenced by the rat granulomatous sac.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats i conditions and parameters of response	Quantitative apo studies; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats i response conditions and parameters.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats ii relationship of the proliferative response to the immunologic status of the donors	Quantitative studies on apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats; relationship between proliferative response and apo; immunologic status of donors.
8	studies of the cells in the afferent and efferent lymph of lymph nodes draining the site of skin homografts	Studies of afferent and efferent lymph node cells draining the site of cutaneous homografts.
8	autoradiographic analysis of lymphopoiesis and lymphocyte migration in mice bearing multiple thymus grafts	Autoradiographic analysis of lymphopoietic and lymphocyte migration in mice with multiple thymus transplants.
8	in vitro demonstration of humoral and cell bound immunity against common specific transplantation atigen s of adenovirus 12 induced mouse and hamster tumors	In vitro, demonstration of immunities related to humoral and cell immunity against apos; common specific etigen of apos; adenovirus 12 induced tumours in mouse and hamster.
8	pyrimidine nucleotide synthesis regulatory control during transformation of lymphocytes in vitro	The regulatory control of pyrimidine nucleotide synthesis during lymphocyte transformation in vitro.
8	antiserum to immunoglobulin a inhibition of cell mediated demyelination in tissue culture	An antiserum to apos; immunoglobulin, an inhibition of cell-mediated demyelination in tissue culture.
8	mechanism of a reaction in vitro associated with delayed type hypersensitivity	Mechanisms of initiation; an in vitro reaction associated with delayed hypersensitivity of the type.
8	radioautographic and electron microscopic evidence of rapid uptake of antigen by lymphocytes	Radioautographic and electron microscopic data indicate that the lymphocytes are fast absorbing antigen.
8	heterologous antilymphocyte globulin studies in vitro	Studies of heterologous antilymphocyte globulins in vitro.
8	chromosome studies on marshall islanders exposed to fallout radiation	Chromosome studies on Marshall Islanders exposed to fallout radiation.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes prolonged survival of canine renal allografts	Lymphocyte antiserum has prolonged survival of canine renal allografts.
8	phosphorylation of nuclear protein early in the course of gene activation in lymphocytes	Nuclear protein phosphorylation early in the process; gene activation in lymphocytes.
8	electron microscopic observations on antibody producing cells in lymph and blood	Electron microscopic observations on lymph and blood antibody producing cells.
8	intestinal lymphangiectasia a protein losing enteropathy with hypogammaglobulinemia lymphocytopenia and impaired homograft rejection	Intestinal lymphangiectasis, a protein that loses protein; enteropathy due to disease; lymphocytopenic and d*apos hypogamaglobulinemia; altered lymphocytopenic rejection; homograft.
8	renal homotransplantation in rats i allogeneic recipients	"Rosenberg, J.A. and R.J. Watt, ""Renal homotransplantation in rats i allogeneic recipients."""
8	antigens in immunity xv ultrastructural features of antigen capture in primary and secondary lymphoid follicles	Antigen in the apo; immunity xv ultrastructural characteristics of antigen uptake in primary and secondary lymphoid follicles.
8	ring d chromosome a second case associated with anomalous haptoglobin inheritance	A second case associated with an abnormal inheritance of haptoglobin is the d chromosome of the apos; d ring.
8	effect of amantadine hydrochloride on the response of human lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	The effect of d&apos hydrochloride; amantadine on the response of human lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
8	the pathogenesis of chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Pathogenesis of chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	histones of genetically active and inactive chromatin	Genetically active and inactive chromatin histones.
8	mortality of radiation chimeras in relation to the number of transplanted bone marrow and lymph node cells	Mortality due to radiation chimeras in relation to the number of cells of bone marrow and lymph nodes transplanted.
8	the initial lesion in experimental allergic neuritis a phase and electron microscopic study	The initial lesion in experimental allergic neuritis has phase and is studied by electron microscopy.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 8 the relationship between heterozygosity and homozygosity of lymphocyte donor and per cent blast transformation induced by antiallotype sera	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro8 examined the relationship between leafiness, heterozygosity and leafiness; lymphocyte donor homozygosity; and percentage of blastic transformation induced by antiallotype sera.
8	association of experimental chronic arthritis with the persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls in the articular tissue	L' association of l' experimental chronic arthritis with persistent group a streptococcal cell walls in the articular tissue.
8	activation of lymphocytes	Lymphocyte activation.
8	chromosomes and transformation of lymphocytes in lymphoproliferative disorders	Chromosomes and lymphocyte transformation in lymphoproliferative disorders.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats 3 kinetics of the response	Quantitative dosage studies; mixed lymphocyte interaction in response kinetics in rats.
8	chemotoxis of mononuclear cells	Chemotoxicity of human mononuclear cells.
8	incorporation of sulfate by the mouse thymus its relation to secretion by medullary epithelial cells and to thymic lymphopoiesis	Incorporation of sulfate by the mouse thymus, its relation to epithelial medullary cell secretion and thymic lymphopoiesis.
8	the mixed lymphocyte reaction an in vitro test for tolerance	The mixed lymphocyte response is an in vitro tolerance test.
8	effect of chloroquine on morphology of cytoplasmic granules in maturing human leukocytes an ultrastructural study	Effect of chloroquine on cytoplasmic granule morphology in maturing human leukocytes; ultrastructural study.
8	studies on the in vitro behavior of agammaglobulinemic lymphocytes	Studies of the behaviour in vitro of agammaglobulinemic lymphocytes.
8	studies on lysosomes xi characterization of a hydrolase rich fraction from human lymphocytes	Studies on the characterization of lysosomes xi d' a fraction rich in hydrolase in human lymphocytes.
8	eosinophilic response in glioblastoma tissue culture after addition of autologous lymphocytes	"""Eosinophilic response in glioblastoma tissue culture after addition of lymphocyte autologous,"" Glioblastoma."
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocyte antigen interaction in delayed hypersensitivity	Cytotoxic effect of apo; interaction of apo; lymphocyte antigen on apo; delayed hypersensitivity.
8	viral inhibition of lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin	Viral inhibition of the lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin.
8	dna replication patterns and chromosomal protein synthesis in opossum lymphocytes in vitro	Models of apo replication; in vitro DNA and chromosomal protein synthesis in Dapos lymphocytes; opossum.
8	antigen induced release of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis srs a rat in rats prepared with homologous antibody	In rats prepared with a homologous antibody, the antigen induced release of a slow-reacting substance from the rat anaphylaxis.
8	a quantitative study of the stimulation of dna synthesis in lymph node cell cultures by anti lymphocyte serum anti gamma globulin serum specific antigen and phytohemagglutinin	A quantitative study of the stimulation of synthesis of DNA in lymph node cultures by the specific serum antigen-gamma serum globulin and phytohemagglutinin.
8	tissue interaction in the development of thymus lymphocytes	A tissue-based interaction in the development of lymphocytes in the thymus.
8	cytotoxic test automation a live dead cell differential counter	Automation of cytotoxic tests; a differential counter for live dead cells.
8	cell separation on antigen coated columns elimination of high rate antibody forming cells and immunological memory cells	Cell separation on eposcoated columns; antigen elimination from cells with high rates of epos formation; antibodies and immune memory cells.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ix the suppression of antiallotype induced blast transformation in lymphocyte cultures from allotypically suppressed donors	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro ix suppression of allos-induced blast transformation in allotypically suppressed donor lymphocyte cultures.
8	a sex difference in the leucocyte count	There is a gender difference in the number of leukocytes.
8	characteristics of the rna synthesized in vitro by the normal human small lymphocyte and the changes induced by phytohemagglutinin stimulation	Features of in vitro synthesized rna by the normal human small lymphocyte and changes induced by phytohemagglutinin stimulation.
8	specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections i monocyte as host cell for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro	Specific role of each type of human leukocyte in i monocyte viral infections as a host cell for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro.
8	noncycling tumor cells mitogenic response to antilymphocytic serum	Non-cyclic mitogenic response of tumor cells to antilymphocyte serum.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity i characterization of the phenomenon	Dosage-mediated cytotoxicity; soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity; delayed characterization.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity ii correlation of the in vitro response with skin reactivity	Caused cytotoxicity; soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity ii correlation of in vitro response with skin reactivity.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity 3 analysis of mechanism	Apos-mediated cytotoxicity; soluble antigen and lymphocytes in apo; delayed hypersensitivity; 3 mechanism analysis.
8	the interaction of human monocytes and lymphocytes	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of cells.
8	studies on the anti inflammatory action of 6 mercaptopurine	Dosage Studies; Antimicrobial Action-Inflammatory of 6 Mercaptopurine.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes and procarbazine compared as immunosuppressants in mice	Lymphocyte antiserum and procarbazine were compared as immunosuppressive agents in mice.
8	specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections ii phytohemagglutinin treated lymphocytes as host cells for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro	Specific role of each type of human leukocyte in viral infections ii Phytohemagglutinin treats lymphocytes as host cells for the in vitro replication of vesicular stomatitis virus.
8	serotyping for homotransplantation xxii specificity of cytotoxic antibodies developing after renal transplantation	Specificity xxii homo-transplantation of cytotoxic antibodies developing after renal transplantation.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes interactions with chemical immunosuppressants	Interactions between the immunos; antiserum and lymphocytes and chemical immunosuppressants.
8	microspikes on the lymphocyte uropod	Micropics on the epos; lymphocyte uropod.
8	leukotactic factor produced by sensitized lymphocytes	Leukotactic factor produced by sensitized lymphocytes.
8	mixed lymphocyte reaction an in vitro test for antilymphocytic serum activity	The Mixed Lymphocyte Reaction (MLCR) is an in vitro test for serum anti-lymphocyte activity.
8	significance of the changes in the circulating lymphoid cells in hodgkin s disease	Importance of changes in circulating lymphoid cells in Hodgkin's Disease.
8	nonrandomness of translocations in man preferential entry of chromosomes into 13 15 21 translocations	The nonrandom character of the translocations in the apos; man favored the apos; 13-15-21 translocations entered chromosomes.
8	labial salivary gland biopsy in sj gren s disease	Lipid salivary gland biopsy in pomegranate disease, sj.
8	immunological aspects of intrauterine transfusion	Immunological aspects of intravenous transfusion:-uterine.
8	studies of pplo infection v inhibition of lymphocyte mitosis and antibody formation by mycoplasmal extracts	Studies of apo; infection of the liver; inhibition of lymphocyte mitosis and formation of apo; antibodies by mycoplasmic extracts.
8	the effect of epithelial remnant and whole organ grafts of thymus on the recovery of thymectomized irradiated mice	The effect of remnant epithelial and whole organ grafts of thymus on the recovery of the irradiated thymectomized mice.
8	antigenic changes in lymph node cells after administration of antiserum to thymus cells	Antigenic changes in lymph nodes after apo; administration of apo; an antiserum to the thymus cells.
8	mn blood group locus data concerning the possible chromosomal location	Blood group mn locus data for possible chromosomal localization.
8	the cellular infiltrate in hashimoto s disease and focal lymphocytic thyroiditis	L' cellular infiltration into Hashimoto disease and focal lymphocytic thyroiditis.
8	virus containing lymphocyte cultures from cancer patients	Virus containing lymphocyte cultures from cancer patients.
8	studies on marek s disease ii pathogenesis	Marek disease studies ii pathogenesis.
8	abnormalities of in vitro lymphocyte responses during rubella virus infections	Defects in lymphocyte responses in vitro during rubella virus infections.
8	fine structural alterations of interphase nuclei of lymphocytes stimulated to grwoth activity in vitro	Fine structural alterations of interphase cell nuclei stimulated at l' grwoth activity in vitro.
8	the frequency of antigen sensitive cells in tissue transplantation a commentary on clonal selection	The frequency of antigen-sensitive cells in tissue transplants should be considered in the context of clonal selection.
8	the occurrence and properties of leukocytosis and lymphocytosis stimulating material in the supernatant fluids of bordetella pertussis cultures	Frequency and properties of leucocytosis and lymphocytosis-stimulating material in supernatants of bordetella pertussis cultures.
8	dissociation of hemolytic and lymphocyte transforming activities of streptolysin s preparations	Dissociation of the hemolytic and lymphocytic transformation activities from streptolysin s preparations.
8	replication of poliovirus in phytohemagglutinin stimulated human lymphocytes	Human lymphocytes are stimulated by replication of poliovirus in phytohemagglutinin.
8	aggregation and transformation of rat lymphocytes on rat embryo monolayers	Lapses; aggregation and transformation of rat lymphocytes on monolayers of rat embryos.
8	immunoglobulins g a and m determined in single cells from human tonsil	Immune globulins g a and m were determined in isolated cells from the human amygdala.
8	reentry of nondividing leukemic cells into a proliferative phase in acute childhood leukemia	The reintroduction of non-divisional leukemia cells into a proliferative phase of acute leukemia in children.
8	lymphocytoid lines from persons with sex chromosome anomalies	Lymphocytoid lines of individuals with sexual chromosomal abnormalities.
8	the proliferative and anamnestic antibody response of rabbit lymphoid cells in vitro i immunological memory in the lymph nodes draining and contralateral to the site of a primary antigen injection	The proliferative and anamnestic antibody response of rabbit lymphoid cells in vitro immunologic memory in both draining and contralateral lymph nodes at the d&apos site; primary injection of antigen.
8	cellular immunity in vitro clonal proliferation of antigen stimulated lymphocytes	Cellular immunity in vitro has promoted clonal proliferation of antigen-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	human granulocyte collagenase	Human granulocyte collagenase.
8	isopentenyladenosine stimulates and inhibits mitosis of human lymphocytes treated with phytohemagglutinin	Isopentenyladenosine stimulates and inhibits mitosis in human lymphocytes treated with phytohemagglutinin.
8	serum mediated protection of neoplastic cells from inhibition by lymphocytes immune to their tumor specific antigens	The serum protects neoplastic cells of the apos; inhibition by lymphocytes immunized against their specific tumour antigens.
8	the human chromosome electron microscopic observations on chromatin fiber organization	The electron microscopic observations of human chromosomes on the structure of the chromatin fibers.
8	transformation of human lymphocytes inhibition by homologous alpha globulin	Human lymphocyte inhibition in human lymphocytes by alpha-globulin homologue.
8	hodgkin s disease histological classification and diagnosis	Histological classification and diagnosis of Hodgkin's disease syndrome.
8	localization of immunological complexes fixing beta1c c3 in germinal centers of lymph nodes	The localization of beta1c c3 binding immunological complexes in lymph node germ centres.
8	the distribution of large dividing lymph node cells in syngeneic recipient rats after intravenous injection	Distribution of large, dividing lymph node cells in intravenous injected syngenic rats.
8	lymphocytosis and histamine sensitization of mice by fractions from bordetella pertussis	Lymphocytosis and sensitization to mouse histamine by fractions of bordetella pertussis.
8	cells involved in the immune response 13 the nature of the cellular interactions relating antibody formation and immunologic tolerance a unified hypothesis	The cells involved in the immune response 13 the nature of the cellular interactions linking the formation of antibody; antibody and immune tolerance a unified hypothesis.
8	heterogeneity of antibody forming cells an electron microscopic analysis	The heterogeneity of the antibodies that make up the cells is analyzed by electron microscopy.
8	lymphoid cellular responses in the blood after immunization in man	Lymphoid cellular responses in blood after apo; immunization in humans.
8	immune response to gluten in adult coeliac disease	The immune response to gluten in celiac disease in adults.
8	stress effect of antilymphocyte serum	Stressful effect of anti-lymphocyte serum?
8	dna polymerase activity as an index of lymphocyte stimulation studies in down s syndrome	Apos polymerase activity; DNA as an index of lymphocyte stimulation studies in bottom to bottom syndrome.
8	immunoglobulin synthesis by salivary gland lymphoid cells in sj gren s syndrome	Synthesis of the apos; immune globulin by salivary lymphoid cells in garnet syndrome sj.
8	specific antibody within lymphoid germinal center cells of mice after primary immunization with horseradish peroxidase a light and electron microscopic study	A specific antibody in mouse lymphoid germ cells following primary immunization with horseradish peroxidase was studied by light and electron microscopy.
8	changes in the blood picture in therapeutic use of hormones	Changes in dosage; image of blood in dosage; therapeutic use of hormones.
8	rat thoracic duct lymphocytes types that participate in inflammation	Types of rat thoracic canal lymphocytes involved in inflammation.
8	isolation and zonal fractionation of metaphase chromosomes from human diploid cells	Isolation and zonal fractionation of metaphase chromosomes in diploid human cells.
8	mixed lymphocyte reactions and tissue transplantation tolerance	Mixed lymphocyte responses and tissue transplant tolerance.
8	white blood count in patients on regular haemodialysis	White blood cell count (WBC) in patients on regular hemodialysis.
8	morphological comparison of machupo with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus basis for a new taxonomic group	Morphological comparison of the machupo with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus for a new taxonomic group.
8	the effect of glucocorticosteroids on the kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes	L' effect of glucocorticoids on mononuclear phagocyte kinetics.
8	giant neutrophil granules in the chediak higashi syndrome of man mink cattle and mice	Giant neutrophil granules in mink and mouse chediak higashi syndrome.
8	hematological and febrile responses of rabbits to listerial hemolysins	Rabbit hematological and febrile reactions to listerial hemolysins.
8	unscheduled incorporation of thymidine in ultraviolet irradiated human lymphocytes	Unexpected incorporation of thymidine into ultraviolet-irradiated human lymphocytes.
8	effects of short term epithelial reticular cell and whole organ thymus grafts in neonatally thymectomized mice	Effects of epithelial reticular cell and thymus d&apos transplantation as a short-term whole organ in thymectomized neonatalised mice.
8	cytogenetic studies with cyclamate and related compounds	Cytogenetic studies with cyclamate and related compounds.
8	lymphocytic responses to streptococcal antigens in glomerulonephritic patients	The effects of streptococcal antigens on glomerulonephritic patients.
8	in vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells ii cell interactions and effects of immunochemical or metabolic inhibitors	In vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells ii cellular interactions and effects of immunochemical or metabolic inhibitors.
8	the role of the lymphatic system in the rejection of homografts a study of lymph from renal transplants	The role of the lymphatic system in homograft rejection a study of lymph from renal transplants.
8	biochemical endocrine and other indices during quinestrol therapy	Biochemical endocrine indices and other indices during quinestrol therapy.
8	mixed lymphocyte cultures produce effector cells model in vitro for allograft rejection	Mixed lymphocyte cultures produce model effector cells for allograft rejection in vitro.
8	labeling and other effects of actinomycin d on human chromosomes	Marking and other effects of d' actinomycin on human chromosomes.
8	quantitation of strain balb c mouse peritoneal cells	Quantification of the peritoneal cells of the mouse balb c strain.
8	the effect of caffeine on the mitosis of human lymphocytes in culture	Cultures of human lymphocytes: the effect of caffeine on mitosis.
8	isolation of leucogenenol from bovine and human liver	Isolation of leucogenenol from both bovine and human liver.
8	lymphocyte stimulation transfer of cellular hypersensitivity to antigen in vitro	Lymphocyte stimulation cell transfer; cell hypersensitivity to apos; antigen in vitro.
8	cell mediated immunological processes in leprosy	Cell-mediated immunological processes in leprosy.
8	correction of celluar metachromasia in cultured fibroblasts in several inherited mucopolysaccharidoses	Correcting for cellular metachromasis in fibroblasts cultured in several hereditary mucopolysaccharidoses.
8	in vitro lymphocyte reactivity during depression of tuberculin hypersensitivity by 6 mercaptopurine	Lymphocyte reactivity in vitro during a decrease in the amount of tuberculin hypersensitivity to 6 mercaptopurine.
8	pompe s disease detection of heterozygotes by lymphocyte stimulation	Pump s disease detection of heterozygotes by lymphocyte stimulation. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/pubs.html.
8	detection of simultaneous antibody synthesis in plasma cells and specialized lymphocytes in rabbit lymph nodes	Detection of simultaneous synthesis of apos; antibodies in plasma cells and lymphocytes specialized in lymph nodes of rabbit.
8	human monocytes and macrophages interaction with antigen and lymphocytes	Human monocytes and macrophages are known to interact with antigen and lymphocytes.
8	antigen recognition in vitro studies on the specificity of the cellular immune response	Recognition of immunos; antigen in vitro studies on the specificity of cellular immune response.
8	cells involved in the immune response xii the differing responses of normal rabbit lymphoid cells to phytohemagglutinin goat anti rabbit immunoglobulin antiserum and allogeneic and xenogeneic lymphocytes	The cells involved in the xii immune response are the different responses of normal rabbit lymphoid cells to rabbit phytohemagglutinin anti-immunoglobulin and to allogeneic and xenogenic lymphocytes.
8	rapid lymphocytic recognition of histoincompatibility changes of the deoxyribonucleoprotein complex in mixed cultures of allogeneic human lymphocytes	Rapid lymphocyte recognition of deoxyribonucleoprotein complex histoincompatibility changes in mixed cultures of allogeneic human lymphocytes.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats iv immunologic potentiality of the responding cells	Quantitative studies of apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rat iv immunologic potentiality of responding cells.
8	lymphocyte transformation in multiple sclerosis	Lymphocytic transformation in multiple sclerosis.
8	the differential attachment of antibiotics to glycoprotein and blood lymphocytes	Differential attachment of antibiotics to glycoproteins and blood lymphocytes.
8	mixed leukocyte reactivity and leukemia study of identical siblings	Study of leukocyte reactivity and leukemia in leukocytes from identical siblings.
8	specificity of antigen recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro	Specific recognition of antigens by human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	cytotoxicity specificity after in vitro sensitization	Specificity of cytotoxicity after in vitro sensitization.
8	a study of the effects of certain hormones on human cells in culture	A study of the effects of certain hormones on the human cells in culture.
8	changes in the differential leukocyte count of chicks inoculated with salmonella	Changes in the differential number of leukocytes in salmonella-inoculated chicks.
8	alkaline phosphatase activity of polymorphonuclear leucocytes and lymphocytes separated from normal human blood	L' alkaline phosphatase activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and of lymphocytes is separated from normal human blood.
8	quantitation of lymphocyte transformation using radioactive iododeoxyuridine	Diagnosis of lymphocyte transformation using radioactive iododeoxyuridine.
8	quantitative enzyme cytochemistry of leukaemic cells	The quantitative enzyme-linked cytochemistry of leukemia cells.
8	glucocorticoids and cellular immunity in vitro facilitation of the sensitization phase and inhibition of the effector phase of a lymphocyte anti fibroblast reaction	Glucocorticoids and lacidosis; cellular immunity in vitro facilitates sensitization and lacidosis; inhibition of the effector phase of lacidosis; an anti-cellular fibroblast reaction.
8	studies on the differentiation of thymus derived lymphocytes	Studies on differentiation of Thymus-derived Lymphocytes.
8	histocompatibility type and immune responsiveness in random bred hartley strain guinea pigs	Histocompatibility and immune response in random-bred hartley guinea pigs are examples of guinea pigs.
8	clinical evaluation of the urinary sediment after renal allotransplantation	Clinical evaluation of urinary sediment after renal allotransplantation.
8	y fluorescence of interphase nuclei especially circulating lymphocytes	Fluorescence of interphase nuclei, especially of circulating lymphocytes.
8	in vitro and in vivo activity of a lymphocyte and immune complex dependent chemotactic factor for eosinophils	In vitro and in vivo activity of eosinophils; a lymphocyte and chemotactic factor dependent on the immune complex.
8	immunological problems in leprosy research 1 clinical and pathological spectrum of leprosy	Immunological problems in leprosy research 1 clinical and pathological leprosy spectrum.
8	response of the rheumatoid synovial membrane to exogenous immunization	Rheumatoid synovial membrane response to apos; exogenous immunization.
8	comparison of the hl a phenotypes of lymphocytes and kidney cells determined by the fluorochromasia cytotoxicity assay	Comparison of lymphocyte and renal cell phenotypes as determined by the fluorochromatic cytotoxicity assay.
8	cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in human lymphocytes alterations after phytohemagglutinin stimulation	Cyclic Adenosine 35 monophosphate in alterations of human lymphocytes following phytohemagglutinin stimulation.
8	human lymphocytic metabolism effects of cyclic and noncyclic nucleotides on stimulation by phytohemagglutinin	Effects of human lymphocyte metabolism of cyclic and non-cyclic nucleotides on stimulation by human phytohemagglutinin.
8	specificity of allogeneic cell recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro	Specificity of recognition of allogeneic cells by human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	specific lymphocyte sensitization in cancer is there a common antigen in human malignant neoplasia	The specific sensitization of lymphocytes in cancer results from the existence of a common antigen in human neoplastic malignancies.
8	karyotyping of single human chromosomes from dry mass determined by electron microscopy	Karyotyping of simple human chromosomes in the dry mass fraction determined by electron microscopy.
8	immunoglobulin production by human lymphocytoid lines and clones absence of genic exclusion	Production of apos; immunoglobulins by human lymphocyte lines and clones without gene exclusion.
8	cell surface antigens serial sectioning of single cells as an approach to topographical analysis	Serial separation of antigens from the cell surface of individual cells for topographic analysis.
8	lymphocyte stimulation selective destruction of cells during blastogenic response to transplantation antigens	Lymphocyte stimulation selective cell destruction during blastogenic response to transplantation.
8	a study of gluco corticosteroid induced pyknosis in the thymus and lymph node of the adrenalectomized rat	A study of gluco corticosteroids induced pyknosis in the thymus and lymph node of adrenalectomized rats.
8	6 thioguanine antimitotic effect on human lymphocytes in vitro prevented by adenine	Thioguanine is an anti-mitotic effect on human lymphocytes in vitro, which is prevented by adenosine.
8	lymphocyte sensitization in sarcoidosis	Lymphocyte sensitization to sarcoidosis.
8	cytodiagnosis of rheumatoid pleural effusions	Cydiagnosis of the rheumatoid pleural effusion.
8	human lymphocyte antigen reactivity modified by neuraminidase	Neuraminidase modified antigenic human lymphocyte reactivity.
8	ultrastructural study of two cases of alpha chain disease	Ultrastructural study of two cases of alpha-chain disease.
8	quantitative aspects of plasma membrane associated immunoglobulin in clones of diploid human lymphocytes	The quantitative aspects of the plasma membrane-associated immunoglobulin in clones of diploid human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocytic sialadenitis in the major and minor glands a correlation in postmortem subjects	Lymphocytic sialadenitis in the main and secondary glands, a correlation in postmortem subjects.
8	mediators of histamine release from human platelets lymphocytes and granulocytes	Mediators of histamine release from human granulocytes and platelet lymphocytes.
8	mixed leukocyte stimulation of normal peripheral leukocytes by autologous lymphoblastoid cells	Mixed leukocyte stimulation of normal peripheral leukocytes by autologous, lymphoblastoid cells.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats v tempo and specificity of the proliferative response and the number of reactive cells from immunized donors	Quantitative studies of the apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction in the rat v. and specificity of proliferative response and number of immunized reactive donor cells.
8	biochemically marked lymphocytoid lines establishment of lesch nyhan cells	Establishment of lesch nyhan biochemically labelled lymphocytoid lines.
8	uptake of transfer ribonucleic acid by normal and leukemic cells	Transfer extracts; ribonucleic acid to normal and leukemic cells.
8	action of diphenylhydantoin on chromosomes	Action of diphenylhydantoin on chromosomes.
8	the peritoneal exudate lymphocyte i differences in antigen responsiveness between peritoneal exudate and lymph node lymphocytes from immunized guinea pigs	Lapos lymphocytes; peritoneal exudate differ in antigenic reactivity between lymphocytes of immunized guinea pigs; peritoneal exudate and lymph nodes.
8	lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in vitro effect of enhancing antisera	In vitro lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxic effect of apos; increase of antisera.
8	mechanisms of recovery from a generalized viral infection mousepox 3 regression infectious foci	Mechanisms of recovery; a generalized viral infection of the musepox virus 3 infectious foci of regression.
8	synthesis and assembly of immunoglobulins by malignant human plasmacytes and lymphocytes ii heterogeneity of assembly in cells producing igm proteins	Synthesis and assembly of apo; immune globulins by malignant human plasmacytes and lymphocytes ii heterogeneity of apo; assembly into germ protein producing cells.
8	studies on the life history of lymphocytes i the life span of cells responsive in the mixed lymphocyte interaction	Lymphocyte lifecycle studies the lifespan of cells reacting to apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction.
8	specific inhibition of tumor cell dna synthesis in vitro by lymphocytes from peritoneal exudate of immunized syngeneic guinea pigs	Lapses; specific inhibition of synthesis of apo; in vitro tumour cell DNA by lupus lymphocytes; immunized syngenic guinea pig peritoneal exudate.
8	on the number and nature of antigen sensitive lymphocytes in the blood of delayed hypersensitive human donors	Number and nature of antigen-sensitive lymphocytes in the blood of delayed human hypersensitive donors.
8	antigen binding cells in normal mouse thymus	Binding cells; antigen in normal mouse thymus.
8	tumor immunity tumor suppression in vivo initiated by soluble products of specifically stimulated lymphocytes	Tumour suppression immunity tumour suppression in vivo initiated by soluble products of specifically stimulated lymphocytes.
8	treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukaemia comparison of immunotherapy b c g intermittent methotrexate and no therapy after a five month intensive cytotoxic regimen concord trial preliminary report to the medical research council by the leukaemia committee and the working party on leukaemia in childhood	Treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukemia, bladder comparison, intermittent c-methotrexate immunotherapy and no treatment after five months of intensive cytotoxic testing, preliminary report to the Medical Research Council by the Leukemia Committee and the Working Group on Leukemia in Children.
8	synthesis of plasma membrane associated and secretory immunoglobulin in diploid lymphocytes	Synthesis of the secretory and plasma membrane associated immunoglobulin in diploid lymphocytes.
8	sensitized lymphocytes in muscular dystrophy evidence for a neural factor in pathogenesis	Lymphocytes sensitized in muscular dystrophy indicate the existence of apos; a neural factor in the pathogenesis.
8	lymphocyte sensitization to nervous tissues and muscle in patients with the guillain barr syndrome	Lymphocyte sensitization to both nervous tissue and muscle in patients with Guillain Barr syndrome.
8	a receptor for antibody on b lymphocytes i method of detection and functional significance	A lymphocyte antibody receptor detection method and functional significance.
8	a receptor for antibody on b lymphocytes ii immunochemical and electron microscopy characteristics	Lymphocyte antibody receptor b ii Features of immunochemical and electron microscopy.
8	synergistic interaction of macrophages and lymphocytes in antigen induced transformation of lymphocytes	L' synergistic interaction of macrophages and lymphocytes in apos; antigen induced lymphocyte transformation.
8	receptors on immunocompetent cells ii specificity and nature of receptors on dinitrophenylated guinea pig albumin 125 i binding lymphocytes of normal guinea pigs	Immunocompetent cell receptors ii specificity and nature of receptors on normal guinea pig lyso-bound lymphocytes; dinitrophenylated 125 i guinea pig albumin.
8	a new micromethod for evaluating lymphocyte responses to phytohemagglutinin quantitative analysis of the function of thymus dependent cells	A new micromethod for the quantitative analysis of the function of phytohemagglutinin-dependent thymus-dependent cells.
8	impaired lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with coeliac disease	Anomalies of lymphocyte responsiveness to tumour cells in patients with apo; a CD.
8	dna dependent dna polymerases i and ii from normal human blood lymphocytes	Apos-dependent polymerases i and ii; DNA from normal human blood lymphocytes.
8	the relationship between thymus and oncogenesis a study of the incidence of non thymic malignancy in myasthenia gravis	The relationship between thymus and oncogenetic processes is a study of the incidence of non-thymic malignancy in severe myasthenia.
8	enhancement by interferon of the specific cytotoxicity of sensitized lymphocytes	Apos enhancement; interferon specific cytotoxicity of sensitized lymphocytes.
8	mouse cytomegalovirus necrosis of infected and morphologically normal submaxillary gland acinar cells during termination of chronic infection	Cytomegalovirus necrosis of mouse acinar cells under-maxillary infected and morphologically normal during the end of l' chronic infection.
8	surface immunoglobulins on thymus and thymus derived lymphoid cells	Surface immunoglobulins on the thymus and lymphoid cells derived from the thymus.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats vi reactivity of lymphocytes from conventional and germfree rats to allogeneic and xenogeneic cell surface antigens	Quantitative studies of cell surface allogeneic and xenogenic cell surface antigens in normal and germ-free rat lymphocytes; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rat vi reactivity.
8	the compartmentalization of antigen reactive lymphocytes in desensitized guinea pigs	Compartmentalization of reactive antigenic lymphocytes in desensitized guinea pigs.
8	cystathionine synthase activity in human lymphocytes induction by phytohemagglutinin	L&apos cystathionine synthase activity in human lymphocytes is induced by phytohemagglutinin.
8	antigen solubilized from human leukemia lymphocyte stimulation	Antigen solubilized from stimulation of human leukemia lymphocytes.
8	cell cycle dependent immune lysis of moloney virus transformed lymphocytes presence of viral antigen accessibility to antibody and complement activation	The cellular-cycle-dependent lysis of the moloney virus transforms lymphocytes in the presence of apo; accessibility of the viral antigen to antibody and apo; complement activation.
8	membrane associated dna in the cytoplasm of diploid human lymphocytes	Membrane-associated DNA (MDNAs) in the cytoplasm of diploid human lymphocytes.
8	thymus dependent and thymus independent lymphocyte separation relation to exposed sialic acid on cell surface	The relationship between thymus-dependent and thymus-independent exposure to sialic acid at cell surface and lymphocyte separation.
8	antigen binding specificity of isolated cell surface immunoglobulin from thymus cells activated to histocompatibility antigens	Cell surface immunoglobulin isolated from thymus cells activated with antigen-based antigen-binding agents; histocompatibility.
8	stimulated normal human lymphocytes contain a ribonuclease sensitive dna polymerase distinct from viral rna directed dna polymerase	Stimulated normal human lymphocytes contain viral rna polymerase-mediated viral RNA polymerase, a ribonuclease-sensitive DNA polymerase distinct from the apos.
8	regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro potentiation and inhibition of rat lymphocyte responses to antigen and mitogens by cytochalasin b	The regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro and in vitro; inhibition of the responses of rat lymphocytes to antigen and mitogens by cytochalasin b.
8	interaction of aggregated globulin with b lymphocytes	Aggregate globulin interaction with b lymphocytes.
8	the host cell response in the local graft versus host reaction induced in the kidneys of f 1 rats by parental thoracic duct lymphocytes	Host cell response in the local graft versus host response induced in f1 rat kidneys by parental thoracic duct lymphocytes.
8	the effect of bordetella pertussis on lymphocyte cyclic amp metabolism	Lapos; effect of bordetella pertussis on metabolism of the lymphocyte; lymphocyte cyclic ampoule.
8	deletion of b5 immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes in allotype suppressed rabbits	Deletion of lymphocytes harboring immunoglobulin b5 in rabbits; allotype suppresses rabbits.
8	characterization of a lymphocyte factor which alters macrophage functions	Characterization of apo; a lymphocyte factor that modifies macrophage function.
8	independence of h 2k and h 2d antigenic determinants on the surface of mouse lymphocytes	Mouse lymphocyte surface dependence of h 2k and h 2d antigenic determinants.
8	lymphocyte transformation in immunoproliferative disorders	Lymphocyte transformation in immunoproliferative disorders.
8	excretion of deoxyribonucleic acid by lymphocytes stimulated with phytohemagglutinin or antigen	Lapos; deoxyribonucleic acid excretion by phytohemagglutinin-stimulated lymphocytes or lapos; antigen.
8	action of rifamycin derivatives on rna polymerase of human leukemic lymphocytes	The action of rifamycin derivatives on human leukemia lymphocyte rna polymerase.
8	cytochalasin b inhibits lymphotoxin production by antigen stimulated lymphocytes	Cytochalasin inhibits lymphotoxin production by antigen-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	aryl hydrocarbon benzopyrene hydroxylase is stimulated in human lymphocytes by mitogens and benz a anthracene	L' d&apos hydroxylase; benzopyrene-aryl hydrocarbon is stimulated in human lymphocytes by mitogens and anthracene-containing benzylcarbons.
8	the effect of lymphocytes from sufferers from recurrent aphthous ulceration upon colon cells in tissue culture	Lapos; effect of lymphocytes in patients with osteoarthritis; recurrent aphthous ulceration of colonic cells in tissue culture.
8	lymphocyte transformation in chagas disease	Lymphocytic transformation in Sorrow Disease.
8	the migration of lymphocytes across the vascular endothelium in lymphoid tissue a reexamination	The migration of lymphocytes through vascular endothelium in lymphoid tissues has been reexamined.
8	idiotypic determinants of immunoglobulin m detected on the surface of human lymphocytes by cytotoxicity assays	Idiotypic determinants of the apos; immune globulin detected on the surface of human lymphocytes by cytotoxicity assays.
8	quantitation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes and lymphocyte response to mitogens in horses persistently infected by equine infectious anemia virus	Quantification of apo-carrier lymphocytes; immune globulin and lymphocyte response to mitogens in horses with persistent apovirus infection; infectious equine anemia.
8	papain solubilized hl a antigens from cultured human lymphocytes contain two peptide fragments	The a antigens from cultured human lymphocyte hl-solubilized papain contain two peptide fragments.
8	impaired lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with crohn s disease	An abnormal response of the lymphocytes to tumour cells in patients with Crohn's disease.
8	macrophage lymphocyte interaction i characteristics of the antigen independent binding of guinea pig thymocytes and lymphocytes to syngeneic macrophages	Lymphocyte interaction of macrophages characteristic of the independent binding of peptides; antigen from guinea pig thymocytes and lymphocytes to syngene macrophages.
8	anti human immunoglobulin g activity of membrane bound monoclonal immunoglobulin m in lymphoproliferative disorders	L' anti-Human GG immunoglobulin antibody activity; membrane-bound monoclonal immunoglobulin in lymphoproliferative disorders.
8	control of transcription of rna rich in polyadenylic acid in human lymphocytes	Mastery of transcription of polyadenylic acid-rich rna in human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic antibody in normal human serums reactive with tumor cells from acute lymphocytic leukemia	Cytotoxic antibody in normal human sera reacting with acute lymphocytic leukemia tumour cells.
8	function of macrophages in antigen recognition by guinea pig t lymphocytes i requirement for histocompatible macrophages and lymphocytes	The function of macrophages in the recognition of antigens by guinea pig lymphocytes requires macrophages and histocompatible lymphocytes.
8	studies of two subpopulations of human lymphocytes differing in responsiveness to concanavalin a	Studies of two under-human lymphocyte populations that differed in their responsiveness to concanavalin.
8	transmissible mink encephalopathy studies on the peripheral lymphocyte	Mink studies; transmissible encephalopathy of mink in peripheral lymphocytes.
8	the response to phytohaemagglutinin pha of lymphocytes from cancer patients	Lymphocyte pha's response to phytohemagglutinin from cancer patients.
8	relationship of adenovirus to lymphocytes in naturally infected human tonsils and adenoids	Ratio of adenovirus to lymphocytes in human tonsils and naturally infected adenoids.
8	the effect of in vivo hydrocortisone on subpopulations of human lymphocytes	Effect of apos; hydrocortisone in vivo on human lymphocyte (HLC) sub-populations.
8	the thymic suppressor cell i separation of subpopulations with suppressor activity	Separation of the suppressive cells of thymus i from sub@-@ suppressive populations.
8	alterations in cyclic amp metabolism in human bronchial asthma ii leukocyte and lymphocyte responses to prostaglandins	Changes in the metabolism of cyclic blisters in human bronchial asthma ii leukocyte and lymphocyte responses prostaglandins.
8	tissue factor activity in lymphocyte cultures from normal individuals and patients with hemophilia a	Lapses; tissue factor activity in cultures of normal and hemophilic individuals a.
8	studies on the distribution of surface immunoglobulins of human b lymphocytes	Studies of the distribution of human b lymphocyte surface immune globulins.
8	lymphocyte anergy in patients with carcinoma	Lymphocytic anergy in patients with apos; carcinoma.
8	enumeration of activated thymus derived lymphocytes by the virus plaque assay	Enumeration of viral plaque test of thymus-activated lymphocytes.
8	stimulated lymphocyte cultures responder recruitment and cell cycle kinetics	Stimulate recruitment of responders in lymphocyte cultures and cell cycle kinetics.
8	antibody mediated suppression of lymphoma participation of platelets lymphocytes and nonphagocytic macrophages	The antibodies suppressed the involvement of both platelet lymphocytes and nonphagocytic macrophages in lymphoma.
8	occurrence of surface igm igd and free light chains of human lymphocytes	The presence of free surface and light chains of human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocytes in patients with variable immunodeficiency and panhypogammaglobulinemia evaluation of b and t cell surface markers and a proposed classification	Lymphocytes in patients with variable immunodeficiency and pan-hypogamaglobulinemia were evaluated at baseline, using b- and t-cell surface markers and a proposed lymphocyte classification.
8	pattern of immunoglobulin synthesis and assembly in a human mouse somatic cell hybrid clone	Synthesis and apo pattern; immune globulin assembly in a hybrid clone of human mouse somatic cells.
8	the k chains of the immunoglobulin from a continuous culture of human lymphocytes daudi have an unusual molecular size	The k-chains of apos; immune globulin from apos; an unusually large molecular size of a continuous culture of human lymphocytes.
8	relationship between hl a antigens and beta 2 microglobulin as studied by immunofluorescence on the lymphocyte membrane	The relationship between hl a antigens and beta-2 microglobulin was studied by lymphocyte membrane immunofluorescence.
8	the phasic radiosensitivity of human lymphocytes to the effects of protons	The phasic radiosensitivity of human lymphocytes to proton-induced effects.
8	macrophage lymphocyte clusters in the immune response to soluble protein antigen in vitro ii ultrastructure of clusters formed during the early response	Lymphocyte macrophage clusters in the immune response to in vitro soluble protein antigen; ultrastructure of clusters formed at the beginning of the response.
8	receptor for the fourth component of complement on human b lymphocytes and cultured human lymphoblastoid cells	Receptor for the fourth component of the complement to human b lymphocytes and cultured human lymphoblastoid cells.
8	separation of antigen specific lymphocytes a new general method of releasing cells bound to nylon mesh	The separation of specific lymphocytes from antigens is a new general method for the release of cells bound to the nylon net.
8	human lymphocyte surface immunoglobulin capping normal characteristics and anomalous behavior of chronic lymphocytic leukemic lymphocytes	Human lymphocyte surface immunoglobulins cover normal characteristics and abnormal behaviour of chronic lymphocyte leukemia.
8	human peripheral lymphocytes and cancer in vitro studies on the basic protein histone f2a1 fraction	In vitro studies of human peripheral lymphocytes and cancer on the f2a1 fraction of baseline protein histone.
8	a girl with karyotype 46 xx del 7 qter p 15	A girl with karyotype 46 xx del 7 p p.
8	transformation antigens on stimulated lymphocytes	Transformation antigens on stimulated lymphocytes.
8	chromatin proteins from human lymphocytes a gel electrophoretic comparison between normal mitogen stimulated cell line and chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes	The chromatin proteins of human lymphocytes were compared by gel electrophoresis between the normal mitogen-stimulated cell line and chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes.
8	insoluble particulate antigen s in cell mediated immunity of autoimmune thyroid disease	Specific antigen(s) insoluble in the apos; cell-mediated immunity to auto @-@immune thyroid diseases.
8	periapical destructions caused by experimental pulpal inoculation of streptococcus mutans in rats	Toxicol J, Periapical destruction caused by experimental pulpal inoculation of streptococcus mutans in rats.
8	in vitro lymphocyte response to treponema refringens im human syphilis	In vitro lymphocyte response to treponema refringens in human syphilis.
8	evidence for two waves of induction of dna enzymes in stimulated human lymphocytes	There appeared to be two waves of apo; induction of apo; DNA enzymes in stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes from pregnant mice on cultivated tumor cells i specificity nature of effector cells and blocking by serum	Cytotoxic effect of pregnant mouse lymphocytes on cultured tumor cells i effector cell specificity and blockade by serum.
8	a simple method for the elimination of platelets from the lymphocyte platelet mixture by sucrose	Simple procedure; elimination of platelets from lymphocyte platelet mixture by sucrose.
8	studies of the human lymphocyte receptor for heat aggregated or antigen complexed immunoglobulin	Human lymphocyte receptor studies of apos; heat-complexed immunoglobulin or immunoglobulin; antigen.
8	chromosome breakage studies in lymphocytes from normal women pregnant women and women taking oral contraceptives	Lymphocyte chromosomal breakage studies in normal pregnant women and women taking oral contraceptives.
8	abnormal immune responses of bloom s syndrome lymphocytes in vitro	Abnormal immune reactions of flowering syndrome lymphocytes in vitro.
8	in vitro generation of memory lymphocytes reactive to transplantation antigens	In vitro memory lymphocyte generation reactive to transplantation antigens.
8	sialyl residues in hepatitis b antigen their role in determining the life span of the antigen in serum and in eliciting an immunological response	The sialyl residues in the apo antigen; hepatitis b play a role in determining the lifespan of the apo antigen; antigen in serum and apo; obtaining apo; an immunological response.
8	effect of anti beta2 microglobulin on antigen and allogeneic lymphocyte induced proliferation of human lymphocytes	The effect of microglobulin anti-beta2 on antibody and allogenic lymphocytes induced the proliferation of human lymphocytes.
8	lipid composition of plasma membranes from human leukemic lymphocytes	Lipid composition of the plasma membranes of human leukemic lymphocytes.
8	heritability of the phytohemagglutinin responsiveness of lymphocytes and its relationship to leukemogenesis	Heritability of reactivity of lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin and its relation to leukemogenesis.
8	some properties of a dna unwinding protein unique to lymphocytes from chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Some of the protein-depleting DNA, unique to chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes, is unique to lymphocytes.
8	dna dependent rna polymerase levels during the response of human peripheral lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	Level of apos-dependent rna polymerase; DNA during response of human peripheral lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
8	functional subclasses of t lymphocytes bearing different ly antigens ii cooperation between subclasses of ly cells in the generation of killer activity	Under-functional classes of t-cells carrying different antigens ly ii cooperation between ly cell classes in the generation of killer activity.
8	contact sensitivity in vitro ii the effect of beryllium preparations on the proliferative responses of specifically allergised lymphocytes and normal lymphocytes stimulated with pha	The effect of beryllium preparations on the proliferative responses of specifically allergenized lymphocytes and pha-stimulated normal lymphocytes.
8	the properities of lymphocytes which carry immunologic memory of phix 174	The properties of lymphocytes that carry the phix's immunological memory are not known.
8	the yield of chromosomal aberrations in rabbit lymphocytes after irradiation in vitro and in vivo	The yield of chromosomal aberrations in rabbit lymphocytes after in vitro and in vivo irradiation experiments.
8	suppression of maternal responsiveness to paternal antigen by maternal plasma	The suppression of antigen responsiveness of the mother to paternal antigen by maternal plasma.
8	tolerance and contact sensitivity to dnfb in mice iv desensitization as a manifestation of increased proliferation of sensitized cells	Tolerance and sensitivity to dnfb contact in desensitized iv mice as a result of increased proliferation of sensitized cells.
8	characterization of immunoglobulin bearing and other small lymphocytes in mouse bone marrow by sedimentation and electrophoresis	Characterization of the presence of immunoglobulins and other small lymphocytes in the mouse bone marrow by sedimentation and electrophoresis.
8	concanavalin a receptors on the surface membrane of lymphocytes from patient s with hodgkin s disease and other malignant lymphomas	Concanavalin has surface membrane receptors in lymphocytes from patients with Hodgkin's disease and other malignant lymphomas.
8	biologic and antigenic similarity of virus induced migration inhibition factor to conventional lymphocyte derived migration inhibition factor	Biological and antigenic similarity of dapos factor; inhibition of viral-induced migration with dapos factor; inhibition of traditional lymphocyte-derived migration.
8	phytohemagglutinin committed lymphocytes the mitotic activity of the phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes	Phytohemagglutinin gave rise to l&apos lymphocytes, a mitotic activity of phytohemagglutinin that stimulated lymphocytes.
8	hl a ld lymphocyte defined typing a rapid assay with primed lymphocytes	A lymphocyte defined the typing of apos; a rapid test with activated lymphocytes.
8	detection of canine kidney allograft rejection with 51cr labeled lymphocytes	Identification of Canine Kidney Allograft Rejection with 51cr Markled Lymphocytes.
8	asymptomatic liver disease in hepatitis b antigen carriers	Asymptomatic hepatic infection in hepatitis B carriers; antigen; hepatitis B.
8	a cytotoxic factor released from unactivated human lymphocytes	Cytotoxic factor released from inactivated human lymphocytes.
8	multiple protein kinases from human lymphocytes identification enzymes phosphorylating exogenous histon and casein	Multiple protein kinases from apo; apo enzymes; identification of human lymphocytes phosphorylating apo; exogenous histone; and casein.
8	excision repair in lymphocytes of psoriasis author s transl	Repair of apos; excision in psoriasis lymphocytes.
8	a technique for separation of canine lymphocytes and their use in the lymphocytotoxic blastogenic and rosette assys	A technique for separating canine lymphocytes from their use in blastogenic and rosette lymphocytotoxic assays.
8	differences in the sensitivity of tumor cells and normal lymphocytes toward lysis by alloantibodies and guinea pig or rabbit complement	Differences in the susceptibility of normal lymphocytes and tumor cells to lysis by alloantibodies and guinea pig or rabbit complement.
8	appparent familial multiple sclerosis in three generations report of a family with histocompatibility antigen typing	A related family of three generations of multiple sclerosis reported a family with antigen; apos; histocompatibility was typified.
8	distribution of cytoplasmic vacuoles in blood t and b lymphocytes in two lysosomal disorders	Distribution of cytoplasmic vacuoles in blood t- and b-lymphocytes in two lysosomal disorders.
8	lymphocyte in chronic lymphatic leukemia	Lymphocytes in chronic lymphatic leukemia.
8	immunosuppressive effect of a human serum ferroprotein of hepatic origin alpha 2 h globulin study on blastic transformation of normal lymphocytes in the presence of phytohemagglutinin	Immunosuppressive effect of apos; a human serum ferroprotein study; hepatic origin alpha 2 h globulin on the blast transformation of normal lymphocytes in the presence of phytohemagglutinin.
8	the possible utilization of nuclear pockets of lymphocytes in the diagnosis of enzootic bovine leucosis	L' possible use of nuclear packs of lymphocytes in diagnosis of enzootic bovine leukosis.
8	comparison of results of isolating lymphocytes with ficoll plus ronpacon and with gelatin	Comparison of apo results; lymphocyte isolation with ficoll plus purple and with gelatin.
8	chromosomal aberrations in peripheral lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis author s transl	Chromosome aberrations in peripheral lymphocytes of MS patients.
8	surface immunoglobulin of guinea pig leukaemic lymphocytes	L' guinea pig leukemic lymphocyte surface immunoglobulin.
8	an investigation of the characteristics of a negative pion beam by means of induced chromosome aberration in human peripheral blood lymphocytes	A study of the characteristics of apo; negative-ion bundle using apo; induced chromosomal aberration in human peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	studies on the production of anti human lymphocyte serum als in bulls	Studies on production of anti-human lymphocyte serum antibody in bulls.
8	lymphocytes roles in cellular immunity and humoral immunity	Lymphocytes play a role in cellular and humoral immunity.
8	role of a non committed accessory cell in the in vivo suppression of a syngeneic tumour by immune lymphocytes	An accessory cell not engaged in in vivo suppression of apos; a syngenic tumour by immune cells.
8	an assay of biological dosimetry from the changed number of lymphocytes and hypersegmented neutrophiles evaluated by means of statistical decision method	Biological dosimetry test based on the modified number of hyper-separated neutrophils and lymphocytes, using a statistical decision method.
8	lymphocyte response to hepatitis b surface antigen findings in hepatitis and indian childhood cirrhosis	Lymphocyte reaction to discovery of apo; surface antigen of apo; hepatitis b in apo; childhood hepatitis and cirrhosis in India.
8	b lymphocytes lacking surface ig in patients with immune deficiency initiation of ig synthesis in culture in cells of a patient with thymoma	Surface-free b lymphocytes in immunocompromised patients initiate eig synthesis in cultured cells; a patient with apo; a thymoma.
8	surface structure of the macrophages and lymphocytes in their interaction under conditions of antigenic stimulation observed with the scanning electron microscope	Surface structure of macrophages and lymphocytes in their interaction under conditions of scanning electron microscopic antigen stimulation.
8	induction of 16alpha hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes	Induction of 16alpha hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	surface proteins of thymus derived lymphocytes and bone marrow derived lymphocytes selective isolation of immunoglobulin and the theta antigen by non ionic detergents	The surface proteins of thymus-derived lymphocytes and bone marrow-derived lymphocytes selectively isolate l-apos; immunoglobulin and l-apos; antigen theta by non-ionic detergents.
8	fractionation of functional lymphocytes sensitized to basic encephalitogen on derivatized collagen and gelatin gels	Fractionation of functional lymphocytes sensitized to basic collagen gelatin-derived encephalitogen.
8	regulation of the release of colony stimulating activity from mitogen stimulated lymphocytes	The regulation of l&apos release; mitogen-stimulated lymphocyte colony-stimulating activity.
8	stimulator t cells involvement in the induction of cell mediated cytotoxicity	Stimulatory t cells intervene in cell-mediated cytotoxicity induction.
8	kinetic studies of circulating lymphocytes in malignant lymphatic disease using the impulse cytophotometer	Kinetic studies of circulating lymphocytes in cases of malignant lymphatic disease; assistance; impulse cytophotometer.
8	human antibody dependent cellular cytotoxicity isolation and identification of a subpopulation of peripheral blood lymphocytes which kill antibody coated autologous target cells	Isolation of human antibody-dependent cellular cytotoxicity and identification of a sub@-@ population of peripheral blood lymphocytes that kill antibody-coated autologous target cells.
8	effects of cytotoxic immunosuppressants on tuberculin sensitive lymphocytes in guinea pigs	Effects of cytotoxic immunosuppressants on tuberculin-sensitive lymphocytes in the guinea pig.
8	comparative study of the ultrastructure of immune and normal phytohemagglutinin treated lymphocytes	Comparative study of apos; ultrastructure of immune and normal lymphocytes treated with phyto-hemagglutinin.
8	ultrastructural relationships between decidua trophoblast and lymphocytes at the beginning of human pregnancy	Ultrastructural relationships between trophoblast decidua and lymphocytes in early human pregnancy.
8	characteristics of a cytotoxic human lymphocyte dependent antibody	A cytotoxic antibody dependent on human lymphocytes.
8	high terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase activity in a new t cell line rpmi 8402 of acute lymphoblastic leukemia origin	Terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase activity elevated in a novel tpmi cell line 8402 d' acute lymphoblastic origin.
8	thymosin induced increase in e rosette forming capacity of lymphocytes in patients with malignant neoplasms	Thymosin treatment induced an increased ability of lymphocytes to form rosette e in patients with malignant neoplasms.
8	cytotoxic lymphocytes from normal donors a functional marker of human non t lymphocytes	Cytotoxic lymphocytes from normal blood donors are a functional marker of non-t human lymphocytes.
8	in vitro reactivity of lymphocytes obtained from uraemic patients maintained by heamodialysis	In vitro reactivity of lymphocytes obtained from heamodialysis uremic patients.
8	effect of dimethylbenzanthracene on lymphocytes of the peripheral blood in man	Effect of dimethylbenzanthracene on peripheral blood lymphocytes in humans.
8	induction of t cell differentiation in the bursa of fabricius by a soluble thymus factor	Induced differentiation of the t cells in the fabricius bursa by a soluble thymus factor.
8	physicochemical characterization of chemotatic lymphokines produced by human t and b lymphocytes	Physico-chemical characterization of chemotactic lymphokines produced by human t- and b-cells.
8	the expression of theta like antigen by rat peripheral lymphocytes serologic and functional studies	L' expression of antigens of theta by rat peripheral lymphocytes in serological and functional studies.
8	suppressor cell control of unresponsiveness to experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	The cellular suppressor control of the non-response to experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	in vitro production of ige by lymphocytes from a patient with hyperimmunoglobulinaemia e eosinophilia and increased lymphocytes carrying surface ige	In vitro production of eosinophilia by apo-cell lymphocytes; a patient with apo-cell abnormalities; hyperimmune globulinemia and apo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo-blo.
8	an absolute requirement for serum macromolecules in phytohaemagglutinin induced human lymphocyte dna synthesis	The synthesis of human lymphocyte DNA is induced by an absolute requirement for serum macromolecules in phytohemagglutinin.
8	activation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by concanavalin a dependence of monocytes	Concanavalin activation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes, dependence of monocytes on concanavalin @-@.
8	ultrastructural investigations on the lysosomal system of lymph node lymphocytes in transplantation immunity	Ultrastructural studies on the lysosomal system of lymphocytes in the lymph nodes in the apos; immunity to transplantation.
8	depressed lymphocyte function after measles mumps rubella vaccination	Decreased lymphocyte function following vaccination against mumps rubella.
8	lymphocyte associated antigens in patients with alveolar cell carcinoma	Lymphocyte-associated antigen in patients with alveolar carcinoma.
8	migration inhibition of peritoneal cells and pha lymphocyte toxicity in rats during methylcholanthrene carcinogenesis	Inhibition of peritoneal cell migration and pha-cell toxicity in rats during methylcholanthrene carcinogenesis.
8	effect of oil attached bcg cell wall on the kinetics of lymphocytes in the tumor draining node	Effect of apos; oil attached to bcg cell wall on lymphocyte kinetics in the draining ganglion of the tumour.
8	unscheduled dna synthesis in human lymphocytes treated with neocarzinostatin	Unprogrammed synthesis of DNA in neocarzinostatin-treated human lymphocytes.
8	histocompatibility testing in dogs ii leukocyte typing in relation to the mixed lymphocyte culture mlc reactivity	Dapos tests; dog histocompatibility; and leukocyte typing in relation to the mlc reactivity of mixed-cell cultures.
8	relative genetic efficiency of 50 me v protons as derived from analyses of chromosome anomalies in human lymphocytes	The relative genetic efficiency of 50-m-old protons has been determined from DNA analysis; chromosomal abnormalities in human lymphocytes.
8	radiation induced chromosome aberrations in human peripheral lymphocytes exposure to x rays or protons	The radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in the peripheral human lymphocytes exposed to X-rays or protons.
8	role of the regional lymph node in neoplasia cellular mediated reactivity in vitro by autologous regional or distant lymph nodes or peripheral blood lymphocytes of dogs with spontaneous neoplasms	Role of the regional lymph node in the in vitro neoplastic cell-mediated responsiveness of autologous distal or regional lymph nodes or peripheral blood lymphocytes in spontaneously neoplastic dogs.
8	increased lymphocyte mediated destruction of tumor cells in microcytotoxicity assays seen after addition of inhibitors of protein synthesis	Increased tumour cell destruction by lymphocyte intermediates in microcytotoxicity assays was observed after the addition of protein synthesis inhibitors.
8	tissue factor activity of cultured human lymphocytes	Tissue factor activity of cultured human lymphocytes.
8	massive polyclonal hyperimmunoglobulinemia e eosinophilia and increased ige bearing lymphocytes	Massive polyclonal hyperimmunoglobulinemia and eosinophilia and increase of snow lymphocytes.
8	relationship between sterol synthesis and dna synthesis in phytohemagglutinin stimulated mouse lymphocytes	The relationship between sterol synthesis and biosynthesis; DNA in phytohemagglutinin stimulates mouse lymphocytes.
8	selective adsorption of immune lymphocytes synthesizing dna on corresponding target cells	Selective adsorption of immune cells synthesizing DNA from the corresponding target cells.
8	radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes after partial body exposure to 60co gamma irradiation and in vitro exposure to 230 kv x irradiation	The radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes following partial body exposure to 60-co gamma irradiation and in vitro exposure to 230-kv x-rays.
8	isolation and electrophoretic characteristics of 3 lymphocyte populations of normal human blood	Isolation and electrophoretic characteristics of three normal human blood lymphocyte populations.
8	studies on n5 methyltetrahydrofolate homocystein methyltransferase in normal and leukemia leukocytes	Methyltetrahydrofolate homocysteine methyltransferase n5 studies in normal and leukemic leukocytes.
8	human lymphocytes 5 nucleotidase positive and negative subpopulations	Human lymphocytes 5 under-nucleotidase populations positive and negative.
8	radiosensitivity of sensitized and nonsensitized human lymphocytes evaluated in vitro	Sensitized and non-sensitized human lymphocytes evaluated in vitro for radiation sensitivity.
8	the blood xylose test in childhood correlation between 1 hour blood xylose levels and numbers of intraepithelial lymphocytes in intestinal mucosa in celiac disease	Blood xylose test in childhood correlation between 1 hour xylose blood levels and number of intraepithelial lymphocytes in coeliac mucosa.
8	experimental production of granulomatous pneumonitis comparison of immunological and morphological sequelae with particulate and soluble antigens administered via the respiratory route	Experimental production of granulomatous pneumonia, comparison of immunological and morphological sequelae with particulate and soluble respiratory antigens.
8	investigations concerning the fixation of hepatitis b antigen hbag on peripheral lymphocytes and isolated hepatocytes in patients with inflammatory liver diseases author s transl	Hepatic antigen of the liver; hepatitis b in peripheral lymphocytes and isolated hepatocytes in patients with inflammatory liver disease.
8	very short lived and stable mrnas from resting human lymphocytes	Stable, very short-lived mnas of resting human lymphocytes.
8	increased cellular levels of spermidine or spermine are required for optimal dna synthesis in lymphocytes activated by concanavalin a	An increase in cellular spermidine or spermine levels is required for optimal synthesis of DNA in concanavalin a-activated lymphocytes.
8	t rosette assay in vitro correlate of cellular immunity	T Rosette in vitro test correlated with immunos; cell immunity.
8	two stages in lymphocyte mediator production by differential susceptibility to blockade using niridazole	Two stages in the production of lymphocyte mediators by differential susceptibility to niridazole-assisted blockade.
8	studies on the behavior of lymphocytes in the direct lymphocytotoxicity test dlt in surgical patients ii dynamics of immunological reactivity in selected cases	Studies of lymphocyte behaviour in the direct lymphocytotoxicity test dlt in surgical patients ii immune reactivity dynamics in selected cases.
8	morphological changes in maternal lymphocytes in pregnancy	Morphological changes in pregnant maternal lymphocytes.
8	in vitro lymphocyte reactivity and t cell levels in patients with melanoma correlations with clinical and pathological stage	Lymphocyte reactivity in vitro and t-cell levels in patients with a correlation to the clinical and pathological stage of melanoma.
8	production of mif like supernatants by rheumatoid arthritis lymphocytes stimulated by immunoglobulin g	Production of mif-like supernatants by apos-stimulated rheumatoid polyarthritis lymphocytes; immunoglobulin g.
8	study of the effects of antigammaglobulin factors on lymphocytes from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Study of the effects of antigammaglobulin factors on the lymphocytes of patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	a case of impaired chemotaxis and lymphocyte transformation	One case; altered chemotaxis and lymphocyte transformation.
8	immunoglobulin synthesis in vitro by cerebrospinal fluid cells in patients with meningoencephalitis of presumed viral origin	Synthesis of immunoglobulins in vitro by cerebrospinal fluid cells-spinal cord in patients with meningo-encephalitis d' presumed viral origin.
8	contamination of anti immunoglobulin reagents with antibodies to beta 2 microglobulin and other unrelated antigens effects on immunofluorescence staining of human lymphocytes	Contamination of anti--immunoglobulin reagents with antibodies to microglobulin beta 2 and d' other unrelated antigens that have effects on the immunofluorescence staining of human lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of normal lymphocytes with autologous lymphoid cell lines properties of derived killer cells	Stimulation of normal lymphocytes with autologous properties of derived killer cell lines.
8	capacity of sera from patients with mammary carcinoma to promote pha stimulation of human lymphocytes	The ability of sera from patients with breast cancer to enhance pha stimulation of human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic mechanisms detected in vitro following sheep renal allografts	Cytotoxic mechanisms detected in vitro following sheep-induced renal allografts.
8	rhesus lymphocyte alloantigens iii identification of new antigens	Rh lymphocyte heloantigen iii identification of novel antigens.
8	elution and characterization of lymphocytes from rheumatoid inflammatory tissue	Elution and characterization of the rheumatoid inflammatory tissue lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in the cerebrospinal fluid and peripheral blood in patients with multiple sclerosis	Under-population of cerebrospinal fluid lymphocytes-spinal fluid and peripheral blood in MS patients.
8	quantitative studies of lymphocytes and other cell populations in the bone marrow of neonatally thymectomized c3h mice	Quantitative studies of lymphocytes and dapos; other neonatal c3h thymectomized bone marrow cell populations.
8	in vitro effect of methylprednisolone on protein synthesis of activated canine thymus derived lymphocytes	The in vitro effect of methylprednisolone on protein synthesis in lymphocytes derived from activated canine thymus.
8	the assessment of histocompatibility by mixed lymphocyte reaction as measured by the macrophage electrophoretic mobility mem test	Lapos; assessment of apos; mixed lymphocyte response histocompatibility as measured by the mem electrophoretic mobility test of macrophages.
8	anti hl a7 lymphocyte dependent antibody	Lymphocyte dependent antibody-hl a7.
8	direct cell mediated lympholysis by peripheral blood lymphocytes from renal allograft recipients	Direct cell-mediated lympholysis by peripheral blood lymphocytes (BLCs) of kidney transplant recipients.
8	ultrastructural comparison of the cell coat in normal and chronic lymphocytic leukaemic blood lymphocytes by concanavalin a labelling and cationic staining	Ultrastructural comparison of apos; cell envelope in normal and chronic lymphocytic leukemic blood lymphocytes by concanavalin, labelling and cationic staining.
8	morphological studies on allergen induced blast transformation of sensitized lymphocytes	Allergen morphological studies induced blastic transformation of sensitized lymphocytes.
8	correlation between incorporation of myo 2 3h inositol into the phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes and disability degree stage and duration of multiple sclerosis	Integration of myo 2 h inositol into lymphocyte phosphatidylinositol and stage of degree of apos; disability and duration of multiple sclerosis.
8	the fine structure of the lymphocyte nucleus under conditions of phytohaemagglutinin stimulation	The fine structure of the lymphocyte nucleus under phytohemagglutinin-stimulated conditions.
8	in vitro dna synthesis in lymphocytes from turkeys vaccinated with lasota tc and inactivated newcastle disease vaccines	In Vitro Synthesis of DNA in turkey lymphocytes vaccinated with tc lasota and inactivated Newcastle disease vaccines.
8	increased lymphocyte atp ase activity in patients with carcinomas of the oral cavity and larynx	Increased liver function; activity of the liver; lymphocyte atps in patients with oral cavity and laryngeal carcinoma.
8	anitroxide sterol derivative potently modifies cholesterol biosynthesis by normal and neoplastic guinea pig lymphocytes	The sterol derivative of l' anitroxide strongly modifies cholesterol biosynthesis by guinea pig normal and neoplastic lymphocytes.
8	influence of serum blocking factors on cancer patients undergoing immunotherapy	L' influence of serum blocking factors on immunotherapy-treated cancer patients.
8	damaged dna in lymphocytes of aplastic anemia	DNA from lymphocytes with apos; aplastic anemia was damaged.
8	decrease and altered distribution of human t antigen on chronic lymphatic leukemia cells of t type suggesting a clonal origin	Decreased and altered distribution of the human tantigen on t-type chronic lymphatic leukemia cells, suggesting a clonal origin.
8	cellular composition of the nipple aspirate specimen of breast fluid i the benign cells	Cellular composition of the apo; breast-fluid sample drawn by benign cells.
8	dna synthesis of lymphocytes in hyperthyroid and euthyroid subjects effect of 131i therapy on hyperthyroidism	Lymphocyte DNA Synthesis in Hyperthyroid and Euthyroid Patients Effect of 131i therapy on apos; hyperthyroidism.
8	electronmicroscopic and immunohistochemical studies on human lymphocytes	Electron microscopy and immunohistochemistry studies in human lymphocytes.
8	influence of prednisone and cytostatics on human blood b t and o lymphocytes in diseases	L' influence of prednisone and cytostatics on lymphocytes b t and o of human blood in disease.
8	antibody dependent and direct lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in patients on hemodialysis	Antibody-dependent and directly lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in hemodialysis patients.
8	the influence of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and macrophages on the growth of lymphocytes and fibroblasts in vitro	L' the influence of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and macrophages on lymphocyte and fibroblast growth in vitro.
8	intracellular immunoglobulin production in vitro by lymphocytes from patients with hypogammaglobulinaemia and their effect on normal lymphocytes	The production of intracellular immunoglobulins in vitro by lymphocytes from patients with apos; hypogamaglobulinemia and their effects on normal lymphocytes.
8	investigations of the t and b cells and the hemopexin carrying lymphocytes in cases of porphyria cutanea tarda author s transl	T-cell, b-cell, and haemopexin-carrying lymphocytes in cases of skin porphyria took a long time to translate.
8	immunologic heterogeneity of the lymphocyte surface in various diseases	Immunological surface heterogeneity of lymphocytes in various diseases.
8	co operation between macrophages and a factor from lymphocytes in tumor lysis in vitro	Cooperation between the macrophages and a lymphocyte factor in in vitro tumor lysis.
8	mixed lymphocyte reactivity of human lymphocytes primed in vitro i secondary response to allogenic lymphocytes	Mixed lymphocyte reactivity of human lymphocytes, initiated in vitro, i secondary response to allogeneic lymphocytes.
8	analysis of human thymocyte subpopulations using discontinuous gradients of albumin precursor lymphocytes in human thymus	Sub-human thymocyte populations at baseline; aid in discontinuous gradients of precursor lymphocytes; albumin in human thymus.
8	separation of complement dependent and lymphocyte dependent cytotoxic activity in human sera	Lipocyte separation; complement- and lacid-dependent cytotoxic activity; lymphocyte-dependent activity in human serum.
8	participation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes in the production of macrophage migration inhibitory factor	Participation of immunoglobulin-carrying lymphocytes in the production of inhibitory factor for macrophage migration.
8	determination of the nucleolar coefficient in lymphocytes in chemotherapeutically treated patients with ovarian carcinoma	Determination of the nucleolar coefficient in lymphocytes of patients with the disease; an ovarian carcinoma treated chemotherapeutically.
8	effect of cyclic nucleotides on the transformation and proliferation of lymphocytes	The effect of cyclic nucleotides on lymphocyte transformation and proliferation.
8	reactivity of lymphocytes from patients with syphilis towards t pallidum antigen in the leucocyte migration and lymphocyte transformation tests	Lymphocytes from patients with syphilis are reactive to the apos; antigen pallidum in leukocyte migration and lymphocyte transformation tests.
8	inhibition of haemopoietic stem cells by syngeneic lymphocytes treated with antilymphocyte serum	L' inhibition of hematopoietic stem cells by syngenic lymphocytes treated with anti-lymphocyte serum.
8	experimental murine leprosy 8 ultrastructural features of the inflammatory exudate and bacterial morphology in c3h and c57bl mice after foot pad inoculation with mycobacterium lepraemurium	Experimental murine 8 ultrastructural characteristics of inflammatory exudate and bacterial morphology in c3h and c57bl mice after inoculation of lepraemurium mycobacteria into plantar pads.
8	the response of lymphocytes to phytohaemagglutinin in women with pre eclampsia	Phytohaemagglutinin in women with preclampsia.
8	plasma inhibitors of lymphocyte response to phytohaemagglutinin in children with recurrent infections	Plasma inhibitors of lymphocyte response to phyto-hemagglutinin in children with chronic lymphocyte insufficiency; recurrent infections.
8	t and cr lymphocyte profile in leprosy and the effect of treatment	T and lymphocyte pattern in leprosy and lupus; effect of treatment.
8	the rate of sister chromatid exchanges parallel to spontaneous chromosome breakage in fanconi s anemia and to trenimon induced aberrations in human lymphocytes and fibroblasts	The rate of sister chromatid exchange parallels spontaneous chromosome breakage in the apos; fanconi anemia and trenimon-induced aberrations in human lymphocytes and fibroblasts.
8	effect of cortisol on the ultrastructure of normal leukemic and cultured human lymphocytes	Cortisol effect on the ultrastructure of normal leukemic and cultured human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte stimualtion by a mammary carcinoma assoicated glycoprotein	Lymphocyte stimulation by breast carcinoma with specific glycoprotein.
8	effect of blood serum from schizophrenic patients and from normal donors on dna synthesis in lymphocytes	Effect of blood serum in schizophrenic patients and normal donors on DNA synthesis in lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic action of immune lymphocytes on adherent cells macrophages of autologous system lymph nodes during delayed hypersensitivity	Cytotoxic action of immune lymphocytes on autologous lymph node adherent cell macrophages during delayed hypersensitivity.
8	mesenchymal reaction and serum glycoprotein concentration in chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis	Mesenchymal reactivity and serum glycoprotein concentration in hepatic chronic hepatitis and cirrhosis.
8	tumour associated lymphocyte cytotoxicity superimposed on spontaneous cytotoxicity in melanoma patients	Tumour-associated lymphocyte cytotoxicity overlaps spontaneous cytotoxicity in melanoma.
8	sequential in vitro reactivity of lymphocytes from melanoma patients receiving immunotherapy compared with the reactivity of lymphocytes from healthy donors	The in vitro sequential responsiveness of lymphocytes from immunotherapy-treated melanoma patients is comparable to the responsiveness of lymphocytes from healthy donors.
8	in vitro monitoring of cadaver kidney donor pretreatment by lymphocyte culture	In vitro monitoring of pretreatment of cadaver kidney donors by lymphocyte culture.
8	spontaneous rosette formation by lymphocytes differential effect of cytochalasin b on thymocytes and thymus related peripheral blood lymphocytes in the guinea pig	Spontaneous lymphocyte rosette formation has a differential effect of cytochalasin b on thymocytes and peripheral blood lymphocytes related to the thymus in the guinea pig.
8	appearance of epstein barr virus nuclear antigen in human cordblood lymphocytes	Lapses; appearance of epstein virus nuclear antigen barred in human cord blood lymphocytes.
8	mixed lymphocyte culture stimulatory and responding capacity of lymphocytes from patients with lymphoproliferative diseases	Lymphocytes from patients with lymphoproliferative disease (LPD) have the ability to stimulate and respond to mixed lymphocyte culture.
8	immunological studies in patients with chronic active hepatitis cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes to autochthonous liver cells grown in tissue culture	Immunological studies in tissue cultured native hepatic cells in patients with chronic active hepatic cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes.
8	the immunological capacity of peripheral lymphocytes in a blast transformation system using frozen stored cells	The immunological capacity of peripheral lymphocytes in an explosion-mediated transformation system using stored frozen cells.
8	binding of c reactive protein to antigen induced but not mitogen induced t lymphoblasts	The binding of reactive protein c to the n&apos-induced lymphoblast t is not induced by mitogen.
8	secondary cytotoxic allograft responses in vitro ii differentiation of memory t cells into cytotoxic t lymphocytes in the absence of cell proliferation	Secondary reactions d' cytotoxic allografts in vitro ii differentiation of memory t cells into cytotoxic lymphocytes in absence of cell proliferation.
8	diamond blackfan syndrome lymphocyte mediated suppression of erythropoiesis	Diamond blackfan lymphocyte suppression mediation; erythropoiesis.
8	ultrastructural and immunofluorescent studies of the replication of herpesvirus saimiri in cultured lymphocytes of infected owl monkeys	Ultrastructural and immunofluorescent studies of the replication of saimiri herpesviruses and apos in cultured lymphocytes of infected owl monkeys.
8	cell mediated lympholysis in vitro independence of mixed lymphocyte reactions and t cell mitogen responses from the in vitro generation of cytotoxic effectors in primary immunodeficiency diseases	In vitro cell-mediated lympholysis Mixed lymphocyte reactions and t-cell mitogen responses independent of in vitro generation of cytotoxic agents in primary immunodeficiency diseases.
8	immunological responsiveness of frozen thawed human lymphocytes	Immunologic reactivity of frozen and thawed human lymphocytes.
8	quantitation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes and the lymphocyte response to pha in experimental pyelonephritis	Quantification of lymphocytes carrying immunoglobulin and response to pha in experimental pyelonephritis.
8	effect of vincristine on sister chromatid exchanges of normal human lymphocytes	Effect of vincristine on sister chromatid exchange in normal human lymphocytes.
8	elaboration of pyrimidine specific nucleosidases by human lymphoblastoid cells of established cultures	The development of pyrimidine-specific nucleosidases by human lymphoblastoid cells from established cultures.
8	immunologic mechanisms in hepatitis b assayed by antigen binding lymphocytes	Immunologic mechanisms of the apos; hepatitis b tested by lymphocytes binding the antigen.
8	studies on the lymphocytes of sheep i recirculation of lymphocytes through peripheral lymph nodes and tissues	Sheep lymphocyte studies i lymphocyte recirculation in the lymph nodes and peripheral lymphatic tissues.
8	studies on the lymphocytes of sheep ii some properties of cells in various compartments of the recirculating lymphocyte pool	Sheep lymphocyte studies ii certain cell properties in various compartments of the recirculating lymphocyte pool.
8	lymphocyte stimulation by soluble subcellular fractions	Lymphocyte stimulation by soluble subcellular fractions.
8	marrow grafts between canine litter mates homozygous or heterozygous for lymphocyte defined histocompatibility antigens	Marrow transplants between canine litter partners are homozygous or heterozygous for the lymphocyte-defined antigen.
8	suppressor cell activity after concanavalin a treatment of lymphocytes from normal donors	L' suppressive cell activity after normal donor lymphocyte treatment with concanavalin.
8	binding of components of the properdin system to cultured human lymphoblastoid cells and b lymphocytes	Binding of the propellin system components to cultured human lymphoblastoid cells and b lymphocytes.
8	membrane permeability in normal human lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphatic leukaemia	Membrane permeability in normal human lymphocytes and lymphocytes in patients with chronic lymphatic leukemia.
8	antibody dependent direct cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes ii studies on peripheral blood lymphocytes synovial fluid cells and sera from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Direct antibody-dependent cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes ii studies of peripheral blood lymphocyte synovial fluid (PLC) cells and serum from patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	surface immunoglobulins of lymphocytes in plasmacytoma v the effect of rna rich extract from mouse plasmacytoma mopc 104e on the immune response	Lymphocyte surface immunoglobulins in the plasmacytome; effect of apos; rich extract from the mopc 104 plasmacytome of mice on immune response.
8	inhibition of macrophage lymphocyte interaction by cytochalasin b during antigen recognition by t lymphocytes	L' inhibition of apos; interaction between macrophages and lymphocytes by cytochalasin b during apos recognition; antigen by t lymphocytes.
8	lymphoid cell subpopulations ii characterization of cell populations responsible for syngery in the mixed lymphocyte interaction	Sub-lymphoid cell populations ii Characterization of syntax-causing cell populations in the apos; mixed lymphocytic interaction.
8	t lymphocyte enriched murine peritoneal exudate cells i a reliable assay for antigen induced t lymphocyte proliferation	Murine lymphocytes enriched with dapos cells; peritoneal peritoneal exudate a reliable assay of antigen-induced t-cell proliferation.
8	effect of anti ia sera on mixed lymphocyte reaction in mice	Effect of anti-ia serum on mixed lymphocyte response in mouse.
8	adoptive transfer of tumor immunity between twins by in vitro immunized nodal macrophages and lymphocytes reversal of serum enhancement	Adoptional transmission of apo; tumour immunity between twins via in vitro immunized nodal macrophages and reverse apo lymphocytes; serum augmentation.
8	terminal transferase in human bone marrow lymphocytes	Terminal transferase in human bone marrow lymphocytes?
8	lack of synergistic effect between x ray and uv irradiation on the frequency of chromosome aberrations in pha stimulated human lymphocytes in the g1 stage	Absence of apo; synergistic effect between X-rays and apo; UV irradiation on frequency of chromosomal aberrations in pha stimulated human lymphocytes at the g1 stage.
8	ferritin synthesis in lymphocytes polymorphs and monocytes	Ferritin synthesis in polymorphic lymphocytes and monocytes.
8	the blocking effect of conditioned media from tumour cell cultures on the lysis of target cells by immune lymphocytes and macrophages	L' blocking effect of conditioned media from tumor cell cultures on target cell lysis by macrophages and immune cells.
8	long term effects of radiation of t and b lymphocytes in peripheral blood of patients with hodgkin s disease	Long-term effects of radiation from lymphocytes (t and b) in peripheral blood of patients with Hodgkin's disease.
8	the lysosomal enzymes of lymphocytes in the premature and the term infant	Lysosomal lymphocyte enzymes in premature infants and term infants.
8	activation of purified human t cells by mitogens diminished mitogen induced deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in human t cells compared with autologous peripheral blood lymphocytes	Activation of mitogen-purified human t-cells decreased mitogen-induced deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in human t-cells compared with autologous peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	reactive and nonreactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis i possible role of macrophage lymphocyte interactions	Reactive and non-reactive lymphocytes in the immune system; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis i possible role of macrophage-lymphocyte interactions.
8	acridine orange fluorescence cytochemistry for detecting lymphocyte immunoreactivity	Orange acridine, fluorescence cytochemistry to detect lymphos; lymphocyte immunoreactivity.
8	some properties of the mitogenic factor induced in human lymphocytes under the influence of phytohemagglutinin	Certain properties of mitogenic factor are induced in human lymphocytes under the influence of phytohemagglutinin.
8	effect of crude and purified hcg on lymphocyte blastogenesis	Effect of crude and purified hcg on lymphocyte blastogenesis.
8	epstein barr nuclear antigen ebna carrying lymphocytes in human palatine tonsils	The nuclear antigen epstein barr ebna has lymphocytes in human palatine tonsils.
8	variables and specificity of in vitro lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in human melanoma	The variables and specificity of lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in vitro in human melanoma.
8	separation of populations of sensitized lymphoid cells into fractions inhibiting and fractions enhancing syngeneic tumor growth in vivo	Separation of sensitized lymphoid cell populations into growth-promoting and growth-inducing fractions of syngenic tumors in vivo.
8	isolation and partial characterization of agf 1 a rat lymphocyte membrane antigen	Isolation and partial characterization of agf 1, a rat lymphocytic membrane antigen.
8	an improved quantitative plaque assay for lymphocytes bearing antigen specific cell receptors	An improved quantitative plate assay for lymphocytes with specific cellular receptors for antigen.
8	sequential studies of lymphocytes neutrophils and serum proteins during prednisone treatment	Sequential studies of neutrophils and serum lymphocyte proteins during prednisone treatment.
8	identification of camp dependant protein kinases in human lymphocytes	Identification of camp-dependent protein kinases in human lymphocytes.
8	leucocyte migration inhibitory activity of concanavalin a stimulated human lymphocytes modification by dipyridamole lysine acetylsalicylate and heparin	Inhibition of leukocyte migration by concanavalin stimulated the modification of human lymphocytes by dipyridamole lysine acetylsalicylate and l' heparin.
8	the use of nylon fibre as a method of separating human lymphocyte subpopulations	Use of nylon fiber as a method for separation of sub@-@ human lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in normals and patients with rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis	Under-lymphocyte populations in normal subjects and patients with rheumatoid arthritis and spondylosing spondylitis.
8	long term maintenance in vitro of human t cells by repeated exposure to the same stimulator cells differences when using repeated stimulation in allogeneic mixed leukocyte culture and when using stimulation with autologous lymphoblastoid cells	Long-term in vitro maintenance of human t-cells by repeated exposure to the same stimulatory cells, when followed; repeated stimulation in a mixed allogeneic leukocyte culture and when followed; stimulation with autologous lymphoblastoid cells.
8	massive invasion of fetal lymphocytes into the mother s blood at induced abortion	Monster invasion of fetal lymphocytes into the mother's blood at the time of birth; induced abortion.
8	secondary responses of human lymphocytes to alloantigens in vitro	Secondary reactions of human lymphocytes to alloantigen in vitro.
8	inhibition by anti beta2 microglobulin antisera of responder cells and not of stimulator cells in the mixed lymphocyte reaction	Inhibition by microglobulin anti-beta2 antisera of reactive and not stimulatory cells in the mixed lymphocyte response.
8	cytotoxic antibody complicating platelet support in acute leukemia response to chemotherapy	Cytotoxic antibody that complicates the platelet support in acute leukemic chemotherapy response.
8	c1 and human platelets decrease in chronic lymphocyte leukemia effect of lymphocytes	Human platelets and c1 decreased lapos; a chronic leukemic effect of lymphocytes on lymphocytes.
8	failure of nitrous oxide to inhibit transformation of lymphocytes by phytohemagglutinin	Failure of apo; nitrous oxide to inhibit phytohemagglutinin-mediated transformation of lymphocytes.
8	expression and segregation of hl a antigens in d98 ah 2 by lymphocyte and fibroblast hybrids	Expression and segregation of hl a antigen into d98 ah 2 by lymphocytes and hybrid fibroblasts.
8	lymphocyte abnormalities in mycosis fungoides	There are lymphocyte abnormalities in the fungal mycosis.
8	occurrence of lymphocytotoxic lymphocytes and antibodies after corneal transplantation	Lymphocytotoxic antibodies after corneal transplantation.
8	differences in free fatty acid and glucose metabolism of human blood neutrophils and lymphocytes	Differences in the metabolism of free fatty acids and glucose in human blood neutrophils and lymphocytes.
8	in vitro proliferative reactions by lymphocytes from both responder and low responder mice to t g a l	Proliferative in vitro reactions of lymphocytes from response and low-response mice.
8	studies of intestinal lymphoid tissue i electron microscopic evidence of blast transformation in epithelial lymphocytes of mouse small intestinal mucosa	Intestinal lymphoid tissue studies by electron microscopy of mouse small intestine epithelial lymphocyte transformation.
8	relation of antigen binding cells to immunological memory	The relationship between the cells connecting the antigen; antigen and the immune memory.
8	observations in vitro regarding the mechanism of the cell destruction by stimulated lymphocytes	In vitro observations concerning mechanism of cell destruction by stimulated lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte surface attached immunoglobulins in some clinical conditions	The lymphocyte surface fixed the immunoglobulins under certain conditions.
8	the influence of sequential chemotherapy and radiotherapy on mitogen induced lymphocyte transformation in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia	L' influence of sequential chemotherapy and radiation treatment on mitogen-induced lymphocyte transformation in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
8	the effect of changes in dose rate on the yield of chromosome aberrations in human lymphocytes exposed to gamma radiation	L' effect of dose rate changes on the yield of chromosomal aberrations in gamma-exposed human lymphocytes.
8	unusual intranuclear filaments in the circulating lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis and optic neuritis	Unusual intranuclear filaments in the circulating lymphocytes of MS and optic neuritis patients.
8	accelerated expulsion of adult trichinella spiralis in mice given lymphoid cells and serum from infected donors	Accelerated expulsion of adult trichinella spiralis from mice that received lymphoid cells and serum from infected donors.
8	origin of lymphoid lines established from mixed cultures of cord blood lymphocytes and explants from infectious mononucleosis burkitt lymphoma and healthy donors	Origins of lymphoid lines established from mixed cultures of cord blood lymphocytes of umbilical cord and dapos; explants of infectious burkitt lymphoma mononucleosis and healthy donors.
8	antigenic structure of phytohemagglutinin stimulated mouse lymphocytes using specific antisera	The phytohemagglutinin antigenic structure stimulates mouse lymphocytes using specific antisera.
8	t and b cells and cell mediated immunity in mycosis fungoides	Cells t and b and cell-mediated immunity in fungal mycosis.
8	nucleoli of lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of patients with bronchogenic lung and gastrointestinal cancer	Lymphocyte nucleoli in the peripheral blood of patients with bronchogenic or gastro-intestinal cancer.
8	kinetics of intraepithelial lymphocytes in the small intestine of thymus deprived mice and antigen deprived mice	The kinetics of intraepithelial lymphocytes in the small intestine of thymus-deprived and antigen-deprived mice.
8	evidence for suppressor cell activity associated with induction of herpesvirus saimiri induced lymphoma	Evidence of a suppressive cellular activity associated with apos; induction of apos; apos-induced lymphoma; saimiri herpesviruses.
8	the effect of intrauterinely injected lymphocytes prepared from sensitized or non sensitized guinea pigs on the ultrastructure of rat fetal membranes visceral yolk sac	Effect of apo; intra-uterine injection of lymphocytes prepared from sensitized or unsensitized guinea pigs; ultrastructure of the visceral yolk membranes of rat fetuses.
8	demonstration of nucleotide pyrophosphatase and phosphohydrolase activities in normal lymphocyte of balb c mice and absence of these activities in yc8 tumor cells and in lymphocytes of animals with yc8 lymphoma	Demonstration of nucleotide pyrophosphatase and phosphohydrolase activities in normal Berber mouse lymphocytes and their absence in yc8 tumor cells and in lymphocytes from animals with d*apos; lymphoma yc8.
8	in vitro response of bovine thoracic duct lymphocyte to phytohaemagglutinin following adult thymectomy	In vitro reaction of bovine thoracic canal lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin following adult thymectomy.
8	cytotoxic activity of human lymphocyte plasma membranes	Cytotoxic activity of human lymphocyte plasma membranes.
8	double stranded ribonuclease activity in human lymphocyte nuclei	Double-stranded ribonuclease activity in human lymphocyte nuclei.
8	in vitro lymphocyte stimulation by wart antigen in man	Lymphocyte stimulation in vitro by apos; verrue antigen in men.
8	in vitro transforming activity of ebv i establishment and properties of two ebv strains m81 and m72 produced by immortalized callithrix jacchus lymphocytes	In vitro transformative activity of the organism; establishment of ebv i and properties of two strains m81 and m72 of ebv produced by immortalized callithrix jacchus lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis	Cytotoxic lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis.
8	inhibitory activity of medium dialyzed transfer factor on lymphocyte blastogenesis	Dialyzed transfer factor inhibitory activity of the medium on lymphocyte blastogenesis.
8	a comparison of in vitro cell mediated reactivity against syngeneic tumor cells by various lymphoid cell populations from bacillus calmette gu rin tumor cured tumor sensitized tumor bearing and normal inbred guinea pigs	Comparison of in vitro cell-mediated responsiveness to syngenetic tumor cells by various gu rin, tumor-susceptible, and normal inbred guinea pig lymphoid cell populations.
8	genetic control of interindividual variations in the inducibility of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes	Genetic control of interindividual apo variation; apo inducibility; aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte subpopulation in neoplastic and non neoplastic thymus and in blood of patients with myasthenia gravis	Under-lymphocyte population in the neoplastic and non-neoplastic thymus and in the blood of patients with severe myasthenia.
8	concanavalin a activated suppressor cells in normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Concanavalin is an activated suppressant of normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	the repair of x ray induced chromosomal damage in trisomy 2 and normal diploid lymphocytes	The X-ray repair caused chromosomal damage in normal trisomic 2 and diploid lymphocytes.
8	control of pyrimidine biosynthesis in human lymphocytes inhibitory effect of guanine and guanosine on induction of enzymes for pyrimidine biosynthesis de novo in phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes	Control of pyrimidine biosynthesis in human lymphocytes, inhibitory effect of guanine and guanosine on apos; induction of apos; enzymes for de novo biosynthesis of pyrimidine in phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes.
8	permanent lymphoid lines from genetically marked lymphocytes success with lymphocytes recovered from frozen storage	Permanent lymphoid lines of successfully labelled lymphocytes with lymphocytes recovered from the apo; frozen storage.
8	the influence of dissolved oxygen on the mitogen responses of mouse lymphocytes	L' influence of os; dissolved oxygen (DO) on mitogenic responses of mouse lymphocytes.
8	a sensitive micromethod for generating and assaying allogeneically induced cytotoxic human lymphocytes	A sensitive micro-method for generating and testing allogeneically induced cytotoxic human lymphocytes.
8	humoral sensitization in parous women cytotoxic antibodies to non hl a antigens	Humoral sensitization to non-hl a antigens in pregnant women using cytotoxic antibodies.
8	suppressor function of peripheral blood mononuclear cells in normal individuals and in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus	Suppressive functions of peripheral blood cells in normal individuals and in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
8	the migration of lymphocytes across specialized vascular endothelium i the entry of lymphocytes into the isolated mesenteric lymph node of the rat	Lymphocyte migration into the vascular specialized endothelium; lymphocyte entry into the mesenteric lymph node isolated from the rat.
8	cell mediated cytotoxicity against measles virus in sspe ii analysis of cytotoxic effector cells	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against measles virus during apos; cytotoxic effector cell analysis.
8	natural cytotoxic reactivity of human lymphocytes against a myeloid cell line characterization of effector cells	Natural cytotoxic reactivity of human lymphocytes against characterization of epos, a myeloid effector cell line.
8	bidirectional amplification of macrophage lymphocyte interactions enhanced lymphocyte activation factor production by activated adherent mouse peritoneal cells	Lapses; bidirectional amplification of macrophage-lymphocyte interactions increased production of dapo factors; activation of lymphocytes by activated mouse adherent peritoneal cells.
8	rosette plaques with lymphoid cells from heterozygous rabbits ani hapten antibody forming cells displaying either one or both b locus surface allelic markers	Rosette plates containing lymphoid cells from heterozygous rabbits and antibodies to etapos; haptene formed cells that showed one or both allelic surface markers of locus b.
8	effect of lectins on the levels of camp and cgmp in guinea pig lymphocytes early responses of lymph node cells to mitogenic and non mitogenic lectins	Effect of lectins on cgmp and camp levels in guinea pig lymphocytes, early responses of lymph node cells to mitogenic and non mitogenic lectins.
8	specific positive and negative selection of rat lymphocytes reactive to strong histocompatibility antigens activation with alloantigens in vitro and in vivo	Specific positive and negative selection of rat lymphocytes that respond to high antigen activation of apos; alloantigen-compatibility in vitro and in vivo.
8	cell mediated immune response in vitro i the development of suppressor cells and cytotoxic lymphocytes in mixed lymphocyte cultures	In vitro cell-mediated immune response i the development of suppressive cells and cytotoxic lymphocytes in mixed lymphocyte cultures.
8	factor b of the alternative complement pathway on human lymphocytes	A factor b for the alternative pathway of human lymphocyte complement.
8	t cell deficiency in patients with autoimmune hemolytic anemia warm type	T cell carcinoma in patients with apo; auto hemolytic anemia-hot hemolytic immune type.
8	presence of alpha 2 macroglobulin on the membrane of peripheral human blood lymphocytes a new lymphocyte maker	The presence of apos; alpha 2 macroglobulin on the peripheral human blood lymphocyte membrane is a new factor in lymphocytes.
8	peripheral lymphocytes in paraproteinemia	Peripheral lymphocytes in paraprotein.
8	5 nucleotidase activity in leukaemic lymphocytes	L&apos nucleotidase activity is 5 in leukemic lymphocytes.
8	the effects of therapeutic irradiation on lymphocytes and immunity	Effects of apo; therapeutic radiation on lymphocytes and immunity.
8	collagenase production by rheumatoid synovial cells stimulation by a human lymphocyte factor	Collagenase production by human lymphocyte factor stimulation of rheumatoid synovial cells.
8	free ribosomes in physiologically nondividing cells human peripheral lymphocytes	Free ribosomes are found in human peripheral lymphocytes that are physiologically non-divisional.
8	cytochemical characteristics of nucleic acids in the peripheral blood lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis	Cytochemical characteristics of nucleic acids in peripheral blood lymphocytes of MS patients.
8	quantitative ultrastructural autoradiographic studies of iodinated plasma membranes of lymphocytes during segregation and internalization of surface immunoglobulins	Quantitative, ultrastructural autoradiographic studies of iodinated lymphocyte plasma membranes during segregation and l' internalization of surface immunoglobulins.
8	cytotoxic activity of rheumatoid and normal lymphocytes against allogeneic and autologous synovial cells in vitro	Cytotoxic activity of normal and rheumatoid lymphocytes against allogeneic and autologous synovial cells in vitro.
8	b t and null lymphocytes in newborn infants and their mothers	Bt lymphocytes and null lymphocytes in the new @-@born and their mothers.
8	interaction of c reactive protein with lymphocytes and monocytes complement dependent adherence and phagocytosis	L' interaction of reactive protein c with lymphocytes and monocytes completes adhesion; adhesion and phagocytosis.
8	tolerance and contact sensitivity to dnfb in mice vi inhibition of afferent sensitivity by suppressor t cells in adoptive tolerance	Tolerance and sensitivity to dnfb contact in the vi mouse inhibition of afferent sensitivity by suppressive t cells in the adopted tolerance.
8	t lymphocyte precursors i synergy between precursor and mature t lymphocytes in the response to concanavalin a	The precursors of the t i lymphocytes synergistic between precursor and mature t-cells in response to concanavalin a.
8	lymphocyte nucleoli activation as a marker of autoimmune disorder development i observation in nzb mice	L' activation of lymphocyte nucleoli as a marker for the development of auto-disease observed in nzb mice.
8	natural cytotoxic reactivity of rat lymphocytes against syngeneic gross virus induced lymphoma	Natural cytotoxic reactivity of rat lymphocytes against macroscopic syngenic virus-induced lymphoma.
8	lymphocyte plasma membranes vi surface antigens of lymphocytes in chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Plasma membranes of viogenic surface lymphocyte antigens in chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	spontaneous interaction in vitro between lymphocytes and syngeneic peritoneal macrophages of mice	Spontaneous in vitro interaction between lymphocytes and syngeneal macrophages in mice.
8	different effects of phytohemagglutinin activated lymphocytes and their culture supernatants on macrophage function	Various effects of phytohemagglutinin-activated lymphocytes and their culture supernatants on macrophage function were observed.
8	mg2 and ca2 stimulated atpase at the outer surface of human peripheral lymphocytes and hematopoietic cell lines correlation between enzyme activity and immunoglobulin secretion	Both mg2 and ca2 stimulated apos; atpase at the outer surface of human peripheral lymphocytes and hematopoietic cell lines were found to be correlated with apos; enzymatic activity and immunoglobulin secretion.
8	hemihypotrophy in a girl with a translocation t 13q 7p	Hemihypotrophy in a girl with a 13q 7p t translocation.
8	lymphocyte cytotoxicity in alcoholic hepatitis	Cytotoxicity of lymphocytes in alcoholic hepatitis.
8	normal lymphocyte function in the presence of delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol	Lymphocyte function normal in the presence of delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol.
8	immunofluorescent staining of the surfaces of lymphocytes in suspension from patients with dengue hemorrhagic fever	Immunofluorescent staining of suspended lymphocyte surfaces in patients with dengue hemorrhagic fever.
8	fate of antibodies bound to lymphocyte surface i study with complement dependent cytotoxicity indirect immunofluorescence and radiolabelled antibodies	The fate of the lymphocyte surface i-linked antibodies was studied with the complement-dependent cytotoxicity, l' indirect immunofluorescence, and radiolabelled antibodies.
8	effect of supernatant from pha stimulated lymphocyte culture on blastic transformation of peripheral blood lymphocytes in healthy controls and patients with chronic lymphatic leukemia	The effect of pha supernatant has stimulated lymphocyte culture on the blast transformation of peripheral blood lymphocytes in healthy controls and chronic lymphatic leukemia patients.
8	characterization of lymphocyte inhibition by supernatants of crowded lymphocytoblasts	Characterization of apo; lymphocyte inhibition by crowded lymphocytoblast supernatants.
8	interaction of k lymphocytes with myeloma proteins of different igg subclasses	Interaction of k-cells with myeloma proteins from different under-d&apos classes; igg.
8	role of t lymphocytes in the humoral immune response iii lack of influence of antigen charge on the isotype and charge of antibody	Role of t-cells in humoral immune response iii absence of anti-apos; influence of antigenic load on apos; isotype and charge of apos; antibody.
8	sequential examination of lymphocyte proliferative capacity in patients with malignant melanoma receiving bcg immunotherapy	Sequential examination of lymphocyte proliferative capacity in patients with apos; a malignant melanoma receiving immunotherapy bcg.
8	establishment in continuous culture of a new type of lymphocyte from a burkitt like malignant lymphoma line d g 75	Continuous culture Establishment of a new type of lymphocyte from animals; a line of burkitt-type malignant lymphoma.
8	suppressor cells in homograft tolerant rats	Suppressive cells in the etapos-tolerant rats; homograft.
8	in vitro induction of tumor specific immunity ii activation of cytotoxic lymphocytes to murine oncofetal antigens	In vitro, immunotherapy; tumour-specific immunity ii, immunotherapy; activation of cytotoxic lymphocytes with mouse oncofetal antigens.
8	in vitro lymphocyte immunization to cultured human tumor cells parameters for generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes	In vitro immunisation of lymphocytes against parameters of cultured human tumour cells for the production of cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	differentiation of lymphoid cells b cell as a direct target and t cell as a regulator in lipopolysaccharide enhanced induction of immunoglobulin production	Differentiation of b lymphoid cells as a direct target and t cells as a regulator in lipopolysaccharide increases apos; induction of production of apos; immunoglobulins.
8	inhibition of antigen and mitogen induced human lymphocyte proliferation by gold compounds	Inhibition of the antigen and mitogen induced proliferation of human lymphocytes by gold compounds.
8	lymphocytes hla antigens expressivity after neuraminidase treatment author s transl	L' expression of hla lymphocyte antigens after neuraminidase was translated by the author.
8	role of suppressor cells in antibody induced inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions	The role of suppressive cells in the antibodies induced the inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions.
8	altered lymphocyte reactivity in rheumatoid arthritis	Lapses; impaired lymphocyte responsiveness in rheumatoid arthritis.
8	5 nucleotidase in different populations of mouse lymphocytes	We found 5 nucleotidases in different mouse lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte response in patients with head and neck cancer effect of clinical stage and radiotherapy	The lymphocyte response in patients with cancer; head and neck cancer due to cancer; clinical and skin cancer; and radiation therapy.
8	lymphocyte locomotion i the initiation velocity pattern and path of locomotion in vitro	Lymphocyte locomotion i in vitro locomotion initiation and in vitro locomotion pattern.
8	lymphocyte locomotion ii the lymphocyte traffic over the post capillary venules analysed by phase contrast microscopy of thin sections of rat lymph nodes	Lymphocytic locomotion ii Lymphocytic movement at-above the capillary vein post-was analyzed by phase-contrast microscopy of thin sections of rat lymph nodes.
8	cell partition a simple test for lymphocyte sensitisation	Cell Sharing A simple test for sensitizing lymphocytes.
8	primary in vitro antibody response from human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Primary immune response in vitro of peripheral blood lymphocytes in humans.
8	studies on the glycolipids of sheep thymus and of normal and concanavalin a stimulated sheep peripheral lymphocytes	Glycolipid studies of sheep thymus and normal and concanavalin have stimulated peripheral sheep lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of eb virus transformation of non adherent human lymphocytes by co cultivation with adult fibroblasts	L' inhibition of the transformation of non-adherent human lymphocytes by the Eb virus by culture with adult fibroblasts.
8	electron microscopic evidence for phagocytic properties of human peripheral mononuclear cells cultured with pha	Electron microscopic evidence of the phagocytic properties of human peripheral mononuclear cells grown in culture with pha.
8	capability of lymphocytes stimulated in vitro with phytohemagglutinins to accomplish the graft versus host reaction	The ability of stimulated in vitro lymphocytes with d&apos phytohemagglutinins to perform the graft versus host response.
8	enzymatic and immunologic activity of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis	Enzymatic and immunological activity of lymphocytes during lymphocyte chemical carcinogenesis.
8	b and t lymphocytes in man iii b t and null lymphocytes in multiple sclerosis	B and T lymphocytes in apos; male iii b and lymphocytes nil in multiple sclerosis patients.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by cholinergic receptor in myasthenia gravis	Stimulation of lymphocytes by the cholinergic receptor in severe myasthenia.
8	complement dependent immunoglobulin g receptor function in lymphoid cells	G-receptor function of l' complement-dependent immunoglobulin in lymphoid cells.
8	the blocking by autologous serum of maternal cell mediated immune reactions to placental antigen	Autologous serum blocking of maternal cell-mediated immune responses to placental antigen.
8	reaction of lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin in vitro in hereditary microspherocytosis	Lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin in vitro in hereditary microspherocytosis.
8	advantages of cryoperserved lymphocytes for sequential evaluation of human immune competence i mitogen stimulation	Advantages of using cryopreserved lymphocytes for apo, sequential evaluation of human immune competence, and stimulation of mitogens.
8	inhibition of lymphocyte blastogenesis by plasma of patients with minimal change nephrotic syndrome	Lapos; plasma inhibition of lymphocytic blastogenesis in patients with minimal change nephrotic syndrome.
8	leukocyte inhibiting factor lif production from human lymphocytes stimulated by bacterial lipopolysaccharides	Leukocytes inhibiting bacterial lipopolysaccharide-stimulated production of life factors from human lymphocytes.
8	detection of t cell lymphoma associated antigens on cord blood lymphocytes and phytohemagglutinin stimulated blasts	Lymphoma t-associated antigen detection on cord blood lymphocytes and phytohemagglutinin stimulated the explosions.
8	cell electrophoretic analysis of lymphocytes and polymorphonuclear cells from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Cell-based electrophoretic analysis of lymphocytes and polymorphonuclear cells from rheumatoid arthritis (RA) patients.
8	cytokine inhibition of dna synthesis effect on cyclic adenosine monophosphate in lymphocytes	Cytokine inhibition of apos; effect of synthesis of apos; DNA on apos; cyclic adenosine monophosphate in lymphocytes.
8	human lymphocytes as target cells in a metabolizing test system in vitro for detecting potential mutagens	Human lymphocytes as target cells in an in vitro metabolism test system for mutagenicity.
8	globulin producing cells in cultures of blast transformed lymphocytes in vitro	Globulin-producing cells in transformed lymphocyte cultures by in vitro explosion.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by antigen in microplate cultures absence of an effect of transfer factor in vitro	Lymphocyte stimulation by antigen in microplate cultures has no effect on in vitro transfer factor.
8	the stimulation of lymphocytes by chondrocytes in mixed cultures	Lymphocyte stimulation by chondrocytes in mixed cultures.
8	properties of blast cells in control cultures of human blood lymphocytes preliminary note	Blast cell properties in control cultures of human blood lymphocytes.
8	membrane characteristics of established human t and b cell lines cross reactivity of human t antigenic determinants with peripheral lymphocytes of non human primates and the presence of mlc antigens on cultured t cell lines	The membrane characteristics of established human t- and b-cell lines cross-reacted the reactivity of human t-antigen determinants with peripheral lymphocytes from non-human primates and the presence of mlc antigens in the cultured t-cell lines.
8	assessment of the functional activity of human lymphocytes in malignant disease by the local graft versus host reaction in rats and the t rosette forming cell test	Evaluation of apo; functional activity of human lymphocytes in malignant disease by local graft response to apo; host in rats and rosette cell test.
8	the stimulation of lymphocytes by nucleus pulposus in patients with degenerative disk disease of the lumbar spine	Lymphocyte stimulation by the nucleus pulposus in patients with apos; a degenerative lumbar spinal disc disease.
8	comparative study of the effect of haloperidol and maptil on the karyotype and immunoproliferative response of lymphocytes	Comparative study of apos; effect of haloperidol and maptil on karyotype and immunoproliferative response of lymphocytes.
8	rosette formation by human t and b lymphocytes in the presence of adrenergic and cholinergic drugs	Human t- and b-cell rosette formation in the presence of cholinergic and adrenergic drugs.
8	modulating effects of levamisole nsc 177023 on human lymphocyte response in vitro	Modulatory effects of levamisole (nsc 177023) on human lymphocyte response in vitro.
8	influence of radiotherapy on lymphocyte stimulation	L' influence of radiation treatment on lymphocyte stimulation.
8	cell free media of mixed lymphocyte cultures augmenting sensitization in vitro of mouse t lymphocytes against allogeneic fibroblasts	Media free of cells from mixed lymphocyte cultures increasing in vitro sensitization of mouse t-cells to allogeneic fibroblasts.
8	effects of concanavalin a and a succinylated derivative on lymphocyte proliferation and cyclic nucleotide levels	Effects of concanavalin a and dapos; succinyl derivative on lymphocyte proliferation and cyclic nucleotide levels.
8	t b and k cells in autoimmune thyroid disease	Cells t b and k in auto thyroid diseases @-@immunes.
8	study of lymphocyte subpopulations in normal humans and patients with systemic lupus erythematosus by fractionation of peripheral blood lymphocytes on a discontinuous ficoll gradient	Study of sub-lymphocyte populations in normal humans and in patients with lupus erythematosus disseminated by fractionation of peripheral blood lymphocytes along a discontinuous gradient of ficolls.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in human malnutrition cytotoxic and suppressor cells	Under-lymphocyte populations in human malnutrition-related cytotoxic and suppressive cells.
8	specific sensitization of lymphocytes to tumor antigens by co cultivation with peritoneal cells exposed to such antigens	Specific sensitization of lymphocytes to the tumour antigens by co-culture with peritoneal cells exposed to these antigens.
8	cell mediated immune response to gonococcal antigen in uro arthritis reiter s disease a inhibition of migration of sensitised human lymphocytes b lymphocyte transformation in vitro measured by 14c thymidine uptake	The cellular-mediated immune response to the gonococcal antigen in bone marrow; arthritis uro re-emphasizes an inhibition of migration of human lymphocytes sensitized to in vitro lymphocyte transformation as measured by thymidine absorption 14c.
8	t lymphocyte number and function and the course of hepatitis b in hemodialysis patients	The number and function of t-cells and liver enzymes; evolution of liver disease; hepatitis b in patients with hemodialysis.
8	mitogen induced membrane changes and cell proliferation in t lymphocyte subpopulations	Mitogen also induced membrane changes and cell proliferation in sub@-@t lymphocyte populations.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by allogeneic lymphocytes and lymphoblasts in the presence of anti hla antisera	Lymphocyte stimulation by allogenic lymphocytes and lymphoblasts in the presence of anti-hla antisera.
8	differential cytotoxicity of activated lymphocytes on allogeneic and xenogeneic target cells iii species specificity of lymphocyte target cell recognition in vitro	Differential cytotoxicity of activated lymphocytes on allogenic and xenogenic target cells iii d&apos specificity; species of target cell recognition of lymphocytes in vitro.
8	the systemic production of cytotoxic lymphoid cells in corneal allograft reaction 1 a quantitantitative study utilizing 51chromium release assay	The systemic production of cytotoxic lymphoid cells in reaction 1 of the corneal allograft, a quantitative study using a 51chromium release test.
8	separate ia like determinants in human lymphocytes and macrophages	Factors such as the determinants in human lymphocytes and human macrophages are distinct.
8	thyroid antigen stimulates lymphocytes from patients with graves disease to produce thyroid stimulating immunoglobulin tsi	Thyroid antigen stimulates lymphocytes in patients with apotism; a serious disease to produce apotism; thyroid-stimulating immunoglobulin.
8	effect of 2 mercaptoethanol on the in vitro response of sensitized bovine peripheral blood lymphocytes to anaplasma antigen	Effect of mercaptoethanol 2 on the in vitro response of Dapos antigen-sensitized bovine peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	atypical t cells in rheumatoid synovial membranes	Atypical t-cells in rheumatoid synovial membranes.
8	dissociation of blastogenic factor production and lymphocyte transformation of guinea pig lymphocytes stimulated with tuberculin ppd	Disassociation of blastogenic factor production and lymphocyte transformation in tuberculin-positive guinea pig lymphocytes.
8	in vitro activation of mouse macrophages by rat lymphocyte mediators	In vitro activation of mouse macrophages by rat lymphocyte mediators.
8	chromosome aberration yields induced in human lymphocytes by 15 mev electrons given at a conventional dose rate and in microsecond pulses	Chromosomal aberrations were induced in human lymphocytes by 15 mev electrons given at conventional dose rates and microsecond pulses.
8	change in specific antigen binding by rabbit lymphocytes during immunization with human serum albumin	Change in binding of apo; specific antigen by rabbit lymphocytes during apo; human serum albumin.
8	a simple method for the cryopreservation of human lymphocytes at 80c	Simple 80-c method of cryopreservation of human lymphocytes.
8	ultrastructural study of so called curvilinear bodies and fingerprint structures in lymphocytes in late infantile amaurotic idiocy	Ultrastructural study of curvilinear bodies and bone structures; fingerprinting in apo lymphocytes; amaurotic late childhood idiocyte.
8	t lymphocyte shifts in patients with melanoma and bronchogenic carcinoma author s transl	Transfer of T-cells to patients with melanoma and dapos; bronchogenic carcinoma.
8	responsiveness of lymphocytes to soluble extracts of prostatic tumors and abrogation by serum blocking factor s	Lymphocyte reactivity to soluble extracts of prostate tumors and abrogation by serum blocking factors.
8	hyperacute rejection of a kidney allograft may be caused by cytotoxic lymphocytes	Hyperacute rejection of lymphocytes; renal allograft can be caused by cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	myasthenia gravis mitotic activity of thymus dependent and blood lymphocytes	Myasthenia gravis mitotic activity of blood and thymus-dependent lymphocytes.
8	fate of foreign dna taken up by tonsillar lymphocytes	The fate of apos; foreign DNA absorbed by tonsil lymphocytes.
8	a simplified one step procedure for the simultaneous determination of complement receptor lymphocytes and lymphocytes with membrane bound immunoglobulins	One-step simplified procedure for simultaneous determination of complement receptor lymphocytes and lymphocytes with membrane-bound immunoglobulins.
8	enzymatic activity of blood lymphocytes experimental tsutsugamushi fever in mice	Blood lymphocyte enzyme activity experimental tsutsugamushi fever in mouse.
8	chronic lymphocytic leukemia correlation of clinical course and therapeutic response with in vitro testing and morphology of lymphocytes	Chronic lymphocytic leukemia correlates with apos; clinical evolution and therapeutic response with in vitro tests and lymphocyte morphology.
8	bloom s syndrome iv sister chromatid exchanges in lymphocytes	Flowering Syndrome iv sister chromatid exchange in lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes from patients with coeliac disease by a subfraction of gluten	Stimulation of the lymphocytes of patients with CD by a sub@-@ gluten fraction.
8	cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes to bronchogenic carcinoma cells in patients with lung cancer	Lapos; cytotoxic lymphocyte activity on bronchogenic carcinoma cells in patients with lung cancer.
8	regulation of low density lipoprotein receptor activity in freshly isolated human lymphocytes	The regulation of l' low-density lipoprotein receptor activity in freshly isolated human lymphocytes.
8	does the pro inflammatory factor in lymphocytes lpif explain the role of these cells in acute inflammation	The role of these cells in acute inflammation is explained by the proinflammatory factor of the pancreatic lymphocytes-t @-@?
8	ectogalactosyltransferase studies in fibroblasts and concanavalin a stimulated lymphocytes	Ectogalactosyltransferase from fibroblasts and concanavalin from stimulated lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte differentiation in the rabbit thymus	Lymphocyte differentiation in rabbit thymus.
8	cell mediated destruction of human leukemic cells by mhc identical lymphocytes requirement for a proliferative trigger in vitro	The cell-mediated destruction of human leukemia cells by identical mhc lymphocytes is necessary for proliferative elicitation in vitro.
8	cell mediated immune response in vitro ii the mechanism s involved in the suppression of the development of cytotoxic lymphocytes	The cell-mediated immune response in vitro ii the mechanism involved in suppressing cytotoxic lymphocyte development.
8	a study of the variable heavy chain vh region of membrane bound ig on human chronic leukemic lymphocytes	A study of the variable heavy chain region of the membrane linked to chronic human leukemia lymphocytes.
8	expression of alloantigens ly 5 and ly 6 on cytotoxic effector cells	Expression of ly 5 and ly 6 alloantigens on cytotoxic effector cells.
8	sequential proliferation induced in human peripheral blood lymphocytes by mitogen ii suppression by pha activated cells	Sequential proliferation induced in peripheral human blood lymphocytes by mitogen ii suppression by pha-activated cells.
8	genetic studies in inbred rats viii the production of xenoantisera against ag b histocompatibility antigens	Genetic studies in inbred rats viii xenoantier production against d' ag b histocompatibility.
8	antigen induced locomotor responses in lymphocytes	The antigen induced locomotor responses in lymphocytes.
8	activity and intracellular localization of lysosomal acid phosphatase in lymphocytes from patients with hodgkin s disease plasma cell myeloma and primary polycythemia	Activity and intracellular localization of lysosomal acid phosphatase in the lymphocytes of patients with apo; Hodgkin's and dapo's myeloma; primary polycythemia.
8	production of the second component of complement by human monocytes stimulation by antigen activated lymphocytes or lymphokines	The production of the second complement component by stimulation of human monocytes by antigen-activated lymphocytes or lymphokines.
8	t cell variant of chronic lymphocytic leukaemia with chromosome abnormality and defective response to mitogens	A variety of t-cells of chronic lymphocytic leukemia showing a chromosomal abnormality and a deficient response to mitogens.
8	the chromosomal radiosensitivity of lymphocytes from the chimpanzee pan troglodytes	Chromosome radiosensitivity of chimpanzee pan troglodyte lymphocytes.
8	leukocyte inhibitory factor lif production from lymphocytes stimulated by leucogenenol	Production of apos, an inhibitory life factor of leukocytes from leucogenenol-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	effect of sera from patients with graves disease on the e rosette function of normal lymphocytes	Effect of serum in patients with severe disease on the function of normal lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte sensitization in childhood solid tumours and lymphoblastic leukaemia measured by electrophoretic mobility test	Lymphocyte sensitization in solid childhood tumours and lymphoblastic leukemia as measured by the electrophoretic mobility test.
8	preparation of mononuclear cell subpopulations from normal human peripheral blood	Preparation of sub-mononuclear cell populations from normal human peripheral blood.
8	lymphocyte like cells of the tunicate pyura stolonifera binding of lectins morphological and functional studies	In morphological and functional studies, lymphocyte cells of the pyura stoloniferous tunicate bind to lectins.
8	cytophotometric characterization of cortical and medullary lymphocytes in the chicken bursa and thymus	Cytophotometric characterization of cortical and medullary lymphocytes in chicken bursa and thymus.
8	epithelium and associated lymphocytes of developing human fetal appendix electron microscopic study	Electron microscopic study of apos; epithelium and associated lymphocytes of the apos; developing human fetal appendage.
8	in vitro studies on the mechanism of acquired resistance to tuberculous infection ii the effects of the culture supernatants of specifically stimulated sensitized lymphocytes on the growth of tubercle bacilli within macrophages	In vitro studies on the mechanism of acquired resistance to tuberculosis infection ii supernatant effects of specifically stimulated sensitized lymphocyte cultures on the growth of tubercle bacilli in macrophages.
8	cytotoxic antibodies to cultured melanoma cells in the sera of melanoma patients	A cytotoxic antibody directed against melanoma cell cultures in serum from melanoma patients.
8	concanavalin a and the production of bovine leukemia virus antigen in short term lymphocyte cultures	Conanavalin has and production of bovine leukemia virus antigens in short-term lymphocyte cultures.
8	the effect of cyproheptadine on the chromosomes of human lymphocytes in vitro	Effect of cyproheptadine on human lymphocyte chromosomes in vitro.
8	virus receptors on lymphocytes	We've got viral receptors on the lymphocytes.
8	human lymphocyte subpopulations involved in mlc and cml	Under-populations of human lymphocytes involved in mlc and cml.
8	in vitro reactivity of human lymphocytes after cryopreservation using a programmed cooling device	In vitro reactivity of human lymphocytes after cryopreservation at apo; aid; a cooling device programmed.
8	specific affinity fractionation of lymphocytes using glass or plastic bead columns	D&apos fractionation; specific lymphocyte affinity to apos; aid of glass or plastic bead columns.
8	in vitro effect of thymosin on t lymphocyte rosette formation in rheumatic diseases	Effect of thymosin on the formation of t-cell rosettes in rheumatic diseases.
8	lack of restimulation by non hla antigens in primed lymphocyte typing	The absence of restimulation by non-hla antigens in the typing of the activated lymphocytes.
8	responses of alloantigen primed lymphocytes in vitro the specificity of secondary responses assayed by titration of primed lymphocyte populations	Reactions of primed lymphocytes with alloantigens in vitro secondary response specificity as measured by titration of primed lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte surface markers in acute rheumatic fever and post streptococcal acute glomerulonephritis	Lymphocyte surface markers in acute rheumatic fever (RHF) and acute post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis.
8	human lymph node lymphocytes fail to effect lysis of antibody coated target cells	Lymphocytes of human lymph nodes do not affect the lysis of target cells coated with antibody.
8	enhancement of in vitro immunoglobulin synthesis of human lymphocytes by lysosomal enzymes from polymorphonuclear leucocytes	Augmentation of in vitro synthesis of human lymphocyte immunoglobulins by polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomal enzymes.
8	antigen specific lymphocyte activity in vitro by peripheral blood leucocytes from mantoux positive and negative human beings i comparison of quantitative and qualitative differences in the ppd specific lymphoproliferative response of lymphocytes from the two kinds of donors	Specific antigenic lymphocytic activity in vitro of peripheral blood leukocytes; positive and negative human mantoux compared quantitative and qualitative differences in the specific lymphoproliferative response pd of lymphocytes from both types of donors.
8	immunity and cancer suppressor effect on the cytotoxic activity of lymphoid cells from animals carrying syngeneic tumors	Immunity and immunities; suppressive effect of cancer on immune cells; cytotoxic activity of lymphoid cells; syngenic tumour-carrying animals.
8	long term physiologic study of thoracic duct lymph and lymphocytes in rat and man	Long-term physiological study of human thoracic canal lymph and lymphocytes in rats and lapos; men.
8	dna repair after uv and gamma irradiation ii human lymphocytes	Reparation of the cell; DNA after UV irradiation and gamma ii human lymphocytes.
8	differential uptake of platinum uracil by human peripheral lymphocytes	Differential uptake of platinum uracil by human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	suppression of generation of human cytotoxic effectors by lectins or lectin activated peripheral blood lymphocytes	Suppression of human cytotoxic effectors by lectins or lectins activated peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of human mixed lymphocyte culture stimulation by anti hla d associated antisera studies with primed responding cells	An inhibition of human mixed lymphocyte culture by antisera studies with primary response cells.
8	immunotherapy with autologous white cell infusions lymphocytes in the treatment of recurrrent glioblastoma multiforme a preliminary report	A preliminary report was prepared on autologous infusion of white lymphocytes for the treatment of recurrent multiform glioblastoma.
8	mechanism of target cell lysis of cytolytic t lymphocytes i characterization of specific lymphocyte target cell conjugates separated by velocity sedimentation	Mechanisms of lysis of target cells of cytolytic t-cells i characterization of conjugates specific to target lymphocytes separated by velocity settling.
8	variable region fv determinants on mouse lymphocytes	Determinants of variable fv region on mouse lymphocytes.
8	studies on the role of suppressor cells in specific unresponsiveness to dncb	Studies on the role of suppressive cells in dncb-specific non-@-@ response.
8	frozen lymphocyte pools as technical and reference controls for lymphocyte transformation	Frozen lymphocyte masses as a reference and technical control for lymphocyte transformation.
8	detection of a minor stimulating product involved in secondary allogenic proliferation of human lymphocytes in vitro	Detection of apo, a minor stimulant involved in the secondary allogenic proliferation of human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	the effect of x ray induced mitotic delay on chromosome aberration yields in human lymphocytes	The effects of X-ray-induced mitotic retardation on chromosome yields in human lymphocytes.
8	effect of immunotherapy on lymphocyte function in acute lymphatic leukemia	Effect of apo; immunotherapy on lymphocyte function in the acute lymphatic leukemia.
8	immunological characteristics of lymphoblasts and lymphocytes in acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in children	Immunologic characteristics of lymphoblasts and lymphocytes in pediatric acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
8	education of lymphocytes in vivo following a transient take of a matched unrelated bone marrow graft in man	Lupos; in vivo lymphocyte education following surgery; transient use of unrelated paired bone marrow graft in men.
8	nodular lymphoid hyperplasia of the bowel in primary hypogammaglobulinaemia study of in vivo and in vitro lymphocyte function	Nodular lymphoid hyperplasia of the apos; intestine in the apos; primary lymphocyte studies; hypogamaglobulinaemia of lymphocyte function in vivo and in vitro.
8	serum albumin biosynthesis and secretion by resting and lectin stimulated human lymphocytes	The biosynthesis and secretion of serum albumin by lectins and resting serum albumin stimulate human lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by a sodium periodate naio4 induced growth factor	Stimulation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by sodium periodate naio4 was found to induce a growth factor.
8	electron microscopic studies of lymphocytes in the bone marrow of the mouse i effect of hydrocortisone on marrow small lymphocytes author s transl	Electron microscopy studies of lymphocytes in mouse bone marrow; effect of hydrocortisone on small marrow lymphocytes.
8	the effects of azathioprine and levamisole on rosette forming cells of healthy subjects and cancer patients	The effects of azathioprine and levamisol on rosette cell formation in healthy subjects and cancer patients.
8	the effect of intensive immunosuppression on the in vitro activity of lymphocytes from multiple sclerosis patients	Lapos; effects of intensive immunosuppression on apos; in vitro lymphocyte activity in patients with multiple sclerosis.
8	a simplified technique for obtaining purified peripheral lymphocytes from chickens	A simplified procedure to obtain purified peripheral lymphocytes from chickens.
8	assay of immune cytolysis of lymphocytes and tumour cells by automatic determination of cell volume distribution	Automatic determination of cell volume distribution to determine the immune cytolysis of lymphocytes and tumor cells.
8	human mixed lymphocyte culture using separated lymphocyte populations	Mixed human lymphocyte culture at baseline; aid in separate lymphocyte populations.
8	characterization of human lymphocyte subpopulations for cytotoxicity against tumor derived monolayer cultures	Characterization of cytotoxicity of sub-populations of human lymphocytes against tumour-derived monolayers.
8	biologic activity of transfer factor tested in vitro with cord blood lymphocytes	L' biological transfer factor activity was assayed with cord blood lymphocytes in vitro.
8	synthesis of ribosomal rna in the lymphocytes with 21 chromosome trisomy	Ribosomal rna synthesis in lymphocytes with 21-chromosome trisomy.
8	effect of schizophrenic patients serum on dna synthesis in cultures of pha stimulated lymphocytes	Effect of serum from schizophrenic patients on synthesis of DNA in pha-stimulated lymphocyte cultures.
8	a population of lymphocytes in human blood distinctive in morphology and other characteristics	Lymphocyte population in human blood distinguished by its morphology and other characteristics.
8	a new antigen system expressed in human endothelial cells	New antigen system expressed in human endothelial cells.
8	immune response to immunization via the anterior chamber of the eye i f lymphocyte induced immune deviation	The immune response to apo; immunization by apo; an anterior chamber intermediate of the f lymphocyte eye induced immune deviation.
8	distribution of alloantigens on human fc receptor bearing lymphocytes the presence of b cell alloantigens on sig positive but not sig negative lymphocytes	Alloantigen distribution on human fc receptor-bearing lymphocytes, presence of alloantigenic b cells on sig-positive but not sig-negative lymphocytes.
8	membrane transport by murine lymphocytes ii the appearance of thymidine transport in cells from concanavalin a stimulated mice	Membrane transport by murine lymphocytes stimulated mice; the appearance of thymidine transport in concanavalin cells.
8	effect of cytochalasin b on human lymphocyte responses to mitogens time and concentration dependence	The effect of cytochalasin b on the responses of human lymphocytes to mitogens as a function of time and concentration.
8	fractionation on lymphocyte surface antigens i rapid method for eliminating labeled lipid from cell surface antigens iodinated by the lactoperoxidase catalysed reaction	Fractionation on surface antigens of lymphocytes is a rapid method for removing labelled lipids from surface antigens of iodinated cells by the lactoperoxidase-catalyzed reaction.
8	role of clozapine in the occurrence of chromosomal abnormalities in human bone marrow cells in vivo and in cultured lymphocytes in vitro	The role of clozapine in the development of osteoarthritis; the development of chromosomal abnormalities in human bone marrow cells in vivo and in lymphocytes cultured in vitro.
8	effect of the elimination of suppressor cells on the development of dncb contact sensitivity in guinea pig	Effect of apo; elimination of suppressive cells on the development of sensitivity to dncb in guinea pig.
8	a suppressor mechanism controlling lymphocyte recruitment	A suppressor mechanism that controls lymphocyte recruitment.
8	kinetics of small lymphocytes in normal and nude mice after splenectomy	Kinetics of small lymphocytes in normal and naked mice after splenectomy.
8	stimulation of human fetal lymphocytes by lipopolysaccharide b in culture	Stimulation of human fetal lymphocytes by cultured lipopolysaccharide b.
8	nuclear bodies of lymphocytes in the lymph nodes of guinea pigs treated with phytohemagglutinin in vivo	Lymphocyte nuclear bodies in lymph nodes of guinea pigs treated with in vivo phytohemagglutinin.
8	action of adenosine hosphates on the release of intracellular lactate dehydrogenase from human and rat lymphocytes	Action of adenosine and d&apos hosphates on release of intracellular lactate dehydrogenase from human and rat lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions in humans after immunization with tetanus toxoid	Lapses; inhibition of the mixed lymphocyte reactions in humans following apo; immunization with apo; tetanus anatoxin.
8	the production of micronuclei from chromosome aberrations in irradiated cultures of human lymphocytes	Production of micronuclei from chromosome aberrations in irradiated human lymphocyte cultures.
8	impaired response of lymphocytes of diabetic subjects to antigen of staphylococcus aureus	Altered lymphocyte reaction of diabetic subjects to staphylococcus aureus antigen.
8	studies on difference in cellular immune response between the human tonsil and blood lymphocytes	Studies of the difference in cellular immune response between human tonsils and human blood lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte transformation in vitro in dermatophytosis	Lymphocyte transformation in vitro in the dermatophytosis.
8	proteolytic enzymes in palatine tonsil lymphocytes	The proteolytic enzymes in the lymphocytes of the palatine amygdala.
8	triiodothyronine receptors in lymphocytes of newborn and adult rats	Lymphocyte triiodothyronine receptors in newborn and adult rats.
8	reactive and non reactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	"""Reactive and non-reactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis patients,"" Int J Obstet Gynecol, Vol."
8	immunity to trichinella spiralis i transfer of resistance by two classes of lymphocytes	Immunity to trichinella spiralis i transfer of resistance from two different classes of lymphocytes.
8	a receptor for self on lymphocytes	It's like a self-help-receptor even on lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes from rheumatoid arthritis patients by mitogens and igg	Lymphocyte stimulation in patients with rheumatoid arthritis by mitogens and igg.
8	cytotoxicity to isolated rabbit hepatocytes by lymphocytes from children with liver disease	Toxicity to isolated rabbit hepatocytes by lymphocytes from children with liver disease.
8	autoallergic states tumor immunology impaired function of peripheral lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus	L' tumor immunology of autoallergic states altered peripheral lymphocyte function in disseminated lupus erythematosus.
8	detection of a nuclear ebna type antigen in apparently ebna negative herpesvirus papio hvp transformed lymphoid lines by the acid fixed nuclear binding technique	Detection of a nuclear ebna-like antigen in papio-transformed lymphoid cell lines; herpesviruses that appear to be ebna-negative by the acid-fixed nuclear binding technique.
8	a non t non b human leukemia cell line nalm 1 establishment of the cell line and presence of leukemia associated antigens	The establishment of the nalm 1 cell line of human non-beta leukemia and the presence of leukemia-associated antigens.
8	in vitro reactivity of macrophages and lymphocytes from ultraviolet irradiated mice	In vitro reactivity of mouse macrophages and mouse lymphocytes exposed to ultraviolet radiation.
8	semiquantitative cytochemical estimation of beta glucuronidase activity in peripheral lymphocytes in healthy human subjects	Quantitative cytochemical estimate of liver enzymes; beta activity-glucuronidase in peripheral lymphocytes in healthy human subjects.
8	t and b lymphocytes before during and after cytostatic therapy of acute lymphoblastic leukemia all in children author s transl	Both pre- and post-cytostatic treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children are all translated by the authors.
8	the effect of surgical removal of a rat sarcoma on lymphocyte cytotoxicity	The effects of apo; the surgical ablation of apo; a rat sarcoma on lymphocyte cytotoxicity.
8	evidence for the release of mitogenic factors by both t and b lymphocytes in the human	Evidence of mitogenic factor release from t and b lymphocytes in humans.
8	dna synthetic responses of fractionated human lymphocytes exposed to lymphocyte derived mitogenic factor	DNA synthetic responses of fractionated human lymphocytes exposed to derived mitogenic factor.
8	the effects of mouse alpha fetoprotein on t cell dependent and t cell independent immune responses in vitro	The effects of the mouse fetoprotein alpha on t-cell dependent and t-cell independent immune responses in vitro.
8	distribution of heavy chain variable region vh subgroups on human lymphocytes	Distribution of sub-groups in the vh region heavy variable chain on human lymphocytes.
8	comparison of microtitre plates with flat bottomed and round bottomed wells for mixed lymphocyte culture mlc	Comparison of microtitre plates and wells with flat bottom and round bottom for mixed mlc lymphocyte culture.
8	reduced mitogenic responses in cultures of lymphocytes from newly calved cows	In recently born cows lymphocyte cultures mitogenic responses were reduced.
8	cytomegalovirus directed lymphocyte reactivity in healthy adults tested by a cmv induced lymphocyte transformation test	Cytomegalovirus induced lymphocyte transformation tests in healthy adults.
8	diminished cap formation in lymphocytes from patients and carriers of duchenne muscular dystrophy	Reduced cap formation in lymphocytes of duchenne patients and duchenne muscular dystrophy carriers.
8	cell mediated lympholysis in man an attempt to type with cytotoxic lymphocytes	Cell-mediated lympholysis in men, an attempt at typing with cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	chromosome aberrations induced by fortrin in human lymphocytes in cultures and in vivo	Fortrin-induced chromosomal aberrations in both cultured and in vivo human lymphocytes.
8	on the structure of the t cell receptor for antigen	On the structure of the cell receptor t cell for the antigen.
8	structure of hl a a and b antigens isolated from cultured human lymphocytes	Structure of human hl a and b antigens isolated from cultured human lymphocytes.
8	immune complexes in hepatitis b antigen associated periarteritis nodosa detection by antibody dependent cell mediated cytotoxicity and the raji cell assay	Immune complexes in detection of apo; apo antigen; hepatitis b associated with cell-mediated antibody- and apo-mediated periarteritis; adjusted cell assay.
8	lymphocytes which differentiate in an allogeneic thymus ii evidence for both central and peripheral mechanisms in tolerance to donor strain tissues	Lymphocytes that differentiate in an allogenic thymus (ii) indicate the existence of central and peripheral mechanisms in tissue tolerance of the donor strain.
8	lymphocyte stimulation in multiple sclerosis patients untreated and treated with transfer factor long term studies on the effect of different stimulants on myo 2 3h inositol incorporation into phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes	Lymphocytic stimulation in patients with untreated multiple sclerosis treated with Dapos transfer factors; long-term studies on apos; effect of various stimulants on apos; incorporation of apos; inositol myo 2 h into lymphocyte phosphatidylinositol.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes exposed to 8 methoxypsoralen and long wave uv radiation prior to incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine	Sister chromatid exchange in human lymphocytes exposed to 8 methoxypsoralenes and long-wave uv radiation prior to apos; bromodeoxyuridine incorporation.
8	mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes induction of a lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for allogeneic and syngeneic mouse target cells	Mycoplasma-dependent activation of normal lymphocytes induces lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity to target cells of allogeneic and syngenic mice.
8	mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes role of arginine and nonviable mycoplasma antigen in the induction of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for syngeneic mouse target cells	Molecular characterization of the role of arginine and nonviable mycoplasma antigen in the induction of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for syngeneic mouse target cells.
8	inhibition of proliferative and plaque forming cell responses by human bone marrow derived lymphocytes from peripheral blood by antisera to the p23 30 antigen	L' inhibition of proliferative and plaque-forming responses by antisera to peripheral blood from human bone marrow-derived lymphocytes; p23 antigen 30 was observed.
8	lymphocytes alloantigens associated with x chromosome linked immune response genes	Alloantigens in lymphocytes associated with x-chromosome-linked immune response genes bind to x-chromosomes.
8	in vitro anti kidney effect of lymphocytes in experimental immunization to placental antigens	In vitro renal anti-cells effect of lymphocytes in the apos; experimental immunisation against anti-placental antigens.
8	morphology of immune lymphocytes in homograft lymph	Morphology of lymphocyte immune cells in homogreated lymph.
8	transformation of lymphocytes by herpesvirus papio	Lymphocyte transformation by papio herpesvirus papio.
8	early effects of phytohemagglutinin on induction of dna polymerase thymidine kinase deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate pools and dna synthesis in human lymphocytes	Early effects of phytohemagglutinin on apos; induction of apo pools; DNA polymerase thymidine kinase deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate (DNP) and deoxyribonucleoside synthesis; DNA in human lymphocytes.
8	discrimination of b t and null lymphocytes by esterase cytochemistry	The cytochemistry of apos; esterase activity distinguishes b t lymphocytes from null ones.
8	effect of corticosteroids on the response of lymphocytes to stimulation by galactose oxidase modified lymphocytes	Corticosteroids affect the response of lymphocytes to galactose oxidase-modified stimulation.
8	the effect of steroids on the circulating lymphocyte population ii studies of the thoracic duct lymphocyte population of the guinea pig after neonatal thymectomy and prednisolone treatment	L' effect of steroids on circulating lymphocytic population ii studies of the lymphocytic population of the thoracic canal of the guinea pig following neonatal thymectomy and prednisolone treatment.
8	quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iii the lineage of memory cells	Quantitative studies of cytotoxic lymphocyte precursors iii line of memory cells.
8	t cell regulation of human peripheral blood b cells responsiveness	Cellular regulation t of b-cell responsiveness of human peripheral blood.
8	polygenic control of mixed lymphocyte reaction in dogs	Polygenic mastery of the mixed lymphocyte response in dogs.
8	separation of lymphoid cells with a suppressor effect on the activity of cytotoxic cells in vitro during the growth of a syngeneic mouse tumour	Separation of lymphoid cells with suppressive effect on the apos; in vitro cytotoxic cell activity during cell growth; a mouse syngenetic tumour.
8	responses of alloantigen primed lymphocytes in vitro the contribution of increased frequencies of responding lymphocytes to differences between reactivity of normal and primed lymphocyte populations	Reactions of initiated lymphocytes with alloantigens in vitro The contribution of allos; increased frequency of reactive lymphocytes to differences in the reactivity of the normal and the activated lymphocyte populations.
8	peripheral blood lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus relation to activity	Relationship between peripheral blood activity and lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus and lapos; activity.
8	thymus and breast cancer plasma androgens thymic pathology and peripheral lymphocytes in myasthenia gravis	Thymus and androgenic plasma breast cancer thymic pathology and peripheral lymphocytes in severe myasthenia.
8	relationship between lymphocyte response to tetanus toxoid and age of lymphocyte donor	Relationship of lymphocyte response to apo; tetanus anatoxin to apo; lymphocyte donor age.
8	immunosuppression by sex steroid hormones the effect upon pha and ppd stimulated lymphocytes	Both pha- and ppd-stimulated lymphocytes were affected by immunosuppression by sex steroid hormones.
8	characterization of human adenoid cells using surface and functional markers for lymphocyte subpopulations	Characterization of the human adenoid cells at baseline; aid in surface and functional markers for sub@-@ lymphocyte populations.
8	isolation of enzymatically homogeneous populations of human lymphocytes monocytes and granulocytes by zonal centrifugation	Isolate enzymatically homogeneous populations of human lymphocyte granulocytes and monocytes by zonal centrifugation.
8	ultrastructural study of the vacuoles in the peripheral lymphocytes in juvenile amaurotic idiocy juvenile form of generalized ceroid lipofuscinosis	Ultrastructural study of vacuoles in peripheral lymphocytes of juvenile generalized ceric lipofuscinosis in juvenile amaurotic idiomes.
8	hl a b 27 in reiter s disease with special reference to oligosymptomatic course forms	Hl a b 27 in reme nt, especially as regards oligosymptomatic forms.
8	antisera against leukaemia associated antigens on human lymphocytes	Anti-antigens associated with leukemia in human lymphocytes.
8	post transplant monitoring of renal allograft recipients for t b and null lymphocyte subpopulations	Post-transplant surveillance of renal allografts for sub-populations of lymphocytes b and null.
8	the use of detergents and immunoperoxidase reagents for the ultrastructural demonstration of internal immunoglobulin in lymph cells	Use of detergents and immunoperoxidase reagents for ultrastructural demonstration of lapos; internal immunoglobulin in lymphatic cells.
8	phylogeny of lymphocyte heterogeneity i membrane immunoglobulins of teleost lymphocytes	Phylogenesis of apos; heterogeneity of teleost cell membrane lymphocytes i immunoglobulins.
8	surface igm on lymphocytes from pregnant women	Surface igema on the lymphocytes of pregnant women.
8	mouse immunoglobulin receptors on lymphocytes identification of igm and igd molecules by tryptic cleavage and a postulated role for cell surface igd	Mouse immunoglobulin receptors on lymphocytes identify the molecules of disease and disease by tryptic cleavage and a postulated role for cell surface igd.
8	determination of antiplatelet antibody activity in sera cytotoxic for human lymphocytes	Determination of apo; antiplatelet antibody activity in human lymphocyte cytotoxic serum.
8	immunologic surface markers on nonhuman primate lymphocytes	Surface immunological markers on non-human primate lymphocytes.
8	comparison of the stimulating capacity of human leukemia t cell null cell and b cell lines in mixed lymphoma culture	Comparison of the stimulatory capacity of human t-leukemia b-cell lines and null cells in mixed lymphoma cultures.
8	lack of specificity of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity against the bladder cancer cell line t24	Lack of specificity of lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity against bladder cancer cell line t24.
8	inhibition of dna biosynthesis in human lymphocytes by alpha 1 antitrypsin	Alpha 1 antitrypsin inhibits biosynthesis of apos; DNA in human lymphocytes.
8	cell mediated cytotoxicity in vitro of human lymphocytes against a cervical cancer cell line	Cell-mediated in vitro cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes against a cell line of cervical cancer; uterus.
8	surface immunoglobulins and lymphocyte adhesiveness during development	Surface immunoglobulins and lymphocyte adherence during development.
8	the procoagulant activity of human granulocytes lymphocytes and monocytes stimulated by endotoxin coagulation and electron microscopic studies	L' procoagulatory activity of lymphocytes and monocytes of human granulocytes stimulated by coagulation with l' endotoxin and electron microscopy studies.
8	formation and release of antibodies in lymphocytes	Formation and release of antibody into lymphocytes.
8	temperature effects on lymphocyte transformation invitro	Effects of temperature on transformation of invitro lymphocytes.
8	induction of specific unresponsiveness against the c3h m1s antigen in mice increase of suppressive capacity of c3h x cba f1 lymphocytes after sensitization against cba lymphoid cells	L' induction of apos; specific non--reactivity against apos; antigen c3h m1s in mice increases c3h x cba f1 suppressive capacity after sensitization against cba lymphoid cells.
8	increased succinate dehydrogenase activity of lymphocytes in eczema	Increase in apo; lymphocyte succinate dehydrogenase activity in apo; eczema.
8	surface immunoglobulin on rabbit lymphoid cells iv ultrastructural labelling of a and b group allotypic determinants	Immunoglobulin surface on rabbit lymphoid cells iv ultrastructural labeling of allotypic determinants of groups a and b.
8	structure and biological function of human igd ix anti igd activation of human lymphocytes	Structure and biological function of human igd igix antiactivating igd igd in human lymphocytes.
8	studies in porphyria vii induction of uroporphyrinogen i synthase and expression of the gene defect of acute intermittent porphyria in mitogen stimulated human lymphocytes	Porphyria vii, lapos, induction of uroporphyrinogen i synthase and lapos; expression of acute intermittent porphyria gene defect in mitogen-stimulated human lymphocytes stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	studies on the capacity of human tonsillar lymphocyte subpopulations to produce interferon	Studies on the ability of sub-populations of human amygdala lymphocytes to produce l' interferon.
8	the effect of a23187 upon calcium metabolism in the human lymphocyte	L' effect of a23187 on human lymphocyte calcium metabolism.
8	ligand independent cap formation redistribution of surface receptors on mouse lymphocytes and thymocytes in hypertonic medium	Ligand-independent root cap formation, surface receptor redistribution on mouse lymphocytes and thymocytes in hypertonic medium.
8	dna synthesis in isolated lymphocyte nuclei effects of megaloblastic anaemia due to folate or vitamin b 12 deficiency or antimetabolite drugs	Synthesis of apo; DNA in isolated lymphocyte nuclei effects of apo; folate deficiency, vitamin b12 deficiency or antimetabolite-induced megaloblastic anemia.
8	quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iv specificity and cross reactivity of cytotoxic clones	Quantitative studies of cytotoxic lymphocyte precursors iv specificity and cross-reactivity of the cytotoxic clones.
8	a cytotoxic proteinase isolated from human lymphocytes	It's a proteinase isolated from human lymphocytes.
8	alkaline phosphatase positive lymphocytes appl in man	Alkaline phosphatase-positive lymphocytes clap in the male.
8	ultrastructural cytochemical and membrane surface marker characteristics of the atypical lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis	Ultrastructural cytochemical characteristics and marker membranes of atypical lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis.
8	transplantation of nuclei from lymphocytes of adult frogs into enucleated eggs special focus on technical parameters	Transplantation of adult frog lymphocyte nuclei into enucleated eggs focuses on technical parameters.
8	changes in the cellular membrane surface coat of lymphocytes and thymocytes after incubation in vitro with cystein as revealed with electronmicroscopy	Changes in the surface layer of the cell membrane of lymphocytes and thymocytes after in vitro incubation with cysteine were observed by electron microscopy.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in multiple scerlosis comparison with neuroelectric blocking activity	Under-lymphocyte populations in comparison of multiple sclerosis with l' neuroelectrical blocking activity.
8	characteristics of cytotoxic t lymphocytes eluted from allogenic target cells	Characteristics of cytotoxic t-cells were also eluted from allogenic target cells.
8	kinetics and properties of a cortisol resistant population of lymphocytes from the lymph nodes of guinea pigs with experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	Kinetics and properties; a population of cortisol-resistant lymphocytes from the lymph nodes of guinea pigs with apo; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes on peritoneal macrophages of mice in contact dermatitis induced by dinitrochlorbenzene	Cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes on peritoneal macrophages of dinitrochlorobenzene-induced contact dermatitis in apos mice.
8	an electron microscopic study of intraepithelial lymphocytes in human fetal small intestine	Electron microscopic study of intraepithelial lymphocytes in the human fetal small intestine.
8	change in the density of surface lymphocyte receptors and in the level of serum immunoglobulins in chronic lympholeukosis	Change in surface lymphocyte receptor density and serum immunoglobulin levels in the chronic lympholeukosis.
8	autoradiographic study of dna metabolism in different populations of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis is mice of the balb c strain	Autoradiographic studies of cell metabolism; DNA in different lymphocyte populations during chemical carcinogenesis are performed in mice of the balb c strain.
8	studies of t b and null lymphocytes during the course of acute lymphocytic leukemia	T-cell and null lymphocyte studies during apos; acute lymphocyte leukemia.
8	cytogenetic investigations on lymphocytes from workers exposed to vinyl chloride	Cytogenetic studies on lymphocytes from vinyl chloride exposed workers.
8	the location of dna homologous to human satellite iii dna in the chromosomes of chimpanzee pan troglodytes gorilla gorilla gorilla and orang utan pongo pygmaeus	Localization of DNA homologous to human satellite iii DNA in chromosomes of gorilla pan troglodyte chimpanzee and orang utan pongo pygmaeus.
8	fluidity of membrane lipids and lateral mobility of concanavalin a receptors in the cell surface of normal lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with malignant lymphomas and leukemias	The fluidity of membrane lipids and lateral mobility of concanavalin receptors at the cell surface of normal lymphocytes and of lymphocytes from patients with malignant lymphoma and leukemia.
8	distribution of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase inducibility in cultured human lymphocytes	Distribution of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase inducibility in human cultured lymphocytes.
8	an attempt at passive transfer of immunity to leprosy patients by transfusion of allogeneic lymphocytes inactivated with mitomycin c	An attempt to passively transfer leprosy; immunity to leprosy patients by transfusion of mitomycin-inactivated, allogeneic lymphocytes.
8	antisera with ia specificity selected by lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Specificity antisera ia selected by lymphocytes from chronic lymphocytic leukemia patients.
8	the activating effect of synovial fluid and washings of synovial membrane on autologous lymphocytes in rheumatoid arthritis	L' activating effect of synovial fluid and washing synovial membranes on autologous lymphocytes in rheumatoid arthritis.
8	incorporation of deoxynucleotides into dna by diethylaminoethyldextran treated lymphocytes	Incorporation of deoxynucleotides into DNA by diethylaminoethyldextran-treated lymphocytes.
8	morphological differences between sub populations of human lymphocytes revealed by scanning electron microscopy	Morphological differences between sub-human lymphocyte populations as revealed by scanning electron microscopy.
8	heterogeneity of acid phosphatase beta glucuronidase and alpha naphthyl acetate esterase in normal and leukaemic lymphocytes	Heterogeneity of beta-acid glucuronidase and apos; alpha naphthyl acetate esterase in normal and leukemic lymphocytes.
8	gamma radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes dose rate effects in stimulated and non stimulated cells	Gamma radiation has induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes, dose-rate effects in stimulated and unstimulated cells.
8	in vitro morphological studies on antibody dependent nonimmune lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in chronic active liver disease	In vitro morphological studies of non-immune, antibody-dependent lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in chronic active liver disease.
8	concomitant presence of tumor specific cytotoxic and inhibitor lymphocytes in patients with osteogenic sarcoma	Concomitant presence of cytotoxic lymphocytes and specific tumour inhibitors in patients with osteogenic sarcoma.
8	surface immunoglobulin on rabbit lymphoid cells v ultrastructural distribution of b4 allotypic determinants of thymus lymph node and bone marrow lymphocytes	Rabbit lymphoid cell surface immunoglobulin v ultrastructural distribution of allotypic determinants b4 of thymus lymph nodes and bone marrow lymphocytes.
8	thymic factors regulating dna synthesis in lymphocytes cultured in vitro	The thymic factors regulating DNA synthesis in cultured lymphocytes in vitro.
8	quantitative distribution of satellite associations differing according to the number of chromosomes in human lymphocytes	Quantitative satellite associations differing in the number of chromosomes in human lymphocytes.
8	kinetics of indium iii labelled lymphocytes in normal subjects and patients with hodgkin s disease	Lactose labelled lymphocyte kinetics; indium iii in normal subjects and patients with Hodgkin's disease.
8	patterns of immunological anti donor reactivity in renal allotransplanted patients a prospective study	Anti-donor reactivity patterns in renal allotransplant patients in a prospective study.
8	frozen thawed mononuclear cells as a source of b lymphocytes for antibody screening	Both frozen and thawed mononuclear cells are a source of b-cells for antibody screening.
8	association between hla determinants and complement receptors on human lymphocytes	Association of hla determinants with complementary human lymphocyte receptors.
8	lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin in patients with asbestosis and pleural mesothelioma	Effect of phytohaemagglutinin on the lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin in patients with asbestosis and pleural mesothelioma.
8	close genetic relation between determinants coding for the hla d region detected by the technique of mixed primary and secondary lymphocyte culture and by serology of b lymphocytes	A close genetic relationship between the determinants coding for the hla d region was detected by the mixed primary and secondary lymphocyte culture technique and b lymphocyte serology.
8	cytoenzymatic studies on the lymphocytes of peripheral blood and lymphatic nodes of rats in an experimental magnesium deficiency	Cyto-enzymatic studies of peripheral blood lymphocytes and lymph nodes from taproot-dwelling rats; experimental magnesium deficiency.
8	effect of the serum of patients with cholestasis on lymphocyte e rosette formation	Serum effect of cholestasis patients on lymphocyte and rosette formation.
8	influence of autologous serum on in vitro reactivity of peripheral lymphocytes of patients with breast cancer	The effect of autologous serum on the in vitro reactivity of the peripheral lymphocytes of patients with breast cancer.
8	cytochemical reactions of normal and neoplastic lymphocytes	Cytochemical reactions of both normal and neoplastic lymphocytes.
8	mitotic chiasmata and other quadriradials in mitomycin c treated bloom s syndrome lymphocytes	Mitotic chiasmata and other quadriradials in mitomycin c treated bluem lymphocyte syndrome.
8	uva induced inhibition of proliferation of pha stimulated lymphocytes from humans treated with 8 methoxypsoralen	In humans treated with 8 methoxypsoralen, there was an inhibition of the proliferation of pha-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte activation by streptococcal antigens in psoriasis	L' lymphocyte activation by streptococcal antigens in the psoriasis.
8	serologically detected lymphocyte antigens in holstein cattle	Serologically detected lymphocyte antigens in the Holstein cattle.
8	adenosine triphosphatase and 5 nucleotidase activity of antigen stimulated lymphocytes	Apos; apos; adenosine triphosphatase and 5 nucleotidase activity of lymphocytes stimulated by apos; antigen.
8	differentiation between various effects of cytotoxic fractions of lymphocyte culture medium	Differentiation among the various effects of the cytotoxic fractions of lymphocyte culture media.
8	cytotoxins against a granulocyte antigen system detection by a new method employing cytochalasin b treated cells	Cytotoxins against the detection of granulocyte antigenic system by a novel method using cytochalasin-treated cells b.
8	unchanged electrophoretic mobility in human cryopreserved lymphocytes	Unchanged electrophoretic mobility in cryopreserved human lymphocytes.
8	secretion by tumor and non tumor cells of substances modifying macrophage migration and the cytopathogenic effect of immune lymphocytes in vitro	The secretion by tumor and non-tumour cells of macrophage and l&apos migration-modifying substances; the cytopathogenic effect of immune cells in vitro.
8	adhesive lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of schizophrenic patients	Lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of schizophrenic patients.
8	chronic lymphocytic leukemia well differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma with monoclonal iga iga production by circulating lymphocytes	Well-differentiated chronic lymphocytic leukemia with monoclonal production of iga iga by circulating lymphocytes.
8	bloom s syndrome dna replication in cultured fibroblasts and lymphocytes	Replication of DNA from the flowering syndrome in cultured fibroblasts and lymphocytes.
8	changes in the electric charge of blood lymphocyte populations after secondary immunization with tetanus antitoxin in man	Changes in electrical charge of blood lymphocyte populations following apo; secondary immunization with apo; tetanus antitoxin in men.
8	in vitro activating properties of polyene antibiotics for murine lymphocytes	Activating properties of polyene antibiotics for murine lymphocytes.
8	induction of delayed reaction to dinitrophenylated lymphocytes in guinea pigs with contact sensitivity to dncb	Induction of apo; a delayed reaction to dinitrophenylated lymphocytes in dncb-sensitive guinea pigs.
8	lower azure b methylene blue ratios in giemsa type blood and malaria stains	Reduced methylene blue azure b ratios in giemsa-like blood and malaria stains.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in lymphocytes of psoriatics after treatment with 8 methoxypsoralen and long wave ultraviolet radiation	Exchanges of sister chromatids in psoriatic lymphocytes after treatment with 8 methoxypsoralenes and long-wave ultraviolet (UV) radiation.
8	a sensitive rosetting method for detecting subpopulations of lymphocytes which react with alloantisera	Sensitive detection method for sub-populations reacting with alloantisers.
8	interdependence of in vitro responsiveness of cord and maternal blood lymphocytes to antigens from oral bacteria	Interdependence of the in vitro responsiveness of cord lymphocytes and maternal blood to oral bacterial antigens.
8	human blood l lymphocytes in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus rheumatoid arthritis and scleroderma a comparison with t and b cells	Human blood lymphocytes in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus, rheumatoid polyarthritis, and scleroderma compared to t and b cells.
8	suppression of dna synthesis by con a activated human lymphocytes stimulation by con a bound to non t cells unless removed after activation	Suppression of DNA synthesis by stimulation of activated human lymphocytes by non-total cell-binding activity, unless removed after activation.
8	demonstration of nuclear antigen binding lymphocytes by the resette method in sle patients	Nuclear antigen binding lymphocytes by the resetting method in patients.
8	vacuolated lymphocytes in type ii glycogenosis a diagnostic approach	Glycogenosis type ii vacuolated lymphocytes are a diagnostic approach.
8	bacille calmette gu rin infection in the mouse regulation of macrophage plasminogen activator by t lymphocytes and specific antigen	Bacille calmette gu rin infection in the mouse control of macrophage plasminogen activator by specific antigen and lymphocytes.
8	anti viral activity induced by culturing lymphocytes with tumor derived or virus transformed cells identification of the anti viral activity as interferon and characterization of the human effector lymphocyte subpopulation	Anti-viral activity induced by culture of lymphocytes with virus-transformed or tumor-derived cells Identification of the apos; antiviral activity as an interferon and characterization of the sub-human effector lymphocyte population.
8	sensitization of lymphocytes against pooled allogeneic cells i generation of cytotoxicity against autologous human lymphoblastoid cell lines	Lymphocyte sensitization against aggregated allogeneic cells i cytotoxicity generation against autologous human lymphoblastoid cell lines.
8	induction of ebna precedes the first cellular s phase after ebv infection of human lymphocytes	Lapses; induction of the apos; ebna precedes the first cell phase after infection; infection of human lymphocytes by apos; ebv.
8	metabolism of immunoglobulin a lymphocyte function and histocompatibility antigens in patients on anticonvulsants	Metabolism of apo; immunoglobulin, lymphocyte function and antibody; histocompatibility in anticonvulsant-treated patients.
8	k lymphocytes killer cells in crohn s disease and acute virus b hepatitis	Killer cells of k-cells in Crohn's disease and l' acute viral hepatitis b.
8	immuno suppressive effect of human macrophages ii influence of macrophages on the kinetics of dna rna and protein synthesis in pha stimulated lymphocytes	Immuno effect-suppressor of human macrophages ii influences macrophages on the kinetics of synthesis of l' rna DNA and proteins in pha-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	suppression of growth of guinea pig line 10 hepatocarcinoma ii effect of passive transfer of xenogeneic and syngeneic antibodies and normal lymphoid cells	Suppression of growth of the guinea-pig hepatocarcinoma cell line 10; effect of passive transfer of xenogenic and syngenic antibodies and normal lymphoid cells.
8	in vitro immune response of human peripheral lymphocytes iii effect of anti mu or anti delta antibody on pwm induced increase of cyclic nucleotides in human b lymphocytes	In vitro immune response of human peripheral lymphocytes iii effect of mucosal antibody or anti-diaposal antibody; cyclic nucleotide pwm-induced increase in human b lymphocytes.
8	increase in titer of the naturally occurring human antibody to neuraminidase treated lymphocytes after influenza	Increase in titre of apo; natural human antibody directed against neuraminidase-treated lymphocytes after the flu.
8	fc receptor heterogeneity immunofluorescent studies of b t and third population lymphocytes in human blood with rabbit igg b4 anti b4 complexes	Dapos studies; immunofluorescence of apo; fc receptor heterogeneity of b t lymphocytes and third population in human blood with antib4 rabbit complexes.
8	a simple and rapid method to distinguish between rosettes and non specific aggregation of erythrocytes in the rosette assay for human t lymphocytes	A quick and simple method for distinguishing between rosettes and l' nonspecific aggregation of erythrocytes in the rosette test for human lymphocytes.
8	kinetics of 21 trisomic lymphocytes i in vitro response of 21 trisomic lymphocytes to pha	Kinetics of 21 trisomic lymphocytes i, in vitro response of 21 trisomic lymphocytes to the pha.
8	baisc protein hydrolysis in lymphocytes of lewis rats with experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	L' hydrolysis of the baisc proteins in lymphocytes of experimental rat lewis with apos; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes detected by using 5 bromdeoxyuridine	Sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes were detected by the use of 5 bromdeoxyuridine.
8	the cytolytic effect of puva treatment on pha stimulated human peripheral lymphocytes	The cytolytic effect of puva treatment on pha stimulated the human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	a further contribution on nucleoli of human lymphocytes	Another contribution on human lymphocyte nucleoli.
8	differences in purine metabolizing enzyme activities in human leukemia t cell b cell and null cell lines	Differences in the enzymatic activities that metabolize purines in human leukemia b cells and null cell lines.
8	behaviour of sheep immunoglobulin bearing and non immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes isolated by nylon wool columns	Behaviour of non-carrier and carrier lymphocytes; sheep immune globulin (BIG) isolated by nylon woolen columns.
8	an improved syncytia infectivity assay for the bovine leukemia virus	Improvement of the apo; apo test; syncytia infectivity for bovine leukemia virus.
8	3h thymidine labelling kinetics of peripheral blood lymphocytes in adult thymectomized mice	Thymidine labelling kinetics of peripheral lymphocytes in adult thymectomized mice.
8	replication patterns of three isodicentric x chromosomes and an x isochromosome in human lymphocytes	Replication patterns of three isodicentric and d&apos x chromosomes; one isochromosome x in human lymphocytes.
8	augmented mitotic response of human peripheral lymphocytes in the presence of lymphocytes from nude mice detection of a small number of functional human lymphocytes in the explanted host	Increased mitotic response of human peripheral lymphocytes to lymphocytes from nude mice, detection of apo; a small number of functional human lymphocytes in the transplanted host.
8	nonspecific activation of murine lymphocytes i proliferation and polyclonal activation induced by 2 mercaptoethanol and alpha thioglycerol	Non-specific activation of the mouse lymphocytes i proliferation and polyclonal activation induced by 2 mercaptoethanol and alpha thioglycerol.
8	secondary cytotoxic response in vitro against moloney lymphoma cells antigenically altered by drug treatment in vivo	A secondary cytotoxic reaction in vitro against moloney lymphoma cells damaged by an in vivo drug treatment.
8	autoreactivity between lymphocytes and thymus cells in myasthenia gravis	Autoreactivity between the lymphocytes and thymus cells in severe myasthenia.
8	the surface morphology of mitogen stimulated human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Lymphocytes of human peripheral blood are stimulated by the surface morphology of mitogen.
8	evidence that blood group a antigen on lymphocytes is derived from the plasma	Well, the evidence that the blood type is an antigen on the lymphocytes came from the plasma.
8	induction of long lived chromosome damage as manifested by sister chromatid exchange in lymphocytes of animals exposed to mitomycin c	The induction of long-term chromosomal damage is manifested by the exchange of sister chromatids in the lymphocytes of animals exposed to mitomycin c.
8	caffeine inhibition of prereplication repair of mitomycin c induced dna damage in human peripheral lymphocytes	Caffeine inhibition of the repair of mitomycin c prior to replication caused an alteration of the DNA in the human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	response of human lymphocytes to mitogen at what stage is there a requirement for ca2	The response of human lymphocytes to mitogen-t-at what stage is there a need for ca2?
8	expression and specificity of fcigg receptor sites on neoplastic lymphocytes	L' expression and specificity of neoplastic lymphocyte fcigg receptor sites.
8	inhibition of human lymphocyte responses by methylmethacrylate	Methylmethacrylate inhibition of human lymphocyte responses.
8	in vitro assay for responsiveness of lymphocytes to transfer factor by a new leukocyte migration inhibitory test	In vitro assay of lymphocyte responsiveness to transfer factor by a new Dapos test; inhibition of leukocyte migration.
8	immunologic study of t and b lymphocytes in thymectomized monkeys after irradiation and autologous bone marrow transplantation	Immunological study of t- and b-cells in thymectomized monkeys following irradiation and autologous bone marrow transplantation.
8	cytotoxic effects of toximul mp8 in human lymphocytes in culture a preliminary investigation	Cytotoxic effects of toximul mp8 on human lymphocytes in culture, preliminary study.
8	macrophages lymphocytes and plasma cells in the perivascular compartment in chronic multiple sclerosis	Lymphocyte and plasma cell macrophages in the perivascular compartment in chronic multiple sclerosis.
8	beta adrenoreceptors on the surface membranes of lymphocytes and macrophages	Beta-adrenoceptors on surface membranes of lymphocytes and macrophages.
8	lymphocyte mediated natural cytotoxicity in neoplasia	Natural lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in neoplasia was due to natural cytotoxicity.
8	in vitro induction of cytotoxic effector cells with spontaneous killer cell specificity	In vitro, induction of cytotoxic effector cells with specificity for spontaneous killer cells.
8	lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in patients with head and neck cancer	Interaction of lymphocyte cancer cells in patients with head and neck cancer.
8	lymphocyte associated beta 2 microglobulin studied by crossed radioimmunoelectrophoresis	The beta-2 microglobulin associated with lymphocytes was studied by cross-linked radioimmunoelectrophoresis.
8	affinity chromatography of nonhistone chromosomal proteins from lymphocytes on dna agarose columns	Chromatography of apos cells; affinity of nonhistone chromosomal proteins of lymphocytes on apos columns; DNA agarosis.
8	sister chromatid exchange induced by x ray of human lymphocytes and the effect of l cysteine	L' x-ray induced sister chromatid exchange in human lymphocytes and l' effect of cysteine.
8	transglutaminase activity in human lymphocytes early activation by phytomitogens	L' transglutaminase activity in human lymphocytes is activated early by the phytomitogens.
8	uptake and early fate of metaphase chromosomes ingested by the wi l2 human lymphoid cell line	Absorption and early becoming of metaphase chromosomes ingested by the wi l2 line of human lymphoid cells.
8	the lymphocyte transformation response of fetal hemolymphatic tissue to mitogens and antigens	The response of lymphocyte transformation of fetal hemolymphatic tissue to mitogens and antigens.
8	lack of effect of halothane on e ea and eac rosette formation and cyclic amp level of human lymphocytes	Absence of apo; effect of apo; halothane on eac and eac rosette formation and cyclic rate; human lymphocyte blisters.
8	production of prostaglandins in mixed lymphocyte cultures mlc between allograft donors and recipients	Production of prostaglandins in mixed-cell lymphocyte cultures between donors and allograft recipients.
8	comparison of the relative cytotoxic effector cell capabilities and the proportions of cells bearing various surface markers in human tonsil and peripheral blood mononuclear cells	Comparison of the relative cytotoxic capacities of effector cells and the proportions of cells with various surface markers in mononuclear cells of human amygdala and peripheral blood.
8	detection and separation of two serum factors responsible for depression of lymphocyte activity in pregnancy	The detection and separation of two serologic factors responsible for the decrease in liver function; lymphocytic activity during pregnancy.
8	a new approach to the autoradiographic study of proliferating lymphocytes	A new approach to autoradiography studies of proliferating lymphocytes.
8	interferon and spontaneous cytotoxicity in man i enhancement of the spontaneous cytotoxicity of peripheral lymphocytes by human leukocyte interferon	Interferon and spontaneous cytotoxicity in humans; increased spontaneous cytotoxicity of peripheral lymphocytes by humans; and human leukocyte interferon.
8	thymic humoral factor in the assessment of t lymphocytics in a patient with t cell chronic lymphocyte leukemia	Thymic humoral factor in lymphocytic assessment in a patient with T cell chronic lymphocyte leukemia.
8	a 3h thymidine paper strip method for stimulation of lymphocytes i culture conditions for human or murine lymphocytes and reproducibility of the paper strip method	Thymidine strip method of 3 h for the stimulation of lymphocytes i culture conditions of human or murine lymphocytes and paper strip reproducibility.
8	symposium on membrane markers and antigens of human lymphocytes and leukemic cells	Human lymphocyte and leukemia cell membrane markers and antigens symposium.
8	lymphocytes within glial cells emperipolesis in a case of a granular cell tumor	Lymphocytes on the inside of the glial cell walls are victims of apos; emperipolesis in the case of apos; a granular cell tumour.
8	detection of b lymphocyte b cell associated antigens on human leukemic lymphocytes masking of membrane antigens	Antigen-associated b lymphocyte antigens on human leukemic lymphocytes that mask antigens in the skin.
8	suppression of human cytotoxic lymphocytes by methylprednisolone an immunosuppressive mechanism of action of steroids	The suppression of human cytotoxic lymphocytes by methylprednisolone is an important mechanism for the immunosuppressive action of steroids.
8	liposomes as model membrane systems for immune attack i transfer of antigenic determinants to lymphocyte membranes after interactions with hapten bearing liposomes	Liposomes as model membrane systems for the immune system; transfer of antigenic determinants to lymphocyte membranes after interactions with hapten-bearing liposomes.
8	the induction of cytolytic t lymphocytes with specificity for p azophenylarsonate coupled syngeneic cells	Induction of cytolytic t-cell cells with specificity to p-azophenylarsonate-coupled syngenic cells.
8	target antigens of cell mediated lympholysis discrimination of hla subtypes by cytotoxic lymphocytes	Targeted antigen of cell-mediated lympholysis discrimination of-types hla by cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	double expression of vh region a2 and a3 allotypes in individual rabbit lymphocytes	Double expression of allotypes of vh a2 and a3 regions in individual rabbit lymphocytes.
8	in vitro studies of the rabbit immune system vi rabbit anti mouse cytotoxic t effector cells are inhibited by anti rabbit t cell serum in the absence of complement	In vitro studies of rabbit immune system vi rabbit against mouse cytotoxic effect t cells were inhibited by rabbit immune serum-t cells in the absence of complement.
8	rosette formation in chronic lymphocytic leukemia studies of lymphocytes from peripheral blood and lymph node biopsy	Formation of a rosette in chronic lymphocytic leukemia studies of peripheral blood lymphocytes and lymphocyte biopsy.
8	carbohydrate composition of peripheral cultured and leukaemic human lymphocyte plasma membranes	Carbohydrate composition of plasma membranes of cultured and leukemic peripheral human lymphocytes.
8	activation of measles virus from silently infected human lymphocytes	L' activation of the measles virus from silently infected human lymphocytes.
8	failure of autologous mixed lymphocyte reactions between t and non t cells in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus	Insufficient autologous mixed lymphocyte responses between t and non-t cells in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
8	the enhancing effect of multiple sclerosis brain homogenates on the active e rosette forming lymphocytes	Lapse; increase in apo; effect of MS brain homogenates on active rosette forming lymphocytes.
8	suppression of lymphocyte proliferation by a nonspecific factor produced by the burkitt lymphoma derived lymphoblast cell line	Suppression of lymphocyte proliferation by a nonspecific factor produced by the Burkitt lymphoblast cell line.
8	ebv antigens in lymphocytes of patients with exudative tonsillitis infectious mononucleosis and hodgkin s disease	Antigen ebv in lymphocytes of patients with exudative tonsillitis, infectious mononucleosis, and Hodgkin's disease.
8	advantages of cryopreserved lymphocytes for sequential evaluation of human immune competence ii mixed lymphocyte cultures and mononuclear cell subpopulations	The benefits of cryopreserved lymphocytes for immune competence; sequential assessment of human immune competence ii mixed cell cultures and under-mononuclear cell populations.
8	in vitro generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by tumor extracts of transitional cell carcinoma	In vitro generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes from extracts of transient cellular carcinomas.
8	lithium a modulator of cyclic amp dependent events in lymphocytes	Lithium is a modulator of apos; cyclic events dependent on the blisters in lymphocytes.
8	transitional cell carcinoma lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity	Lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in transition cells of lymphocyte carcinoma is cytotoxicity.
8	detection and separation of lymphocytes with specific surface receptors by using microparticles	The detection and separation of lymphocytes with surface receptors specific to the apos; aid of microparticles.
8	lymphocyte morphology in mucoid middle ear effusions	Lymphocyte morphology in mucoid middle ear effusions.
8	nonspecific suppressive and cytostatic activities mediated by human colonic carcinoma tissue or cultured cell extract	Cytostatic and suppressive non-specific activities mediated by human colonic carcinoma or l' extracts from cultured cells.
8	cytotoxicity of human peripheral lymphocytes in cell mediated lympholysis antibody dependent cell mediated lympholysis and natural cytotoxicity assays after mixed lymphocyte culture	Antibody-mediated cell-mediated lympholysis cytotoxicity of human peripheral lymphocytes, cell-mediated lympholysis, and natural cytotoxicity assays after mixed lymphocyte culture.
8	in vitro sensitization of human lymphocytes against histiocytic lymphoma cell lines ii characterization of two different effector activities and of suppressor cells	In vitro sensitization of human lymphocytes to cell lines of histiocytic lymphoma ii characterization of two different effector activities and of suppressive cells.
8	toxicity of na251cro4 when used to label rat lymphocytes	Toxicity of na251cro4 when used to label lymphocytes from rats.
9	markovian model of time patterns of speech	The Markovian model of temporal speech patterns.
9	the squid giant axon mathematical models	These are mathematical models of giant squid axons.
9	isotope flows and flux ratios in biological membranes	It's called isotope flow and flux ratios in biological membranes.
9	a note on puck and steffen s equations for the life cycle analysis of mammalian cells	Palet and steffen equations for the analysis of the life cycle of mammalian cells.
9	analysis of permeability data for the case of parallel diffusion pathways	Analysis of permeability data for parallel diffusion channels.
9	the input impedance of an assembly of randomly branching elastic tubes	L' impedance d' input d' a randomly branched set of elastic tubes.
9	a mathematical evaluation of the core conductor model	A mathematical evaluation of the basic kernel conductor model.
9	correction to one of macarthur s species abundance formulas	Corrected to apos; one of the formulas; macarthur species abundance.
9	the tail movement of bull spermatozoa observations and model calculations	The movement of the tail of bull sperm observed and model calculations.
9	inactivation of oriented bacteria with polarized ultraviolet light	Inactivation of bacteria oriented by the polarized ultraviolet light.
9	a unified kinetic hypothesis of carrier mediated transport its applications	A unified kinetic hypothesis of transport carrier-mediated applications.
9	the steady state properties of ion exchange membranes with fixed sites	Properties to the apo; apo state; exchange membrane balance of apo; ions with fixed sites.
9	an extension of the solid angle potential formulation for an active cell	An extension of the d&apos potential formulation; solid angle for an active cell.
9	a quantitative analysis of the voltage current relationships of fixed charge membranes and the associated property of punch through	A quantitative analysis of the tension current relationships of fixed-head membranes and the associated punching properties across membranes.
9	a mathematical physical model of the genesis of the electrocardiogram	A physical mathematical model of the genesis of the apos; electrocardiogram.
9	volume conductor fields of action currents	D&apos fields; volume-conducting action of the current; action.
9	an analysis of age prevalence data by catalytic models a contribution to the study of bilharziasis	Analysis of prevalence data by age; age at onset; contribution of catalytic models; schistosomiasis study.
9	the steady state properties of an ion exchange membrane with mobile sites	Properties at the site; state of repair; d*apos equilibrium; a d*apos exchange membrane; ions with mobile sites.
9	use of fourier series for the analysis of biological systems	Use of Fourier series for analysis of biological systems.
9	response of nonspherical biological particles to alternating electric fields	Response of non-spherical biological particles to alternative electric fields.
9	the numerical solution of the time dependent nernst planck equations	The numerical solution of the nernst-plankk time-dependent equations.
9	a theoretical analysis of neuronal variability	A theoretical analysis of neural variability.
9	limitations on complexity of random learning networks	The limits of the complexity of the networks d'apos; random learning.
9	on the concentration gradient across a spherical source washed by slow flow	On the gradient of concentration through a spherical source washed by a slow flow.
9	the non steady state membrane potential of ion exchangers with fixed sites	The membrane potential at the base; the nonstationary state of the ion exchange at fixed sites.
9	state vector description of the proliferation of mammalian cells in tissue culture i exponential growth	Vector description of apo; state of mammalian cell proliferation in tissue culture i exponential growth.
9	treatment of low angle x ray data from planar and concentric multilayered structures	Processing low-angle X-ray data from planar and concentric multi-layer structures.
9	observable changes of hypotheses under positive reinforcement	Observable changes; hypotheses with a positive reinforcement.
9	osmotic flow in a rigid porous membrane	Osmotic flow in a rigid porous membrane, sir.
9	oxygen hemoglobin system a model for facilitated membranous transport	The system of d' haemoglobin oxygen is a model for facilitating membrane transport.
9	the measurement of synthesis rates of albumin and fibrinogen in rabbits	Measurement of rates of albumin and fibrinogen synthesis in rabbits.
9	some kinetic properties of a deterministic epidemic confirmed by computer simulation	In addition, a deterministic epidemic was confirmed by computer simulation.
9	potassium 40 content as a basis for the calculation of body cell mass in man	Potassium 40 as the basis for calculating the mass of body cells in men.
9	a mathematical model of the human respiratory control system	A mathematical model of the human respiratory control system of the human respiratory apparatus, the mathematical model of the respiratory control system.
9	investigation of an operator method in the analysis of biological tracer data	Laboratory; biological marker data analysis; biological marker data analysis; biological marker analysis; a biological marker methodology; operator.
9	steady state phototropism in phycomyces	Phototropy at apos; state of apos; equilibrium in the phycomycetes.
9	differential growth and phototropic bending in phycomyces	Differential growth and phototropic bending in the phycomycetes.
9	kinetics of growth of individual cells of escherichia coli and azotobacter agilis	Kinetics of the growth of individual cells of: escherichia coli and d' azotobacter agilis.
9	studies of cell deformability iv a possible role of calcium in cell contact phenomena	Studies of the deformability of cells iv a possible role of calcium in cell contact phenomena.
9	determination of distribution of diffusing capacity in relation to blood flow in the human lung	Distribution of diffusion capacity in relation to blood flow in human lungs.
9	intercellular communication and tissue growth i cancerous growth	Cell-to-cell communication and tissue growth i cancer growth.
9	synthesis of rna in mammalian cells during mitosis and interphase	Rna synthesis in mammalian cells during mitosis and l' interphase.
9	absolute sensitivity of electron microscope radioautography	Radioautography's absolute sensitivity to electron microscopy.
9	studies on cell deformability 3 some effects of edta on sarcoma 37 cells	Cells deformability studies Some effects of Edta on sarcoma 37 cells.
9	physicochemical differences between fragments of plasma membrane and endoplasmic reticulum	Physico differences-chemicals between plasma membrane and endoplasmic reticulum fragments.
9	a theory of fluid flow in compliant tubes	A theory of the flow of fluid through the conditioning tubes compliance tubes.
9	cell growth and division i a mathematical model with applications to cell volume distributions in mammalian suspension cultures	Cell Growth and Division i, a mathematical model that can be applied to cell volume distribution in mammalian suspension culture systems.
9	the application of electromagnetic theory to electrocardiology ii numerical solution of the integral equations	Application of electromagnetic theory to cellular processes; electrocardiology ii numerical solution of integral equations.
9	aerobic microbial growth at low oxygen concentrations	Aerobic microbial growth at low concentrations of the oxygen.
9	limitations on the equivalent cardiac generator	There are limitations on the equivalent cardiac generator.
9	orientation in systems with asymmetric density distribution	L' orientation in systems with an asymmetric density distribution.
9	the kinetics of osmotic transport through pores of molecular dimensions	The kinetics of osmotic transport through molecular-sized pores.
9	are infinity machines paradoxical can processes involving an infinite sequence of operations or acts be completed in a finite time	Infinite machines are paradoxical may processes involving an infinite sequence of operations or actions to be completed in a finite time.
9	some relations between changes in the linear electrical properties of striated muscle fibers and changes in ultrastructure	Some relationships between changes in the linear electrical properties of the striated muscle fibers and changes in the ultrastructure.
9	a new approach to molecular configuration applied to aqueous pore transport	A new molecular configuration approach to aqueous pore transport.
9	osmotic volume flow in the proximal tubule of necturus kidney	Volume flow osmotic in the proximal tubule of the necturus kidney.
9	the active state of mammalian skeletal muscle	Active state of mammalian skeletal muscle.
9	application of fourier analysis to the visibility of gratings	Application of fingerprint data; Fourier analysis at screen visibility.
9	the energetics of tortoise muscle	L' turtle muscle energy.
9	the relation of oxygen intake and velocity of walking and running in competition walkers	The relationship between oxygen supply and walking and running speed in competitive walkers.
9	wave propagation in a viscous fluid contained in an orthotropic elastic tube	Wave in a viscous fluid contained in an elastic orthotropic tube.
9	the application of electromagnetic theory to electrocardiology i derivation of the integral equations	L' application of electromagnetic theory to apos; electrocardiology integral equation derivation.
9	on the relative contribution of viscous flow vs diffusional frictional flow to the stationary state flow of water through a tight membrane	On the relative contribution of the slime flow versus the slime flow; frictional diffusion flow to the apos; stationary flow of the apos; water through a tight membrane.
9	the time dependence of single file diffusion	The temporal dependence of diffusion in single file format.
9	the kinetics of a novel cyclic reaction system and its use in the assay of polynucleotide phosphorylase or adenosine diphosphate plus adenosine triphosphate	Apos kinetics; a novel cyclic reaction system and its use in apos; polynucleotide phosphorylase or apos assay; adenosine diphosphate plus adenosine triphosphate.
9	methods for the determination of adipose cell size in man and animals	Methods for determining fat cell size in humans and animals.
9	deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis during exponential growth and microcyst formation in myxococcus xanthus	L&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid during exponential growth and microcyst formation in the myxococcus xanthus.
9	standing gradient osmotic flow a mechanism for coupling of water and solute transport in epithelia	Steady-gradient osmotic flux, a coupling mechanism for transport of water and solute in the epithelium.
9	validity of the force velocity relation for muscle contraction in the length region l less than or equal to l o	Validity of the force relationship-velocities for muscle contraction in the region of length l less than or equal to l o.
9	theoretical series elastic element length in rana pipiens sartorius muscles	Theoretical length series of elastic elements in rana pipiens sartorius muscles.
9	heat work and phosphorylcreatine break down in muscle	Heat and phosphorylcreatin decay in the muscle tissue.
9	the site of calcium binding in relation to the activation of myofibrillar contraction	The calcium binding site in relation to the etapos; activation of the myofibrillar contraction.
9	hydrolysis of polynucleotides and the characterization of their secondary structure a theoretical study	Hydrolysis of polynucleotides and characterization of their secondary structure is a theoretical study.
9	a study of the alkaline hydrolysis of fractionated reticulocyte ribosomal ribonucleic acid and its relevance to secondary structure	A study of the alkaline hydrolysis of reticulated ribonucleic ribosomal acid, and its relationship to the secondary structure.
9	an approach to the study of phase separation in ternary aqueous systems	An approach for the study of phase separation in aqueous ternary systems.
9	membrane potentials at zero current the significance of a constant ionic permeability ratio	Zero current membrane potentials, meaning d' a constant ratio of ion permeability.
9	a method to relate steady state ionic currents conductances and membrane potential in ion exchange membranes with unknown thermodynamic properties	A method to relate the ionic current conductances to the steady state and membrane potential in apo-membrane membranes; d&apos exchange; ions whose thermodynamic properties are unknown.
9	numerical data concerning the sensitivity of anaerobic bacteria to oxygen	Numerical data concerning sensitivity of anaerobic bacteria to oxygen.
9	sulfur isotope fractionation and kinetic studies of sulfite reduction in growing cells of salmonella heidelberg	By sulfur isotope fractionation and sulfite reduction kinetic studies in growing Salmonella heidelberg cells.
9	enzyme activities in polarized cell membranes	Enzyme activity in polarized cell membranes.
9	visual adaptation of the rhodopsin rods in the frogs retina	Visual adaptation of rhodopsin rods in frog retinas.
9	spectral sensitivity of the planarian ocellus	Spectral sensitivity of the planar cell.
9	filtration coefficient of the axon membrane as measured with hydrostatic and osmotic methods	Axonal membrane filtration coefficient, as measured by hydrostatic and osmotic methods.
9	passive electrical properties of rod outer segments	Passive electrical properties of the outer segments of the stem.
9	a kronig penney model of salts of dna	A kronig penney salt model.
9	a thermodynamic analysis of fluxes and flux ratios in bioligical membranes	Thermodynamic analysis of flux and flux ratios in bioligical membranes.
9	surface charge of giant axons of squid and lobster	Surface loading of the giant squid and lobster axons.
9	turbidimetric assays the antibiotic dose response line	Turbidimetric testing focuses on the dose line-response to antibiotics.
9	kinetic analyses of calcium movements in hela cell cultures i calcium influx	Kinetic analysis of calcium movements in helical cell cultures and calcium influx.
9	the kinetics of cellular proliferation in regenerating liver	The kinetics of cell proliferation in the liver undergoing regeneration.
9	diffusion and convective flow across membranes irreversible the thermodynamic approach	Diffusion and convective fluxes through the irreversible membranes; thermodynamic approach.
9	transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors ii a mathematical analysis of the areas of isodensity surfaces in reorienting gradient systems	Transport phenomena in zonal centrifugal rotors ii a mathematical analysis of isodensity in reorienting gradient systems.
9	rates of polypeptide chain assembly in liver in vivo relation to the mechanism of temperature acclimation in opsanus tau	The rates of d' polypeptide chain assembly in the liver in vivo are related to the d&apos mechanism; temperature acclimation in Opsanus tau.
9	linkage and selection new equilibrium properties of the two locus symmetric viability model	Linkage and selection of new properties d' equilibrium of the model of viability at two symmetric loci.
9	analysis of glycerol 3h transport in the frog oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques	Analysis of glycerol transport for 3 h in frogs; oocyte and frogs by extractive and radioautographic techniques.
9	estimation of radiation resistance values of microorganisms in food products	An estimate of the radiation resistance of microorganisms in the food supply.
9	distribution of circulation rates within a single tissue type	Distribution of the circulation rates in a single tissue type.
9	kinetics of fibrin clot lysis	K-Kinetics of fibrin clot lysis.
9	rod increment thresholds on steady and flashed backgrounds	D&apos thresholds; stem increment on lighted stable bottom.
9	impulse functions for human rod vision	D&apos functions; Impulse for human stem vision.
9	the variations in visual threshold measurement	Variations in the visual threshold measurement.
9	quantum efficiency and false positive rate	Quantum efficiency and a false-positive rate.
9	an analytical model of the counter current heat exchange phenomena	An analytical model of the processes of heat exchange and heat exchange, as opposed to the current model.
9	the dissipation and dispersion of small waves in arteries and veins with viscoelastic wall properties	The dissipation and dispersion of small waves in the arteries and veins with viscoelastic properties of the walls.
9	computed action potentials for purkinje fiber membranes with resistance and capacitance in series	Potential effects calculated for purkine fiber membranes with resistance and serial capacitance.
9	failure of the nernst einstein equation to correlate electrical resistances and rates of ionic self exchange across certain fixed charge membranes	Failure of capacitance; nernst einstein equation to correlate electrical resistors with capacitance rates; auto-ion exchange through certain fixed charge membranes.
9	frequency dependent capacitance of hydrophobic membranes containing fixed negative charges	Frequency-dependent capacitance of hydrophobic membranes containing fixed, negative charges.
9	computation of impulse conduction in myelinated fibers theoretical basis of the velocity diameter relation	Calculation of impulse conduction in myelinated fibers, the theoretical basis for the velocity-diameter relationship.
9	predicted delays in the activation of the contractile system	It is not known if this is due to a delay in the activation of the contractile system.
9	wave propagation through a viscous fluid contained in a tethered initially stresses orthotropic elastic tube	The propagation of waves through a viscous fluid contained in an elastic tube initially retained by a strap imposes an orthotropic stress on the elastic tube.
9	spectral studies of iron coordination in hemeprotein complexes difference spectroscopy below 250 millimicrons	Spectral studies of iron coordination in the differential spectroscopy of hemeprotein complexes at-below 250 millimicrons.
9	wave propagation through a newtonian fluid contained within a thick walled viscoelastic tube	The propagation of waves through a Newtonian fluid contained in a viscoelastic tube with a thick wall.
9	estimating the median generation time of proliferating cell systems in steady state	Estimation of median generation time of proliferating cell systems; state of equilibrium.
9	nonsteady state three compartment tracer kinetics i theory	Kinetics of the three-compartment tracers in an unstable state i theory i.
9	the extracellular potential field of the single active nerve fiber in a volume conductor	The extracellular potential field (ECF) of the single active nerve fiber in a volume conductor.
9	energetics of active transport processes	L' energetics of the active transport processes.
9	comparison of caplan s irreversible thermodynamic theory of muscle contraction with chemical data	Compare the irreversible thermodynamic theory of muscle contraction with the chemical data.
9	the electrical characteristics of fixed charge membranes solution of the field equations	Electrical characteristics of the solution of the fixed-head membranes of the field equations.
9	electroosmosis in membranes effects of unstirred layers and transport numbers i theory	Electroosmosis in membranes effects of transport numbers i theory and stationary layers.
9	capacitance of the surface and transverse tubular membrane of frog sartorius muscle fibers	Surface and transverse tubular membrane capacity of frog sartorius muscle fibers.
9	ammonium ion currents in the squid giant axon	Ion currents d' ammonium in the apos; giant squid axon.
9	interpretation of tracer data significance of the number of terms in specific activity functions	Interpretation of the data of tracers meaning the number of terms in the functions d' specific activity.
9	transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors i velocity and shear stress distributions of fluid during acceleration	Transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors i speed and fluid shear stress distributions during acceleration.
9	the influence of muscle length on the development of fatigue in toad sartorus	The influence of muscle length on fatigue development in the sartorus toad.
9	the active transport of 5 hydroxyindol 3 ylacetic acid and 3 methoxy 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid from a recirculatory perfusion system of the cerebral ventricles of the unanaesthetized dog	Active transport of 5 hydroxyindol-3 yelastic acid and 3 methoxy-4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid from d' a recirculatory infusion system of the cerebral ventricles of unanaesthetized dog.
9	responses to single photons in virual cells of limulus	Single photon reactions in virulent cells of the limulus.
9	a mathematical analysis of concomitant virus replication and heat inactivation	Mathematical analysis of virus and apo simultaneous replication; heat inactivation.
9	oxygen consumption in normally grown small for dates and large for dates new born infants	Oxygen consumption in normal shoots, small for dates and large for dates, newborns and newborns.
9	oscillations in controlled biochemical systems	Oscillations in all controlled biochemical systems.
9	division patterns from single escherichia coli cells	Dividing models from individual cells of d'apos; Escherichia coli.
9	the kinetics of mechanical activation in frog muscle	Kinetics of apos; apos activation; mechanical activation in frog muscle.
9	translational and rotational diffusion constants of tobacco mosaic virus from rayleigh linewidths	Translational and rotational diffusion constants of tobacco mosaic virus from the rayleigh linewidths.
9	the analysis of fluorescence decay by a method of moments	L' analysis of the decay of the fluorescence by a method of moments of the method of moments.
9	interpretation of tracer data	L' interpretation of the tracer data.
9	note on the stability problem for mammillary matrices	Note on stability stability stability problem for apo matrices; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status; apo civil status.
9	electrical sizing of particles in suspensions i theory	Electrical Dimensions of Suspended Particles i Theory i.
9	correlations between virulence and other characters of clostridium perfringens type a	Correlations between virulence and other clostridium perfringens type a.
9	temperature dependence of oscillation in squid axons comparison of experiments with computations	Comparison of the apos; oscillation of squid axons as a function of experimental temperature with calculations.
9	a model for ultraviolet and photoreactivating light effects in euglena	A model for ultraviolet and photoreactivating light in euglena.
9	distributed representations for actin myosin interaction in the oscillatory contraction of muscle	Distribution of muscle representations; myosin interaction; actin in oscillatory muscle contraction.
9	conjugation in escherichia coli k 12 and its modification by irradiation	Conjugation in escherichia coli k12, and its modification by irradiation.
9	the general theory of mapping functions for random genetic recombination	The general theory of genetic mapping functions for random genetic recombination.
9	determinants of pulmonary blood volume	The determinants of the pulmonary blood volume are as follows.
9	inhibition by iodine of the release of thyroxine from the thyroid glands of patients with thyrotoxicosis	Inhibition of thyroxine release by the thyroid glands of patients with thyrotoxicosis.
9	dark current and photocurrent in retinal rods	Dark current and photocurrent in the retinal rods.
9	ultraviolet inactivation dichroic ratio of oriented fd bacteriophage	D&apos dichroic ratio; ultraviolet inactivation of oriented bacteriophage fd.
9	study of biological pigments by single specimen derivative spectrophotometry	Spectrophotometric study of biological pigments on a single derived specimen.
9	concentration dependence of permeability coefficient to an electrolyte component across bovine lens capsule in vitro	The coefficient of permeability to an electrolyte component through the bovine lentil capsule in vitro.
9	calculations of pulsatile flow across bifurcations in distensible tubes	Calculation of the flow rate; pulsatile flow through the bifurcations in distensitive tubes.
9	studies on the origin of milk fat a further study of bovine serum lipoproteins and an estimation of their contribution to milk fat	Dairy fat origin, further study of bovine serum lipoproteins and evaluation of their contribution to milk fat.
9	quantitation of tail lesions in vaccinia infected mice	Quantification of tail lesions in vaccinia-infected mice.
9	ionized calcium in normal serum ultrafiltrates and whole blood determined by ion exchange electrodes	Calcium ionized in normal serum ultrafiltrates and whole blood determined by exchange electrodes.
9	the measure in vivo of regional cerebral oxygen utilization by means of oxyhemoglobin labeled with radioactive oxygen 15	In vivo measurement of liver, regional utilization of brain oxygen by means of apos; labelled oxygen with apos; radioactive oxygen.
9	on tuning and amplification by lateral inhibition	On the setting and l' amplification by lateral inhibition.
9	a model for responses to activation by axodendritic synapses	A model for apo responses; activation by axodendritic synapses.
9	a theoretical study of pulmonary capillary gas exchange and venous admixture	A theoretical study of pulmonary capillary gas exchange and the venous admixture.
9	passive membrane potentials a generalization of the theory of electrotonus	Passive membrane potentials a generalization of electrotonus theory.
9	rapid histamine assays a method and some theoretical considerations	A d&apos method; rapid analysis of l' histamine and some theoretical considerations.
9	exchange of carbon dioxide in the pregnant rhesus monkey multicompartmental analysis of carbon dioxide kinetics	L' exchange of carbon dioxide in the apos; multicompartmental analysis of the gravid rhesus monkey of the kinetics of carbon dioxide.
9	the electrical capacitance of phospholipid membranes	Electrical capacity of phospholipid membranes.
9	flow through a collapsible tube experimental analysis and mathematical model	Flux through a collapsible experimental analysis and mathematical model tube.
9	use of 33p as an indicator for 32p pulse labeling of nucleic acids in bacterial cultures	L' use of 33p as an indicator for 32p pulse nucleic acid labelling in bacterial cultures.
9	visibility of aperiodic patterns compared with that of sinusoidal gratings	Visibility of aperiodic patterns versus that of the sinusoidal networks.
9	kinetics of heterogeneous chemical reactions ii	Kinetics of heterogeneous chemical reactions ii.
9	x ray diffraction of myelin membrane ii determination of the phase angles of the frog sciatic nerve by heavy atom labeling and calculation of the electron density distribution of the membrane	X diffraction of myelin membrane rays ii determination of phase angles of the sciatic nerve of frogs by labelling heavy atoms and calculating the electron density distribution of the membrane.
9	a phenomenological theory of muscular contraction i rate equations at a given length based on irreversible thermodynamics	A phenomenological theory of the muscle contraction i rate equations at a given length based on irreversible thermodynamics.
9	a phenomenological theory of muscular contraction ii generalized length variations	The phenomenological Theory of Muscular Contracture ii.
9	nonlinear electrical effects in lipid bilayer membranes 3 the dissociation field effect	Nonlinear electrical effects in bilayer lipid membranes 3 l' field effect of dissociation.
9	demographic correlates of low birth weight	Demographic correlations of low birth weight.
9	the measurement of the exchangeable pools of cholesterol in the baboon	Measurement of cholesterol exchangeable reserves in baboons.
9	estimations of bacterial growth rates in natural waters	Estimates of bacterial growth rates in natural water supplies.
9	a model for the long time constant transient voltage response to current in epithelial tissues	A model for the long-term constant voltage response to the transient voltage current in epithelial tissues.
9	morphological variants of coliphage p1	Morphological variants of p1-ciphage.
9	mathematical approaches to the evaluation of the flux of gamma aminobutyrate in brain tissue in vitro	Mathematical approaches to apos; evaluation of gamma aminobutyrate flux in brain tissue in vitro.
9	gluconeogenesis in the kidney cortex flow of malate between compartments	Gluconeogenesis was found in the malate flux of the renal cortex between compartments.
9	interpretation of sucrose gradient sedimentation pattern of deoxyribonucleic acid fragments resulting from random breaks	Interpretation of the deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) sucrose gradient sedimentation pattern resulting from random failures.
9	validity of the british system for anticoagulant control using the national reagent	Validity of the British system of control of anticoagulants at apos; national reagent aid.
9	standardized annular assay of dual radioisotopes on a well type sodium iodide crystal	Standard annular test of two-isotope radio on a well-type sodium iodide crystal.
9	bilateral symmetry in morphogenesis of embryos	Bilateral symmetry in embryo morphogenesis.
9	a model for gallbladder function and cholesterol gallstone formation	Model for gallbladder function and gallstone formation on cholesterol.
9	chemical states of bacterial spores heat resistance and its kinetics at intermediate water activity	It is the chemical state of the bacterial spores that is resistant to heat and its kinetics to an intermediate activity of the water.
9	aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of sewage and activated sludge v analysis of population structure and activity	Aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of activated sewage and sludge v analysis of structure and l' population activity.
9	stress distribution in the canine left ventricle during diastole and systole	Canine left ventricle stress distribution during diastole and systole.
9	centrifugal sedimentation of virus particles for electron microscopic counting	Electron microscopic counting centrifugal silencing of virus particles.
9	computer treatment of gas liquid chromatographic data with special reference to fatty acid methyl esters	Computer processing of liquid chromatographic data with special reference to methyl esters of fatty acids.
9	quantitative determination of phosphorus in soybean lipids	Quantitative determination of phosphorus in the lipids of soybeans.
9	use of an epidemiological model for estimating the effectiveness of tuberculosis control measures sensitivity of the effectiveness of tuberculosis control measures to the social time preference	Use of epidemiologic models to estimate rates; efficacy of TB control measures susceptibility; effectiveness of TB control measures to social time preference.
9	q i iia os formula for predicting left atrial pressure in mitral stenosis	Formula q i iia os to predict left atrial pressure in the mitral stenosis.
9	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes ii oscillating phase transition	Co-operative effects in phase transport models; state of equilibration across membranes; oscillating phase transition.
9	selection and polygenic characters	It's called polygenic selection and typing.
9	a study of vascular stresses and deformations in relation to variations of the tonus and to their geometrical characteristics	A study of vascular stresses and strains as they relate to variation in tone and geometrical characteristics.
9	a study of the distribution of the flow in a branched system of vessels in parallel system of vessels	A study of the distribution of the apo; flow in a vacuum system; branching of the vessels into a parallel system of vessels into a parallel system of vessels into a study of the distribution of the apo; flow into a vacuum system; branching.
9	kinetics of initiation of germination of bacillus pumilus spores by hydrostatic pressure	L&apos kinetics; hydrostatic pressure initiation of germination of pumilus spores.
9	on the relation between effector concentration and the rate of induced enzyme synthesis	The relationship between the effector concentration and the induced rate of enzyme synthesis.
9	the potential distribution and the short circuiting factor in the sucrose gap	The potential distribution and short factor-circuit in the sucrose gap.
9	analysis of the components of ionic flux across a membrane	Analysis of components of ionic flux through a membrane.
9	kinetic theory model for ion movement through biological membranes i field dependent conductances in the presence of solution symmetry	Kinetic theory model for ionic motion across field-dependent biological membranes in the presence of solution symmetry.
9	pulse frequency modulation in neural systems a random model	Pulse frequency modulation in neural systems is a random model.
9	van der waals forces special characteristics in lipid water systems and a general method of calculation based on the lifshitz theory	Van der waals imposes special features in lipid water systems and a general calculation method based on lifshitz theory.
9	solutions to axon equations	Solutions to the axonal equations.
9	electrical properties of phospholipid vesicles	Electrical properties of phospholipid vesicles.
9	the writhing number of a space curve	The number of bends d'apos; a d'apos curve; space is the number of bends d'apos; a d'apos curve; space.
9	liquid scintillation spectrometer data processing by desk top computer	Processing of liquid scintillation spectrometer (LCS) data by desktop computer.
9	a mathematical study of nerve fiber interaction	A mathematical study of l' interaction of nerve fibres.
9	the locomotion of mouse fibroblasts in tissue culture	The locomotion of mouse fibroblast cells in tissue culture.
9	the geometry of peripheral myelin sheaths during their formation and growth in rat sciatic nerves	The geometry of the peripheral myelin sheaths during formation and growth in rat sciatic nerves.
9	the use of equilibrium density gradient methods for the preparation and characterization of blood group specific glycoproteins	Use of density gradient methods; balance for preparation and characterization of blood group specific glycoproteins.
9	cooperative regulation of cellular proliferation by intercellular diffusion	The cooperative regulation of cell proliferation through the use of cell-to-cell diffusion.
9	a physical model for muscular behavior	Physical model of muscular behavior.
9	focus formation by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex i theoretical analysis	Formation of a focal point by a theoretical analysis of murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex.
9	focus formation by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex ii quantitative aspects of the interaction between radiation leukemia virus and its murine sarcoma virus pseudotype in strain c57bl mouse embryo cells	Formation of a focal site by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex ii quantitative aspects of leukemia; interaction between radiation leukemia virus and its mouse sarcoma virus pseudotype in embryonic cells of the mouse c57bl strain.
9	calorific content of certain bacteria and fungi	Calorific content of some bacteria and fungi.
9	analysis of the multiseptate potential of bacillus subtilis	Multiserved potential of bacillus subtilis.
9	the myofilament lattice studies on isolated fibers i the constancy of the unit cell volume with variation in sarcomere length in a lattice in which the thin to thick myofilament ratio is 6 1	Studies of the myofilament network on isolated fibers i unit cell volume constancy with variation in sarcomere length in a network with a thin to thick myofilaments ratio of 6.1.
9	an exact constant field solution for a simple membrane	Exact constant field solution for a single membrane.
9	membrane potentials and ion permeability in a cation exchange membrane	Membrane potentials and ion permeability in cation exchange membrane.
9	electrical properties and ultrastructure of mycoplasma membranes	Electrical and ultrastructural properties of myoplasmal membranes.
9	the validity of the ussing flux ratio equation in a three dimensionally inhomogeneous membrane	The validity of l' equation using flux ratio in an inhomogeneous three-dimensional membrane.
9	studies with composite membranes preparation and measurement impedances	Composite membrane preparation studies and measurement impedances.
9	studies with composite membranes ii measurement of asymmetric properties	Composite Membrane Studies (CMT) ii measures asymmetric properties.
9	the role of diffusion in bimolecular solution kinetics	The role of diffusion in the kinetics of bimolecular solution.
9	the role of diffusion in enzyme kinetics	Role of diffusion in enzyme kinetics.
9	linear electrical properties of the transverse tubules and surface membrane of skeletal muscle fibers	Linear electrical properties of skeletal muscle fibre transverse tubules and surface membrane.
9	division cycle of myxococcus xanthus 3 kinetics of cell growth and protein synthesis	Myxococcus xanthus 3 division cycle kinetics of cell growth and protein synthesis.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes 3 the size distribution of peroxisomes and the incorporation of new catalase	Synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes 3, peroxisome size distribution and l' incorporation of d' a new catalase.
9	the dynamic characteristics of color coded s potentials	The dynamic characteristics of the potential encoded s color potentials.
9	response properties of a sensory hair excised from venus s flytrap	The response properties of a sensory hair extracted from Venus; a Venus flytrap.
9	cable theory for finite length dendritic cylinders with initial and boundary conditions	The cable theory for finite-length dendritic cylinders with initial and boundary conditions.
9	functional inactivation and appearance of breaks in rna chains caused by gamma irradiation of escherichia coli ribosomes	Functional inactivation and appearance of rna chain breaks caused by apos; gamma irradiation of apos ribosomes; escherichia coli.
9	blood flow slip and viscometry	Blood flow slide and viscometry.
9	numerical solution of steady state electrodiffusion equations for a simple membrane	Numerical solution of d&apos equations; apos electrodiffusion; steady state for single membrane.
9	fiber interaction in a nerve trunk	Fiber interaction in a nerve stem.
9	anisotropic absorption of linearly polarized light by cylindrical molecules	Anisotropic absorption of linearly polarized light by a cylindrical molecule.
9	cell growth and division v error analysis of the collins richmond equation	Cell growth and apo analysis; v-division error of apo; Collins Richmond equation.
9	ion microprobe mass analyzer	Ion microprobe mass analyser, mass analyzer.
9	matching sequences under deletion insertion constraints	D&apos sequences; pairing under constraints; deletions insertion.
9	kinetic theory model for ion movement through biological membranes 3 steady state electrical properties with solution asymmetry	Kinetic theory model for the movement of ions across biological membranes 3 electrical properties at apos; d&apos state; solution asymmetry equilibrium.
9	the independence principle a reconsideration	The principle of independence is reconsideration.
9	depression kinetics of ornithine transcarbamylase in escherichia coli	Kinetics of ornithine transcarbamylase in Escherichia coli.
9	macromolecular sieving by the dormant spore of bacillus cereus	A macromolecular smear by the dormant spore of the cereus bacillus.
9	action of ionizing radiation on sensitive strains of escherichia coli b	Action of ionizing radiation on sensitive strains of d' escherichia coli b.
9	direct determination of the structure of barium stearate multilayers by x ray diffraction	Direct determination of the structure of the multiple layers of barium stearate by X-ray diffraction.
9	the location of photopigment molecules in the cross section of frog retinal receptor disk membranes	L' location of photopigment molecules in the disc membrane cross section of frog retinal receptors.
9	net electric charge on photopigment molecules and frog retinal receptor disk membrane structure	Net electrical charge on frog retinal receptor photopigment molecules and disc membrane structure.
9	gas liquid chromatographic assay of lipid bound sialic acids measurement of gangliosides in brain of several species	Liquid chromatography in the gas phase of lipid-bound sialic acids (LFAs), measuring gangliosides in the brains of several species.
9	determination of the optimal priming dose for achieving an isotopic steady state in a two pool system application to the study of cholesterol metabolism	Dose determination; optimal initiation to reach a state of readiness; isotope balance in a two-pool system for apo; cholesterol metabolism study.
9	phonoangiography a new noninvasive diagnostic method for studying arterial disease	Phonoangiography is a new, non-invasive diagnostic method for the study of arterial diseases.
9	thermal resistance of certain oncogenic viruses suspended in milk and milk products	Thermal resistance of certain oncogenic viruses in suspension in milk and milk products.
9	herpes vimplex virus genome size and redundancy studied by renaturation kinetics	The size and redundancy of the genome of herpes vimplex virus were studied by renaturation kinetics.
9	divalent ions and the surface potential of charged phospholipid membranes	Divalent ions and surface potential of charged phospholipid membranes.
9	studies on the regulation of plasma cholesterol levels in squirrel monkeys of two genotypes	Studies of regulation of plasma cholesterol levels in squirrel monkeys of two genotypes.
9	cascade chromatography and automated multidimensional fractionation	Cascading chromatography and automatic multidimensional fractionation.
9	sterological measurements of cardiac ultrastructures implicated in excitation contraction coupling	Steric measurements of cardiac ultrastructures involved in elicitation contracture coupling.
9	renal gluconeogenesis in eviscerated diabetic rats	"""Renal gluconeogenesis in eviscerated diabetic rats,"" Diabetes, Vol."
9	staphylococcal enterotoxin b solid phase radioimmunoassay	Enterotoxin b staphylococcal, solid-phase radioimmunoassay.
9	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes iv one site two site and multisite models	Co-operative effects in transport models at apo; state d' membrane balance iv a site two and multisite models.
9	dielectrophoresis of cells	Cell dikrophoresis.
9	rotational diffusion of rhodopsin digitonin micelles studied by transient photodichroism	Rotational diffusion of rhodopsin digitonin micelles investigated by transient photodichroism.
9	biological ion exchanger resins i quantitative electrostatic correspondence of fixed charge and mobile counter ion	Exchange resins; biological ions Quantitative electrostatic fixed charge correspondence vs. @-> mobile ion.
9	biological ion exchanger resins 3 molecular interpretation of cellular ion exchange	Apos exchange resins; biological ions 3 molecular interpretation of apos; cellular ion exchange.
9	spectral analysis of laser light scattered from motile microorganisms	Spectral analysis of laser light scattered by a moving microorganism.
9	physicochemical and light scattering studies on ribosome particles	Physico studies-chemicals and light scattering studies on ribosomal particles.
9	reliability of computation in the cerebellum	Calculus reliability in the cerebellum.
9	white noise analysis of a neuron chain an application of the wiener theory	Analysis of white noise d' a neural chain, application of sausage theory.
9	a mathematical model of the controlled plant of the respiratory system	A mathematical model mathematical model of the controlled plant of the apos plant; apos plant; respiratory apparatus; respiratory apparatus.
9	a mathematical model of the human menstrual cycle	You know, a mathematical model of the human menstrual cycle.
9	a stochastic model for discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor	Stochastic model for discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor.
9	water permeability of isolated muscle fibers of a marine crab	The water permeability of the isolated muscle fibers from a crab shell.
9	mechanism of the enhancement of the bohr effect in mammalian hemoglobins by diphosphoglycerate	Apo mechanisms; increase in apo; boomer effect in apo; mammalian hemoglobin by diphosphoglycerate.
9	three dimensional reconstruction from radiographs and electron micrographs application of convolutions instead of fourier transforms	The three-dimensional reconstruction from X-rays and electronic micrographs l' application of convolutions instead of Fourier transforms.
9	quantitation of serum lipoproteins by electrophoresis on agarose gel standardization in lipoprotein concentration units mg 100 ml by comparison with analytical ultracentrifugation	Quantification of serum lipoproteins by standardizer gel electrophoresis; agarose in 100 mL lipoprotein concentration units compared with 100 mL lipoprotein concentration units; analytical ultracentrifugation.
9	early increase in left ventricular compliance after myocardial infarction	Early increase in left ventricular compliance after a heart attack.
9	the binomial nature of transmitter release at the crayfish neuromuscular junction	The binomial nature of transmitter release at the neuromuscular junction of the apos; crayfish.
9	quantitation of transplacental haemorrhage	Quantification of placental hemorrhage.
9	addition of chemical and osmotic free energies through negative interaction of protein bound ligands	Addition of chemical and osmotic free energies via apos; a negative interaction of protein-bound protein-bound ligands.
9	the state of water in muscle tissue as determined by proton nuclear magnetic resonance	L' state of l' water in muscle tissue as determined by proton nuclear magnetic resonance.
9	theoretical and experimental studies of energy exchange from jackrabbit ears and cylindrically shaped appendages	Theoretical and experimental study of the apos; exchange of d' energy from d' ears of hare and d' cylindrical appendages.
9	effects of viscosty and constraints on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels i theoretical analysis	Effects of stress and viscosity on wave dispersion and dissipation in large blood vessels i theoretical analysis.
9	effects of viscosity and constraints on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels ii comparison of analysis with experiments	Effects of viscosity and stress on wave dispersion and dissipation in large blood vessels ii comparison with experiment.
9	the dipole model and phase transitions in biological membranes	The dipolar model and phase transitions in biological membranes.
9	the measurement of glomerular filtration pressure from sieving data for macromolecules	Measurement of glomerular filtration pressure from the glomerular macromolecule screening data.
9	calculation of electron slowing down spectra i hard sphere cross sections	Calculation of hard-sphere cross sections to slow down the electronic spectra.
9	calculation of electron slowing down spectra ii classical cross sections	The calculation of the d' electron retardant spectra is carried out in the classical cross sections.
9	thresholds for lenticular damage in the rabbit eye due to single exposure to cw microwave radiation an analysis of the experimental information at a frequency of 2 45 ghz	Thresholds for lenticular damage in the rabbit's eye due to a single exposure to microwave radiation; analysis of experimental data at a frequency of 245 ghz.
9	the behavior of 137cs and other fallout radionuclides on a michigan dairy farm	The behaviour of 137c and d' other fallout radionuclides on a Michigan dairy farm.
9	asymmetries generated by diffusion and reaction and their bearing on active transport through membranes	Asymmetries generated by diffusion and reaction and their implications for active membrane transport.
9	construction of a three dimensional model of the polypeptide backbone of the variable region of kappa immunoglobulin light chains	Construction of a three-dimensional model of the polypeptide skeleton of the variable light chain region of apos; immunoglobulin kappa.
9	microscopic fat cell size measurements on frozen cut adipose tissue in comparison with automatic determinations of osmium fixed fat cells	Microscopic measurement of fat cell size on frozen cut adipose tissue as compared to automatic determination of fat cells attached to the osmium.
9	mass transfer from gas bubbles to impinging flow of biological fluids with chemical reaction	Mass transfer of natural gas bubbles to the environment; impervious flow of biological fluids by chemical reaction.
9	the rotating fourier s ring an alternative model for cell kinetic studies	The Fourier rotational ring is an alternative model for cellular kinetic studies.
9	computer simulation of after inhibition in crayfish slowly adapting stretch receptor neuron	Computer simulation of post-inhibition in the crayfish, slowly adapting the d&apos receptor neuron; stretch.
9	model simulation of blood flow and oxygen uptake during exercise	Model to simulate blood flow and oxygen consumption during exercise.
9	computer simulation of radial immunodiffusion i selection of an algorithm for the diffusion process	Computer simulation of the transmitter, radial immunodiffusion, and a selection algorithm for the diffusion process.
9	voltage clamp of cardiac muscle a theoretical analysis of early currents in the single sucrose gap	Cardiac muscle tension clamp, a theoretical analysis of the first currents in l' unique sucrose space.
9	spatial distribution of potential in a flat cell application to the catfish horizontal cell layers	Spatial distribution of potential in a flat cell-based application on fish horizontal cell layers-chat.
9	influence of electrolytes on the thicknesses of the phospholipid bilayers of lamellar lecithin mesophases	L' influence of electrolytes on apos; thickness of phospholipid bilayers of lecithin lamellar mesophases.
9	locomotion of spirilla	Spirly locomotion!
9	growth dynamics of mitochondria in synchronized chinese hamster cells	The dynamics of mitochondrial growth in synchronized Chinese hamster moth cells.
9	breakage of parental dna strands in haemophilus influenzae by 313 nm radiation after replication in the presence of 5 bromodeoxyuridine	The breaking of the strands of parental DNA in the apos; haemophilus influenzae by 313 nm radiation after replication in the presence of 5 bromodeoxyuridine.
9	mechanical properties of the sarcolemma and myoplasm in frog muscle as a function of sarcomere length	The mechanical properties of frog muscle sarcolemma and myoplasm as a function of sarcomere length.
9	neurological abnormalities in the cri du chat syndrome	Neurological abnormalities in cat cry syndrome.
9	a mathematical method for analysing questionnaires	A dapos method; a dapos analysis; a dapos analysis; a lapos analysis; Europe.
9	theoretical aspects of orbital steering	Theoretical aspects of the theory of orbital direction.
9	free energy calculations of the interactions of helical poly l proline with water	D&apos calculations; free energy for the interactions of the polyl helical proline with the polyl helical proline; water.
9	the stability theory of nonpolynomial kinetics	Stability theory of nonpolynomial kinetics.
9	lateral diffusion of phospholipids in a vesicle membrane	Lateral diffusion of the phospholipids in a membrane vesicle.
9	gene order of the poliovirus capsid proteins	Gene order of poliovirus capsid proteins.
9	voltage clamp experiments of single muscle fibers of rana pipiens	Experiences of potential imposed on simple muscle fibers of rana pipiens.
9	light adaptation of discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor	Adaptation to the light of discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor.
9	voltage dependent conductance induced in thin lipid membranes by monazomycin	Voltage-dependent conduct induced by monazomycin in thin lipid membranes.
9	phosphate starvation and the nonlinear dynamics of insect fibrillar flight muscle	Phosphate deprivation and the nonlinear dynamics of the insect's flight muscle fibrillar.
9	fluorescence spectroscopy of an oriented model membrane	Fluorescence spectroscopy d' a oriented model membrane.
9	magnetic anisotropy and the orientation of retinal rods in a homogeneous magnetic field	Magnetic anisotropy and orientation of retinal rods in homogeneous magnetic field.
9	ring orientation in ionone and retinals	Orientation of the apos; ring in the apos; ionone and retina.
9	energetics of isometric and isotonic twitches in toad sartorius	Energy from isometric and isotonic tremors in sartorius toads.
9	an energetic model of muscle contraction	It's an energy model of muscle contraction.
9	oxygen permeability of the limiting layers of the cornea	Permeability to apos; oxygen from the corneal boundary layers.
9	enzyme kinetics systematic generation of valid king altman patterns	Enzyme kinetics consistently generate valid altman King patterns.
9	red blood cell damage by shear stress	Shear stress damage to red blood cells.
9	cross sectional shape of collapsible tubes	Cut-out shape of the collapsible tubes.
9	the frequency response coherence and information capacity of two neuronal models	The consistency of the frequency response and the capability of two neural models.
9	origin of hepatic triglyceride fatty acids quantitative estimation of the relative contributions of linoleic acid by diet and adipose tissue in normal and ethanol fed rats	Origins of Hepatic Triglyceride Fatty Acids Quantitative estimate of the relative contributions of apo; linoleic acid by diet and fat in normal and apo-treated rats; ethanol.
9	determination of unidirectional uptake rates for lipids across the intestinal brush border	Determination of unidirectional lipids; absorption of lipids through the intestinal brush border.
9	nonequilibrium steady state differences in partial pressure of co 2 and in concentration of weak acids and bases between blood and tissue	Differences in partial pressure of co 2 and concentration of acids and weak bases between the blood and tissues at the apos; state of d' unbalanced balance.
9	oxygen equilibrium characteristics of abnormal hemoglobins hirose alpha 2 beta 2 37ser l ferrara alpha 2 47 gly beta 2 broussais alpha 2 90 asn beta 2 and dhofar alpha 2 beta 2 58arg	Characteristics of d' balance of apos; abnormal haemoglobin oxygen alpha 2 beta 2 37er ferrara alpha 2 47 gly beta 2 broussais alpha 2 90 asn beta 2 and dhofar alpha 2 beta 2 58arg.
9	the use of lithium in the treatment of thyrotoxicosis	L' use of lithium in the treatment of thyrotoxicosis.
9	correction for mechanical dead space in the calculation of physiological dead space	Correcting for mechanical death in the calculation of the number; space for physiological death.
9	the effect of membrane parameters on the properties of the nerve impulse	L' effect of membrane parameters on properties of nerve impulse.
9	dipole theory of heat production and absorption in nerve axon	Dipolar production and apo theory; heat absorption in the apo; nerve axon.
9	modeling the carotid sinus baroreceptor	Baroreceptor modulation of the carotid sinus.
9	on the electrostatic interaction across a salt solution between two bodies bearing unequal charges	Electrostatic interaction through a saline solution between two bodies carrying unequal charges.
9	myelin membrane structure as revealed by x ray diffraction	Myelin membrane structure revealed by X-ray diffraction.
9	a study of heavy light atom discrimination in bright field electron microscopy using the computer	A computer-based study of heavy light discrimination in bright field electron microscopy.
9	muscle energetics and the fenn effect	L' muscle energy and l' fennel effect.
9	studies with composite membranes 3 measurement of water permeability	Composite membrane studies 3 measurements of apo water permeability.
9	computer simulation of flagellar movement i demonstration of stable bend propagation and bend initiation by the sliding filament model	Computer simulation of the movement of the flagella i demonstration of the stable propagation of curvature and l' initiation of the curvature by the sliding filament model.
9	the transient response and impedance locus of a mobile site membrane	The transient response and locus d&apos impedance of a membrane with a mobile site.
9	number of deoxyribonucleic acid uptake sites in competent cells of bacillus subtilis	Number of sites; absorption of deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid into competent cells of subtilis bacillus.
9	taxonomy of aerobic marine eubacteria	Taxonomy of Aerobic Marine Eubacteria.
9	hydrostatic pressure and ionic strength effects on the kinetics of lysozyme	Effects of hydrostatic pressure and ionic strength on lysozyme kinetics.
9	h 2 co 3 as substrate for carbonic anhydrase in the dehydration of hco 3	A carbonic anhydrase in the dehydration of hco 3.
9	tautomerism of uracil and thymine in aqueous solution spectroscopic evidence	Tautomerism of uracil and thymine in aqueous uracil and thymine.
9	individual states in the cycle of muscle contraction	Individual states in the cycle of contraction.
9	z average sedimentation coefficient in reversibly self aggregating systems	Z Average sedimentation coefficient in Reversible Auto-Aggregation Systems.
9	ribonucleic acid synthesis in cells infected with herpes simplex virus controls of transcription and of rna abundance	Synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in herpes simplex virus infected cells controls transcription and l' rna abundance.
9	the interaction of histone iv with nucleoside triphosphates	L' interaction of l' histone iv with triphosphate nucleosides.
9	circadian surfaces and the diversity of possible roles of circadian organization in photoperiodic induction	Circadian surfaces and diversity of possible roles of the circadian organization in photoperiodic induction.
9	self association of gene 32 protein of bacteriophage t4	Auto-association of bacteriophage t4 protein gene 32.
9	estimating the number of organisms in quantal assays	An estimate of the number of organisms in quantum testing.
9	validity of computer interpretation of the electrocardiogram	Validity; computer interpretation of apo; electrocardiogram.
9	running up and down hills some consequences of size	Run down and up the hills some consequences of the size.
9	direct measurement of osteolysis in man	Direct measurement of osteolysis in adults; male.
9	the interpretation of current voltage relations recorded from a spherical cell with a single microelectrode	L' interpretation of voltage relationships recorded from d' a spherical cell with a single microelectrode.
9	membrane permeability generalization of the reflection coefficient method of describing volume and solute flows	Generalization of the membrane permeability of the reflection coefficient method to describe both bulk and solute flow.
9	analysis of the torus surrounding planar lipid bilayer membranes	Analysis of the torus surrounding the two-layer planar lipid membranes.
9	the graphical determination of k m and k i	The plotting of k m and k i i.
9	the control by ventilation of airborne bacterial transfer between hospital patients and its assessment by means of a particle tracer ii ventilation in subdivided isolation units	The ventilation control of the transfer of bacteria into the air between hospitalized patients and its evaluation by means of a particulate tracers ii ventilation in the units; subdivided isolation.
9	physical properties and subunit structure of l asparaginase isolated from erwinia carotovora	Physical properties and structure of apos units; isolated apos asparaginase; erwinia carotovora.
9	sex chromosome translocations in the evolution of reproductive isolation	Sex chromosome translocation in apo; evolution of apo; reproductive isolation.
9	valinomycin crystal structure determination by direct methods	Determination of the crystal structure of valinomycin by direct methods.
9	dynamics of number fluctuations motile microorganisms	Dynamics of microphone number fluctuations-mobile organizations.
9	the statistical nature of the acetycholine potential and its molecular components	The statistical nature of the potential of d' acetycholine and its molecular components.
9	a structure activity study of sympathomimetic amines on the beta adrenoreceptors of guinea pig trachea	A study of the structural activity of sympathomimetic amines on guinea pig tracheal beta-adrenoceptors.
9	a quantitative study of the anticholinergic action of several tricyclic antidepressants on the rat isolated fundal strip	A quantitative study of the anticholinergic action of several tricyclic antidepressants on the isolated rat genetic band.
9	amphetamine and conditioned anxiety	Amphetamine and conditioned anxiety.
9	kinetic studies of nitrogenase from soya bean root nodule bacteroids	Kinetic studies of the nitrogenase activity of soybean root nodule bacteroids.
9	the effect of substitution at c 2 of d glucose 6 phosphate on the rate of dehydrogenation by glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from yeast and from rat liver	L' effect of c2 substitution of glucose 6 phosphate on the rate of glucose dehydrogenation 6 phosphate dehydrogenase of yeast and rat liver.
9	the significance of abrupt transitions in lineweaver burk plots with particular reference to glutamate dehydrogenase negative and positive co operativity in catalytic rate constants	L' importance of abrupt transitions in linear weaver burk curves, particularly the negative and positive cooperativity of glutamate dehydrogenase in the catalytic rate constants.
9	inhibition by gamma hydroxybutyrate of chlorpromazine induced increase in homovanillic acid	The inhibition of chlorpromazine by gamma-hydroxybutyrate induces an increase in homovanillic acid (HLA) levels.
9	characteristics of the antitrypsin activity of human serum	Characteristics of the drug; antitrypsin activity of human serum.
9	a kinetic study of rabbit muscle pyruvate kinase	A kinetic study of rabbit muscle pyruvate kinase is described.
9	automatic screening of biological specimens by optical correlation	Automatic screening of biological specimens in the laboratory by optical correlation.
9	expression of fetal antigens in tumor cells	Expression of fetal antigens in tumour cells.
9	an engineering study of the peristaltic drive of axonal flow	A technical study of the apos; peristaltic drive of the apos; axonal flow.
9	phenylalanyl trna synthetase and isoleucyl trna phe a possible verification mechanism for aminoacyl trna	Phenylalanyl trna synthetase and l' isoleucyl trna phe constitute a possible mechanism for the verification of l' aminoacyl trna.
9	protein changes in different brain areas as a function of intermittent training	Protein changes in different brain regions as a function of brain function; intermittent training.
9	the anisotropic elastic properties of the sarcolemma of the frog semitendinosus muscle fiber	The anisotropic elastic properties of frog semitendinosus muscle fiber sarcolemma.
9	one dimensional harmonic model for biomolecules	One-dimensional harmonic model for biomolecules.
9	passive electrical properties of microorganisms v low frequency dielectric dispersion of bacteria	Passive electrical properties of low-frequency dielectric dispersal microorganisms of bacteria.
9	a model for the genetics of handedness	A model for genetic genetic genetics of the genetics of HIV/AIDS; adadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadad
9	on treating the chromosome as the unit of selection	To treat the chromosome as the unit of the apos; unit of the apos; unit of selection of the apos; unit of treatment.
9	methods of determining rate constants in single substrate single product enzyme reactions use of induced transport limitations of product inhibition	Methods for the determination of rate constants in single-substrate enzymatic reactions utilize induced limitations of the transport of the product.
9	the radiofrequency field distribution surrounding coils for intrauterine diagnostic procedures i geometrical factors	The distribution of the radiofrequency field surrounding the coils for intra-@ uterine diagnostic procedures i geometric factors.
9	simplified method in polynucleotide helix coil transition theory including binding of complementary monomer	A simplified method in the helix polynucleotide coil transition theory, including the complementary monomer binding.
9	dynamics of fluorescence polarization in macromolecules	Dynamics of polarization of fluorescence in macromolecules.
9	analysis of a calcium ion binding system composed of two different sites	Analysis of calcium ion binding system composed of two different sites.
9	reply to myelin membrane structure as revealed by x ray diffraction by david harker	Response to the membrane structure of myelin as revealed by X-ray diffraction by Dr. David Harker.
9	dissipative structures for an allosteric model application to glycolytic oscillations	These structures are dissipative for an application of d' an allosteric model with glycolytic oscillations.
9	the nature of electrosensing in the fish	The nature of fish electrosensing.
9	virial expansions for ideal self associating systems	Viral expansion for auto systems-associating ideals.
9	force balances in systems of cylindrical polyelectrolytes	Power balances in cylindrical poly-electrolyte systems.
9	a model of peritubular capillary control of isotonic fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule	A model of peritubular capillary control of the reabsorption of isotonic fluid by the renal proximal tubule.
9	van der waals forces between cylinders i nonretarded forces between thin isotropic rods and finite size corrections	Van der waals strengths between cylinders i undelayed forces between thin isotropic rods and finite dimension corrections.
9	van der waals forces between cylinders ii retarded interaction between thin isotropic rods	Van der waals forces between cylinders ii retard the apos; interaction between thin, isotropic shoots.
9	ionic partition between surface and bulk water in a silica gel a biological model	Ion sharing between surface water and surface water; bulk water in silica gel.
9	on two sex models leading to stable populations	On two sex models leading to a stable population.
9	quantitative studies of the delivery of hepatic synthesized bilirubin to plasma utilizing aminolevulinic acid 4 14 c and bilirubin 3 h in man	Quantitative dosage studies; bilirubin synthesized in plasma in liver using apos; aminolevulinic acid 4 c and bilirubin 3 h in men.
9	ultrafiltration of lipoproteins through a synthetic membrane implications for the filtration theory of atherogenesis	Ultra filtration of lipoproteins through a synthetic membrane implications for l&apos filtration theory; atherogenesis.
9	facilitated diffusion of monosaccharides in saccharomyces cerevisiae experimental investigation of kinetic parameters without the assumptions of symmetry	Facilitate diffusion of monosaccharides in the apos; experimental study of kinetic parameters in saccharomyces cerevisiae without assuming symmetry.
9	a new newton s law of cooling	New Newtonian law on cooling.
9	assessment of acid base disturbances employing a desk top computer	Assisted by a desktop computer to assess acid base disturbances.
9	three pool model of the long term turnover of plasma cholesterol in man	A three-pool model of long-term plasma cholesterol turnover in men.
9	improved estimation of body masses and turnover of cholesterol by computerized input output analysis	Improvement of weight; estimation of body mass and cholesterol turnover by weight; computerized analysis of inputs and outputs.
9	kinetics of small ising systems deviations from internal equilibrium in a tetrahedral model	In a tetrahedral model, the kinetics of small systems ising s' departs from the apos; internal equilibrium.
9	a new method for analyzing electron microscope autoradiographs using hypothetical grain distributions	A new d&apos method; electron microscopy autoradiography analysis using hypothetical grain distributions.
9	nonlinear spectroscopy	Nonlinear spectroscopy, please.
9	nomograms for calculation of heat loss	From a qualitative point of view, it does not exist; another means of achieving satisfactory results.
9	oxygen consumption by the component layers of the cornea	Consumption of oxygen by the corneal layers.
9	pancreatic acinar cells measurement of membrane potential and miniature depolarization potentials	Pancreatic acinar cells measure the miniature membrane potential and depolarization potentials.
9	a numerical inversion of the perrin equations for rotational diffusion constants for ellipsoids of revolution by iterative techniques	Numerical inversion of perrin equations for rotational diffusion constants of revolution ellipsoids by iterative techniques.
9	the need for a kinetics for biological transport	The need for kinetics for biological transport.
9	intracellular biopotentials during static extracellular stimulation	Intracellular biopotentials (ECBs) during static extracellular stimulation.
9	an automated microbiological method for the measurement of vitamin b12	Automatic microbiological method for b12 vitamin measurement.
9	the avian egg and the retina	They're eggs, birds and retinas.
9	the thermodynamic description of enzyme catalyzed reactions the linear relation between the reaction rate and the affinity	Thermodynamic description of enzyme-catalyzed reactions, linear relation between reaction rate and l' affinity.
9	concentrating engines and the kidney i central core model of the renal medulla	Concentration drivers and model of the central kidney i of the renal medulla.
9	concentrating engines and the kidney ii multisolute central core systems	Concentration Motors and Renal System ii Multisolute central core system.
9	a continuum mechanical approach to the flow equations for membrane transport i water flow	A continuous mechanical approach to flow equations for membrane transport and water flow.
9	finite difference solution for biopotentials of axially symmetric cells	Finite difference solution for axially symmetrical cell biopotentials.
9	integral equation solution for biopotentials of single cells	Solution d' integral equation for individual cell biopotentials.
9	dischroism of the infrared spectrum of nerve	Dischroism in the infrared spectrum of the nerve.
9	traveling wave solutions of a nerve conduction equation	Itinerant wave solutions, a nerve conduction equation.
9	deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization of r factors	Deoxyribonucleic acid Deoxyribonucleic acid Deoxyribonucleic acid reductive hybridization.
9	the double fixed charge membrane low frequency dielectric dispersion	Low-frequency, double-membrane, fixed-charge dielectric dispersion.
9	the double fixed charge membrane solution membrane ion partition effects and membrane potentials	Partition effects of membrane ions and membrane potentials in the membrane fixed charge solution.
9	physical properties of onsager s dipole chain model for ionic transport across membranes i steady state fluxes and instabilities	Physical properties of the onshore polar chain model for ion transport across membranes and fluxes; steady state.
9	studies on the fluorophore sempervirene and its complexes with dna	Studies of the sempervirene fluorophore and complexes with DNA.
9	phospholipid flip flop and the distribution of surface charges in excitable membranes	Dissociation of phospholipids and surface charge distribution in excitable membranes.
9	small angle x ray scattering of the thylakoid membranes of rhodopseudomonas speroides in aqueous suspensions	Low X-ray scattering of rhodopseudomonas speroides thylakoid membranes in aqueous suspensions was observed.
9	note on the theory of x ray diffraction by spherical shell structures	Note on the theory of spherical shell X-ray diffraction.
9	measurement of the size distribution of zymogen granules from rat pancreas	Measurement of the size distribution of the granules of zymogen in rat pancreas.
9	improved profiles of electron density distribution along collagen fibrils	Improved electron density distribution profiles along collagen fibrils.
9	studies on the analysis of fluorescence decay data by the method of moments	Analysis of fluorescence decay data by the moment method by the moment method.
9	probit transformation improved method for defining synchrony of cell cultures	The transformation of probits has improved the method of defining the synchrony of cell cultures.
9	normalization in the fitting of data by iterative methods application to tracer kinetics and enzyme kinetics	Standardization of apos; data adjustment by iterative methods applied to tracer kinetics and to enzyme kinetics.
9	branch input resistance and steady attenuation for input to one branch of a dendritic neuron model	Apos resistance; branch entry and constant attenuation of the apos; entry into a dapos branch; a dendritic neural model.
9	deformation of the diastolic left ventricle nonlinear elastic effects	Deformation of the nonlinear, elastic effects of the diastolic left ventricle.
9	electrical breakdown of bimolecular lipid membranes as an electromechanical instability	Electrical degradation of bimolecular lipid membranes is electromechanical instability.
9	radioimmunoassay of rat 1 fetoprotein	Radioimmunoassay of fetoprotein 1 in rats.
9	physiocochemical properties of low density lipoproteins of normal human plasma evidence for the occurrence of lipoprotein b in associated and free forms	The physiochemical properties of low density lipoproteins in normal human plasma indicate the presence of free and associated lipoproteins b.
9	a study of the properties of two porphyringlobin species formed in the reaction of protoporphyrin ix with human globin	A study of the properties of two species of porphyringlobins formed in the reaction of protoporphyrin ix with human globin.
9	a study of the properties of hybrids of oxyhaemoglobin and deoxyhaemoglobin with two porphyringlobin species	A study of the properties of apos; apos, oxyhemoglobin, and deoxyhemoglobin hybrids with two porphyringlobin species.
9	structural features of ring c of 20 oxo steroids and the interaction with cortisone reductase	Structural characteristics of the c cycle of 20 oxo steroids and interaction with cortisone reductase.
9	dynamics of glomerular ultrafiltration in the rat iv determination of the ultrafiltration coefficient	Dynamic of the apos; glomerular ultrafiltration in determination IV of the d&apos coefficient; ultrafiltration in the rat.
9	stereological analysis of mammalian skeletal muscle i soleus muscle of the adult guinea pig	Stereological analysis of mammalian skeletal i soleus muscle of adult guinea pig.
9	the kinetics of intramolecular distribution of 15n in uric acid after administration of 15n glycine a reappraisal of the significance of preferential labeling of n 3 9 of uric acid in primary gout	The kinetics of the intramolecular distribution of 15n in apos; uric acid after apos; 15n glycine administration was reevaluated with respect to apos; importance of preferential labeling of n.39 of apos; uric acid in primary drop.
9	linkage disequilibrium in subdivided populations	This is a linkage disequilibrium in the subdivided populations.
9	steady state enzyme kinetics with high affinity substrates or inhibitors a statistical treatment of dose response curves	The kinetics of enzymes in the apo state; equilibrium with high-affinity substrates or d*apos inhibitors; a statistical treatment of dose-response curves.
9	incidence of anticonvulsant osteomalacia and effect of vitamin d controlled therapeutic trial	Anti-vulsant osteomalacia and effect of dosing; controlled therapeutic trial with vitamin d.
9	transcription unit mapping in bacteriophage t7 i in vivo transcription by escherichia coli rna polymerase	Mapping of the transcription units in bacteriophage t7 i in vivo by escherichia coli rna polymerase.
9	numerator analysis of fertility change in costa rica a methodological examination	Analysis by numerator of the fertility changes in the costa rica a methodological examination.
9	weighting functions and data truncation in the fitting of multi exponential functions	Weighting functions and data truncation in appos; adjustment of multi-exponential functions.
9	electrical response to vibration of a lipid bilayer membrane	Electrical response to vibration d' lipid bilayer membrane.
9	the stiffness of the flagella of impaled bull sperm	The rigidity of the flagella of the impaled bull semen.
9	direct structure determination of multilayered membrane type systems which contain fluid layers	Direct determination of the structure of multilayer membrane-type systems that contain fluid layers.
9	cysteine activation in cultured cystinotic cells the specific activity of cysteinyl trna synthetase and trnacys and the determination of the michaelis menten constants for cysteinyl trna synthetase	L' cysteine activation in cultured cystotic cells; cysteinyl trna synthetase and trnacys specific activity; determination of michaelis menten constants for cysteinyl trna synthetase.
9	an experimental evaluation of genetic correlation	Experimental evaluation of genetic correlation.
9	limiting distribution under assortative mating	Limitations of distribution under the angle of the wedge; matching by sexual choice.
9	gene flow and selection in a cline	Gene flow and selection within a cline.
9	on the thermodynamics of cell injury some insights into the molecular mechanisms	On the subject of the thermodynamics of cellular lesions, some ideas on the molecular mechanisms.
9	light induced changes in photoreceptor membrane resistance and potential in gecko retinas i preparations treated to reduce lateral interactions	Light induced changes in the membrane resistance of photoreceptors and in the potential of treated gecko i retinas to reduce lateral interactions.
9	origin of esterified cholesterol transported in the very low density lipoproteins of human plasma	Origin of esterified cholesterol carried in very low density lipoproteins of human plasma.
9	method for comparing concentrations of the open air factor	The method of comparing concentrations of ozone; exposure to free air is the same as that used to compare concentrations of ozone; exposure to free air.
9	an approach to the current voltage characteristics of nerve membranes based on adsorption phenomena	An approach to the common stress characteristics of nerve membranes based on d' adsorption phenomena.
9	electron spinal resonance analysis of the nitroxide spin label 2 2 6 6 tetramethylpipidone n oxyl tempone in single crystals of the reduced tempone matrix	Electron spin resonance analysis of nitroxide spin label 2 2 2 6 6 6 6 Oxylated n-tetramethylpipidone Temperone in single crystals of the reduced tempone matrix.
9	effect of structure on function in model nerve nets	L' effect of structure on function in neural network models.
9	limited binding capacity sites for l triiodothyronine in rat liver nuclei nuclear cytoplasmic interrelation binding constants and cross reactivity with l thyroxine	The binding sites of triiodothyronine l in rat liver nuclei are limited, as are nuclear cytoplasmic binding constants and cross-reactivity with thyroxine l.
9	optical diffraction studies of muscle fibers	Studies on the optical diffraction of muscle fibers.
9	electronic conduction in lipid films with metal contacts	Electrical conductivity in films with metallic contacts.
9	unsteady transport and hydration dynamics in the in vivo cornea	Dynamics of transport and d&apos, and unstable corneal hydration in vivo.
9	model studies of the magnetocardiogram	Model studies of magnetocardiogram.
9	dilute solution approximation and generalization of the reflection coefficient method of describing volume and solute flows	Approximation of the dilute solution and generalization of the coefficient of reflection method to describe volume and solute flow.
9	restricted transport in small pores a model for steric exclusion and hindered particle motion	Restricted transport in small pores model for l' steric exclusion and hindered movement of particles.
9	use of inert gases to study the interaction of blood flow and diffusion during passive absorption from the gastrointestinal tract of the rat	Use of inert gases to study vomiting; interaction of blood flow and diffusion during vomiting; passive absorption from rat intestinal tract.
9	correlation between leprosy rates in villages different distances apart	The relationship between the leprosy rates in the villages and the distances between the villages.
9	cross correlation functions for a neuronal model	A cross-correlation function for a neural model.
9	letter oral contraceptives and risks of thromboembolism	Oral contraceptives in letter form and oral contraceptives and the risk of thromboembolism.
9	production of plasma esterified cholesterol in lean normotriglyceridemic humans	Esterified plasma cholesterol production in lean normotriglycerides humans.
9	quantitative analysis of cholesterol in 5 to 20 microliter of plasma	Quantitative cholesterol analysis in 5 to 20 microlitres of the plasma.
9	voltage and current clamp transients with membrane dielectric loss	Transient periods of voltage and current clamp with membrane dielectric loss.
9	ventricular and arterial wall stresses based on large deformation analyses	Ventricular and arterial wall stress based on analyses of large deformations.
9	binding of ions to oligopeptides	Ion binding to oligopeptides.
9	model hydrophobic ion exchange membrane	Apos exchange membrane model; hydrophobic ions.
9	inherited biochemical variation in drosophila melanogaster noise or signal i single locus analysis	Biochemical variation in drosophila melanogaster noise or l' single-locus i-signal analysis.
9	isozyme genotype environment associations in natural populations of the harvester ant pogonomyrmex badius	Association of the isozyme genotypes of l' environment in natural populations of pogonomyrmex badius ants.
9	wave length dependencies of light scattering in normal and cold swollen rabbit corneas and their structural implications	Depends on the length of wave and light scattering in normal and cold-swollen rabbit corneas and their structural implications.
9	flux of free fatty acids among host tissues ascites fluid and ehrlich ascites carcinoma cells	Dapos flow; free fatty acids in apo tissues; host ascites fluid and ehrlich carcinoma cells ascites.
9	measurement of the permeability of biological membranes application to the glomerular wall	Measure permeability of membranes; application of biological membranes to the glomerular wall.
9	kinetic cell cycle analysis of a cultured mammalian cell population	Kinetic analysis of the cell cycle of d' a population of cultured mammalian cells.
9	d 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase from rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetic mechanism from steady state kinetics of the reaction catalysed by the enzyme in solution and covalently attached to diethylaminoethylcellulose	D3 Rhodopseudomonas spheroides hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase kinetic mechanism from l' kinetic steady state reaction catalyzed by l' enzyme in solution covalently attached to diethylaminoethylcellulose.
9	d 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase from rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetics of radioisotope redistribution at chemical equilibrium catalysed by the enzyme in solutions	D3 Rhodopseudomonas spheroides hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase kinetic radio redistribution-isotopes at l' chemical equilibria catalyzed by etapos; enzyme in solutions.
9	the origin and consequences of concentration dependence in gel chromatography	L' origin and consequences of concentration dependence in gel chromatography.
9	reactions of papain and of low molecular weight thiols with some aromatic disulphides 2 2 dipyridyl disulphide as a convenient active site titrant for papain even in the presence of other thiols	Reactions of papain and low molecular weight thiols with some aromatic disulfides 2 dipyridyl disulfide as the convenient titrant site for papain, even in the presence of other thiols.
9	the mechanism of action of beta galactosidase effect of aglycone nature and deuterium substitution on the hydrolysis of aryl galactosides	Mechanism of action of apos; effect of aglyconic beta galactosidase and deuterium substitution on apos; hydrolysis of aryl galactosides.
9	a new mathematical model for fitting an hpl radioimmunoassay curve	A new mathematical model for adjusting radioimmunoassay in hpl.
9	proteins of the postsynaptic density	Postsynaptic density proteins.
9	evaluation of some thin layer chromatography procedures for the identification and detection of impurities of hormonal steroids	Evaluation of selected thin-layer chromatography methods for identification and detection of hormonal steroid impurities.
9	mass fragmentographic determination of eleven estrogens in the body fluids of pregnant and nonpregnant subjects	"""Mass fragmentographic determination of 11 estrogens in the body fluids of pregnant and non-pregnant subjects,"" J. Am."
9	curves of ligand binding the use of hyperbolic functions for expressing titration curves	Ligand binding curves using hyperbolic functions to express titration curves.
9	phototaxis in chlamydomonas reinhardtii	Phototaxis in Chlamydomonas, reinhardtii.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver of rat liver peroxisomes iv biochemical pathway of catalase synthesis	Rat liver synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes iv biochemical route of catalase synthesis.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes v intracellular pathway of catalase synthesis	The synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes is an intracellular route of catalase synthesis.
9	the forces generated at the human elbow joint in response to imposed sinusoidal movements of the forearm	The force generated at the apos; human elbow articulation in response to imposed sinusoidal sinus movements of the apos; front @-@arm.
9	nuclear magnetic resonance transverse relaxation times of water protons in skeletal muscle	Transverse relaxation time by proton nuclear magnetic resonance d' water in skeletal muscle.
9	the use of simple epidemiological models in the evaluation of disease control programmes a case study of trachoma	Use of simple epidemiological models in diagnosis; evaluation of disease control programs; case study of trachoma.
9	changes of action potential shape and velocity for changing core conductor geometry	Changes in the shape and speed of the d&apos potential; action to change the conductor core geometry.
9	enzymic mechanisms involving concomitant transfer and hydrolysis reactions	Enzymatic mechanisms involving concomitant transfer and d&apos reaction processes; hydrolysis.
9	on the use of contour maps in the analysis of spread of communicable disease	On the map; use of contour cards; use of the map; use of contour cards in the map; analysis of the map; analysis of the spread of communicable disease from the map; other side of the map; Atlantic.
9	error rates in cervical cytological screening tests	Failure rate; cervical cytological screening error.
9	a method of comparing differences in tumour growth rates applied to a study of the increasing growth capacity of mouse carcinomata	Comparison of differences in tumour growth rates in a study of the growing capacity of mouse carcinomas.
9	breast volumes in cancer of the breast	The volume of breast cancer in breast cancer.
9	stability of dna in purkinje cell nuclei of the mouse an autoradiographic study	Stabilization of DNA in mouse purkinje cell nuclei; an autoradiographic study of purkinje cell nuclei.
9	a model for the passage of the nurohypophysial hormones and their related proteins through the rat neurohypophysis	A model for the passage of nurohypophysial hormones and their related proteins through rat neurohypophysis.
9	x ray small angle scattering a new deconvolution method for evaluating electron density distributions from small angle scattering diagrams	X small angle scattering radius a new deconvolution method to evaluate electron density distributions from small angle scattering diagrams.
9	measurement of the impedance of frog skeletal muscle fibers	Measurements of the length; impedance of skeletal muscle fibers of frogs.
9	an ultrasensitive vibrating probe for measuring steady extracellular currents	An ultra-sensitive, vibrating probe to measure stable extracellular currents.
9	cross age tutoring fifth graders as arithmetic tutors for kindergarten children	Inter-ages course for fifth graders as tutors in arithmetic for preschool children.
9	selection in complex genetic systems i the symmetric equilibria of the three locus symmetric viability model	Selection in complex i l&apos genetic systems; symmetrical equilibrium of the symmetric viability model at three loci.
9	interaction between natural selection for heterozygotes and directional selection	Interaction between natural selection for the heterozygotes and directional selection.
9	use of inert gases and carbon monoxide to study the possible influence of countercurrent exchange on passive absorption from the small bowel	Use of inert gases and carbon monoxide to study the apos; possible influence of the apos; exchange against-current on the apos; passive absorption from the apos; small intestine.
9	competitive binding of bilirubin and drugs to human serum albumin studied by enzymatic oxidation	Competitive binding of bilirubin and drugs to human serum albumin was studied by enzymic oxidation.
9	the spontaneous release of transmitter from insect nerve terminals as predicted by the negative binomial theorem	Spontaneous release of apoes; a transmitter from nerve endings of insects as predicted by the negative binomial theorem.
9	smoking in pregnancy and subsequent child development	Smoking during pregnancy and subsequent development of the child.
9	interpretation of serum calcium in patients with abnormal serum proteins	Interpretation of serum calcium in patients with abnormal serum proteins.
9	linear analysis of membrane conductance and capacitance in cardiac purkinje fibres	Linear analysis of membrane conductance and capacitance in cardiac purkinje fibers.
9	the direct linear plot a new graphical procedure for estimating enzyme kinetic parameters	The direct linear plot is a new graphical procedure for estimating the kinetic parameters of the enzyme.
9	an efficient optimization technique for recovering ventilation perfusion distributions from inert gas data effects of random experimental error	Effective optimization to recover ventilation perfusion distributions from inert gas effects resulting from random experimental errors.
9	transient response in a dendritic neuron model for current injected at one branch	A transient response in a dendritic neural model for the current injected into a branch.
9	quantitative studies of pinocytosis ii kinetics of protein uptake and digestion by rat yolk sac cultured in vitro	Quantitative studies of pinocytosis ii protein uptake and digestion by rat yolk sac culture in vitro.
9	mitosis in tilia americana endosperm	Mitosis in the apos; american tilia endosperm.
9	cardiovascular investigations and fuzzy sets theory	Cardiovascular investigations and Fuzzy Ensemble Theory.
9	variola minor in bragan a paulista county 1956 lack of evidence indicating the influence of contaminated classrooms on spread of the disease	Small braganic smallpox, Paulista County, 1956; lack of evidence of apos; influence of contaminated classrooms on spread of disease.
9	theory of delayed lateral inhibition in the compound eye of limulus	Lapse theory; delayed lateral inhibition in the eye; compound limulus.
9	theory of photometric errors applied to the design and evaluation of a high performance filter photometer	Theory of Photometric Errors Applied to Design and Applications; Evaluation of a High-Performance Filter Photometer.
9	statistical evaluation of method comparison data	For the needs of the business, one can directly directly go directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly from the position of the companies; company for the apos; assessment of the apos; state of apos; set of apos; information for the apos; review of the situation.
9	the impact of laboratory error on the normal range a bayesian model	L' impact of l' error of laboratory on the normal range of d' a Bayesian model.
9	tobacco smoking and sex ratios in the united states	Smoking and Sex Ratios in the United States.
9	active site titration and aminoacyl adenylate binding stoichiometry of aminoacyl trna synthetases	Title of active site and binding stoichiometry of aminoacyl adenylate and aminoacyl trna synthetases.
9	oxygen binding by hemocyanin from levantina hierosolima ii interpretation of cooperativity in terms of ligand ligand linkage	Levantina hierosolima hemocyanin oxygen binding ii interpretation of cooperativity in terms of ligand binding.
9	ligand binding and enzymic catalysis coupled through subunits in tyrosyl trna synthetase	Ligand binding and enzyme catalysis are coupled by tyrosyl trna synthetase sub-@-@ units.
9	hydrodynamic diameters of rna tumor viruses studies by laser beat frequency light scattering spectroscopy of avian myeloblastosis and rauscher murine leukemia viruses	Hydrodynamic diameters of rna tumor viruses are studied by laser beatsfrequency light scattering spectroscopy of avian myeloblastosis and murine leukemia viruses.
9	binding of calcium to phosphatidylcholines as determined by proton magnetic resonance and infrared spectroscopy	Calcium binding to phosphatidylcholines was determined by nuclear magnetic resonance and infrared spectroscopy.
9	demonstration of two active sites on a monomeric aminoacyl trna synthetase possible roles of negative cooperativity and half of the sites reactivity in oligomeric enzymes	Two sites active on a monomeric aminoacyl trna synthetase were demonstrated for possible roles of negative cooperativity and half of site reactivity in oligomeric enzymes.
9	relationship between frequency dependence of lung compliance and distribution of ventilation	Relationship between frequency dependence of lung condition and ventilation distribution.
9	a simulation study of the efficacy of stepwise discriminant analysis in the detection and comparison of event related potentials	A simulation study of the apos; efficiency of the apos; step-by-step discriminant analysis in the detection and potential comparison of the apos; event.
9	an electronic activity integrator for operant conditioning of patterns of neural and muscular activity	A d&apos integrator; electronic activity for operatory conditioning of d&apos patterns; neural and muscular activity.
9	frequency dependence of the transmission of the eeg from cortex to scalp	Transmission from the cortex to the scalp is frequency dependent.
9	the determination of density and molecular weight distributions of lipoproteins by sedimentation equilibrium	Determination of density and molecular weight distributions of lipoprotein by sedimentation equilibrium.
9	mechanism of inactivation of the flavoenzyme lactate oxidase by oxalate	Mechanism of inactivation of flavoenzyme lactate oxidase by oxalate.
9	subunit interactions in aspartate transcarbamylase the interaction between catalytic and regulatory subunits and the effect of ligands	Interactions of sub-units in l' aspartate transcarbamylase interaction between sub-catalytic and regulatory units and l' effect of ligands.
9	interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 i equilibrium dialysis studies	Interaction of guanosine nucleotides with d&apos dialysis studies; d&apos factor balance; elongation 2 i.
9	interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 ii effect of ribosomes and magnesium ions on guanosine diphosphate and guanosine triphosphate binding to the enzyme	Interaction of guanosine nucleotides with d&apos factor; elongation 2 ii, effect of ribosomes and magnesium ions on guanosine diphosphate and guanosine triphosphate binding; enzyme.
9	the structure of ferrocytochrome b5 at 2 8 a resolution	Structure of ferrocytochrome b5 in 28 a resolution.
9	quaternary structure of partially liganded intermediates of sheep carbon monoxide hemoglobin at alkaline ph	Quaternary structure of the partially ligated intermediates of the sheep carbon monoxide hemoglobin at the alkaline phalange.
9	role of metal ions in escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase a study of the metal water interaction by nuclear relaxation rate measurements on water protons	The role of metal ions in the alkaline phosphatase of cholesterol; escherichia coli; study of the reactions; interaction of the metal with the apos; water by measurements of the rate of nuclear relaxation on protons; water.
9	the interaction of inhibitors of proteolytic enzymes with 3 methylhistidine 57 chymotrypsin	Apos; apos interaction; apos inhibitors; proteolytic enzymes with 3 methylhistidine 57 chymotrypsin.
9	the effect of functional differences in the alpha and beta chains on the cooperativity of the osidation reduction reaction of hemoglobin	L' effect of functional differences in the alpha and beta chains on the cooperativity of the reductive reaction of l' osidation of l' hemoglobin.
9	the molecular dissociation of ferrihemoglobin derivatives	Molecular dissociation of ferrihemoglobin derivatives.
9	the effect of potassium chloride on the bohr effect of human hemoglobin	The effects of potassium chloride on the immune system and on the immune system.
9	radiolabeling of proteins and viruses in vitro by acetylation with radioactive acetic anhydride	Radiolabeling proteins and viruses in vitro by acetylation with the radioactive acetic anhydride.
9	cross linking of the components of lactose synthetase with dimethylpimelimidate	Cross-link between lactose synthetase and dimethylpimelimidate components.
9	affinity partitioning a method for purification of proteins using specific polymer ligands in aqueous polymer two phase systems	It is also used for the purification of proteins; for the purification of proteins; and for the purification of specific polymeric ligands in aqueous systems of two-phase polymers.
9	the covalent and three dimensional structure of concanavalin a iii structure of the monomer and its interactions with metals and saccharides	The covalent three-dimensional structure of concanavalin a iii monomer structure and its interactions with metals and saccharides.
9	threonine deaminase from salmonella typhimurium relationship between regulatory sites	Threonine deaminase from the Salmonella typhimurium relationship between the regulatory sites.
9	blood flow and mineral deposition in canine tibial fractures	Blood flow and deposition of minerals in canine tibial fractures.
9	role of inertia in the measurement of dynamic compliance	Role of businesses; inertia in measuring dynamic compliance.
9	a theory of aerosol deposition in the human respiratory tract	A theory of the deposition of aerosols into the human respiratory tract.
9	in vivo occlusal forces and moments ii mathematical analysis and recommendations for instrumentation specifications	In vivo forces and occlusive moments ii Mathematical analysis and recommendations for d&apos specification; instrumentation.
9	major fatty acids and proximate composition of dairy products	Major fatty acids and the immediate composition of dairy products.
9	a simple graphical method for determining the inhibition constants of mixed uncompetitive and non competitive inhibitors	A simple graphical method to determine the inhibitory constants of non-competitive and non-competitive inhibitors.
9	inhibition of enzymes by metal ion chelating reagents theory and new graphical methods of study	Enzyme inhibition by metal ion chelator reagent theory and new graphical methods are being studied.
9	detection of neuroelectric signals from multiple data channels by optimum linear filter methods	Detection of neuroelectrical signals from multiple data channels by linear optimal filter methods.
9	computer based method for calculation of the available energy of proteins	Computer method for calculating protein available energy.
9	corneal thickness measured by interferometry	Thickness of cornea measured by interferometry.
9	selection of the candidate for myocardial revascularization a profile of high risk based on multivariate analysis	Selection of myocardial revascularization candidate; high risk profile based on multivariate analysis.
9	equation of the helix for separating plants in a spiral radial cultivator	L&apos equation; helix to separate plants in a radial spiral cultivator.
9	mechanism of osmotic flow in porous membranes	Osmotic flow in porous membranes.
9	sampling variances of heterozygosity and genetic distance	Variance of age; sampling of age; heterozygosity and genetic distance.
9	longitudinal magnification in radiologic images of thick objects a new concept in magnification radiography	Longitudinal magnification in thick x-ray images, a new concept in magnification radiography.
9	the cutoff characteristics of rotating grids	These are the cutting characteristics of rotating grids.
9	effects of partial reinforcement on conditioning conditional probabilities asymptotic performance and extinction of the rabbit s nictitating membrane response	Effects of partial reinforcement on conditioning of asymptotic performance and extinction of rabbit nictitating membrane response.
9	problems of quantities and units in enzymology	In addition, a number of studies have been carried out in this area.
9	determination of the kinetic constants of glucose 6 phosphate 1 epimerase by non linear optimization	Determination of the kinetic constants of l' glucose epimerase 6 phosphate 1 by nonlinear optimization.
9	evidence for an essential lysine in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from leuconostoc mesenteroides	Evidence for the presence of an essential lysine in leuconostoc mesenteroides glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase.
9	approach for an equation of state for adsorbed protein surfaces	Approach to a d&apos equation; state for adsorbed protein surfaces.
9	frequency dependence of the frog skin impedance	L' frog skin impedance is a function of frequency.
9	the interaction of atebrin with phospholipid vesicles	L' interaction of the spine with the phospholipid vesicles.
9	critical arterial stenosis a theoretical and experimental solution	Critical arterial stenosis is both a theoretical and experimental solution.
9	dynamic local distensibility of living arteries and its relation to wave transmission	Dynamic local distensibility of living arteries and its relation to transmission of d' waves.
9	a mathematical model of cardiac rhythm disorders in the presence of rapid auricular electrical activity	A mathematical model of heart rhythm disorders in the presence of fast atrial electrical activity.
9	multi exponential analysis of plasma free amino acid kinetics in the rat	Multiple exponential kinetics analysis of plasma free amino acids in the rat.
9	calculation of elementary components of evoked potentials	The calculation of the elementary components of the evoked potentials is based on the calculation of the elementary components of these potentials.
9	theory of syncytial tissues ii open syncytiae	Syncytial tissue theory ii opens syncytiae.
9	role of functional reorganization of the receptive fields in forming a relationship between visual acuity and pupil diameter	Role of functional reorganization of receptor fields in pupil formation; relationship between visual acuity and pupil diameter.
9	reproduction by means of a methematical model of the dynamic characteristics of human vertical posture maintenance	A methodical model reproduces the dynamic characteristics of vertical posture maintenance in humans.
9	mathematical modeling of the dynamics of biokinematic chains	A mathematical model of the dynamics of the biokinematic chains.
9	letter analysis of the lateral stability of the protofibril lattice in the a disk of striated muscle	Analysis of the lateral stability letters of the protofibrillar network in a muscle striated disc.
9	letter velocity of passive conductance in a branching fiber	Speed of the letter of the passive conductance in a branched fiber.
9	receptor potential fluctuations in a pacinian corpuscle	"""Receptive potential fluctuations in a pacinian corpuscle"", Pacinian corpuscle."
9	on the theory of ionic solutions	In the theory of ionic ionic solutions of ionic solutions, the theory of ionic solutions of ionic ionic solutions can be further developed in the field of the theory of ionic solutions.
9	electro optical property of extremely stretched skinned muscle fibers	Electrooptic properties of extremely stretched and stretched muscle fibers.
9	systemic error during measurement of dp dt using conventional heart catheters and their correction	Systemic error in measuring and correcting the dp dt at the apos; aided by conventional cardiac catheters.
9	the stability constants of magnesium oxalate complexes	The stability constants of the d' magnesium oxalate complexes.
9	measurement of right ventricular volumes using 131i maa	Measurement of the right ventricular volumes using 131i maa maa.
9	factors affecting the times till death of pedestrians killed in road accidents	Factors affecting time up to and including the time of death of pedestrians killed in road traffic accidents.
9	plasma volumes and constituents of heat exposed men before and after acclimatization	Plasma volumes and heat constituents exposed humans both before and after acclimation.
9	chest wall mechanics during artificial ventilation	Chest wall mechanics during the artificial ventilation.
9	effects of lung inflation on pulmonary arterial blood volume in intact dogs	Effects of Lapos; pulmonary inflation on pulmonary arterial blood volume in intact dogs.
9	total work rate of breathing optimization in co 2 inhalation and exercise	Rhythm of total work; optimization of breathing in the air; inhalation co 2 and breathing; exercise.
9	measurement of axial diffusivities in a model of the bronchial airways	Measurement of axial diffusivities in a bronchial respiratory tract (ARP) model.
9	continuous in vivo measurement of arterial po2 in humans	In vivo continuous measurement of arterial po2 in humans.
9	tetralogy of fallot a morphometric and geometric study	Fallot tetralogy, a morphometric and geometric study.
9	direct quantitative estimation of paneth and total cell populations in the jejunal glands of lieberk hn	Direct quantitative estimation of populations of total and paneth cells in the jejunal glands of lieberk hn.
9	collaborative study of a spectrofluorometric method for lasalocid sodium in feeds	Collaborative study of a spectrofluorometric method for sodium lasalocides in animal feeds.
9	dynamics of glomerular ultrafiltration in the rat viii effects of hematocrit	Dynamic of the apos; glomerular ultrafiltration in the vascular effects of the apos; hematocrit in the rat.
9	an electronic device for the automatic correction of fluorescence emission spectra	An electronic device for the automatic correction of d&apos and d&apos spectra; fluorescence emission.
9	effect of protein concentration on the molecular weight of delta5 3 ketosteroid isomerase	The effect of protein concentration on the molecular weight of the delta5-3 ketosteroid isomerase.
9	crystallographic structure refinement of chromatium high potential iron protein at two angstroms resolution	Development of the crystallographic structure of ferric protein with high chromatic potential with a resolution of two angstroms.
9	role of the surface excess of palmitoyl coenzyme a in the 1 acylglycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase reaction catalyzed by microsomes	Role of l' excess palmitoyl coenzyme a surface in the microsome-catalyzed reaction 1 acylglycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase.
9	antenatal fetal growth from the nineteenth week ultrasonic study of 12 head and chest dimensions	Prenatal fetal growth from baseline; 12-dimensional ultrasonic study of head and breast at ten-9 weeks.
9	the kinetics of glucocorticoid binding to the soluble specific binding protein of mouse fibroblasts	Kinetics of glucocorticoid binding to soluble specific binding protein of mouse fibroblasts.
9	the calcium and magnesium binding sites on troponin and their role in the regulation of myofibrillar adenosine triphosphatase	Calcium and magnesium binding sites on troponin and their role in regulation of myofibrillar adenosine triphosphatase.
9	mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase independent function of the catalytic binding sites	A l&apos-independent function; mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase from catalytic binding sites.
9	the pathology of the degenerate meniscus lesion	Uh, pathology of degenerate meniscus lesion.
9	pulmonary blood flow determined by continuous analysis of pulmonary n2o exchange	Acute pulmonary blood flow as determined by ultrasound; continuous analysis of lung; n2o exchange.
9	restitution of blood volume after hemorrhage mathematical description	The restoration of the blood volume after the patient's mathematical description; hemorrhage.
9	regulation of intestinal calcium binding protein calcium intake in the rat	Regulation of pH; intake of intestinal calcium binding protein calcium in rats.
9	participation of the catalytic carboxyls asp 52 and glu 35 and asp 101 in the binding of substrate analogues to hen lysozyme	Participation of catalytic carboxyls asp 52 and glu 35 and asp 101 in binding of substrate analogs to hen lysozyme.
9	tryptophan fluorescence lifetimes in lysozyme	"T.L. and D.L. Kreis, ""Typtophan fluorescence lifetimes in lysozyme"", J. Toxicol."
9	mechanism by which antibodies inhibit hapten malate dehydrogenase conjugates an enzyme immunoassay for morphine	The mechanism by which antibodies inhibit etapos; haptene malate dehydrogenase conjugates an enzyme-linked morphine immunoassay.
9	kinetic demonstration of the intermediate role of aminoacyl adenylate enzyme in the formation of valyl transfer ribonucleic acid	Kinetic demonstration of the role of l' aminoacyladenylate enzyme in the formation of l' and valyl transfer ribonucleic acid.
9	the steady state kinetic parameters and non processivity of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase i	Kinetic parameters at baseline; state of equilibrium and non- @-> processivity of bios; deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase i d' escherichia coli.
9	role of sulfhydryl groups in cellular adhesiveness	Role of sulfhydryl groups in cellular adhesion.
9	myonemal contraction of spirostomum ii some mechanical properties of the contractile apparatus	Myonemic contraction of the spirostomum ii certain mechanical properties of the contractile apparatus.
9	the hepatic adenylate cyclase system iii a mathematical model for the steady state kinetics of catalysis and nucleotide regulation	Hepatic apo system; adenylate cyclase iii, a mathematical model for apo kinetics; d&apos state; nucleotide catalysis and regulation equilibrium.
9	comparably massive penicillin g therapy in renal failure	Treatment with comparatively massive penicillin during apos; renal failure.
9	possible physical substrates for the interaction of electromagnetic fields with biologic membranes	Possible physical substrates for proteins; interaction of electromagnetic fields with biological membranes.
9	hydrophobic interaction of alkanes with liposomes and lipoproteins	Hydrophobic interaction of alkanes with liposomes and lipoproteins.
9	rumen modeling rumen input output balance models	Rumen rumen models modeling; apo balance balance input; apo balance; rumen input.
9	kinetic aspects of synchrony in suspension cultures of acer pseudoplatanus l	Kinetic aspects of synchrony in suspension cultures of etapos; acer pseudoplatanus l.
9	photoelectron quantum yields of the amino acids	Photoelectronic quantum yields of amino acids are obtained.
9	direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at low resolution 17 a	Direct determination of the lamellar structure of low resolution peripheral nerve myelin 17 a.
9	comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods ii beef products	Comprehensive Evaluation of Fatty Acids in Foods ii Beef Products.
9	comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods iii eggs and egg products	A comprehensive assessment of the fatty acids in foods iii. eggs and egg products.
9	osmosis in cortical collecting tubules a theoretical and experimental analysis of the osmotic transient phenomenon	Osmosis in cortical collecting tubules a theoretical and experimental analysis of transient osmotic phenomena.
9	auditory membrane vibrations measurements at sub angstrom levels by optical heterodyne spectroscopy	Measurement of vibrations of the auditory membrane at levels below-angstroms by optical heterodyne spectroscopy.
9	a simple specific assay for estriol in maternal urine	A simple specific test for estriol in the maternal urine.
9	influx of cholesterol into plasma in rabbits with fasting hyperbetalipoproteinemia	Fasting hyperbetalipoproteinemia in rabbits with apos; cholesterol influx in plasma.
9	a biological least action principle for the ecological model of volterra lotka	A principle of less biological action for the volterra lotka ecological model.
9	transmucosal triglyceride transport rates in proximal and distal rat intestine in vivo	The rate of transport of the transmucosal triglycerides into the proximal and distal intestine of the rat in vivo.
9	activation of 3 5 cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase by calcium ion and a protein activator	Activation of 35 adenosine monophosphate cyclic phosphodiesterase (CHP) by calcium ion and a protein activator.
9	studies on the kinetic mechanism of s adenosylmethionine protein o methyltransferase of calf thymus	Studies of the kinetic mechanism of calf thymus adenosylmethionine o methyltransferase protein.
9	affinity labeling of a regulatory site of bovine liver glutamate dehydrogenase	Labelling of apos; affinity of apos; a regulatory site for bovine hepatic glutamate dehydrogenase.
9	neutral and cationic sulfonamido derivatives of the fluorescent probe 2 p toluidinylnaphthalene 6 sulfonate properties and mechanistic implications	Neutral and cationic sulfonamido derivatives of the fluorescent probe 2 p toluidinylnaphthalene, 6 sulfonate properties and mechanistic implications.
9	energy transfer by chlorophyll a in detergent micelles	Transfer of energy through chlorophyll a into detergent micelles.
9	the rapid component of electron paramagnetic resonance signal ii a candidate for the physiological donor to photosystem ii in spinach chloroplasts	The fast component of the electron spin resonance signal ii is a potential candidate for the physiological donor of photosystem ii in spinach chloroplasts.
9	calcium binding to rabbit skeletal myosin under physiological conditions	Calcium binding to rabbit skeletal myosin under physiological conditions.
9	electric birefringence of myosin subfragments	Electrical Birfringence of sub-keys-myosin fragments.
9	participation of manganese ions complexed with trna in the interaction with amino acids and dipeptides	The participation of trna complexed manganese ions in the interaction with amino acids and dipeptides.
9	the kinetic mechanism and properties of the cytoplasmic acetoacetyl coenzyme a thiolase from rat liver	The kinetic mechanism and properties of the rat liver cytoplasmic a thiolase coenzyme acetoacetyl acetoacetyl.
9	the amine oxidases of human placenta and pregnancy plasma	The amine oxidases of the human placenta and of the plasma of pregnancy.
9	determinants of glomerular filtration in experimental glomerulonephritis in the rat	Glomerular filtration effects on glomerulonephritis and glomerulonephritis.
9	hepatocellular uptake of taurocholate in the dog	L-apos; hepatocellular absorption of taurocholate in dogs.
9	kinetics of the hydrolysis of n benzoyl l serine methyl ester catalysed by bromelain and by papain analysis of modifier mechanisms by lattice nomography computational methods of parameter evaluation for substrate activated catalyses and consequences of postulated non productive binding in bromelain and papain catalysed hydrolyses	The kinetics of l' hydrolysis of l' methyl ester of bromelain- and l&apos-catalyzed serine n benzoyl; analysis of modifying mechanisms by network name calculation methods for l' evaluation of the parameters of substrate-activated catalysts and consequences of nonproductive binding in bromain- and papain-catalyzed hydrolyses.
9	kinetics of irreversible enzyme inhibition by an unstable inhibitor	Kinetics of l' irreversible enzyme inhibition by an unstable inhibitor.
9	the inhibition of human placental diamine oxidase by substrate analogues	L' inhibition of human placental diamine oxidase by analogs of the substrate.
9	macroscopic rate constants involved in the formation and interconversion of the two central enzyme substrate complexes of the lactate dehydrogenase turnover	Macroscopic rate constants involved in the formation and interconversion of the two central enzymatic lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) turnover substrates.
9	a kinetic analysis of enzyme systems involving four substrates	A kinetic analysis of the enzyme systems involving four different substrates.
9	a comparison of two methods for fitting the integrated michaelis menten equation	Comparison of two methods; adjustment of l' integrated equation of Michaelis menten.
9	colloidal alpha stannic acid and negative iron colloid as differential electron stains for surface proteins	Stannic alpha colloidal acid and negative colloid iron as a differential electronic dye for surface proteins.
9	long term potentiation of the perforant path granule cell synapse in the rat hippocampus	In the long term, potentiation of the synapse of granule cells of the perforating pathway in the rat hippocampus.
9	transparency of pair correlated random distributions of small scatterers with applications to the cornea	Pair transparency correlated random distributions of small diffusers with corneal applications.
9	cross talk in absorbing optical fibers	The word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of God.
9	visual fourier transform spectroscopy with a single crystal plate	A Fourier transform spectroscopy with a single-crystalline plate.
9	masking of the non test ear in speech audiometry	Hide the ear; hide the ear, not tested in audiometry of the speech.
9	masking of the non test ear in tone decay b k sy audiometry and sisi tests	Eardrum not tested in audiometry and sisi tests; tone decay and sisi systems.
9	determination of bile acid pool size in man a simplified method with advantages of increases precision shortened analysis time and decreased isotope exposure	The determination of the size of the human bile acid pool is a simplified method that has the advantage of increasing the precision, shortening the time of onset, analysis and decreasing the time of exposure to isotopes.
9	an improved mantel bryan procedure for safety testing of carcinogens	Improved screening procedure; safety of carcinogens based on bryan mantel.
9	localization of heart vectors produced by epicardial burns and ectopic stimuli validation of a dipole ranging method	Location of cardiac vectors produced by epicardial burns and validation of ectopic stimuli; a method of dipolar telemetry.
9	calculations of pulsatile flow through a branch implications for the hemodynamics of atherogenesis	Calculation of the apos; pulsatile flow through the implications of apos; a branch for apos hemodynamics; atherogenesis.
9	theory of current source density analysis and determination of conductivity tensor for anuran cerebellum	Apos theory; current source density analysis and conductivity tensor determination for the anuran cerebellum.
9	experimental optimization of current source density technique for anuran cerebellum	Experimental optimization of the current source density technique for cerebellum anurans.
9	the evaluation of left ventricular function in man a comparison of methods	Evaluation of left ventricular function in men and a comparison of methods.
9	linear working graphs in blood lead determinations with the beckman flameless atomic absorption cuvet	Linear working charts for determination of lead level with the d&apos bowl; flameless Beckman atomic absorption.
9	biological populations with nonoverlapping generations stable points stable cycles and chaos	Non-overlapping biological populations indicate stable cycles and chaos.
9	tracer flow permeability and partial conductance	Permeability of the tracker flow and partial conductance.
9	food intake and growth of guinea pigs fed a cholesterol containing diet	L'apos; ingestion of food and growth of guinea pigs gave to eat a cholesterol-containing diet.
9	application of the loo riegelman absorption method	Application of d' loo riegelman absorption.
9	measurement of surface color and color difference of tablet colorants by tristimulus colorimetry	Measurement by tristimulus colorimetry of the surface color and colour difference of tablet dyes.
9	determination of stability constants of stannous fluoride complexes by potentiostatic titration	Determination of the stability constants of fluoride stannous complexes by potentiostatic titration.
9	influence of the electrical properties of electrodes platinum wire on the myoelectric signal	L' influences the electrical properties of the electrodes of platinum on the myoelectric signal.
9	quantitative study of autoradiographic marking in the rat nervous system ii final characteristics of the adult animal brain interpretation rules and concept of cortical chronoarchitecture	Quantitative study of autoradiographic labeling in the rat nervous system ii Final characteristics of the apogee rules; interpretation of the apogee brain; adult animal and concept of cortical chronoarchitecture.
9	calculation of the electromyographic jitter	Calculating the electromyographic shock.
9	a model for the transient and steady state mechanical behavior of contracting muscle	Model for the transient and stationary mechanical behaviour of contracting muscle.
9	the differential scattering of circularly polarized light by chloroplasts and evaluation of their true circular dichroism	Differential scattering of circularly polarized light by chloroplasts and l' assessment of their true circular dichroism.
9	the effect of energization on the apparent michaelis mentne constant for oxygen in mitochondrial respiration	Apos; effect of apos; apparent constant michaelis energy for apos; oxygen in mitochondrial respiration.
9	the effects of 5alpha dihydrotestosterone on the kinetics of cell proliferation in rat prostate	The effects of 5alpha dihydrotestosterone on the kinetics of proliferation in the rat prostate.
9	a re evaluation of energy independent calcium ion binding by rat liver mitochondria	Re-evaluation of calcium ion binding independent of glucose; energy by rat liver mitochondria.
9	experimental tonography on enucleated human eyes i the validity of grant s tonography formula	Experimental Tonography on Enucleated Human Eyes i the validity of the Grant tonography formula.
9	calcium ion binding to the chromaffin granule surface	The calcium ion binds to the surface of chromaffin granules.
9	model connective tissue systems a study of polyion mobile ion and of excluded volume interactions of proteoglycans	A model of connective tissue systems studies of polyionic mobile ions and volume interactions excluded from proteoglycans.
9	the macromolecular properties of blood group specific glycoproteins characterization of a series of fractions obtained by solvent fractionation	The blood-group-specific macromolecular properties of glycoproteins characterize a series of fractions obtained by solvent fractionation.
9	a study of the kinetics and mechanism of rabbit muscle l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	The kinetics and mechanism of rabbit muscle glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase were studied.
9	the molecular and crystal structures of 4 n 2 acetamido 2 deoxy beta d glucopyranosyl l asparagine trihydrate and 4 n beta d glucopyranosyl l asparagine monohydrate the x ray analysis of a carbohydrate peptide linkage	The molecular and crystal structures of 4-n-2-acetamido-2-deoxy beta-glucopyranosyl asparagine l and 4-n-dihydrohydrate of glucopyranosyl asparagine l were determined by X-ray analysis of a peptide sugar bond.
9	a solid phase radioimmunoassay for plasma progesterone	A radioimmunoassay in the solid phase for plasma progesterone.
9	a new method for determining the michaelis constant	A new method for determining the Michaelis constant is described.
9	studies of the dimensions of oligopeptides by singlet singlet energy transfer and theoretical calculations i influence of glycine on the dimensions of tetrapeptides	The study of the dimensions of the oligopeptides by single-energy transfer and theoretical calculations influences the size of the tetrapeptides.
9	air pressure and flow in the nose6 represented in a double logarithmic system author s transl	The pressure and the air flow in the nose are represented in a logarithmic system.
9	mathematical method for determining kvp from x ray attenuation measurements	This is a mathematical method for determining the kvp from measurements of x-ray attenuation.
9	the use of 13c nuclear magnetic resonance of aromatic amino acid residues to determine the midpoint oxidation reduction potential of each iron sulfur cluster of clostridium acidi urici and clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxins	Use of nuclear magnetic resonance 13c of the residues; aromatic amino acids to determine the potential d' half-way oxidation of each group of clostridium acidi urici iron sulphides and clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxins.
9	ph dependence of the adair constants of human hemoglobin nonuniform contribution of successive oxygen bindings to the alkaline bohr effect	The pH dependence of the human hemoglobin adair constants contributes inconsistently to the successive oxygen bonds to the apos; the alkali bohr effect.
9	the mechanism of stabilization of the structure of nuclease t by binding of ligands	The mechanism of stabilization of nuclease t structure by ligand binding is described.
9	an expression for the calculation of relative affinities of antibody ligand interactions	An expression for the calculation of the relative affinities of d&apos ligand–antibody interactions.
9	relationships between chemical structure and affinity for postganglionic acetylcholine receptors of the guinea pig ileum	Relationships between chemical structure and l' affinity for postganglionic receptors of l' acetylcholine of l' guinea-pig ileum.
9	build up region of megavoltage photon radiation sources	Construct a megavoltage region of photonic radiation sources.
9	hidden part suppression on three dimensional plots	Partial suppression hidden in three-dimensional patterns.
9	high energy electron radiotherapy in a magnetic field	High-energy radiation in a magnetic field.
9	kinetic studies on the depolymerization of polyadenylic acid by ribonuclease a	Kinetic studies on depolymerization of polyadenyl acid by ribonuclease a.
9	kinetic behavior of associating enzyme systems ofthe type m in equilibrium m2 in equilibrium m3 in equilibrium and of the type 2m in equilibrium d in equilibrium d2 in equilibrium d3 in equilibrium	Kinetic behavior of associated enzyme systems of the m-type; m2 equilibrium at apos; m3 and m2 equilibrium at apos; d2 equilibrium at apos; d3 equilibrium at apos; d3 equilibrium at apos; d3.
9	the structure of hydrophobic cores of globins	The structure of the hydrophobic globin nuclei.
9	a study of the mechanism of action of phosphorylase b using isotope labelled substrates	A study of the mechanism of action of phosphorylase b at apos and apos, using isotope-labelled substrates.
9	a study of the interaction of oligonucleotides with polynucleotides by the method of equilibrium gel filtration the effect of magnesium ions and the composition of the oligonucleotides on the stability of the complex	A study of apos; interaction of oligonucleotides with polynucleotides by the gel filtration method at apos; equilibrium of apos; effect of magnesium ions and oligonucleotide composition on complex stability.
9	diffuse scattering of x rays by polypeptides and proteins in solution iii analysis of scattering curve of sperm whale myoglobin	Diffuse X-ray scattering by polypeptides and proteins in solution iii sperm whale myoglobin diffusion curve analysis.
9	an analysis of the cost of selection concept	A cost analysis of the selection concept using a selection cost approach.
9	differential light scattering from spherical mammalian cells	Differences in light scattering patterns in mammalian spherical cells.
9	a pressure vessel model for nerve compression	This is a model of a pressure vessel for use in nerve compression.
9	the resolution of arterial pulses into forward and backward waves as an approach to the determination of the characteristic impedance	Resolution of wave-borne arterial impulses to the front and rear as an approach for determination of the characteristic impedance.
9	quantitative analysis of mass and energy balance in non ideal models of the renal counterflow system	Quantitative analysis of mass and l' energy balance in non-ideal models of the system of against-renal flow.
9	population structure in relation to cost of selection	Population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. cost vs. cost vs. selection vs vs. cost vs vs vs. cost vs vs vs. cost vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs
9	the interaction of ribonuclease t 1 with dna	The interaction of ribonuclease t1 with DNA.
9	investigation of very slowly tumbling spin labels by nonlinear spin response techniques theory and experiment for stationary electron electron double resonance	L' study of very slow spin tilt markers by nonlinear spin response and l' stationary electron double resonance experimentation.
9	analysis of a simple prototypal muscle model near to and far from equilibrium	Analysis of a simple prototypic model of muscle near and far equilibrium.
9	discontinuous variability in the form of a geometric progression of albumin production in hepatoma and hybrid cells	Discontinuous variation in the form of geometric progression of production of albumin; albumin in hepatoma and hybrid cells.
9	island models for takeover by a social trait facing a frequency dependent selection barrier in a mendelian population	Island models of the social takeover facing a frequency-dependent selection barrier in a Mendelian population.
9	niche overlap and diffuse competition	There is an overlap between niche and diffused competition.
9	the coats of the eyeball and the intraocular pressure author s transl	The coats of the eyeball and translations intraocular of l' author on pressure.
9	changes in arterial pressure viscosity and resistance during cardiopulmonary bypass	Changes in the viscosity and resistance of blood pressure during cardiopulmonary bypass surgery.
9	assessment of some problems associated with prediction of the three dimensional structure of a protein from its amino acid sequence	Assessment of problems associated with predicting the three-dimensional structure of a protein from its amino acid sequence.
9	stochastics of cycle completions fluxes in biochemical kinetic diagrams	Stochastic fluxes of ring complements in biochemical kinetic diagrams.
9	phenylalanyl trna synthetase from baker s yeast role of 3 terminal adenosine of trna phe in enzyme substrate interaction studied with 3 modified trna phe species	Bisual yeast phenylalanyl trna synthetase role of 3 trna phe terminal adenosine in the apos; substrate enzyme interaction studied with 3 modified trna phe species.
9	magnetic resonance spectra of membranes	Membrane magnetic resonance spectrum.
9	a group of thermodynamic potentials applicable to ligand binding by a polyfunctional macromolecule	A group of thermodynamic potentials applicable to the binding of a ligand by a multi-functional macromolecule.
9	moments for sum of an arbitrary function of gene frequency along a stochastic path of gene frequency change	Moments for the sum d' an arbitrary function of gene frequency along d' stochastic path of change of gene frequency.
9	vascular and extravascular volume changes due to elevated venous pressure	Changes in both vascular and extravascular volume due to elevated venous pressure.
9	a model for ultracentrifugal quantification of 35 s bromosulphthalein binding to plasma proteins in the presence of radioimpurities	A model for the ultracentrifugal quantitation of bromosulftalein 35 s binding to plasma proteins in the presence of radioimpurities.
9	interference competition and niche theory	Interference and niche theory.
9	special pharmacokinetic aspects in newborns and young infants	Special pharmacokinetic aspects in newborn-and in young children.
9	the effect of chlorpromazine on some properties dna in solution	Effect of chlorpromazine on certain properties of DNA in solution.
9	a potent new mesodermal growth factor from mouse submaxillary gland a quantitative comparative study with previously described submaxillary gland growth factors	A new potent mesodermal growth factor of the gland under @-@mouse maxillary has made l'apos; object d' a quantitative comparative study with the gland growth factors under-maxillary described above.
9	on equation of gas transport in the lung	On the apos; gas transport equation in the lungs.
9	a sigmoid model of the static volume pressure curve of human lung	Sigmoid model static volume pressure curve of human lungs.
9	carbon monoxide elimination	Carbon monoxide removal.
9	determination of mean whole body intracellular ph in unanesthetized dogs	Mean body intracellular phage determination in unanesthetized dogs.
9	on the psychophysical law an information theory interpretation	An interpretation of the theory of l' information on the psychophysical law.
9	a theory of group selection	A theory of group selection.
9	a general model for genetic recombination	This is a general pattern of genetic recombination.
9	short lived messenger rna in hela cells and its impace on the kinetics of accumulation of cytoplasmic polyadenylate	Short-lived helical cell messenger and its impact on the kinetics of apos; cytoplasmic polyadenylate accumulation.
9	computer generated isodose curves for high energy x ray machines experimental verification and time saving strategies	Curves d' computer-generated isodosis for experimental verification of high energy X-ray equipment and time saving strategies.
9	new approach to the study of hormone protein interaction using the microcalorimetric method	New approach to apos; study of apos; hormonal protein interaction using microcalorimetric method.
9	tumor and normal tissue response to irradiation in vivo variation with decreasing dose rates	Tumour and tissue response normal to apo; irradiation variation in vivo with decreasing dose rates.
9	the total biological dose	The full biological dose!
9	appraisal of the angiographic circulation time as an index of cerebral blood flow	Evaluation of Angiographic Circulation Time (AGT) as an index of cerebral blood flow.
9	analytical approach for depth dose calculations 60co beams with fixed source target distance	Analytical Approach to Dose Designing at Depth 60Co beams with fixed target distance source.
9	errors in applying the nsd concept	Mistakes in the Application of the Concept.
9	reward versus cost token systems an analysis of the effects on students and teacher	An analysis of the effects of reward systems versus cost-check systems on students and teachers.
9	comparative measurements of airway resistance	The results of the assessment of respiratory resistance in relation to resistance to cancer are presented in the context of a bill.
9	interspecific competition a new approach to the classical theory	Interspecific competition a new approach of classical theory.
9	the impact of organization of family planning clinics on waiting time	The impact of the organization of family planning clinics on family planning wait times was highlighted.
9	high counting rates from 125i in radioimmunoassays	High counting rates from 125i on radioimmunoassay.
9	a dynamical model for human population	A dynamic model for the human population.
9	a technique for estimating the position of the oxygen hemoglobin dissociation curve	This technique is used to estimate the position of the dissociation curve of the apos; oxygenated hemoglobin.
9	realpop a mathematical model for resource allocation in population programs results from a test in the dominican republic	Realpop a mathematical model for population program resource allocation results from a test in the Dominican Republic.
9	polar vectors in the posterior inferior parietal myocardial infarct and left anterior hemiblock	Polar vectors in the lower posterior parietal myocardial infarction and anterior left hemococci.
9	intracranial volume pressure relationships during experimental brain compression in primates 1 pressure responses to changes in ventricular volume	Relationships between primate intracranial volume and pressure during experimental cerebral compression 1: pressure responses to changes in ventricular volume.
9	intramyocardial pressure effect of preload on transmural distribution of systolic coronary blood flow	Effect of preloading on intramyocardial pressure on the transmural distribution of systolic coronary blood flow.
9	quantitative evaluation of hemodialysis therapy using a simple mathematical model and a programmable pocket calculator	Quantitative evaluation of apos therapy; hemodialysis at apos; help with apos; a simple and simple apos-based mathematical model; a programmable pocket calculator.
9	observations on a model of the biology of carcinoma of the cervix a poor fit between observation and theory	Observations on a model of cervical carcinoma biology; uterus a poor fit between observation and theory.
9	the inotropic memory of amphibian myocardium i identification of two stimultaneous mechanisms and statement of a model	The inotropic memory of amphibians' myocardium he identification of two stimulatory mechanisms and a model.
9	ventricular performance in patients based upon rate of change of power during isovolumic contraction	Ventricular performance in patients based on isovolumic contraction rate of power change.
9	isovolumic fractional rate of change of power its applicability to assessment of ventricular performance in patients	Isovolumic fractional rate of change of power its applicability to patients; evaluation of ventricular performance.
9	ray tracing through a toric refracting surface	Radiation patterned through a refracted toric surface, sir.
9	analysis of photometric data	Analysis of the photometric data.
9	kinetics of renin antirenin reaction micromethods for the assay of renin and antirenin	Kinetics of renin reaction-micromethodium antirenine for the determination of renin and l' antirenin.
9	linear measurements of the rhomboid fossa the fourth ventricle in man	Linear measurement of the fourth ventricle rhomboidal fossa in man.
9	mathematical analysis of several parameters of the microcirculatory bed of muscles and muscular organs	Mathematical analysis of several parameters of the muscle and muscle organ microcirculatory bed system.
9	infant development and adipositas author s transl	Infant development and adipositas authors s translat s.
9	population variation in asymmetry and diversity from finger to finger for digital ridge count	Asymmetry and diversity of mountain pine beetle populations; one finger at the base; another for numerical ridge counts.
9	dermatoglyphics of schizophrenics patients with down s syndrome and mentally retarded males as compared with australian europeans using multivariate statistics	The dermatoglyphs of men with lower syndrome and mental retardation schizophrenia compared to European d' Australian origin using multivariate statistics.
9	the radius dose relationship in linear source therapy	Radiation source therapy: the radius dose relationship.
9	sulphated glycosaminoglycans as virus inhibitors 2nd communication inhibitory effect of glycosaminoglycanpolysulphates on yellow fever virus 17 d in animal experiments author s transl	Sulfated glycosaminoglycans as viral inhibitors 2nd inhibitory effect of glycosaminoglycan polysulfate communication on yellow fever virus in animal experiments 17 days.
9	biothermal simulation of scuba divers	Biothermal simulation of divers in diving suits.
9	the use of stereologic image analysis in medicine peripheral nerves	L' use of apos; analysis of medical stereological images for peripheral nerves.
9	inactivation of bacteriophages t7 and phix174 by radiomimetics	Radiomimetic inactivation of bacteriophages t7 and phix174.
9	a mathematical model for bacterial chemotaxis	A mathematical model of bacterial chemotaxis.
9	karyometric analysis of the supraoptic nucleus and the paraventricular nucleus before and after milking the cow	Karyometric analysis of supraoptic nucleus and paraventricular nucleus before and after milking the cow.
9	light scattering spectrum due to wiggling motions of bacteria	Light scattering spectrum due to the agitated motion of the bacteria.
9	inelastic light scattering by large structured particles	Inelastic scattering of light particles by large structured particles.
9	normal hemoglobin oxygen affinity	Normal affinity for apos; aposal oxygen; hemoglobin.
9	8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonate interaction with whole and disrupted mitochondria a re evaluation of the use of double reciprocal plots in the derivation of binding parameters for fluorescent probes binding to mitochondrial membranes	Anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonate interaction with whole mitochondria and broken a reevaluation of l' use of double reciprocal tracings in the derivation of binding parameters for fluorescent mitochondrial membrane-binding probes.
9	the new patient index a method of measuring the activity of day hospitals	The new patient index is a method of measuring wait times; day hospital activity.
9	overlap problems in counting fibers	There was some overlap in the fiber counting.
9	right ventricular volume in congenital heart disease	Right ventricular volume in congenital heart disease.
9	a simple method for anzlyzing multifactorial data	A simple method to annotate the multifactorial data.
9	comparison of 2 angiographic methods to determine the expulsion fraction of the left ventricle	Comparison of two angiographic methods to determine fraction d&apos expulsion of the left ventricle.
9	effect of papaverine hydrochloride on brain circulation studies using a scintillation camera computer system	Effects of the hydrochloride papaverine on brain circulation studies using a scintillation camera computer system.
9	sense and applicability of means various critical considerations	Meaning and applicability of terms means a variety of critical considerations.
9	an equilibrium binding study of the interaction of fructose 6 phosphate and fructose 1 6 bisphosphate with rabbit muscle phosphofructokinase	A study of binding to epos; equilibrium of epos; interaction of fructose 6 phosphate and fructose 16 bisphosphate with muscle phosphofructokinase of rabbit.
9	fluorescence energy transfer between ligand binding sites on aspartate transcarbamylase	Dapos transfer; fluorescence energy between ligand binding sites on apos; aspartate transcarbamylase.
9	negative cooperativity in the binding of thyroxine to human serum prealbumin preparation of tritium labeled 8 anilino 1 naphthalenesulfonic acid	Negative co-activity in thyroxine binding to a human tritium tritium-labeled human serum préalbumin preparation; anilino acid 8 naphthalenesulfonic acid 1.
9	mandelate racemase from pseudomonas putida magnetic resonance and kinetic studies of the mechanism of catalysis	Mandelate pseudomonas putida magnetic resonance racemase and kinetic studies of the catalytic mechanism.
9	nuclear magnetic resonance studies of histone iv solution conformation	Nuclear magnetic resonance study of conformation of l&apos solution; histone iv in solution.
9	platelet stimulation by thrombin and other proteases	Stimulation of platelets by thrombin and other proteases.
9	immobilized electric eel acetylcholinesterase i kinetics of acetylcholinesterase trapped in polyacrylamide membranes	The kinetics of immobilized electrical eel, acetylcholinesterase i, are trapped in polyacrylamide membranes.
9	human platelet 6 phosphofructokinase relation between inhibition by mg atp2 and cooperativity towards fructose 6 phosphate and investigations on the formation of a ternary complex	Relationship of human platelet phosphofructokinase 6 to apos; inhibition by mg atp2 and cooperativity to fructose phosphate 6 and apos; study of d&apos formation; ternary complex.
9	ph effects in plasmin catalysed hydrolysis of alpha n benzoyl l arginine compounds	Ph effects in plasmin catalyze epos; hydrolysis of benzoyl n-α compounds; arginine.
9	physicochemical and kinetic properties of beef liver argininosuccinase studies in the presence and absence of arginase	The chemical and kinetic properties of bovine liver argininosuccinase have been studied in the presence and absence of apos; arginase.
9	mammalian 3 oxosteroid delta4 delta5 isomerase a membrane bound enzyme ii activation by divalent cations	Mammalian 3 delta4 delta5 delta5 oxosteroid isomerase, a membrane-bound enzyme ii activated by divalent cations.
9	a physical explanation of the epr spectrum observed during catalysis by enzymes utilizing coenzyme b12	A physical explanation of the esr spectrum observed during catalysis by enzymes using the coenzyme b12 as the coenzyme.
9	lateral diffusion of cholesterol in monolayers	Lateral spread of cholesterol in the monolayers.
9	the characterization of energized and partially de energized respiration independent beta galactoside transport into escherichia coli	Characterization of live and partially live breathing-independent beta galactoside transport in escherichia coli.
9	a conformational change in bovine beta lactoglobulin at low ph	A conformational change in the beta-low-phase bovine lactoglobulin.
9	nonlinear regression methods in design of experiments and mathematical modelling applications to the analysis of the steady state kinetics of glutathione reductase	Non-linear regression methods in the design of experiments and applications of mathematical modelling at apos; kinetics analysis at apos; state d' glutathione reductase equilibrium.
9	substrate inhibition kinetics in assemblages of cells	The kinetics of l' substrate inhibition in cell assemblages.
9	dynamics of cellular growth	Cellular growth dynamics in the brain.
9	a computer simulation model for analysis of conformation of nuclear chromatin and of the transcription process	Computer simulation model for the analysis of the conformation of nuclear chromatin and the transcription process.
9	a negative control model of hormone receptor interaction	Apos negative control model; hormone receptor interaction.
9	time hierarchy equilibrium and non equilibrium in metabolic systems	Apos hypothesis; temporal hierarchy balance vs. non-balance in metabolic systems.
9	analytic procedures for large dimention nonlinear biochemical oscillators	Analytical procedures for large-dimensional, nonlinear biochemical oscillators.
9	genetic distance and gene diversity among linguistically different tribes of mexican indians	Genetic distance and genetic diversity among linguistically different Mexican Indians.
9	estimation of race admixture a new method	This method is based on the estimation of the number of animals; a new method.
9	influence of crossbridge compliance on the force velocity relation of muscle	L' influence of the conformity of cross-bridges on the relationship between force velocity and muscle.
9	electron diffraction study of the hexagonal polymorphic form of some choline containing phosphpolipids	Electron diffraction study of the hexagonal polymorphic form of some choline-containing phospholipids.
9	monolayer characteristics of some glycolipids at the air water interface	Monolayer characteristics of selected glycolipids at l' air-water interface.
9	modification of optical responses associated with the action potential of lobster giant axons	Modification of optical responses associated with lobster potential; action of giant axons.
9	kinetics of macrotetrolide induced ion transport across lipid bilayer membranes	Macrotetrolide kinetics induces ion transport across lipid bilayer membranes.
9	electromechanical stresses and the effect of ph on membrane structure	Electromechanical stress and effect of the ph on the membrane structure.
9	light scattering from nucleated biological cells	Light diffusion by nucleated biological cells.
9	analysis of fluorescence decay curves by means of the laplace transformation	Analysis of fluorescence decay curves using laplace transformation.
9	the effect of essential fatty acid deficiency upon fatty acid uptake by the brain	L' effect of lack of essential fatty acids on appetite; absorption of fatty acids by brain.
9	diffusion in bile and its implications on detergency	Dissemination in the bile and its implications for the detergent.
9	influence of glucocorticoids on some morphological and biochemical aspects of rat small intestinal mucosa	Influence of glucocorticoids on morphological and biochemical aspects of the mucosa of the rat small intestine.
9	the effect of neomycin and streptomycin on the electrical polarisability of aqueous suspensions of escherichia coli	Effect of neomycin and streptomycin on the electrical polarizability of aqueous suspensions of d' escherichia coli.
9	kinetics of a ca 2 triggered membrane aggregation reaction of phospholipid membranes	The kinetics of d' ca 2 elicits a d&apos reaction; membrane aggregation of phospholipid membranes.
9	relationship between hb and hba2 concentrations in healthy and iron deficient subjects	Relationships between levels of hb and hba2 in healthy and iron-deficient subjects.
9	the acidity and peptic activity of gastric juice in healthy children and in children suffering from cystic fibrosis author s transl	L' acidity and l' peptic gastric juice activity in healthy children and in children with cystic fibrosis.
9	kidney position and the measurement of relative uptake of 131 i hippuran in renography	Position of the kidneys and measurement of l' relative absorption of 131 i hippuran in renography.
9	energy a useful criterion in analysis of human visual evoked response	L' energy is a useful criterion in the analysis of human visual evoked response.
9	sterility control basic mathematical considerations author s transl	Infertility controls basic mathematical considerations about the translation of the author.
9	spectral analysis of the eeg recorded during stimulation of the human fovea	L' spectral analysis of age was recorded during stimulation of human fovea.
9	the length of the fibroin gene in the bombyx mori genome	This is the length of the fibroin gene in the bombyx mori genome.
9	structural genes adjacent to interspersed repetitive dna sequences	Structural genes adjacent to d&apos repetitive sequences; DNA dispersed among sequences.
9	purification and properties of coffee bean alpha d galactosidase	Purification and properties of the bean's alpha galactosidase.
9	complexation of reducing and nonreducing carbohydrates with hydroxides of some alkali and alkaline earth metals	Carbohydrate reduction and non-reducing complex with some alkali and alkaline alkali metal hydroxides.
9	the result sequence method sequence analysis in leptospira research 3 communication the bilateral sequential test de boer armitage for testing the difference of mean values of two binomial distributions author s transl	L' sequential analysis of the sequential method of results in the framework of research leptospira 3 allows to communicate the bilateral sequential test of boer armitage to test the difference of the average values of two binomial distributions.
9	some physico chemical properties of aqueous solutions of n alpha acyl l histidine	Some physic properties-chemical properties of n alpha acyl l histidine aqueous solutions.
9	a model of lateral diffusion in phosphatide bilayers and natural membranes	Side-scattering pattern in natural phosphatidic bilayers and natural phosphatidic membranes.
9	studies on phosphatidylcholine model membranes i iodine permeability measurement by specific ion electrode	Studies on the measurement of phosphatidylcholine model membrane ion electrode permeability.
9	a new method of measuring propagation coefficients and characteristic impedance in blood vessels	A new method to measure the propagation coefficients and l' characteristic impedance in blood vessels.
9	simulation of action potential propagation in an inhomogeneous sheet of coupled excitable cells	Simulation of the propagation of the d&apos potential; action in an inhomogeneous layer of coupled excitable cells.
9	right ventricular performance in patients with coronary artery disease	Right ventricular performance in patients with apo; coronary heart disease.
9	trend detection in control data optimization and interpretation of trigg s technique for trend analysis	Detection of trends in the environment; optimization of monitoring data and interpretation of triggers; trend analysis.
9	use of carbon dioxide and oxygen tonometered phosphate bicarbonate chloride glycerol water mixtures for calibration and control of ph pco2 and po2 electrode systems	Use of aqueous mixtures of bicarbonate, carbon dioxide and dichloromethane; oxygen, tonometre with phosphate, to calibrate and control the systems; electrodes ph pco2 and po2.
9	pressure drop across artificially induced stenoses in the femoral arteries of dogs	Pressure drop in the stenoses induced artificially in the femoral arteries of dogs.
9	observations on blood viscosity changes after acute myocardial infarction	Observations on changes in blood viscosity after an acute myocardial infarction.
9	radionuclide angiocardiography improved diagnosis and quantitation of left to right shunts using area ratio techniques in children	L' radionuclide angiocardiography led to improvements in diagnosis and quantification of left-hand derivations-right at the apos; help with reporting techniques; area in children.
9	molar absorptivities of beta nadh and beta nad at 260 nm	Molar absorptivities of beta-nadh and beta-nad at 260 nm.
9	transient potentials in dendritic systems of arbitrary geometry	Transient potentialities in dendritic systems of arbitrary geometry.
9	cumulative radiation effect part iv normalisation of fractionated and continuous therapy area and volume correction factors	Cumulative effect of the deletions Part iv normalization of the implant; fractionation area and continuous therapy and volume correction factors.
9	expressions of the michaelis menten equation when studying enzyme reactions in a variable volume medium	Expressions of michaelis menten in vitro; michaelis menten equation in vitro; study of enzyme reactions in a volume-variable medium.
9	the effect of systematic error on the accuracy of michaelis constants and maximum velocities estimated by using the integrated michaelis menten equation	The effect is a systematic error in the accuracy of michaelis constants and maximum estimated velocities at the apos; aid of the apos; integrated equation of michaelis menten.
9	cine angiographic determination of ventricular volumes with the help of a computer author s transl	Angiographic kinetic determination of ventricular volumes at apos; assistant d' translated author computer.
9	validation of a dual isotope plasma ratio method for measurement of cholesterol absorption in rats	Validation of pH values; a double isotope plasma ratio method for the measurement of pH; absorption of cholesterol in the rat.
9	time course of the effect of adrenalectomy on transcortin binding characteristics appraisal of different methods of calculation	L' temporal evolution of apos; effect of adrenalectomy on apos; evaluation of trans-cortine binding characteristics according to different calculation methods.
9	optimal statistical design of radioimmunoassays and competitive protein binding assays	Optimal statistical design of radioimmunoassays and protein binding tests.
9	a simple method to evaluate the massive dose vitamin a prophylaxis program in preschool children	A simple method for evaluating the massive dose of vitamin a prophylactic program in children of pre-school age.
9	blood sugar determination with the reflomat author s transl	Determination of the glycemia with the translation of l'apos; author of the reflomat.
9	alimentary iodine deficiency in the federal republic of germany author s transl	Food-borne iodine deficiency disorder in the Federal Republic of Germany; translator.
9	the effects of diet lipolysis and limb ischaemia on the distribution of plasma tryptophan in the rat	Effects of dietary lipolysis and limb ischemia on the distribution of plasma tryptophan in rats.
9	extracellular enzyme system utilized by the fungus sporotrichum pulverulentum chrysosporium lignorum for the breakdown of cellulose 2 activities of the five endo 1 4 beta glucanases towards carboxymethylcellulose	Extracellular enzyme system used by the fungus sporotrichum pulverulentum chrysosporium lignorum for breakdown of apos; cellulose activity 2 of five endo 14 beta glucanases into carboxymethylcellulose.
9	the semen of fertile men statistical analysis of 1300 men	The Sperm of a Fertile Man A statistical analysis of the sperm of 1,300 men.
9	voltage transients in neuronal dendritic trees	The tension transients in neural dendritic trees.
9	a note on the variance of the number of loci having a given gene frequency	A note on the variance of the number of loci with gene frequencies.
9	on nei and roychoudhury s sampling variances of heterozygosity and genetic distance	On nei and roychoudhury we sample variances of gap; heterozygosity and genetic distance.
9	a new method for measurement of right ventricular residual ratio using 121i maa	A new right ventricular residual ratio measurement method using 121i maa.
9	sequential change in the different of potential distribution between a normal subject and simulated torso model	Sequential change in the potential distribution difference between a normal subject and a simulated torso model.
9	methods of mathematical differentiation in tonography	Mathematical differentiation methods in tonography.
9	model for the growth of a solid in vitro tumor	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for the presence of a tumour.
9	the influence of women s work opportunities on marriage rates	L' influence of poverty; influence of poverty; women's work activity on employment opportunities; employment, women's work opportunities and marriage rates.
9	estimates of fecundability from a truncated distribution of conception times	Estimates of fecundability based on a truncated distribution of time of conception.
9	a general method of correction for age misreporting in census populations	General method of correcting errors; estimate of causes; age in census populations.
9	constructing increment decrement life tables	Build increment life life tables incrementally.
9	use of a specific probe for ovalbumin messenger rna to quantitate estrogen induced gene transcripts	L' use of apos; a specific probe for message ovalbumin rna to quantify estrogen-induced gene transcripts.
9	structure function relationship in the binding of snake neurotoxins to the torpedo membrane receptor	The ratio of structure function in the binding of snake neurotoxins to torpedo membrane receptor.
9	application of pulsed gradient fourier transform nuclear magnetic resonance to the study of self diffusion of phospholipid vesicles	Application of pulsed gradient Fourier transform nuclear magnetic resonance at apos; auto-diffusion of phospholipid vesicles.
9	optical spectra and electronic structure of flavine mononucleotide in flavodoxin crystals	Optical spectrum and electronic structure of flavin mononucleotide in crystals of flavodoxine.
9	spin label studies of tropomyosin	Spin-marker studies of tropomyosin.
9	a practical approach to quantitate hepatic excretory function	A practical approach to quantifying hepatic excretory function.
9	aspartate aminotransferase from wheat germ purification and kinetic properties	L' aspartate aminotransferase from the purification of wheat germ and its kinetic properties.
9	model of regulation of the proliferation rate of bone marrow stem cells	Model for regulation of bone marrow stem cell proliferation rate.
9	actinomycin d deoxynucleotide complexes as models for the actinomycin d dna complex the use of nuclear magnetic resonance to determine the stoichiometry and the geometry of the complexes	L' use of nuclear magnetic resonance to determine the stoichiometry and geometry of d&apos deoxynucleotide complexes; actinomycin as models of the d&apos complex; l&apos DNA; actinomycin.
9	direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at moderate resolution 7a	Direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at a moderate resolution 7a.
9	in vitro measurement of margin of safety of neuromuscular transmission	An in vitro measurement of the margin of safety of the neuromuscular transmission.
9	a medico genetic study of the population of western pamir vi local genetic differentiation in the populations of western pamir	A genetic medical study of the population of pamir de l'apos; west vi local genetic differentiation in pamir de l'apos populations; west.
9	viscosity and molecular weight of hyaluronic acids	Viscosity and molecular weight of hyaluronic acids.
9	the allosteric properties of beef liver fructose bisphosphatase	The allosteric properties of the bovine liver fructose bisphosphatase.
9	kinematics of spontaneous breathing the ventilatory system as a non linear oscillator	The kinematics of spontaneous respiration of the ventilatory system as a nonlinear oscillator.
9	the steady state kinetics of the oxygenation of linoleic acid catalysed by soybean lipoxygenase	Apos kinetics; apos state; apos equilibrium; apos oxygenation; soybean lipoxygenase catalyzed linoleic acid.
9	analysis of the kinetics of the transition of cells to dna synthesis in systems with stimulated proliferation ii theoretical bases of the method	Analysis of the kinetics of cell transition to biosynthesis; DNA synthesis in stimulated proliferation systems ii theoretical basis of the method.
9	a two state conformational transition of the extracellular ribonuclease of bacillus amyloliquefaciens barnase induced by sodium dodecyl sulfate	Sodium dodecyl sulfate induced two-state conformational transition of the extracellular ribonuclease of the amyloliquefaciens barnase.
9	a computational method for calculating distensibility of the blood vessel in vivo	Procedure for calculating the distensibility of blood vessels in vivo.
9	inactivation of biologically active dna by gamma ray induced superoxide radicals and their dismutation products singlet molecular oxygen and hydrogen peroxide	L' inactivation of the molecule; biologically active gamma-ray DNA induced superoxide radicals and their disproportionation products, l' singlet molecular oxygen and hydrogen peroxide.
9	an nmr investigation of electron transfer in the copper protein plastocyanin	A study of the transfer of d' electron in the copper protein plastocyanine.
9	kinetics of the cooperative association of actin to actin filaments	The kinetics of apos; cooperative association of apos; actin in the filaments of apos; actin.
9	the response of the ferrous sulphate dosemeter to neutrons	The response of ferrous sulphate deposition to neutrons.
9	a possible mechanism of the generation of singlet molecular oxygen in nadph dependent microsomal lipid peroxidation	A possible mechanism of molecular oxygen production is found in the nadphous-dependent peroxidation of microsomal lipids.
9	theoretical model of the ionic mechanism of 1 f noise in nerve membrane	Theoretical model of the ionic mechanism of noise 1 f in the nerve membrane.
9	work of large information systems	The work of a large e-mail system; information on e-mail systems; information from the European Union.
9	simulation studies of self associating systems discrimination between specific and isodesmic associations	Simulation studies of discrimination of associated auto-systems between specific and isodesmic associations.
9	a theoretical study of gaseous homeostasis in the magill circuit	A theoretical study of gas homeostasis in the magillary circuit.
9	kinetic manifestations of slow isomerization of allosteric enzyme for the model of monod wyman and changeux	Apos kinetic manifestations; slow isomerization of apos; allosteric enzyme for the wyman and monodic changeable model.
9	model for the positional differentiation of the cap in acetabularia	Model for positional differentiation of the cap in the acetabular.
9	the measurement of the performance of the display system of radioisotope imaging device the multi element band display	In the case of a radioisotope imagery, it is necessary to monitor the performance of the system; display of the images; display of the multiple element band.
9	structure of the complexes of distamycin type antibiotics and actinomycin d with dna new data on the localization of these antibiotics within the dna narrow groove	Structure of the distamycin-like antibiotic complexes; actinomycin d with new DNA data on the localization of these antibiotics in the narrow furrow of the apo; DNA.
9	compartmental model of the adsorption of a dye by proteins the possible role of adsorption in the hepatic excretion of bromosulphophthalein	Compartmental model of apos; adsorption of apos; a protein dye the possible role of apos; adsorption in apos; bromosulfophthalein hepatic excretion.
9	numerical determination of intestinal membrane diffusing constants by a gradient method	Numerical determination of the intestinal membrane diffusion constants by a gradient method.
9	derivation of the angle of torsion of the eye	The derivation of the gap; angle of gap; torsional angle of gap; eye of gap; eye of gap; observer.
9	simple formulas for computation of prism vergence and accommodation stimulation in a brewster stereoscope	Simple formulas for calculating prism vergence and d*apos stimulation; accommodation in brewing stereoscope.
9	in vivo determination of cerebral blood volume with radioactive oxygen 15 in the monkey	In vivo determination of blood volume with radioactive oxygen 15 in monkeys.
9	criteria for optimising phylogenetic trees and the problem of determining the root of a tree	Abstract criteria; phylogenetic tree optimization and problem of root determination; a single tree.
9	improvements and simplifications of the ozonolysis schiff staining method for plasma lipoproteins on cellulose acetate	Enhancement and simplification of the schiff ozonolysis staining method for plasma lipoproteins on cellulose acetate.
9	kinetic analysis of carrier mediated ion transport by the charge pulse technique	A kinetic analysis of ion transport by a transporter was carried out using the charge pulse technique.
9	structural requirements for steroid binding and quenching of albumin fluorescence in bovine plasma albumin	Structural requirements for steroid binding and l' fluorescence extinction of l' albumin in l' bovine plasma albumin.
9	propagation of the action potential in the vicinity of the soma of giant neurons after the hodgkin huxley model	Propagation of the d&apos potential; hodgkin huxley action near the giant neuron soma.
9	assembly of three major subclasses of mouse immunoglobulin g a theoretical model for covalent assembly in vivo	Assembly of three under-main classes d' immunoglobulin g mouse, a theoretical model for in vivo covalent assembly.
9	analogue solution for electrical capacity of membrane covered square cylinders in square array at high concentration	A similar solution for the electrical capacity of square cylinders covered with high-concentration, square-row membrane.
9	comparison of jumping and electrodiffusion mechanisms of particle movement in thin membranes i statement of the problem stationary transfer	Comparison of the mechanisms of jump and gap; electrodiffusion of particle motion in thin membranes he statement of problem stationary transfer problem.
9	utilization of the inactivation rate of coenzyme a transferase by thiol reagents to determine properties of the enzyme coa intermediate	Use of d' inactivation of the coenzyme a transferase by thiol reagents to determine the properties of the intermediate coa enzyme.
9	asymmetric charge distributions in planar bilayer systems	Asymmetric charge distributions in planar double layer systems are obtained.
9	study of cycle of cell wall assembly in streptococcus faecalis by three dimensional reconstructions of thin sections of cells	L' study of cell wall assembly in three-dimensional reconstruction of thin sections of cells of Streptococcus faecalis.
9	system analysis of the multi oscillatory functional order in the circadian and ultradian frequency range and its monitoring value for load effects exemplified by a varying light dark regimen in the intensive rearing of sheep	Systemic analysis of apo; multiple oscillatory functional order in the circadian and ultradian frequency ranges and load effects monitoring value illustrated by a d&apo regime; variable light obscurity in apo; intensive rearing of sheep.
9	an evaluation of statistical procedures designed to detect outliers resulting from a light degree of contamination in random samples of moderate size	Evaluation of statistical procedures designed to detect outliers resulting from a moderate degree of contamination in medium sized random samples.
9	conformational transitions of polypeptides in ternary solvent systems	Conformational transitions of polypeptides in ternary solvent systems.
9	errors in the measurement of total respiratory resistance and reactance by forced oscillations	Errors in measuring total respiratory resistance and responsiveness by forced oscillations.
9	recording of ventricular pressure by conventional catheter manometer systems efficiency of several combinations of conventional catheters modern transducers and catheter flush systems author s transl	Ventricular pressure recording by conventional catheter manometers systems Effectiveness of several conventional catheter combinations Modern transducers and catheter rinsing systems Translators.
9	interaction of aminoacyl trna synthetases and trna positive and negative cooperativity of their active centres	Interaction of aminoacyl trna synthetases and positive and negative cooperation of their active centers.
9	transfer free energies and average static accessibilities for ribonuclease a in guanidinium hydrochloride and urea solutions	Transfer free energies and mean static ribonuclease a accessibilities to guanidinium and d&apos hydrochloride urea solutions.
9	the sedimentation equilibrium of heterogeneously associating systems and mixtures of non interacting solutes analysis without determination of molecular weight averages	L' settling equilibrium of heterogeneous association systems and l&apos mixtures; solute analysis without interaction without determination of molecular weight averages.
9	chemical studies on yeast hexokinase specific modification of a single tyrosyl residue with 1 ethyl 3 3 dimethylaminopropyl carbodiimide	Chemical studies on the specific modification of apos; apos yeast hexokinase; a single tyrosyl residue with 1 ethyl carbodiimide-3 dimethylaminopropyl-3 methyl carbodiimide.
9	flow cytofluorometric analysis of cell cycle distributions using propidium iodide properties of the method and mathematical analysis of the data	Continuous flow cytofluorometric analysis of cell cycle distributions using method properties of apos; propidium iodide and apos; mathematical analysis of data.
9	analysis of afferent responses from isolated semicircular canal of the guitarfish using rotational acceleration white noise inputs ii estimation of linear system parameters and gain and phase spectra	Analysis of the associated responses of the isolated circular channel semi-fish-guitar to l' help from d&apos white noise inputs; rotational acceleration ii estimation of linear system parameters and gain and phase spectra.
9	conformational characteristics of luliberin circular dichroism and fluorescence studies	Conformational features of luliberin circular dichroism and fluorescence.
9	the epr of low spin heme complexes relation of the t2g hole model to the directional properties of the g tensor and a new method for calculating the ligand field parameters	The relationship of the l&apos complexes; low-spin heme of the t2g hole model with the directional properties of the g tensor and a new method for calculating ligand field parameters.
9	reaction of cis and trans isomers of platinum ii diamminedichloride with purine adensine and its derivatives in dilute solutions	Reaction of the cis and trans isomers of platinum diamedichloride ii with purine adenosine and its derivatives in dilute solutions.
9	mathematical analysis of myelin structure of nerves of the brachial plexus in antenatal and early postnatal ontogenesis of man	Mathematical analysis of myelin structure of brachial plexus nerves in pre- and early post-natal ontogenesis of men.
9	a simplified approach to the measurement of specific airway resistance	A simplified approach to airway specific resistance measurement.
9	serological study of several strains of foot and mouth disease virus type o isolated in europe between 1971 and 1975 application of the biomathematical system of classification	Serological study of several strains of FMD virus isolated in Europe between 1971 and 1975 using the classification biomathematic system.
9	pressure jump relaxation kinetics of frog skin open circuit voltage and short circuit current	The pressure is kinetic jump relaxation frog skin tension open circuit and short circuit-current circuit.
9	normal values in clinical electrooculography iii numerical evaluation of two dimensionless eog parameters	Normal Clinical Electrooculography Values iii Numerical evaluation of dimensionless eog parameters in two dimensions.
9	the momentum of population growth with time dependent net maternity function	L' momentum of l' population increase with a time-dependent net maternity function.
9	a proposal for revision of the quality factor	A proposal for the revision of the quality factor is on the agenda for the revision of the quality factor.
9	resolution of electron microscope autoradiography iv application to analysis of autoradiographs	Apos resolution; electron microscope x-ray x-ray application; autoradiograph analysis.
9	occurrence of an uncoupler resistant intermediate type of phosphate water oxygen exchange reaction catalyzed by heart submitochondrial particles	An intermediate reaction of apos; exchange of apos; oxygen of the apos; phosphate- and decoupling-resistant water, catalyzed by particles of the type under heart mitochondrial.
9	the microfilarial load in the anterior segment of the eye a parameter of intensity of onchocerciasis	Microfilament charge in the anterior segment of the eye, a parameter of weakness; intensity of weakness; onchocerciasis.
9	water and electrolyte acquisition across the placenta of the sheep	Acquisition of water and electrolytes through the placenta of sheep.
9	size and density of fibrin fibers from turbidity	Size and density of fibrin fibers from the turbidity.
9	on the use of calibration equations in perception research	On the following: use of calibration equations; use of equations d' calibration in researching perception research on perception perception.
9	clinical application of a single compartment model to urea and creatinine kinetics in dialysis therapy	Clinical application of apos; a single-compartment model for urea and creatinine kinetics in dialysis therapy.
9	open field behavior in mice generality of results from a diallel analysis of replicate selected lines	Mouse field behaviour Generality of results obtained from a diallel analysis of selected replicated lines.
9	albumin clearance from alveoli tissue permeation vs airway displacement	The clearance of l' albumin from permeation of alveolar tissue vs. airway displacement.
9	kinetics of bilirubin binding to bovine serum albumin and the effects of palmitate	Kinetics of bilirubin binding to l' bovine serum albumin and palmitate effects.
9	mechanodynamics at the interventricular sulcus reciprocal effect of the ventricles on the ventricular function	Mechanodynamics at the interventricular groove of the ventricles; reciprocal effect on ventricular function.
9	electronic conformational interactions of molecular biological systems i quantum chemical aspect of the theory of electronic conformational interaction	Conformational electronic interactions of molecular biological systems i quantum chemical aspect of the electronic conformational interaction theory.
9	systems matching by degeneration ii interpretation of the generation and degeneration of retinal ganglion cells in the chicken by a mathematical model	Degeneration-related systems ii. interpretation of the generation and degeneration of retinal ganglion cells (RNGs) in chicken at apos; aid d' a mathematical model.
9	stereological analysis of reinke s crystals in human leydig cells	Stereological analysis of reindeer crystals in leucoded human cells.
9	quantitative structure activity relationships vi non linear dependence of biological activity on hydrophobic character calculation procedures for bilinear model	Quantitative relationships between structures and apo; nonlinear dependent vi activity of apo; biological activity on procedures for calculating hydrophobic characters for bilinear model.
9	heritability estimates from twin studies i formulae of heritability estimates	Estimations of income; heritability from studies; twin formula studies; estimates of income; heritability.
9	spectroscopic studies of specifically deuterium labeled membrane systems nuclear magnetic resonance investigation of the effects of cholesterol in model systems	Spectroscopic studies of membrane systems specifically labelled with deuterium Study of nuclear magnetic resonance of cholesterol effects in model systems.
9	influence of viscosity of enzymatic reactions studied with glucoamylase of aspergillus niger	The influence of the viscosity of the enzymatic reactions was studied with glucoamylase d' aspergillus niger.
9	steady state turnover and body pool of ascorbic acid in man	Spinning, steady state, and body mass of ascorbic acid in the body; male.
9	ring current effects in the conformation dependent nmr chemical shifts of aliphatic protons in the basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor	Ring current effects in nmr conformationally dependent chemical shifts of aliphatic protons in the basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor.
9	an automated study of eeg a method of detection of non stationary points	An automated study of apos; eg a non-stationary stationary point detection method of the detection method.
9	structure of the dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine vesicle and the complex formed by its interaction with apolipoprotein c iii x ray small angle scattering studies	The structure of the dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine vesicle and of the dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine complex formed by its interaction with apos; apolipoprotein c iii x rays was studied by low-angle scattering.
9	conformation as the determinant of saccharide binding in concanavalin a ca2 concanavalin a complexes	Conformation is the determinant of saccharide binding in ca2 concanavalin, concanavalin, and concanavalin complexes.
9	peritubular capillary control of proximal tubule reabsorption in the rat	Peritubular capillary control of proximal tubular reabsorption in rat.
9	instantaneous pressure volume relationship of right atrium during isovolumic contraction in canine heart	An instantaneous relationship between the volume of the right atrium pressure and the isovolumic contraction in the dog heart.
9	light propagation in twisted anisotropic media application to photoreceptors	Light propagation in a twisted anisotropic medium applied to the photoreceptors.
9	heat stress upon undressed man due to different combinations of elevated environmental temperature air humidity and metabolic heat production a critical comparison of heat stress indices	Heat stress on the undressed man due to various combinations of high environmental temperature humidity of the air and metabolic heat production a critical comparison of thermal stress indices.
9	possibility of the spectral analysis of heterogeneous biological systems the determination of the mycelium concentration of actinomyces aureofaciens a producer of tetracycline cultured on a medium with corn meal	Possibility of apo; spectral analysis of heterogeneous biological systems mycelial concentration determination; actinomyces aureofaciens a tetracycline producer grown on a corn meal medium.
9	method for computing motion in a two dimensional cochlear model	Method of calculating motion in a two-dimensional cochlear model.
9	the orientations of reaction center transition moments in the chromatophore membrane of rhodopseudomonas sphareroides bases on new linear dichroism and photoselection measurements	The orientations of the reaction center transition moments in the rhodopseudomonas sphareroides membrane chromatophore are based on new linear dichroism and photoselection measurements.
9	synthesis and degradation of xanthine dehydrogenase in chick liver in vivo and in vitro studies	In vivo and in vitro synthesis and degradation of xanthine dehydrogenase in chicken liver.
9	dna replication in hela cells after gamma irradiation ii the periodicity of dna replication in the process of giant cell formation	DNA replication in gamma irradiation helical cells ii replication periodicity of the apos; DNA in the process of giant cell formation.
9	theory of binaural interaction based on auditory nerve data iii joint dependence on interaural time and amplitude differences in discrimination and detection	Theory of the apo; binural interaction based on data from the auditory nerve iii joint dependence on the apo; consideration of interaural time and differences in apo; amplitude in discrimination and detection.
9	a method for the determination of amitriptyline and its metabolites nortriptyline 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and 10 hydroxynortriptyline in human plasma using stable isotope dilution and gas chromatography chemical ionization mass spectrometry gc cims	A method for the determination of 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and its metabolites nortriptyline 10 in human plasma at apos using stable isotope dilution and gc cims chemical ionization mass spectrometry gas chromatography.
9	analysis of the adolescent growth spurt using smoothing spline functions	Growth spurt analysis of teenagers at age; help spline smoothing functions.
9	curve of labeled mitoses with different states of cell proliferation kinetics v effect of the circadian rhythm of cell proliferation on the shape of the labeled mitosis curve	Curve of marked mitoses with different states of cell proliferation kinetics has an effect of circadian rhythm of cell proliferation on the shape of the marked mitosis curve.
9	evolutionary potential a mathematical hypothesis of mouse hemoglobin beta chain evolution	Evolutionary potential mathematical hypothesis of the apos; evolution of the beta chain; mouse hemoglobin.
9	kinetics of tryptophan transport into the brain	Kinetics of tryptophan transport in the brain.
9	role of surface distribution of hydrophobic groups in the assembly of protein quaternary structure	Role of surface distribution of hydrophobic groups in quaternary protein structure assembly.
9	spike transmission in statistical neuronal ensembles induced epileptic focus in a model of hippocampal field ca3	Transmission of d' peak in statistical neural sets induced epileptic focusing in a ca3 hippocampal field model.
10	resistance and cross resistance of escherichia coli s mutants to the radiomimetic agent proflavine	Resistance and cross-resistance of d*apos mutants; escherichia coli to apos; radiomimetic agent proflavin.
10	tryptophan and indole excreting prototrophic mutant of escherichia coli	Tryptophan and indole excrete the prototrophic mutant d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	cross resistance relationships in escherichia coli between ultraviolet radiation and nitrous acid	Resistance relationships in Escherichia coli between ultraviolet radiation and l' nitrous acid.
10	thymineless mutation site on escherichia coli chromosome	Thymine-free mutation site on the d' Escherichia coli chromosome.
10	mutational synergism between radiations and methylated purines in escherichia coli	Mutational synergism between the radiation and the methylated purines in escherichia coli.
10	isolation and properties of a putrescine degrading mutant of escherichia coli	Isolation and properties of a putrescine-degrading Escherichia coli (ESC) mutant.
10	effect of drug resistance factor r on the f properties of escherichia coli	The effect of the r-resistance factor on the properties of escherichia coli.
10	gene transfer by f strains of escherichia coli iv effect of a chromosomal deletion on chromosome transfer	Chromosome transfer by escherichia coli; gene transfer by fetus strains has a chromosomal effect on chromosome transfer.
10	new type of streptomycin resistance resulting from action of the episomelike mutator factor in escherichia coli	A novel type of streptomycin resistance resulting from ectomycin deficiency; action of episomal mutator factor in escherichia coli.
10	proline metabolism in escherichia coli ii regulation of total growth of a proline auxotroph by a proline oxidizing system	Metabolism of proline in escherichia coli ii regulation of total growth of apos; proline auxotroph by a proline-oxidizing system.
10	resistance and cross resistance of escherichia coli s mutants to the radiomimetic agent nitrofurazone	Resistance and cross-resistance of mutants of d' escherichia coli to nitrogen; nitrofurazone radiomimetic agent.
10	fructose 1 6 diphosphatase and acid hexose phosphatase of escherichia coli	Fructose 16 diphosphatase and hexose phosphatase acid d' escherichia coli.
10	kinetic and genetic analyses of d cycloserine inhibition and resistance in escherichia coli	Kinetic and genetic analysis of the inhibition and resistance to d cycloserine in escherichia coli.
10	metabolism of glutamic acid in a mutant of escherichia coli	Lapos metabolism; glutamic acid in a d&apos mutant; escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage common to pasteurella pestis and escherichia coli	Bacteriophage common to pasteurella pestis and escherichia coli.
10	suppression of a lac o o mutation in escherichia coli	Deletion of lake mutation o o o o in Escherichia coli.
10	gene recombination and segregation of resistance factor r in escherichia coli	Resistance factor r recombination and segregation in escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage induced functions in escherichia coli k lambda infected with rii mutants of bacteriophage t4	Bacteriophage-induced functions of lambda escherichia coli infected with rii mutants of bacteriophage t4 were observed.
10	chromosomal location of thymine and arginine genes in escherichia coli and an f incorporating them	Chromosomal localization of arginine and thymine genes in escherichia coli and an incorporator f.
10	analysis of a gene controlling cell division and sensitivity to radiation in escherichia coli	Dapos analysis; a gene controlling escherichia coli cell division and radiation sensitivity.
10	chromosomal aberrations associated with mutations to bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli	Chromosome aberrations associated with mutations of bacteriophage resistance in Escherichia coli.
10	isolation of mutants affecting tryptophanase production in escherichia coli	Isolate mutants that affect tryptophanase production in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of tryptophanase mutants of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of tryptophanase d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	autoradiographic studies of bacterial chromosome replication in amino acid deficient escherichia coli 15t	Autoradiographic studies of bacterial chromosomal replication in amino acid deficient escherichia coli 15t.
10	nature of the effector of catabolite repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	The effect of the catabolite repression of beta galactosidase in Escherichia coli.
10	effect of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyladenine on polymer synthesis in a polyauxotrophic strain of escherichia coli	Effect of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyladenine on the synthesis of polymers in a polyauxotrophic strain of d' escherichia coli.
10	genetics of host controlled restriction and modification of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Host-mediated restriction genetics and deoxyribonucleic acid modification in escherichia coli are host controlled.
10	loss and repair of conjugal fertility and infectivity of the resistance factor and sex factor in escherichia coli	Marital fertility loss and repair; resistance factor and sex trait infectivity in escherichia coli.
10	properties and regulation of the beta d galactosidase in shigella dysenteriae and in escherichia coli shigella dysenteriae hybrids	The properties and regulation of beta dgalactosidase in the hybrid shigella dysenteriae and escherichia coli shigella dysenteriae.
10	intracellular forms of lambda deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli infected with clear or virulent mutants of bacteriophage lambda	Intracellular forms of etapos; deoxyribonucleic lambda acid in Escherichia coli infected with clear or virulent mutants of the bacteriophage lambda.
10	distribution and function of genes concerned with aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Distribution and function of the genes involved in aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	biosynthesis of riboflavine by a purine requiring mutant strain of escherichia coli	Riboflavin biosynthesis by a purine mutant strain of apos; escherichia coli.
10	genetic instability in escherichia coli	Genetic instability in Escherichia coli.
10	the biosynthesis of alkaline phosphatase with a particulate fraction of escherichia coli	The biosynthesis of the alkaline phosphatase with a particulate fraction of d' escherichia coli.
10	the synthesis of ribosomes by a mutant of escherichia coli	The synthesis of ribosomes by an escherichia coli-like mutant.
10	mutants of escherichia coli variably resistant to bacteriophage t1	Mutants of d' escherichia coli vary in their resistance to bacteriophage t1.
10	gene controlling the uptake of shikimic acid by escherichia coli	Gene controlling apos; absorption of apos; shikimic acid by escherichia coli.
10	location of the maltose a and b loci on the genetic map of escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of the genetic map of Escherichia coli.
10	evidence for two mechanisms of photoreactivation in escherichia coli b	Two photoreactivation mechanisms were demonstrated in escherichia coli b.
10	conditional mutations involving septum formation in escherichia coli	Conditional mutations involving formation of escherichia coli septum.
10	genetic and biochemical analysis of the isoenzymes concerned in the first reaction of aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Biochemical and genetic analysis of the isoenzymes involved in the first aromatic biosynthetic reaction in escherichia coli.
10	sensitivity of escherichia coli to atabrine conferred by r factor and its potential clinical significance	The sensitivity of Escherichia coli to r-factor atabrine and its potential clinical importance.
10	inducible system for the utilization of beta glucosides in escherichia coli i active transport and utilization of beta glucosides	Inducible system for lacidosis; use of beta-glucosides in active transport of iodine; escherichia coli and beta-glucosides.
10	inducible system for the utilization of beta glucosides in escherichia coli ii description of mutant types and genetic analysis	Inducible system for apo; use of beta glucosides in escherichia coli ii description of the types of mutants and genetic analysis.
10	inversion of transfer modes and sex factor chromosome interactions in conjugation in escherichia coli	Reversal of the modes of transfer and chromosomal interactions of sex factor in escherichia coli conjugation.
10	induction of capsular polysaccharide synthesis by rho fluorophenylalanine in escherichia coli wild type and strains with altered phenylalanyl soluble ribonucleic acid synthetase	Induction of capsular polysaccharide synthesis by rho fluorophenylalanine in wild-type and phenylalanyl-soluble ribonucleic acid synthetase strains.
10	suppression of radiation sensitivity and capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 by ochre suppressors	The suppression of escherichia coli k 12 radiation sensitivity and capsular polysaccharide synthesis by ochre suppressants.
10	selection of sucrose dependent escherichia coli to obtain envelope mutants and fragile cultures	Selection of sucrose-dependent escherichia coli for cell-bound mutants and fragile cultures.
10	mutagenesis in escherichia coli by visible light	Mutagenesis in escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal location of the structural gene for glycerol kinase in escherichia coli	Chromosomal localization of the glycerol kinase structural gene in escherichia coli.
10	unusual growth characteristics of a methionine cyano b12 auxotroph of escherichia coli	Unusual growth characteristics of a cyano b12-methionine auxotroph; Escherichia coli.
10	azure mutants a type of host dependent mutant of the bacteriophage f2	Azur mutants, a type of host-dependent mutant of bacteriophage f2.
10	thymineless death in escherichia coli strain specificity	Thymine-free death in specificity of strains of Escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of mutant strains of escherichia coli requiring p aminobenzoic acid for growth	Genetic analysis of mutant strains of apos; escherichia coli that require paminobenzoic acid for growth.
10	metabolism of thymineless mutants of escherichia coli i absence of thymidylate synthetase activity and growth characteristics of two sequential thymineless mutants	Metabolism of mutants without thymine d' escherichia coli i absence of d' activity of thymidylate synthetase and growth characteristics of two sequential mutants without thymine.
10	genetic mapping of mutations affecting phosphoglucose isomerase and fructose diphosphatase in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of mutations affecting isomerase phosphoglucose and fructose diphosphatase in escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene of escherichia coli b	The mutant gene of l' escherichia coli b.
10	giant cells of escherichia coli	Giant cells from Escherichia coli.
10	ubiquinone deficiency in an auxotroph of escherichia coli requiring 4 hydroxybenzoic acid	Ubiquinone deficiency d' a d&apos auxotroph; escherichia coli requiring 4 hydroxybenzoic acids.
10	cell wall composition and virulence in escherichia coli	Cell wall composition and cell wall virulence in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of glutamate transport and glutamate decarboxylase in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of glutamate and glutamate decarboxylase transport in escherichia coli.
10	effects of streptomycin deprivation on enzyme synthesis in streptomycin dependent escherichia coli	Effects of lack of streptomycin on streptomycin-dependent enzyme synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	acridine binding by escherichia coli ph dependency and strain differences	Acridine binding by escherichia coli ph dépendance et strain differences.
10	properties of mitomycin c sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The properties of mutants sensitive to mitomycin c d' escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	temperature sensitive chloramphenicol acetyltransferase from escherichia coli carrying mutant r factors	Temperature-sensitive chloramphenicol acetyltransferase d' escherichia coli carries mutant factors.
10	dominance studies with stable merodiploids in the d serine deaminase system of escherichia coli k 12	Dominance studies with stable merodiploids in the serine deaminase d system of l' escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic basis of colicin e susceptibility in escherichia coli i isolation and properties of refractory mutants and the preliminary mapping of their mutations	Genetic basis of colonicin sensitivity in the intestinal tract; isolation of escherichia coli; and properties of refractory mutants and preliminary mapping of their mutations.
10	streptomycin resistance mutation in escherichia coli altered ribosomal protein	The streptomycin resistance mutation in escherichia coli has altered the ribosomal protein.
10	the control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli by o acetyl l serine	Control of sulfate reduction in escherichia coli by acetyl serine.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in ribonucleoside and deoxyribonucleoside catabolism	Mutants of apos; escherichia coli defective in ribonucleoside and deoxyribonucleoside catabolism.
10	selection of a mutant of escherichia coli which has high mutation rates	Selection of an escherichia coli mutant with a high level of mutation.
10	genetic determination of resistance to acriflavine phenethyl alcohol and sodium dodecyl sulfate in escherichia coli	Genetic determination of resistance to apos, acriflavin, phenethyl alcohol, and sodium dodecyl sulfate in Escherichia coli.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light i effect of rec mutations on liquid holding recovery	Ultraviolet light-irradiated escherichia coli recovery process; darkness effects of mutations on recovery of retention fluid.
10	analysis of melibiose mutants deficient in alpha galactosidase and thiomethylgalactoside permease ii in escherichia coli k 12	L' analysis of alpha galactosidase and thiomethylgalactoside permease ii mutants in escherichia coli k 12 was performed.
10	genetic and biochemical analysis of the biotin loci of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic and biochemical analysis of Escherichia coli k 12 biotin loci.
10	factors influencing the survival and revival of heat treated escherichia coli	Factors influencing survival and reappearance of heat-treated escherichia coli.
10	lysis inhibition in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4	Inhibition of lysis in Escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4.
10	transcription and intragenic recombination in polar mutants of escherichia coli	Transcription and intragenic recombination in polar mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	genetic mapping of loci for glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrase in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrase loci in escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with an altered tryptophanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase	Escherichia coli mutants with modified tryptophanyl transfer ribonucleic synthetase.
10	localization and regulation of synthesis of nitrate reductase in escherichia coli	Localization and regulation of nitrate reductase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	positive control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli isolation characterization and mapping oc cysteineless mutants of e coli k12	Positive control of reduction of sulfate in characterization of apos; isolation of escherichia coli and mapping of cysteine-free mutants of e coli k12 mutants.
10	positive control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli the nature of the pleiotropic cysteineless mutants of e coli k12	Positive control of sulfate reduction in escherichia coli the nature of e coli k12 mutants proteinless pleiotropic mutants.
10	genetic location of certain mutations conferring recombination deficiency in escherichia coli	Genetic localization of certain escherichia coli recombination deficiency mutations.
10	synthesis of an s adenosylmethionine cleaving enzyme in t3 infected escherichia coli and its disturbance by co infection with enzymatically incompetent bacteriophage	Synthesis of a cleavage enzyme; adenosylmethionine in t3 infected escherichia coli and co-disturbance-infection with an enzymatically incompetent bacteriophage.
10	acridine sensitivity of bacteriophage t2h in escherichia coli	The sensitivity of bacteriophage t2h to acridine in Escherichia coli.
10	identification of closely linked loci controlling ultraviolet sensitivity and refractivity to colicin e2 in escherichia coli	Identification of closely linked loci controlling sensitivity to ultraviolet and refractivity to colicin e2 in escherichia coli.
10	phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli infected with t4 bacteriophages	Phospholipid synthesis of Escherichia coli infected with bacteriophages t4.
10	escherichia coli strains that excrete an inhibitor of colicin b	Escherichia coli strains that excrete a colicin inhibitor b.
10	genetic analysis of the maltose a region in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of the Escherichia coli maltose a gene region.
10	correlation between the rate of ribonucleic acid synthesis and the level of valyl transfer ribonucleic acid in mutants of escherichia coli	Correlation between the rate of synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and the rate of ribonucleic acid (RNA) valyl transfer in d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	chromosome transfer from f lac strains of escherichia coli k 12 mutant at reca recb or recc	Transfer of chromosomes from f lac strains of mutant k12 d' escherichia coli to reca or recc.
10	carbohydrate accumulation and metabolism in escherichia coli the close linkage and chromosomal location of ctr mutations	The accumulation of carbohydrates and metabolism in Escherichia coli, the close linkage and chromosomal localization of these mutations.
10	effects of oleate starvation in a fatty acid auxotroph of escherichia coli k 12	Effects of starvation; oleate in potato auxotroph; fatty acids; escherichia coli k 12 auxotroph.
10	nonrandom mutagenesis of the escherichia coli genome by nitrosoguanidine	Nonrandom mutagenesis of apos; nitrosoguanidine escherichia coli genome.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 unable to form ubiquinone	Mutant strains of Escherichia coli k12 are unable to form apos; ubiquinone.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism of escherichia coli xv biochemical properties of mutants resistant to thiaisoleucine	Isoleucine and valine metabolism of the biochemical properties of escherichia coli xv of thiaisoleucine-resistant mutants.
10	site and gene specific limited heterocatalytic expression in bacteriophage t4 infected escherichia coli	Heterocatalytic expression in bacteriophage t4 infected with escherichia coli was restricted to the site and specific gene.
10	phenotypic suppression in escherichia coli by chloramphenicol and other reversible inhibitors of the ribosome	Phenotypic suppression of Escherichia coli by chloramphenicol and d' other reversible ribosome inhibitors.
10	ferrous activated nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide linked dehydrogenase from a mutant of escherichia coli capable of growth on 1 2 propanediol	Activated ironic nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide linked dehydrogenase d' a d' escherichia coli mutant capable of growing on 12 propanediol.
10	catabolite repression in escherichia coli a study of two hypotheses	Catabolic repression in escherichia coli was found to be a study of two hypotheses.
10	anthranilate synthetase an enzyme specified by the tryptophan operon of escherichia coli comparative studies on the complex and the subunits	L' anthranilate synthetase is an enzyme specified by the tryptophan d&apos operon; escherichia coli in unit and complex comparative studies.
10	nonsense suppression in a multiauxotrophic derivative of escherichia coli 15t identification and consequences of an amber triplet in the deoxyribomutase gene	Absurd deletion in multiauxotrophic derivative of apos; identification of escherichia coli 15t and consequences of apos; triplet amber in deoxyribomutase gene.
10	loss of host controlled restriction of lambda bacteriophage in escherichia coli following methionine deprivation	Loss of the controlled restriction of the bacteriophage lambda host in Escherichia coli following methionine starvation.
10	effect of infection with ribonucleic acid bacteriophage r23 on the inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; bacteriophage r23 infection of apos; ribonucleic acid on inducible beta galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k bacteriophages i isolation and introductory characterization of five escherichia coli k bacteriophages	Bacteriophage isolation, escherichia coli, and preliminary characterization of five bacteriophages, k d and escherichia coli k.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid replication in lambda bacteriophage mutants	Deoxyribonucleic acid l&apos replication in mutants of the lambda bacteriophage.
10	replication of t4rii bacteriophage in escherichia coli k 12 lambda	Replication of the bacteriophage t4rii Escherichia coli k 12 lambda.
10	coresistance to neomycin and kanamycin by mutations in an escherichia coli locus that affects ribosomes	Neomycin and kanamycin resistance by mutation in a d' escherichia coli locus that affects the ribosomes.
10	regulation of glyoxylate metabolism in escherichia coli k 12	Control of glyoxylate metabolism in escherichia coli k 12.
10	iron transport in escherichia coli relationship between chromium sensitivity and high iron requirement in mutants of escherichia coli	Fer transport in escherichia coli relation between chromium sensitivity and high iron requirements in mutants of escherichia coli.
10	iron transport in escherichia coli roles of energy dependent uptake and 2 3 dihydroxybenzoylserine	Iron transport in escherichia coli functions of apos; apos-dependent absorption; energy; and 2,3 dihydroxybenzoylserin.
10	arabinose leucine deletion mutants of escherichia coli b r	Leucine arabinose deletion mutants; escherichia coli b r.
10	antipolarity in the ilv operon of escherichia coli k 12	There is a need for additional data on the incidence of cervical cancer.
10	mutation in escherichia coli k 12 mediating spherelike envelopes and changes tolerance to ultraviolet irradiation and some antibiotics	Mutation in escherichia coli k 12 mediates spherical envelopes and modifies tolerance to ultraviolet irradiation and certain antibiotics.
10	induction by mercuric ion of extensive degradation of cellular ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Induction by cellular ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli; a significant degradation of the protein.
10	corepressor system for catabolite repression of the lac operon in escherichia coli	Catabolic repression corepression system for lac operon in escherichia coli.
10	some properties of excision defective recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Some recombination-deficient and excision-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulator gene controlling enzymes concerned in tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Regulatory gene which regulates enzymes involved in tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	nitrate reductase complex of escherichia coli k 12 isolation and characterization of mutants unable to reduce nitrate	Nitrate reductase complex d' escherichia coli k 12, isolation and characterization of nitrate-reducing mutants.
10	mutant of escherichia coli with anomalous cell division and ability to decrease episomally and chromosomally mediated resistance to ampicillin and several other antibiotics	Apos mutant; escherichia coli with abnormal cell division and the ability to decrease resistance to apos; ampicillin and several other antibiotics by episomal and chromosomal routes.
10	escherichia coli mutant with elevated nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced oxidase activity	An Escherichia coli mutant with high nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate content reduced the oxidase activity.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli p1 transduction	Characterization of the auxotrophs of pyridoxine in transduction p1 d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and mapping of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of escherichia coli	To isolate and map the mutants of polynucleotide phosphorylase d' escherichia coli.
10	characterization of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of escherichia coli	Characterization of polynucleotide phosphorylase d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	ribonucleic acid synthesis and glutamate excretion in escherichia coli	Lapor synthesis, ribonucleic acid, and glutamate excretion in escherichia coli.
10	infectious drug resistance among clinically isolated escherichia coli	Infectious drug resistance among clinically isolated escherichia coli. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/infectious-diseases.html.
10	interaction of the exr and lon genes in escherichia coli	Interaction of exr and lon gene expression in escherichia coli.
10	paradoxical effect of weak inducers on the lac operon of escherichia coli	Paradoxical effect of low inducers on the cell; lactic operon; escherichia coli.
10	erythromycin resistant mutant of escherichia coli with altered ribosomal protein component	Mutant d'apos; escherichia coli resistant to erythromycin and with altered ribosomal protein component.
10	an analysis of the ribosomal ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli by hybridization techniques	An analysis of ribosomal ribonucleic acids (RNAs) by escherichia coli using DNA hybridization techniques.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light ii effect of uvr genes on liquid holding recovery	Ultraviolet light-irradiated escherichia coli recovery process; darkness ii effect of genes uvr on recovery of retained liquid.
10	kasugamycin resistance 30s ribosomal mutation with an unusual location on the escherichia coli chromosome	Ribosomal mutation 30s of resistance to kasugamycin with an unusual localization on the d' escherichia coli chromosome.
10	specificity and efficiency of thymidine incorporation in escherichia coli lacking thymidine phosphorylase	Specificity and effectiveness of thymidine incorporation in thymidine phosphorylase-depleted Escherichia coli.
10	regulation of 3 deoxy d arabino heptulosonic 7 phosphate acid synthetase activity in relation to the synthesis of the aromatic vitamins in escherichia coli k 12	Regulation of l' deoxy arabino heptulosonic activity 7 phosphate acid synthetase in relation to synthesis of aromatic vitamins in escherichia coli k 12.
10	escherichia coli ras locus its involvement in radiation repair	Escherichia coli ras locus, its involvement in radiation repair.
10	nitrate reductase complex of escherichia coli k 12 participation of specific formate dehydrogenase and cytochrome b1 components in nitrate reduction	Nitrate reductase complex d' escherichia coli k 12 participation of specific formate dehydrogenase (formate dehydrogenase) and cytochrome b1 components in nitrate reduction.
10	leakiness of pleiotropic maltose negative bacteriophage lambda resistant mutants of escherichi coli k 12	Fluidity of pleiotropic maltose negative bacteriophage lambda resistance mutants of escherichi coli k12.
10	unlinking of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication in a temperature sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis mutant of escherichia coli	Decoupling of cell division from replication of l' deoxyribonucleic acid in a temperature-sensitive mutant of l&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid of escherichia coli.
10	polarity in gene arab of the l arabinose operon in escherichia coli b r	Polarity in the arab gene of l' operon arabinose in escherichia coli b r.
10	catabolite repression gene of escherichia coli	The catabolic repression gene of Escherichia coli and Escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12 carrying rec mutations cotransducible with thya	L' genetic analysis of mutants defective in recombination with escherichia coli k 12 carrying cya-repeatable mutations.
10	presence of nuclear bodies in some minicells of escherichia coli	Presence of nuclear bodies in some small cells of Escherichia coli.
10	regulation of the escherichia coli tryptophan operon by early reactions in the aromatic pathway	The regulation of the tryptophan d&apos operon and Escherichia coli by early reactions in the aromatic pathway.
10	mechanism of 3 methylanthranilic acid derepression of the tryptophan operon in escherichia coli	Mechanism(s) of derepression of escherichia coli; tryptophan operon by apos; methylanthranilic acid 3.
10	resistance of escherichia coli to penicillins vi purification and characterization of the chromosomally mediated penicillinase present in ampa containing strains	Apos resistance; escherichia coli to vi penicillin purification and characterization of chromosomally mediated penicillinase present in ampa strains containing the strains.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli permitting replication of two f factors	A mutant d' escherichia coli allowing the replication of two factors f.
10	origin and direction of dna synthesis in e coli b r	Origins and direction of synthesis of l' DNA in e coli b r.
10	phi x 174 bacteriophage structural mutants which affect deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Phi x 174 structural mutants of the bacteriophage affecting l&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	induction of helical arrays of ribosomes by vinblastine sulfate in escherichia coli	Induction of apos; helical ribosomal arrangements by vinblastine sulfate in escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerant mutants of escherichia coli resistance of membranes to colicin e1	Colicine-tolerant mutants of colicin e1 resistance; escherichia coli.
10	energy coupling in the lactose transport system of escherichia coli	Lactose coupling; Escherichia coli; energy in the lactose transport system.
10	structure and function of e coli ribosomes 8 cold sensitive mutants defective in ribosome assembly	Structure and function of the apos ribosomes; e coli 8 cold-sensitive mutants incapable of assembling the ribosomes.
10	sensitization of anoxic recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 to x rays by triacetoneamine n oxyl	The sensitization of mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 deficient in anoxic x-ray recombination by n oxyl n-triacetoneamine.
10	studies with bacteriophage phi ii events following infection of male and female derivatives of escherichia coli k 12	Studies with bacteriophage phiii following infection with male and female derivatives of escherichia coli k.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli chromosomal position of linkage group i	Characterization of the pyridoxin auxotrophs d' escherichia coli at the linkage group chromosomal position i.
10	effect of r factors and other plasmids on ultraviolet susceptibility and host cell reactivation property of escherichia coli	The effect of r&d factors; other plasmids on susceptibility to apo; ultraviolet and reactivation properties of d&apos host cells; escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene studies in escherichia coli	Mutant gene studies in the Escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to nalidixic acid genetic mapping and dominance studies	Mutants d' escherichia coli k 12 resistant to genetic mapping of nalidixic acid and dominance studies.
10	expression of the arginine regulon of escherichia coli w evidence for a second regulatory gene	Apos gene expression; arginine d' escherichia coli demonstrated the presence of apos; a second regulatory gene.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli with temperature sensitive streptomycin protein	Apos mutant; escherichia coli with temperature-sensitive streptomycin protein.
10	segregation into and replication of plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in chromosomeless segregants of escherichia coli	Segregation and replication of deoxyribonucleic acid (DMAC) plasmid in segregants without d' escherichia coli chromosomes.
10	biosynthesis of 4 aminobenzoate in escherichia coli	Biosynthesis of 4 aminobenzoates in escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and cell division in a lon mutant of escherichia coli	Synthesis of deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, and cell division in a dacid mutant; escherichia coli.
10	identification of the puri locus in escherichia coli k 12	Identification of the locus puri in escherichia coli k 12.
10	3 phosphoserine transaminase mutants of escherichia coli b	Mutants of phosphoserine transaminase d' escherichia coli b.
10	dominance of ultraviolet radiation resistance in partial diploids of escherichia coli k 12	The dominance of ultraviolet resistance in the partial diploids d'apos; escherichia coli k 12 is dominance.
10	second pyridine nucleotide independent 1 alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	This is the second pyridine nucleotide independent of 1 alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity in estos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	effect of the ribonucleic acid control locus in escherichia coli on t4 bacteriophage specific ribonucleic acid synthesis	Effect of locus control of apos; ribonucleic acid in Escherichia coli on apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid specific for bacteriophage t4.
10	fitness of an escherichia coli mutator gene	Adapted from a mutator gene from Escherichia coli.
10	biochemical and genetic studies of recombination proficiency in escherichia coli ii rec revertants caused by indirect suppression of rec mutations	Biochemical and genetic studies of the recombination ability of reactive ester, escherichia coli ii, caused by indirect suppression of recurrent mutations.
10	an endonuclease activity from escherichia coli absent from certain rec strains	Lapos; endonuclease activity of escherichia coli is absent in some rec strains.
10	mapping of the nadb locus adjacent to a previously undescribed purine locus in escherichia coli k 12	Nadb mapping adjacent to a previously undescribed purine locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light 3 effect of rec mutations on recovery of excision deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli 3 effect of mutations on the recovery of mutants defective in excision of escherichia coli k 12 effect of ultraviolet light.
10	loss of colicinogeny in escherichia coli strains infected by certain resistance factors	Loss of colicinogenesis in the strains of Escherichia coli infected by certain resistance factors.
10	selection of arab and arac mutants of escherichia coli b r by resistance to ribitol	Ribitol-resistant selection of arab and arac d' escherichia coli b r.
10	genetic analysis of a large cell radiation resistant strain of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of a strain of Escherichia coli resistant to radiation from large cells.
10	induction of the lactose transport system in a lipid synthesis defective mutant of escherichia coli	Induction of the lactose transport system in a mutant of d' escherichia coli with a defective lipid synthesis.
10	transketolase mutants of escherichia coli	Mutants for Escherichia coli transketolase.
10	nonsense mutations in the maltose a region of the genetic map of escherichia coli	Absurd mutations in maltosis, a region of the d' Escherichia coli genetic map.
10	sulfur deficient transfer ribonucleic acid in a cysteine requiring relaxed mutant of escherichia coli	Sulfur-deficient ribonucleic acid transfer in cysteine requiring relaxed d&apos mutant; escherichia coli.
10	decay of normal and 5 fluorouracil substituted messenger ribonucleic acid of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli	The decomposition of the normal messenger ribonucleic acid and the 5-fluorouracil-substituted ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
10	suppression of adsorption properties of a z mutant of bacteriophage t4 by r mutations	Deletion of d&apos properties; adsorption of d' z mutant of bacteriophage t4 by mutation r.
10	functional interdependence of ribosomal components of escherichia coli	Functional interdependence of d&apos ribosomal components; escherichia coli.
10	isolation and partial characterization of escherichia coli mutants with altered glycyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases	Isolation and partial characterization of escherichia coli d&apos mutants with altered glycle transfer nucleic acid synthetases.
10	resistance transfer to the resident intestinal escherichia coli of rats	Transmission of resistance to intestinal parasites; resident rat intestinal escherichia coli.
10	induction of filament formation and thymineless death in escherichia coli k 12	Induction of filament formation and death without thymine in escherichia coli k 12.
10	conversion of t4 gene 46 mutant deoxyribonucleic acid into nonviable bacteriophage particles	Conversion of the t46 gene, a deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) mutant, into non-viable bacterial particles.
10	biosynthesis of ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12 location of genes affecting the metabolism of 3 octaprenyl 4 hydroxybenzoic acid and 2 octaprenylphenol	Biosynthesis of apos; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k 12 localization of genes affecting apos metabolism; 3 octaprenyl acid-4 hydroxybenzoic acid and 2 octaprenylphenol.
10	thymineless death in escherichia coli inactivation and recovery	Thymine-free death in inactivation and recovery of Escherichia coli.
10	reversion instability in the galactose operon of escherichia coli	Instability of reversion in the cell; galactose operation; escherichia coli.
10	effect of glycine on thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Effect of glycine on thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	glycolate uptake by mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12	Glycolate absorption by mutant strains of apos; escherichia coli k 12 is ensured by mutant strains.
10	isolation of conditionally putrescine deficient mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate putrescine-deficient d' escherichia coli mutants under conditions.
10	inhibition of de novo purine biosynthesis and interconversion by 6 methylpurine in escherichia coli	Purine biosynthesis inhibition de novo and interconversion by 6 methylpurine in escherichia coli.
10	depression of guanosine diphosphate mannose pyrophosphorylase by mutations in two different regulator genes involved in capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12	Guanosine diphosphate mannose pyrophosphorylase decreased by mutations in two different regulatory genes involved in capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12.
10	the action of streptomycin in a mutant of escherichia coli with increased sensitivity to the antibiotic	Streptomycin action in a mutant of escherichia coli with increased susceptibility to antibiotics.
10	mutants of escherichia coli k 12 with an altered glutamyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase	Dapos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 with modified glutamyltransfer of the apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	streptomycin suppressible lethal mutations in escherichia coli	Suppressible lethal mutation by streptomycin in escherichia coli.
10	relation between deoxyribonucleic acid and intracytoplasmic membranes in escherichia coli o111a	Relationship between l' deoxyribonucleic acid and intracytoplasmic membranes in escherichia coli o111a.
10	genetic mapping and dominance of the amber suppressor su1 supd in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mapping and dominance of suppressive protein supplementation in escherichia coli.
10	repair of radiation induced damage in escherichia coli ii effect of rec and uvr mutations on radiosensitivity and repair of x ray induced single strand breaks in deoxyribonucleic acid	Repair of radiation-induced damage in escherichia coli ii, the effect of mutations on the radiosensitivity and repair of X-ray induced single strand breaks in deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	genetic exchange between escherichia coli strains in the mouse intestine	Genetic exchange between animal strains; Escherichia coli in the intestines of mice.
10	n 5 phosphoribosyl anthranilate isomerase indol 3 ylglycerol phosphate synthetase of tryptophan biosynthesis relationship between the two activities of the enzyme from escherichia coli	N 5 phosphoribosylanthranilate isomerase indol 3 ylglycerol phosphate synthetase of the tryptophan biosynthetic relationship between the two activities of l' escherichia coli.
10	genetic recombination in escherichia coli the role of exonuclease i	Genetic recombination in escherichia coli strains, the role of exonuclease i.
10	an examination of the inhibitory effects of n iodoacetylglucosamine on escherichia coli and isolation of resistant mutants	Examination of inhibitory effects of niodoacetylglucosamine on escherichia coli and isolation of resistant mutants.
10	synchronous reinitiation of chromosome replication in e coli b r after nalidixic acid treatment	Synchronous reactivation of chromosomal replication in e coli b r after treatment with l' nalidixic acid.
10	isolation and genetic analysis of a strain of escherichia coli k 12 with an amber reca mutation	Isolation and genetic analysis of an amber-reduced strain of Escherichia coli k 12.
10	ultraviolet and x ray induced responses of a deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase deficient mutant of escherichia coli	The responses to apos, a deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase deficient mutant, are induced by ultraviolet and X-rays.
10	d fucose as a gratuitous inducer of the l arabinose operon in strains of escherichia coli b r mutant in gene arac	D fucose as a free inducer of apos; operon arabinose in mutant strains of apos; escherichia coli b r of the arac gene.
10	mutants of escherichia coli lacking endonuclease i ribonuclease i or ribonuclease ii	Dapos; escherichia coli mutants lack ribonuclease I endonuclease or ribonuclease ii.
10	regulation of tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 isolation and characterization of operator mutants	The regulation of tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12; isolation and characterization of the mutant operators.
10	chromosomal integration of f factors in recombination deficient hfr strains of escherichia coli	Chromosome integration of f factors in recombinant escherichia coli recombinant deficient hfr strains.
10	colicin tolerance induced by ampicillin or mutation to ampicillin resistance in a strain of escherichia coli k 12	Colicin tolerance induced by apos; ampicillin or a mutation of resistance to apos; ampicillin in an apos strain; escherichia coli k.
10	involvement of recombination genes in growth and viability of escherichia coli k 12	Implication of recombinant genes in the growth and viability of plants; escherichia coli c.
10	biosynthesis of the iron transport compound enterochelin mutants of escherichia coli unable to synthesize 2 3 dihydroxybenzoate	Enterochelin-transport compound d&apos mutants; escherichia coli unable to synthesize 2-3 dihydroxybenzoate.
10	metabolism of d arabinose a new pathway in escherichia coli	Metabolism of arabinose, a novel pathway in escherichia coli.
10	mutations affecting iron transport in escherichia coli	Mutations affecting iron transport by escherichia coli.
10	effects of ribonucleosides on thymidine incorporation selective reversal of the inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in thymineless auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Effects of ribonucleosides on apos; incorporation of thymidine Selective reversal of apos; inhibition of the synthesis of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in thymine-free auxotrophs; escherichia coli.
10	isolation characterization and genetic analysis of mutator genes in escherichia coli b and k 12	Isolation and genetic analysis of mutant genes in Escherichia coli b and k 12.
10	chromosomal location of the c gene involved in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of c gene involved in the biosynthesis of adenine nicotinamide dinucleotide in escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic location in escherichia coli k 12 of the ultraviolet sensitive mutation uvrd3	Genetic localization of the ultraviolet-sensitive uvrd3 mutation in escherichia coli k 12.
10	host induced modification restriction and the utilization of 5 bromouracil by thymineless mutants of escherichia coli	The host induced a restriction of modification and the use of 5 bromouracil by thymine-free mutants d' escherichia coli.
10	inhibition by phenylalanine of thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli	L' phenylalanine inhibition of thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	nalidixic acid resistant auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Apos auxotrophs; apos resistant escherichia coli; nalidixic acid.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli serine and pdxf mutants	Characterization of the pyridoxin auxotrophs d'apos; escherichia coli serine and pdxf mutants.
10	partial purification and properties of d desthiobiotin synthetase from escherichia coli	Partial purification and properties of desthiobiotin synthetase d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and mapping of phosphotransferase mutants in escherichia coli	To isolate and map phosphotransferase mutants in escherichia coli.
10	methylated bases of bacillus megaterium km nucleic acids comparison with escherichia coli	Comparison of the methylated bases of the nucleic acids of the bacillus megaterium km and l' escherichia coli.
10	elimination of sex factors in escherichia coli by urea	Elimination of sexual factors in Escherichia coli by the use of urea.
10	genetic and molecular characteristics of x ray sensitive mutants of escherichia coli defective in repair synthesis	Genetic and molecular characteristics of X-ray-sensitive mutants d' escherichia coli with impaired repair synthesis.
10	translational repression in the arginine system of escherichia coli	Translational repression in the arginine system: d' escherichia coli.
10	defective excision repair of pyrimidine dimers in the ultraviolet sensitive escherichia coli ras mutant	Defective repair of the apos; excision of pyrimidine dimers in the apos-sensitive ras escherichia coli mutant; ultraviolet.
10	l serine sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Serine-sensitive mutants of estos; escherichia coli k 12 serine-sensitive mutants.
10	nalidixic acd resistant mutants of escherichia coli deficient in isocitrate dehydrogenase	Isocitrate dehydrogenase-deficient isocitrate isocitrate dehydrogenase mutants; isocitrate dehydrogenase-deficient isocitrate isocitrate dehydrogenase mutants.
10	genetic analysis of diaminopimelic acid and lysine requiring mutants of escherichia coli	Apos genetics; diaminopimelic acid and lysine requiring d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	effect of nalidixic acid on semionservative replication and repair synthesis after ultraviolet irradiation in escherichia coli	The effect of l' nalidixic acid on semionative replication and repair synthesis after ultraviolet irradiation in escherichia coli.
10	lysine suppressor in escherichia coli	Suppressant lysine in Escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with a growth requirement for either lysine or pyridoxine	Mutants of d' escherichia coli that require growth for lysine or pyridoxine.
10	growth rate of escherichia coli at elevated temperatures limitation by methionine	Rate of growth of d' escherichia coli at high temperatures, limited by methionine.
10	repression of 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase trp and enzymes of the tryptophan pathway in escherichia coli k 12	Repression of 3 deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase trp and d' tryptophan pathway enzymes in escherichia coli k 12.
10	ampicillin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12 with lipopolysaccharide alterations affecting mating ability and susceptibility to sex specific bacteriophages	Ampicillin-resistant mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 exhibit lipopolysaccharide alterations affecting their ability to mate and susceptibility to sex-specific bacteriophages.
10	mutants of escherichia coli sensitive to antibiotics	Antibiotically sensitive mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid transferred from ultraviolet irradiated excision defective hfr cells of escherichia coli k 12	Deoxyribonucleic acid, transferred from defective hfr cells of apos; escherichia coli k 12 after ultraviolet irradiation.
10	biosynthesis in vitro of tryptophanase by polyribosomes from induced cultures of escherichia coli	In vitro biosynthesis of tryptophanase by polyribosomes from escherichia coli induced cultures.
10	ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 accumulation of an octaprenol farnesylfarnesylgeraniol by a multiple aromatic auxotroph	"""Ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 accumulation of an octaprenol farnesylfarnesylgeraniol by auxotrophic aromatic multiple,"" Arch."
10	cotransduction of stra and ribosomal protein cistrons in escherichia coli salmonella typhimurium hybrids	Co-transduction of stra and ribosomal protein cistrons in escherichia coli salmonella typhimurium hybrids.
10	degradation of escherichia coli b deoxyribonucleic acid after infection with deoxyribonucleic acid defective amber mutants of bacteriophage t7	Degradation of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid d*apos; escherichia coli after infection by defective amber mutants of bacteriophage t7 with apos; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	t even bacteriophage tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b i isolation and preliminary characterization	Even bacteriophage-tolerant mutants of isolation and preliminary characterization of Escherichia coli.
10	the utilization of prolyl peptides by escherichia coli	L' use of prolylic peptides by escherichia coli.
10	differential recovery of auxotrophs after penicillin enrichment in escherichia coli	Auxotroph differential recovery after apo; penicillin enrichment in escherichia coli.
10	mutation preventing capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 and its effect on bacteriophage resistance	Mutations preventing synthesis of capsular polysaccharides in escherichia coli k 12 and its effect on bacteriophage resistance.
10	pleiotropic effect of the rec a gene of escherichia coli uncoupling of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication	Pleiotropic effect of gene rec a dos; escherichia coli decoupling cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication.
10	membrane association of conjugally transferred deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli minicells	Membrane association of l' deoxyribonucleic acid conjugated to the mini-cell of d' escherichia coli.
10	transformation of agrobacterium tumefaciens into a non oncogenic species by an escherichia coli rna	Transformation of l' agrobacterium tumefaciens by escherichia coli rna into a non-oncogenic species.
10	galactose specific messenger ribonucleic acid contents in escherichia coli	Galactose-specific messenger ribonucleic acid content in escherichia coli.
10	phosphoglucomutase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Phosphoglucomutase mutants of 12 Escherichia coli isolates.
10	mapping the gene determining ornithine transcarbamylase and its operator in escherichia coli b	Mapping of the ornithine transcarbamylase gene and its operator in escherichia coli b.
10	biochemical characterization of the ctr mutants of escherichia coli	Biochemical characterization of ctr d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	mutants of escherichia coli unable to make protein at 42 c	D' escherichia coli mutants failed to produce protein at 42 c.
10	stimulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis by chloramphenicol in a rel aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutant of escherichia coli	Stimulation of synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid by chloramphenicol in a relict mutant of l' escherichia coli, transfer mutant of d' aminoacyl of l' ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	phenotypic restoration by molybdate of nitrate reductase activity in chld mutants of escherichia coli	Phenotypic restoration by slow molybdate; nitrate reductase activity in chld d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	growth of escherichia coli on short chain fatty acids growth characteristics of mutants	Growth of apos; escherichia coli on mutant growth characteristics of short-chain fatty acids.
10	relationship between sex pili formation and macarbomycin sensitivity in escherichia coli	Relationship between sex pili formation and susceptibility to macarbomycin in escherichia coli.
10	temperature dependence of sex factor maintenance in escherichia coli k 12	The temperature dependence of sex-factor maintenance in escherichia coli k12 is an important factor.
10	enzymatic characterization of a mutant of escherichia coli with an altered dna ligase	Enzymatic characterization of a mutant Escherichia coli with a modified DNA ligase.
10	isolation of vitamin b 12 transport mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate vitamin b transport mutants 12 d' escherichia coli.
10	phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 mutants derepressed for chorismate mutase p prephenate dehydratase	Phenylalanine biosynthesis in phenylalanine mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 derepressed for chorismate mutase p prephenate dehydratase.
10	auxotroph accumulation in deoxyribonucleic acid polymeraseless strains of escherichia coli k 12	The accumulation of auxotrophs in apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 without apos polymerization; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	regulation of thymidine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 studies on the inducer and the coordinateness of induction of the enzymes	The regulation of thymidine metabolism in escherichia coli k12 has been studied on the inducer and coordination of l' enzyme induction.
10	cell division and prophage induction in escherichia coli studies of nucleotide levels	Cell division and apo; prophage induction in apo nucleotide level studies; Escherichia coli.
10	growth inhibition and appearance of the membranous structure in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage fd	Inhibition of growth and appearance of membrane structure in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage fd.
10	on the process of cellular division in escherichia coli v incorporation of deoxynucleoside triphosphates by dna thermosensitive mutants of escherichia coli also lacking dna polymerase activity	On the process of cell division in escherichia coli; incorporation of deoxynucleoside triphosphates by heat-sensitive d&apos mutants; escherichia coli without apos; d&apos activity; DNA polymerase.
10	enlargement of escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection i description of the phenomenon	Widening of the apo; Escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection.
10	t even bacteriophage tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b ii nucleic acid metabolism	Even bacteriophage-tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b e nucleic acid metabolism.
10	bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin e2 induced degradation of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid i protein synthesis dependent inhibition	Bacteriophage t4 inhibits deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) e2 co-cicin-induced escherichia coli degradation, which is inhibited.
10	incomplete lambda bacteriophage heads produced by a gene f mutant	The incomplete heads of lambda bacteriophages produced by a mutant of gene f.
10	occurrence of lysophosphatides in bacteriophage t4rii infected escherichia coli s 6	Presence of lysophosphatides in infected escherichia coli bacteriophage t4rii 6 s.
10	isolating tryptophan regulatory mutants in escherichia coli by using a trp lac fusion strain	Isolate tryptophan regulatory mutants from Escherichia coli isolates using a trp lac fusion strain.
10	alternate pathway for isoleucine biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Alternative pathway for biosynthesis of isoleucine in escherichia coli.
10	ordering of mutant sites in the isoleucine valine genes of escherichia coli by use of merogenotes derived from f 14 a new procedure for fine structure mapping	Order of mutant sites in isoleucine valine genes; escherichia coli par l'apos; use of f14-derived merenotes, a new procedure for mapping fine structures.
10	ribosomal proteins involved in the suppression of streptomycin dependence in escherichia coli	Ribosomal proteins play a role in suppressing streptomycin dependence in escherichia coli.
10	utilization of aminobutyric acid as the sole carbon and nitrogen source by escherichia coli k 12 mutants	Use of l' aminobutyric acid as sole source of carbon and nitrogen; nitrogen by k12 d&apos mutants; escherichia coli.
10	slow joining of newly replicated dna chains in dna polymerase i deficient escherichia coli mutants	Slow junction of newly replicated DNA strands in the apo-deficient mutant species; DNA polymerase i d' escherichia coli.
10	new polarity suppressors in escherichia coli suppression and messenger rna stability	New polarity suppressors in the removal of escherichia coli and stability of rna messengers.
10	analysis of dna polymerases ii and 3 in mutants of escherichia coli thermosensitive for dna synthesis	Polymerase analysis ii and 3 of apos; DNA in heat-sensitive mutants of apos; escherichia coli for synthesis of apos; DNA.
10	specific inhibition of cell division by colicin e 2 without degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in a new colicin sensitivity mutant of escherichia coli	Specific inhibition of cell division by colicin e 2 without degraded apo; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) in a novel colicin-sensitive mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	control of nucleotide metabolism and ribosomal ribonucleic acid synthesis during nitrogen starvation of escherichia coli	Control of nucleotide metabolism and synthesis of l' ribosomal ribonucleic acid during starvation; nitrogen in escherichia coli.
10	mutations in r factors of escherichia coli causing an increased number of r factor copies per chromosome	Mutations in escherichia coli factors causing an increased copy number of r factors per chromosome.
10	recombinant f factors from escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying recb or recc	Recombinant Factors for Dapos strains; Escherichia coli k 12 Recb or Recc carriers.
10	physiological factors in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	Physiological factors involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	new rifampin resistant mutant of escherichia coli	New Rifampin-resistant mutant of Escherichia coli.
10	establishment of repression by lambdoid phage in catabolite activator protein and adenylate cyclase mutants of escherichia coli	Establishment of repression by lambdaid phage in apos mutants; escherichia coli for catabolite activating protein and l' adenylate cyclase.
10	isolation and characterization of an escherichia coli bacteriophage requiring cell wall galactose	Isolation and characterization of bacteriophage of escherichia coli requiring parietal galactosis.
10	location and orientation of the phoa locus on the escherichia coli k 12 linkage map	Location and orientation of the phoa locus on the genetic map of Escherichia coli k 12.
10	purification and properties of 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe from a lambda arog transductant of escherichia coli	Purification and properties of arabinoheptulosonic acid deoxy, 7 phosphate synthetase phe, from d'apos; a lambda drog d&apos transducer; escherichia coli.
10	biochemical characterization of a mutant isoleucyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase from escherichia coli k 12	Biochemical characterization of an isoleucyl mutant that transfers apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase of apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	phospholipids of virus induced membranes in cytoplasm of escherichia coli	The virus phospholipids induce membranes in the cytoplasm of d' escherichia coli.
10	presence of bacteriophage like inhibitory particles in escherichia coli	Bacteriophage-like inhibitory particles in Escherichia coli.
10	lethal synthesis of methylglyoxal by escherichia coli during unregulated glycerol metabolism	Lethal synthesis of methylglyoxal by escherichia coli during unregulated glycerol metabolism.
10	polysome turnover during amino acid starvation in escherichia coli	Renewal of polysomes during amino acid deprivation in escherichia coli.
10	physical and functional characteristics of r factor deoxyribonucleic acid segregated into escherichia coli minicells	The physical and functional characteristics of the deoxyribonucleic acid factor segregate into minicells of apos; escherichia coli.
10	repression of aromatic amino acid biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12	The inhibition of aromatic amino acid biosynthesis in escherichia coli k.
10	phenylalanine and tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 mutants derepressed for 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase tyr chorismate mutase t prephenate dehydrogenase and transaminase a	Phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesis in mutants of apos; escherichia coli k 12 derepressed for 3 deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe 3 deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase chorismate mutase t prephenate dehydrogenase and transaminase a.
10	alteration of a 30s ribosomal protein accompanying the ram mutation in escherichia coli	Modification of apos; a 30s ribosomal protein accompanying the escherichia coli ram mutation.
10	control of vitamin b 6 biosynthesis in escherichia coli	The control of vitamin b-6 biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	nature of the penetration barrier in escherichia coli k 12 effect of macromolecular inhibition of penetrability in strains containing the enva gene	Nature of Barrier to Penetration in Escherichia coli k 12 effects; macromolecular inhibition of penetrability in strains containing the enva gene.
10	phenethyl alcohol as a suppressor of the enva phenotype associated with the enva gene in escherichia coli k 12	Phenethyl alcohol suppresses the phenotype of apos; enva associated with the apos gene; enva in apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	alterations in the cytoplasmic membrane proteins of various chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Changes in cytoplasmic membrane proteins of various chlorate-resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	transposition of the lac region to the gal region of the escherichia coli chromosome isolation of lambda lac transducing bacteriophages	Transposition of the lake region to the gal region of the lake; chromosomal isolation of apos; escherichia coli from the bacteriophages transducer of lambda lake.
10	specific role of sex pili in the effective eliminatory action of sodium dodecyl sulfate on sex and drug resistance factors in escherichia coli	The specific role of sexual pili in the disease; effective elimination of sodium dodecyl sulfate on sex and drug resistance factors in escherichia coli.
10	close linkage between ochre and missense suppressors in escherichia coli	A close connection between the suppressors of ochre and false-sense in escherichia coli.
10	breakdown and exclusion of superinfecting t even bacteriophage in escherichia coli	Decomposition and leakage; exclusion of superinfecting bacteria even the bacteriophage in the bacteriophage; escherichia coli.
10	cell division and prophage induction in escherichia coli effects of pantoyl lactone and various furan derivatives	Cell division and l' induction of prophage in the effects of pantoyl lactone and various furan derivatives on escherichia coli.
10	isolation and some properties of cell envelope altered mutants of escherichia coli	Isolation and certain properties of the cell surface; cell envelope alteration of the apos; escherichia coli mutants.
10	relationship between permeability cell division and murein metabolism in a mutant of escherichia coli	Relationship between cellular permeability division and walline metabolism in a d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	isolation and characterization of 2 keto 3 deoxyoctonate lipid a from a heptose deficient mutant of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of 2 keto 3 deoxyoctonate lipide a d'apos; a mutant d'apos; escherichia coli deficient in heptosis.
10	mutations affecting the dissimilation of mannitol by escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting mannitol dissimulation by escherichia coli k 12.
10	requirement for protein synthesis in rec dependent repair of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli after ultraviolet or x irradiation	Protein synthesis is required in the deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) recovery of escherichia coli after ultraviolet or x irradiation.
10	a second transport system for l arabinose in escherichia coli b r controlled by the arac gene	A second transport system for l' arabinose in l'apos; escherichia coli b r, controlled by the arac gene.
10	mapping of a d cycloserine resistance locus in escherichia coli k 12	Map of a cycloserine resistance locus in Escherichia coli 12.
10	a new element in the control of dna initiation in escherichia coli	A new element in the control of escherichia coli cell lines; initiation of DNA in escherichia coli.
10	new small polypeptides associated with dna dependent rna polymerase of escherichia coli after infection with bacteriophage t4	New small polypeptides associated with the apos-dependent rna polymerase enzyme; d&apos DNA; and escherichia coli after infection with bacteriophage t4 were observed.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli that requires high concentrations of biotin	A d' escherichia coli mutant that requires high concentrations of biotin.
10	the energy linked transhydrogenase reaction in respiratory mutants of escherichia coli k12	Energy-related transhydrogenase reaction in the escherichia coli k12 respiratory mutants was energy-related.
10	death through respiratory failure of a fraction of ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli b r cells	Death due to respiratory insufficiency; a fraction of the cells of ultraviolet-irradiated Escherichia coli.
10	excision repair properties of isogenic rec mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The restorative properties of the excision of recisogenic mutants of apos; escherichia coli k 12 are described below.
10	escherichia coli mutants tht require either pyridoxine or alanine	Dapos; Escherichia coli mutants need pyridoxine or d' alanine.
10	infection of escherichia coli by t2 and t4 bacteriophages as seen in the electron microscope t4 head morphogenesis	Escherichia coli infection with bacteriophages t2 and t4, as observed by electron microscopy during t4 head morphogenesis.
10	limiting availability of binding sites for dehydrogenases on the cell membrane of escherichia coli	Limiting the availability of dehydrogenase binding sites on the d' escherichia coli cell membrane.
10	nuclear disruption after infection of escherichia coli with a bacteriophage t4 mutant unable to induce endonuclease ii	Nuclear Rupture; infection of escherichia coli by a mutant of bacteriophage t4 incapable of causing apos; induction of apos; endonuclease ii.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k12 that use d amino acids	Mutant strains of d' escherichia coli k12 using d amino acids.
10	analysis of host range restriction in escherichia coli treated with toluene	Analysis of restriction of host range in toluene-treated escherichia coli.
10	regulation of lambda rex expression after infection of escherichia coli k by lambda bacteriophage	Lambda rex expression after apos infection; escherichia coli k by the bacteriophage lambda.
10	three membered parasitic system a bacteriophage bdellovibrio bacteriovorus and escherichia coli	Three members of the parasite system, a bacteriophage bdellovibrio bacteriovorus and an escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage lysozyme synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 lambda infected with rii mutant of bacteriophage t4	Synthesis of the bacteriophage lysozyme in escherichia coli k 12 lambda infected with bacteriophage t4 mutant rii.
10	genetic map of the lactose repressor gene i of escherichia coli	Genetic map of lactose repressor gene of escherichia coli.
10	eight transfer rnas induced by infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4	Eight apo-induced transfer events; escherichia coli infections with bacteriophage t4 were observed.
10	conjugational complementation analysis of transfer deficient mutants of flac in escherichia coli	L' conjugative complementation analysis of flask transfer-deficient mutants in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of transfer by the escherichia coli sex factor f using p1 transductional complementation	Genetic analysis of fetal sex factor transfer by escherichia coli using p1 transductional complementation.
10	deletion map of the escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f the order of eleven transfer cistrons	Sexual Factor Deletion Card (SFD) k 12 of the list; Escherichia coli f of the list; order of 11 transfer cistrons.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 deficient for detergent resistant phospholipase a	The d' escherichia coli k12 mutant is deficient in detergent-resistant phospholipase a.
10	effect of the folic acid analogue trimethoprim on growth macromolecular synthesis and incorporation of exogenous thymine in escherichia coli	Effect of l' analog of leaf acid, trimethoprim, on macromolecular synthesis of growth and l' incorporation of exogenous thymine in escherichia coli.
10	gene transfer in pasteurella pestis harboring the f cm plasmid of escherichia coli	Gene transfer to pasteurella pestis containing plasmid f cm d' escherichia coli.
10	arginine control of transcription of argecbh messenger ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	L' arginine controls the transcription of l' ribonucleic acid, a messenger of l' argecbh, in escherichia coli.
10	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from escherichia coli and from a high level mutant	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase d' escherichia coli and d' a high level mutant.
10	construction and properties of escherichia coli strains exhibiting complementation of galactosidase fragments in vivo	Construction and properties of the d&apos strains; escherichia coli showing complementarity of galactosidase fragments in vivo.
10	manganese resistant mutants of escherichia coli physiological and genetic studies	Manganese-resistant mutants of escherichia coli in physiological and genetic studies.
10	biochemical and genetic studies on ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 4 hydroxybenzoate octaprenyltransferase	Biochemical and genetic studies on biosynthesis of apos; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k 12-4 hydroxybenzoate octaprenyltransferase.
10	ribosomal alterations controlling alkaline phosphatase isozymes in escherichia coli	Ribosomal alterations which control alkaline phosphatase isozymes in escherichia coli.
10	membrane mutation associated with sensitivity to acriflavine in escherichia coli	Membrane changes associated with sensitivity to apos; acriflavin in Escherichia coli.
10	effects of acridine orange on the growth of escherichia coli	The effects of apos; orange acridine on the growth of apos; escherichia coli.
10	induction of the ara operon of escherichia coli b r	Induction of apo; operon ara de l'apos; escherichia coli b r.
10	genetic analysis of flagellar mutants in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of flagellar mutants in the Escherichia coli.
10	effect of thymine starvation on deoxyribonucleic acid repair systems of escherichia coli k 12	Effect of thymine deficiency on liver repair systems; deoxyribonucleic acid; escherichia coli k 12.
10	porphyrin accumulating mutants of escherichia coli	Porphyrin accumulating d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	ultraviolet sensitive mutator strain of escherichia coli k 12	The ultraviolet-sensitive mutant Escherichia coli k 12 is sensitive to ultraviolet radiation.
10	evidence for the direct action of colicin k on aerobic 32 p i uptake in escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro	Evidence of the direct action of colicin k on the intestinal tract; 32% aerobic absorption in escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro.
10	characterization of lethal zygosis associated with conjugation in escherichia coli k 12	Characterization of the lethal zygosis associated with Escherichia coli k1 conjugation.
10	osmotic reversal of temperature sensitivity in escherichia coli	Osmotic reversal of temperature sensitivity in the escherichia coli.
10	importance of facilitated diffusion for effective utilization of glycerol by escherichia coli	L' importance of facilitated diffusion for ecos; effective glycerol utilization by escherichia coli.
10	deletion and complementation analysis of biotin gene cluster of escherichia coli	Deletion and complementation analysis of a group of Escherichia coli (ES coli) biotin genes.
10	molecular studies on entry exclusion in escherichia coli minicells	Molecular studies on apo; exclusion to apo; entry into apo minicells; escherichia coli.
10	dominant mutations lex in escherichia coli k 12 which affect radiation sensitivity and frequency of ultraviolet lght induced mutations	Dominant lex mutations in escherichia coli k 12 that affect the radiation sensitivity and frequency of ultraviolet-induced mutations.
10	flagellar assembly mutants in escherichia coli	Mutants of escherichia coli; flagellar assembly in escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants altered in the transport of branched chain amino acids	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 altered in the transport of the branched chain amino acids.
10	anaerobic l glycerophosphate dehydrogenase of escherichia coli its genetic locus and its physiological role	Anaerobic glycosphate dehydrogenase d&apos escherichia coli is its genetic locus and physiological role.
10	bacterial cell division regulation physiological effects of crystal violet on escherichia coli lon and lon strains	Physiological effects of bacterial cell division on lon and lon d' escherichia coli strains.
10	alteration of ribosomal protein s4 by mutation linked to kasugamycin resistance in escherichia coli	Modification of s4 ribosomal protein by kasugamycin resistance mutation in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of an escherichia coli syndrome	Genetic analysis of apos; d'apos syndrome; and Escherichia coli.
10	properties and mode of action of a bactericidal compound methylglyoxal produced by a mutant of escherichia coli	Properties and mode of action; action of a bactericidal methylglyoxal compound produced by a d&apos mutant; escherichia coli.
10	mutants of rhodospirrillum rubrum obtained after long term anaerobic dark growth	Mutants of rhodospirrillum rubrum were obtained after long-term, anaerobic growth in the dark.
10	giant cells of escherichia coli a morphological study	Giant Cells of Apos; Escherichia coli, morphological study.
10	alkaline sucrose gradient sedimentation of chromosomal deoxyribonucleic acid from escherichia coli pola and pola strains during thymine starvation	Chromosomal deoxyribonucleic acid of deacid strains; escherichia coli pola and pola during thymine deprivation.
10	genetic determinant in escherichia coli affecting thymineless death and ultraviolet sensitivity	Genetic determinant of Escherichia coli affecting thymine-free death and ultraviolet sensitivity.
10	in vivo production of an rna dna copolymer after infection of escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4	Production in vivo of DNA polymer after infection with escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in dna polymerase ii activity	Apos mutant; Escherichia coli defective in apos; apos activity; DNA polymerase ii.
10	mutants of salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli pleiotropically defective in active transport	Mutants of Salmonella typhimurium and d' escherichia coli pleiotropically defective in the active transport.
10	fine structure deletion map of the escherichia coli l arabinose operon	Deletion map of fine structure of cell; arabinose operon of cell; escherichia coli l.
10	mapping of new escherichia coli k and 15 restriction sites on specific fragments of bacteriophage phi x174	Mapping of new restriction sites for Escherichia coli and 15 others on specific fragments of phi x174 bacteriophage.
10	bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin e2 induced degradation of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid ii inhibition by t4 ghosts and by t4 in the absence of protein synthesis	Bacteriophage t4 inhibits deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) degradation induced by colicine e2; this inhibition is induced by phantoms t4 and t4 in the absence of protein synthesis.
10	on some genetic aspects of phage lambda resistance in e coli k12	Genetic aspects of lambda phage resistance in e coli k12.
10	a dominant constitutive phor mutation in escherichia coli	One dominant phor constitutive mutation in escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage tail components iv pteroyl polyglutamate synthesis in t4d infected escherichia coli b	Viv pteroyl polyglutamate synthesis in infected Escherichia coli b.
10	analysis of nuclear disruption and binding of intermediates in host dna breakdown to membranes after infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophages t4 and t7	Analysis of nuclear disorganization and binding of intermediates in cell degradation; DNA from apos; host to membranes after apos; infection of apos; escherichia coli with bacteriophages t4 and t7.
10	degradation of escherichia coli chromosome after infection by bacteriophage t4 role of bacteriophage gene d2a	Degradation of d&apos chromosome; escherichia coli after bacteriophage t4 infection, role of d2a gene of bacteriophage.
10	reconstitution of d lactate dependent transport in membrane vesicles from a d lactate dehydrogenase mutant of escherichia coli	Reconstitution of lactate-dependent transport in the membrane vesicles of d' a lactate dehydrogenase d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	rna linked nascent dna fragments in escherichia coli	Rna bound DNA fragments that were incipient in Escherichia coli.
10	characterization by electron microscopy of fused f prime factors in escherichia coli	Electron microscopic characterization of f fused major factors in escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli thermosensitive for the synthesis of transfer rna	Temperature-sensitive d' escherichia coli mutants for synthesis of transfer proteins.
10	r factors of escherichia coli from dressed beef and humans	The factors affecting the human and prepared beef production of Escherichia coli.
10	transport of magnesium by a repressible and a nonrepressible system in escherichia coli	Transport of magnesium by both repressible and unrepresentable systems in escherichia coli.
10	role of dna polymerase i and the rec system in excision repair in escherichia coli	Role of apos; DNA polymerase i and rec system in apo repair; escherichia coli excision.
10	low activity of galactosidase in frameshift mutants of escherichia coli	Low galactosidase activity in d' escherichia coli frame change mutants.
10	growth and macromolecular composition of a mutant of escherichia coli during polyamine limitation	Growth and macromolecular composition of apos; a mutant of apos; escherichia coli during polyamine limitation.
10	the utilization of fructose by escherichia coli properties of a mutant defective in fructose 1 phosphate kinase activity	The use of fructose by the properties of escherichia coli d'apos; a mutant whose fructose 1 phosphate kinase activity is deficient.
10	recircularization and autonomous replication of a sheared r factor dna segment in escherichia coli transformants	Recirculation and self-sustaining replication of apos; an apos segment; factor DNA, which is cut from apos transformants; and Escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene studies in escherichia coli the muts gene	Mutant gene studies in the muts gene in escherichia coli.
10	suppression of ultraviolet sensitivity in escherichia coli uvr502 by the su58 missense suppressor	Removal of ultraviolet sensitivity in Escherichia coli uvr502 by the false-sense suppressor was observed.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli common receptor sites for vitamin b12 and the e colicins on the outer membrane of the cell envelope	The transport of vitamin b12 to the common receptor sites of Dapos; Escherichia coli for vitamin b12 and for colicins on the outer membrane of the cell; cell envelope.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli genetic studies	The transport of vitamin b12 has been studied in escherichia coli genetics studies.
10	derepression of anthranilate synthase in purified minicells of escherichia coli containing the col trp plasmid	The derepression of apos; anthranilate synthase in purified minicells of apos; escherichia coli containing the trp plasmid.
10	genetic analysis of the system that reduces biotin d sulfoxide in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of the biotin sulfoxide d reducing system in escherichia coli.
10	thymineless death in pola and pola strains of escherichia coli	Death without thymine in pola and pola d' escherichia coli.
10	novel mutation to dominant fucose resistance in the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli	A new mutation to dominant fucose resistance in the arabinose operon of Escherichia coli.
10	two genetic loci for resistance to kasugamycin in escherichia coli	Two genetic loci for resistance to kasugamycin in Escherichia coli.
10	protein synthesis and deoxyribonucleic acid membrane attachment during thymineless death in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli protein synthesis and membrane binding; deoxyribonucleic acid during thymine-free death.
10	rapid mapping of conditional and auxotrophic mutations in escherichia coli k 12	Rapid mapping of auxotrophic and conditional mutations in escherichia coli k 12.
10	isolation and characterization of mutations affecting the transport of hexose phosphates in escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of mutations in hexose phosphate transport in escherichia coli.
10	involvement of the recb recc nuclease exonuclease v in the process of x ray induced deoxyribonucleic acid degradation in radiosensitive strains of escherichia coli k 12	L' recc nuclease v exonuclease is involved in the apos degradation process; x-ray-induced deoxyribonucleic acid in radiosensitive strains of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	physiology of escherichia coli k 12 during conjugation altered recipient cell functions associated with lethal zygosis	Physiology of l' escherichia coli k12 during conjugation altered the functions of receptor cells associated with lethal zygosis.
10	x ray sensitivity and repair capacity of a pola1 exra strain of escherichia coli k 12	X-ray sensitivity and repair capability of a pola1 strain; a pola1 strain will be extracted; and escherichia coli will be extracted.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxi mutations affecting derepression and valine resistance	Metabolism of apos; isoleucine and valine in apos-induced mutations; escherichia coli xxi affecting derepression and valine resistance.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxii a pleiotropic mutation affecting induction of isomeroreductase activity	Immunosorbent metabolism; isoleucine and valine in escherichia coli xxii, pleiotropic mutation affecting apos; induction of apos; isomeroreductase activity.
10	organic solvents as probes for the structure and function of the bacterial membrane effects of ethanol on the wild type and an ethanol resistant mutant of escherichia coli k 12	Organic solvents as probes for the structure and function of bacterial membrane effects of apos; ethanol on wild type and apos mutant; ethanol; escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Regulation of l&apos formation; methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	isolation of deoxyribonucleic acid methylase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	To isolate mutants of l' deoxyribonucleic acid methylase d' escherichia coli k 12 mutants.
10	reconstitution of nitrate reductase activity and formation of membrane particles from cytoplasmic extracts of chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Reconstitution of apos; nitrate reductase activity and formation of membrane particles from apos; chlorate-resistant escherichia coli; cytoplasmic extracts of apos mutants.
10	excretion of enterochelin by exba and exbb mutants of escherichia coli	L'apos; d'apos; enterocelin excretion by exba and exb d'apos mutants; escherichia coli.
10	pathway for ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 gene enzyme relationships and intermediates	Pathway for ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 Genetic Relationships and Intermediates.
10	increase in sensitivity to antibiotics and lysozyme on deletion of lipopolysaccharides in escherichia coli strains	Increased sensitivity to antibiotics and lysozyme in d' escherichia coli lipopolysaccharide deletion.
10	genetic determination of the constitutive biosynthesis of phospho glucosidase a in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic determination of phospho glucosidase a constitutive biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12.
10	comparison of the resa1 and pola1 mutations in isogenic strains of escherichia coli k 12	Comparison of resa1 and pola1 mutations in the isogenic strains of Escherichia coli.
10	effect of serine hydroxamate on phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli	Effect of serine hydroxamate on phospholipid synthesis in Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of a regulatory mutant of an aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characterization of a protein regulatory mutant; a protein transfer ribonucleic; aminoacyl synthetase in escherichia coli k 12.
10	location of promoter and operator sites in the biotin gene cluster of escherichia coli	Localization of promoter and operator sites in apo biota gene clusters; escherichia coli.
10	genetic fine structure of the leucine operon of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic structure of the bacterium and its metabolites.
10	bacterial cell division regulation lysogenization of conditional cell division lon mutants of escherichia coli by bacteriophage	Regulation by bacterial cell division of lon mutants of l' escherichia coli by bacteriophage-mediated cell division.
10	control of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli characterization of arginyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutants	Mastery of apos biosynthesis; arginine in escherichia coli characterization of apos mutant cells; ribonucleic acid synthetase by apos transfer; arginyl.
10	a polypeptide bacteriophage receptor modified cell wall protein subunits in bacteriophage resistant mutants of bacillus sphaericus strain p 1	Under-cell wall protein units modified by a polypeptide bacteriophage receptor (PBCR) in bacteriophage-resistant mutants of Bacillus sphaericus strain p-1.
10	biosynthetic pathway of thiamine pyrophosphate a special reference to the thiamine monophosphate requiring mutant and the thiamine pyrophosphate requiring mutant of escherichia coli	The thiamine pyrophosphate biosynthetic pathway is a special reference to the mutant requiring thiamine monophosphate and the mutant requiring thiamine pyrophosphate from escherichia coli.
10	enterochelin system of iron transport in escherichia coli mutations affecting ferric enterochelin esterase	Iron transport enterocelin system in apo mutation; escherichia coli affecting apo; apo esterase; ferric enterocelin.
10	excision repair characteristics of recb res and uvrc strains of escherichia coli	Repair characteristics of specimens; excision of recovered and used isolates; escherichia coli.
10	l arabinose isomerase formation in a conditional mutant of gene araa of escherichia coli b r	Formation of apos; isomerase of apos; arabinosis in a conditional mutant of the araa d&apos gene; escherichia coli b r.
10	mutant of escherichia coli with derepressed levels of the biotin biosynthetic enzymes	Escherichia coli mutant with derepressed levels of biogenic enzymes of biotin.
10	phleomycin stimulated degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Phleomycin stimulated deoxyribonucleic acid – lapos degradation in escherichia coli.
10	studies on sex pili mutants of the sex factor f in escherichia coli defective in bacteriophage adsorbing function of f pili	Studies of sexual pili mutants of sex factor f in escherichia coli having a bacteriophage-mediated pili adsorption function in escherichia coli.
10	relation between protein synthesis and phospholipid synthesis and turnover in escherichia coli	Protein synthesis and phospholipid synthesis and turnover in escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of thiamine transport by chloroethylthiamine in escherichia coli	The inhibition of thiamine transport by chloroethylthiamine in Escherichia coli.
10	effects of proline analogues on the formation of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli	Effects of proline analogs on alkaline phosphatase formation in escherichia coli.
10	mutations affecting amino sugar metabolism in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting metabolism of amino sugars in escherichia coli k 12.
10	de novo biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli excretion of quinolinic acid by mutants lacking quinolinate phosphoribosyl transferase	De novo biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli excretion of quinolinic acid by mutants without phosphoribosyltransferase, Arch.
10	genetic analysis of bacteriophage mu induced flagellar mutants in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of mu bacteriophage induced flagellar mutants in Escherichia coli.
10	transport systems for alanine serine and glycine in escherichia coli k 12	Serine alanine and glycine transport systems in apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	turnover of phosphatidylglycerol in escherichia coli	Phosphatidylglycerol turnover in escherichia coli.
10	duplication translocations of tryptophan operon genes in escherichia coli	The duplication of translocations of the tryptophan operon genes in escherichia coli.
10	glycolaldehyde is a precursor of pyridoxal phosphate in escherichia coli b	Glycolaldehyde is a precursor of the pyridoxal phosphate in Escherichia coli b.
10	degradation of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid after gamma irradiation of spheroplasted escherichia coli cr thy cells	Deterioration of the apos; cellular deoxyribonucleic acid after gamma irradiation of apos; escherichia coli cre thy spheroplasified cells.
10	biotin uptake in biotin regulatory mutant of escherichia coli	L' uptake of biotin in the biotin regulatory mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	mutation to erythromycin dependence in escherichia coli k 12	Mutation to dependence on e.g. erythromycin in escherichia coli k 12.
10	studies with a gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase mutant in escherichia coli strain c	Studies with a mutant gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase of strain c d' escherichia coli.
10	genetic characterization of mutations which affect catabolite sensitive operons in escherichia coli including deletions of the gene for adenyl cyclase	Genetic characterization of mutations in catabolite-sensitive operons of escherichia coli including deletion of the l' adenyl cyclase gene.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 defective in the transport of basic amino acids	Mutant d' escherichia coli k 12 defective in basic amino acid transport.
10	basic amino acid transport in escherichia coli properties of canavanine resistant mutants	The basic transport of amino acids in the esterichia coli properties of canavanin-resistant mutants.
10	deletion mapping and orientation of the histidine operon of escherichia coli on a transducing bacteriophage	Deletion and orientation mapping of apos; histidine d&apos operon; escherichia coli on a transducer bacteriophage.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants altered in the transport systems for oligo and dipeptides	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 were altered in the trace and dipeptide transport systems.
10	repression of enzymes of arginine biosynthesis by l canavanine in arginyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutants of escherichia coli	Repression of enzymes of biosynthesis of apos; arginine by canavanine in apos mutants; escherichia coli for transfer of apos; arginyl to apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xix inhibition of isoleucine biosynthesis by glycyl leucine	Isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xix inhibition of isoleucine biosynthesis by glycyl leucine.
10	degradation of bacteriophage lambda deoxyribonucleic acid after restriction by escherichia coli k 12	Degradation of l' deoxyribonucleic acid of lambda bacteriophage after restriction by escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of macromolecular synthesis by putrescine in a conditional escherichia coli putrescine auxotroph	Regulation of macromolecular synthesis by putrescine in a conditional auxotroph d' putrescine escherichia coli.
10	chemotaxis toward amino acids in escherichia coli	Amino acid chemotaxis in Escherichia coli.
10	nonidentity of the aspartate and the aromatic aminotransferase components of transaminase a in escherichia coli	Identification of components of aspartate and apos; aromatic aminotransferase a in escherichia coli.
10	restoration of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase activity of a neurospora mutant by extracts of various chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	The reduced activity of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase d' a neurospora mutant by extracts from various chlorate-resistant mutants; escherichia coli.
10	characterization of escherichia coli mutants tolerant to bacteriocin jf246 two new classes of tolerant mutants	Characterization of bacteriocin-tolerant mutants d' escherichia coli jf246 and two new classes of tolerant mutants.
10	outer penetration barrier of escherichia coli k 12 kinetics of the uptake of gentian violet by wild type and envelope mutants	External penetration barrier; escherichia coli k 12 yeast cell kinetics; uptake of gentian violet by wild type and yeast mutants; envelope.
10	suppression of lex mutations affecting deoxyribonucleic acid repair in escherichia coli k 12 by closely linked thermosensitive mutations	The suppression of lex mutations affecting the deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) repair in escherichia coli k 12 by closely related thermosensitive mutations.
10	pleiotropic properties and genetic organization of the tola b locus of escherichia coli k 12	Pleiotropic properties and genetic organization of the escherichia coli loci.
10	multivalent repression of aspartic semialdehyde dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Multitivalent repression of aspartic semialdehyde dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k12, J. Am.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 exhibiting enhanced sensitivity to 5 methyltryptophan	The mutant strains of d' escherichia coli k12 showed an increased sensitivity to 5 methyltryptophan.
10	synthesis of bacteriophage coded gene products during infection of escherichia coli with amber mutants of t3 and t7 defective in gene 1	Synthesis of bacteriophage-encoded gene products during apo; infection of escherichia coli by defective t7 and t3 mutants.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli with a new highly efficient promoter for the lactose operon	A mutant of d' escherichia coli with a new promoter that is very effective for the l' operon lactose.
10	isolation of a mutant of escherichia coli defective in cytosine specific deoxyribonucleic acid methylase activity and in partial protection of bacteriophage lambda against restriction by cells containing the n 3 drug resistance factor	Isolation of cytosine-specific deoxyribonucleic acid methylase, escherichia coli, cytosine-specific deoxyribonucleic acid, and partial protection of the lambda bacteriophage against restriction by cells containing drug resistance factor 3.
10	tyrosine and phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 complementation between different tyrr alleles	Tyrosine and phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 complementation between different tyr alleles.
10	nucleoid condensation and cell division in escherichia coli mx74t2 ts52 after inhibition of protein synthesis	Nucleoid condensation and cell division in escherichia coli mx74t2 ts52 after inhibition of the protein synthesis.
10	rapid method for isolation of large quantities of outer membrane from escherichia coli k 12 and its application to the study of envelope mutants	A rapid method for the isolation of large amounts of the outer membrane of dolipid; escherichia coli k 12 and its application to the apos; study of mutants of the apos; envelope.
10	isolation of the nonviable cells produced during normal growth of recombination deficient strains of escherichia coli k 12	Isolate nonviable cells produced during normal growth of recombinant deficient Escherichia coli strains.
10	cross feeding of escherichia coli mutants defective in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Cross-feeding of d&apos mutants; Escherichia coli defective in nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide biosynthesis.
10	the gua operon of escherichia coli k 12 evidence for polarity from guab to guaa	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence of the existence of a polarity between the two groups.
10	reactivation of photoinactivated single stranded dna bacteriophage phi x174 by uv irradiated escherichia coli cells	Reactivation of photoinactivated single-stranded DNA phi x174 bacteriophage by apo-irradiated Escherichia coli; uv.
10	synthesis of bacteriophage and host dna in toluene treated cells prepared from t4 infected escherichia coli role of bacteriophage gene d2a	Bacteriophage and apo synthesis; apo DNA; host in toluene-treated cells prepared from t4 d&apos infected cells; escherichia coli role of bacteriophage d2a gene.
10	polyamine synthesis and accumulation in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage r17	Polyamine synthesis and accumulation in bacteriophage r17-infected Escherichia coli 5.
10	transcellular ion flow in escherichia coli b and electrical sizing of bacterias	Escherichia coli b transcellular ion flow and electrical sizing of bacteria.
10	electrophoretic variation in escherichia coli from natural sources	An electrophoretic variation of escherichia coli from natural sources.
10	defective transamination a mechanism for resistance to ketomycin in escherichia coli	Defective transfusion a mechanism for ketomycin resistance in escherichia coli.
10	f factor mediated immunity to lethal zygosis in escherichia coli k 12	L' f-factor-mediated immunity to lethal zygosis in l' escherichia coli k12 induced by a factor.
10	mapping of the structural genes of the three aspartokinases and of the two homoserine dehydrogenases of escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of the structural genes of the three aspartokinases and two homoserine dehydrogenases of apos.
10	role for free isoleucine of glycyl leucine in the repression of threonine deaminase in escherichia coli	Role of glycyl leucine free isoleucine in threonine deaminase repression in escherichia coli.
10	malb region in escherichia coli k 12 characterization of new mutations	Malb region in escherichia coli k 12 characterization de nouveaux mutations.
10	genetic analysis of the leucine region in escherichia coli b r gene enzyme assignments	Genetic analysis of the leucine region of the apo; assignment of enzymes from the apo gene; escherichia coli.
10	positioning flagellar genes in escherichia coli by deletion analysis	Position flagellar genes in Escherichia coli through deletion analysis.
10	reconstitution of oxidative phosphorylation and the adenosine triphosphate dependent transhydrogenase activity by a combination of membrane fractions from unca and uncb mutant strains of escherichia coli k12	Reconstruction of oxidative phosphorylation and l' l&apos-dependent transhydrogenase activity; adenosine triphosphate by a combination of membrane fractions from unca and uncapos mutant strains; escherichia coli k12 was completed.
10	use of escherichia coli mutants to evaluate purines purine nucleosides and analogues	The use of d' escherichia coli mutants to evaluate purine and its nucleosides and analogs.
10	thermal enhancement of ultraviolet mutability in a tif 1 uvra derivative of escherichia coli b r evidence that ultraviolet mutagenesis depends upon an inducible function	Ultraviolet in an ultraviolet derivative; escherichia coli b r shows that mutagenesis at apos; ultraviolet depends on an inducible function.
10	the nucleotide sequence of the lactose messenger ribonucleic acid transcribed from the uv5 promoter mutant of escherichia coli	The nucleotide sequence of l' ribonucleic acid, a lactose messenger, transcribed from the mutant promoter uv5 d' escherichia coli.
10	excision of thymine dimers in vitro by extracts of bacteriophage infected escherichia coli	L' excision of thymine dimers in vitro by extracts from escherichia coli-infected thymine bacteriophages.
10	nucleotide sequences from tryptophan messenger rna of escherichia coli the sequence corresponding to the amino terminal region of the first polypeptide specified by the operon	The nucleotide sequences of the tryptophan messenger rna de l'apos; escherichia coli correspond to the amino region-terminal of the first polypeptide specified by the operon.
10	description of an incompatibility mutant of escherichia coli	Description of an apos mutant; apos incompatibility; escherichia coli.
10	genetic and biochemical investigation of the escherichia coli mutant hfl 1 which is lysogenized at high frequency by bacteriophage lambda	L' genetic and biochemical study of hfl 1 d&apos mutant; Escherichia coli which is lysogenized at high frequencies by the bacteriophage lambda.
10	properties of metk mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Properties of Met4 mutants; Escherichia coli c.
10	repair of dna containing interstrand crosslinks in escherichia coli sequential excision and recombination	Repair of apos; DNA containing strand cross-links in apos; sequential excision and recombination of apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutagenesis by mutator gene muth1 in continuous cultures of escherichia coli	Cultures of escherichia coli mutator mutagenesis.
10	inhibition of replication gap closure in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet light photoproducts of l tryptophan	L' inhibition of the closure of the replication gap in Escherichia coli by the photoproducts of tryptophan @-@1 in the near-lapo light; ultraviolet.
10	effect of dicyclohexylcarbodiimide on growth and membrane mediated processes in wild type and heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Effect of dicyclohexylcarbodiimide on growth and membrane-mediated processes in wild-type d' escherichia coli k 12 mutants.
10	beta beta subunits of ribonucleic acid polymerase in episome free minicells of escherichia coli	Under-beta units of l' ribonucleic acid polymerase in mini-episomatic free d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of an escherichia coli ruv mutant which forms nonseptate filaments after low doses of ultraviolet light irradiation	Isolation and characterization; ruv d&apos mutant; escherichia coli that forms non-@-seven filaments after low doses of apo; ultraviolet irradiation.
10	three different missense suppressor mutations affecting the trna ggg gly species of escherichia coli	Three different-sense false suppressor mutations affect trna ggg gly d' escherichia coli species.
10	multiplicity of isoleucine leucine and valine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12	Multiplicity of the transport systems for leucine and valine isoleucine in escherichia coli.
10	mutations affecting the different transport systems for isoleucine leucine and valine in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations in the different transport systems of isoleucine-leucine and valine in escherichia coli.
10	isolation of specialized transducing bacteriophages for gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gnd of escherichia coli	Isolation of gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase specialized transducer bacteriophages; escherichia coli.
10	localization of two functions of the phosphoribosyl anthranilate transferase of escherichia coli to distinct regions of the polypeptide chain	Localization of two functions of phosphoribosylanthranilate transferase d' escherichia coli into distinct regions of the polypeptide chain.
10	alterations in the outer membrane of the cell envelope of heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli	Alterations of the outer membrane of the cell envelope of heptose-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli were observed.
10	divergent orientation of transcription from the arginine gene ecbh cluster of escherichia coli	Divergent transcriptional orientation from the ecbh group of the arginine gene in escherichia coli.
10	modified map positions for lac and the pro markers in escherichia coli k 12	Modified lake position and escherichia coli k 12 pro markers on map.
10	gross map distances and hfr transfer times in escherichia coli k 12	Gross map distance and transfer time hfr in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	metabolism of d arabinose by escherichia coli b r	D arabinose metabolism by escherichia coli b r.
10	properties of a d glutamic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli	Properties of a glutamic acid requiring a d*apos mutant; escherichia coli.
10	cell division of escherichia coli control by membrane organization	Cell division of escherichia coli is controlled by the membrane organization.
10	cyclic adenosine monophosphate independent mutants of the lactose operon of escherichia coli	Lactose-independent mutants; cyclic adenosine monophosphate of the apos; lactose-operon of the apos; escherichia coli.
10	d serine transport system in escherichia coli k 12	Serine-transport system in escherichia coli k 12 d.
10	metabolism of d serine in escherichia coli k 12 mechanism of growth inhibition	Serine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12, dosage mechanism; growth inhibition.
10	loss of an essential function of escherichia coli by deletions in the thya region	Escherichia coli loss is an essential function of escherichia coli per deletion in the thya region.
10	stringent control of intracellular proteolysis in escherichia coli	Strict control of intracellular proteolysis in the Escherichia coli.
10	multiplicity of leucine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12	Multiplicity of escherichia coli k 12 leucine transport systems.
10	effect of rifampin on the structure and membrane attachment of the nucleoid of escherichia coli	Effect of rifampin on structure and apos; membrane attachment of the nucleoid d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation of the bacteriophage lambda receptor from escherichia coli	To isolate the lambda receptor from the bacteriophage d'apos; Escherichia coli.
10	phospholipid turnover in a conditional polyamine auxotroph of escherichia coli	Phospholipid cycling in a conditional auxotroph of polyamine d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of lipopolysaccharide protein from escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of lacid lipopolysaccharide protein; escherichia coli.
10	transport of biosynthetic intermediates homoserine and threonine uptake in escherichia coli	Transport of d' threonine absorption and homoserine biosynthetic intermediates in escherichia coli.
10	effect of photoreactivation on the filling of gaps in deoxyribonucleic acid synthesized after exposure of escherichia coli to ultraviolet light	The effect of photoreactivation on the filling of spaces in the cell; deoxyribonucleic acid synthesized after exposure of the cell; escherichia coli to ultraviolet light.
10	genetic analysis of cold sensitive ribosome maturation mutants of escherichia coli	L' genetic analysis of ripening mutants of cold-sensitive ribosomes of l' escherichia coli.
10	growth of ribonucleic acid bacteriophage f2 in a conditional putrescine auxotroph of escherichia coli evidence for a polyamine role in translation	The growth of bacteriophage f2 of apos; ribonucleic acid in a conditional auxotroph of putrescine d' Escherichia coli demonstrates the apos; existence of apos; a role of polyamines in translation.
10	chromosomal location of the tolg locus for tolerance to bacteriocin jf246 in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of the tolg locus for bacteriocin tolerance jf246 in escherichia coli k.
10	proteins of the inner membrane of escherichia coli identification of succinate dehydrogenase by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis with sdh amber mutants	Escherichia coli d&apos inner membrane proteins identified succinate dehydrogenase by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis with sdh amber mutants.
10	decay of ribonucleic acid synthesis in amino acid starved escherichia coli after rifampin treatment	Decomposition of ribonucleic acid synthesis in amino acids deprived Escherichia coli of food after rifampin.
10	reversion of frameshift mutations by mutator genes in escherichia coli	Reversal of frame change mutations by mutant genes in escherichia coli.
10	complementation between different mutations in the ilva gene of escherichia coli k 12	Complementation between different mutations in the escherichia coli gene.
10	evolution of a second gene for beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Progress of a second beta galactosidase gene in escherichia coli.
10	con mutants class of mutants in escherichia coli k 12 lacking a major cell wall protein and defective in conjugation and adsorption of a bacteriophage	Class of mutants con in escherichia coli k 12, lacking cell wall proteins and defective in conjugation and appos; adsorption of bacteriophage.
10	quantal behavior of a diffusible factor which initiates septum formation at potential division sites in escherichia coli	A diffusible factor that initiates the formation of apos; a septum at potential division sites in escherichia coli.
10	complementation in vitro between mutationally altered beta2 subunits of escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase	In vitro complementation between beta2 mutated beta units; escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase.
10	negative chemotaxis in escherichia coli	Negative chemotaxis in the Escherichia coli.
10	genetic mapping of the locus for detergent resistant phospholipase a plda in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mapping of detergent-resistant apla phospholipase locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic regulatory mechanisms and the ecological niche of escherichia coli	Genetic regulatory mechanisms and ecological niches of the Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of prototrophic mutants of escherichia coli unable to support the intracellular growth of t7	Isolation and characterization of prototrophic d' escherichia coli mutants unable to support the intracellular growth of t7.
10	reconstitution of the energy linked transhydrogenase activity in membranes from a mutant strain of escherichia coli k12 lacking magnesium ion or calcium ion stimulated adenosine triphosphatase	The reconstitution of apos; transhydrogenase activity related to apos; energy in the membranes of apos; a mutant strain of apos; escherichia coli k12 lacking apos; magnesium ion or apos; calcium ion stimulates apos; adenosine triphosphatase.
10	size distribution and molecular polarity of newly replicated dna in escherichia coli	The particle size distribution and molecular polarity of the apos; newly replicated DNA in escherichia coli.
10	an escherichia coli mutant with an altered elongation factor tu	A mutant d'apos; Escherichia coli with a factor d'apos; elongation altered there.
10	interaction of bacterial and lambda phage recombination systems in the x ray sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12	Interaction of bacterial recombination systems and lambda phage in x-ray sensitivity of l' escherichia coli k 12.
10	studies on in vitro dna synthesis isolation of dna b gene product from escherichia coli	Studies of the in vitro synthesis of apos; DNA to isolate the b gene product from apos; escherichia coli.
10	stereospecificity of tripeptide utilization in a methionine auxotroph of escherichia coli k 12	Stereospecificity of apos; use of tripeptides in a methionine auxotroph d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	mapping of a mutation polb100 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of a polb100 mutation affecting deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii in the Escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with cold sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	D&apos mutants; escherichia coli with d&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid sensitive to cold.
10	release of polarity in escherichia coli by gene n of phage lambda termination and antitermination of transcription	Release of polarity in escherichia coli by the n gene of termination of lambda phage and anti-transcription termination.
10	genetic studies on ribose 5 phosphate isomerase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic studies on mutants of apos; ribose isomerase 5 phosphate d' escherichia coli k 12 were performed.
10	mapping loci for surface exclusion and incompatibility on the f factor of escherichia coli k 12	Map loci; surface and locus exclusion; fluid factor incompatibility; escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of one carbon biosynthesis and utilization in escherichia coli	Regulation of the biosynthesis of carbon and use in escherichia coli.
10	proline excretion and indirect suppression in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Proline excretion and indirect suppression in Escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	threonine locus of escherichia coli k 12 genetic structure and evidence for an operon	Threonine Site of Escherichia coli k 12 genetic structure and evidence of an operon.
10	pleiotropic effects of mutations involved in the regulation of escherichia coli k 12 alkaline phosphatase	Pleiotropic effects of mutations involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase; escherichia coli k 12.
10	polyamine limitation of growth slows the rate of polypeptide chain elongation in escherichia coli	Growth limitation by polyamines will slow the rate of polypeptide chain elongation in escherichia coli.
10	the reconstitution of oxidase activity in membranes derived from a 5 aminolaevulinic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli	The re-establishment of apos; oxidase activity in membranes derived from apos; an aminolaevulinic acid 5 requiring a mutant of apos; escherichia coli.
10	the 3 terminal sequence of escherichia coli 16s ribosomal rna complementarity to nonsense triplets and ribosome binding sites	Sequence 3 of the apos terminus; escherichia coli 16s ribosomal complementarity rn with absurd triplets and ribosome-binding sites.
10	regulation of the pool size of valine in escherichia coli k 12	Valine pool size regulation in Escherichia coli k 12 is described.
10	characterization of escherichia coli flagellar mutants that are insensitive to catabolite repression	Characterization of flagellar d' escherichia coli mutants that are insensitive to catabolite repression.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid directed in vitro synthesis of ilv specific messenger ribonucleic acid by extracts of escherichia coli k 12	L' deoxyribonucleic acid directed the in vitro synthesis of the ilev-specific messenger ribonucleic acid by escherichia coli extracts.
10	r6k plasmid replication influence of chromosomal genotype in minicell producing strains of escherichia coli k 12	L' influence of chromosomal genotype on r6k plasmid replication in d&apos strains; and, escherichia coli k12 producing minicells was demonstrated.
10	role of atp in excision repair of ultraviolet radiation damage in escherichia coli	Role of apo; atp in excision repair of ultraviolet radiation damage to escherichia coli.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 missing acetolactate synthase activity	The d' escherichia coli k12 mutant lacks acetolactate synthase activity.
10	streptomycin induced synthesis of abnormal protein in an escherichia coli mutant	Streptomycin induced synthesis of the abnormal proteins in a mutant of d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	lactose permeation via the arabinose transport system in escherichia coli k 12	Lactose permeation via the system of transport of l'apos; arabinose in escherichia coli k.
10	interrelationship of repair mechanisms in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli	Interrelationship of repair mechanisms in ultraviolet-irradiated escherichia coli.
10	thymineless mutagenesis in escherichia coli	Thymine-free mutagenesis in the Escherichia coli.
10	effect of r factor mediated genes on some surface properties of escherichia coli	The effect of r-mediated genes on certain surface properties of escherichia coli was studied.
10	genetic mapping of the antigenic determinants of two polysaccharide k antigens k10 and k54 in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of antigenic determinants of two polysaccharide antigens k10 and k54 in escherichia coli.
10	evidence for specific control of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli	Evidence of a specific control of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	transcriptional control in the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli b r	Control of transcription in the cell; arabinose operon l of the cell; escherichia coli b r.
10	influence of protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis on the replication of the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in escherichia coli cells and minicells	Influence of protein synthesis and protein synthesis; ribonucleic acid on replication of bacteriocinogen factor clo df13 in cells and minicells; Escherichia coli.
10	identification of messenger ribonucleic acids and proteins synthesized by the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in purified minicells of escherichia coli	Identification of messenger ribonucleic acids and proteins synthesized by clo df13 bacteriocinogen factor in purified d' escherichia coli minicells.
10	nonreplicated dna and dna fragments in t4 r bacteriophage particles phenotypic mixing of a phage protein	Fragments of DNA and dapos; unreplicated DNA in t4 particles of the bacteriophage phenotypic mixture of dapos; a phagic protein.
10	asparagine utilization in escherichia coli	The use of asparagine in Escherichia coli.
10	analysis of the growth of recombination deficient strains of escherichia coli k 12	Growth analysis of the recombinant-deficient Escherichia coli strains.
10	biosynthesis of ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12 biochemical and genetic characterization of a mutant unable to convert chorismate into 4 hydroxybenzoate	The biosynthesis of apos; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k 12 and the biochemical and genetic characterization of apos, a mutant unable to convert chorismate to 4 hydroxybenzoates.
10	studies on l serine deaminase in escherichia coli k 12	Serine Deaminase Studies in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic analysis of thymidine resistant and low thymine requiring mutants of escherichia coli k 12 induced by bacteriophage mu 1	Genetic analysis of thymidine resistance and low thymine content for d&apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 induced by bacteriophage mu 1 was performed.
10	effect of a leu linked mutation on the valine sensitivity of acetohydroxy acid synthase activity in escherichia coli	Effect of a leu mutation on valine sensitivity of apos; activity of apos; acetohydroxy synthase in escherichia coli.
10	mutation affecting regulation of synthesis of acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting regulation of l&apos synthesis; acetohydroxyacid synthetase in escherichia coli k12.
10	enzymatic production of deoxyribonucleic acid double strand breaks after ultraviolet irradiation of escherichia coli k 12	The enzymatic production of the double strands of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid breaks down after apos; ultraviolet irradiation of apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	mut 25 a mutation to mutator linked to pura in escherichia coli	Mut 25, a mutation to a pura-linked mutant of Escherichia coli.
10	growth of bacteriophages ms2 and t7 on streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Growth of bacteriophages ms2 and t7 on mutants of d' escherichia coli resistant to streptomycin.
10	ultraviolet light sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying ruv mutations in combination with uvra or lon mutant alleles	The ultraviolet sensitivity of ruv mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 in combination with uvra or lon mutant alleles.
10	the fate of ribosomes in escherichia coli cells starved for a carbon source	The fate of ribosomes in Escherichia coli cells is also hungry from apos, a carbon source.
10	the recbc deoxyribonuclease of escherichia coli isolation and characterization of the subunit proteins and reconstitution of the enzyme	The deoxyribonuclease recbc of apos; isolation of escherichia coli and the characterization of proteins of the sub-unit and reconstitution of the enzyme.
10	host dna degradation after infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4 dependence of the alternate pathway of degradation which occurs in the absence of both t4 endonuclease ii and nuclear disruption on t4 endonuclease iv	The degradation of the host's DNA after infection; escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4 is dependent on apos; another degradation pathway that occurs in the host; absence of apos; endonuclease ii t4 and nuclear disorganization on the host; and, endonuclease iv.
10	induction by mutagens of tandem gene duplications in the glys region of the escherichia coli chromosome	Mutagenic Induction of tandem gene duplications in the gly-region of the d' escherichia coli chromosome.
10	biological activity of t4 dna synthesized in toluene treated escherichia coli cells	Biological activity of the cells; t4 DNA synthesized in toluene-treated cells; escherichia coli.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in leucyl phenylalanyl trna protein transferase	A mutant of d' escherichia coli defective in the leucyl phenylalanyl trna protein transferase.
10	translational reinitiation reinitiation of lac repressor fragments at three internal sites early in the lac i gene of escherichia coli	Translational reboot of lake repressor fragments at three internal sites early in the lac i gene of l' escherichia coli.
10	the roles of the lambda c3 gene and the escherichia coli catabolite gene activation system in the establishment of lysogeny by bacteriophage lambda	Roles of lambda c3 gene and the apos system; activation of catabolite d' Escherichia coli in apos; establishment of lysogenesis by lambda bacteriophage.
10	divergent operons and the genetic structure of the maltose b region in escherichia coli k12	Dissenting operations and genetic structure of maltose b region in escherichia coli k12.
10	genetic analysis of an escherichia coli mutant with a lesion in stable rna turnover	Genetic analysis of an escherichia coli mutant with lesion in a stable turnover of the rna.
10	oxidative phosphorylation in escherichia coli k12 an uncoupled mutant with altered membrane structure	Oxidative phosphorylation in k12 escherichia coli, a decoupled mutant with altered membrane structure.
10	the threonine sensitive homoserine dehydrogenase and aspartokinase activities of escherichia coli k12 distribution and accessibility to antibodies of some epitopes of the bifunctional enzyme	The threonine-sensitive aspartokinase-homoserine dehydrogenase and threonine-sensitive activities of dapos; escherichia coli k12 distribution and their availability to antibodies of certain apo epitopes; bifunctional enzyme.
10	comparison of the mutagenic effects of 35s decay in escherichia coli strains wp 2 and wp 2s	Comparison of the mutagenic effects of 35s decomposition in wp 2 and wp 2s d&apos strains; escherichia coli strains.
10	genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k 12 cross resistance among colicins of group a	The genetics of colicin resistance in escherichia coli k12 intersected with resistance among group a colicines.
10	dnab gene of escherichia coli k 12 affects superinfection inhibition between f plasmids	The dnab d' escherichia coli k12 gene affects the inhibition of plasmid-f superinfection.
10	effect of uncouplers on downhill beta galactoside transport in energy depleted cells of escherichia coli	The effect of uncouplers on the transport of beta-galactosides descending in cells depleted in energy d' escherichia coli.
10	lambda bacteriophage gene produces and x ray sensitivity of escherichia coli comparison of red dependent and gam dependent radioresistance	The bacteriophage lambda gene produces and x sensitivity to the radiation of escherichia coli by comparing red- and gamma-dependent radioresistance.
10	amplification of sex repressor function of one fi r factor during anaerobic growth of escherichia coli	Enhancement of sexual repressive function of apo; a factor relied on during anaerobic growth of apo; escherichia coli.
10	variation in expression of sex factor genes in the proteus providencia group relative to escherichia coli	Variation in the expression of sex factor genes in the Provencia Proteus group with respect to escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerance and map location of conjugation deficient mutants	Colicin tolerance and map location of the colonic conjugation-deficient mutants.
10	quantitation of the loss of the bacteriophage lambda receptor protein from the outer membrane of lipopolysaccharide deficient strains of escherichia coli	Quantification of loss of outer membrane bacteriophage lambda receptor protein from lipopolysaccharide-deficient d' escherichia coli strains.
10	regulation of the escherichia coli methylgalactoside transport system by gene mgld	Gene regulation of the transport system of the methylgalactoside d' escherichia coli by the gene mgld.
10	genetic and physiological analysis of an envb spherelike mutant of escherichia coli k 12 and characterization of its transductants	Genetic and physiological analysis of plants; a spherical type mutant of plants; escherichia coli k 12 and characterization of its transducers.
10	genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k 12 cross resistance among colicins of group b	The genetics of colicin resistance in escherichia coli k12 crossbreeds resistance among group b colicines.
10	tryptophan operon read through isolation and characterization of an abnormally long tryptophan synthetase alpha subunit from a frame shift mutant of escherichia coli	L' tryptophan operon reads throughout; isolation and characterization of apos; under @-@unit alpha of unusually long tryptophan synthetase from apos; a d&apos mutant; escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage t7 deoxyribonucleic acid replication in vitro a protein of escherichia coli required for bacteriophage t7 dna polymerase activity	In vitro replication of apos bacteriophage t7; deoxyribonucleic acid, a dolipos protein; escherichia coli necessary for apos; bacteriophage t7 dna polymerase activity in vitro.
10	isolation and characterization of mutator strains of escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characterization of mutant strains of Escherichia coli.
10	regulation of galactose operon at the gal operator promoter region in escherichia coli k 12	Control of glaucoma; galactose operon in the glaucoma promoter region; galactose operator in escherichia coli k 12.
10	five control systems preventing transfer of escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f	Five control systems preventing transfer of escapos; escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f.
10	rapid cessation of phospholipid synthesis in fructose 1 6 diphosphate aldolase mutants of escherichia coli	Rapid cessation of phospholipid synthesis in fructose, 16 diphosphate aldolase mutants of escherichia coli.
10	location of the escherichia coli k 12 ruv gene affecting septum formation after inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Localization of the l&apos ruv gene; escherichia coli k 12 gene that affects septum formation after inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis.
10	a third kasugamycin resistance locus ksgc affecting ribosomal protein s2 in escherichia coli k 12	A third kasugamycin-resistance locus, ksgc, affects ribosomal protein s2 of l' escherichia coli k 12.
10	mutants of escherichia coli k12 unable to grow on non fermentable carbon substrates	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 unable to grow on nonfermentable substrates of carbon.
10	restriction of dna in yersinia enterocolitica detected by recipient ability for a derepressed r factor from escherichia coli	Restriction of dosage; DNA in yersinia enterocolitica detected by the recipient's ability to derepress the dosage factor; escherichia coli.
10	inhibition and amplification of the radiation induced degradation of dna in escherichia coli	Inhibition and amplification of DNA degradation induced by radiation in Escherichia coli.
10	male specific bacteriophage ms2 propagation in fluorophenylalanine resistant escherichia coli k12	"""Male specific bacteriophage ms2 propagation in fluorophenylalanine resistance escherichia coli k12"", J. App."
10	does phospholipase have a role in killing and sodium dodecyl sulfate lysis of t4 ghost infected escherichia coli	Phospholipase plays a role in the removal and lysis of the phantom-infected sodium dodecyl sulfate; escherichia coli t4?
10	ultraviolet mutagenesis and its repair in an escherichia coli strain containing a nonsense codon	Ultraviolet mutagenesis and its repair in Escherichia coli strains containing an absurd codon.
10	regulation of the beta glucoside system in escherchia coli k 12	Beta system regulation-glucoside in escherchia coli k.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 detection and measurement of ilv specific messenger ribonucleic acid	Metabolism of apos; isoleucine and valine in escherichia coli k 12, detection and measurement of apos; specific messenger ribonucleic acid; ilv.
10	the rep mutation iii altered structure of the replicating escherichia coli chromosome	The rep iii mutation has altered the structure of the replicating d' escherichia coli chromosome.
10	source of energy for the escherichia coli galactose transport systems induced by galactose	Source of energy for pod-induced galactose transport systems; galactose-induced Escherichia coli.
10	dna synthesis dependent cell division of escherichia coli 15 tau after arginine and uracil starvation	The synthesis of DNA depends on the cell division of d' escherichia coli 15 tau after deprivation of apos; arginine and d' uracil.
10	chemical studies on damages of escherichea coli by the immune bactericidal reaction ii release of phosphatidylethanolamine from a phospholipase a deficient mutant of e coli during the immune bactericidal reaction	Chemical studies of damage caused to escherichea coli by the bactericidal immune response ii release of phosphatidylethanolamine from apos; a phospholipase, a defective mutant; and e coli, the bactericidal immune response.
10	isolation of a metabolite capable of differentially supporting the growth of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide auxotrophs of escherichia coli	D&apos isolation; a metabolite capable of differentially supporting the growth of auxotrophs of l' adenine dinucleotide nicotinamide of l' escherichia coli.
10	the reconstitution of functional respiratory chains in membranes from electron transport deficient mutants of escherichia coli as demonstrated by quenching of atebrin fluorescence	The reconstitution of functional respiratory chains in electron-transport-deficient escherichia coli d*apos mutants membranes was demonstrated by elapos; extinction of spinal fluorescence.
10	recombination and the escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f	Recombination and isolation; escherichia coli k 12 sex factor ff.
10	characteristics of cold sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12 defective in deoxyribonucleic acid replication	Characteristics of cold-sensitive mutant cells; escherichia coli k 12 defective in deoxyribonucleic acid replication.
10	evidence for common binding sites for ferrichrome compounds and bacteriophage phi 80 in the cell envelope of escherichia coli	Evidence of the existence of common binding sites for ferrichrome compounds and bacteriophage phi 80 in apos; cell envelope escherichia coli.
10	anaerobic cytochrome b1 in escherichia coli association with and regulation of nitrate reductase	Anerobic cytochrome b1 in escherichia coli association with nitrate reductase and control of nitrate reductase.
10	synthesis of nitrate reductase components in chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Synthesis of nitrate reductase components in chlorate-resistant Escherichia coli and D&apos mutants.
10	biochemistry and genetics of klebsiella pneumoniae mutant strains unable to fix n2	Genetic biochemistry of mutant strains of klebsiella pneumoniae unable to bind n2.
10	regulation of branched chain aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases in an ilvdac deletion strain of escherichia coli k 12	Regulation of branched amino chain transfer ribonucleic acids synthetases in a deletion d'apos; escherichia coli k12 strain; ilvdac.
10	bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli k 12 general pattern of resistance	Resistance to the bacteriophage in the bacteriophage; escherichia coli k 12 general pattern of resistance.
10	modification of escherichia coli membranes in the prereplicative phase of phage t4 infection specificity of association and quantitation of bound phage proteins	Modification of membranes d' escherichia coli in the pre-plicative phase of specificity of apos; association and quantification of bound proteins of phage t4 for apos; infection by phage t4.
10	escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acids are not cut from an intact precursor molecule	Ribosomal ribonucleic acids from Escherichia coli are not cut from intact precursor molecules.
10	induction and mutagenesis of prophage lambda in escherichia coli k12 by metabolites of aflatoxin b1	Induction and mutagenesis of lambda prophage in escherichia coli k12 by the metabolites of aflatoxin b1.
10	pleiotropic effects of a dna adenine methylation mutation dam 3 in escherichia coli k12	A mutant of eposyl ester methylation; eposyl ester adenine; DNA, dam 3, in escherichia coli k12.
10	effects of dna polymerase defective and recombination deficient mutations on the ultraviolet sensitivity of bacillus subtilis spores	Effects of mutations deficient in DNA polymerase and recombination on ultraviolet sensitivity of bacillus subtilis spores.
10	mutagenic properties of cis plantinum ii diammino dichloride in escherichia coli	Mutagenic properties of cis-plantinum ii diammino dichloride in escherichia coli.
10	stringent control of ribosomal protein gene expression in escherichia coli	Strict control of l' expression of ribosomal protein gene in Escherichia coli.
10	a new relaxed mutant of escherichia coli with an altered 50s ribosomal subunit	A new relaxed d' escherichia coli mutant with an altered 50s sub@-@ ribosomal unit.
10	direction of transcription of the regulatory gene arac in escherichia coli b r	Transcriptional direction of the arac-regulating gene in escherichia coli b r.
10	fine structure mapping complementation and physiology of escherichia coli hfl mutants	Map of fine structures, complementation, and physiology of hfl d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	an endonuclease from escherichia coli that acts preferentially on uv irradiated dna and is absent from the uvra and uvrb mutants	An escherichia coli endonuclease that acts preferentially on apos-irradiated DNA; uv and is absent from uvra and uvrb mutants.
10	biogenesis of membrane lipids mutants of escherichia coli with temperature sensitive phosphatidylserine decarboxylase	Biogenesis of d&apos mutants; escherichia coli for membrane lipids with heat-sensitive phosphatidylserine decarboxylase.
10	metabolites influence control of lysine transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli k 12	These metabolites influence the control of lysine transfer formation; ribonucleic acid synthetase in escherichia coli k12.
10	a ribonucleoprotein precursor of both the 30s and 50s ribosomal sunbunits of escherichia coli	A ribonucleoprotein precursor to the ribosomal sun units of the 1930s and 50s; Escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of polypeptide chain initiation in escherichia coli by elongation factor g	Apos inhibition; Polypeptide chain initiation in escherichia coli by d&apos factor; g elongation.
10	effect of a low molecular weight dna binding protein h1 factor on the in vitro transcription of the lactose operon in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; h1 binding protein; low molecular weight DNA on in vitro transcription of apos; lactose operon in escherichia coli.
10	a deletion mutation placing the galactokinase gene of escherichia coli under control of the biotin promoter	A deletion mutation placing the gene for the d' escherichia coli galactokinase under the control of the biotin promoter.
10	accumulation of toxic concentrations of methylglyoxal by wild type escherichia coli k 12	Accumulation of toxic methylglyoxal concentrations by wild type 12 escherichia coli.
10	ribosomal proteins in plastids of a mendelian and a nonmendelian streptomycin resistant mutant of chlamydomonas reinhardii determined by two dimensional gel electrophoresis	The ribosomal proteins in the d&apos plastids; a Mendelian and d&apos mutant; a streptomycin-resistant nonmendelian mutant of Chlamydomonas reinhardii were determined by two-dimensional gel electrophoresis.
10	the development and the reversion of spheroplasts of a diaminopimelic acid auxotrophic mutant of escherichia coli	The development and reversion of the spheroplasts of Apos; a mutant auxotrophic to apos; diaminopimelic acid; escherichia coli.
10	metabolite transport in mutants of escherichia coli k12 defective in electron transport and coupled phosphorylation	The transport of metabolites in mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 is defective in electron transport and coupled phosphorylation.
10	biosynthesis of bacterial menaquinones menaquinone mutants of escherichia coli	Menaquinone mutants of menaquinone; escherichia coli for bacterial biosynthesis.
10	alteration of regulation of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli w by mutation to rifampin resistance	Modification of the regulation of the biosynthesis of arginine in escherichia coli w by mutation to rifampin resistance.
10	excision of pyrimidine dimers in normal and t4 infected escherichia coli effect of pola and other mutations	Excision of pyrimidine dimers in normal and t4 strains infected with escherichia coli; effects of pola and d' other mutations.
10	stimulatory effect of hydrostatic pressure on cell division in cultures of escherichia coli	Stimulant effect of hydrostatic pressure on cell division in d*apos; escherichia coli cultures.
10	inhibition of excision repair without influence upon uv sensitivity and uv mutability in escherichia coli b r hcr	Inhibition of repair; excision with no influence on sensitivity to apos; uv and mutability of apos; uv in escherichia coli.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in removing 3 terminal nucleotides from some transfer rna precursor molecules	An escherichia coli mutant that does not remove 3 terminal nucleotides of some transfer precursor molecules.
10	effect of procaine hydrochloride on dna repair in escherichia coli	Effect of procaine hydrochloride on repair of DNA in Escherichia coli.
10	mutations in escherichia coli k 12 decreasing the rate of streptomycin uptake synergism with r factor mediated capacity to inactivate streptomycin	Apos mutation; escherichia coli k 12 decreased the rate of apo synergy; streptomycin absorption with the factor-mediated capacity; and inactivation of streptomycin.
10	energy linked reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in membranes derived from normal and various respiratory deficient mutant strains of escherichia coli k12	The reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in membranes derived from normal mutant and various respiratory deficient Escherichia coli k12 strains is energy dependent.
10	the atp dependent dnaase from escherichia coli rora a nuclease with changed enzymatic properties	Apos-dependent dnaase produces escherichia coli which has changed its enzymatic properties.
10	30 s pre ribosomal rna of escherichia coli primary and secondary processing	The primary and secondary transformation of escherichia coli is described in the following sections.
10	isolation and initial characterization of glutathione deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and initial characterization of glutathione-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli 12.
10	isolation of specialized transducing bacteriophage lambda carrying genes of the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli b r	Isolate specialized lambda transducer bacteriophage carrying genes from l' operon arabinose l from l' escherichia coli b r.
10	role of pyrimidine dimer excision in loss of potential streptomycin resistance mutations of ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli on phosphate buffered agar	Role of apos; excision of pyrimidine dimer in loss of potential streptomycin-resistant mutations of apos; irradiated apos escherichia coli; ultraviolet on phosphate-buffered agar.
10	two modes of excision repair in toluene treated escherichia coli	Two routes of repair of l' excision in toluene-treated escherichia coli.
10	individuality of mannonate and altronate hydro lyases in escherichia coli k 12	The individuality of mannonate and altronate hydrolyses in escherichia coli k12 is also demonstrated.
10	n terminal amino acid sequences of d serine deaminases of wild type and operator constitutive strains of escherichia coli k 12	N sequences; terminal amino acids of wild-type serine deaminases and component strains; operators; escherichia coli k 12.
10	inhibition of escherichia coli isoleucine biosynthesis by isoleucine tetrazole	Inhibition of biosynthesis of apos; apos isoleucine; escherichia coli by apos; tetrazole isoleucine.
10	accumulation of arginine precursors in escherichia coli effects on growth enzyme repression and application to the forward selection of arginine auxotrophs	Accumulation of apo precursors; arginine in the effects of escherichia coli on the repression of growth enzymes and their application to the direct selection of arginine auxotrophs.
10	genetic analyses of an amber mutation in escherichia coli k 12 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid ligase and viability	Genetic analysis of an amber mutation in escherichia coli k 12 affects the ligase of l' deoxyribonucleic acid and viability.
10	production of cells without deoxyribonucleic acid during thymidine starvation of lexa cultures of escherichia coli k 12	Production of deoxyribonucleic acid-free cells during thymidine deprivation in lexa d' escherichia coli k 12 cultures.
10	ribosomal distribution in a polyamine auxotroph of escherichia coli	Ribosomal distribution in polyamin auxotrophs of escherichia coli.
10	operator constitutive mutants in the threonine operon of escherichia coli k 12	Mutant constitutive operator in escherichia coli threonine operon k 12.
10	translocation of the tetracycline resistance determinant from r100 1 to the escherichia coli k 12 chromosome	Translocation of the r1001 tetracycline resistance determinant to chromosome k12 d' escherichia coli.
10	uroporphyrin accumulating mutant of escherichia coli k 12	Mutant d'apos; escherichia coli k 12; accumulating uroporphyrin.
10	physiological suppression of a transport defect in escherichia coli mutants deficient in ca2 mg2 stimulated adenosine triphosphatase	Physiological suppression of apos; a transport defect in ca2 mg2-deficient esterichia coli mutants stimulated apos; adenosine triphosphatase.
10	anaerobic energy yielding reaction associated with transhydrogenation from glycerol 3 phosphate to fumarate by an escherichia coli system	D&apos reaction; anaerobic energy associated with trans hydrogenation of glycerol 3 phosphate to fumarate by escherichia coli; d&apos system.
10	electron transport chain from glycerol 3 phosphate to nitrate in escherichia coli	Glucos transport chain; glycerol electrons 3 phosphate to nitrate in escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid modification by intermediate type modification mutants of escherichia coli k 12 and b	Modification of deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid by mutants intermediate in modification; escherichia coli k 12 and b.
10	comparison of lipopolysaccharides from agmenellum quadruplicatum to escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium by using thin layer chromatography	Compare the lipopolysaccharides of apos; agmenellum quadruplicatum with those of d'apos; escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium by thin-layer chromatography.
10	unusual membranous structures in minicells and minicell producing strains of escherichia coli	Unusual membrane structures in minicells and minicells producing strains of d' escherichia coli.
10	regulation of methionine transport activity in escherichia coli	The regulation of l' methionine transport activity in escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of lambda transducing bacteriophages for the su1 supd minus amber suppressor of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of lambda transducer bacteriophages for suppressant su1 sup less amber of escherichia coli.
10	maltose chemoreceptor of escherichia coli	Chemoreceptor malosis d'apos; Escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal location of mutations affecting the electrophoretic mobility of malate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of mutations affecting the electrophoretic mobility of malate dehydrogenase (MSD) in escherichia coli k.
10	analysis of glutamate exit in escherichia coli	Analysis of glutamate efflux in Escherichia coli isolates.
10	deletion of the escherichia coli crp gene	Dissolution of the gene in the cell.
10	properties of alpha dehydrobiotin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 resistant to apos; alpha@dehydrobiotin.
10	xanthosine 5 phosphate amidotransferase from escherichia coli	Xanthosine phosphate amidotransferase 5 from Escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis effect of cessation of net phospholipid synthesis on cytoplasmic and outer membranes	D' escherichia coli mutants defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis had a discontinuous effect on cytoplasmic and outer membranes.
10	transport of purines and deoxyadenosine in escherichia coli	Transport of purines and deoxyadenosine (deoxyadenosine) in escherichia coli.
10	transfection of escherichia coli spheroplasts vi transfection of nonpermissive spheroplasts by t5 and bf23 bacteriophage dna carrying amber mutations in dna transfer genes	Sphaeroplast transfection d' Escherichia coli vi transfection of non-permissive spheroplasts by bacteriophages t5 and bf23 carrying amber mutations in DNA transfer genes.
10	a new method for the isolation of methionyl transfer rna synthetase mutants from escherichia coli	A novel method to isolate methionyl transfer rna synthetase mutants from l' escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal location of mutations affecting the regualtion of biotin synthesis in escherichia coli	Chromosomal localization of mutations affecting the biotin synthesis pattern in escherichia coli.
10	effect of l azetidine 2 carboxylic acid on growth and proline metabolism in escherichia coli	The effect of lazetidine 2 carboxylic acid on proline growth and metabolism in escherichia coli.
10	inducibility of beta glucuronidase in wild type and hexuronate negative mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The indutibility of beta glucuronidase in the wild-type and hexuronate-negative mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 is confirmed.
10	selection procedure for mutants defective in the beta methylgalactoside transport system of escherichia coli utilizing the compound 2r glyceryl beta d galactopyranoside	Screening method for defective mutants in the beta transport system-methylgalactosides d' escherichia coli using 2r glyceryl beta d galactopyranoside.
10	changes in the biochemical properties of shigella flexneri la as a result of recombination with escherichia coli k12	Changes in the biochemical properties of shigella flexneri resulting from recombination with escherichia coli k12.
10	mutations affecting aromatic amino acid transport in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Aromatic amino acid transport mutations in escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	r factor tetracycline and chloramphenicol resistance in escherichia coli k12 cmlb mutants	Tetracycline and chloramphenicol resistance in escherichia coli k12 cmlb mutants.
10	genes involved in the uptake and catabolism of gluconate by escherichia coli	The genes involved in the absorption and the catabolism of gluconate by escherichia coli.
10	effect of inorganic phosphate on acridine inhibition and plasmid curing in escherichia coli	Effect of inorganic phosphate on apos; acridine inhibition; plasmid cure in escherichia coli.
10	mutagenesis by nitrosoguanidine ethyl methanesulfonate and mutator gene muth in continuous cultures of escherichia coli	Mutagenesis of nitrosoguanidine ethyl methanesulfonate and mutator gene mutagenesis in continuous cultures of escherichia coli.
10	use of repair deficient strains of escherichia coli and liver microsomes to detect and characterise dna damage caused by pyrrolizidine alkaloids heliotrine and monocrotaline	Use of repair-deficient strains of d&apos, escherichia coli, and liver microsomes to detect and characterize DNA damage caused by pyrrolizidine alkaloids, l&apos, heliotrin, and monocrotaline.
10	mutation and dna replication in escherichia coli treated with low concentrations of n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine	DNA mutation and replication in Escherichia coli treated with low concentrations of n-methyl n-nitro-n-nitrosoguanidine.
10	ultraviolet light induced responses of an mfd mutant of escherichia coli b r having a slow rate of dimer excision	Ultraviolet light induced the responses of a mfd dapos mutant; escherichia coli with a slow rate of dimer excision.
10	regulation of early mrna synthesis after bacteriophage t4 infection of escherichia coli	Regulation of early mrna synthesis after infection with bacteriophage t4 d' escherichia coli.
10	studies on the de novo biosynthesis of nad in escherichia coli the separation of the nadb gene product from the nada gene product and its purification	Studies of de novo nad biosynthesis in escherichia coli, separation of nadb gene product from nada gene product and purification.
10	f factor mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 synthesis of rna and protein in t7 infected escherichia coli f and f cells	F-factor-mediated restriction of the synthesis of rna and bacteriophage t7 proteins in t7-infected f&f cells; escherichia coli.
10	f factor mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 protein synthesis in cell free systems from t7 infected escherichia coli f and f cells	The f-factor-mediated restriction of bacteriophage protein t7 synthesis in the cell-free systems of f- and f- infected cells; escherichia coli.
10	experimental escherichia coli urinary infection in the rat	An experimental urinary tract infection with Escherichia coli in the rat.
10	comparative analysis of deletion and base change mutabilities of escherichia coli b strains differing in dna repair capacity wild type uvra pola reca by various mutagens	Comparative analysis of the deletion and base-change mutability of dapos; escherichia coli b strains with DNA repair capacity different from that of apos; uvra wild-type by various mutagens.
10	isolation and characteristics of uv resistant revertants of reca strains of escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characterization of re-tolerant strains of Escherichia coli and Escherichia coli.
10	endonucleolytic incision of x irradiated deoxyribonucleic acid by extracts of escherichia coli	Endonucleolytic incision of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) x irradiated with extracts of apos; escherichia coli.
10	dna synthesis involving a complexes form of dna polymerase i in extracts of escherichia coli	Synthesis of DNA involving a complex form of DNA; DNA polymerase i in extracts from plants; escherichia coli.
10	permeability lesions in male escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t7	The permeability lesion in a male escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t7.
10	elevated mutability of pola derivatives of escherichia coli b r at sublethal doses of ultraviolet light evidence for an inducible error prone repair system sos repair and its anomalous expression in these strains	Increased mutability of polar derivatives of escherichia coli at sublethal doses of ultraviolet light demonstrates the existence of apos, an inducible and error-prone repair system, and its abnormal expression in these strains.
10	model for regulation of escherichia coli dna repair functions	Model for the regulation of spinal cord repair functions; d*apos DNA; escherichia coli.
10	transport properties of merodiploids covering the daga locus in escherichia coli k 12	Merodiploid transport properties covering daga locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	suppression of spectinomycin resistance in a mutant of escherichia coli k 12	The suppression of spectinomycin resistance in a d' escherichia coli k12, mutant was performed.
10	genetic characterization of the metk locus in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic characterization of metk locus in escherichia coli k.
10	specialized peptide transport system in escherichia coli	A specialized peptide transport system for escherichia coli.
10	multiplicity of oligopeptide transport systems in escherichia coli	Multiple oligopeptide transport systems in escherichia coli.
10	d alanine requiring cell wall mutant of escherichia coli	D alanine, requiring a cell wall mutant of escherichia coli.
10	derivation of glycine from threonine in escherichia coli k 12 mutants	Derivation of glycine from threonine in the threonine mutants k 12 d' escherichia coli.
10	relationship between chromosome replication and cell division in a thymineless mutant of escherichia coli b r	Relationships between chromosomal replication and cell division in a mutant without thymine d' escherichia coli b r.
10	transport of l 4 azaleucine in escherichia coli	Transport of azaleucine 4 into the intestine; escherichia coli.
10	utilization of selected leucine peptide amides by escherichia coli	Use of selected escherichia coli leucine peptide amides.
10	regulation of the lysine biosynthetic pathway in escherichia coli k 12 isolation of a cis dominant constitutive mutant for ak iii synthesis	Regulation of lysine biosynthetic pathway in escherichia coli k 12, isolation from d' a dominant constitutive mutant for ak iii synthesis.
10	induction of lactose transport in escherichia coli during the absence of phospholipid synthesis	Induction of lactose transport in escherichia coli during ouapos; lack of phospholipid synthesis.
10	mating aggregates in escherichia coli conjugation	Aggregates of plants; mating in conjugation of plants; Escherichia coli.
10	genes for ribitol and d arabitol catabolism in escherichia coli their loci in c strains and absence in k 12 and b strains	The genes responsible for the catabolism of ribitol and d arabitol in escherichia coli are their loci in c strains and their absence in k12 and b strains.
10	intrinsic and extrinsic light responses of salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli	Intrinsic and extrinsic reactions in the light of Salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli.
10	enhanced level and metabolic regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in different strains of escherichia coli k 12	Increased rate and metabolic regulation of methionyltransfer of l' ribonucleic acid synthetase in different d&apos strains; escherichia coli k12.
10	unusual sensitivity of escherichia coli to adenine or adenine plus histidine	Unusual sensitivity to apos; Escherichia coli to apos; adenine or apos; adenine plus histidine.
10	effect of tsl mutations on col e1 expression in a reca strain of escherichia coli k 12	Effect of mutation on colon; cervix expression in recipient strain; escherichia coli k 12 of receipt.
10	evidence for binding protein independent substrate translocation by the methylgalactoside transport system of escherichia coli k12	Evidence of a substrate translocation independent of the binding protein by the apo-methylgalactoside transport system; escherichia coli k12.
10	production and biological properties of l like mutants 11r of escherichia coli	Production and biological properties of similar mutants 11r d' escherichia coli.
10	effect of different mutations in ribosomal protein s5 of escherichia coli on translational fidelity	Effect of different mutations in the ribosomal protein s5 d' escherichia coli on the accuracy of translation.
10	distribution in nature of r factors that increase susceptibility to rifampin of rif r mutants in escherichia coli	Distribution of r factors that increase rifampin susceptibility of r mutants in escherichia coli.
10	genetical studies of serum resistance in escherichia coli	A genetic study of serum resistance in Escherichia coli.
10	integration at hag or elsewhere of h2 phase 2 flagellin genes transduced from salmonella to escherichia coli	Integration at the level of the witch or elsewhere of the phase 2 h2 flagellin genes transcribed from Salmonella to Escherichia coli.
10	effect of some aminoglycosides upon a drug dependent escherichia coli strain	Effect of certain aminoglycosides on a drug-dependent Escherichia coli (E. coli) strain.
10	studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides relationship between the synthesis of deoxyribonucleic acid and the thymidine triphosphate pool in escherichia coli k12	Studies of the relationship between the nucleotides of intracellular thymidine and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and the thymidine triphosphate pool in escherichia coli k12.
10	plasmid incompatibility and control of replication copy mutants of the r factor r1 in escherichia coli k 12	Plasmid incompatibility and control of replication of mutant copies of r1 in 12 mutants of escherichia coli k.
10	further characterization of a non essential mutator gene in escherichia coli k 12	Further characterization of a mutant gene not essential in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	relationship between the tonb locus and iron transport in escherichia coli	Relationship between tonb-locus and iron transport in escherichia coli.
10	isolation characterization and mapping of escherichia coli mutants blocked in the synthesis of ornithine decarboxylase	Characterization and mapping of mutants of d' escherichia coli blocked in the synthesis of l' ornithine decarboxylase.
10	tryptophan synthetase alpha 5 7 s novel molecular species formed within escherichia coli	Tryptophan synthetase alpha 5 s provides new molecular species in escherichia coli.
10	identification of the dicyclohexylcarbodiimide reactive protein component of the adenosine 5 triphosphate energy transducing system of escherichia coli	Identification of the reactive protein to dicyclohexylcarbodiimide in the transduction system of l' energy triphosphate of l' adenosine 5 in escherichia coli.
10	interaction of p2 bacteriophage with the dnab gene of escherichia coli	Interaction of the bacteriophage p2 with the Escherichia coli dnab gene.
10	genetic control of multiple pathways of post replicational repair in uvrb strains of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mastery of multiple post-repeat repair pathways in uvr d&apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 in uvrb strains.
10	sucrose dependent spectinomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Mutants of sucrose-dependent spectinomycin-resistant Escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii activity in an escherichia coli mutator strain	Deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii active in a mutant strain of apos; escherichia coli.
10	excision of pyrimidine dimers in toluene treated escherichia coli	L' excision of pyrimidine dimers in the toluene-treated escherichia coli.
10	cis dominant transfer deficient mutants of the escherichia coli k 12 f sex factor	Dominant sexually transfer-deficient cis mutants k 12 f of l' escherichia coli.
10	isolation of escherichia coli k 12 mutants with altered level of beta n acetylglucosaminidase	Isolate mutants k 12 d' escherichia coli with altered beta levels of acetylglucosaminidase.
10	increased loss of duplicated genes in streptomycin resistant stra mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Increased loss of duplicated genes in streptomycin-resistant stratiform mutants d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic study of escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to 2 6 diaminopurine	Genetic study of mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 resistant to 26 diaminopurine.
10	a further study of the nature of phenotypical reversions in thymidine phosphorylase deletion mutants of escherichia coli k 12	A further study of the nature of phenotypic reversions in deletion mutants of thymidine phosphorylase from l' escherichia coli k 12 was carried out.
10	coupling of rates of transcription translation and messenger ribonucleic acid degradation in streptomycin dependent mutants of escherichia coli	Determination of a transcriptional and messenger ribonucleic acid degradation in streptomycin-dependent mutants of escherichia coli.
10	nature of the energy requirement for the irreversible adsorption of bacteriophages t1 and phi80 to escherichia coli	Nature of pH; energy required for pH; irreversible adsorption of bacteriophages t1 and phi80 to Escherichia coli.
10	coordinated alterations in ribosomes and cytoplasmic membrane in sucrose dependent spectinomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Coordinated alterations of ribosomes and cytoplasmic membranes were observed in spectinomycin-resistant sucrose-dependent d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	suppressor induced structural changes in a missense l ribulokinase of escherichia coli	The suppressor induced structural changes in an escherichia coli l missense ribulokinase.
10	effect of enrichment procedure upon auxotroph recovery in escherichia coli k 12	Effect of the procedure; enrichment on recovery of desotrophic escherichia coli.
10	reca dependent inactivation of the lambda repressor in escherichia coli lysogens by gamma radiation and by tif expression	Reca-dependent inactivation of lambda repressor in apos lysogens; escherichia coli in apos lysogens by gamma radiation and tif expression.
10	is1 and is2 mutations in the ribosomal protein genes of e coli k 12	Est1 and est2 mutations in the ribosomal protein genes of k 12 k e coli.
10	alteration of ribosomal proteins in revertants of a valyl trna synthetase mutant of escherichia coli	Modification of ribosomal proteins in dapos revertants; a valyl trna synthetase dapos mutant; escherichia coli.
10	analysis of ribosomal proteins in streptomycin resistant and dependent mutants isolated from streptomycin independent escherichia coli strains	L' ribosomal protein analysis of streptomycin dependent and resistant mutants isolated from streptomycin-in-independent d' escherichia coli strains.
10	cooperative control of translation fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli i properties of ribosomal mutants whose resistance to neamine is the cumulative effect of two distinct mutations	Cooperative monitoring of translational fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli i properties of l-resistant ribosomal mutants; cumulative effect of two distinct mutations.
10	non enzymatic translocation in ribosomes from streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Non-enzymatic transfer in the ribosomes of streptomycin-resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	phileomycin induced lethality and dna degradation in escherichia coli k12	Phileomycin induced lethality and degradation of DNA in escherichia coli k12.
10	strains of escherichia coli diploid for the chromosomal origin of dna replication	Diploid strains of Escherichia coli for apo- and progenitor cells; chromosomal origin of apo-replication; DNA.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli auxotrophic for organic phosphates evidence for two defects in inorganic phosphate transport	A mutant d' escherichia coli auxotroph for organic phosphates demonstrates the existence of two defects in inorganic phosphate transport.
10	induction of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli	Induction of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	infectivity of different forms of lambda bacteriophage dna in transfection of calcinated escherichia coli	Infectivity of different forms of the bacteriophage in the transfection of calcined escherichia coli.
10	the regulation of transcription in bacteriophage t5 infected escherichia coli	Transcriptional regulation in bacteriophage t5 infected escherichia coli.
10	overproduction of lysine by mutant strains of escherichia coli with defective lysine transport systems	Lysine overproduction by mutant strains of d'apos; escherichia coli with defective lysine transport systems.
10	mutations in escherichia coli that relieve catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis mutations distant from the tryptophanase gene	Mutations in Escherichia coli that suppress catabolite repression of mutations in the tryptophanase synthesis remotely from the tryptophanase gene.
10	mutations in escherichia coli that relieve catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis tryptophanase promoter like mutations	Mutations in Escherichia coli that suppress catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis promoter, such as mutations similar to mutations.
10	energy requirements for biosynthesis of dna in escherichia coli role of membrane bound energy transducing atpase coupling factor	The energetic requirements for biosynthesis of apos; DNA in apos; escherichia coli play the role of the coupling factor of apos; transducer atpase of apos; membrane energy in apos; escherichia coli.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 vii purification of the soluble atpase of supernatant extracts and kinetics of incorporation into reconstituted particles	Membrane reconstruction in chlos mutants; escherichia coli bacteriophage 12 vii purification of apos; soluble apos apase; supernatant and kinetic extracts of apos; incorporation into reconstituted particles.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 viii purification and properties of the fa factor the product of the chl b gene	Membrane reconstruction in chl r mutants of purification of escherichia coli k 12 viii and properties of factor fa, the product of gene chl b.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 ix part played by phospholipids in the complementation process	Membrane reconstitution in the chl r mutants d' escherichia coli k 12 ix plays a role in the process of phospholipid complementation.
10	the maintenance of the energized membrane state and its relation to active transport in escherichia coli	Maintenance of membrane tension and its relation to active transport in escherichia coli.
10	synthesis of heteropolyribonucleotides by toluene treated escherichia coli cells	Toluene-treated heteropolyribonucleotide synthesis of escherichia coli.
10	transcription termination factor rho activity is altered in escherichia coli with sua gene mutations	L' rho transcription termination factor activity is altered in escherichia coli with mutations of the sua gene.
10	progress in the resolution of the cytoplasmic membrane dna initiation complex of escherichia coli	Progress in resolving apo complex; initiation of apo; cytoplasmic membrane DNA of apo; escherichia coli.
10	mechanism of growth delay induced in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet radiation	The mechanisms of growth retardation induced in escherichia coli by near-ultraviolet radiation.
10	chemostat culture of escherichia coli k 12 limited by the activity of alkaline phosphatase	Chemostat culture of escherichia coli k 12 is limited by alkaline phosphatase activity.
10	transience of the donor state in an escherichia coli k12 strain carrying a repressed r factor	The donor state of an Escherichia coli k12 strain carrying apos; a repressed factor.
10	dna degradation in minicells of escherichia coli k 12 ii effect of reca1 and recb21 mutations on dna degradation in minicells and detection of exonuclease v activity	Cell degradation; DNA in minicells; Escherichia coli k 12 effect of mutations reca1 and recb21 on cell degradation; DNA in minicells and detection of DNA; exonuclease activity v.
10	isolation and characterization of mutants with a feedback resistant n acetylglutamate synthase in escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characterization of mutants with retolerant acetylglutamate synthase activity in escherichia coli k 12; these mutants were isolated and characterized.
10	transcriptional control of the isoleucine valine messenger rna s in e coli k 12	Transcriptional control of apos; isoleucine valine messenger rna s in 12 k coli.
10	escherichia coli mutants uvr d and uvr e deficient in gene conversion of lambda heteroduplexes	Evolutionary Escherichia coli uvr d and uvr defective in the gene conversion of lambda heteroduplexes.
10	induction of prophage lambda during the division cycle of escherichia coli	Induction of lambda prophage during the d' escherichia coli division cycle.
10	replication of phia and phix174 in escherichia coli mutants thermosensitive in dna synthesis	Replication of phia and phix174 in mutants of heat-sensitive apos; escherichia coli during DNA synthesis.
10	effects of some antibiotics on the stringent control of rna synthesis in escherichia coli	Effects of antibiotics on strict control of rna synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	polynucleotide phosphorylase can participate in decay of mrna in escherichia coli in the absence of ribonuclease ii	Polynucleotide phosphorylase may contribute to the decomposition of mrna in escherichia coli in the absence of the ribonuclease ii.
10	parameters of gene expression in the bipolar argecbh operon of e coli k12 the question of translational control	Gene expression in the bipolar e coli k12 arcbh operon, the question of translation control.
10	proteinchemical studies on ribosomal proteins s4 and s12 from ram ribosomal ambiguity mutants of escherichia coli	Protein-chemical studies of s4 and s12 ribosomal proteins from mutants of d' escherichia coli with ribosomal ambiguities.
10	chelocardin inducible resistance in escherichia coli bearing r plasmids	Chelocardin-induced resistance in escherichia coli carrying r-plasmid isolates.
10	phospholipids and atpase activity of wild type and atpase deficient and uncoupled mutants of e coli	Phospholipids and l' wild-type atpase activity; and atpase-deficient and uncoupled e coli mutants.
10	the mutagenic effect of pesticides on escherichia coli wp2 try	The mutagenic effect of pesticides on escherichia coli wp2 try.
10	comparison of mutagenic efficiency of decay of 32p incorporated in e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s cells	Comparison of l' mutagenic efficiency of 32p decay incorporated into e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s.
10	reversible inactivation of vectorial phosphorylation by hydroxybutynoate in escherichia coli membrane vesicles	Reversible inactivation of vector phosphorylation by etapos; hydroxybutynoate in the membrane vesicles of l' escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli stringent factor binds to ribosomes at a site different from that of elongation factor tu or g	The strict d&apos factor; Escherichia coli binds to ribosomes at a site different from that of the d&apos factor; elongation tu or g.
10	differentiation between mutants of escherichia coli k defective in oxidative phosphorylation	Differentiation between oxidative phosphorylation deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	dna synthesis in vitro in lysates of escherichia coli	In vitro synthesis of apos; DNA in apos lysates; escherichia coli.
10	inducible gluconate permease in a gluconate kinase deficient mutant of escherichia coli	Incubable gluconate permease in a mutant d'apos; gluconate kinase-deficient escherichia coli.
10	isolation and properties of escherichia coli atpase mutants with altered divalent metal specificity for atp hydrolysis	Isolation and properties of apos mutants; apos atpase; escherichia coli with modified divalent metal specificity during apos; hydrolysis of apos; atp.
10	very stable prokaryotic messenger rna in chromosomeless escherichia coli minicells	Rna, a very stable procaryotic messenger, in chromosomal minicells of Apos; escherichia coli.
10	bidirectional replication of plasmid r6k dna in escherichia coli correspondence between origin of replication and position of single strand break in relaxed complex	Bi-directional replication of apos; plasmid DNA r6k in the correspondence of apos; Escherichia coli between apos; origin of replication and position of breakage of apos; single strand in relaxed complex.
10	lipoic acid content of escherichia coli and other microorganisms	Lipoic acid content of apo, escherichia coli and other microorganisms.
10	soluble tri and dipeptidases in escherichia coli k 12	Salmonella sifting and soluble dipeptidases; Escherichia coli k 12.
10	a 30 s precursor of 30 s ribosomes in a mutant of escherichia coli	A 30-s precursor of 30-s ribosomes in a d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	isolation and characterization of a bacteriophage infective for a udp galactose 4 epimeraseless mutant of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of an infectious bacteriophage for an epimer-free mutant, E. coli.
10	repair of heat injury in thymine auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Repair of heat damage to thymine auxotrophs; d' Escherichia coli.
10	relationship between ppgpp levels and rates of protein and rna synthesis in escherichia coli	Relationship between ppgpp levels and protein and rna synthesis rates in escherichia coli.
10	the influence of differences in the rec genotype of e coli cells on the function of sex factor f	L' influence of differences in rec genotype of e coli cells on sex factor function f f.
10	effects of rifampicin on synthesis and functional activity of dna dependent rna polymerase in escherichia coli	Effects of rifampicin on synthesis and apos; functional activity of apos-dependent rna polymerase; DNA in escherichia coli.
10	expression of the plasmid pkm101 determined dna repair system in reca and lex strains of escherichia coli	L' plasmid expression pkm101 determined the repair system of l' DNA in reca and lex d' escherichia coli strains.
10	the influence of mutations upon the synthesis of rna polymerase subunits in escherichia coli cells	It is not possible to predict the effects of a mutation on the synthesis of rna polymerase.
10	formaldehyde induced dna protein crosslinks in escherichia coli	Formaldehyde induced cross-linking of biosome proteins; DNA in escherichia coli.
10	partial suppression of the lexa phenotype by mutations rnm which restore ultraviolet resistance but not ultraviolet mutability to escherichia coli b r uvr a lexa	Partial deletion of phenotype by rnm mutations which restore resistance to ultraviolet but not ultraviolet; ultraviolet; ultraviolet; escherichia coli b rvr a lexa.
10	reversion induction in phage t4 mutants in escherichia coli strains with defective rna polymerase	Phage t4 mutants of d&apos strains; escherichia coli with defective rna polymerase induced reversion.
10	processing of the 17 s escherichia coli precursor rna in the 27 s pre ribosomal particle	Treatment of the 17-s delay precursor; escherichia coli in the 27-s pre-ribosomal particle.
10	carcinogen induced dna repair in nucleotide permeable escherichia coli cells analysis of dna repair induced by the carcinogens n acetoxy n 2 acetylaminofluorene and 7 bromomethyl benz a anthracene	Apo repair; carcinogen-induced DNA in apo cells; nucleotide permeable escherichia coli, repair of apo; acetoxy carcinogen-induced DNA n 2 acetylaminofluorene and 7 anthracene bromomethyl benz.
10	the major proteins of the escherichia coli outer cell envelope membrane heterogeneity of protein i	The major proteins of protein i in apos; outer cell envelope of apos; escherichia coli are heterogeneous.
10	purification by immunoadsorbtion chromatography of the normal and a mutant form of the b2 subunit of escherichia coli tryptophan synthase	Purification by chromatography of normal and d*apos, a mutant form of tryptophan synthase sub-unit b2 d*apos, and escherichia coli.
10	an inhibitory effect of thymidine on its own conversion to nucleotide in escherichia coli	An inhibitory effect of thymidine on its own nucleotide conversion in escherichia coli.
10	preparation of enterochelin from escherichia coli	Preparation of the apos; enterocelin from apos; escherichia coli.
10	hydrogen donor system for escherichia coli ribonucleoside diphosphate reductase dependent upon glutathione	Donor system for glutathione-dependent hydrogen; escherichia coli ribonucleoside diphosphate reductase.
10	elimination of lethal and pre mutational dna lesions during the photoreactivation of uv irradiated escherichia coli	Elimination of lethal and pre-fatal lesions; DNA during photoreactivation; irradiated escherichia coli; uv.
10	cross resistance of escherichia coli b r to cis platinum ii diamminochloride uv light and alkylating agents	Cross-resistance to cis-platinum diamminochloride; escherichia coli b r to the ultraviolet (UV) light and alkylating agents.
10	properties of a mutant of streptococcus mutans altered in glucosyltransferase activity	The properties of a mutant streptococcus mutans altered glucosyltransferase activity.
10	threonine deaminase from a nonsense mutant of escherichia coli requiring isoleucine or pyridoxine evidence for half of the sites reactivity	Threonine deaminase d' a mutant not-sense d' Escherichia coli requires data on apos; isoleucine or pyridoxine for half the reactive sites.
10	biosynthesis of membrane bound nitrate reductase in escherichia coli evidence for a soluble precursor	Membrane-bound nitrate reductase biosynthesis in escherichia coli demonstrates the existence of a soluble precursor.
10	escherichia coli mutants altered in murein lipoprotein	D&apos mutants; altered escherichia coli in murine lipoprotein.
10	mode of insertion of lipopolysaccharide into the outer membrane of escherichia coli	Procedure; lipopolysaccharide insertion into the outer membrane of d' escherichia coli.
10	threonine deaminase from escherichia coli feedback hypersensitive enzyme from a genetic regulatory mutant	Threonine deaminase de l'apos; escherichia coli is a feedback hypersensitive enzyme from apos, a genetic regulatory mutant.
10	siderophore protection against colicins m b v and ia in escherichia coli	Protection of siderophores against colicines m b v and ia in Escherichia coli.
10	mapping of two loci affecting the regulation of branched chain amino acid transport in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of two regulatory loci of branched chain amino acid transport in escherichia coli k 12.
10	characterization of an escherichia coli k 12 f con mutant	Characterization of a mutant of escherichia coli k 12 f con.
10	effect of colicin k on a membrane associated energy linked function	Effect of colicin k on cellular function; membrane energy.
10	methyl methane sulfonate sensitive mutant of escherichia coli deficient in an endonuclease specific for apurinic sites in deoxyribonucleic acid	Methylmethan sulfonate sensitive mutant; endonuclease-deficient escherichia coli specific to apurinic sites in the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	chea cheb and chec genes of escherichia coli and their role in chemotaxis	Cheques chea and the genes of l' escherichia coli and their role in chemotaxis.
10	role of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases and deoxyribonucleic acid ligase in x ray induced repair synthesis in toluene treated escherichia coli k 12	The role of deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, and deoxyribonucleic acid in X-rays induced a restorative synthesis in toluene-treated escherichia coli k12.
10	thymidine uptake and utilization in escherichia coli a new gene controlling nucleoside transport	Absorption and apo; utilization of thymidine in escherichia coli, a novel gene controlling nucleoside transport, were determined.
10	periplasmic protein related to the sn glycerol 3 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	A periplasmic protein linked to the glycerol transport system 3 phosphate d' escherichia coli.
10	in vivo methylation by escherichia coli k 12 mec deoxyribonucleic acid cytosine methylase protects against in vitro cleavage by the rii restriction endonuclease r eco rii	In vivo methylation with escherichia coli k 12 deoxyribonucleic acid cytosine methylase protects against in vitro cleavage by the restriction endonuclease rii r eco rii.
10	altered deoxyribonucleotide pools in p2 eductants of escherichia coli k 12 due to deletion of the dcd gene	Modification of pools of deoxyribonucleotides in p2 educators; escherichia coli k 12 due to deletion of dcd gene.
10	effects of antibodies to various molecular forms of a mutationally altered escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase on its activation by zinc	The effects of antibodies against various molecular forms of apos; a mutant-alpha phosphatase d'apos; escherichia coli on its zinc activation.
10	mu induced polarity in the escherichia coli k 12 ent gene cluster evidence for a gene entg involved in the biosynthesis of enterochelin	The mu-induced polarity in the gene cluster k 12 ent d' escherichia coli indicates the existence of apos; an entg gene involved in biosynthesis of apos; enterocelin.
10	role of the receptor for bacteriophage lambda in the functioning of the maltose chemoreceptor of escherichia coli	Role of the bacteriophage lambda receptor in the maltosis chemoreceptor function; and, Escherichia coli.
10	isolation of an escherichia coli mutant deficient in glutathione synthesis	Isolate a mutant of etapos; escherichia coli defective in the synthesis of glutathione.
10	operator promoter functions in the threonine operon of escherichia coli	The promoter of the drug is the operator of the drug, working in the threonine operon of the drug.
10	syntheses of elongation factors tu and g are under stringent control in escherichia coli	The syntheses of the elongation and elongation factors are strictly controlled in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of succinate utilization in enzyme i mutants of the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in escherichia coli	L' genetic analysis of apos; succinate utilization in apos mutants; enzyme i from the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in escherichia coli.
10	genetic mapping of a mutation that causes ribonucleases iii deficiency in escherichia coli	DNA mapping of ribonuclease deficient mutation iii in escherichia coli.
10	co2 production from galactose in galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase deficient escherichia coli	Co2 production from galactose in escherichia coli-deficient galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase.
10	recipient ability of bacteriophage resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Ability to receive bacteriophage-resistant mutants of escherichia coli k-12.
10	bacteriophage mu 1 induced permeability mutants in escherichia coli k 12	Mu 1 bacteriophage induced permeability mutants in 12 mutants of Escherichia coli k.
10	transductional mapping of gene trma responsible for the production of 5 methyluridine in transfer ribonucleic acid of escherichia coli	Transductional mapping of the trma gene(s) responsible for the production of 5 methyluridine in apos; d&apos transfer ribonucleic acid; escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis phenotypic suppression of sn glycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase km mutants by loss of feedback inhibition of the biosynthetic sn glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Mutants of d' escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis phenotypically suppress snyltransferase 3 glycerol mutants km by loss of biosynthetic glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase feedback inhibition.
10	the in vitro translation of a terminating signal by a single escherichia coli ribosome the fate of the subunits	In vitro translation of apos; termination signal by a single ribosome d' escherichia coli as to the fate of the sub @-@units.
10	biochemical genetics of chinese hamster cell mutants with deviant purine metabolism biochemical analysis of eight mutants	Biochemical genetics of Chinese hamster cell mutants with biochemical analysis of the purine-deviant metabolism of eight hamster cell mutants.
10	r factor mediated resistance to ultraviolet light in strains of escherichia coli deficient in known repair functions	Resistance to ultraviolet light was mediated by the r factor in strains of d' escherichia coli deficient in known repair functions.
10	variants of escherichia coli giving the appearance of mixed growths in urine	Variants of apos; escherichia coli yielding apos; appearance of mixed growth in urine.
10	adp ribosylation of dna dependent rna polymerase of escherichia coli by an nad protein adp ribosyltransferase from bacteriophage t4	Adp ribosylation of apos rna-dependent DNA; d' escherichia coli by nad protein adp ribosyltransferase from bacteriophage t4.
10	studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides thymineless death and the recovery after re addition of thymine in escherichia coli k 12	Intracellular thymidine nucleotide studies of thymine-free death and thymine re-addition recovery in escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of escherichia coli k10 aminoendopeptidase synthesis effects of mutations involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase	Effects of regulation of synthesis of apos; amino endopeptidase k10 d' escherichia coli on mutations involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase.
10	biosynthesis of a specific lipoprotein of the escherichia coli outer membrane on polyribosomes	Biosynthesis of apos; a specific lipoprotein from apos' outer membrane; and escherichia coli on polyribosomes.
10	the escherichia coli uv endonuclease correndonuclease ii	The Escherichia coli endonuclease ii.
10	involvement of escherichia coli dna polymerase i associated 5 in equilibrium 3 exonuclease in excision repair of uv damaged dna	Lapses; involvement of polymerase chain reaction (PCR); DNA; Escherichia coli associated with 5 in apos; exonuclease of apos; balance 3 in repair; excision of apos; DNA damaged by apos; u.
10	exonuclease vii of escherichia coli	Exonuclease (exonuclease) vii dapos; escherichia coli.
10	repair replication in permeabilized escherichia coli	Replication repair in permeabilized escherichia coli.
10	ultraviolet light induced incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine into parental dna of an excision defective mutant of escherichia coli	Ultraviolet light induces the incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine into the DNA of parents; a mutant defective in excision of escherichia coli.
10	distribution of pyrimidine dimers during postreplication repair in uv irradiated excision deficient cells of escherichia coli k12	"""Distribution of pyrimidine dimers during post-replication repair in uv irradiated excision deficient cells of escherichia coli k12,"" Am."
10	postreplication repair gap filling in an escherichia coli strain deficient in dnab gene product	After replication, the repair space fills a strain of Escherichia coli deficient in dnab gene product.
10	the role of dna polymerase i in genetic recombination and viability of escherichia coli	The role of DNA polymerase in the genetic recombination and viability of escherichia coli.
10	the role of the rec genes in the viability of escherichia coli k12	The role rec genes play in the viability of escherichia coli k12.
10	dna repair in dna polymerase deficient mutants of escherichia coli	DNA repair in DNA-deficient mutants of Escherichia coli.
10	maltose transport in escherichia coli k12 a comparison of transport kinetics in wild type and lambda resistant mutants as measured by fluorescence quenching	Maltosis transport in escherichia coli k12, a comparison of the transport kinetics of Lambda- and wild-type resistant mutants as measured by fluorescence extinction.
10	isolation and genetic characterization of the nita mutants of escherichia coli affecting the termination factor rho	Genetic isolation and characterization of the nita d' escherichia coli mutants affecting rho-termination factor.
10	isolation of rec mutants from an f prime merodiploid strain of escherichia coli k 12	Isolate the recovered mutants; a merodiploid strain f prime d'apos; escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	rna polymerase mutants of escherichia coli iii a temperature sensitive rifampicin resistant mutant	Mutants rna polymerase d' escherichia coli iii, a heat-sensitive rifampicin-resistant mutant.
10	expression of a valine resistant acetolactate synthase activity mediated by the ilv o and ilv g genes of escherichia coli k 12	The expression of valine-resistant acetolactate synthase activity mediated by the valine- and valine-mediated genes; escherichia coli k.
10	radiation sensitivity of a mutant of escherichia coli k 12 associated with dna replication evidence for a new repair function	The radiosensitivity of a mutant of escherichia coli k12 associated with the replication of DNA demonstrates the existence of a new repair function.
10	r factor mediated tetracycline resistance in escherichia coli k12 dominance of some tetracycline sensitive mutants and relief of dominance by deletion	The r factor mediated tetracycline resistance in escherichia coli k12, dominance of some tetracycline-sensitive mutants, and deletion relief of dominance.
10	intracellular distribution of 8 14c puromycin aminonucleoside in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli	Intracellular distribution of apos; puromycin aminonucleoside 8c in the apos; escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet.
10	fate of thymine containing dimers in the deoxyribonucleic acid of ultraviolet irradiated mutator t1 escherichia coli transductants	Pathway of thymine-containing dimers in apos; deoxyribonucleic acid of ultraviolet-irradiated t1 transducers; escherichia coli.
10	intragenic complementation by gene 42 amber mutations of bacteriophage t4	Intragenic amber mutation complementation of bacteriophage t4 gene 42.
10	phospholipase activity in bacteriophage infected escherichia coli iii phopholipase a involvement in lysis of t4 infected cells	L' bacteriophage-infected phospholipase activity; escherichia coli iii phopholipase is implicated in the lysis of t4-infected cells.
10	an amber suppressor of escherichia coli strain ko1	A suppressor for the ko1 d' escherichia coli strain.
10	synthesis of ribosomal proteins l7l12 in relaxed and stringent strains of escherichia coli	Ribosomal protein synthesis in relaxed and severe strains of escherichia coli.
10	in vitro synthesis and repression of argininosuccinase in escherichia coli k12 partial purification of the arginine repressor	In vitro synthesis and repression of apos; argininosuccinase in the apos; escherichia coli k12 partial purification of the repressor of the apos; arginine.
10	a yeast mutant defective in the processing of 27s r rna precursor	A yeast mutant defective in 27s rna precursor rna treatment.
10	cooperative control of translational fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli iii a ram mutation in the structural gene for protein s5 rpx e	Co-operative monitoring of translational fidelity by ribosomal proteins in a ram mutation in the structural gene of s5 rpx e protein in escherichia coli iii.
10	conjugation in escherichia coli a study of recombination and the fate of donor dna at the level of the zygote	Conjugation in escherichia coli a study of recombination and fate of donor DNA at the zygote level.
10	the regulatory nature of the phob gene for alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	The phobic regulatory nature of the gene for alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	a new gene for ribosomal restriction in escherichia coli	This is a novel gene for ribosomal restriction in escherichia coli.
10	tetracycline sensitive mutants of the f like r factors r100 and r100 1	Tetracycline-sensitive mutants of similar r100 and r100 1 to f.
10	regulation of enzyme formation in klebsiella aerogenes by episomal glutamine synthetase of escherichia coli	The regulation of the formation of l' enzyme in klebsiella aerogenes by episomal d' escherichia coli glutamine synthetase.
10	characterization of group b colicin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12 colicin resistance and the role of enterochelin	Characterization of mutants of l' colicin-resistant escherichia coli k12 of group b and the role of l' enterocelin.
10	isolation and genetic characterizaion of escherichia coli k 12 mutations affecting bacteriophage t5 restriction by the colib plasmid	Isolation and genetic characterization of mutations in escherichia coli k 12 affecting the restriction of bacteriophage t5 by colib plasmid.
10	relationship between the transport of iron and the amount of specific colicin ia membrane receptors in escherichia coli	Relationship between iron transport and the amount of colicin ia-specific membrane receptors in escherichia coli.
10	repression of escherichia coli carbamoylphosphate synthase relationships with enzyme synthesis in the arginine and pyrimidine pathways	Repression of carbamoylphosphate synthase relationships between d' escherichia coli and enzyme synthesis in the pathways of estos; arginine and pyrimidine.
10	isolation and characterization of t even ghost tolerant mutants of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of phantom-tolerant mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	regulation of beta glucuronidase synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 pleiotropic constitutive mutations affecting uxu and uida expression	Regulation of beta glucuronidase synthesis in eucalyptus; escherichia coli k 12 pleiotropic constitutive mutations affecting eucalyptus; eucalyptus and uida expression.
10	r factor mediated polarized chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli c	R-factor promoted polarized chromosome transfer in escherichia coli c.
10	comparative study of r1 specific chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli k 12 and salmonella typhimurium lt2	Comparative study of r1-specific chromosome transfer in escherichia coli k12 and Salmonella typhimurium lt2.
10	control of the synthesis of alkaline phosphatase and the phosphate binding protein in escherichia coli	Control of alkaline phosphatase and phosphate binding protein synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	isolation by tetracycline selection of small plasmids derived from r factor r12 in escherichia coli k 12	Isolation by tetracycline selection of small r12-derived plasmids from escherichia coli k 12 has been carried out.
10	co regulation of the phosphate binding protein and alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	Co-regulation of the phosphate binding protein and synthesis of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli.
10	phosphatidylserine synthetase mutants of escherichia coli genetic mapping and membrane phospholipid composition	Phosphatidylserine synthetase mutants of the apos; escherichia coli gene map and membrane phospholipid composition.
10	a timing control of cell division in escherichia coli	A study of the time course of cell division in the Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and partial characterization of an escherichia coli mutant resistant to colicin a	Isolation and partial characterization of a mutant of colicin-resistant Escherichia coli a.
10	fragments of beta galactosidase from escherichia coli fragmentation purification characterization and in vitro complementation	Characterization and in vitro complementation of beta galactosidase from escherichia coli.
10	mutagenic dna repair in escherichia coli conditions for error free filling of daughter strand gaps	Mutagenic repair of proteins; DNA under laboratory conditions; escherichia coli to unambiguously fill open spaces in strands.
10	mutants of escherichia coli which block head formation of lambda	Mutants of d' escherichia coli that block the formation of the head in lambda.
10	biochemical and genetic characterization of a carbamyl phosphate synthetase mutant of escherichia coli k12	Biochemical and genetic characterization of a mutant of the carbamyl phosphate synthetase d'apos; escherichia coli k12 mutant.
10	in vitro synthesis of enzymes of the tryptophan operon of escherichia coli	In vitro synthesis of apo; apo enzymes; tryptophan operon; and escherichia coli.
10	the nature of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli	The nature of the mutation is the same as that of the mutation.
10	mechanism of reversion of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli	Mechanism of reversion of gal3 mutation of escherichia coli.
10	the nature of the product of the cys b gene of escherichia coli	The nature of the cys b gene product from Escherichia coli.
10	unaltered stability of newly synthesized rna in strains of escherichia coli missing a ribonuclease specific for double stranded rna	Unaltered stability of newly synthesized rna from dapos strains; escherichia coli in the absence of dapos; a double stranded rna specific ribonuclease.
10	two ribose 5 phosphate isomerases from escherichia coli k12 partial characterisation of the enzymes and consideration of their possible physiological roles	Two ribose 5 phosphate isomerases d' k12 escherichia coli partially characterizing the enzymes and considering their possible physiological roles.
10	altered synthesis and stability of rna polymerase holoenzyme subunits in mutants of escherichia coli with mutations in the beta or beta subunit genes	Modified synthesis and stability of the sub-holoenzyme units of rna polymerase in d&apos mutants; escherichia coli with mutations in the genes of beta or beta units.
10	expression of the guanine operon of escherichia coli as analyzed by bacteriophage lambda induced mutations	Expression of l' guanine operon d' escherichia coli as tested by mutations induced by lambda bacteriophage.
10	evidence that the gene uvrb is indispensable for a polymerase i deficient strain of escherichia coli k 12	Evidence that the uvrb gene is required for a polymerase deficient strain of escherichia coli k-12.
10	heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 deficient in up to three major outer membrane proteins	Heptose-deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 were found to be defective in up to three major outer membrane proteins.
10	mapping of the pola locus of escherichia coli k12 orientation in the amino and carboxy termini of the cistron	Mapping of the locus pola de l'apos; orientation k12 of l'apos; escherichia coli in the amino and carboxy ends of the cistron.
10	cole plasmid replication in dna polymerase i deficient strains of escherichia coli	Plasmide replication in DNA-deficient strains of Escherichia coli i.
10	characterization of a ts beta mutant rna polymerase of escherichia coli	Characterization of escherichia coli, a mutant polymerase chain reaction.
10	coumermycin a1 a preferential inhibitor of replicative dna synthesis in escherichia coli i in vivo characterization	Coumermycin a1, a preferential inhibitor of DNA replication synthesis in escherichia coli, was characterized in vivo.
10	polarity in segments of the escherichia coli trp operon with deleted intraoperonic translational initiation signals	Polarity in segments of the epos; operon trp d' escherichia coli with suppression of the signals d' initiation of intra-@ operonic translation.
10	new types of streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	New types of streptomycin-resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	role of lysyl trna in the regulation of lysine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k12	Role of lysyl trna in regulation of lysine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k12.
10	escherichia coli k12 mutant with increased rna content and messenger rna stability	Chloroform mutant k12 dapos; escherichia coli with increased rna content and increased rna-messenger stability.
10	rapid test for assay of ozone sensitivity in escherichia coli	Rapid sensitivity testing; ozone testing in escherichia coli.
10	lamb mutations in e coli k12 growth of lambda host range mutants and effect of nonsense suppressors	Mutations of plants; lamb in the e coli k12 growth of normal mutants in the host range and the effect of absurd suppressors.
10	evidence against autorepression of the betabeta operon in escherichia coli	Evidence against aposemia; self-repression of apos; betabeta operon in escherichia coli.
10	the absence of caffeine inhibition of post replication repair in excision deficient strains of escherichia coli b and k12	Failure; inhibition by caffeine of replication repair in excision-deficient d&apos strains; escherichia coli b and k12.
10	mutagenic dna repair in escherichia coli ii factors affecting loss of photoreversibility of uv induced mutations	Repair of apo; mutagenic DNA in escherichia coli ii factors affecting the loss of photoreversibility of apo-induced mutations; uv.
10	genetic analysis of mutants of escherichia coli defective in dicarboxylate transport	L' genetic analysis of d&apos mutants; escherichia coli mutants defective in dicarboxylate transport.
10	prophage induction and cell division in e coli iii mutations sfia and sfib restore division in tif and lon strains and permit the expression of mutator properties of tif	Prophetic induction and cell division in sfib and sfia d&apos mutations; e coli iii restore division in tif and lon strains and allow expression of mutant properties of tif.
10	dna repair in proteus mirabilis iii survival dimer excision and uv reactivation in comparison with escherichia coli k12	Repair of the apo; DNA in the apo; excision of survival dimer mirabilis iii and reactivation of the apo; escherichia coli k12.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli deficient in pyruvate formate lyase	Apos; escherichia coli pyruvate formate lyase deficient mutant.
10	mapping of gsha a gene for the biosynthesis of glutathione in eschericha coli k12	Mapping of gsha, a gene for glutathione biosynthesis in l'apos; eschericha coli k12.
10	hyperproduction of the sigma subunit of rna polymerase in a mutant of escherichia coli	Hyperproduction of rna polymerase under-unit sigma in a mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	the effect of lexa and recf mutations on post replication repair and dna synthesis in escherichia coli k 12	L' effect of mutations on repair after replication and synthesis of l' DNA in escherichia coli k 12 was studied.
10	localized mutagenesis of the aroe stra section of the escherichia coli chromosome coding for ribosomal proteins	Localized mutagenesis of the ribosomal protein encoding stratigraphic section of the d' escherichia coli chromosome.
10	increased spontaneous reversion of certain frameshift mutations in dna polymerase i deficient strains of escherichia coli	Increase in spontaneous reversion of certain frame change mutations in DNA polymerase deficient d' escherichia coli strains i.
10	effects of sodium arsenite on the survival of uv irradiated escherichia coli inhibition of a reca dependent function	Effects of sodium ester, arsenite, on the survival of apos; escherichia coli irradiated at apos; immunotherapies; apos inhibitors; a function dependent on reca.
10	the effect of streptomycin resistance caffeine and acriflavine on ultraviolet light induced reversion to tryptophan independence in strains of escherichia coli b r	L' effect of caffeine and apos; streptomycin-resistant acriflavin on ultraviolet light induced reversion to apos; independence from tryptophan in d&apos strains; escherichia coli b r.
10	increased isoleucine acceptance by sulfur deficient transfer rna from escherichia coli	Increased dosage; acceptance of apo; isoleucine by sulfur-deficient transfer of apo; escherichia coli.
10	transport of pyrimidine nucleosides in cells of escherichia coli k 12	Transport of pyrimidine nucleosides in d&apos cells; escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	polarity and the regulation of the ilv gene cluster in escherichia coli strain k 12	Polarity and regulation of apo gene cluster in strain k 12 d' escherichia coli.
10	induction kinetics of mutagenic dna repair activity in e coli following ultraviolet irradiation	Kinetics of apos; induction of apos; repair activity of apos; mutagenic DNA in e coli following ultraviolet irradiation.
10	efficient suppression of the requirement for n function of bacteriophage lambda by a rho defective e coli sua mutant	Effective suppression of the n function of the lambda bacteriophage by a defective e coli sua rho mutant.
10	specificity of polarity suppression in e coli correction of defects in gene n but not in gene q of phage lambda	Specificity of polarity suppression in e coli correction of n, but not lambda phage q gene defects.
10	genetic mapping of chromosomal mutations affecting the replication of the f factor of escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of chromosomal mutations affecting replication of escherichia coli f-f.
10	identification of genes for elongation factor ts and ribosomal protein s2 in e coli	Identification of factor genes; ts elongation and ribosomal protein s2 in e coli.
10	mutations affecting the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dehydrogenase complex of escherichia coli	Mutations affecting reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dehydrogenase complex d' escherichia coli.
10	changes in membrane proteins of escherichia coli k12 mediated by bacteriophage ike specific plasmids	Changes in ike bacteriophage-specific plasmid-mediated membrane proteins of escherichia coli k12.
10	effects of bacteriophage t4 induced modification of escherichia coli rna polymerase on gene expression in vitro	The effects of bacteriophage t4 were found to induce modification of escherichia coli rna polymerase on apos; gene expression in vitro.
10	alterations in envelope structure of heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli as revealed by freeze etching	Freeze-etching revealed alterations in the structure of apos; envelope of heptose-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	peptidoglycan biosynthesis in a thermosensitive division mutant of escherichia coli	Peptidoglycan biosynthesis in a heat-sensitive mutant of the apos; escherichia coli.
10	freeze etch morphology of outer membrane mutants of escherichia coli k12	"""Frost etch morphology of outer membrane mutants of escherichia coli k12,"" E. coli, Vol."
10	evaluation of a dna polymerase deficient mutant of e coli for the rapid detection of carcinogens	Evaluation of a DNA polymerase deficient coli mutant for the rapid detection of carcinogens.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli common receptor system for vitamin b12 and bacteriophage bf23 on the outer membrane of the cell envelope	Transport of vitamin b12 in the common dapos receptor system; Escherichia coli for vitamin b12 and bacteriophage bf23 on the outer membrane of the cell; cell envelope.
10	role of d tryptophan oxidase in d tryptophan utilization by escherichia coli	Role of tryptophan oxidase in use of tryptophan by escherichia coli.
10	in vivo transcription of r plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli strains with altered antibiotic resistance levels and or conjugal proficiency	In vivo transcript of plasmid r, deoxyribonucleic acid in strains of escherichia coli with modified antibiotic resistance or altered conjugal competence.
10	effect of mutations in deoxyribonucleic acid repair pathways on the sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains to nitrofurantoin	Effect of mutations in apos repair pathways; deoxyribonucleic acid on apos strain sensitivity; escherichia coli k 12 nitrofurantoin.
10	expression of the arga gene carried by a defective lambda bacteriophage of escherichia coli	Expression of the arga gene carried by a defective lambda bacteriophage d' escherichia coli.
10	lowered levels of colicin ia membrane receptors in an escherichia coli mutant defective in heme biosynthesis	Colicine receptor membranes reduced in a mutant of apos; escherichia coli defective in biosynthesis of apos; heme.
10	galactoside accumulation by escherichia coli driven by a ph gradient	Accumulation of galactoside levels by escherichia coli below the pH; influence of pH gradients.
10	glutamate transport in membrane vesicles of the wild type strain and glutamate utilizing mutants of escherichia coli	Glutamate transport in the membrane vesicles of the wild-type strain and glutamate using d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	isolation and characterization of escherichia coli k 12 f mutants defective in conjugation with an i type donor	Isolation and characterization of mutants k 12 f d' defective escherichia coli in conjugation with type i donor.
10	phospholipid composition and phenotypic correction of an envc division mutant of escherichia coli	Phospholipid composition and phenotypic correction of apos mutant; escherichia coli in division envc.
10	initiation of protein synthesis without formylation in a mutant of escherichia coli that grows in the absence of tetrahydrofolate	Initiation of protein synthesis without formylation in a growing escherichia coli d&apos mutant; absence of tetrahydrofolate.
10	number of mutations required to evolve a new lactase function in escherichia coli	Number of mutations required to develop novel lactase function in escherichia coli.
10	pleiotropic phenotype of an escherichia coli mutant lacking leucyl phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid protein transferase	Phenotype pleiotropic d'apos; mutant d'apos; escherichia coli lacking leucyl phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid transfer proteinase.
10	threonyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase and the regulation of the threonine operon in escherichia coli	Threonyl transferring threonyl, ribonucleic acid synthetase and regulation of threonine operon in escherichia coli.
11	common errors in the management of acute myocardial infarction a critical analysis of 58 fatal cases	Common errors in the treatment of the acute myocardial infarction, a critical analysis of 58 fatal cases.
11	induced malignancy in cells from rat myocardium subjected to intermittent anaerobiosis during long propagation in vitro	Malignancy induced in rat myocardial cells subjected to intermittent anaerobic conditions during long-term propagation in vitro.
11	rheumatic lesions in left atrial appendages pathologic studies of material removed during mitral commissurotomy	Rheumatic lesion in left atrial appendages Pathological studies of material collected during apo; a mitral commissurotomy.
11	selective inhibition by preparations of streptococcal filtrates of the oxidative metabolism of mitochondria procured from rabbit myocardium	L' selective inhibition by streptococcal filtrate preparations of oxidative metabolism of rabbit myocardium mitochondria.
11	an integrated morphological and biochemical study of a purified preparation of the succinate and dpnh oxidase system	An integrated morphological and biochemical study of a purified succinate and dpnh oxidase preparation.
11	high energy phosphates during long term hibernation	High-energy phosphates during slowing; long-term hibernation.
11	the rate of oxygen uptake of quiescent cardiac muscle	Dapos; absorption of apos; oxygen from the cardiac muscle that is resting.
11	choline acetylase activity in the atria and its possible relation to the maintenance of the membrane potential	L' choline acetylase activity in atria and its possible relationship to membrane potential maintenance.
11	enzymatic activity in the m band	Enzyme activity in the m-band.
11	cat heart muscle in vitro i cell volumes and intracellular concentrations in papillary muscle	Cardiac muscle of cats, cell volume i in vitro, and intracellular concentrations in papillary muscle.
11	reversible inhibition of beef heart cytochrome c oxidase by polyionic macromolecules	Reversible inhibition of bovine heart cytochrome c oxidase by polyionic macromolecules.
11	effect of reserpine on ventricular escape	Effect of reserpine on apos; ventricular escapement.
11	increase of labeled calcium uptake in heart muscle during potassium lack contracture	In addition, there is an increased amount of calcium in the heart muscle during the course of potassium deprivation.
11	a simple method of weighing the heart	This is a simple way to weigh the heart.
11	calcium flux in the mammalian ventricular myocardium	Calcium flux in the ventricular myocardium of mammals.
11	the human pacemaker and its pathology	The human pacemaker and the pathology.
11	muscle action potentials a technique for recording in situ	The potential of muscle action is a recording technique in situ.
11	fine structural localization of adenosinetriphosphatase activity in heart muscle myofibrils	Fine structural localization of the apos; adenosine adenosine phosphatase activity in cardiac muscle myofibrils.
11	immunologic studies of heart tissue iii occurrence of bound gamma globulin in auricular appendages from rheumatic hearts relationship to certain histopathologic features of rheumatic heart disease	Immunological studies of cardiac tissue iii occurrence of bound gamma globulin in the atrial appendages of rheumatic heart tissue in relation to certain histopathological characteristics of rheumatic heart disease.
11	on the structural continuities of the transverse tubular system of rabbit and human myocardial cells	Structural continuities of the transverse tubular system of human and rabbit myocardial cells.
11	sex hormone studies the effects on the cellular membrane potentials and contractility of isolated rat atrium	L' sexual hormone studies the effects on the cell membrane potentials and contractility of the isolated rat atrium.
11	a quantitative description of the relationship between the area of rabbit ventricular action potentials and the pattern of stimulation	Quantitative description of the relationship between the region of the rabbit ventricular action and the stimulation pattern.
11	participation of an intermediate of oxidative phosphorylation in ion accumulation by mitochondria	Involvement of an oxidative phosphorylation intermediate at apos; ion accumulation by mitochondria.
11	the cardiomyopathy of muscular dystrophy report of two cases with a review of the literature	Cardiomyopathy of muscular dystrophy has been reported in two cases and in a review of the literature.
11	effect of reserpine on the acetylcholine content of the heart the ileum and the hypothalamus of the dog	Effect of reserpine on the acetylcholine content of the dog's ileum and hypalamus.
11	is the fundamental electrical response of the single heart muscle cell a spike potential	It is the fundamental electrical response of the single cell of cardiac muscle to peak potential.
11	reserpine its effect on silver stained structures of the heart	Reserpine has its own effect on the colored structures of the heart.
11	oxidation of carbon 14 labeled endogenous lipids by isolated perfused rat heart	L' 14C-oxidation labeled endogenous lipids by the isolated perfused rat heart.
11	plague toxin its effect in vitro and in vivo	Effect of plague toxin in vitro and in vivo.
11	hypothermia asphyxia and cardiac glycogen in guinea pigs	It's called hypothermia, lacidosis, asphyxiation, and cardiac glycogen in guinea pigs.
11	immunologic relation of streptococcal and tissue antigens ii cross reaction of antisera to mammalian heart tissue with a cell wall constituent of certain strains of group a streptococci	Immunological relationships between streptococcal and tissue antigens ii cross-reactivity of antisera to mammalian cardiac tissue with a cell wall component of some group a streptococcal strains.
11	immunologic relation of streptococcal and tissue antigens iii presence in human sera of streptococcal antibody cross reactive with heart tissue association with streptococcal infection rheumatic fever and glomerulonephritis	Immunological relationship between streptococcal and tissue antigens iii present in human serum d' cross-reactive streptococcal antibody with apos; association of cardiac tissue with streptococcal rheumatic fever and glomerulonephritis.
11	some observations on the fine structure and metabolic activity of normal and glycerinated ventricular muscle of toad	Some observations on the fine structure and metabolic activity of toad glycerinated and normal ventricular muscle.
11	the staining of lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes after electrophoretic separation on cellulose acetate	Isoenzyme staining of lactic dehydrogenase after cellulose acetate electrophoretic separation.
11	action of plague murine toxin on mitochondria from resistant and susceptible animals	The action of the plague-induced murine toxin on the intestinal mitochondria of resistant and susceptible animals.
11	the effects of synthetic eledoisin on the systemic and coronary haemodynamics and metabolism of the intact dog	Effects of apos; synthetic eledoisin on intact dog's hemodynamics and systemic and coronary metabolism.
11	cardiac myoglobin in myoglobinuria	Heart myoglobin in myoglobinuria.
11	rabbit muscle lactate dehydrogenase 5 a regulatory enzyme	Rabbit muscle lactate dehydrogenase 5 is a regulatory enzyme.
11	a comparison of the effects of the plasma kinins bradykinin and kallidin on myocardial blood flow and metabolism	Comparison of the effects of bradykinin and kallidin plasma kinins on myocardial blood flow and metabolism.
11	the mechanism of adhesion of cells to glass a study by interference reflection microscopy	The mechanism of the apos; adhesion of the cells to glass, a study by apos; reflection microscopic interference.
11	an attempt to infer the electrophysiological functions of some intracellular structures in cardiac cells by an electronic analogue	An attempt to infer the electrophysiological functions of certain intracellular structures in cardiac cells via an electronic analog.
11	nucleoside phosphatase activities in rat cardiac muscle	L' nucleoside phosphatase activity in rat cardiac muscle.
11	the localization of cholinesterase activity in rat cardiac muscle by electron microscopy	Electron microscopic localization of cholinesterase activity in rat heart muscle.
11	the effect of beta sitosterol on the metabolism of cholesterol and lipids in rats on a diet containing coconut oil	L*apos; effect of beta sitosterol on cholesterol and lipid metabolism in rats fed a diet containing coconut oil.
11	labelling of dna and cell division in so called non dividing tissues	Marking of DNA and cell division in the so-called non-divisive tissue.
11	the effect of sonic oscillation on the structure and function of beef heart mitochondria	L' effect of l' sonic oscillation on the structure and function of the bovine heart mitochondria.
11	a macromolecular repeating unit of mitochondrial structure and function correlated electron microscopic and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria and submitochondrial particles of beef heart muscle	Electron microscopic and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria and mitochondrial particles of bovine heart muscle were correlated by a macromolecular repeat unit of mitochondrial structure and function.
11	an example of information retention in rabbit ventricular muscle fibres	An example of rabbit ventricular muscle fiber retention.
11	mitochondrial dna in yeast and some mammalian species	Mitochondrial DNA in yeast and certain mammalian species.
11	an immunological relationship between the group a streptococcus and mammalian muscle	An immunologic relationship between the strep group and mammalian muscle.
11	steroid stimulation of beating of cultured rat heart cells	Steroidal stimulation of the heartbeat of the cultured rat heart cells.
11	synchronous assisted circulation	Synchronous circulation enhanced.
11	current status of counterpulsation in cardiac assistance a summary of experimental experience in the dog	Current status of contra-pulse in the apos; cardiac assistance a summary of the apos; experimental dog experiment.
11	metmyoglobin oxidation during electron transport reactions in mitochondria	Oxidation of metamyoglobin during mitochondrial electron transport reactions.
11	propagation of action potentials and the structure of the nexus in cardiac muscle	The propagation of nexus potentials, nexus action and nexus structure in cardiac muscle.
11	studies on the in vitro interaction of electrical stimulation and ca movement in sarcoplasmic reticulum	Studies on the apos; in vitro interaction of electrical stimulation and ca movement in the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	isozymes of aldolase	Isozymes of the apos; aldolase.
11	purification and general properties of aspartate aminotransferase of ox heart	Purification and general properties of beef heart aspartate aminotransferase.
11	amino acid composition and terminal residues of aspartate aminotransferase from ox heart	Amino acid composition and terminal residues of beef heart aspartate aminotransferase.
11	two dimensional chromatography on silica gel loaded paper for the microanalysis of polar lipids	Two-dimensional silica gel-filled paper chromatography for polar lipid microanalysis.
11	effect of diabetes on the concentration of amino acids in plasma and heart muscle of rats	Effect of diabetes on amino acid levels in plasma and heart muscle of rats.
11	fatty acid components of rat tissue lipids	Fatty acid components of rat tissue lipids.
11	fine structure of lipid depleted mitochondria	The fine structure of lipid-depleted mitochondria.
11	preparation from human serum of an alpha one protein which induces the immediate growth of unadapted cells in vitro	Prepared from human serum, an alpha 1 protein that induces the immediate growth of maladaptive cells in vitro.
11	isolation and analysis of free fatty aldehydes from rat dog and bovine heart muscle	Isolation and analysis of free fatty aldehydes of rat and bovine heart muscle.
11	mammalian ribosomal protein analysis by electrophoresis on polyacrylamide gel	Mammalian ribosomal protein analysis by electrophoresis on polyacrylamide gel.
11	organ specificity and lactate dehydrogenase activity differential inhibition by urea and related compounds	Organ specificity and lactate dehydrogenase activity were different from those of urea and related compounds.
11	camel myoglobin	Camel myoglobin.
11	calcium induced activation of phosphorylase in rat hearts	Calcium was found to induce apos; activation of phosphorylase in rat hearts.
11	regulation of renal citrate metabolism by bicarbonate ion and ph observations in tissue slices and mitochondria	Observations of bicarbonate ion and ph in tissue slices and mitochondria regulate renal citrate metabolism.
11	the control of rat heart phosphofructokinase by citrate and other regulators	Control of rat cardiac phosphofructokinase by citrate and d' other regulators.
11	mitochondria in cardiac muscle cells of the canary and some other birds	Mitochondria in canary and some other bird heart muscle cells.
11	rabbit lactate dehydrogenase isozymes effect of ph on activity	Effect of ph on isos; isoenzyme activity of rabbit lactate dehydrogenase.
11	genetic control of lactate dehydrogenase formation in the hagfish eptatretus stoutii	Genetic control of lactate dehydrogenase formation in hagfish eptatretus stoutii.
11	lipid composition of mitochondria from bovine heart liver and kidney	Lipid composition of liver and kidney mitochondria from bovine hearts.
11	glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase variants in phyletically diverse organisms	Words-key: glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase, phyletically diverse organisms.
11	passive transport of 5 5 dimethyl 2 4 oxazolidinedione into beef heart mitochondria	Passive transport of 5 dimethyls-2-4 oxazolidinedione in beef heart mitochondria.
11	alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in tissues of the weddell seal	L' alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase and glucose-6 phosphate dehydrogenase in Weddell seal tissue.
11	competent chick ectoderm nonspecific response to rna	Ectoderma; ectoderma d' a chick competent in rna.
11	cross reactive antigen shared by streptococcus agalactiae and certain bovine tissues	Reactive cross-reactive antigen common to Streptococcus agalactiae and certain bovine tissues.
11	an electron microscope study of canine cardiac myosin and some of its aggregates	Electron microscopy of canine cardiac myosin and some of its aggregates.
11	transverse tubule apertures in mammalian myocardial cells surface array	Transverse tubule apertures in myocardial mammalian cells surface array.
11	rheumatic like cardiac lesions in mice	Rheumatism Similar to heart damage in mouse.
11	the mechanics of left ventricular contraction in acute experimental cardiac failure	Mechanics of left ventricular contraction in the apos; experimental acute heart failure.
11	control of myocardial contraction the sensitivity of cardiac actomyosin to calcium ion	Control of myocardial contraction, apos sensitivity, cardiac actomyosin to apos; calcium ion.
11	detection and isolation of minor lipid constituents	Detection and isolation of minor lipid components.
11	effect of streptococcus pyogenes on tissue cells	Effect of Streptococcus pyogenes on tissue cells.
11	the ubiquinone content of animal tissues a survey of the occurrence of ubiquinone in vertebrates	The ubiquinone content of animal tissues is a study of the ubiquinone content of vertebrates.
11	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin ii protein synthesis in primary heart cell cultures	Studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin protein synthesis in primary cardiac cell cultures.
11	the uncoupling of respiratory chain phosphorylation by 4 5 6 7 tetrachloro 2 trifluoromethylbenzimidazole	The decoupling of respiratory chain phosphorylation by tetrachloro 4, 5, 6, 7 and trifluoromethylbenzimidazole 2.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes of chick embryo response to variations of ambient oxygen tension	Lactate dehydrogenase enzymes of the response of the egg; chick embryo to changes in voltage; ambient oxygen.
11	evolution of malate dehydrogenase in birds	Evolution of malate dehydrogenase in the birds.
11	peafowl lactate dehydrogenase problem of isoenzyme identification	Problem with peafowl lactate dehydrogenase; identification of isoenzymes.
11	macroscopic identification of early myocardial infarction by dehydrogenase alterations	Macroscopic identification of early stages of apos; myocardial infarction by alteration of the dehydrogenase.
11	structural modulations of plasmalemmal vesicles	Plasma membrane vesicle structural modifications.
11	control of myocardial oxygen consumption relative influence of contractile state and tension development	Control of apo consumption; myocardial oxygen, relative influence of apo; contractile state and tension development.
11	chromatography of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c on carboxymethylcellulose	Chromatography of cytochrome c. oxidized and reduced on carboxymethylcellulose.
11	the localization of circulating immune complexes in experimental serum sickness the role of vasoactive amines and hydrodynamic forces	Localization of circulating immune complexes in serum disease investigated the role of vasoactive amines and hydrodynamic forces.
11	mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase reversible denaturation studies	Reversible denaturation studies using the mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase.
11	cardiac autoantibodies i immunodiffusion analysis of multiple responses evoked homologously and heterologously	L' immunodiffusion analysis i d' auto-cardiac antibody of multiple homologously evoked and heterologous responses.
11	a species comparison of the effects of changing perfusion pressure on blood flow and metabolic heat production in the myocardium	A specific comparison of the effects of a change in perfusion pressure on blood flow and metabolic heat production in the myocardium.
11	utilization of endogenous lipid by the isolated perfused rat heart	Use of endogenous lipids by isolated perfused rat heart.
11	the reversal of phenylarsenoxide inhibition of keto acid oxidation in mitochondrial and bacterial suspensions by lipoic acid and other disulphides	Lapos; reversal of apos; inhibition of apos; oxidation of apos; ketonic acid by phenylarsenolate in mitochondrial and bacterial suspensions by apos; lipoic acid and d' other disulfides.
11	effect of removal of cholesterol diet upon serum sickness cholesterol induced atherosclerosis	The effects of cholesterol depletion on serum cholesterol disease induced aposemia; atherosclerosis.
11	characterization and metabolism of ovine foetal lipids	Characterization and metabolism of ovine fetal body lipids.
11	the functional status of lipoprotein lipase in rat liver	L' Functional status of lipoprotein lipase in rat liver.
11	energetics of cardiac contractions	Cardiac contractions energy, please.
11	autoantibodies reacting with heart muscle tissue in coronary heart disease	Autos-antibodies react with cardiac muscle tissue in coronary heart disease.
11	pathological findings in three cases of fungal endocarditis complicating open heart surgery	Pathological findings in three cases of fungal endocarditis which complicates open heart surgery.
11	determination of extracellular space in amphibian muscle	Determination of the extracellular space in the muscle of an amphibian.
11	lipofuscinosis of the gastrointestinal tract in man	Gastro Lipofuscinosis-intestinal in the gastrointestinal tract.
11	disproportionately higher levels of myocardial docosahexaenoate and elevated levels of plasma and liver arachidonate in hyperthyroid rats	Abnormally high levels of myocardial docosahexaenoate and elevated plasma and hepatic arachidonate levels in hyperthyroid rats.
11	a reappraisal of some structural features of bovine heart malate dehydrogenase	Re-evaluation of certain structural characteristics of bovine heart malate dehydrogenase.
11	the effect of werum on the uptake of thyroid hormones by the perfused rat heart	L' effect of werum on uptake of thyroid hormones by perfused rat heart.
11	the effect of fatty acid on the uptake of thyroxine by the perfused rat heart	L' effect of fatty acids on appetite; absorption of thyroxine by perfused rat heart.
11	metabolism of triglyceride fatty acid by the perfused rat heart	Perfused rat heart metabolism of triglyceride fatty acids.
11	isolation and identification of cholesteryl alkyl ethers from bovine cardiac muscle	Isolation and identification of cholesterylalkyl ethers in bovine cardiac muscle.
11	calcium current and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibers	Calcium current and contraction activation in ventricular myocardial fibers.
11	mitral stenosis together with a giant cell myocarditis limited to the left atrium	Mitral stenosis and giant-cell myocarditis limited to the apos; left atrium.
11	phenoxyethanol protein preservative for taxonomists	Phenoxyethanol, a protein preservative for taxonomists.
11	the ultrastructure of frog ventricular cardiac muscle and its relationship to mechanism of excitation contraction coupling	The ultrastructure of frog ventricular heart muscle and its relation to the coupling mechanism of contraction; excitation.
11	the influence of ouabain and alpha angelica lactone on calcium metabolism of dog cardiac microsomes	L' influence of ouabain and l' angelic alpha lactone on the calcium metabolism of canine cardiac microsomes.
11	molecular species of lecithins of rat heart kidney and plasma	Molecular species of rat heart lecithin and rat heart plasma.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes in human cardiac transplantation	Lactate dehydrogenase enzymes in human heart transplant.
11	the growth of the muscular and collagenous parts of the rat heart in various forms of cardiomegaly	Growth of muscle and collagen parts of the rat heart in various forms of cardiomegaly.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes in parthenogenetic teiid lizards cnemidophorus	Isozymes of lactate dehydrogenase in parthenogenetic teiid lizards cnemidophorus.
11	effects of guanidine derivatives on mitochondrial function i phenethylbiguanide inhibition of respiration in mitochondria from guinea pig and rat tissues	Effects of guanidine derivatives on mitochondrial i phenethylbiguanide function inhibition of respiration in guinea pig and rat tissue mitochondria.
11	the oxidation of exogenous and endogenous cytochromec in mitochondria a biochemical and ultrastructural study	The oxidation of exogenous and endogenous cytochrome C in mitochondria has been the subject of a biochemical and ultrastructural study.
11	experience with three brescia cimino shunts	Experience with three shunts brescia cimino.
11	the effect of quinidine on calcium accumulation by isolated sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal and cardiac muscle	L' effect of quinidine on appetite; accumulation of calcium by the isolated sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal and cardiac muscles.
11	diagnosis of pericardial effusion by ultrasound	Diagnosis of apos; pericardial effusion by ultrasound.
11	free fatty acid metabolism of the human heart at rest	The metabolism of free fatty acids in the resting state of the human heart.
11	internal redistribution of tissue protein synthesis in uremia	Internal distribution of tissue protein synthesis in the uremia.
11	effect of reserpine on the subcellular distribution of 3h alpha methylnoradrenaline in the mouse heart	Reserpine affects the subcellular distribution of alpha methylnoradrenaline 3 h in the mouse heart.
11	factors controlling the washout of the interstitial space of the isolated perfused rat heart	Factors controlling the rinse of the apos; interstitial space of isolated perfused rat heart.
11	relationship between the uptake binding and pharmacological action of procaine in the isolated heart	The relationship between the binding of the uptake and the pharmacological action of procaine in the isolated heart.
11	the roles of synthesis and degradation in determining tissue concentrations of lactate dehydrogenase 5	The role of synthesis and degradation in determining the concentrations of lactate dehydrogenase 5 in tissues.
11	toxic effects of glucagon induced acute lipid mobilization in geese	The toxic effects of glucagon induced an acute lipid mobilization in geese.
11	biological properties of cell wall mucopeptide of hemolytic streptococci	Biological properties of hemolytic streptococci cell wall mucopeptide.
11	the use of beef liver catalase as a protein tracer for electron microscopy	L' use of beef liver catalase as a protein tracer product for electron microscopy.
11	energized configurations of heart mitochondria in situ	Energetic configuration of the cardiac mitochondria in situ.
11	metabolism of cholesterol in the tissues and blood of the chick embryo	Cholesterol metabolism in blood and tissue of the chicken embryo.
11	the inhibition of pyruvate and ls isocitrate oxidation by succinate oxidation in rat liver mitochondria	L' oxidation of pyruvate and l' isocitrate of ls by apos; oxidation of succinate in rat liver mitochondria.
11	relation between plasma lignocaine levels and induced haemodynamic changes	Relationship between lignocaine plasma concentrations and induced hemodynamic changes.
11	gene dosage at the lactate dehydrogenase b locus in triploid and diploid teiid lizards	Genetic dose at the lactate dehydrogenase b (LDHB) locus in triploid and diploid teiid lizards.
11	hemodynamic changes following correction of severe aortic stenosis using the cutter smeloff prosthesis	Hemodynamic changes after correction of severe aortic stenosis at the apos; aid from the cutter smelter.
11	a study of the t system in rat heart	A study of the t-system in rat heart.
11	gradient thickness thin layer chromatography for the isolation and analysis of trace amounts of free fatty acids in large lipid samples	Thin-layer chromatography with gradient; thickness for pH; isolation and pH; trace analysis; free fatty acids in large lipid samples.
11	embryonic cell adhesiveness do species differences exist among warm blooded vertebrates	Attachment of embryonic cells differs-t-it d' one species in appos; another species in warm-blooded vertebrates?
11	calcium exchange and contraction strength of guinea pig atrium in normal and hypertonic media	L' calcium exchange and force of contraction of guinea pig atrium in hypertonic and normal media.
11	the uptake of thyroxine and tri iodothyronine by perfused hearts	Absorption of thyroxine and triiodothyronine by perfused hearts.
11	effect of peruvosid cd412 on excitability and functional refractory period of atrial and ventricular tissues in cardiomyopathy caused by trypanosoma cruzi	Effect of cd412 peruvoside on excitability and functional refractory period of atrial and ventricular tissue in trypanosome cruzi cardiomyopathy.
11	a case of fatal peri partum cardiomyopathy	Fatal perinatal cardiomyopathy.
11	localization of cytochromes in intact and fragmented mitochondrial membranes	Location of cytochromes in intact and fragmented mitochondrial membranes.
11	tissue iodoprotein formation during the peripheral metabolism of the thyroid hormones	Formation of tissue iodoproteins during peripheral metabolism of thyroid hormones.
11	the significance of the incorporation of 14c leucine into different protein fractions by isolated ox heart mitochondria	The incorporation of leucine 14c into different protein fractions by isolated bovine heart mitochondria.
11	a contribution to the study of cardiac lipofuscin fluorescence	Contribution to the study of the fluorescence of cardiac lipofuscin.
11	horseshoe crab lactate dehydrogenases evidence for dimeric structure	Horseshoe crab lactate dehydrogenase demonstrated the existence of dimer structure.
11	effect of organic nitrates on myocardial oxygen consumption in vitro	Effect of organic nitrates on the consumption of myocardial oxygen in vitro.
11	glycerol kinase activities in muscles from vertebrates and invertebrates	Glycerol kinase (Glycerol) activity in vertebrate and invertebrate muscle.
11	spontaneous rhythmic contraction of separated heart muscle cells	Spontaneous rhythmic contractions of the separate cardiac muscle cells.
11	the mitochondrial oxidation of quinol monophosphates	Lidos; mitochondrial oxidation of quinol monophosphates.
11	the effect of fasting on the utilization of chylomicron triglyceride fatty acids in relation to clearing factor lipase lipoprotein lipase releasable by heparin in the perfused rat heart	The effect of fasting on appetite; utilization of chylomicron triglyceride fatty acids in relation to clear factor lipase released by apos; heparin in perfused rat heart.
11	the effect of physical training upon the mechanical and metabolic performance of the rat heart	The effects of exercise and exercise training on the mechanical and metabolic performance of the rat heart.
11	biochemical properties of trypanosomatid lactate dehydrogenases	The biochemical properties of trypanosomatids lactate dehydrogenases.
11	membrane studies with polarity dependent and excimer forming fluorescent probes	Membrane studies with excimer-forming polarity-dependent fluorescent probes.
11	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin iii effect on subcellular components of protein synthesis from the tissues of intoxicated guinea pigs and rats	Studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin iii effect on subcellular components of protein synthesis from guinea pig and intoxicated rat tissues.
11	the toxicity of streptolysin o for beating mammalian heart cells in tissue culture	Toxicity of streptolysin to mammalian heart cells in tissue culture.
11	augmentation of the virulence of murine coxsackie virus b 3 myocardiopathy by exercise	Exercise increases the virulence of myocardial myocarditis due to the murine coxsackie virus b 3.
11	the activities of some enzymes concerned with energy metabolism in mammalian muscles of differing pigmentation	L&apos is the activity of certain enzymes involved in energy metabolism in mammalian muscles of different pigmentation.
11	beta hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase lack in ruminant liver mitochondria	The absence of beta-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in ruminant liver mitochondria.
11	ribonuclease inhibitor system abnormality in dystrophic mouse skeletal muscle	Dystrophic skeletal muscle of mice is defective in the ribonuclease inhibitory system.
11	effect of fasting on the clearing factor lipase lipoprotein lipase activity of fresh and defatted preparations of rat heart muscle	Effect of fasting on apos; clear factor lipoprotein lipase activity in faded and fresh preparations of rat cardiac muscle.
11	c3 leukotactic factors produced by a tissue protease	Leukotactic factors produced by tissue protease c3.
11	the rsr pattern in left surface leads in ventricular aneurysm	The rsr profile of the left surface leads to the apos; ventricular aneurysm.
11	wilms tumour propagated through the inferior vena cava into the right heart cavities	A s&apos wilms tumor is propagated by the inferior vena cava in the right heart cavity.
11	composition of alkoxylipids of human heart and aorta	The composition of alkoxylipids in the human heart and the human aorta.
11	novel preparation of cardiolipin from beef heart	A new preparation of cardiolipin from the heart of beef.
11	energy coupling mechanisms in mitochondria kinetic spectroscopic and thermodynamic properties of an energy transducing form of cytochrome b	Energy coupling mechanisms in the thermodynamic and spectroscopic properties of the mitochondria d' a transducing form d' energy of cytochrome b.
11	pathology of experimental trypanosomiasis in the albino rat rabbit goat and sheep a preliminary report	A preliminary report of experimental trypanosomiasis in albino rabbits and goats and sheep.
11	rheumatoid heart disease with complete heart block	Rheumatoid heart disease with complete cardiac block.
11	osmotically induced alterations in volume and ultrastructure of mitochondria isolated from rat liver and bovine heart	Osmotic alterations of volume and apos; ultrastructure of mitochondria isolated from rat liver and from bovine heart were induced.
11	creatine regulation in the embryo and growing chick	Regulation of creatine in the embryo and the growing chick.
11	microfilaments in cellular and developmental processes	The use of microfilaments in cellular and developmental processes.
11	giant peaked upright t waves in cerebrovascular accident	Giant t waves peaked vertically during a stroke.
11	control of the tricarboxylate cycle and its interactions with glycolysis during acetate utilization in rat heart	The control of the tricarboxylate cycle and its interactions with glycolysis during the apos; use of the apos; acetate in the rat heart.
11	further studies on the reversibility of serum sickness cholesterol induced atherosclerosis	D' other studies on serum cholesterol reversibility have also induced apos; atherosclerosis.
11	ketone body and fatty acid metabolism in sheep tissues 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase a cytoplasmic enzyme in sheep liver and kidney	Metabolism of ketones and fatty acids in sheep 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase tissues, a cytoplasmic enzyme of sheep liver and kidney.
11	interconversion of cyclic nucleotide activated and cyclic nucleotide independent forms of a protein kinase from beef heart	Interconversion of independent and activated cyclic nucleotide forms of bovine heart protein kinase.
11	elevation of guanosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate in rat heart after perfusion with acetylcholine	L' guanosine cyclic phosphate elevation 3-5 in rat heart after infusion with l' acetylcholine.
11	neurally mediated increase in dopamine beta hydroxylase activity	Dopamine beta hydroxylase activity; dopamine beta hydroxylase activity.
11	cineangiography of the coronary arteries clinical function and anatomic correlation in patients with chronic chest pain	Cardiac artery clinical function kineangiography and anatomical correlation in patients with chronic chest pain.
11	enzyme inactivation with ultraviolet laser energy 2650 angstroms	Enzyme inactivation with l' ultraviolet laser energy 2650 angstroms.
11	effect of inhibition of lipolysis on myocardial oxygen consumption in the presence of isoproterenol	Effect of apos; inhibition of lipolysis on apos consumption; myocardial oxygen in the presence of apos; isoproterenol.
11	the effects of intra aortic counterpulsation on cardiac performance and metabolism in shock associated with acute myocardial infarction	The effects of d' one against intra @-@beatening aortic on cardiac performance and shock metabolism associated with acute myocardial infarction.
11	studies of cardiac muscle with a high permeability to calcium produced by treatment with ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid	Cardiac muscle studies with high permeability to calcium produced by ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid treatment.
11	excitation contraction coupling in heart vii calcium accumulation in subcellular particles in congestive heart failure	Excitation contraction coupling in cardiac vii calcium accumulation in subcellular particles in congestive heart failure.
11	glutamine synthetase in muscle and kidney	Glutamine synthetase in muscles and kidneys?
11	haem a cytochrome c and total protein turnover in mitochondria from rat heart and liver	Hem, cytochrome c and total protein turnover in the rat heart and liver mitochondria.
11	thyroxine convesion to triiodothyronine by isolated perfused rat heart	Triiodothyronine thyroxine conjugation by an isolated perfused rat heart.
11	comparison of glycerol treatment in frog skeletal muscle and mammalian heart an electrophysiological and morphological study	Comparison of glycerol treatment in frog skeletal muscle and mammalian heart, electrophysiological, and morphological study.
11	in vitro organization of dissociated rat cardiac cells into beating three dimensional structures	In vitro organization of dissociated rat heart cells into three-dimensional rat beats.
11	studies on the pathogenesis of experimental epizootic hemorrhagic disease of white tailed deer	Pathogenesis studies of experimental epizootic hemorrhagic disease in white-tailed deer.
11	effect of free fatty acids on myocardial function and oxygen consumption in intact dogs	Effect of free fatty acids on myocardial function and oxygen consumption in intact dogs.
11	action of fenfluramine on monoamine stores of rat tissues	The action of fenfluramine on the monoamine stores of rat tissues.
11	transitional cardiac cells of the conductive system of the dog heart distinguishing morphological and electrophysiological features	Morphological and electrophysiological features are distinguished by the transition cardiac cells of the dog heart conducting system.
11	cardiac muscle its ultrastructure in the finch and hummingbird with special reference to the sarcoplasmic reticulum	L' cardiac muscle ultrastructure in finfish and hummingbird, especially sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	the course of ketosis and the activity of key enzymes of ketogenesis and ketone body utilization during development of the postnatal rat	L' evolution of ketosis and l' activity of key enzymes of ketogenesis and l' use of keto bodies during postnatal rat development.
11	regulation of coronary blood flow	He or she will take the pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos
11	study of soluble lipoprotein in rat liver mitochondria	Study of soluble lipoproteins in rat liver mitochondria.
11	the fine structure and electrophysiology of heart muscle cell injury	Fine structure and apo; electrophysiology of cardiac muscle cell injury.
11	further studies on histamine catabolism in vivo	D' other studies on the catabolism of histamine in vivo were performed.
11	improved techniques for the preparation of ultrathin frozen sections	Improved preparation techniques for thin frozen cuts.
11	comparative studies of light meromyosin paracrystals derived from red white and cardiac muscle myosins	Comparative studies of paracrystals of light meromyosin derived from white myosin and myosin from cardiac muscle.
11	importance of the carotid sinus baroreceptors in the regulation of myocardial performance	Importance of carotid sinus baroreceptors in the regulation of carotid sinus performance.
11	endocardial fibroelastosis in children with special reference to the lesions of cardiac ganglia	Fibro-endocardial elastosis in children, especially lesions of the cardiac glands.
11	synthetic strands of cardiac muscle growth and physiological implication	Synthetic strands of cardiac muscle growth with physiological implications.
11	quantitative study of infarcted myocardium in cardiogenic shock	Quantitative study of myocardium infarcted during cardiogenic shock.
11	changes of myocardial enzyme activities in atrial fibrillation	Changes in myocardial enzyme activities in atrial fibrillation.
11	cardiac lesions in fatal cases of recent myocardial ischaemia from a coronary care unit	Cardiac injury in fatal cases; recent myocardial ischemia in a coronary care unit.
11	the identification of the site of action of nn dicyclohexylcarbodi imide as a proteolipid in mitochondrial membranes	Identification of the d&apos site; action of nn dicyclohexylcarbodi imide as proteolipid in mitochondrial membranes.
11	aerobic reduction of cytochrome b 566 in pigeon heart mitochondria succinate cytochrome c1 reductase stopped flow kinetics	Aerobic reduction of cytochrome b 566 in succinate cytochrome c1 reductase in pigeon heart mitochondria stopped the flux kinetics.
11	activities of enzymes of ketone body utilization in brain and other tissues of suckling rats	Apos enzymes activity; use of the keto body in the brain and tissues; other tissues of lactating rats.
11	light and electron microscopy of diet induced atrial thrombosis in swiss mice ii recovery on return to a balanced diet	Light and electron microscopy of the diet induced atrial thrombosis in Swiss mice ii recovery from a balanced diet.
11	angiotensin ii rapid localization in nuclei of smooth and cardiac muscle	L' angiotensin ii is rapidly localized in cardiac nuclei and smooth muscle.
11	histochemistry of lactic dehydrogenase in heart and pectoralis muscles of rat	Histochemistry of lactic dehydrogenase in the heart and pectoral muscles of the rat.
11	the isotope exchange reactions of ox heart phosphofructokinase	The d&apos reactions; isotopic exchange of the bovine heart phosphofructokinase.
11	light chains of myosins from white red and cardiac muscles	Light chains of myosin from white red and cardiac muscle.
11	metabolism of lysolecithin in vivo effects of hyperlipemia and atherosclerosis in squirrel monkeys	Lysolecithin metabolism In vivo effects of apos; hyperlipemia and apos; atherosclerosis in squirrel monkeys.
11	quantitative assessment of the extent of myocardial infarction in the conscious dog by means of analysis of serial changes in serum creatine phosphokinase activity	Quantitative evaluation of apos; extent of apos; myocardial infarction in conscious dogs using apos; analysis of serial changes in apos; activity of serum creatine phosphokinase.
11	fluorescent probe environment and the structural and charge changes in energy coupling of mitochondrial membranes	L' fluorescent probe environment and charge and structural changes in energy coupling of mitochondrial membranes.
11	coronary blood flow oxygen delivery rate and cardiac performance	Coronary blood flow, cardiac output; oxygen and cardiac performance.
11	modification of the cardiovascular effects of l dopa by decarboxylase inhibitors	Modification by decarboxylase inhibitors of the cardiovascular effects of dopa.
11	myocardial and skeletal muscle concentrations of digoxin in patients on long term therapy	Digoxin levels in myocardium and skeletal muscles of patients on long-term therapy.
11	reconstitution of horse heart cytochrome c interaction of the components obtained upon cleavage of the peptide bond following methionine residue 65	Reconstitution of l' interaction of horse heart cytochrome c with peptide bond cleavage components following the methionine residue 65.
11	the sensitivity of developing cardiac myofibrils to cytochalasin b electron microscopy polarized light z bands heartbeat	The sensitivity of developing cardiac myofibrils to cytochalasin b by electron microscopy polarizes z-light bands of heartbeats.
11	the progression of interstitial myocarditis to idiopathic endocardial fibroelastosis	Progression from interstitial myocarditis to idiopathic endocardial fibroelastosis.
11	effects of isoprenaline and aminophylline on the chronotropic responses of the isolated guineapig heart to vagal stimulation and acetylcholine	The effects of apos; isoprenaline and apos; aminophylline on the chronotropic responses of isolated guinea pig heart to vagal stimulation and apos; acetylcholine.
11	myocardial fibrosis and smooth muscle cell hyperplasia in coronary arteries of allylamine fed rats	Myocardial fibrosis and smooth muscle cell hyperplasia in the coronary arteries of allylamine-treated rats.
11	equivalent circuit of frog atrial tissue as determined by voltage clamp unclamp experiments	Equivalent frog atrial tissue circuit as determined by tension clamp experiments.
11	decrease in liver aromatic l amino acid decarboxylase produced by chronic administration of l dopa	Decrease in hepatic aromatic amino acid decarboxylase induced by apos; chronic dopa l administration.
11	the effects of posture and isoproterenol on the velocity of left ventricular contraction in man the reciprocal relationship between left ventricular volume and myocardial wall force during ejection on mean rate of circumferential shortening	The effects of posture and isoproterenol on the rate of left ventricular contraction in men, the interrelationship between left ventricular volume and the strength of the myocardial wall during apo; ejection on the mean rate of circumferential shortening.
11	ethanol acetaldehyde and myocardial protein synthesis	L' ethanol acetaldehyde and myocardial protein synthesis.
11	bone and soft tissue changes with oral phosphate supplements	Modification of bones and soft tissue with oral phosphate supplementation.
11	the use of autologous fascia lata for cardiac valve replacement preliminary results	Lapos; use autologous fascia lata for preliminary cardiac valve replacement results.
11	magnesium exchange in rat ventricle	L-apos; magnesium exchange in rat ventricle.
11	change in the glycogen level in the liver heart and skeletal muscles of rodents during exposure to plague toxin	Changes in the level of glycogen in the heart and skeletal muscle of rodents exposed to plague toxin.
11	left ventricular performance and coronary flow after coronary embolization with plastic microspheres	Left ventricular performance and coronary flow after embolization with plastic microspheres.
11	on the analysis of long chain alkane diols and glycerol ehters in biochemical studies	On the apos; analysis of alkanes long chain alkanes and glycerol ehters in biochemical studies.
11	effect of physostigmine on ventricular fibrillation and myocardial glycogen in hypothermic dogs	Effect of physostigmine on ventricular fibrillation and myocardial glycogen in dogs with hypothermia.
11	the inducible alkaline phosphatase of rat heart some properties of the enzyme and factors influencing its activity	Rat heart inducible alkaline phosphatase has certain properties of the enzyme and factors that influence its activity.
11	free fatty acid oxidation and carnitine levels in diphtheritic guinea pig myocardium	L' oxidation of free fatty acids and carnitine levels in guinea pig diphtheria.
11	brain response to protein undernutrition mechanism of preferential protein retention	The brain response to the mechanism of under-protein feeding preferential protein retention.
11	direct counting and sizing of mitochondria in solution	Direct counting and sizing of the mitochondria in the solution phase.
11	ferrochelatase and aminolaevulate synthetase in brain heart kidney and liver of normal and porphyric rats the induction of aminolaevulate synthetase in kidney cytosol and mitochondria by allylisopropylacetamide	Ferrochelatase and l' aminolaevulate synthetase in the kidney and liver of the cerebral heart of normal and porphyric rats, l' induction of aminolaevulatory synthetase in renal cytosol and mitochondria by allylisopropylacetamide.
11	coordinated development of glucuronidase and galactosidase in mouse organs	Coordination of glucuronidase and galactosidase development in mouse organs.
11	a method for the determination of lipoprotein lipase in postheparin plasma and body tissues utilizing a triolein coated celite substrate	Procedure for determination of lipoprotein lipase in plasma and body tissue post-heparin using a triolein-coated celitic substrate.
11	natural occurrence of free fatty aldehydes in bovine cardiac muscle	Natural occurrence of free fatty aldehydes in the bovine heart muscle.
11	influence of dietary fat on the concentration of long chain unsaturated fatty acid families in rat tissues	The effects of dietary fats on the concentration of long-chain unsaturated fatty acids in rat tissues.
11	the effect of drugs on stress induced changes of myocardial glycogen and blood glucose concentration in rats	The effect of drugs on stress induced changes in myocardial glycogen and in blood glucose concentration in rats.
11	a binding protein for fatty acids in cytosol of intestinal mucosa liver myocardium and other tissues	A protein that binds fatty acids in the cytosol of the myocardium of the intestinal mucosa of the liver and other tissues.
11	clearing factor lipase in obese hyperglycaemic mice ob ob	Clear factor lipase in obese hyperglycaemic obese obese.
11	cell sorting in the presence of cytochalasin b	Screening of cells in the presence of cytochalasin b.
11	synthetic strands of cardiac muscle formation and ultrastructure	Synthetic strands of formation and apos; cardiac muscle ultrastructure.
11	proton translocation coupled to quinone reduction by reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in rat liver and ox heart mitochondria	Proton translocation has been coupled to quinone reduction by reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in rat liver and beef heart mitochondria.
11	coronary vasodilator responses to hypoxia before and after aminophylline	The coronary vasodilator responses to apos; pre- and post-aposal hypoxia; aminophylline.
11	coronary artery reperfusion i early effects on local myocardial function and the extent of myocardial necrosis	Lapos perfusion; early coronary artery effects on local myocardial function and lapos; extent of myocardial necrosis.
11	coronary artery reperfusion ii reduction of myocardial infarct size at 1 week after the coronary occlusion	Apos reperfusion; coronary artery ii size reduction; myocardial infarction 1 week after stroke; coronary occlusion.
11	endothelial cell membranes polarity of particles as seen by freeze fracturing	Polarity of particles in endothelial cell membranes, as observed by cryofracture.
11	adenine nucleotide induced contraction of the inner mitochondrial membrane i general characterization	The nucleotides of adenine induce contraction of the internal mitochondrial membrane i general characterization.
11	adenine nucleotide induced contraction on the inner mitochondrial membrane ii effect of bongkrekic acid	Apos-induced contraction; nucleotide adenine on the inner mitochondrial membrane ii bongkrekic acid effect.
11	3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in tissues from normal and ketonaemic sheep	Hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in the tissues of normal sheep and ketoneemic sheep.
11	synthesis of plastoquinone analogs and inhibition of photosynthetic and mammalian enzyme systems	Plastoquinone analogs and inhibition of photosynthetic and mammalian enzyme systems.
11	reversible transformation by urea of contact inhibited fibroblasts	Reversible urea transformation of contact inhibits fibroblasts.
11	intramitochondrial glycogen in hypertrophied infundibular muscle of patients with congenital heart diseases	Intramitochondrial glycogen (IMG) in hypertrophied infundibular muscle of patients with congenital heart disease.
11	platelets in hyperacute rejection of heterotopic cardiac allografts in presensitized dogs an experimental study	"""A randomized trial of a hyperacute rejection of heterotopic heart allografts in a presensizing dog,"" J. Am."
11	lanthanum in heart cell culture effect on calcium exchange correlated with its localization	In cardiac cell cultures, the effect of lanthanum on the apos; calcium exchange was correlated with its localization.
11	calcium as mediator of isoproterenol induced myocardial necrosis	Calcium mediated isoproterenol induced myocardial necrosis.
11	acute villous inflammation in the placenta following intrauterine transfusion	Acute villositary inflammation of the placenta following d' intravenous transfusion,-uterine.
11	role of muscarinic cholinergic receptors in regulation of guanosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate content in mammalian brain heart muscle and intestinal smooth muscle	The role of muscarinic cholinergic receptors in the regulation of cyclic monophosphate content of guanosine 3-5 in mammalian cerebral cardiac and intestinal smooth muscle.
11	light and electron microscopic changes in the myocardium of influenza infected turkeys	Changes in the myocardium of diseased turkeys; influenza infection by light and electron microscopy.
11	responses of the protein deficient rabbit to staphylococcal bacteremia	The rabbit's protein-deficient response to staphylococcal bacteremia.
11	myocardial aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase and aminoacyl transferring enzyme activity	L' aminoacyl myocardium transfer l' ribonucleic acid synthetase and l' aminoacyl transfer l' enzyme activity.
11	kinetics of calcium accumulation in acute myocardial ischemic injury	Kinetics of the apos; calcium accumulation in acute ischemic myocardial lesion.
11	reduction of experimental myocardial infarct size by corticosteroid administration	Reduction in size; experimental myocardial infarction with apos; administration of corticosteroids.
11	development of sensitivity to tetrodotoxin in beating chick embryo hearts single cells and aggregates	The development of tetrodotoxin sensitivity in human hearts; chick embryos beating individual cells and aggregates.
11	evidence for boundary lipid in membranes	Evidence for the presence of boundary lipids in membranes.
11	the pathological diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction preliminary results of a who cooperative study	Pathological diagnosis of apos; acute myocardial infarction Preliminary results from a collaborative study conducted by Who.
11	carnitine and brown adipose tissue metabolism in the rat during development	Metabolism of brown adipose tissue and carnitine during development in rats.
11	a morphometric study on the nexus of rat cardiac muscle	A morphometric study of the relationship between rat heart muscle and rat heart muscle.
11	characterization of adrenoceptors in the myocardium	Characterization of adrenoceptors in myocardium.
11	the activities of phosphorylase hexokinase phosphofructokinase lactate dehydrogenase and the glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenases in muscles from vertebrates and invertebrates	L' phosphorylase hexokinase phosphofructokinase lactate dehydrogenase and glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase activities in vertebrate and invertebrate muscle.
11	cell free protein synthesis in heart and skeletal muscles from polymyopathic hamsters	Synthesis of cell-free proteins in the heart and skeletal muscles of polymyopathic hamsters.
11	evidence for defective transfer ribonucleic acid in polymyopathic hamsters and its inhibitory effect on protein synthesis	Evidence of a defective transfer of l' ribonucleic acid in polymyopathic hamsters and its inhibitory effect on protein synthesis.
11	the effect of sulfonylurea drugs on rabbit myocardial contractility canine purkinje fiber automaticity and adenyl cyclase activity from rabbit and human hearts	The effect of sulfonylurea drugs on canine purkin fiber myocardial contractility and adenyl cyclase activity from rabbit and human heart.
11	a quantitative assay for intercellular adhesion	Quantitative dosage of apos; intercellular adhesion.
11	the enzymic properties of a modified ox heart myosin adenosine triphosphatase on covalent binding to an insoluble cellulose matrix	The enzymatic properties of the bovine heart adenosine triphosphatase modified on covalent binding to an insoluble cellulose matrix.
11	ultrastructural studies of beef heart mitochondria 3 the inequality of gross morphological change and oxidative phosphorylation	Ultrastructural studies of mitochondria 3 of the beef heart, crude morphological changes, and oxidative phosphorylation.
11	heart failure and neonatal hypocalcaemia	Heart failure and neonatal hypocalcemia.
11	specificity of serum creatine kinase isoenzymes in diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction	Specificity of serum creatine kinase isoenzymes in the diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction.
11	transcription of spontaneously released bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid in frog auricles	Transcription of l' bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid spontaneously released into frog auricles.
11	experimental induction of atheroarteriosclerosis by the synergy of allergic injury to arteries and lipid rich diet ii effect of repeatedly injected foreign protein in rabbits fed a lipid rich cholesterol poor diet	Experimental induction of apo; atherosclerosis by apo synergism; an allergic lesion to arteries and a high-fat diet ii effect; repeated injections of foreign proteins into rabbits fed a low-fat cholesterol diet.
11	experimental induction of atheroarteriosclerosis by the synergy of allergic injury to arteries and lipid rich diet 3 the role of earlier acquired fibromuscular intimal thickening in the pathogenesis of later developing atherosclerosis	Experimental induction of apo; atherosclerosis by the synergism of allergic lesions to arteries and to the high-fat diet 3 the role of apo; intimal thickening of the fibro-muscular muscle acquired earlier in the pathogenesis of the further development of apo; atherosclerosis.
11	oscillation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate concentration during the myocardial contraction cycle	Dapos concentration oscillation; cyclic adenosine monophosphate during myocardial contraction cycle.
11	experimental calcification of the myocardium ultrastructural and histochemical investigations	Ultrastructural and histochemical studies of the myocardium are experimental calcifications.
11	evidence for delayed development of the glucagon receptor of adenylate cyclase in the fetal and neonatal rat heart	A delay in the development of the glucagonic receptor of the adenylate cyclase in fetal and neonatal rat heart.
11	ultrastructural changes of coronary artery endothelium associated with biliary obstruction in the rat	Ultrastructural changes in the apos; endothelium of the apos; coronary artery associated with biliary obstruction in rat.
11	total and effective coronary blood flow in coronary and noncoronary heart disease	Total and effective coronary blood flow in both coronary and non-coronary heart disease.
11	evidence against the incorporation into protein of amino acids directly from the membrane transport system in rat heart	Evidence against apo; protein incorporation in apo; amino acids arising directly from the membrane transport system in rat heart.
11	the changing pattern of ischemic heart disease	Evolution of ischemic heart disease.
11	the calcium pump of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum functional alterations at different levels of thyroid state in rabbits	Calcium pump of functional alterations of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum at different levels of the liver; thyroid status in rabbits.
11	the effect of prolonged administration of ethanol on cardiac metabolism and performance in the dog	The effects of prolonged administration of ethanol on cardiac performance and metabolism in dogs.
11	the neurogenic vasoconstrictor effect of digitalis on coronary vascular resistance	L' neurogenic vasoconstrictor effect of digitalin on coronary vascular resistance.
11	radiation induced cardiomyopathy i an electron microscopic study of cardiac muscle cells	Cardiomyopathy induced by radiation i an electron microscopic study of cardiac muscle cells.
11	significance of multiple intercalated discs in hypertrophied human myocardium	The importance of multiple disks intercalated in the hypertrophied human myocardium.
11	tissue distribution and metabolism of aflatoxin b 1 14 c in broiler chickens	Tissue distribution and metabolism of apos; aflatoxin b 114 c in broiler chickens.
11	the apparent stimulation of proteolysis by adenosine triphosphate in tissue homogenates	The apparent stimulation of proteolysis by etapos; adenosine triphosphate in tissue homogenates.
11	the interaction of the calcium binding protein troponin c with bivalent cations and the inhibitory protein troponin i	The interaction of troponin c, a calcium-binding protein, with divalent cations and troponin i, an inhibitory protein, with troponin i.
11	studies on partially reduced mammalian cytochrome oxidase reactions with carbon monoxide and oxygen	Studies of the partially reduced reactions of mammalian cytochrome oxidase with carbon monoxide and oxygen.
11	isolation of nuclear acidic proteins from rat tissues characterization of acetylated liver nuclear acidic proteins	Isolate the acidic nuclear proteins from rat tissues to characterize the acidic hepatic acetylated proteins.
11	the myocardial interstitium its structure and its role in ionic exchange	The myocardial interstium is structured and plays a role in ion exchange.
11	spheroidal bodies in the junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum of lizard myocardial cells	Spheroidal body within the junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum of lizard myocardial cells.
11	membrane junctions in the intermembrane space of mitochondria from mammalian tissues	Membrane junctions in the intermembrane space of mammalian tissue mitochondria.
11	dna synthesis and mitosis in well differentiated mammalian cardiocytes	Synthesis of DNA synthesis and mitosis in well-differentiated mammalian cardiocytes.
11	changes in enzyme activities in tissues of rats exposed to hypoxia	Changes in enzyme activities in tissues of hypoxia-exposed rats.
11	the specific radioactivity of the precursor pool for estimates of the rate of protein synthesis	The specific radioactivity of the precursor pool for its estimates of protein synthesis rate.
11	inhibition of cell proliferation in the livers of hepatectomized rats by a rabbit hepatic chalone	L' inhibition of cell proliferation in the liver of rats hepatectomized by a rabbit hepatic chalone.
11	cytochrome c observation of numerous single carbon sites of the reduced and oxidized species by means of natural abundance 13c nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy	Assisted by abundant natural 13c nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy, cytochrome c observations of numerous simple carbon sites of reduced and oxidized species.
11	morphometric data on the endothelium of blood capillaries	Morphometric data on apos; endothelium of the blood capillaries.
11	microbodies peroxisomes containing catalase in myocardium morphological and biochemical evidence	The peroxisome microbodies containing catalase in the myocardium show morphological and biochemical evidence.
11	the effects of dipyridamole on blood flow and oxygen handling in the acutely ischaemic and normal canine myocardium	The effects of dipyridamole on blood flow and canine oxygen handling in the acute and normal ischemic myocardium.
11	pathology of murine cytomegalovirus infection in newborn mice muscle heart and brown fat lesions	Mouse cytomegalovirus infection in mouse newborn heart and brown fat lesions.
11	tetrodotoxin desensitization in aggregates of embryonic chick heart cells	The desensitization to tetrodotoxin in aggregates of embryonic heart cells of chickens.
11	sudden death in infancy a study of cardiac specialized tissue	Sudden infant death, study of specialized cardiac tissues.
11	a study of human cardiac allograft in a patient with four year survival	A Dapos study; a human cardiac allograft in a 4-year survival patient.
11	histopathology of early myocardial infarcts a new approach	Histopathology of early myocardial infarction is a new approach.
11	detection of protein subunits of ferritin in situ in cells by immunofluorescence	Immunofluorescence in situ detection of ferritin protein units in cells under-units.
11	primary neuropathic amyloidosis in three brothers	Primary neuropathic amyloidosis in three brothers.
11	the organic inorganic relationship in calcified mitochondria	The inorganic organic relationship in the calcified mitochondria.
11	the inhibition of histamine uptake and metabolism by burimamide in the guinea pig atrium and in mouse neoplastic mast cells in vitro	Apos; inhibition of apos; absorption and metabolism of apos; burimamide histamine in guinea pig atrium and in neoplastic mast cells of mice in vitro.
11	synthesis and degradation of mitochondrial components in hypertrophied rat heart	Synthesis and degradation of mitochondrial constituents in the enlarged rat heart.
11	proton translocation coupled to quinol oxidation in ox heart mitochondria	Proton translocation coupled with l' quinol oxidation in beef heart mitochondria.
11	studies in rheumatic fever vi ultrastructure of chronic rheumatic heart disease	Rheumatic fever (RHF) ultrastructural studies of chronic rheumatic heart disease.
11	effect of inhibition of lipolysis on infarct size after experimental coronary artery occlusion	Effect of apos; inhibition of lipolysis on the size of the apos; infarction of the apos after experimental apos occlusion; coronary artery.
11	reduction of ferricytochrome c by dithionite ion electron transfer by parallel adjacent and remote pathways	Reduction of ferricytochrome c by d-apos transfer; dithionite ions by adjacent and distant parallel channels.
11	rate of uptake of endogenous cortisol by the left ventricle of the anaesthetized dog during ventilation with ambient air and during hypoxia	Dapos; endogenous cortisol absorption by the left ventricle of anesthetized dog during ventilation with apos; ambient air and during apos; hypoxia.
11	effect of a transient period of ischemia on myocardial cells ii fine structure during the first few minutes of reflow	Effect of delay; transient period of onset; ischemia on myocardial cells ii fine structure during first minutes of reflux.
11	intracytoplasmic junctions in cardiac muscle cells	Intracytoplasmic functions in the cardiac muscle cells.
11	investigation of the physiological basis for increased exercise threshold for angina pectoris after physical conditioning	Examination of physiological basis; increased baseline effort; angina pectoris after physical condition.
11	the molecular weight and thiol residues of acetyl coenzyme a synthetase from ox heart mitochondria	The molecular weight and thiol residues of the etapos; acetyl coenzyme a synthetase of bovine heart mitochondria.
11	relatedness among contractile and membrane proteins evidence for evolution from common ancestral genes	The relationship between contractile and membrane proteins is evidence of evolution from common ancestral genes.
11	intracellular calcium binding and release in frog heart	Fixation and release of frog heart intracellular calcium.
11	mechanisms for intracellular calcium regulation in heart i stopped flow measurements of ca uptake by cardiac mitochondria	The mechanisms by which intracellular calcium is regulated in the i heart have stopped measurements of ca uptake by cardiac mitochondria.
11	myocardial function and lipid metabolism in the chronic alcoholic animal	Myocardial functions and lipid metabolism in chronic alcoholic animals.
11	coronary hemodynamics and regional myocardial metabolism in experimental aortic insufficiency	Coronary hemodynamics and regional myocardial metabolism in experimental aortic failure.
11	antigenic cross reaction between mouse intestine and a member of the autochthonous microflora	Antigenic reaction between the intestine of a mouse and a member of the native microflora.
11	electron transfer reactions in biological systems the reduction of ferricytochrome c by chromous ions	D&apos transfer reactions; electrons in biological systems reduction of ferricytochrome c by chromium ions.
11	the effect of acute fatigue on organ proteins and protein fractions	The effect of acute fatigue on the body's proteins and on protein fractions.
11	synthesis and properties of some cyclic amp alkyl phosphotriesters	Synthesis and properties of some alkyl ampoules cyclic phosphotriesters.
11	subendocardial ischemia provoked by tachycardia in conscious dogs with coronary stenosis	Ischemia at-endocardium caused by tachycardia in conscious dogs with coronary stenosis.
11	cor triatriatum study of 20 cases	Cor triatriatum study of 20 cases.
11	primary cardiomyopathy in identical twins	Primary cardiomyopathy in identical twins.
11	bacterial endocarditis in subjects 60 years of age and older	Bacterial endocarditis among those 60 years of age and older.
11	anatomically corrected malposition of the great arteries s d l	Malposition of major arteries anatomically corrected.
11	ultrastructure of crista supraventricularis muscle in patients with congenital heart diseases associated with right ventricular outflow tract obstruction	Ultrastructure of crista supraventricularis muscle in patients with congenital heart associated with right ventricular outflow tract obstruction.
11	clinical use of sodium nitroprusside in chronic ischemic heart disease effects on peripheral vascular resistance and venous tone and on ventricular volume pump and mechanical performance	Clinical use of sodium nitroprusside in the effects of chronic ischemic heart disease on peripheral vascular resistance and venous tone, as well as on ventricular volume pump and mechanical performance.
11	de subitaneis mortibus x familial congential heart block	Subsentianeis mortibus x family congential heart block.
11	electrophoresis on cellulose acetate and chromatography on deae sephadex a 50 compared in the estimation of creatine kinase isoenzymes	Cellulose acetate gel electrophoresis and deae sephadex a 50 chromatography were compared in vitro; estimates of creatine kinase isoenzymes were estimated.
11	improvement of myocardial and other vital organ functions and metabolism with a simple method of pulsatile flow iabp during clinical cardiopulmonary bypass	Improvement of myocardial and d&apos functions and metabolism; other vital organs by a simple iabp pulsatile flow method during clinical pulmonary bypass graft.
11	further characterization of tissue distribution and metabolism of 14c aflatoxin b1 in chickens	Further characterization of tissue distribution and metabolism in chickens; aflatoxin b1-14c.
11	hypercalcemia and calcinosis in florida horses implication of the shrub cestrum diurnum as the causative agent	Hypercalcemia and calcinosis in Florida horses are associated with apos; cestrum diurnum shrub as causative agent.
11	the development of cardiac myxomas and papillary endocardial lesions from mural thrombus	The development of cardiac myxoma and endocardial papillary lesions from a wall thrombus.
11	influence of perfusion pressure and heart rate on local myocardial flow in the collateralized heart with chronic coronary occlusion	Influence of perfusion pressure and heart rate on local myocardial output in collateralized heart with chronic coronary occlusion.
11	effect of stimulation site on ventricular threshold in dogs with heart block	Effect of cardiac arrest; a site of ventricular threshold stimulation in dogs with cardiac blockade.
11	comparison of the effects of histamine and tolazoline on adenylate cyclase activity from guinea pig heart	Comparison of the effects of apos, histamine and tolazoline on apos; guinea pig heart activity; adenylate cyclase.
11	inhibition of mitochondrial electron transport by hydroxy substituted 1 4 quinones	L' inhibition of mitochondrial electron transport by 14-quinone-substituted hydroxyquinones.
11	the actions of a new beta adrenoceptor blocking drug ici 66082 on the rabbit papillary muscle and on the dog heart	The actions of a new beta drug blocking the adrenoreceptors here 66082 on the papillary muscle of the rabbit and on the heart of the dog.
11	studies on cytochrome oxidase interactions of the cytochrome oxidase protein with phospholipids and cytochrome c	Studies of the cytochrome oxidase interaction of protein cytochrome oxidase with phospholipids and cytochrome c.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes of salmonid fish evidence for unique and rapid functional divergence of duplicated h 4 lactate dehydrogenases	The isoenzymes of salmonid lactate dehydrogenase indicate a unique and rapid functional divergence of the duplicated h4 lactate dehydrogenases.
11	myocardial and total body extractions of radiorubidium in anesthetized dogs	Total body and myocardial extractions of radiorubidium in anesthetized dogs.
11	relationship between theophylline uptake and inotropic effect in the guinea pig heart	Theapos ratio; theophylline absorption and apos; inotropic effect in guinea pig heart.
11	amyloid in the aged heart frequency and clinical significance	Amyloid in heart rate of elderly and clinical significance.
11	myocardial infarction complicating bacterial endocarditis in rheumatic heart disease report of a case and review of the literature	Complicating myocardial infarction; bacterial endocarditis in rheumatic heart disease: a case report and literature review.
11	competitive inhibition of beef heart cyclic amp phosphodiesterase by cytokinins and related compounds	Competitive inhibition of bovine heart phosphodiesterase by cytokinins and related compounds.
11	aberrations of cyclic nucleotide metabolism in the hearts and vessels of hypertensive rats	Aberrations of cyclic nucleotide metabolism in hearts and vessels of hypertensive rats.
11	direct selective myocardial revascularization by internal mammary artery coronary vein anastomosis	Direct selective myocardial revascularization by anastomosis of the l&apos coronary vein; internal mammary artery.
11	cardiovascular calcification associated with nephritis in a badger	Cardiovascular Calcification Associated with Nephritis in a Badger.
11	identification and measurement of plasticizer in neonatal tissues after umbilical catheters and blood products	Identification and measurement of plasticizer in neonatal tissue after birth; use of umbilical catheters and blood products.
11	prediction of secondary structure of proteins a comparison of the phi psi angles previously predicted for cytochrome c with recent x ray crystallographic findings	Prediction of secondary structure by comparing previously predicted phi psi angles for cytochrome c with recent X-ray crystallographic results.
11	scanning electron microscopy of the heart after coronary occlusion	Scanning electron microscopy of the heart after a coronary occlusion.
11	mitochondrial changes in dog myocardium induced by lowered ph in vitro	Mitochondrial changes in dog myocardium induced by a decrease in ph in vitro.
11	the mechanism of myocardial protection from ischemic arrest by intracoronary tetrodotoxin administration	Mechanism of myocardial protection against apos; ischemic arrest by apos; intracoronary tetrodotoxin administration.
11	hemodynamic characteristics of critical stenosis in canine coronary arteries	Hemodynamic characteristics of critical stenosis in the canine coronary arteries.
11	a method of closed chest cannulation of the left atrium for left atrial femoral artery bypass	Procedure for closed chest canalation of the apos; left atrium for bypass of the apos; left femoral artery.
11	differences in amine storage in rat heart and brain	Differences in storage of amine in rat heart and brain.
11	comparative effects of left atrial or left ventricular bypass on coronary sinus flow and oxygen usage in dogs	The comparative effects of coronary artery bypass graft; left atrium or left ventricle on coronary sinus flow and vestibule; use of apos; oxygen in dogs.
11	isotonic contraction and contracture of the isolated right rat ventricle effect of la3 prenylamine atp mg2 author s transl	Isotonic contraction and contracture of the apos; right ventricular effect isolated from prenylamine la3 atp mg2 translator.
11	endogenous cyclic adenosine monophosphate in tissues of rabbits fed an atherogenic diet	Endogenous cyclic adenosine monophosphate (CDM) in tissues of rabbits fed an atherogenic diet.
11	investigation of the evi antibody in parasitic diseases other than american trypanosomiasis an anti skeletal muscle antibody in leishmaniasis	Study of apo; antibody for parasitic diseases other than American trypanosomiasis, an anti-@ skeletal muscle antibody in leishmaniasis.
11	individual organ contributions to the decrease in whole body vo2 with isoflurane	Contribution of each organ to decrease of whole body vo2 with isoflurane.
11	myocardial injury from transthoracic defibrillator countershock	Myocardial injury caused by shock to the transthoracic defibrillator.
11	reticulum cell sarcoma of the heart	It's a sarcoma of the cells of the reticulum of the heart.
11	distribution and properties of cholinesterases in subcellular fractions from rat jejunum and heart tissue	Distribution and properties of cholinesterases in the subcellular fractions of rat jejunum and cardiac tissue.
11	conformational studies of equilibrium structures in fragments of horse heart cytochrome c	Conformational studies of the d&apos structures; equilibrium in horse heart cytochrome c fragments.
11	dependence of the cardiac uptake of digitalis glycosides on the extracellular calcium concentration in guinea pig isolated hearts	The dependence of cardiac uptake of digital glycosides on extracellular calcium concentration in isolated guinea pig heart tissue.
11	the present status of heart transplantation	L' current state of the heart transplant.
11	the inhibition of c amp phosphodiesterase by phenobarbitone	L' inhibition of c amp phosphodiesterase by phenobarbitone.
11	myocardial lactate metabolism during isometric hand grip test comparison with pacing tachycardia	Myocardial lactate metabolism during isometric hand grip comparison with tachycardia.
11	conformational isomerism and effective redox geometry in the oxidation of heme proteins by alkyl halides cytochrome c and cytochrome oxidase	Conformational isomerism and effective redox geometry in apos; heme protein oxidation by halides d' alkyl, cytochrome c, and cytochrome oxidase.
11	effects of physical training on several glycolytic enzymes in rat heart	Physical training on several glycolytic enzymes in the rat heart.
11	x ray diffraction study of muscles in disease	A study of muscle X-ray diffraction in disease.
11	wolff parkinson white syndrome a fatal case in a girl with no other heart disease	Parkinson's Syndrome-Wolff is a fatal case in a young girl who has no other heart disease.
11	distribution and excretion of two chlorinated biphenyl isomers 4 chlorobiphenyl and decachlorobiphenyl in lactating bovine	Distribution and excretion of two chlorinated biphenyl isomers, chlorobiphenyl 4 and decachlorobiphenyl, in lactating cattle.
11	systolic time intervals in domestic ponies alterations in a case of coarctation of the aorta	Systolic time intervals in domestic ponies alterations in a coarctation of the aorta.
11	immunofluorescent localization of glycogenolytic and glycolytic enzyme proteins and of malate dehydrogenase isozymes in cross striated skeletal muscle and heart of the rabbit	Immunofluorescence localization of glycogenolytic and glycolytic enzyme proteins and malate dehydrogenase isozymes in rabbit skeletal muscle and rabbit heart.
11	the ultra structural localization of enzyme activity in unfixed sections	The ultra-structural localization of l' enzyme activity in unfixed sections.
11	myocardial infarction in the newborn a case report complicated by cardiogenic shock and associated with normal coronary arteries	Myocardial infarction in newborn @-@, a case report complicated by cardiogenic shock and associated with normal coronary arteries.
11	cardiac pathology after aortic valve replacement using hufnagel trileaflet prostheses a study of 20 necropsy patients	Cardiac pathology after aortic valve replacement; hufnagel trileaflast prosthesis replacement, study of 20 necropical patients.
11	scanning electron microscopy of cardiac endothelium of the dog	Scanning electron microscopy of dog cardiac endothelium.
11	the heart in systemic lupus erythematosus and the changes induced in it by corticosteroid therapy a study of 36 necropsy patients	Heart in disseminated lupus erythematosus and changes induced by corticosteroid treatment a study of 36 necropsy patients.
11	dissociations between changes in myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate and contractility	Dissolution between changes in the myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate and contractility.
11	a permeability test for the study of mitochondrial injury in in vitro cultured heart muscle and endothelioid cells	A permeability test for apo; study of mitochondrial lesions in cardiac muscle and endotheloid cells cultured in vitro.
11	the lysosomal permeability test modified for toxicity testing with cultured heart endothelioid cells	The lysosomal permeability test was modified for the endothelial cell toxicity tests in cultured cardiac cells.
11	localization in cardiac muscle of some enzymes related to glutamate metabolism	Cardiac muscle localization of certain enzymes related to glutamate metabolism.
11	lipid specificity of beta hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase activation	Lipid specificity of the peptide; beta activation-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase.
11	regulation of long chain fatty acid activation in heart muscle	Regulation of the fatty acid receptor; activation of long-chain fatty acids in cardiac muscle.
11	purification and regulatory properties of chicken heart prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase	Purity and regulatory properties of prostaglandin and 9 ketoreductase from chicken heart.
11	kinetics of adenosine triphosphate synthesis in bovine heart submitochondrial particles	Kinetics of l&apos synthesis; adenosine triphosphate in the heart of bovine submitochondrial particles.
11	chemical modification of bovine heart mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase selective modification of cysteine and histidine	Chemical modification of beef heart mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase, selective modification of cysteine and l' histidine.
11	acyl coa inhibition of adenine nucleotide translocation in ischemic myocardium	L' acyl coa inhibits the translocation of adenine nucleotides into ischemic myocardium.
11	reciprocal synapses between cholinergic axons and small granule containing cells in the rat cardiac ganglion	Reciprocal synapses between the cholinergic axons and small granules containing cells in the rat cardiac ganglion.
11	halothane and the beating response and atp turnover rate of heart cells in tissue culture	Halothane and the rate of turnover of atps from heart cells in tissue cultures.
11	golgi organelle response to the antibiotic x537a	Reaction of golgi organelles to x537a antibiotic.
11	effects of magnesium on the kinetic properties of bovine heart glycogen synthase d	Effects of magnesium on the kinetic properties of glycogen synthase in beef heart d.
11	effects of thyroid hormones on enzymes involved in fatty acid and glycerolipid synthesis	Effects of thyroid hormones on enzymes involved in synthesis of fatty acids and glycerolipids.
11	the role of extracellular materials in cell movement i inhibition of mucopolysaccharide synthesis does not stop ruffling membrane activity or cell movement	The role of extracellular materials in cell movement, inhibition of mucopolysaccharide synthesis, n&apos, does not prevent cell activity, or cell movement.
11	studies of intercellular invasion in vitro using rabbit peritoneal neutrophil granulocytes pmns i role of contact inhibition of locomotion	Apo studies; in vitro intercellular invasion at apo; peritoneal granulocyte peritoneal neutrophils of rabbit pmns i role of apo; inhibition of locomotion contact.
11	characteristics of mitochondrial and microsonal monoacyl and diacylglycerol 3 phosphate biosynthesis in rabbit heart	Characteristics of mitochondrial and microsonal biosynthesis of monoacyl and diacylglycerol 3 phosphate in rabbit heart.
11	myocardial perfusion and metabolism at normothermic and hypothermic levels	Myocardial perfusion and metabolism to the normothermic and hypothermic levels.
11	distribution of coronary arterial flow in acute myocardial ischemia	Distribution of arterial coronary flow in acute myocardial ischemia ischia.
11	preliminary results of examinations of rats after a 22 day flight aboard the cosmos 605 biosatellite	Preliminary results of a rat examination after a 22-day flight on the 605 cosmos biosatellite.
11	mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase location of sulfhydryl groups and disulfide bonds in soluble enzyme from beef heart	Mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase location of sulfhydryl groups and disulfide linkages in soluble enzyme from beef heart.
11	beef heart submitochondrial particles a mixture of mitochondrial inner and outer membranes	The heart of beef contains mitochondrial particles, a mixture of mitochondrial inner and outer membranes.
11	kinetics of carbon monoxide binding and electron transfer by cytochrome c polymers	The kinetics of carbon monoxide binding and electron transfer by polymers of cytochrome c.
11	viable amphibian hybrids produced by circumventing a block to cross fertilization rana clamitans female x rana catesbeiana male	Viable amphibian hybrids were produced by circumventing a rana clamitans female × rana catesbeiana male cross-fertilization block.
11	hypersensitivity of delayed type manifested during the development of allergic lesions of the myocardium	Delayed hypersensitivity is manifested during the development of allergic myocardial lesions.
11	how does angiotensin ii increase cardiac dopamine beta hydroxylation	How does l' angiotensin ii increase-t-it l' beta hydroxylation of cardiac dopamine?
11	fatty acid binding protein in small intestine identification isolation and evidence for its role in cellular fatty acid transport	The fatty acid binding protein in the intestine; identification of the small intestine and evidence of its role in fatty acid transport.
11	cellular reactivity studies to streptococcal antigens migration inhibition studies in patients with streptococcal infections and rheumatic fever	Cellular Reactivity Studies to Streptococcus Antigen Dapo studies; inhibition of migration in patients with apo; streptococcal and rheumatic fever infections.
11	effects of verapamil on myocardial contractility cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and heart phosphorylase	Effects of verapamil on cardiac myocardial contractility Adenosine 3,5 monophosphate and cardiac phosphorylase.
11	alteration in oxyhemoglobin equilibrium p 50 and myocardial oxygen consumption mvo2 by nitroglycerin gtn	Modification of apo, apo, apo balance, p50 oxygen and myocardial consumption of apo, and gtn oxygen mvo2 by nitroglycerin.
11	time course for reversal of electrophysiological and ultrastructural abnormalities in subendocardial purkinje fibers surviving extensive myocardial infarction in dogs	L' temporal evolution of apos; reversal of electrophysiological and ultrastructural abnormalities in subendocardial purkinje fibres survived a major myocardial infarction in the dog.
11	a model of psychosocial hypertension showing reversibility and progression of cardiovascular complications	D&apos model; psychosocial hypertension showing reversibility and progression of the cardiovascular complications.
11	effect of the thyroid state on the enzymatic characteristics of cardiac myosin a difference in behavior of rat and rabbit cardiac myosin	Effect of apos; thyroid status on cardiac myosin enzymatic characteristics, a difference in rat and rabbit cardiac myosin behaviour.
11	anoxia induced release of prostaglandins in rabbit isolated hearts	Anoxia induced the release of prostaglandins into isolated rabbit hearts.
11	the heart as a target organ in systemic allergic reactions comparison of cardiac analphylaxis in vivo and in vitro	The heart as a target organ in systemic allergic reactions; comparison of cardiac analgesia in vivo and in vitro.
11	in vitro acetylcholine biosynthesis in normal and failing guinea pig hearts	In vitro biosynthesis of l' acetylcholine in normal and failing guinea pig hearts.
11	persistence of mb isoenzyme of creatine phosphokinase in the serum after minor iatrogenic cardiac trauma absence of postmortem evidence of myocardial infarction	Persistence of creatine phosphokinase mb isoenzyme in serum after minor iatrogenic cardiac injury, in the absence of signs post @-@mortem d' myocardial infarction.
11	thallium 201 for myocardial imaging relation of thallium 201 to regional myocardial perfusion	Thallium 201 for the d'apos relation; myocardial imaging of thallium 201 to the regional myocardial infusion.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xi young girl with palpitations	Subtanus mortibus xi young girl with palpitations.
11	identification of nerve fibres in the scanning electron microscope	Nerve fiber identification in the scanning electron microscope.
11	effect of exercise on tissue lipids and serum lipoproteins of rats fed two levels of fat	L' effect of apos; exercise on tissue lipids and serum lipoproteins in rats fed two fat levels.
11	modifications of plasma post heparin lipolytic activity and tissue lipoprotein lipase activity induced in the rat by acute administration of ethanol or propan 2 ol	Acute administration of apos, ethanol or propan 2 o, to rats with changes in apos; post-lipolytic activity of plasma heparin and apos; tissue lipoprotein lipase activity induced by apos; acute administration of apos; ethanol or propan 2 o.
11	selective coronary perfusion scintigraphy ii abnormal coronary perfusion pattern author s transl	Selective Scintigraphy of Coronary Infusion ii Abnormal pattern of coronary perfusion by a translator.
11	cardiac side effects of bencyclan	Side effects of bencyclan heart.
11	contractile myocardial proteins and their enzymatic activity in hypertensive disease and coronary atherosclerosis	Contractile myocardial proteins and their enzymatic activity in coronary atherosclerosis and hypertensive diseases.
11	characteristics of reaction of the coronary vessels and metabolism of the myocardium in changing over from high to low frequency electric stimulation of the heart	Characteristics of coronary vessel response and myocardial metabolism from high frequency electrical stimulation to low frequency electrical stimulation.
11	importance of determination of the content of lactate dehydrogenase and its isoenzymes in patients with myocardial infarct complicated by rupture of the heart	The importance of determining the content of lactate dehydrogenase and its isoenzymes in patients with apo; a myocardial infarction complicated by a ruptured heart.
11	cardiac responses to snout immersion in trained dogs	"""Heart responses to snout immersion in dogs dressed,"" J. Toxicol."
11	depression of contractile function and decrease of the effectiveness of oxygen utilization during compensatory heart hypertrophy	Decreased contractile function and decreased posture; efficacy of apo; use of apo; oxygen during apo; compensatory cardiac hypertrophy.
11	effect of trypsin like enzyme inhibitor on certain metabolic processes in the acute period of experimental myocardial ischemia	Effect of apos; trypsin inhibitory enzyme on certain metabolic processes during the acute period of aposemia; experimental myocardial ischemia.
11	the cardiac muscle in the pulmonary vein of the rat a morphological and electrophysiological study	Heart muscle in rat pulmonary vein a morphological and electrophysiological study.
11	autoantibodies against heartmuscle sarcolemma in sera of patients with an idiopathic cardiomyopathy author s transl	Auto-antibody to the sarcolemma of the cardiac muscle in the serum of patients with idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
11	production and utilization of acetate in mammals	Production and use of apos acetate in mammals.
11	the specific radioactivity of the tissue free amino acid pool as a basis for measuring the rate of protein synthesis in the rat in vivo	The specific radioactivity of the tissue free amino acid (FLA) pool as the basis for measuring the rate of protein synthesis in rats in vivo.
11	comparative studies on 3 oxo acid coenzyme a transferase from various rat tissues	Comparative studies on 3 oxo-acid coenzyme a transferase from various tissues of rats.
11	carnitine and trimethylaminobutyrate synthesis in rat tissues	Synthesis of carnitine and trimethylaminobutyrate in tissues of rats.
11	cardiomegaly in chronic anemia in ratsman experimental study including ultrastructural histometric and stereologic observations	Cardiomegaly in anemia in ratsman experimental study including ultrastructural histometric and stereological observations.
11	the surgical anatomy of pulmonary atresia with ventricular septal defect pseudotruncus	Surgical anatomy of the apos; pulmonary atresia with defective ventricular septation pseudotruncus.
11	the relationship between the bovine heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase lipophilic compounds and oligomycin	The relationship between lipophilic bovine heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase and l' oligomycin.
11	complexation of iron hexacyanides by cytochrome c evidence for electron exchange at the exposed heme edge	Complexation of the iron hexacyanides by cytochrome c suggests electron exchange at the exposed end of the apos; heme.
11	the role of cyclic gmp in the regulation of cyclic amp hydrolysis	The role of the cyclic gmp in the regulation of l' ampoule cyclic hydrolysis.
11	concentration of digoxin methyldigoxin digitoxin and ouabain in the myocardium of the dog following coronary occulsion	The concentration of digoxin digitoxin and ouabain in dog myocardium following coronary occlusion.
11	effects of zinc copper and manganese supplementation of high concentrate ration on digestibility growth and tissue content of holstein calves	Effects of zinc copper and manganese supplementation on high-concentration digestibility and tissue content of holstein calves.
11	isolation of a major cell surface glycoprotein from fibroblasts	To isolate a major glycoprotein from the cell surface of fibroblasts.
11	the calcium antagonistic fundamental effects of verapamil on myocardial fibers and smooth muscle cells of the blood vessels	The fundamental calcium antagonistic effects of verapamil on the myocardial fibers and smooth muscle cells of blood vessels.
11	key role of intracellular calcium overload in acute necrosis of the myocardium cardioprotection with verapamil	Key role of intracellular calcium overload in the acute necrosis of verapamil cardiomyocardial cardioprotection.
11	verapamil in the study and treatment of supraventricular tachycardias with special reference to pre excitation	Verapamil in the study and treatment of supraventricular tachycardia, especially pre-excitation.
11	membrane response to current pulses in spheroidal aggregates of embryonic heart cells	The membrane response to current impulses in spheroidal aggregates of embryonic cardiac cells.
11	an asparagine requirement in young rats fed the dietary combinations of aspartic acid glutamine and glutamic acid	An asparagine requirement was observed in young rats fed aspartic acid, glutamine, and glutamic acid combinations.
11	fatal iron heart in an adolescent biochemical and ultrastructural aspects of the heart	"""Fatal iron heart in an adolescent biochemical and ultrastructural aspects of the heart,"" Am J Obstet Gynecol, M.J. et al."
11	contractile function of the myocardium of the right ventricle in thyrotoxicosis	Contractile functions of right ventricular myocardium in thyrotoxicosis.
11	experimental thyrotoxicosis under conditions preventin hyperlipacidemia	Experimental thyrotoxicosis under conditions which prevent hyperlipacidemia.
11	cardiac hypertrophy in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Cardiac hypertrophy in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
11	prevention of hereditary cardiomyopathy in the hamster by verapamil and other agents	Prevention of hereditary cardiomyopathy in hamster by the use of verapamil and d' other agents.
11	apparent volumes of distribution of 125 i lothalamate and inulin in chickens	The apparent volume of distribution of 125 i lothalamate and l' inulin in chickens.
11	tolerance of altitude acclimatized rats to exercise in the cold	The tolerance of rats acclimatized to high altitude encouraged them to exercise in the cold.
11	effects of obstruction of cardiac lymphatics	The Effects of Lapse; Obstruction of Cardiac Lymphatics.
11	increased collagen synthesis in blood vessels of hypertensive rats and its reversal by antihypertensive agents	Increased synthesis of collagen in blood vessels from hypertensive rats and its inversion by antihypertensive agents were increased.
11	macroscopic enzyme mapping verification of large homogeneous experimental myocardial infarcts of predictable size and location in dogs	Verification of macroscopic enzyme mapping of homogeneous large experimental myocardial infarcts of expected size and localization in the dog.
11	the effect of different methods of protecting the myocardium on lysosomal activation and acid phosphatase activity in the dog heart after one hour of cardiopulmonary bypass	L' effect of different myocardial protection methods on apos; lysosomal activation and l' acid phosphatase activity in dog heart after one hour of cardiopulmonary bypass surgery.
11	a mitochondrial carnitine acylcarnitine translocase system	The mitochondrial system of carnitine acylcarnitine translocase.
11	on the question of translocation of heart camp dependent protein kinase	On the issue of the translocation of cardiac camp-dependent protein kinase.
11	myocardial extraction of labeled long chain fatty acid analogs 38509	Myocardial extraction of labelled long-chain fatty acid analogues 38509.
11	release of prostaglandin from the rabbit isolated heart following vagal nerve stimulation or acetylcholine infusion	Isolated rabbit heart prostaglandin release after vagus nerve stimulation or acetylcholine infusion.
11	nature of alkanes in beef heart lipids	Nature of alkanes in Beef Heart Lipids.
11	a23187 a calcium ionophore that directly increases cardiac contractility 38704	A23187, a calcium ionophore that directly increases 38704 cardiac contractility.
11	characteristics of artefacts following fixation with glutaraldehyde and osmium tetroxide	Artifact characteristics after fixation with osmium, glutaraldehyde and tetroxide.
11	anoxic myocardial lesions in man developed during extracorporeal circulation studied by electron microscopy	Anoxic myocardial lesions in male etapos developed during the extracorporeal circulation studied by electron microscopy.
11	early ischemic lesion of the myocardium in a case of unusual developmental anomaly of the coronary vessels and coronary thrombosis	Early ischemic myocardial injury in a case of abnormal development of coronary vessels and coronary thrombosis.
11	changes in the ultrastructure of cardiac muscle in steers deprived of copper	Changes in apos; cardiac muscle ultrastructure in copper-deprived steers.
11	potentation of the cardiac response to aminophylline by oxyfedrine	Potent cardiac response to apos; aminophylline via apos; oxyfedrin.
11	change in myoglobin content in rabbit and chicken muscles in ontogenesis	Changes in the myoglobin content of the rabbit and chicken muscles during ontogenesis.
11	histometrical estimation of scar tissue in hypertrophied human heart muscle	Histometric estimate of scar tissue in hypertrophied human cardiac muscle.
11	rna content in the heart muscle cells following adrenalectomy and additional overload in the rat	An increase in the number of cells in the heart muscle following an adrenalectomy and additional overload in the rat.
11	pathogenesis of mural thrombi in idiopathic cardiomyopathy	Pathogenesis of mural thrombiosis in idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the growth of heart cells	Lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) enzymes in cardiac cell growth.
11	catecholamine release as mediator of intracellular enzyme activation in ischaemic perfused rat hearts	Release of catecholamines mediating intracellular enzyme activation in perfused hearts from ischemic rats.
11	effects of pharmacological myocardial depression on coronary artery collateral formation	Effects of pharmacological myocardial depression on the collateral formation of coronary artery.
11	some aspects of lipid metabolism in fatty liver and kidney syndrome in chicks	Aspects of lipid metabolism in foie gras and kidney disease in chicks.
11	tissue lipid composition in fatty liver and kidney syndrome in chicks	Fatty tissue composition in foie gras and kidney syndrome in chicks.
11	the effect of microbial contemination of the air on metabolic indices in broiler chickens	The effect of microbial taleings on metabolic indices in broiler chickens.
11	histochemical and histoenzymatic study of experimental myocardial infarction in the rat by temporary and permanent ligation of the left coronary artery author s transl	Histochemical and histoenzymatic study of rat myocardial infarction by temporary and permanent ligation of the translocation of the apos; left apos coronary artery.
11	cardiac heterotransplantation morphological and immunohistological studies	Morphological and immunohistological studies of ectomycorrhizal heart transplants.
11	anomalous coronary artery origin and bicuspid aortic valve	Abnormal origin of the apos; coronary artery and aortic valve bicuspid.
11	acetylcholine content in the brain and heart of developing rats	Acetylcholine content of brain and heart of developing rats.
11	ca 2 mg 2 dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase and its activator protein	Approximately 2 mg 2 cyclic nucleotides dependent on phosphodiesterase and its activating protein.
11	relationship between cyclic amp metabolism and inotropic response of perfused rat hearts to phenylephrine and other adrenergic amines	Relationship between l&apos metabolism; cyclic ampoule and the inotropic response of perfused rat hearts to phenylephrine and d' other adrenergic amines.
11	cardia venous blood flow in atrial pacing versus exercise induced angina pectoris	Sarcophageal venous blood flow in atrial stimulation versus exercise training induced angina.
11	human intramyocardial oxygen detected through chronic polarographic electrodes	Human intramyocardial oxygen detected by use of chronic polarographic electrodes.
11	alkaline isomerization of ferricytochrome c identification of the lysine ligand	Alkali isomerization of ferricytochrome c Identification of the ligand lysine ligand.
11	metabolic stability of the protein synthesizing system of the myocardium in compensatory cardiac hyperfunction in actinomycin d block of rna synthesis	Metabolic stability of the myocardial protein synthesis system in the apos; compensatory cardiac hyperfunction of the apos; actinomycin blocking rna synthesis.
11	lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the myocardium and liver of rabbits with thyrotoxicosis	Lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase enzymes in the myocardium and liver of thyrotoxicosis-affected rabbits.
11	citrate content in the myocardium and liver of rabbits in starvation and thyrotoxicosis	The myocardium and liver of rabbits in fasting and thyrotoxicosis contain citrate.
11	ischemia in aortic stenosis hemodynamic prediction	Ischemia in aortic stenosis hemodynamic prediction, hemodynamic prediction.
11	effects of hypoxemia on the extent of myocardial necrosis after experimental coronary occlusion	Effects of apos; hypoxemia on apos; extent of myocardial necrosis following experimental coronary occlusion.
11	continuous measurement of myocardial oxygen consumption mvo2 and hemodynamic response during transapical left ventricular bypass talvb	Continuous measurement of myocardial mvo2 oxygen consumption and hemodynamic response during transapical left ventricular bypass.
11	thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura in four siblings	Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura in Four Sisterings.
11	relations between development of the capillary wall and myoarchitecture of the rat heart	Relationship between capillary wall development and rat heart myoarchitecture.
11	a new method for determination of postmortem left ventricular volumes clinico pathologic correlations	A new method for determining the clinical pathological correlations-ventricles of left ventricular volumes post-mortem.
11	effects of myocardial hypoxia and ischemia on myocardial scintigraphy	Effects of apos; hypoxia and apos; myocardial ischemia on myocardial scintigraphy.
11	inotropic and intracellular acid base changes during metabolic acidosis	Inotropic and intracellular acid bases are changed during metabolic acidosis.
11	effects of physical training on cardiac myosin atpase activity	Apos effects; physical training on apos; cardiac apos activity; cardiac myosin apase.
11	survival of cardiac xenografts effect of antithymocyte serum and enhancing heteroantiserum	Survival of cardiac xenografts, antithymocyte and antibody effects; increase in apos; heteroantium.
11	the effects of long term administration of 3h digoxin to the pregnant ewe upon the cardiovascular hemodynamics of the fetal lamb	Effects of apos; prolonged 3-h administration of digoxin to pregnant sheep; fetal lamb; cardiovascular hemodynamics of apos.
11	adenosine metabolism in cultured chick embryo heart cells	Apos metabolism; adenosine in cultured heart cells; embryonic chicken.
11	the nuclear membranes in hypertrophied human cardiac muscle cells	Nuclear membranes in hypertrophied human cardiac muscle cells.
11	functional architecture of the ligamentum arteriosum in adults	Functional architectures of adult ligamentum arteriosum ligamentum.
11	arteriopathia calcificans infantum	Arteriopathia calcificans infanum.
11	mitochondrial respiration in the ventricular myocardium and in the white and deep red myotomal muscles of juvenile tuna fish thunnus thynnus l	Mitochondrial respiration in the ventricular myocardium and dark red and white myotome muscles of juvenile thunnus thynnus l.
11	acid base changes and excitation contraction coupling in rabbit myocardium i effects on isometric tension development at different contraction frequencies	Variations in acid bases and excitation coupling in rabbit myocardium have effects on the development of isometric tension at different frequencies of contraction.
11	acid base changes and excitation contraction coupling in rabbit myocardium ii effects on resting membrane potential action potential characteristics and propagation velocity	Acid base changes and contraction coupling; excitation in rabbit myocardium ii effects on the characteristics of the d&apos potential; action of resting membrane potential and rate of propagation.
11	effects of myocardial infarction on adrenergic nerves of the rat heart muscle a histochemical study	Effects of apos; myocardial infarction (MI) on adrenergic nerves of rat heart muscle, histochemical study.
11	a mitochondrial monocarboxylate transporter in rat liver and heart and its possible function in cell control	A mitochondrial monocarboxylate transporter in rat liver and rat heart and its possible role in cellular control.
11	the mitochondrial pyruvate carrier kinetics and specificity for substrates and inhibitors	The kinetics and specificity of mitochondrial pyruvate carriers in the substrates and inhibitors.
11	toxicology of epidithio dioxopiperazines 1 studies on toxicity of cyclosarcosylsarcosineepitetrasulfide in guinea pigs and rats	Toxicology of Epidemiological Dioxipiperazines 1 Studies on the Toxicity of Cyclosarcosylsarcosineepitetrasulfide in guinea pigs and rats.
11	effects of an abdominal left ventricular assist device on myocardial oxygen supply demand ratios in normally perfused and ischemic bovine myocardium	Epos; an abdominal device; left ventricular assistance on demand reports; myocardial oxygen in the ischemic and normally perfused bovine myocardium.
11	aortic bacterial endarteritis	Aortic bacterial endarteritis.
11	single coronary artery with myocardial infarction and av block	Single coronary artery with myocardial infarction and an av block.
11	basic fuchsin picric acid method to detect acute myocardial ischemia an experimental study in swine	Basic method with apos; fuchsine picric acid to detect apos; acute myocardial ischemia, experimental study in swine.
11	experimental shwartzman phenomenon in the heart muscle	An experimental phenomenon of shwartzman in cardiac muscle.
11	experimental revascularization of acute myocardial infarct	Experimental revision of apos; acute myocardial infarction.
11	changes in the specific activity and content of free nucleotides and polyamines of the infarct and pre infarct area of the revascularized dog heart	Changes in apo; specific activity and content of free nucleotides and polyamines in dogs; infarcts and pre-infarct area of revascularized dog heart.
11	the mitotic division of cardiac muscle cells	This is the mitotic division of the heart muscle cells.
11	histoenzymatic characteristics of fibroblasts during organization of myocardial micronecroses	Histoenzyme characteristics of fibroblasts during apos; myocardial micronecrosis organization.
11	morphogenesis of coronarosclerosis in rheumatism	Morphogenesis of coronary artery disease in rheumatism.
11	occurrence of coronary ostial stenosis in a necropsy series of myocardial infarction sudden death and violent death	Coronary osteal stenosis in a series of necropsies; myocardial infarction, sudden death and violent death.
11	idiopathic giant cell myocarditis a distinctive clinico pathological entity	Idiopathic giant cell myocarditis is a distinct clinical-pathological entity.
11	the role of protein and lipids in stabilizing the activity of bovine heart succinate dehydrogenase	The role of proteins and lipids in stabilization of beef heart succinate dehydrogenase activity.
11	surface properties of monomolecular films of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c and f	The surface properties of oxidized and reduced monomolecular cytochrome c and f films.
11	kinetic and equilibrium studies of the ligand binding reactions of eight electrophoretic components of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin	Kinetic and d&apos studies; equilibrium of the ligand binding reactions of eight sperm whale ferrimyoglobin electrophoretic components.
11	ballistocardiographic and electrocardiographic changes in men working with lead	"""Ballistocardiographic and electrocardiographic changes in men working with lead,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
11	contractility and ultrastructure of cardiac muscle of guinea pigs treated with diphtheria toxin	Contractility and l' ultrastructure of the heart muscle of guinea pigs treated with diphtheria toxin.
11	interaction between spin labeled acyl coenzyme a and the mitochondrial adenosine diphosphate carrier	Interaction between l' acyl coenzyme labelled by spin and the adenosine diphosphate mitochondrial transporter.
11	isothiocyanates a new class of uncouplers	Isothiocyanate is a new class of uncouplers.
11	cytochemical localization of lysosomal enzyme activity in normal and ischemic dog myocardium	Cytochemical localization of l' lysosomal enzyme activity in normal and ischemic myocardium of dog.
11	alkali induced reduction of the beta cytochromes in purified complex iii from beef heart mitochondria	Alkali induced reduction of beta cytochromes in the purified beef heart mitochondrial complex iii.
11	the activation of short chain fatty acids by the soluble fraction of guinea pig heart and liver mitochondria the search for a distinct propionyl coa synthetase	L' activation of the short chain fatty acids by the soluble fraction of guinea pig heart and liver mitochondria seeks a distinct propionyl coa synthetase.
11	colloidal lanthanum as a marker for impaired plasma membrane permeability in ischemic dog myocardium	Colloidal Lanthanum as an apos label; alteration of plasma membrane permeability in dog ischemic myocardium.
11	mitochondrial permeability to chloride ion	Mitochondrial permeability to pH; chloride ion.
11	prolyl hydroxylase and collagen metabolism after experimental mycardial infarction	D.L. Prolyl hydroxylase and collagen metabolism after experimental mycorrhizal infarction.
11	influence of pituitary growth hormone on dna synthesis in rat tissues	Influence of l' pituitary growth hormone on synthesis of l' DNA in rat tissues.
11	uptake of adenosine by dispersed chich embryonic cardiac cells	Capture of apos; adenosine by shich dispersed embryonic cardiac cells.
11	left anterior hemiblock masking inferior myocardial infarction	Left anterior hemibloc masking an inferior myocardial infarction.
11	a comparison of concentrations of lead in human tissues	Comparison of lead levels in human tissue.
11	on the application of affinity chromatography to turnover studies on the lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes	On apos; application of apos chromatography; affinity to lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme turnover studies.
11	studies on the mechanism of the inhibitory effects of erucylcarnitine in rat heart mitochondria	Investigation of the mechanism of the inhibitory effects of erucylcarnitine in rat heart muscle mitochondria.
11	effect of decapitation and acth on somatic development of the rabbit fetus	The effects of decapitation and apo; acth on the somatic development of the fetus rabbit.
11	fetal and maternal lesions in pregnant ewes ingesting locoweed astragalus lentiginosus	Fetal and maternal injury in pregnant sheep ingesting lacid; astragale lentiginosus localized.
11	experimentally induced sarcocystis infection in calves pathology	Experimentally induced sarcocystis infection in calf pathology.
11	molecular and biological studies on cardiac muscle calcium binding protein tn c	Molecular and biological studies of the calcium-binding protein tn c in cardiac muscle.
11	tissue water content and nuclear magnetic resonance in normal and tumor tissues	Tissue water content and nuclear magnetic resonance in tumour and normal tissue.
11	relationship of intramyocardial oxygen tension and epicardial st segment changes following acute coronary artery ligation effects of coronary perfusion pressure	The relationship between coronary blood pressure; intramyocardial oxygen and changes in the epicardial st segment following acute effects of coronary perfusion on coronary ligation.
11	myocardial lesions induced by prolonged alcohol feeding in rhesus monkeys	Apos-induced myocardial injury; prolonged ingestion of apo; alcohol in rhesus monkeys.
11	mitochondria from the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis oxidative phosphorylation and related processes	Lamprey fluviatilis oxidative phosphorylation and related processes.
11	variations in the lipid and fatty acid composition of cardiac tissue during perfusion of hearts isolated from rats on a high colza oil diet	Changes in the lipid and fatty acid composition of cardiac tissue during infusion of isolated hearts from rats fed a diet high in rapeseed oil.
11	cardiac specific creatine phosphokinase isoenzyme in the diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction	Specific cardiac creatine phosphokinase enzyme in diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction.
11	ultrastructure development and nucleic acid of the s virus from the decapod crustacea macropipus depurator l	Ultrastructural and nucleic acid development of the virus from the scavenger crustaceans macropipus l.
11	interaction between cyclic adenosine monophosphate and cyclic gunaosine monophosphate in guinea pig ventricular myocardium	Interaction between d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine and cyclic gunaosin monophosphate in guinea pig ventricular myocardium.
11	myocardial damage in combined valvular and coronary bypass surgery	Myocardial lesion in the course of a combined valvular and coronary bypass.
11	histochemical and structural changes in human myocardial cells after cardiopulmonary bypass	Histochemical and structural changes in human myocardial cells following cardiopulmonary bypass.
11	blood flow and vasoactive drug effects in internal mammary and venous bypass grafts	Effect of vasoactive drugs and blood flow on bypass and bypass grafts.
11	improved angina threshold and coronary reserve following direct myocardial revascularization	Improvement of dapos threshold; angina and coronary reserve following direct revascularization of the myocardium.
11	reduction of infarct size by oxygen inhalation following acute coronary occlusion	Size reduction; inhalation infarction of apo; oxygen as a result of apo; acute coronary occlusion.
11	hemodynamic and metabolic effects of sodium nitroprusside on the performance and metabolism of regional ischemic myocardium	Hemodynamic and metabolic effects of sodium nitroprusside on the performance and the metabolism of the regional ischemic myocardium.
11	morphologic correlates of technetium 99m stannous pyrophosphate imaging of acute myocardial infarcts in dogs	Technetium 99m stannous pyrophosphate imaging of acute myocardial infarctus in dogs.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xiv bacterial arteritis in whipple s disease	Bacterium xiv bacterium arteritis in whipple s disease.
11	depolarization induced movement of mn 2 cations across the cell membrane in the guinea pig myocardium	Depolarization induced the movement of mn 2 cations across the cell membrane in guinea pig myocardium.
11	the effect of cold air inhalation on again pectoris and myocardial oxygen supply	Apos effect; inhalation of apos; cold air on pecs and limbs; injection of apos; myocardial oxygen.
11	pathology of stable and unstable angina pectoris	Lapos pathology; stable and unstable angina.
11	compensatory changes of the distal coronary vascular bed during progressive coronary constriction	Compensatory changes in the distal coronary vascular bed during progressive coronary constriction.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xii asymmetrical hypertrophy of the heart	De subitaneis mortibus xii, asymmetrical hypertrophy of the heart.
11	the preparation of crystalline human l lactate nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidoreductase isoenzyme 1 involvoing preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Preparation of isoenzyme 1 human nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidoreductase l lactate by preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
11	cardiac involvement in whipple s disease	Cardiac involvement in whipple disease.
11	hypertensive pulmonary vascular disease associated with patent ductus arteriosus primary or secondary	Hypertensive pulmonary vascular disease associated with primary or secondary ductal arteries.
11	evaluation of precordial electrocardiographic mapping as a means of assessing changes in myocardial ischemic injury	Evaluation of the precordial electrocardiographic mapping as a means of evaluating changes in myocardial ischemic injury.
11	rapid separation of plasma creatine kinase isoenzymes by batch adsorption on glass beads	Rapid isoenzyme separation of plasma creatine kinase by batch adsorption to glass beads.
11	detection of cardiac specific creatine kinase isoenzyme in sera with normal or slightly increased total creatine kinase activity	The detection of specific cardiac creatine kinase isoenzyme in serum whose total creatine kinase activity is normal or slightly increased.
11	simultaneous separation of serum creatine kinase and lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes by ion exchange column chromatography	Simultaneous separation of serum creatine kinase and lactate dehydrogenase by ion exchange chromatography.
11	malignant mesenchymoma of the heart	Malignant mesenchymoma of the heart, sir.
11	myocardial sarcoidosis pathological studies on 7 autopsy cases with particular reference to histological variations	Pathological studies of myocardial sarcoidosis on 7 cases of autopsy, particularly histological variations.
11	relationship between heart weight and the cross sectional area of the coronary ostia	Relationship between heart weight and coronary artery cross section.
11	flavoxate a potent phosphodiesterase inhibitor	Flavoxate, a potent inhibitor of phosphodiesterase.
11	myocarditis induced by coxsackie b3 virus in mature mice	Myocarditis caused by the coxsackie virus b3 in mature mice.
11	studies elucidating the importance of thymus on the degree of increased blood pressure and vascular disease in renal hypertensive mice a comparison of the disease in nude and haired littermates	Studies to elucidate the causes; importance of thymus on the level of damage; increase in blood pressure and vascular disease in hypertensive renal mice; comparison of disease in nude and nude littermates.
11	characterization of the metabolism of exogenous cyclic amp by perfused rat heart and incubated prepubertal rat ovary	Characterization of rat metabolism; exogenous cyclic ampoule by perfused rat heart and lidos; prepubertal rat ovary incubated.
11	inhibition of the soluble adenosine triphosphatase from mitochondria by adenylyl imidodiphosphate	Inhibition of apos; soluble adenosine triphosphatase of mitochondria by apos; adenosine triphosphatase imidodiphosphate.
11	postnatal persistence of spongy myocardium with embryonic blood supply	Postnatal persistence of spongy myocardium with embryonic blood supply.
11	coronary hemodynamics during positive g z acceleration	Coronary hemodynamics during implantation; positive g-z acceleration.
11	echocardiographic findings of ventricular septal rupture in acute myocardial infarction	Cardiographic findings of ventricular septal rupture in acute myocardial infarction.
11	consequences of coronary arterial occlusion on remote myocardium effects of occlusion and reperfusion	Effects of apo; coronary artery occlusion on the distal myocardial effects of apo; occlusion and reperfusion.
11	myocardial revascularization after acute infarction	Myocardial revascularization after an acute myocardial infarction.
11	multiple cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activities from rat tissues and occurrence of a calcium plus magnesium ion dependent phosphodiesterase and its protein activator	Multiple cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase in rat tissue and the presence of apos; a phosphate-dependent phosphodiesterase; and a calcium ion plus magnesium and its protein activator.
11	the calcium paradox a reaffirmation	The calcium paradox is a reassertion.
11	voltage clamp simulation	Simulating voltage clamp.
11	modification of the cardiostimulatory and coronary dilator effect of isopreenaline caused by etafenone	Modification of the apos; cardiostimulatory and coronary dilator effect of the apos; isopreenaline caused by the apos; stamenone.
11	electron microscopical study of myocardial biopsy material in congenital heart block	Electron microscopic study of myocardial biopsy equipment in congenital heart block.
11	effects of phentolamine on coronary blood flow in patients with recent myocardial infarction	Effects of phentolamine on coronary blood flow in patients with myocardial infarction.
11	clinical presentation of a myocardial rhabdomyosarcoma	Clinical presentation of myocardial rhabdomyosarcoma.
11	systemic and coronary haemodynamic effects of ketamine in intact anaesthetized and unanaesthetized dogs	Systemic and coronary hemodynamic effects of ketamine in intact anesthetized and unanesthetized dogs.
11	case report fetal cardiac failure resulting from endocardial fibroelastosis	Case report; fetal heart failure due to endocardial fibroelastosis.
11	the response of the right ventricle to experimentally induced pulmonary artery obstruction	The right ventricle response to an experimental obstruction of the lung artery.
11	effects of 5 3 tert butylamino 2 hydroxy propoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril hydrochloride opc 1085 on coronary circulation and myocardial metabolism	Effects of 5 tert hydrochloride @-@butylamino 2 hydroxypropoxy 3-4 dihydrocarbostyril opc 1085 on coronary circulation and myocardial metabolism.
11	the two step reversible denaturation of lactate dehydrogenase at low ph	Reversible two-step denaturation of low-phth lactate dehydrogenase.
11	substrate activity of structural analogs of isocitrate for isocitrate dehydrogenases from bovine heart	Substrate activity of bovine heart structural analogues; isocitrate for isocitrate dehydrogenases.
11	pathologic anatomy of the cardiomyopathies idiopathic dilated and hypertrophic types infiltrative types and endomyocardial disease with and without eosinophilia	Pathological anatomy of dilated idiopathic and hypertrophic types of infiltrating and endomyocardial cardiomyopathies with and without eosinophilia.
11	assay of cardiotonic steroids based on a 2 compartment model	Cardiotonic steroid test based on a two-compartment model.
11	effect of l dopa administration to fine structures of brain heart and kidney in rats with special reference to appearance of microvascular thrombosis and its pathological significance	Effect of dopa; administration of dopa on the fine structures of the cerebral heart and kidney in rats, especially the apos; appearance of apos; microvascular thrombosis and its pathological importance.
11	the crystal structure of bonito katsuo ferrocytochrome c at 2 3 a resolution ii structure and function	Crystal structure of bonito katsuo ferrocytochrome c at 2 a resolution ii structure and function.
11	effect of eltroxine and neomercazol on monoamine oxidase from rat tissues	Effect of eltroxine and neomercazol on rat tissue monoamine oxidase.
11	regulation of postocclusive hyperemia by endogenously synthesized prostaglandins in the dog heart	Regulation of l' post-hyperemia-occlusive by endogenously synthesized prostaglandins in dog heart.
11	paramyxovirus avian cell relationship discrepant impact of 6 azauridine on virus production by susceptible and less susceptible cells	Relationship between paramyxovirus avian cells and l' divergent impact of 6 azauridine on virus production by susceptible and less susceptible cells.
11	effectiveness of prostaglandin e1 and procarbazine hydrochloride in prolonging the survival of vascularized cardiac hamster to rat xenograft	The efficacy of prostaglandin e1 and procarbazine hydrochloride in prolonging survival of rat xenograft vascularized cardiac hamster.
11	distribution of the action of creatine kinase amp aminohydrolase and atpase and absorption of ca n microsomal fractions of skeletal muscles	Distribution of apos; action of amp aminohydrolase creatine kinase and apos; apase and absorption of microsomal fractions from skeletal muscles.
11	effect of pyrogenes on the activity and isoenzyne spectrum of lactate dehydrogenase in tissues and blood serum of guinea pigs	Effect of pyrogens on the activity and isoenzyn spectrum of lactate dehydrogenase in guinea pig tissues and blood serum.
11	failure of dietary erucic acid to impair oxidative capacity or apt production of rat heart mitochondria isolated under controlled conditions	Failure of the apo; dietary erucic acid to alter the oxidative capacity or apt production of isolated rat heart mitochondria under controlled conditions.
11	the effect of sulphide on cytochrome aa3 isosteric and allosteric shifts of the reduced alpha peak	L' effect of sulfide on isosteric and allosteric shifts of reduced alpha peak of cytochrome aa3.
11	experimentally induced vitamin e selenium deficiency in the growing dog	Experimental induction of apo; selenium vitamin deficiency in growing dogs.
11	gas liquid chromatography of non esterified fatty acids of the rat myocardium	Liquid gas chromatography of rat myocardial nonesterified fatty acids.
11	oxidation of erucic acid and erucyl coa by isolated rat heart mitochondria comparison to oleic acid	Oxidation of eucic acid; erucic acid and sucrose; erucyl coa by comparison with isolated rat heart mitochondria; oleic acid.
11	reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent lipid peroxidation by beef heart submitochondrial particles	Reduction of dinucleotide-dependent nicotinamide adenine phosphate-dependent lipid peroxidation by bovine heart mitochondrial particles.
11	fluorimetric and spectrophotometric studies of dpn linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart properties of tyrosyl and tryptophyl residues	Fluorimetric and spectrophotometric studies of dpn-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine cardiac properties of tyrosyl and tryptophyl residues.
11	photoreduction of cytochrome c1	Photoreduction of cytochrome c1 by photoreduction.
11	identification of essential arginyl residues in cytoplasmic malate dehydrogenase with butanedione	Identification of the essential arginyl residues in cytoplasmic malate dehydrogenase with butanedione.
11	alpha methylisocitrate a selective inhibitor of tpn linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart and rat liver	L' alpha methylisocitrate is a selective inhibitor of the bovine heart and rat liver tpn-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase.
11	apparent auricular paralysis and disorders of auriculo ventricular conduction anatomo clinical study	Apparent atrial paralysis and atrial ventricular conduction disorders anatomo clinical study.
11	14 cases of constrictive endocardial fibrosis or endomyocardial fibrosis	There are 14 cases of constrictive endocardial fibrosis or endomyocardial fibrosis.
11	papyraceous right ventricle of the adult apropos of an anatom clinical case observed in a man suffering from spondylo epiphyseal dysplasia	Right ventricle papyraca of the apos; adult anatomy observed in a man with spondylo epiphyseal dysplasia.
11	interaction of adenine nucleotides with multiple binding sites on beef heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase	Interaction of apo nucleotides; adenine with multiple binding sites on apos; mitochondrial bovine heart adenosine triphosphatase.
11	guanosine triphosphate binding sites in solubilized myocardium relation to adenylate cyclase activity	The guanosine triphosphate binding sites in the solubilized myocardium were found to be related to etapos activity; adenylate cyclase.
11	the steady state concentrations of coenzyme a sh and coenzyme a thioester citrate and isocitrate during tricarboxylate cycle oxidations in rabbit heart mitochondria	Concentrations at the apo level; apo state; equilibrium of coenzyme a sh and coenzyme a thioester citrate and isocitrate during tricarboxylic acid oxidation in rabbit heart mitochondria.
11	ion transport and respiratory control in vesicles formed from reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide coenzyme q reductase and phospholipids	Ion transport and respiratory control in the vesicles were formed following reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide coenzyme q reductase and phospholipids.
11	comparative evaluation of 2 methods for the determination of pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in tissues in avitaminosis b 1 induced by various methods	Comparative evaluation of 2 methods for the determination of apo; pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in the tissues of l' avitaminosis b1 induced by various methods.
11	freeze fracturing and freeze etching of cardiac myosin filaments	Freezing fracture and frozen engraving of cardiac myosin filaments.
11	phosphorylation of a 22 000 dalton component of the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum by adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Phosphorylation of apos; a 22,000-dalton component of the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum (CSR) by apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate-protein kinase dependent.
11	functional intermediates in the reaction of membrane bound cytochrome oxidase with oxygen	Functional intermediates in the reaction of membrane-bound cytochrome oxidase with etapos; oxygen.
11	control of pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in intact cardiac mitochondria regulation of the inactivation and activation of the dehydrogenase	Control of apo; pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in intact cardiac mitochondrial regulation of apoE; inactivation and apoE; dehydrogenase activation.
11	effect of acetylcholine on changes in contractility heart rate and phosphorylase activity produced by isoprenaline salbutamol and amino phylline in the perfused guinea pig heart	Effect of l' acetylcholine on changes in contractile heart rate and l' phosphorylase activity induced by isoprenaline salbutamol and l' amino phylline in guinea pig perfused heart.
11	myocardial failure with altered response to adrenaline in endotoxin shock	Myocardial failure with altered response to epos; adrenaline during endotoxic shock.
11	oxidation of nadph by submitochondrial particles from beef heart in complete absence of transhydrogenase activity from nadph to nad	L' nadph oxidation by bovine heart mitochondrial-particles in complete absence of l' transhydrogenase activity from nadph to nad.
11	the genetics and developmental regulation of l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Genetics and regulation of glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase development.
11	in vivo myocardial cell ph in the dog response to ischemia and infusion of alkali	Myocardial cell ph in vivo in dog response to ischemia and infusion of alkali.
11	induced ischemic cardiac arrest clinical and experimental results with magnesium aspartate procaine solution cardioplegin	Induced ischemic cardiac arrest and clinical and experimental results with a solution of magnesium aspartate.
11	divalent ions and myocardial function during cardiopulmonary by pass cpb changes of total calcium ionized calcium and magnesium in plasma	Divalent ions and myocardial function during cardiopulmonary are mediated by cpb changes in total ionized calcium and magnesium in the plasma.
11	coronary circulation and myocardial oxygen consumption after extracorporeal circulation and after cardioplegic arrest	Cone circulation and consumption of apos; myocardial oxygen after extracorporeal circulation and arrest of cardioplegia.
11	anoxic cardiac arrest its effect on myocardial mitochondrial metabolism	Anoxic cardiac arrest, its effect on myocardial mitochondrial metabolism.
11	mobility of normal and virus transformed cells in cellular aggregates	Mobility of normal and virus-transformed cells in cellular aggregates.
11	desmosterol accumulation in rats with experimental myotonia	L' accumulation of desmosterols in rats with experimental myotonia.
11	coronary disease ii analysis of diastolic pressure volume correlations and left ventricular elasticity in 110 patients	Coronary heart disease ii examines correlations between volume of diastolic pressure and left ventricular elasticity in 110 patients.
11	consumption of classical complement components by heart subcellular membranes in vitro and in patients after acute myocardial infarction	Conventional complement components consumed by cardiac subcellular membranes in vitro and in patients following acute myocardial infarction.
11	effect of collateral flow on epicardial and endocardial lysosomal hydrolases in acute myocardial ischemia	Effect of collateral flow on lysosomal hydrolases of the epicardium and the epicardium; endocardium in acute myocardial ischemia.
11	catecholamine binding to plasma membrane enriched fractions of heart and skeletal muscle	Binding of catecholamines to the plasma membrane enriched the heart and skeletal muscle fractions.
11	the mechanism of action of bencyclane on smooth musculature	The action of the bencyclane on the smooth musculature.
11	the effect of a combination of 1 4 hydroxyphenyl 2 methyl aminopropanol 1 hydrochloride with a nucleotide containing heart muscle extract on the heart and circulatory system of the dog	L' effect; a combination of 14 hydroxyphenyl 2 methyl aminopropanol 1 hydrochloride and d' a nucleotide containing a dog heart muscle extract on the dog heart and dog circulatory system.
11	a study of the effects of propranolol and or k 1366 on the distribution of rb86 clearance in the canine heart under selective coronary hypotension	An investigation of the effects of propranolol or k 1366 on the distribution of rb86 clearance in dog heart undergoing selective coronary hypotension.
11	the effect of oxyfedrine on cardiac performance in coronary patients tests using electrocardiographic and metabolic parameters in atrial stimulation	Effect of oxyfedrine on cardiac performance in patients using electrocardiographic and metabolism parameters in atrial stimulation.
11	31 p nuclear magnetic resonance studies of the interaction of pyridine nucleotide coenzymes with dehydrogenases	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies; interaction of pyridine nucleotide coenzymes with dehydrogenases.
11	characterization of autoantigenic sites on isolated dog heart mitochondria	Characterization of the auto-antigenic sites on isolated dog heart mitochondria.
11	superoxide radicals and hydrogen peroxide formation in mitochondria from normal and neoplastic tissues	Superoxide radicals and apos peroxide formation; hydrogen in normal and neoplastic tissue mitochondria.
11	isozymes of rat amp deaminase	Apos Isozymes; rat ampamidase.
11	the coating of mouse myocardial cells a cytochemical electron microscopical study	The coating of mouse myocardial cells was the subject of a cytochemical-electron microscopy study.
11	acetoacetate coenzyme a transferase activity in rat hepatomas	Acetoacetate-coenzyme a transferase activity in hepatomas.
11	the role of myocardial biopsy in cardiac diagnosis	Role of myocardial biopsy in cardiac diagnosis.
11	the ultracytochemical demonstration of a formaldehyde resistant dehydrogenase of leuco nitroxyl analogues	Ultra-tochemical demonstration of formaldehyde-resistant dehydrogenase; leuco nitroxyl analogs.
11	the membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of munida tenuimana g o sars crustacea decapoda	Membrane systems of munida tenuimana g o sars crustacea decapoda heart muscle cells.
11	cardiac histamine ouabain interaction potentiation by ouabain of the arrhythmogenic effects of histamine	Potentiation of the apos; cardiac ouabain histamine interaction by ouabain of the arrhythmogenic effects of the apos; histamine.
11	anatomical and neurohistological observations on the heart of the spiny lizard uromastix hardwickii	Anatomical and neurohistological observations on the heart of Uromastix hardwickii Spiny Lizards.
11	myocardial uptake of labeled oleic and linoleic acids	Myocardial uptake of labelled oleic and linoleic acids.
11	comparison of the effects of physical exercise cold acclimation and repeated injections of isoprenaline on rat muscle enzymes	Comparison of effects of apos; cold acclimation to apos; exercise and exercise; repeated injections of apos; isoprenaline on rat muscle enzymes.
11	major deficiency in serum lactate dehydrogenase 1 and 2 isoenzymes a possible pathogenesis for angina pectoris with normal coronarography	A major lactate dehydrogenase 1 and 2 serum isozyme deficiency may result in l' angina pectoris with normal coronary angina.
11	effect of metabolism on the electrical and mechanical activities of the frog atrium	Effect of metabolism on the electrical and mechanical activities of frog atria.
11	control of myocardial oxygen tension by sympathetic coronary vasoconstriction in the dog	Myocardial oxygen by sympathetic coronary vasoconstriction in dogs.
11	reflex parasympathetic coronary vasodilation elicited from cardiac receptors in the dog	Reflex parasympathetic coronary vasodilation was induced by cardiac receptors in dogs.
11	regional differences in myocardial performance in the left ventricle of the dog	Regional differences in the myocardial performance of the dog left ventricle.
11	analysis of components in a cardiogenic hypertensive chemoreflex	Analysis of components of cardiogenic hypertensive chemoreflex.
11	electrophysiologic and pathologic correlations in two cases of chronic second degree atrioventricular block with left bundle branch block	Electrophysiological and pathological correlations in two cases of a chronic second-degree atrioventricular block with a left-beam branch block.
11	three dimensional geometry of acutely ischemic myocardium	Three-dimensional geometry of the ischemic myocardium.
11	right ventricular dysfunction detected by gated scintiphotography in patients with acute inferior myocardial infarction	Right ventricular dysfunction (RVD) detected by barrier scintiphotography in patients with apo; acute lower myocardial infarction.
11	the pathophysiology of idiopathic mitral valve prolapse	Pathophysiology of idiopathic mitral valve prolapse.
11	clinical conference de subitaneis mortibus xiii multifocal purkinije cell tumors of the heart	"""Clinical conference of subitaneis mortibus xiii multifocal purkinije cell tumors of the heart"", American Journal of Epidemiology."
11	erucic acid metabolism by rat heart preparations	Metabolism of l' erucic acid by rat cardiac preparations.
11	the origin of the elevated activities of creatine kinase and other enzymes in the sera of patients with myxoedema	L' origin of apos; high creatine kinase and d&apos activity; other enzymes in serum of patients with myxoedema.
11	diagnosis of cardiac amyloidosis by myocardial biopsy	Diagnosis of apos; cardiac amyloidosis by myocardial biopsy.
11	homologs of dopa alpha methyldopa and dopamine as potential cardiovascular drugs	The homologs of the dopa alpha methyldopa and dopamine as potential cardiovascular drugs.
11	effects of seven anthracycline antibiotics on electrocardiogram and mitochondrial function of rat hearts	Effects of seven anthracycline antibiotics on apos, electrocardiogram, and mitochondrial function of rat hearts.
11	genesis of fatty liver and hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig	Genesis of foie gras and liver enzymes; hyperlipidemia in the fetal guinea pig.
11	effects of blockade of extraneuronal uptake on responses to isoprenaline in perfused rat heart	Effects of blockade of extraneuronal uptake on responses to isoprenaline in the perfused rat heart.
11	the steady state activity of succinate dehydrogenase in the presence of opposing effectors 1 the effect of l malate and coqh2 on the enzymic activity	L' activity at apos; state; equilibrium of succinate dehydrogenase in presence of apos; opposite effectors 1; effect of malate and coqh2 on apos; enzymatic activity.
11	congenital left atrial enlargement a case report with special reference to myocardial fine structure	Congenital enlargement of the left atrium, a case report focusing on the myocardial fine structure.
11	regulatory factors on immunocytolysis of cardiac cells and mesenchymal cells	Regulatory factors of apos; cardiac and mesenchymal cell immunocytolysis.
11	studies on myocarditis in childhood with special reference to the possible role of immunological process and the thymus in the chronicity of the disease	Studies of childhood myocarditis, particularly the possible role of immunologic process and thymus in the chronicity of the disease.
11	cardiac lesions in collagen disease	Cardiac lesion in collagen disease.
11	myocardial transcapillary exchange in the hypertrophied heart of the dog	Myocardial transcapillary exchange in the dog's enlarged heart.
11	effects of mannitol on cardiac ultrastructure and microcirculation following anoxia	Effects of mannitol on apo; cardiac ultrastructure and microcirculation after apo; anoxia.
11	nutritional effects on heart acetylcholinesterase and butyrocholinesterase activity	Nutritional effects on cardiac apos; apos activity; acetylcholinesterase and butyrocholinesterase.
11	adriamycin induced cardiac damage in the mouse a small animal model of cardiotoxicity	L' adriamycin induced cardiac injury in mouse, an animal model of cardiotoxicity.
11	ultrastructural histogenesis of chicken myocardium	L' histogenesis ultrastructural of chicken myocardium.
11	problem of increasing the viability of the ischemic myocardium in the light of experimental studies	The apo problem; increased viability of ischemic myocardium in experimental studies.
11	effect of heparin on certain indicators of oxidating and energetic processes in experimental endomyocarditis	Effect of apos; heparin on certain indicators of the oxidative and energetic processes in apos; experimental apos; endomyocarditis.
11	effect of large doses of nicotinic acid on certain metabolic processes and contractile function of an intact heart	High dose effect of nicotinic acid on certain metabolic processes and contractile function of intact heart.
11	fatty acid and ketone body metabolism in the rat response to diet and exercise	Fatty acid metabolism and keto body metabolism in rat response to diet and exercise.
11	cardiac structure and function in vitamin b 12 deprived rats	The cardiac structure and function of the rats deprived of vitamin b12 were decreased.
11	the pathology of type ii skeletal muscle glycogenosis a light and electron microscopic study	The pathology of glycogenosis in type II skeletal muscle tissue was studied by light and electron microscopy.
11	primary epithelial tumour in the right atrium of the heart and inferior vena cava in nzr gd inbred rats pathology of 18 cases	Primary epithelial tumour in the apos; right atrium of the heart and inferior vena cava in 18 inbred rat inbreds.
11	esterase polymorphism in the adriatic sardine sardina pilchardus walb 1 electrophoretic and biochemical properties of the serum and tissue esterases	Escherase polymorphism in sardine sardine pilchardus walb 1, electrophoretic and biochemical properties of serum and tissue esterases.
11	localization of acetylcholinesterase in granule containing cells of glomus like bodies in pre and postnatal rabbits by electron microscopy	Electron microscopy localized the etapos; acetylcholinesterase in granules containing glomus-like body cells of pre- and post-natal rabbits.
11	troponin bound calcium in electron micrographs of myocardial cells as demonstrated by the potassium antimonate technique	Troponin binds calcium in electron micrographs of myocardial cells, as demonstrated by potassium antimonate (PAM) technique.
11	the membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of cirolana borealis lilljeborg crustacea isopoda	Membrane Systems of the Cardiac muscle cell of cirolana borealis lilljeborg crustacea isopoda.
11	effect of vanadium on tissue respiration in organs and on cholesterol metabolism in guinea pigs with experimental atheroclerosis	Effect of vanadium on tissue respiration in organs and on the metabolism of cholesterol in guinea pigs with d'apos; experimental atherosclerosis.
11	myocardial and plasma levels of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate studies in experimental myocardial ischemia	Plasma and myocardial levels of apos; adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic phosphate in experimental d'apos; myocardial ischemia.
11	tricuspid and pulmonary valve atresia with aortopulmonary fistula survival of a patient to 21 years of age	Pulmonary valve atresia and tricuspid with survival to aortopulmonary fistula in a 21-year-old patient.
11	effect of albuterol and terbutaline synthetic beta adrenergic stimulants on the cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate system in smooth muscle	Effect of albuterol and terbutaline, synthetic beta adrenergic stimulants on the cyclic 3-5 adenosine monophosphate system in smooth muscle.
11	torulopsis glabrata endocarditis complicating aortic homograft valve treated with 5 fluorocytosine case report with discussion of antifungal chemotherapy	Torulopsis glabrata endocarditis complexating aortic homograft valve treated with 5 fluorocytosine case report with discussion of antifungal chemotherapy.
11	lipid overload induced in myocardial cells by vegetable oils observation using electron microscopy	Lipid overload induced in myocardial cells by etapos; plant oils observed by electron microscopy.
11	transmural gradients in ventricular tissue metabolites produced by stopping coronary blood flow in the dog	Transmural gradients in ventricular metabolites are produced by stopping coronary blood flow in dogs.
11	changes in intramyocardial st segment voltage and gas tensions with regional myocardial ischemia in the dog	Changes in the gas tension and voltage of the intramyocardial stasis segment with regional myocardial ischemia in dogs.
11	plasma and atrial propranolol after preoperative withdrawal	Plasma propranolol and atrial propranolol after preoperative withdrawal.
11	postmortem tissue digoxin concentrations in infants and children	Levels of digoxin in the tissues of infants and children.
11	anatomical pathology of sudden unexpected cardiac death	Anatomical pathology; sudden and unexpected cardiac death.
11	arteriosclerosis of coronary arteries in sudden unexpected deaths	Arteriosclerosis of the coronary arteries (CAR) in the event of sudden unexpected death.
11	pathology of the myocardium and the conduction system in sudden coronary death	Pathology of myocardium and conduction system in sudden coronary death.
11	pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death i organizing thrombosis and acute coronary vessel lesions	Pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death organizing thrombosis and acute lesions of the coronary vessels.
11	myocardial cell necrosis and sudden death in humans	It's called myocardial cell necrosis and sudden death in humans.
11	pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death ii the significance of myocardial infarction	Pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death; extent of death; myocardial infarction.
11	methodological considerations for the study of sudden cardiac death an autopsy protocol	Methodological considerations for diagnosis; study of sudden cardiac death protocol; autopsy.
11	possible electrophysiological mechanisms for lethal arrhythmias accompanying myocardial ischemia and infarction	Possible electrophysiological mechanisms of lethal arrhythmias accompanying the apos; ischemia and apos; myocardial infarction.
11	the myofibrillar m band in the cryo section analysis of section thickness	The m myofibrillar band in the apos; analysis of the cryogenic sections of the apos; section thickness.
11	oxidation of succinate in heart brain and kidney mitochondria in hypobaria and hypoxia	L' oxidation of succinate in the cardiac brain and renal mitochondria in the heart; hypobaric and apo; hypoxia.
11	iron sulfur components of succinate dehydrogenase stoichiometry and kinetic behavior in activated preparations	Iron sulfide succinate dehydrogenase components stoichiometry and kinetic behavior in activated preparations.
11	mitral insufficiency complicating acute myocardial infarction	Complicating mitral insufficiency; acute myocardial infarction.
11	effects of intra aortic balloon pumping on experimental acute myocardial ischaemia	Effects of intra-@ aortic balloon pumping on apos; acute myocardial ischemia.
11	coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to occupational physical activity in male violent deaths	Relationship between diabetes; coronary atherosclerosis and apos; aortic atherosclerosis and apos; physical activity in the workplace in men who die violently.
11	coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to body build factors	Coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to factors of body construction.
11	effect of anoxia on the excitability of the canine ventricular muscle author s transl	Effect of the apos; anoxia on the apos; excitability of translation of the apos; canine ventricular muscle.
11	the effect of cardiopulmonary bypass perfusion pressure on myocardial gas tensions in the presence of coronary stenosis	Lapses; effect of infusion pressure; cardiopulmonary bypass graft on myocardial gas tensions in the presence of coronary stenosis.
11	a study on the rehabilitation of ischemic heart disease patients the heart rate beta receptor blocking agents and strength duration relationship of exercise	A study of rehabilitation of patients with ischemic heart disease, heart rate beta receptor inhibitors, and the relationship between duration of force and exercise.
11	effects of beta blockers on cardiac function and myocardial oxygen consumption in the isolated supported heart preparation of the dog	The effects of the beta-blockers on cardiac function and myocardial oxygen consumption in the isolated cardiac preparation were supported by the dog.
11	ultrastructural changes of hypertrophied myocardium in severe experimental hypoxia effects of diphosphothiamine and of an antagonist of the vitamin b1 author s transl	Ultrastructural changes of myocardium hypertrophied in severe experimental hypoxia effects of diphosphothiamine and an antagonist of the vitamin b1 transl.
11	contractile myocardial proteins in patients with acquired heart defects	Contractile myocardial proteins in patients with acquired cardiac malformations.
11	the effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the heart rate and coronary flow of the isolated perfused guinea pig heart	L' effect of sulfhydryl reagents on heart rate and coronary flow of guinea pig perfused and isolated heart.
11	influence of halothane on calcium movements in isolated heart muscle and in isolated plasma membranes	Calcium movements in isolated cardiac muscle and isolated plasma membranes are influenced by halothane.
11	changes in cyclic nucleotide metabolism in aorta and heart of neurogenically hypertensive rats possible trigger mechanism of hypertension	Changes in cyclic nucleotide metabolism in the aorta and heart of neurogenic hypertensive rats could trigger the mechanism of l' hypertension.
11	decompression induced bubble formation in salmonids comparison to gas bubble disease	Decompression induced bubble formation in salmonids compared with salmonid gas-bubble disease.
11	prevention of exercise induced cardiac hypertrophy in rats by chemical sympathectomy guanethidine treatment	Preventing exercise induced cardiac hypertrophy in rats by chemical treatment with guanethidine by sympathectomy.
11	hypoxia of high altitudes as a theoretical method of treatment of angina pectoris influence on cardiac metabolism	Lapos; high-altitude hypoxia as a theoretical method of stroke treatment; angina of the chest influences the cardiac metabolism.
11	studies on the therapeutic use of mercurascar part iii influence of mercurascan on some metabolic changes in experimental myocardial ischaemia in dogs section i energetic and ionic metabolism	Studies on os; therapeutic use of mercurascar part iii influences mercurascan on certain metabolic changes in the experimental myocardial ischemia in dogs section i energy and ion metabolism.
11	phosphoprotein phosphatase catalyzed dephosphorylation of the 22 000 dalton phosphoprotein of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum	Phosphoprotein phosphatase catalyzes the dephosphorylation of 22,000 cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum daltons.
11	oppositional effects of acetylcholine and isoproterenol on isometric tension and cyclic nucleotide concentrations in rabbit atria	Opposing effects of acetylcholine and isoproterenol on isometric tension and cyclic nucleotide concentrations in rabbit atria.
11	comparison of the reaction of cultured smooth and cardiac muscle cells and fibroblasts to specific antibodies to myosin	Comparison of the response of cultured cardiac smooth muscle cells and fibroblasts to myosin-specific antibodies.
11	ruptured coronary aneurysm and valvulitis in an infant with polyarteritis nodosa	Coronary aneurysm and ruptured valvulitis in an infant with polyarteritis nodosa.
11	ways of drug action on the restorative processes in the myocardium in experimental myocardial infarct	Dosage modes; drug action on myocardial restoration processes in experimental myocardial infarction.
11	morphometry and autoradiography of early hypertrophic changes in the ventricular myocardium of adult rat a light microscopic study	Morphometry and autoradiography of early hypertrophic changes in ventricular myocardium of adult rat, light microscopic study.
11	a controlled sequential morphologic study of hyperacute cardiac allograft rejection in the rat	A sequential morphological study of the rejection of apos; hyperacute cardiac allograft in the rat.
11	myocardial cell damage during experimental infective endocarditis	Damage to myocardial cells during apo; experimental infectious endocarditis.
11	myocardium of hypothermic rats with and without administration of dextran electrocardiographic and electron microscopic studies	Myocardium of hypothermic rats with and without dextran administration, electrocardiographic studies, and electron microscopy.
11	determination of intracapillary hbo2 saturation with a cryo microphotometric method applied to the rabbit myocardium author s transl	Determination of intracapillary hb2 saturation at apos; apos aid; a cryo microphotometric method applied to apos translation; rabbit myocardium author.
11	cardiac injuries in aircraft occupants resulting from aircraft accidents	Cardiac injuries to the occupants of aircraft resulting from accidents; aircraft.
11	relationship between oxygen tension coronary vasodilation and prostaglandin biosynthesis in the isolated rabbit heart	Ratio between coronary vasodilation of blood pressure; oxygen and prostaglandin biosynthesis in the isolated heart of rabbit.
11	non invasive myocardial scanning with thallium 201 basic principles and methods author s transl	Noninvasive thallium-based myocardial scanner 201 basic principles and methods.
11	raised camp content of striated muscle in experimental chronic renal failure author s transl	Lapos, author of a chronic renal insufficiency experimental study, increased the camp content of striated muscle.
11	comparison between muscle and liver enolases and their behavior during differentiation and growth	Comparison between the muscle and liver enolases and their behaviour during differentiation and growth.
11	interpreting cardiac catheterization data part 2	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	molecular interactions of adenosine triphosphatase with the mitochondrial membrane as revealed by a spin label study	The molecular interactions of the etapos; adenosine triphosphatase with the mitochondrial membrane were revealed by a spin label study.
11	decrease in oxygen affinity of myoglobin by formylation of vinyl groups of heme	Apos decrease; myoglobin affinity for apos; oxygen by forming the vinyl groups of apos; heme.
11	preparation of a homogeneous soluble d beta hydroxybutyrate apodehydrogenase from mitochondria	Preparation of d' a homogeneous beta-hydroxybutyrate apodehydrogenase from the mitochondria.
11	effect of dietary magnesium levels on cardiac lesions in rats fed a diet rich in rapeseed oil	Effect of dietary magnesium levels on cardiac lesions in rats fed a high rapeseed oil diet.
11	regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis by polyamines reversal by spermine of inhibition by methylglyoxal bis guanylhydrazone of ribonucleic acid synthesis and histone acetylation in rabbit heart	The regulation of reverse polyamine ribonucleic acid synthesis by spermine l' methylglyoxal bis guanylhydrazone inhibition of l&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid and l' rabbit heart histone acetylation.
11	tissue distribution of retinol and its metabolites after administration of double labelled retinol	Tissue distribution of retinol and its metabolites after double-labelled retinol administration.
11	tolerance and resistance of myocardium to anoxia experimental studies	Tolerance and resistance of the myocardium to experimental studies on anoxia.
11	resistance and tolerance of the myocardium to ischemia	Myocardial resistance and tolerance to aposemia; ischemia.
11	inability of angiotensin to stimulate rna synthesis in isolated rat atria 38551	Failure of the apos; angiotensin to stimulate rna synthesis in isolated rat atria.
11	tolerance of isolated cardiac muscle to hypoxia force frequency interrelationships 38566	Isolated cardiac muscle tolerance to apos; hypoxia Relationships between force frequencies 38566 and 38566.
11	the renin angiotensin system in rats made hypertensive by ligation of the kidney poles 38584	The renin angiotensin system became hypertensive by ligation of the renal poles 38584.
11	the renin and iso renin angiotensin system in rats with experimental pitutary tumors 38585	The Renin System-iso renin-angiotensin in rats with experimental pituitary tumors.
11	ischemia tolerance following cardioplegic arrest in human patients and in experimental animals	Tolerance to apos; ischemia following cardiac arrest in human and laboratory animals.
11	a diurnal rhythm of incorporation of l 3h leucine in myocardium of the rat	Diurnal rhythm of infection; leucine incorporation 3h in rat myocardium.
11	lysosomal and neutral hydrolase activity during the regression of cardiac hypertrophy	Lysosomal and neutral hydrolase activity during gap regression; cardiac hypertrophy.
11	beta hydroxy fatty acid production during fatty acid oxidation by heart mitochondria	Production of d' fatty acids beta-hydroxy during apo; oxidation of fatty acids by cardiac mitochondria.
11	inhibited adenine nucleotide translocation in mitochondria isolated from ishcemic myocardium	Nucleotide translocation of l' adenine was inhibited in isolated mitochondria of ishcemic myocardium.
11	energy metabolism in the infarcted cardiac muscle the interaction of contractile protein and mitochondria	Energy metabolism in infarcted cardiac muscle; interaction of contractile protein and mitochondria.
11	correlation between biochemical and contractile changes after myocardial ischemia and revascularization	Correlation between contractile and biochemical changes following myocardial ischemia and revascularization.
11	release of 14c adenosine from the guinea pig heart during autoregulation	Release of apos; adenosine 14c from guinea pig heart during self-regulation.
11	creatine release from the isolated perfused rat heart	Creatine release from isolated perfused rat heart.
11	uptake and phosphorylation of 14c creatine by mouse cardiac muscle in vivo	Uptake and phosphorylation of creatine 14c by mouse cardiac muscle in vivo.
11	myocardial high energy phosphates in experimental thyrotoxicosis in guinea pigs	Myocardial high energy phosphates in experimental thyrotoxicosis in guinea pigs.
11	utilization of endogenous lipids and glycogen in the perfused rat heart effects of hypoxia and epinephrine	Use of endogenous lipids and glycogen in the perfused cardiac effects of lacidosis; hypoxia and lacidosis; epinephrine in the rat.
11	transmural gradients in the ischemic dog left ventricle metabolism of endogenous triglycerides and glycogen	Transmural gradients in ischemic dog left ventricle metabolism of endogenous triglycerides and glycogen.
11	the uptake of free fatty acid in the rat heart	L' absorption of free fatty acids (FFA) from rat heart.
11	effect on myocardial metabolic pattern of local complete and incomplete ischemia	Effect on myocardial metabolic profile of apos; complete and incomplete local ischemia.
11	early changes in myocardial hypoxia relations among mechanical function ph and intracellular redox states	Early changes in myocardial hypoxic relationships between intracellular and ph redox states of mechanical function.
11	inhibition of glycolysis in hearts during ischemic perfusion	Inhibition of glycolysis in the hearts during the ischemic infusion.
11	mitochondrial metabolism in infarcting myocardium	Mitochondrial metabolism in the apos; myocardial infarction.
11	erucic acid metabolism by cultured beating heart cells of the postnatal rat	Metabolism of etapos; erucic acid by cultured beating heart cells of postnatal rat.
11	on the formation of hydrogen peroxide and oxygen radicals in heart mitochondria	The formation of hydrogen peroxide and oxygen radicals in the heart's mitochondria.
11	cytoplasmic and mitochondrial fractions of serum aspartate aminotransferase in the early phase of myocardial infarction	Cytoplasmic and mitochondrial fractions of serum aspartate aminotransferase in early phase of lupus; myocardial infarction.
11	carnitine palmityltransferase activity during myocardial ischemmia and at low ionic strengths	Lapos; carnitine palmityltransferase activity during apos; myocardial ischemia and low ionic strength.
11	protein synthesis in cell free systems from totally ischemic rat myocardium	Protein synthesis in fully ischemic rat myocardial cell-free systems.
11	attenuation of beta adrenergic cardiac responses in chronically hypoxic rats with right ventricular hypertrophy	Alleviating beta-adrenergic cardiac responses in chronically hypoxic rats with right ventricular hypertrophy.
11	selective control of fibroblast proliferation and its effect on cardiac muscle differentiation in vitro	Selective control of fibroblast proliferation and its effect on differentiation of cardiac muscle in vitro.
11	purification of creatine kinase from beef heart mitochondria	Creatin kinase purification from beef heart mitochondria.
11	the effect of sugar phosphates phosphoenolpyruvate and adenylic acid on muscle brain and heart creatine kinases	L' phosphoenolpyruvate and adenylate sugars affect muscle brain and heart creatine kinases.
11	hypoxic isolated rat heart hemodynamic and metabolic effects of nitroglycerin	Hemodynamic and metabolic effects of nitroglycerin on isolated, hypoxic rat heart.
11	distribution of lysosome populations in rat cardiac tissue	Distribution of lysosome populations in cardiac tissue of the rat.
11	alcoholic cardiomyopathy the effect of ethanol and acetaldehyde on cardiac protein synthesis	Alcoholic cardiomyopathy, effect of ethanol and ethanol; acetaldehyde on cardiac protein synthesis.
11	myocardial cell damage due to ethanol	Apos myocardial cell damage; ethanol.
11	hemodynamic metabolic and ultrastructural consequences of hyperosmolal mannitol after myocardial anoxia	Hemodynamic, metabolic, and ultrastructural effects of mannitol hyperosmolar after myocardial anoxia.
11	phospholipase a and acid lipase activity during release of lysosomal hydrolases	Phospholipase a and l' acid lipase activity during lysosomal hydrolase release.
11	the effects of polyamines on cardiac protein biosynthesis	Effects of polyamines on cardiac protein biosynthesis.
11	some properties of rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase and the in vitro effects of nucleotides	Some properties of the rat ornithine decarboxylase and the in vitro effects of nucleotides.
11	the effects of hypoxia hypertrophy and diet on rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase activity	Effects of hypoxic hypertrophy and diet on apos activity; ornithine decarboxylase in rat.
11	polyamine and nucleoprotein correlations in hypertrophied and perfused heart	Polyamine and nucleoprotein correlations in hypertrophied and perfused heart.
11	comparative aspects of buffering capacity in muscle	Comparison of the buffering capacity in the muscles.
11	congenital rhabdomyoma of the heart	Congenital Rhabdomyoma of the heart?
11	effects of iproveratril on isolated heart mitochondria	The effects of apos; iproveratril on isolated heart mitochondria.
11	thrombolytic therapy and myocardial infarction	Thrombolytics and myocardial infarction.
11	metabolic and histopathologic changes in arteriosclerotic versus nonarteriosclerotic rats following isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction with superimposed diabetes	Histopathological and metabolic changes in arteriosclerotic rats compared with nonarteriosclerotic rats following myocardial infarction induced by isoproterenol with superimposed diabetes.
11	myocardial lysis in acute rheumatic fever followed by regeneration of cardiac muscle and origin of aschoff bodies	Myocardial lysis in acute rheumatic fever followed by heart muscle and muscle regeneration; origin of aschoff bodies.
11	evaluation of potassium 43 scintillation images during early myocardial ischemia in an animal model	Evaluation of potassium 43 scintillation images during the early myocardial ischemia in an animal model.
11	subendocardial origin of ventricular arrhythmias in 24 hour old experimental myocardial infarction	Origin-endocardial of ventricular arrhythmias in the 24-hour-old experimental myocardial infarction.
11	streptococcal pancarditis	Pancarditis strep.
11	preparation of isolated cells by alkaline dissociation of formalin fixed tissue	Preparation of isolated cells by alkaline dissociation from tissue attached to formalin.
11	effects of heparin on lipolytic enzyme activities in vivo and in vitro	Effects of Lapos; heparin on lipolytic enzyme activities in vivo and in vitro.
11	changes in biochemical properties of myocardial lactate dehydrogenase during exposure of rats to high altitude	Changes in the biochemical properties of myocardial lactate dehydrogenase during apo exposure of rats at high altitude.
11	cardiac pathologic findings in patients treated with bone marrow transplantation	Evidence of cardiac pathology in patients who have undergone bone marrow transplant procedures.
11	regulation by calcium of the proliferation of heart cells from young adult rats	Calcium regulation of cardiac cell proliferation in young adult rats.
11	hemorrhagic infarction a reperfusion injury following prolonged myocardial ischemic anoxia	Hemorrhagic Infarction, reperfusion lesion following prolonged ischemic myocardial anoxia.
11	short term effects of docosenoic acid containing oils on rat cardiac lipids colza oil and partially hydrogenated herring oil	Short-term effects of l' docosenoic acid containing oils on cardiac lipids of rat, rapeseed oil and partially hydrogenated herring oil.
11	a complex of cardiac cytochrome c1 and cytochrome c	A cardiac cytochrome c1 complex with cardiac cytochrome c.
11	comparative 131 cesium scintigraphic and electrocardiographic studies of patients following the acute phase of myocardial infarct	In addition, there are 131 comparative scintigraphy and apo studies; post-acute cesium electrocardiography in patients; myocardial infarction.
11	arrhythmias in inflammatory heart disease author s transl	Arrhythmias in translated inflammatory heart disease.
11	inotropic action myocardial uptake and subcellular distribution of ouabain digoxin and digitoxin in isolated rat hearts	Inotropic action, myocardial uptake, and subcellular distribution of digoxin and digitoxin d' ouabain in isolated rat hearts.
11	the time course of the effects of beta and alpha adrenoceptor stimulation by isoprenaline and methoxamine on the contractile force and camp level of the isolated rabbit papillary muscle	L' temporal evolution of the effects of alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor stimulation by isoprenaline and methoxamine on contractile force and camp level of isolated rabbit papillary muscle.
11	radioautographic and cytometric analysis of myocyte growth and myocardial regeneration in rats	Radioautographic and cytometric analysis of myocyte growth and myocardial regeneration in the rat.
11	the effect of triiodothyronine on myocardial protein kinases	L' effect of triiodothyronine on myocardial protein kinases.
11	cardiac tumour in infant	Cardiac tubercle in the infant.
11	clinico biochemical immunological and morphological assessment of myocardial inflammatory reactions in myocardial necroses	Biochemical evaluation of myocardial inflammatory reactions in myocardial necrosis.
11	fractional composition and metabolism of proteins and levels of polynucleotides in canine heart in experimental myocardial infarction	Fractional composition and protein metabolism and polynucleotide levels in the canine heart during experimental myocardial infarction.
11	the development of intramyocardial haemorrhages or fluidaccumulation in the extracellular space	The development of intra- or intra-cardiac hemorrhages; fluid accumulation in the apos; extracellular space.
11	functional replacement of the left heart with an intrathoracally implantable ventricular aortic blood pump author s transl	Functional replacement of the left heart with an intrathoracic implantable ventricular aortic blood pump.
11	the production of cardiac hypertrophy by tri iodothyroacetic acid	The production of drugs; cardiac hypertrophy by the drugs; triiodothyroacetic acid.
11	effects of reserpine and propranolol on anoxia induced enzyme release from the isolated perfused guinea pig heart	The effects of reserpine and propranolol on etapos; anoxia induced enzyme release from isolated guinea pig perfused heart.
11	comparative histopathological effects of aflatoxin b1 and palmotoxins b0 and g0 on some organs of different strains of the newly hatched chick gallus domesticus	Comparative histopathological effects of aflatoxin b1 and palmotoxins b0 and g0 on certain organs of different newly hatched chick gallus domesticus strains.
11	influence of biophysical factors on redox processes and biological oxidation 20 tissue temperatures under ultrasonic administration	Influence of biophysical factors on redox and l&apos processes; biological oxidation 20 ultrasonic tissue temperatures.
11	ultrastructural studies on the myocardial capillaries of the experimentally lathyritic rat protective effect of certain flavonoids	Ultrastructural studies on l&apos myocardial capillaries; protective effect of certain flavonoids on the lathyric rat.
11	moschcowitz syndrome with involvement of the central nervous system light optical studies on the genesis of hemolytic anemia and vascular changes	Moschcowitz syndrome with participation in optical studies of the light of the central nervous system on the genesis of l' hemolytic anemia and vascular changes.
11	prevalence of cardiac tumours at autopsy in ibadan	Prevalence of heart tumours at birth; postnatal autopsy in ibadan.
11	cardiac conduction abnormalities produced by chronic alcoholism	Causes of cardiac conduction abnormalities; chronic alcoholism.
11	supravalvular mitral stenosis associated with tetralogy of fallot	Supravalvular mitral stenosis associated with fallot tetralogy.
11	cardiovascular effects of long term cigarette smoking and nicotine administration	Cardiovascular effects of long-term smoking and nicotine use.
11	emergency myocardial revascularization with assisted circulation for early extension of infarction	Revascularization of myocardium d'apos; emergency with assisted circulation for early extension of infarction.
11	changes in the glycogen content of the dog myocardium at various phases of the cardiac cycle with a normal coronary blood flow	Changes in glycogen content of dog myocardium at various stages of the cardiac cycle with normal coronary blood flow.
11	study of some properties of rat myocardial pyruvate kinase in adrenaline myocarditis	Investigation of certain properties of rat myocardial pyruvate kinase in l' adrenaline myocarditis.
11	progeny pregnancy and phenylketonuria	Gestation of the progeny and of phenylketonuria.
11	effects of carbon monoxide inhalation on ventricular fibrillation	Effects of inhalation; inhalation of carbon monoxide on ventricular fibrillation.
11	hyperacute rejection of guinea pig to rat cardiac xenografts i morphology	Guinea pig hyperacute rejection to rat cardiac xenografts i morphology.
11	myocardial biopsy in a case of cardiomyopathy and partial alpha a antitrypsin deficiency with liver engagement	Myocardial biopsy in cardiomyopathy and partial alpha deficiency-antitrypsin with commitment of the liver.
11	deaths from ischemic heart disease in persons aged 65 or younger in helsinki in 1970 with special reference to patho anatomic findings in hearts 211	Deaths from ischemic heart disease among persons 65 years of age and under in Helsinki in 1970, particularly due to pathology-anatomy of the heart 211.
11	isolated valvular aortic stenosis clinico pathological findings in an autopsy material of elderly patients	Aortic valve stenosis clinically isolated pathological in material from autopsy of elderly patients.
11	incomplete rupture of the heart with diverticulum formation	Incomplete rupture of the heart, resulting in the formation of a single diverticulum.
11	secretory granules in cardiomyocytes	Secretory granules in cardiomyocytes.
11	growth hormone cyclic nucleotides and the rapid control of translation in heart muscle	Cardiac cyclic nucleotides; growth hormone and rapid translation control in the cardiac muscle.
11	prinzmetal s variant angina hemodynamic and angiographic observations during pain	Imprizmetal s hemodynamic angina and angiographic variables observed during pain.
11	myocardial ultrastructure in patients with chronic aortic valve disease	Lapos; myocardial ultrastructure in patients with apos; chronic aortic valvular disease.
11	influence of carbon monoxide hypoxic hypoxia or potassium cyanide pretreatment on acute carbon monoxide and hypoxic hypoxia lethality	Influence of hypoxic hypoxia of carbon monoxide or potassium cyanide pretreatment on the acute lethality of carbon monoxide and glucose; hypoxic hypoxia.
11	creatine kinase isoenzymes in baboon tissues and organs	Isoenzymes of creatine kinase in baboon tissue and organs.
11	half life of rabbit heart mitochondria under normal conditions and in experimental allergic lesions of the heart	Half of rabbit heart mitochondrial life under normal conditions and in experimental allergic lesions of the heart.
11	the effect of strophanthin following administration of homocardiac antigen to animals with experimental myocardial infarct	The effect of strophanthin following the administration of homocardiac antigen (HAPE) on animals with experimental myocardial infarction.
11	effect of morphine in vitro on the oxidative phosphorylation in rat liver mitochondria	Effect of morphine in vitro on oxidative phosphorylation in rat liver mitochondria.
11	functional characteristics of light and dark cells	Functional characteristics of both the light and dark cell types.
11	activity of nad and nadp dependent malate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the myocardium of rabbits with alloxan diabetes	L' larval and larval- and larval-dependent malate dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity in the myocardium of rabbits with alloxan diabetes.
11	a cytoplasmic body in human fetal endothelium	A cytoplasmic body in the fetal endothelium.
11	effect of triiodothyronine on chick embryo heart cells maintained in tissue culture	Effect of triiodothyronine on heart cells; chick embryos maintained in tissue culture.
11	changes in mechanical events and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels induced by enantiomers of isoproterenol in isolated rat atria and uteri	Changes in mechanical events and levels of apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate induced by the enantiomers of apos; isoproterenol in isolated rat atria and uteri.
11	stimulation of ion transport by ascorbic acid through inhibition of 3 5 cyclic amp phosphodiesterase in the corneal epithelium and other tissues	Stimulation of ionic transport by apos; ascorbic acid by apos; inhibition of 35 cyclic phosphodiesterase ampoules in apos; corneal epithelium and dapos; other tissues.
11	alterations in myocardial and plasma cyclic adenosine monophosphate in experimental myocardial ischemia	Modifications to the myocardial and plasma cyclic adenosine monophosphate in vitro; experimental myocardial ischemia.
11	the rate of calcium uptake into sarcoplasmic reticulum of cardiac muscle and skeletal muscle effects of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase and phosphorylase b kinase	The rate of calcium absorption in the sarcoplasmic reticulum of the effects of cardiac and skeletal muscle of the protein kinase on skeletal muscle; a cyclic bulb and phosphorylase b kinase on skeletal muscle.
11	characterization of soluble and microsomal adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases from rabbit heart	Characterization of soluble and microsomal monophosphate-dependent protein kinases of l' adenosine 3-5 in the rabbit heart.
11	reversible autophosphorylation of a cyclic 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Reversible autophosphorylation of apos; a cyclic-dependent protein kinase of 35 amperes of bovine cardiac muscle.
11	comparison of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases from rabbit skeletal and bovine heart muscle	Comparison of the monophosphate-dependent protein kinases of rabbit skeletal muscle and bovine heart muscle.
11	restoration of the automatic contractile activity of k arrested heart muscle cells in culture by means of dibutyryl 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	The restoration of l&apos, the automatic contractile activity of k, stops the cultured heart muscle cells by means of dibutyryl 3,5 adenosine monophosphate.
11	studies on the effects of coenzyme a sh acetyl coenzyme a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and adenosine diphosphate adenosine triphosphate ratios on the interconversion of active and inactive pyruvate dehydrogenase in isolated rat heart mitochondria	Studies on the effects of coenzyme a sh acetyl coenzyme a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and adenosine diphosphate adenosine triphosphate ratios on apos; interconversion of active and inactive pyruvate dehydrogenase in isolated mitochondria from rat heart.
11	the release of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate from the isolated perfused rat heart	Release of etapos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate from isolated perfused rat heart.
11	dissociation and reassociation of the phosphorylated and nonphosphorylated forms of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Dissociation and reassociation of phosphorylated and nonphosphorylated forms of l&apos monophosphate-dependent protein kinase; bovine cardiac muscle adenosine 3.5.
11	isolation of stimulatory modulator of guanosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from mammalian heart devoid of inhibitory modulator of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Guanosine-dependent protein kinase enhancer modulator isolation 3-5 monophosphate from apos; a mammalian heart devoid of a protein kinase inhibitor modulator; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	femtomole sensitive radioimmunoassay for cyclic amp and cyclic gmp after 2 0 acetylation by acetic anhydride in aqueous solution	Femtomole sensitive radioimmunoassay for the apos; cyclic ampulla and cyclic gmp after acetylation 20 with acetic anhydride in aqueous solution.
11	adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in perfused rat hearts exposed to isoprenaline and dopamine	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in the perfused hearts of rats exposed to isoprenaline and dopamine.
11	certain characteristics of myocardial metabolism in long term experimental hypotension and the effect of administration of adenosine triphosphate and fructose 1 6 diphosphate	Features of myocardial metabolism in apo; long-term experimental hypotension and apo; effect of apo; administration of apo; adenosine triphosphate and fructose 16 diphosphate.
11	the 3 amido and 5 amido analogues of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate interaction with camp specific proteins	Analogs 3 amido and 5 amido of the apos; interaction of the apos; adenosine 3 monophosphate with specific camp proteins.
11	binding of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase regulatory subunit to immobilized cyclic nucleotide derivatives	Binding of apos-dependent protein kinase regulatory sub-unit @-@; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate to immobilized cyclic nucleotide derivatives.
11	localization of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in cardiac and skeletal muscle immunocytochemical demonstration	Determination of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in the heart and skeletal muscle of the immunocytochemical test.
11	mechanism of self phosphorylation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Mechanisms of apo; auto-phosphorylation of apos-dependent protein kinase; bovine cardiac muscle adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate free and bound forms in the isolated rat atrium	L' cardiac adenosine 3-5 free and bound monophosphate formed in isolated rat atrium.
11	characterization and regulation of heart adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase isozymes	Characterization and regulation of cardiac adenosine 3; apos-dependent protein kinase monophosphate isozymes.
11	concentrations of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase subunits in various tissues	Concentrations of sub@-@ units of protein kinase inhibitors; cyclic ampulla in various tissues.
11	the effect of carbocromen on cardiac cyclic adenosine monophosphate	L' effect of carbocromene on cardiac epos; cyclic adenosine monophosphate.
11	a quench flow kinetic investigation of calcium ion accumulation by isolated cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum dependence of initial velocity on free calcium ion concentration and influence of preincubation with a protein kinase mgatp and cyclic amp	A kinetic study of the quench flux of apos; calcium ion accumulation by isolated cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum depends on the initial rate of free calcium ion and free calcium ion concentration; influences preincubation with a protein kinase mgatp and a cyclic ampoule.
11	myocardial degeneration in mice treated with dibutyryl cyclic amp and or theophylline	Myocardial degeneration in mice treated with cyclic dibutyryl and / or theophylline.
11	influence of prostaglandins upon adenosine release and of adenosine upon prostaglandin release in the isolated rabbit heart	L' influence of prostaglandins on release of adenosine and l' adenosine on release of prostaglandins in isolated rabbit heart.
11	purification of phosphoprotein phosphatase from bovine cardiac muscle that catalyzes dephosphorylation of cyclic amp binding protein component of protein kinase	The bovine cardiac muscle phosphoprotein phosphatase purification that catalyzes the dephosphorylation of the protein kinase binding protein.
11	an adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from human heart	An apos-dependent monophosphate kinase protein; adenosine 3,5 from the human heart.
11	effects of adrenaline and methylisobutylxanthine on adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels in cultures of beating heart cells of the newborn rat	Effect of adenosine; adrenaline and methylisobutylxanthine on levels of adenosine; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in heart cell cultures in beating rat.
11	inhibition of rat heart and brain cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase under the influence of neurohormone c	Inhibition of apos; cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase 3-5 in rat heart and brain under apos; influence of neurohormone c.
11	cyclic nucleotide levels in the perfused rat heart subjected to hypoxia	Cyclic nucleotide levels in the perfused hypoxic rat heart.
11	participation of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in the pathogenesis of myocardial hypertrophy in experimental hypertension	Participation of monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 in apos pathogenesis; myocardial hypertrophy in apos; experimental hypertension.
11	diabetes and the control of pyruvate dehydrogenase in rat heart mitochondria by concentration ratios of adenosine triphosphate adenosine diphosphate of reduced oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and of acetyl coenzyme a coenzyme a	Diabetes and control of pyruvate dehydrogenase in rat heart mitochondria by ratios of adenosine triphosphate adenosine dienosine nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced and d' acetyl coenzyme a coenzyme a coenzyme a coenzyme a.
11	inhibition of the cyclic amp splitting myocardial nucleotide gydrolase by 5 methyl 7 diethylamino s triazol 1 5 alpha pyrimidine rocornal	L' inhibition of myocardial nucleotide gydrolase by 5 methyl diethylamino 7 triazol 1-5 alpha pyrimidine rocornal.
11	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases of myocardial non histone nuclear proteins	Adenosine 3,5 monophosphate-dependent protein kinases of nuclear nonhistone myocardial proteins.
11	effects of isoproterenol on cyclic amp and cyclic amp dependent protein kinase in developing chick myocardium	Effects of Apos; isoproterenol on apos; cyclic ampoule and protein kinase dependent on apos; cyclic ampoule in developing chicken myocardium.
11	phosphorylation of cardiac regulatory proteins by cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Phosphorylation of cardiac regulatory proteins by apos-dependent protein kinase; cyclic ampoule.
11	interrelations of cyclic adenosine monophosphate and calcium in regulating glycogen synthetase in developing skeletal and cardiac muscles in chickens	Relationships between l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate and calcium in the regulation of chicken glycogen synthetase during skeletal and cardiac muscle development.
11	studies on beta adrenoceptors mediating changes in mechanical events and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels rat atria	Beta-Adrenergic Receptors mediating changes in mechanical events and levels of d' adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in rat atria.
11	chronotropic and cyclic adenosine monophosphate response of fetal rat heart in organ culture to isoproterenol quinidine and a dysrhythmogenic agent	Chronotropic and cyclic reaction of the fetal rat heart adenosine monophosphate in organic culture with isoproterenol quinidine and a dysrhythmogenic agent.
11	effects of zinc chloride on the hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp by the activator dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bovine heart	Effects of zinc chloride on apo; cyclic gmp and apo hydrolysis; cyclic ampullae by apo-dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase; bovine heart activator.
11	influence of phenylephrine on levels of cyclic 3 5 amp in the heart of rats in vivo	L' influence of phenylephrine on the levels of 35 cyclic amperes in rat heart in vivo.
11	the sites of phosphorylation of rabbit cardiac troponin i by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate dependent protein kinase effect of interaction with troponin c	Phosphorylation sites of rabbit cardiac troponin i by apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate kinase effect; interaction with troponin c.
11	phosphorylation of the inhibitory subunit of troponin in perfused hearts of mice deficient in phosphorylase kinase evidence for the phosphorylation of troponin by adenosine 3 5 phosphate dependent protein kinase in vivo	Phosphorylation of troponin-inhibitor sub-unit in perfused mouse hearts deficient in phosphorylase kinase revealed the phosphorylase-dependent protein kinase – troponin phosphorylation; adenosine 3-5 phosphate in vivo.
11	studies in vitro of the effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of nuclear proteins in isolated rat heart nuclei	In vitro studies of the effects of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate on phosphorylation of nuclear proteins in isolated rat heart nuclei.
11	inhibition of rat heart and brain cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase in vitro under the influence of neurohormone c	In vitro under the influence of neurohormone c, apos, apos inhibition, adenosine 3-5 rat brain and heart cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterase.
11	compartmentalization of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase in heart tissue	Compartmentalization of apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate and apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate@ protein kinase dependent in cardiac tissue.
11	stimulation of calcium uptake into aortic microsomes by cyclic amp and cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Stimulation of calcium uptake in aortic microsomes by a cyclic ampoule and a d&apos-dependent protein kinase; a cyclic ampoule.
11	mechanism of action of ouabain and cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate on calcium ion transport in rat cardiac mitochondria	Mechanism(s) of action of ouapos; ouabain and monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 on calcium ion transport in rat cardiac mitochondria.
11	autophosphorylation of cardiac 3 5 cyclic amp stimulated protein kinase kinetic evidence for the regulatory subunit directly acting at the active site in the r2c2 complex	L' autophosphorylation of apos; cardiac cyclic bulb 3-5 stimulated apos; kinetic evidence of protein kinase for the sub-regulatory unit acting directly at the active site in the r2c2 complex.
11	isoprenaline induced release of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate by the left ventricle in the anaesthetized intact dog	L' isoprenaline induced release of apos; cyclic adenosine 3,5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in the anesthetized intact dog.
11	the effect 3 5 3 triiodo l thyronine on the kinetic parameters of sugar transport in cultured chick embryo heart cells	The effect of triiodo-thyronine on the kinetic parameters of sugar transport in cultured heart cells of chickens.
11	organ and tissue cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate during the process of the body s adaptation to extreme factors	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate of organs and tissues during the process of apo adaptation; organism to extreme factors.
11	purification of a protein inhibitor of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine myocardium by a non denaturing procedure	Purification of apos; a protein kinase inhibitor dependent on apos; bovine myocardial adenosine 3-5 monophosphate by a nondenaturing method.
11	effect of adenosine and catecholamines on cyclic amp levels in guinea pig heart	The effect of adenosine and catecholamines on the levels of cyclic blisters in the guinea pig heart.
11	properties of epinephrine induced activation of cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	The properties of epinephrine induced apos; activation of protein kinase dependent on apos; cardiac adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	effects of phosphodiesterase inhibitors imidazole and phosphate on cyclic cmp phosphodiesterase are different from those on cyclic amp and cyclic gmp phosphodiesterases	The effects of imidazole and phosphate inhibitors of phosphodiesterase on cyclic cmp phosphodiesterase are different from those of cyclic ampulla and cyclic gmp phosphodiesterases.
11	adenosine induced release of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in the anaesthetized intact dog	L' adenosine induced release of apos; cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in intact, anesthetized dogs.
11	inhibition of mammalian protein kinase and phosphodiesterase activities by a cyclic amp like compound isolated from higher plants	Mammalian protein kinase and phosphodiesterase activity by a cyclic bulb resembling a compound isolated from higher plants.
11	cyclic amp dependent atpase activity of bovine heart protein kinase	Apos-dependent atpase activity; bovine cardiac protein kinase cyclic ampoule.
11	the role of creatine kinase and arginine kinase in muscle	The role of creatine kinase and arginine kinase (ARK) in muscle.
11	sulfhydryl group reactivity of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine heart a probe of holoenzyme structure	Sulfhydryl group reactivity of apos-dependent protein kinase; adenosine 3-5 beef-heart monophosphate, a probe of apos structure; holoenzyme.
11	lack of altered cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity in the aorta and heart of the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Absence of apo; altered cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity in spontaneously hypertensive rat aorta and heart.
11	saturable adenosine 5 triphosphate independent binding of 3h ouabain to brain and cardiac tissue in vitro	Adenosine 5 saturable saturable triphosphate binding independent of ouabain 3h to brain and cardiac tissue in vitro.
11	somatostatin selective inhibition of cyclic amp stimulated protein kinase	L' selective somatostatin inhibition of apos-stimulated protein kinase; cyclic ampoule stimulated protein kinase.
11	effect of taurine on cyclic amp and gmp levels in the hearts of rats exposed to stress	Effect of taurine on ampoules and cyclic gmp levels in the heart of stressed rats.
11	effects of cucl2 on the hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp by the activator dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bovine heart	Effects of cucl2 on apos; cyclic gmp and apos hydrolysis; cyclic ampulla by apos-dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase; activator from beef heart.
11	the role of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in adrenergic effects on ventricular vulnerability to fibrillation in the isolated perfused rat heart	The role of l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate in the adrenergic effects on ventricular vulnerability to fibrillation in isolated perfused rat heart.
11	interaction of aza and deaza analogs of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate with some enzymes of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate metabolism evidence that the lone pair electrons of n 3 are involved in the binding of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate to type ii adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate dependent protein kinase	The interaction of the aza and deaza analogues of phosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 with some enzymes of phosphate metabolism d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 shows that the electrons of the d&apos pair; free electrons of n-3 are involved in the binding of cyclic phosphate 3-5 of the apos; adenosine to the protein kinase l' cyclic adenosine 3-5 phosphate type ii.
11	phosphorylation of synthetic peptide analogs of rabbit cardiac troponin inhibitory subunit by the cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Phosphorylation of the synthetic peptide analogs of rabbit cardiac troponin inhibitory unit by the cyclic ampulla protein kinase.
11	studies on the inhibition by beta adrenergic receptor agonists of cyclic amp phosphodiesterase activity of rat heart	Studies on beta-adrenoceptor agonists' inhibition of apos; apos activity; cyclic phosphodiesterase (CHP) of rat heart.
11	dissociation between the electrophysiological properties and total tissue cyclic guanosine monophosphate content of guinea pig atria	Dissociation between electrophysiological properties and total tissue cyclic guanosine monophosphate content in the guinea pig atria.
11	tyrosine hydroxylase and the conversion of l thyroxine into 3 3 5 triiodo l thyronone in the rat	Tyrosine hydroxylase and the conversion of thyroxine to 3-3-5 rat triiodo lronone.
11	sequence of two phosphorylated sites in the catalytic subunit of bovine cardiac muscle adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Sequence of two phosphorylated sites in bovine cardiac muscle sub-unit catalytic unit; bovine cardiac muscle-dependent adenosine 3-5 monophosphate kinase.
11	stereochemistry of hydrolysis of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphorothioate by the cyclic phosphodiesterase from beef heart	Stereochemistry of apos; hydrolysis of apos; adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic phosphorothioate by bovine heart cyclic phosphodiesterase.
11	effects of coronary vasodilator on cyclic nucleotides the concentrations of cyclic amp and cyclic gmp in canine coronary artery and left ventricular muscle following the administration of various coronary vasodilators	Effects of coronary vasodilator on cyclic nucleotides, cyclic muscle concentration, cyclic ampoule and cyclic gmp in the apos; canine coronary artery and left ventricular muscle after apos; administration of various coronary vasodilators.
11	purification and properties of two forms of soluble 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase from rabbit myocardium	Purification and properties of two forms of soluble 3-5 ampere-dependent rabbit protein kinase.
11	correlation of cyclic amp and cyclic gmp levels with changes in contractile force of dog ventricular myocardium during cholinergic antagonism of positive inotropic actions of histamine glucagon theophylline and papaverine	Correlation between cyclic gmp and dapos levels; cyclic ampoule and changes in contractile force of ventricular dog myocardium during apo; cholinergic antagonism of positive inotropic actions of the apo; histamine glucagon theophylline and papaverine.
11	effects of phenylephrine and isoproterenol on the activity of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase of hypothyroid rat tissues	Effects of phenylephrine and apos; isoproterenol on apos; apos-dependent protein kinase activity; a cyclic ampoule in hypothyroid rat tissues.
11	catalytic properties of soluble 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase of rabbit myocardium	Catalytic properties of rabbit myocardial protein kinase, soluble 3-5 amperes.
11	in vitro and in vivo myocardial effects of a cyclic amp phosphodiesterase inhibitor structurally related to natural cardenolides	In vitro and in vivo myocardial effects of d*apos, a phosphodiesterase cycling inhibitor structurally related to natural cardenolides.
11	independent expression of cardiac type i and ii cyclic amp dependent protein kinase during murine embryogenesis and postnatal development	Independent expression of protein kinase dependent on the apos; type I and ii cyclic ampoule during the apos; murine embryogenesis and postnatal development.
11	inhibitory effect of a lethal toxic fragment of staphylococcal alpha toxin on cyclic amp dependent protein kinase activity	Inhibitory effect of apos; a lethal toxic fragment of the alpha-staphylococcal toxin on apos; protein kinase activity dependent on apos; a cyclic ampoule.
11	re evaluation of the relationship between the positive inotropic effect of ouabain and its inhibitory effect on na k dependent adenosine triphosphatase in rabbit and dog hearts	Reassessment of relationship between apos; positive inotropic effect of ouabain and its inhibitory effect on apos; na k-dependent adenosine triphosphatase in rabbit and dog hearts.
11	affinity labeling of catalytic subunit of bovine heart muscle cyclic amp dependent protein kinase by 5 p fluorosulfonylbenzoyladenosine	Labelling of apos; affinity of the <-@ catalytic unit of the apos-dependent protein kinase; cyclic ampoule of bovine cardiac muscle by 5 p fluorosulfonylbenzoylladenosine.
11	studies on functional domains of the regulatory subunit of bovine heart adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Studies on functional domains of sub-@-@ regulatory unit of protein kinase dependent on l&apos monophosphate; adenosine 3 of beef heart.
11	decreased myocardial and renal content of 3 5 amp in genetically hypertensive rats effects of pge2 and pgf2 alpha	In genetically hypertensive rats, the renal and myocardial content of 3,5 amperes decreased, while the effects of pge2 and pgf2 alpha were diminished.
11	prostacyclin induced coronary vasodilation interactions with adenosine cyclic amp and energy charge in the rat heart in vitro	Prostacyclin induced coronary vasodilation interactions with a d' adenosine cyclic ampoule and rat heart energy charge in vitro.
12	the urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline by rats under various experimental conditions	Urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline by rats under various experimental conditions.
12	increased urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline after phenoxybenzamine	Increases in apos; urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline following phenoxybenzamine.
12	potentiation of epinephrine and norepinephrine by iproniazid	The potentiation of iproniazid epinephrine and norpinephrine.
12	inhibitor of o methylation of epinephrine and norepinephrine in vitro and in vivo	Inhibitor of methylation o of l' epinephrine and norepinephrine in vitro and in vivo.
12	the action of antisympathomimetic drugs on the urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline	The action of antisympathomimetic drugs on apos, urinary excretion of apos, adrenaline and noradrenaline.
12	effect of psychotropic drugs on the uptake of h3 norepinephrine by tissues	Effect of psychotropic drugs on tissue uptake of norepinephrine h3.
12	effect of noradrenaline on the action of nicotine and tyramine on isolated atria	The effect of norepinephrine on glucose; the effect of nicotine and tyramine on isolated atria.
12	the release of adrenaline and noradrenaline from the adrenal medulla of the cat during splanchnic stimulation	Release of adrenaline and noradrenaline from the cat adrenal medulla during splanchnic stimulation.
12	the uptake of adrenaline and noradrenaline by blood platelets of the pig	Capture of adrenaline and noradrenaline by platelets from pigs.
12	role of myocardial catecholamines in cardiac contractility	Role of myocardial catecholamines in cardiac contractility.
12	role for ganglionic norepinephrine in sympathetic synaptic transmission	Role of ganglionic norepinephrine in sympathetic synaptic transmission.
12	epinephrine norepinephrine and acetylcholine as conditioned stimuli for avoidance behavior	Epinephrine, norepinephrine and apos; acetylcholine are stimuli conditioned by an avoidance behaviour.
12	effect of noradrenaline bretylium and cocaine on the blood pressure response to tyramine in the rat	Effect of noradrenaline-bretylium and cocaine on blood pressure response to tyramine in rat.
12	responses of the isolated sympathetic nerveductus deferens preparation of the guinea pig	The guinea pig preparation was delayed by the responses of the isolated sympathetic nerve.
12	depletion and replacement of the adrenaline and noradrenaline contents of the rat adrenal gland following treatment with reserpine	Depletion and replacement of adrenaline and noradrenaline contents of the adrenal gland of the rat after reserpine treatment.
12	is reserpine tranquilization linked to change in brain serotonin or brain norepinephrine	Reserpine tranquilization is related to a change in brain serotonin or brain norepinephrine.
12	effect of reserpine on release of noradrenaline from transmitter granules in adrenergic nerves	Effect of reserpine treatment on release of noradrenaline from transmitter granules in adrenergic nerves.
12	effect of drugs on the noradrenaline content of brain and peripheral tissues and its significance	Drug effects on the noradrenaline content and importance of brain and peripheral tissues.
12	retention of injected catechol amines by the mouse	Catechol amine retention by the mouse.
12	effect of hexamethonium on the vascular response to noradrenaline in man	The effect of hexamethonium on the vascular response to the norepinephrine in humans.
12	reversal of phenylalkylamine tachyphylaxis by norepinephrine	Inversion of the phenylalkylamine tachyphylaxis by norepinephrine.
12	interactions between cocaine tyramine and noradrenaline at the noradrenaline store	The interactions between cocaine tyramine and norepinephrine in the norepinephrine store.
12	effect of guanethidine hemicholinium and mebutamate on the hypertensive response to eserine and catechol amines	Effect of lacidosis, hemicholinium and guanethidine mebutamate on the hypertensive response to apos; eserine and catecholic amines.
12	effect of antisympathomimetic drugs on the plasma concentrations of catechol amines	Effect of anti-sympathomimetic drugs on plasma concentrations of catechol amines.
12	localizing tritiated norepinephrine in sympathetic axons by electron microscopic autoradiography	Localization of tritiated norepinephrine in sympathetic axons by autoradiography by electron microscopy.
12	pharmacological responses of thiamine deficient rat tissues	Pharmacological responses of thiamine-deficient tissues in rat.
12	neurochemical differences between two strains of mice	Neurochemical differences between two different strains of mice.
12	effect of chlorpromazine and reserpine on the catechol amine content of different areas of the central nervous system of the dog	Effect of chlorpromazine and reserpine on catecholamine content in different regions of the dog central nervous system.
12	tissue levels of norepinephrine and epinephrine in hemorrhagic shock	Tissue levels of norepinephrine and dolipos; epinephrine in a state of hemorrhagic shock.
12	action of sympathomimetic drugs on the isolated junction of the bile duct and duodenum	L' action of the sympathomimetic drugs on the isolated junction of the bile duodenum and ductus.
12	the effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the pressor responses to noradrenaline and angiotensin	The effects of bretylium and guanethidine on pressor responses to noradrenaline and l' angiotensin.
12	the action of histamine on the isolated heart	L' action of the apos; histamine on the isolated heart.
12	the subcellular localization of dopamine and acetylcholine in the dog caudate nucleus	Subcellular localization of dopamine and acetylcholine in dog caudate nucleus.
12	the effects of nialamide on adrenergic functions	Effects of nialamide on adrenergic functions.
12	urinary excretion of metabolites of catecholamines in normal individuals and hypertensive patients	L' urinary excretion of catecholamine metabolites in normal and hypertensive patients.
12	bacteremic shock a medical emergency	One bacteriological shock, one medical emergency.
12	guanethidine and pupillary reaction	Guanethidine and pupillary response.
12	drug administration to neonatal rats effects on later emotionality and learning	Neonatal rats are given medication that has effects on their emotional and emotional well-being.
12	iontophoretic release of adrenaline noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine from micropipettes	Iontophoretic release of epos; adrenaline, noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine from micropipettes.
12	mechanism of the positive inotropic responses to bretylium and guanethidine	Mechanisms of positive inotropic responses to bretylium and guanethidine.
12	effect of some blocking drugs on the pressor response to physostigmine in the rat	Effect of certain blocking drugs on pressor response to physostigmine in rat.
12	potentiation of some catechol amines by phenoxybenzamine guanethidine and cocaine	The potential for phenoxybenzamine guanethidine and cocaine.
12	norepinephrine and 3 4dihydroxyphenethylamine turnover in guinea pig brain in vivo	Norepinephrine and 4dihydroxyphenethylamine turnover occurs in vivo in the guinea pig brain.
12	prostaglandin release from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Release of prostaglandins from rat phrenic nerve diaphragmatic preparation.
12	septic shock	Septic shock.
12	participation of an unusual ganglionic pathway in the mediation of the pressor effect of physostigmine in the rat	Involvement of d' an unusual ganglionic pathway mediated by l' pressor effect of physostigmine in rat.
12	the effects of bethanidine on the peripheral circulation in man	Effects of bethanidine on peripheral circulation in men.
12	innervation of the large intestine of the toad bufo marinus	Innervation of the big toad bufo marinus intestine.
12	a preliminary investigation of the pharmacology of the human isolated taenia coli preparation	A preliminary study of the pharmacology of taenia coli preparation isolated from humans.
12	effects of bretylium and guanethidine on human hand and forearm vessels and on their sensitivity to noradrenaline	The effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the vessels of the hand and the apos; before-human arms and their sensitivity to noradrenaline.
12	the increase in the toxicity of yohimbine induced by imipramine and other drugs in mice	It is important to note that there are no data on the toxicity of yohimbine in mice.
12	tremorine its effect on amines of the central nervous system	Tremorine's effect on the central nervous system amines.
12	early developmental stress and later behavior	Early developmental stress and delayed behavior.
12	a comparison of platelet aggregation produced by seven compounds and a comparison of their inhibitors	A comparison of the platelet aggregation produced by seven compounds and a comparison of their inhibitors.
12	the part played by calcium in determining the response to stimulation of sympathetic postganglionic fibres	The role of calcium in the response to stimulation of the sympathetic postganglionic fibers.
12	histochemical demonstration of uptake of exogenous norepinephrine by adrenergic fibers in vitro	Histochemical demonstration of apos; absorption of exogenous norepinephrine by adrenergic fibres in vitro.
12	a nuclear membrane change after partial hepatectomy	A change in the nuclear membrane following partial hepatectomy.
12	production of inflammatory changes in the microcirculation by cationic proteins extracted from lysosomes	Production of inflammatory changes in the microcirculation by the cationic proteins extracted from the lysosomes.
12	shock caused by continuous infusion of metaraminol bitartrate aramine	Shock from continuous infusion of metaraminol bitartrate aramine.
12	adrenaline synthesis control by the pituitary gland and adrenal glucocorticoids	The synthesis of l' adrenaline is controlled by the pituitary and adrenal glucocorticoids.
12	peripheral vascular effects of mixtures of isoprenaline and noradrenaline in man	Peripheral vascular effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline mixtures in humans.
12	secretory responses of extramedullary chromaffin tissue	Extramedullary chromaffin tissue secretory reactions.
12	a sensitive method for the assay of catechol amines	Sensitive method for the determination of the catechol amines.
12	the effect of fasting on the hyperglycaemic responses to catechol amines in rats	L' effect of fasting on hyperglycemic responses to catecholic amines in rat.
12	effects of amphetamine on the responses of the guinea pig isolated vas deferens preparation to hypogastric nerve stimulation	Effects of l' amphetamine on the isolated guinea pig vas deferens responses to hypogastric nerve stimulation.
12	acidosis effect on lipolytic activity of norepinephrine in isolated fat cells	Effect of the apos; acidosis on the apos; lipolytic activity of norepinephrine in isolated fat cells.
12	adrenaline and noradrenaline relation to performance in a visual vigilance task	The ratio of adrenaline to norepinephrine and performance in a visual alertness task.
12	an investigation of the adrenergic blocking action of chlorpromazine	A study of the adrenergic blocking action of chlorpromazine.
12	urinary excretion of catechol amines in the rat after their liberation by reserpine or dexamphetamine	L' urinary excretion of catechol amines in rats after release by reserpine or dexamphetamine.
12	chemical tests for phaeochromocytoma	Chemical tests for pheochromocytoma, please.
12	the action of sympathomimetic amines on the outflow of aqueous humour from the eye	L' action of sympathomimetic amines on apos; flow of apos; aqueous humour of the apos; eye.
12	inhibition of sympathomimetic effects on the heart	This is an inhibition of sympathomimetic effects on the heart.
12	the effects of drugs on the uptake of amines by mast cells	The effects of the drugs on the apos; amine absorption by mast cells.
12	unconditioned response to electric shock mechanism in planarians	Unconditional response to the mechanism of electric shock in the planar.
12	the effect of some anticholinesterases on the response of the taenia to sympathetic nerve stimulation	The effect of certain anticholinesterases on the response of taenia to sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	the development of the adrenal medulla of the foetal and new born calf	The development of the fetus adrenal medulla and the newborn calf.
12	neuromuscular transmitter substance in insect visceral muscle	A neuromuscular-transmitter substance in the visceral muscle of insects.
12	studies on the renal excretion of norepinephrine	Norepinephrine is the most common form of norepinephrine.
12	comparison of effects of deoxycorticosterone and dexamethasone on cardiovascular responses to norepinephrine	Comparison of the effects of deoxycorticosterone and dexamethasone on cardiovascular responses to norepinephrine.
12	the influences of andrenotropic drugs and noradrenaline on the histamine release in cardiac anaphylaxis in vitro	The influence of andrenotropic drugs and noradrenaline on histamine release in the heart anaphylaxis in vitro.
12	modification by beta adrenergic blockade of the circulatory respones to acute hypoxia in man	The modification, by beta-adrenergic blockade, of the circulatory functions responsible for the acute hypoxia in men.
12	the innervation of sheep mesenteric veins	L' innervation of mesenteric sheep veins.
12	cardiovascular and metabolic responses to noradrenaline in man before and after acclimatization to cold in antarctica	Cardiovascular and metabolic responses to noradrenaline in men before and after onset; cold acclimation in the apo; Antarctic.
12	the blood flow and oxygen consumption of brown adipose tissue in the new born rabbit	The rate of blood flow and the consumption of oxygen from brown adipose tissue in the newborn rabbit.
12	food and water intake after intrahypothalamic injections of carbachol in the rabbit	Absorption of acid; water and food after intrahypothalamic injections of carbachol in rabbits.
12	norepinephrine methylation in fetal rat adrenals	Norepinephrine methylation in fetal rat adrenals.
12	mast cells and necrosis	Mastocytes and necrosis.
12	the effects of pressure and pharmacologically active substances on gastric peristalsis in a transmurally stimulated rat soomach duodenum preparation	Effects of pressure and pharmacologically active substances on gastric peristalsis in a transmurally stimulated rat soomach duodenum preparation.
12	effects on temperature of monoamines injected into the cerebral ventricles of anaesthetized dogs	Temperature effects of monoamines injected into the cerebral ventricles of anesthetized dogs.
12	monoamines and their metabolites in the avian brain	Monoamines and their metabolites in the brains of birds.
12	diagnostic value of detailed metabolic pathway investigations in two cases of phaeochromocytoma with minimal increase in total catecholamine output	Diagnostic value d' detailed metabolic pathway studies in two pheochromocytoma cases with minimal increase in total production of catecholamines.
12	the determination of urinary amines by one dimensional paper chromatography	Determination of urinary amine by one-dimensional paper chromatography.
12	systemic vasoconstrictor and renal vasodilator effects of plv 2 octapressin in man	Systemic vasoconstrictor and renal vasodilator effects of apos; plev octapressin 2 in apos; man.
12	effects of alpha adrenergic blockade and tissue catecholamine depletion on pulmonary vascular response to hypoxia	Effects of alpha-adrenergic blockade and tissue catecholamine depletion on pulmonary vascular response to l' hypoxia.
12	effects of adrenergic receptor activation and blockade on the systolic preejection period heart rate and arterial pressure in man	Effects of Lapos; activation and blockade of adrenergic receptors on heart rate and blood pressure during systolic pre-ejection in men.
12	light induced changes in pineal hydroxyindole o methyltransferase abolition by lateral hypothalamic lesions	Light induced changes in the elimination of pineal hydroxyindole o methyltransferase by lateral hypothalamic lesions.
12	vascular smooth muscle quantitation of cell thickness in the wall of arterioles in the living animal in situ	Quantification of apos; thickness of vascular smooth muscle arteriolar wall cells; live animal in situ.
12	neural correlates of food and water intake in the rat	Neural correlates of consumption of water and food in the rat.
12	localization of the adrenergic feeding system in the rat diencephalon	Localization of the d&apos system; adrenergic feeding in rat diencephalon.
12	plasma lipids and urinary excretion of catecholamines in man during experimentally induced emotional stress and their modification by nicotinic acid	Plasma lipids and l-apos; urinary catecholamine excretion in men during experimentally induced emotional stress and modification by nicotinic acid.
12	observation of changes in volume of a congested limb as a means of studying the behaviour of capacity vessels	Observing volume changes; congested limb as a means of monitoring; studying the behaviour of vessels of capacity.
12	the effect of intraventricular injections of noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine acetylcholine and tranylcypromine on the ox bos taurus at different environmental temperatures	L' effect; intraventricular injections of noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine acetylcholine and tranylcypromine into beef bosurus at different ambient temperatures.
12	concealed glomerular filtration	Hidden glomerular filtration.
12	mechanisms of reflex vasodilation assessment of the role of neural reuptake of norepinephrine and release of histamine	Mechanisms of apo; evaluation of reflex vasodilation of the role of norepinephrine neuronal recapture and histamine release.
12	metabolism of alpha methyltyrosine in man relationship to its potency as an inhibitor of catecholamine biosynthesis	Metabolism of etapos; alpha methyltyrosine in relation to its potency as an inhibitor of catecholamine biosynthesis.
12	the effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on hormone secretion and blood flow from the thyroid vein in sheep with exteriorized thyroids	L' effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on hormonal secretion and thyroid vein blood flow in externalized thyroid sheep.
12	studies on the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesentric artery of the domestic fowl	Longitudinal muscle studies of the anterior mesenteric artery of domestic poultry.
12	electrical and mechanical activity of the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesenteric artery of the domestic fowl	Electrical and mechanical activity of the longitudinal muscle of l' anterior mesenteric artery of domestic poultry.
12	adenyl cyclase activity in rat pineal gland effects of chronic denervation and norepinephrine	Effects of chronic denervation and norepinephrine on apos; apos activity; adenyl cyclase in the pineal gland of rats.
12	central temperature regulation in the conscious rabbit after monoamine oxidase inhibition	Regulation of core temperature in conscious rabbits after monoamine oxidase inhibition.
12	effects of adrenaline on human blood platelets	Effects of epos and adrenaline on human blood platelets.
12	some properties of the smooth muscle of rabbit portal vein	Some properties of the rabbit portal vein smooth muscle.
12	studies of the mitochondrial energy transfer system of brown adipose tissue	Study of the potato transfer system; mitochondrial energy of brown adipose tissue.
12	in vivo and in vitro manifestations of adrenergic blockade in bordetella pertussis vaccinated mice	In vivo and in vitro manifestations of adrenergic blockade in vaccinated mice against whooping cough and whooping cough.
12	inhibition of gastrointestinal movement by sympathetic nerve stimulation the site of action	L' inhibition of gastro@-@ intestinal movement by sympathetic nerve stimulation is the site of this action.
12	the mechanism of body temperature changes induced by intraventricular injections of adrenaline noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the ox bos taurus	The mechanism of body temperature changes induced by intraventricular injections of epos; adrenaline, noradrenaline, and 5 hydroxytryptamine into the bos bosom taurus.
12	intrastrain difference in serotonin and norepinephrine in discrete areas of rat brain	Intrarain difference in serotonin and norpinephrine in discrete areas of rat brain.
12	evoked release of norepinephrine and serotonin from brain slices inhibitoon by lithium	Evoked release of norepinephrine and serotonin from lithium-inhibited brain slices.
12	histochemical fluorescence after application of neurochemicals to caudate nucleus and septal area in vivo	Histochemical fluorescence after in vivo application of neurochemicals to the caudate nucleus and septal region.
12	inhibition of lipolytic action of growth hormone and glucocorticoid by ultraviolet and x radiation	Inhibition of apos; lipolytic action of apos; growth hormone and glucocorticoids by ultraviolet and x-rays.
12	action of various sympathomimetic amines on the isolated stripped vas deferens of the guinea pig	L' action of sympathomimetic amines on the isolated and stripped vas deferens of the guinea pig.
12	the effects of drugs inhibiting catecholamine uptake on tyramine and noradrenaline induced contractions of the isolated rat vas deferens	Drug effects inhibiting catecholamine uptake on tyramine and noradrenaline induced contractions of the isolated rat vas deferens.
12	the interaction between angiotensin and sympathetic vasoconstriction in the isolated artery of the rabbit ear	L' interaction between the apos; angiotensin and sympathetic vasoconstriction in the apos; isolated apos artery; rabbit ear.
12	the release of 3h dopamine from the isolated rabbit ileum	The release of dopamine 3h from the isolated ileum of rabbit.
12	pharmacological modifications of sympathetic responses elicited by hypothalamic stimulation in the rat	Pharmacological changes in the sympathetic responses induced by the hypothalamic stimulation in the rat.
12	the potentiation of rat uterine inhibitory responses to noradrenaline by theophylline and nitroglycerine	Potentialization of uterine inhibitory responses to noradrenaline by theophylline and nitroglycerine.
12	effect of rabbit antibodies against angiotensin ii on the pressor response to angiotensin ii and renal hypertension in the rat	Effect of rabbit antibodies against apos; angiotensin ii on the pressor response to apos; angiotensin ii and apos; rat renal hypertension.
12	interaction between desipramine tyramine and amphetamine at adrenergic neurones	Interaction between tyramine desipramine and adrenergic neuron amphetamine.
12	the pattern and control of sweating in the sheep and the goat	The pattern and control of sheep and goats perspiration.
12	the inhibitory action of noradrenaline and adrenaline on acetylcholine output by guinea pig ileum longitudinal muscle strip	L' inhibitory action of noradrenaline and l' adrenaline on the production of d' acetylcholine by the longitudinal muscle band of the guinea pig ileum.
12	antagonism of the response of human isolated arteries to noradrenaline	The antagonism of the response of isolated human arteries to noradrenaline.
12	the pharmacological properties of fibrinogen degradation products	Pharmacological properties of fibrinogen degradation products.
12	effect of norepinephrine epinephrine and angiotensin on blood flow in the internal carotid artery of man	The effect of norepinephrine-epinephrine and apos; angiotensin on blood flow in the apos; internal carotid artery of the apos; man.
12	facilitation of brain self stimulation by central administration of norepinephrine	Ease of norepinephrine administration; auto-brain stimulation by norepinephrine.
12	semi automated method for the differential determination of plasma catecholamines	Automatic semi-method for differential determination of plasma catecholamines.
12	studies on renal vasomotion	Study of renal vasomotor function.
12	thyroxine deiodination during cold exposure in the rat	Acute toxicity of Tyroxine deiodin during cold exposure in the rat: a prospective study.
12	circadian rhythms in rat mid brain and caudate nucleus biogenic amine levels	Circadian rhythms in the middle of the rat brain and levels of d' caudate nucleus biogenic amine.
12	epinephrine effect on uptake of iodine by dispersed cells of calf thyroid gland	Effect of apos; epinephrine on uptake of apos; iodine by dispersed cells of the thyroid gland of the calf.
12	localization of tritiated norepinephrine in vascular sympathetic axons of the rat intestine and mesentery by electron microscope radioautography	Localization of the tritiated norepinephrine in vascular sympathetic axons of the intestine and rat mesentery by radioautographic electron microscopy.
12	rat brain amines blood histamine and glucose levels in relationship to circadian changes in sleep induced by pentobarbitone sodium	Blood levels of histamine and glucose are altered by rat brain in relation to the circadian changes in sleep induced by sodium pentobarbitone.
12	the reversal of the central effects of noradrenaline by antidepressant drugs in mice	L' reversal of the central effects of norepinephrine by antidepressants in mice.
12	evidence for a central 5 hydroxytryptamine receptor stimulation by lysergic acid diethylamide	Evidence of central stimulation of d*apos receptors; hydroxytryptamine 5 by l*apos diethylamide; lysergic acid.
12	the effects of intracerebroventricularly administered noradnamine and other sympathomimetic amines upon leptazol convulsions in mice	Effects of apos; intracerebroventricular administration of noradnamine and d*apos; other sympathomimetic amines on leptazol-induced convulsions in mice.
12	restoration of the chronotropic effect of tyramine on rat atria after reserpine	Re-establishment of apos; chronotropic effect of tyramine on rat atria after dosing; administration of reserpine.
12	neurohumoral interaction in the rat amygdala after central chemical stimulation	Neuro interaction-humoral in the rat's apos; amygdala after central chemical stimulation.
12	action of a pyrimido pyrimidine compound on platelet behaviour in vitro	Action of pyrimido pyrimidine compound on platelet behaviour in vitro.
12	shivering and non shivering therogenesis during summit metabolism in young lambs	Shivering and nonshivering therogenesis during peak metabolism in young lambs.
12	changes in plasma glucose lactate and free fatty acids in lambs during summit metabolism and treatment with catecholamines	Changes in plasma glucose lactate and free fatty acids in lambs during lamb peak metabolism and catecholamine treatment.
12	the mechanism of the pyrogenic effect of streptococcus cell wall mucopeptide	The pyrogenic effect of the mucopeptide of the streptococcal cell wall.
12	control of body temperature in the unanaesthetized monkey by cholinergic and aminergic systems in the hypothalamus	The control of body temperature in monkeys that are not anesthetized by their cholinergic and aminergic systems; hypothalamus.
12	the systolic blood pressure response of depressed patients to infused norepinephrine	The systolic blood pressure response to norepinephrine infusion in depressed patients.
12	adipose tissue and heat production in the new born ox bos taurus	Fabric fat and heat production in the new-ne bos bos bos taurus.
12	the effect of noradrenaline on the end plate potential in twitch fibres of the frog	L' effect of noradrenaline on potential end plate in frog twitch fibers.
12	generation of adrenergic and cholinergic potentials in sympathetic ganglion cells	Production of both adrenergic and cholinergic potentials in sympathetic ganglion cells.
12	beta receptor mechanisms in the superficial limb veins of the dog	Mechanism(s) of beta receptors in the superficial veins of dog limbs.
12	unexpected adrenergic effects of chlorpromazine eating elicited by injection into rat hypothalamus	Adrenergic unexpected effects of chlorpromazine use induced by apos; injection into the rat hypothalamus.
12	hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol and norepinephrine in acute cardiac tamponade	Hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol and norepinephrine in acute cardiac tamponade.
12	1 delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol neurochemical and behavioral effects in the mouse	Neurochemical and behavioural effects of delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol in the mouse.
12	effects of catecholamines on the cholinergic neuromuscular transmission in fish red muscle	Effects of catecholamines on cholinergic neuromuscular transmission in red muscle of fish.
12	effects of reserpine on the disposition of sympathomimetic amines in vascular tissue	Reserpine effects on the disposition of sympathomimetic amines in vascular tissue.
12	mechanism of cocaine potentiation of responses to amines	The mechanism of apos; increase in apos; apos activity; enzyme is linked to apos; increase in apos; apos activity; enzyme.
12	effects of a haloalkylamine on responses to and disposition of sympathomimetic amines	Effects of a haloalkylamine on the responses to sympathomimetic amines and their disposition.
12	brain monoamines and adrenocortical activation	Brain monoamines and adrenalocortical activation.
12	hormonal regulation of rat seminal vesicle sensitivity to adrenaline noradrenaline acetylcholine and acetyl beta methylcholine	Hormonal regulation of sensitivity of rat seminal vesicles to norepinephrine acetylcholine and l' acetyl beta methylcholine.
12	lysergic acid diethylamide dissociation of its behavioral and hyperthermic actions by dl alpha methyl p tyrosine	Dissociation of the lysergic acid diethylamide from its behavioural and hyperthermic actions by dl alpha methyl tyrosine.
12	a study of the role of noradrenaline in behavioral changes produced in the rat by psychotomimetic drugs	A study of the role of noradrenaline in behavioral changes induced by psychotomimetic drugs in rats.
12	behavioural and biochemical effects of 2 2 6 dichlorophenylamino 2 imidazoline hydrochloride st 155 on the central nervous system	Behavioural and biochemical effects of dichlorophenylamino hydrochloride-2 imidazoline 2-226 on the central nervous system.
12	adenyl cyclase in human platelets activity and responsiveness	Adenyl cyclase in etapos; human platelet activity and reactivity.
12	preiminary investigation of the pharmacology of the human internal anal sphincter	Preliminary study of pharmacology of the human internal anal sphincter.
12	interactions of ouabain and noradrenaline in isolated rabbit s atria	"""Interactions of orabain and noradrenaline in isolated rabbit s atria"", J. Am."
12	effects of chlorpromazine on the metabolism of catecholamines in dog brain	Effects of chlorpromazine on catecholamine metabolism in dog brain.
12	studies of the effect of natural and synthetic polypeptide type ergot compounds on a peripheral vascular bed	Apos studies; effect of natural and synthetic ergot-like polypeptides on a peripheral vascular bed.
12	steroid potentiation of responses to sympathomimetic amines in aortic strips	The steroid potentiation of the responses to sympathomimetic amines in the aortic strips.
12	reversal by pronethalol of dibenamine blockade a study on the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig	Dibenamine d&apos blockade is reversed by pronethalol; a study of the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig.
12	kinetic studies of plasma free fatty acid and triglyceride metabolism in man	Kinetic studies of human free fatty acid and plasma triglyceride metabolism.
12	stimulation of c14 melatonin synthesis from c14 tryptophan by noradrenaline in rat pineal in organ culture	Stimulation of melatonin c14 synthesis from tryptophan c14 by noradrenaline in organ cultured rat epinephrine.
12	norepinephrine turnover in rat brains after gonadectomy	Norepinephrine turnover in brain rats after gonadectomy.
12	influence of prostaglandin e1 on the terminal vascular bed	L' influence of prostaglandin e1 on vascular bed end.
12	tricyclic antidepressants evidence for an intraneuronal site of action	Tricyclic antidepressants indicate the existence of apoes, a site of death, and an intraneuronal action.
12	olfactory bulb removal effects on brain norepinephrine	The effects of olfactory bulb suppression on the brain's norepinephrine.
12	norepinephrine induced depolarization of brown fat cells	Norepinephrine induced depolarization of brown adipose cells.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate stimulation of melatonin and serotonin synthesis in cultured rat pineals	Cyclic stimulation of melatonin and serotonin synthesis by etapos; adenosine monophosphate in pineal cultures of rats.
12	a comparison of sweat gland activity in eight species of east african bovids	Comparison of liver and sweat glands activity in eight species of D&apos bovids; Africa of East Africa.
12	modulation of noradrenaline incorporation by nerve activities in the rat submaxillary gland	Apos modulation; noradrenaline uptake by nerve activities in the gland under rat maxillary @-@.
12	function of smooth muscle of the rat renal pelvis response of the isolated pelvis muscle to angiotensin and some other substances	Function of the rat renal cell smooth muscle, response of isolated muscle to angiotensin and other substances.
12	phase separation in solutions of noradrenaline and adenosine triphosphate influence of bivalent cations and drugs	Phase separation in noradrenaline and d' adenosine triphosphate solutions influences divalent cations and drugs.
12	interactions of inhibitors of noradrenaline uptake and angiotensin on the sympathetic nerves of the isolated rabbit heart	Interactions of norepinephrine and norepinephrine uptake inhibitors; angiotensin on the sympathetic nerves of isolated rabbit heart.
12	the effects of adrenaline noradrenaline and isoprenaline on inhibitory alpha and beta adrenoceptors in the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig ileum	The effects of the adrenalin, noradrenaline and isoprenaline on the alpha and beta inhibitors in the longitudinal muscle of the apos; ileum of the guinea pig.
12	intraneural distribution of exogenous norepinephrine in the central nervous system of the rat	Intraneural distribution of exogenous norepinephrine in the rat central nervous system.
12	dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine replacement and metabolism in sympathetic nerve and adrenal medullary depletions after prolonged thermal injury	Dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine replacement and metabolism in sympathetic nerve and adrenal medullary depletion after prolonged thermal injury.
12	action of dopamine on the human iris	Action of dopamine on human iris.
12	responses of saphenous and mesenteric veins to administration of dopamine	Dopamine is used in the treatment of both saphenous and mesenteric veins.
12	autonomic reflexes and vascular reactivity in experimental scurvy in man	Autonomous reflexes and vascular reactivity in experimental male etapos scurvy.
12	dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine metabolism in parkinsonism	Hydroxytyramine dopamine 3 metabolism in parkinsonism.
12	incorporation of 14c tryptophan into 14c protein by cultured rat pineals stimulation by l norepinephrine	L' incorporation of tryptophan 14c into protein 14c by stimulation of norepinephrine-grown rat pineals.
12	a method for the estimation of the catecholamines and their metabolites in brain tissue	Estimation of catecholamines and their metabolites in brain tissue.
12	effects of chronic administration of nicotine on storage and synthesis of noradrenaline in rat brain	Effects of apos; chronic nicotine administration on storage and synthesis of noradrenaline in rat brain.
12	immunohistochemical localizatio of protein components of catecholamine storage vesicles	Immunohistochemical localization of the protein components of catecholamine storage vesicles.
12	nerve mediated excitation and inhibition of the smooth muscle cells of the avian gizzard	Nerve-mediated inhibition of smooth muscle cells of avian gizzard.
12	melatonin synthesis adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and norepinephrine stimulate n acetyltransferase	Melatonin synthesis, l' adenosine 3,5 monophosphate, and norepinephrine stimulate etapos; acetyltransferase.
12	the mobilization of free fatty acids in relation to adipose tissue triglyceride fatty acids in the rat	The mobilization of free fatty acids relative to the triglyceride fatty acids of the adipose tissue of the rat.
12	inhibition of the carotid sinus reflex by the chronic administration of propranolol	Inhibition of the reflex of the carotid sinus by chronic administration of propranolol.
12	effects of amphetamine derivatives on brain dopamine and noradrenaline	Effects of l&apos derivatives; amphetamine on dopamine and noradrenaline in the brain.
12	effect of a new series of bicyclic compounds with potential thymoleptic properties on the reserpine resistant uptake mechanism of central and peripheral monoamine neurones in vivo and in vitro	A new series of bicyclic compounds with potential thymoleptic properties on the mechanism of apo; reserpine absorption of central and peripheral monoamino neurons in vivo and in vitro.
12	the effect of catecholamines and sympathetic stimulation on the release of acetylcholine from the guinea pig colon	L' effect of catecholamines and sympathetic stimulation on release of apos; acetylcholine from the guinea pig colon.
12	the effect of cocaine and imipramine on tyramine induced release of noradrenaline 3h from the rat vas deferens in vitro	The effect of cocaine and idios; imipramine on tyramine induced the release of noradrenaline 3h from the vas deferens of the rat in vitro.
12	the interactions of noradnamine and imipramine like antidepressant drugs	The interactions of noradnamine and apos; imipramine as antidepressants.
12	the effect of morpine dependence on the vesicular content of adrenergic nerves in relation to arteriolar smooth muscle in the pancreas of the rat	L' effect of morpine-dependence on the vesicular content of adrenergic nerves in relation to arteriolar smooth muscle in rat pancreas.
12	actions of phenylephrine on beta adrenoceptors in guinea pig trachea	L' action of phenylephrine on beta-adrenergic receptors of guinea pig trachea.
12	the pharmacological nature of the response of the reserinized guinea pig vas deferens to postganglionic nerve stimulation	The pharmacological nature of the response of the vas deferens of the reserized guinea pig to postganglionic nerve stimulation.
12	the metabolism of orally administered l dopa in parkinsonism	Metabolism of orally administered dopa in parkinsonism.
12	blockade of biogenic amine synthesis its effect on the responses to leptazol and dexamphetamine in rats	Blocking the synthesis of biogenic amines affects responses to leptazol and dexamphetamine in rats.
12	the spontaneous release of prostaglandins into the cerebral ventricles of the dog and the effect of external factors on this release	Spontaneous release of prostaglandins into the dog's cerebral ventricle and the dog's cerebral cortex; effect of external factors on this release.
12	the effects of cholinomimetic drugs on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation and noradrenaline in the rabbit ear artery	The effects of cholinomimetic drugs on the responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation and noradrenaline in the apos artery; rabbit ear.
12	the antagonism of adrenergic neurone blockade by amphetamine and dexamphetamine in the rat and guinea pig	L' antagonism of blockade of adrenergic neurons by amphetamine and dexamphetamine in rats and guinea pigs.
12	the role of brown adipose tissue in the calorigenic effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline in cold acclimated rats	The role of brown adipose tissue in the calorigenic effect of adenos; adrenaline and noradrenaline in cold-acclimated rats.
12	pineal gland dibutyryl cyclic adenosine monophosphate stimulation of labeled melatonin production	Stimulation of labelled melatonin production by the pineal dibutyryl cyclic adenosine monophosphate.
12	alkaloids from catecholamines in adrenal tissue possible role in alcoholism	Catecholamine alkaloids in adrenal tissues could play a role in apo; alcoholism.
12	the pharmacology of ambenoxan 2 3 6 dioxaheptyl aminomethyl 1 4 benzodioxane a centrally acting muscle relaxant	The pharmacology of l' ambenoxane 2 3-6 dioxaheptyl aminomethyl 1-4 benzodioxane, a muscle relaxant; central action.
12	catecholamine biosynthesis in brains of rats treated with morphine	Catecholamine biosynthesis in the brain of morphine treated rats.
12	norepinephrine turnover and metabolism in rat brain after long term administration of imipramine	Norepinephrine turnover and metabolism in rat brain following prolonged administration of apos; imipramine.
12	miosis during l dopa therapy	Miosis during dopa therapy?
12	intracranial self stimulation and wakefulness effect of manipulating ambient brain catecholamines	Auto-intracranial stimulation and effects; alertness to ambient cerebral catecholamine (ACP) manipulation.
12	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in rat pineal gland increase induced by light	Adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in the pineal gland of the rat light-induced increase.
12	antiparkinsonian drugs inhibition of dopamine uptake in the corpus striatum as a possible mechanism of action	Parkinson's drugs inhibit the absorption of dopamine into the striated body as a possible mechanism of action.
12	amphetamine differentiation by d and l isomers of behavior involving brain norepinephrine or dopamine	Amphetamine differentiation by isomers d and l of brain norepinephrine or brain dopamine behaviour.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate possible mediator for norepinephrine effects on cerebellar purkinje cells	Cyclic adenosine monophosphate may mediate the effects of norepinephrine on cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	brain norepinephrine enhanced turnover after rubidium treatment	Brain norepinephrine was found to increase turnover after rubidium treatment.
12	guanethidine and related agents 3 antagonism by drugs which inhibit the norepinephrine pump in man	Guanethidine and related antagonists 3 with drugs that inhibit norepinephrine pump in men.
12	polyol pathway in aorta regulation by hormones	The pathway of polyol in hormone aorta regulation.
12	idiopathic postural hypotension physiologic observations and report of a new mode of therapy	Physiological observations of the apo; idiopathic postural hypotension and prognosis; a new treatment modality.
12	the delayed pressor response to small doses of intravenous noradrenaline in conscious rabbits	Delayed pressor response to small doses of intravenous noradrenaline in conscious rabbits.
12	prejunctional actions of some beta adrenoreceptor antagonists in the vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig	L' prejunctional action of some beta-adrenoceptor antagonists in the preparation of guinea pig vas deferens.
12	influence of halothane and catecholamines on heart rate and rhythm in the horse	The influence of halothane and catecholamines on horse heart rate and horse rhythm.
12	the effects of carbon disulphide exposure on brain catecholamines in rats	Effects of apos; carbon disulfide exposure to cerebral catecholamines in rat.
12	influence of thyroid hormones on the sensitivity of cardiac and smooth muscle to biogenic amines and other drugs	Influence of thyroid hormones on the sensitivity of smooth and cardiac muscles to biogenic amines and other drugs.
12	the pharmacology of salivary myoepithelial cells in dogs	Pharmacology of salivary myoepithelial cells in dogs.
12	the release of prostaglandin e1 from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	The release of prostaglandin e1 from the diaphragmatic preparation of the phrenic nerve of the rat.
12	behavioural and somatic effects of bradykinin injected into the cerebral ventricles of unanaesthetized rabbits	Behavioral and somatic effects of bradykinin injected into the cerebral ventricles of unanesthetized rabbits.
12	the release of catecholamines by shocks and stimuli paired with shocks	The release of catecholamines from shock and shock-coupled stimuli.
12	norepinephrine metabolism in brainstem of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Norepinephrine metabolism in the brainstem of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	a cntral site for the hypothermic effects of amphetamine sulphate and p hydroxyamphetamine hydrobromide in mice	Cntral site for hypothermic effects of d&apos sulfate; amphetamine and phydroxyamphetamine hydrobromide in mice.
12	effects of hemicholinium and bretylium on the release of autonomic transmitters in the isolated sino atrial node	Effects of apos; hemicholinium and bretylium on apo release; autonomous emitters in the isolated sinus atrial node.
12	effect of acute hypoxia on vascular responsiveness in man i responsiveness to lower body negative pressure and ice on the forehead ii responses to norepinephrine and angiotensin 3 effect of hypoxia and hypocapnia	Effect of apo; acute hypoxia on vascular reactivity in apo; man reactivity to lower body negative pressure and forehead ice ii responses to norepinephrine and apo; angiotensin 3 effect of apo; hypoxia and apo; hypocapnia.
12	lesions of central norepinephrine terminals with 6 oh dopamine biochemistry and fine structure	Lesion of the central norepinephrine terminals with dopaminergic biochemistry 6 oh and fine structure.
12	vascular smooth muscle reactivity in normotensive and hypertensive rats	Vascular smooth muscle reactivity in normotensive and hypertensive rats.
12	prostaglandins e1 and e2 antagonize norepinephrine effects on cerebellar purkinje cells microelectrophoretic study	Prostaglandins e1 and e2 antagonized the effects of norepinephrine on cerebellar purkinje cell microelectrophoretics.
12	hydrocortisone mediated increase of norepinephrine uptake by brain slices	Lapos; hydrocortisone has promoted apos; increase in apos; norepinephrine absorption by brain slices.
12	urinary adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in the switch process from depression to mania	Urinary adenosine 35 monophosphate in the process of transition from depression to mania.
12	the mechanism of functional vasodilatation in rabbit epigastric adipose tissue	The functional vasodilation mechanism in rabbit epigastric adipose tissue.
12	electrical activity of the hypothalamus effects of intraventricular catecholamines	L' electrical activity of the hypothalamic effects of the intraventricular catecholamines.
12	norepinephrine reversal of anorexia in rats with lateral hypothalamic damage	Norepinephrine reverses l' anorexia in rats with lateral hypothalamic injury.
12	indole metabolism in the pineal gland a circadian rhythm in n acetyltransferase	Metabolism of the peptide; indole in the pineal gland, circadian rhythm of the nacetyltransferase.
12	a comparison of the sensitivities of innervated and denervated rat vasa deferentia to agonist drugs	Comparison of vas deferens sensitivities between innervated and denervated agonists.
12	adrenoceptors of the chick rectum	Adrenoceptors in the chicken rectum.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate and norepinephrine effects on transmembrane properties of cerebellar purkinje cells	Effects of cyclic adenosine monophosphate and norepinephrine on the transmembrane properties of cerebellar purkin cells.
12	an analysis of the coronary vascular responses to catecholamines using a modified langendorff heart preparation	Analysis of coronary vascular responses to catecholamines at apos; aid; modified langendorff heart preparation.
12	central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on the body temperature of the rat	The central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on rat body temperature.
12	effects of catecholamines infused into the brain of young chickens	The effects of infused catecholamines in the brains of young chickens.
12	time course of the effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine containing neurones in rat hypothalamus and striatum	L' temporal evolution of the effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine-containing neurons in the rat epos; hypothalamus and striatum.
12	uptake of monoamines into central neurones and the blood brain barrier in the infant rat	Monoamine uptake in central neurons and blood cell barrier (BCB)-encephalic in newborn rat.
12	effects of intraventricular 2 4 5 trihydroxyphenylethylamine 6 hydroxydopamine on rat behaviour and brain catecholamine metabolism	Effects of trihydroxyphenylethylamine-6 intraventricular hydroxydopamine on rat behaviour and cerebral catecholamine metabolism.
12	a simple method for measuring a picogram of acetylcholine using the clam mya arenaria heart	A simple method to measure a picogram of apos; acetylcholine at apos; help from mya arenaria heart of soft-shelled clams.
12	l dihydroxyphenylalanine effect on s adenosylmethionine in brain	The effect of l- @-@dihydroxyphenylalanine on the immune system; the effect of adenosylmethionine in the brain.
12	prostaglandin e1 and noradrenaline at the neuromuscular junction	Prostaglandin-e1 and noradrenaline at the neuromuscular junction.
12	effect of tyramine on human umbilical artery in vitro	Effect of tyramine on human in vitro umbilical artery.
12	cardiovascular reactivity in the experimental hypertensive rat	Cardiovascular reactivity in the experimental hypertensive rat.
12	depletion of brain noradrenaline and dopamine by 6 hydroxydopamine	Brain noradrenaline and dopamine depletion by six hydroxydopamine.
12	eeg responses in regularly menstruating women and in amenorrheic women treated with ovarian hormones	Eeg reactions in women with regular menstruation and amenorrheic women who are treated with ovarian hormones.
12	norepinephrine biosynthesis inhibition effects on memory in mice	Effects of apos; inhibition of norepinephrine biosynthesis on mouse memory.
12	behavioral activation of rats during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine	L' behavioural activation of rats during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine.
12	the effect of isoprenaline on adrenoceptors in human saphenous vein	L'apos; effect of isoprenaline on human saphenous vein adrenoceptors.
12	relaxations of the isolated portal vein of the rabbit induced by nicotine and electrical stimulation	Portal vein relaxations isolated from rabbit induced by nicotine and electrical stimulation.
12	the inactivation of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in dogs	Inactivation of noradrenaline and l' isoprenaline in the dog.
12	adrenergic activity in hypothalamus and ovulation	Adrenergic activity in the host; hypothalamus and eggs.
12	effect of heparin on serum free fatty acids plasma catecholamines and the incidence of arrhythmias following acute myocardial infarction	Effect of apo; heparin on plasma catecholamines free from apo; serum fatty acids and apo; incidence of arrhythmias following acute myocardial infarction.
12	the concentration of catecholamines in the brain of the domestic fowl gallus domesticus	The concentration of catecholamines in the brains of domestic poultry gallus domesticus.
12	relationship between renin and intrarenal hemodynamics in hemorrhagic hypotension	Renin-to-lapos ratio; intrarenal hemodynamics in the liver; hemorrhagic hypotension.
12	catecholamine secretion by the adrenal medulla of the foetal and new born foal	The secretion of catecholamines by the adrenal medulla of the fetus and the new-born.
12	responses of coronary vessels to adrenergic stimuli	Coronary vessel responses to adrenergic stimuli.
12	human norepinephrine metabolism its evaluation bydministration of tritiated norepinephrine	Metabolism of human norepinephrine and its evaluation by administration of tritiated norepinephrine.
12	norepinephrine pools in rat brain differences in turnover rates and pathways of metabolism	Norepinephrine pools in the rat brain differ in turnover rates and pathways of metabolism.
12	hemodynamic effects of phenoxybenzamine in anesthetized dogs	Hemodynamic effects of phenoxybenzamine in anaesthetized dogs.
12	beta adrenoceptor antagonist activity of 3 methoxyisoprenaline	Adrenergic β-adrenoceptor antagonism activity of 3 methoxyisoprenaline.
12	effect of inhibition of catecholamine synthesis on central catecholamine containing neurones in the developing albino rat	Effect of l' inhibition of catecholamine synthesis on catecholamine-containing central neurons in developing albino rat.
12	influence of ambient temperature on the thermoregulatory responses to 5 hydroxytryptamine noradrenaline and acetylcholine injected into the lateral cerebral ventricles of sheep goats and rabbits	Influence of ambient temperature on thermoregulatory responses to 5 hydroxytryptamine noradrenaline and acetylcholine injected into lateral cerebral ventricles of goats and rabbits.
12	the discharge of sweat in welsh mountain sheep	The sweat dump in the mountain sheep welsh.
12	responses of mean arterial pressure to pressor agents and diuretics in renal hypertensive and salt hypertensive rats	The effect of diuretic diuretic diuretic on hypertension on the rate of hypertension.
12	antinociceptive activity of morphine after injection of biogenic amines in the cerebral ventricles of the conscious rat	Antinociceptive activity of morphine after apos; injection of biogenic amines into the cerebral ventricles of conscious rat.
12	pharmacological properties of centrally administered ouabain and their modification by other drugs	The pharmacological properties of centrally administered ouabain and its modification by other drugs.
12	effect of frequency of stimulation on the inhibition by noradrenaline of the acetylcholine output from parasympathetic nerve terminals	Effect of stimulation frequency on apos; norepinephrine-induced inhibition of the production of apos; acetylcholine of parasympathetic nerve terminals.
12	evidence for inhibition of the reuptake of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline by tetrahydronaphthylamine in rat brain	Evidence of lacidosis; inhibition of uptake of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline by tetrahydronaphthylamine in rat brain.
12	effects of progesterone on cardiovascular responses to amines and to sympathetic stimulation in the pithed rat	Effects of progesterone treatment on cardiovascular responses to amines and sympathetic stimulation in the decerebrate rat.
12	some neurochemical effects of amphetamine methylamphetamine and p bromomethylamphetamine in the rat	Neurochemical effects of alpha- and beta-HCH in rats; amphetamine methylamphetamine and p bromomethylamphetamine.
12	inhibitory and excitatory effects of sympathomimetic amines on muscle strips from the stomach of the guinea pig	Inhibiting and excitatory effects of sympathomimetic amines on the muscle strips of guinea pig stomach.
12	evidence that angiotensin enhances transmitter release during sympathetic nerve stimulation	Evidence suggests that angiotensin can stimulate transmitter release during sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	effect of plus or minus dihydroxy ephedrine and plus or minus dihydroxy pseudoephedrine on adrenergic transmission in mesenteric arteries	Effect of more or less dihydroxy ephedrine and more or less dihydroxy pseudoephedrine on adrenergic transmission in the mesenteric arteries.
12	stimulating action of catecholamines on isolated preparations of the rat colon and human and rabbit taeniae coli	Stimulate apos; catecholamine action on isolated preparations from rat colon and human and rabbit taeniae coli.
12	evidence for the presence of adrenoceptors in the central thermoregulatory mechanism of rabbits	Evidence of adrenoceptors in the central thermoregulatory mechanism of rabbits.
12	effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation in the rabbit ear artery	Apos effects; mcn muscarinic agonist has 343 on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation in apos; apos artery; rabbit ear.
12	effects of isoxazolium cations on some isolated muscle preparations	Effects of isoxazolium cations on certain isolated muscle preparations.
12	effect of central catecholamine alterations on the hypothermic response to 6 hydroxydopamine in desipramine treated rats	Effect of changes in central catecholamines on the hypothermic response to 6 hydroxydopamine in desipramine-treated rats.
12	mechanism of potentiation of contractor responses to catecholamines by methylxanthines in aortic strips	Mechanisms of potentiation of catecholamine responses of contractors by methylxanthines in aortic bands.
12	thick filaments in vascular smooth muscle	Thick vascular smooth muscle filaments.
12	central neural regulation by adrenergic nerves of the daily rhythm in hepatic tyrosine transaminase activity	Central neural regulation by adrenergic nerves of daily rhythm of apos; hepatic tyrosine transaminase activity.
12	excitatory input from the distal colon to the inferior mesenteric ganglion in the guinea pig	Excitatory intrusion of distal colon to inferior mesenteric ganglion in the guinea pig.
12	operant behavior changes norepinephrine metabolism in rat brain	The operative behaviour modifies norepinephrine metabolism in the rat brain.
12	changes in the physiology and fine structure of the taenia of the guinea pig caecum following transplantation into the anterior eye chamber	Changes in the fine structure and physiology of the taenia of the guinea pig cecum following transplantation into the anterior ocular cavity.
12	brain amine concentrations after monoamine oxidase inhibitor administration	Concentrations of brain amine after apos; administration of monoamine oxidase inhibitor.
12	physiologic and pharmacologic studies of the human oviduct	Physiological and pharmacological studies of human eggs.
12	thyroid state effects on pre and postsynaptic central noradrenergic mechanisms	Effects of L' thyroid status on pre- and post-synaptic central noradrenergic mechanisms.
12	action of 6 hydroxydopamine on lamb sympathetic ganglia vas deferens and adrenal medulla a combined histochemical ultrastructural and biochemical comparison with the effects of reserpine	L' action of 6 hydroxydopamine drugs on the lipos sympathetic ganglia; lamb, vas deferens, and medullo @-adrenal were compared with the effects of reserpine on a histochemical, ultrastructural, and biochemical basis.
12	changes in systolic time intervals in acute myocardial infarction	Changes in stroke time intervals in acute myocardial infarction.
12	enhancement of methyldopa metabolism with barbiturate	Increase metabolism of methyldopa with barbiturates.
12	the inotropic and chronotropic effects of catecholamines on the dog heart	The inotropic and chronotropic effects of catecholamines on dog heart.
12	effect of p nitromethylamphetamine on biogenic amines and their amino acid precursors in rat brain	Effect of p-nitromethyl-amphetamine on biogenic amines and their precursors in rat brain.
12	a new dopamine hydroxylase inhibitor effects on the noradrenaline concentration and on the action of l dopa in the spinal cord	A new dopamine hydroxylase inhibitor has effects on noradrenaline concentration and dopa action in the spinal cord.
12	modification by choline of adrenergic transmission in rat mesenteric arteries	Choline-mediated modification of adrenergic transmission in rat mesenteric arteries.
12	monoamine oxidase in sympathetic nerves a transmitter specific enzyme type	Monoamine oxidase in sympathetic nerves is a specific transmitter enzyme.
12	aortic reactivity and electrophysiology in normotensive rats spontaneously hypertensive rats and rats made hypertensive with desoxycorticosterone plus salt	Aortic reactivity and l' electrophysiology in normotensive, spontaneously hypertensive and deoxycorticosterone plus salt hypertensive rats.
12	action of thymoxamine on mydriasis induced by levodopa and dopamine	Action of thymoxamine on levodopa- and dopamine-induced mydriasis.
12	decreased noradrenaline norepinephrine synthesis in familial dysautonomia	Reduced norepinephrine and noradrenaline synthesis in family dysautonomy.
12	reciprocal hunger regulating circuits involving alpha and beta adrenergic receptors located respectively in the ventromedial and lateral hypothalamus	Reciprocal regulatory circuits of hunger involving alpha and beta adrenergic receptors located in the etapos; hypothalamus ventromedial and lateral, respectively.
12	dopamine as a synaptic transmitter and modulator in sympathetic ganglia a different mode of synaptic action	Dopamine, as a synaptic transmitter and modulator in sympathetic ganglia, has a different mode of action.
12	inhibition of biogenic amine uptake by hydrogen peroxide a mechanism for toxic effects of 6 hydroxydopamine	L' inhibition of apos; absorption of biogenic amines by peroxide d' hydrogen is a mechanism responsible for the toxic effects of 6 hydroxydopamine.
12	norepinephrine stinulated increase of cyclic amp levels in developing mouse brain cell cultures	Norepinephrine has inhibited apo; increased levels of cyclic blisters in developing mouse brain cell cultures.
12	adrenoceptors in the human foetal small intestine	Adrenoceptors in the small fetal human intestine.
12	catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in nervous tissue of cephalopods	Catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in cephalopod nerve tissue.
12	evidence against adrenergic motor transmission in the guinea pig vas deferens	Evidence against adrenergic motor transmission in guinea pig vas deferens.
12	abnormal hormone responses of an adrenocortical cancer adenyl cyclase	The abnormal hormonal responses d' an adenyl cyclase of adenocortico cancer @-@adrenergic.
12	re investigation of the effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on renal function in situ	Re-examining the apos; effect of adenos; adrenaline and noradrenaline on the renal function in situ.
12	the effect of angiotensin noradrenaline and vasopressin on blood flow distribution in the rat kidney	Effect of norepinephrine angiotensin and vasopressin on blood flow distribution in rat kidney.
12	peristalsis in the rabbit distal colon	Peristalsis in the distal rabbit colon.
12	melatonin metabolism neural regulation of pineal serotonin acetyl coenzyme a n acetyltransferase activity	Metabolism of neural regulation of melatonin; pineal serotonergic acetyl coenzyme and l' n acetyltransferase activity.
12	acetoxycycloheximide induced transient amnesia protective effects of adrenergic stimulants	A transient amnesia of the protective effects of adrenergic stimulants was induced by acetoxycycloheximide.
12	inhibition of release of dopamine hydroxylase and norepinephrine from sympathetic nerves by colchicine vinblastine or cytochalasin b hypogastric nerve stimulation exocytosis microtubules microfilaments guinea pig	Inhibition of dopamine hydroxylase and norepinephrine release from sympathetic nerves by colchicine vinblastine or cytochalasin b, hypogastric nerve stimulation, microtubules d' exocytosis, guinea pig microfilaments.
12	nerve growth factor stimulation of regenerative growth of central noradrenergic neurons	Stimulation of nerve growth factor of regenerative growth of central noradrenergic neurons.
12	6 7 dihydroxytetrahydroisoquinoline uptake and storage by peripheral sympathetic nerve of the rat	Capture and storage of dihydroxytetrahydroisoquinoline by the rat peripheral sympathetic nerve.
12	effect of blood on the response of the rabbit ear artery to noradrenaline and angiotensin ii	Effect of blood on response of apos; apos artery; rabbit ear to noradrenaline and apos; angiotensin ii.
12	effect of free fatty acid mobilization on the electrophoretic mobility of alpha lipoproteins in the dog	Effect of the mobilization of free fatty acids on the electrophoretic mobility of alpha lipoproteins in dogs.
12	effect of tetrabenazine and alpha methyl m tyrosine on exploratory activity and brain catecholamines in rats	The effect of tetrabenazine and l'apos; alpha methyl m tyrosine on appetite; exploratory activity and the cerebral catecholamines in the rat.
12	importance of noradrenaline found in a functional pool in maintaining spontaneous locomotor activity in rats	The importance of noradrenaline found in a functional pool in the maintenance of apos; spontaneous locomotor activity in rats was demonstrated.
12	rat superfused aortic strip for the bioassay of noradrenaline and adrenaline	The rat superfused an aortic band for noradrenaline and epinephrine bioassay; adrenaline.
12	effect of catecholamines on the adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentrations of clonal satellite cells of neurons	Effect of catecholamines on concentrations of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate of neuronal clonal satellite cells.
12	enhanced release of dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves by calcium and phenoxybenzamine and its reversal by prostaglandins	Increased release of dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves by calcium and phenoxybenzamine and prostaglandin reversal.
12	lipolytic response and adenyl cyclase activity of rat adipocytes as related to cell size	The lipolytic response and l' activity of rat adipocyte adenos; adenyl cyclase are related to cell size.
12	effects of adrenergic stimulation on ventilation in man	The effects of adrenergic stimulation on ventilation in adult males.
12	comparison of the hyperglycaemic and glycogenolytic responses to catecholamines with those to stimulation of the hepatic sympathetic innervation in the dog	Comparison of glycogenolytic and hyperglycemic responses to catecholamines with those to etapos stimulation; hepatic sympathetic innervation in dogs.
12	uterine blood flow and uterine renin secretion	Uterine blood flow and uterine renin secretion.
12	angiotensin and renin in rat and dog brain	Angiotensin and renin in rat and dog brain.
12	stimulation by dopamine of adenylate cyclase in retinal homogenates and of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate formation in intact retina	Dopamine stimulation of apos; adenylate cyclase in retinal homogenates and d&apos formation; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in intact retina.
12	assessment of autonomic function in patients with a parkinsonian syndrome	Evaluation of independent function in Parkinson's patients.
12	ca concentration and flux in ca deprived arteries	Concentration and flux ca into private arteries ca.
12	adrenal catecholamine secretion during stimulation of the nasal mucous membrane in the rabbit	Adrenal catecholamine secretion during nasal mucosal stimulation in rabbits.
12	tone and reactivity of vascular smooth muscle in germfree rat mesentery	Vascular smooth muscle tone and reactivity in germless rat mesentery.
12	catecholamine synthesis and excretion in rats exposed intermittently to cold	Synthesis and excretion of catecholamines in rats exposed to intermittent cold.
12	lasting biological effects of early environmental influences 8 effects of neonatal infection perinatal malnutrition and crowding on catecholamine metabolism of brain	The long-lasting biological effects of the early stages of the environment influence 8 effects of neonatal infections, perinatal malnutrition and overcrowding on the metabolism of brain catecholamines.
12	evaluation of mechanisms controlling the release and inactivation of the adrenergic transmitter in the rabbit portal vein and vas deferens	Evaluation of mechanisms controlling release and l' inactivation of the adrenergic transmitter in rabbit portal vein and vas deferens.
12	effects of catecholamines and adrenergic blocking agents on plasma and urinary cyclic nucleotides in man	Effects of catecholamines and adrenergic blockers on urinary and plasma cyclic nucleotides in humans.
12	norepinephrine and dopamine assay by mass fragmentography in the picomole range	Determination of norepinephrine and dopamine by mass fragmentography in picomoles.
12	cardiac responses to thermal physical and emotional stress	Heat-induced heart reactions to thermal physical and emotional stress.
12	angiotensin ii like activity in circulating arterial blood in immature and adult rabbits	L' l&apos activity; angiotensin ii in circulating arterial blood is similar in immature and adult rabbits.
12	glial cell function uptake of transmitter substances	Cellular glial acceptance of the transmitter substances.
12	regulation of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentration in cultured human astrocytoma cells by catecholamines and histamine	The regulation of the concentration of d' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in human astrocytoma cells in culture by catecholamines and histamine.
12	plasma catecholamines in long term diabetics with and without neuropathy and in hypophysectomized subjects	Plasma catecholamines in long-term diabetics with and without neuropathy and hypophysectomized individuals.
12	effects of catecholamines and their interaction with other hormones on cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate of the kidney	Effects of catecholamines and their interaction with d*apos; other hormones on d*apos monophosphate; adenosine cyclic 3-5 of the kidney.
12	release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscular artery release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscular artery	Efficacy of endogenous norepinephrine release; an isolated muscle artery Efficacy of endogenous norepinephrine release; an isolated muscle artery.
12	benzodiazepines anxiety reducing activity by reduction of serotonin turnover in the brain	Anxiety-reducing benzodiazepines; activity by reducing the turnover of serotonin in the brain.
12	dopamine sensitive adenyl cyclase possible role in synaptic transmission	Dopamine-sensitive adenyl cyclase may play a role in synaptic transmission.
12	proportional release of norepinephrine and dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves	Proportional release of norepinephrine and dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves.
12	central cholinergic and adrenergic mechanisms in the release of antidiuretic hormone	Central cholinergic and adrenergic mechanisms in release of the antidiuretic hormone.
12	the pharmacology of the rat ureter in vivo	The pharmacology of rat ureter in vivo.
12	the actions of prostaglandins e 1 and f 2 on the on the perfused vessels of the isolated rabbit ear	The actions of prostaglandins e 1 and f 2 on perfused vessels of isolated rabbit ear.
12	effects of amphetamine on the turnover rate of brain catecholamines and motor activity	Effects of apo; amphetamine on cerebral catecholamine turnover rate and motor activity.
12	effect of cigarette smoking on human precapillary sphincters	The effect of cigarettes on human precapillary sphincters.
12	effect of amphetamine on the transmission of repetitive impulses through the isolated superior cervical ganglion of the rat	Effect of the apos; amphetamine on transmission of apos; repetitive impulses by isolated rat upper cervical ganglion.
12	effects of the inhibition of noradrenaline uptake and synthesis on the maintenance of the response to continuous nerve stimulation in the central artery of the rabbit ear	Effects of norepinephrine synthesis and uptake on maintenance of response to continuous nerve stimulation in the apos; central artery of the apos; rabbit ear.
12	the presence of adrenoceptors in the guinea pig seminal vesicle	The presence of adrenoceptors in the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig.
12	some evidence of the active uptake of noradrenaline in the guinea pig isolated trachea	Some evidence of active uptake of noradrenaline in isolated trachea of guinea pig.
12	noradrenaline uptake by non innervated smooth muscle	Noradrenaline uptake by noninnervated smooth muscle is significant.
12	role of noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in tetrahydronaphthylamine induced temperature changes in the rat	The role of noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in tetrahydronaphthylamine induced temperature responses in the rat.
12	effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on electrical self stimulation of the brain	Effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on epos; auto-electrical stimulation of the brain.
12	drug induced changes in the release of 3 h noradrenaline from field stimulated rat iris	The drug induced changes in 3 h of field-stimulated noradrenaline release by rat iris.
12	catecholamines and the hydroxylation of tyrosine in synaptosomes isolated from rat brain	Catecholamines and l' tyrosine hydroxylation in isolated rat brain synaptosomes.
12	a unique synaptosomal fraction which accumulates glutamic and aspartic acids in brain tissue	A unique synaptosomal fraction that accumulates both glutamic and aspartic acids in brain tissue.
12	sympathetic reinnervation of the rat iris in organ culture	Sympathetic reinnervation of rat irises in organ culture.
12	purine ribonucleotide biosynthesis interconversion and catabolism in mouse brain in vitro	Interconversion and catabolism of the purine ribonucleotide biosynthesis in mouse brain in vitro.
12	effect of prostaglandins e 1 e 2 and a 2 on vascular resistance and responses to noradrenaline nerve stimulation and angiotensin in the dog hindlimb	Effect of prostaglandins 1 and 2 on vascular resistance and responses to noradrenaline nerve stimulation and l' angiotensin in hindlimb of dog.
12	the role of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in the hyperthermic reaction induced by pethidine in rabbits pretreated with pargyline	The role of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in pethidine-induced hyperthermal reaction in rabbits pretreated with pargyline.
12	the effect of cold storage on the adrenergic mechanisms of intestinal smooth muscle	L' effect of cold storage on intestinal smooth muscle adrenergic mechanisms.
12	augmentation of drug induced blood pressure increases in rats by amorbarbital	In rats, it increases the blood pressure caused by the drug.
12	effect of synthetic bradykinin on contractile tension of human saphenous vein strips	The effect of synthetic bradykinin on contractile tension in human saphenous vein strips.
12	antagonism of noradrenaline and histamine by desipramine in the isolated artery of the rabbit ear	Lapos; antagonism of noradrenaline and epos; desipramine-induced histamine in apos; isolated apos artery; rabbit ear.
12	on the role of central nervous system catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the nialamide induced behavioural syndrome	The role of central nervous system catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in nialamide-induced behavioral syndrome.
12	an analysis of central adrenoceptors for control of cardiovascular function	An analysis of central adrenoceptors for the control of the cardiovascular function.
12	effects of perivascular nerve stimulation on the contraction and automaticity of the blood perfused canine papillary muscle	Effects of a perivascular nerve stimulation on contraction and weakness; automaticity of blood-perfused canine papillary muscle.
12	effects of several muscarinic agonists on cardiac performance and the release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart	Effects of several muscarinic agonists on cardiac performance and release of noradrenaline from infused rabbit heart sympathetic nerves.
12	pharmacology of ah 5158 a drug which blocks both and adrenoceptors	Pharmacology of ah 5158 a drug that blocks both adrenoceptors and adrenoceptors.
12	central adrenoceptors concerned in the release of adrenocorticotrophic hormone	Central receptors involved in release of the adrenocorticotropic hormone.
12	studies of isolated fetal mouse hearts in organ culture evidence for a direct effect of triiodothyronine in enhancing cardiac responsiveness to norepinephrine	Studies of fetal mouse hearts isolated from organ cultures have shown a direct effect of triiodothyronine on cardiac responsiveness to norepinephrine.
12	studies of blood flow in aorta to coronary venous bypass grafts in man	Studies of coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) blood flow in men.
12	water soluble derivatives of 1 tetrahydrocannabinol	Water-soluble derivatives of 1 tetrahydrocannabinol.
12	degeneration of sympathetic nerves in vitro and development of smooth muscle supersensitivity to noradrenaline	Degeneration of sympathetic nerves in vitro and development of the hypersensitivity of smooth muscle to noradrenaline.
12	deficits in feeding behavior after intraventricular injection of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats	Insufficient feeding behaviour following intraventricular injection of 6 hydroxydopamine in the rat.
12	rat fighting behavior serum dopamine hydroxylase and hypothalamic tyrosine hydroxylase	Serum dopamine hydroxylase and hypothalamic tyrosine hydroxylase combat behavior.
12	hypothalamic norepinephrine circadian rhythms and the control of feeding behavior	Hypothalamic circadian rhythms of norepinephrine and control of feeding behavior.
12	control of circadian change of serotonin n acetyltransferase activity in the pineal organ by the beta adrenergic receptor	Circadian change control of apos; serotonin n acetyltransferase activity in apos; pineal organ by beta-adrenergic receptor.
12	the use of dopamine hydroxylase as a marker for the central noradrenergic nervous system in rat brain	L' use of dopamine hydroxylase as a marker of the central noradrenergic system in the rat brain.
12	mechanism of effect of alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine on renal water excretion	Mechanisms of onset; effect of alpha-adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine on apos; d*apos excretion; renal water.
12	preliminary observations on the mechanical and electrical activity of the rat ureter	Preliminary observations on the root canal, mechanical and electrical activity of the rat ureter.
12	6 hydroxydopa depletion of brain norepinephrine and the function of aggressive behavior	Six hydroxydopa, depletion of the norepinephrine brain and a function of aggressive behavior.
12	rapid axoplasmic transport of tyrosine hydroxylase in relation to other cytoplasmic constituents	Rapid axoplasmic transport of tyrosine hydroxylase with respect to other cytoplasmic components.
12	tyrosine hydroxylase in human adrenal and pheochromocytoma localization kinetics and catecholamine inhibition	Tyrosine hydroxylase activity in human adrenal and pheochromocytoma localization kinetics and catecholamine inhibition.
12	inhibition of post ganglionic motor transmission in vas deferens by indirectly acting sympathomimetic drugs	L' inhibition of motor ganglionic transmission post-ganglionic in the vas deferens by indirectly acting sympathomimetic drugs.
12	constrictor and compliance responses of some arteries to nerve or drug stimulation	Constrictor reactions and compliance of certain arteries to nerve or drug stimulation.
12	eating caused by 6 hydroxydopamine induced release of noradrenaline in the diencephalon of the rat	L' ingestion of 6 hydroxydopamine resulted in the release of noradrenaline into rat diencephalon.
12	differences in sensitivity to vasoconstrictor drugs within the wall of the sheep carotid artery	Differences in sensitivity to vasoconstrictor drugs in the ewe's carotid artery.
12	some observations on the intrinsic nervous mechanism in hirschsprung s disease	Some observations on the intrinsic nervous mechanism of hirschsprung s.p.D.
12	the effect of efferent discharges in renal nerves on the activity of arterial mechanoreceptors in the kidney in rabbit	L' effect of efferent discharges in renal nerves on apos; arterial mechanoreceptor activity in rabbit kidney.
12	noradrenaline nerve terminals in human cerebral cortices first histochemical evidence	Noradrenaline nerve endings in human cerebral cortex are the first histochemical evidence.
12	possible mechanism for the antiarrhythmic effect of helium in anesthetized dogs	Possible mechanisms of the apo; antiarrhythmic effect of the apo; helium in anesthetized dogs.
12	axonal transport of dopamine hydroxylase by human sural nerves in vitro	Axonal transport of dopamine hydroxylase by human supernerves in vitro.
12	interactions between sympathomimetic amines and antidepressant agents in man	Sympomimetic amines and antidepressant interactions in men.
12	a neuronal basis for the alerting action of amphetamine	A neural base for the apos action, amphetamine alert.
12	the rat anococcygeus muscle and its response to nerve stimulation and to some drugs	Rat anococcygeus muscle and its response to nerve stimulation and certain medications.
12	studies of the interaction of 5 hydroxytryptamine and the perivascular innervation of the guinea pig caecum	The interaction of 5 hydroxytryptamines and apos; perivascular innervation of the guinea pig cecum.
12	a comparison of the pharmacological and biochemical properties of substrate selective monoamine oxidase inhibitors	Comparison of the pharmacological and biochemical properties of monoamine oxidase-selective inhibitors as substrate.
12	the nature of the adrenoceptors in the post partum rat uterus	The nature of the adrenoceptors in the rat's uterus and uterus post @-@partum.
12	effects of a false neurotransmitter p hydroxynorephedrine on the function of adrenergic neurons in hypertensive patients	Effects of apos; a false neurotransmitter p hydroxynorephedrine on adrenergic neuron function in hypertensive patients.
12	evidence for stimulation of renal gluconeogenesis by catecholamines	Evidence of stimulation of the renal gluconeogenesis by catecholamines.
12	central noradrenergic neurones and the cardiovascular actions of clonidine in the rabbit	The central noradrenergic neurons and the cardiovascular actions of rabbit clonidine.
12	effect of centrally acting drugs on the uptake of gamma aminobutyric acid gaba by slices of rat cerebral cortex	The effect of drugs with central action on the apos; absorption of l' gamma aminobutyric acid gaba by slices of cerebral cortex of rat.
12	a comparison of the effects of chemical sympathectomy by 6 hydroxydopamine in newborn and adult rats	A comparison of the effects of d' a chemical sympathectomy with 6 hydroxydopamine in newborn and adult rats.
12	the effect of immunosympathectomy and of 6 hydroxydopamine on the responses of the rat anococcygeus to nerve stimulation and to some drugs	The effects of apos; immunosympathectomy and 6 hydroxydopamine on the responses of rat anococcygeus muscle to nerve stimulation and certain drugs.
12	interaction of bretylium and guanethidine on the relaxations of the rat isolated fundal strip preparation evoked by indirect stimulation	Interaction of bretylium and guanethidine on indirect stimulation-evoked relaxations of the isolated rat flute preparation.
12	effects of histamine on hepatic volume outflow block in anaesthetized dogs	Effects of histamine on blockade of hepatic volume flow in anesthetized dogs.
12	structure activity relations for the inhibition of catecholamine uptake into synaptosomes from noradrenaline and dopaminergic neurones in rat brain homogenates	"""Structure activity relationships for the inhibition of catecholamine uptake in synaptosomes from noradrenaline and dopaminergic neurones in brain homogenates"", Neurology, Vol."
12	the separation of epinephrine from norepinephrine and dopamine from dopa on sephadex g 10	The separation of epinephrine from dopa norepinephrine and dopamine on Sephadex g 10.
12	permanent alterations in catecholamine concentrations in discrete areas of brain in the offspring of rats treated with methylamphetamine and chlorpromazine	Permanent changes in catecholamine levels in distinct brain regions in offspring of rats treated with methylamphetamine and chlorpromazine.
12	differential labelling of intraneuronal noradrenaline stores with different concentrations of 3h noradrenaline	Differential labeling of the noradrenaline intraneuronal stores with different concentrations of noradrenaline 3 h.
12	dopaminergic and noradrenergic substrates of positive reinforcement differential effects of d and l amphetamine	Dopaminergic and noradrenergic substrates of the differential effects of positive reinforcement of amphetamines d and l.
12	noradrenergic stimulation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in rat purkinje neurons an immunocytochemical study	Noradrenergic stimulation of the monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine in rat purkinje neurons, immunocytochemical study.
12	depressor responses to spinal stimulation in the pithed rat	Depressive reactions to spinal stimulation in spinal cord rat.
12	comparison of the dose response effects of morphine on brain amines analgesia and activity in mice	Comparison of the effects of the dose-response of morphine on pain; analgesia and l' activity of cerebral amines in mice.
12	assessment of the effectiveness of adrenoceptor blocking agents towards cardiac and bronchiolar responses of the pithed guinea pig to electrical stimulation of the spinal outflow	Evaluation of apo placentae; effectiveness of adrenoceptor blocking agents on bronchiolar and cardiac responses of the decerebrate guinea pig to electrical stimulation of the apo; spinal discharge.
12	feeding produced in the satiated rat by elevating the concentration of calcium in the brain	The amount of calcium in the brain increases as a result of feeding the satiated rat.
12	secretion of dopa in phaeochromocytoma	Dopa secretion in the phaeochromocytoma.
12	effect of catecholamines on the bactericidal activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Effect of catecholamines on apos; bactericidal activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
12	histochemical localization of adrenergic nerves in the guinea pig trachea	Histochemical localization of adrenergic nerves in the trachea of the guinea pig.
12	an assessment of sympathetic function in isolated tissues from mice given nerve growth factor antiserum and 6 hydroxydopamine	Evaluation of the sympathetic function in isolated tissues of mice treated with nerve growth factor antiserum and 6 hydroxydopamine.
12	effects of drugs and of electrical stimulation on the muscularis mucosae of rabbit large intestine	Effects of drugs and electrical stimulation on the rabbit's large intestinal muscle mucosa.
12	effects of oxyfedrine on isolated portal vein and other smooth muscles	Effect of oxyfedrin on the isolated portal vein and other oxidized muscles.
12	dopamine mediator of brain polysome disaggregation after l dopa	Dopaminergic mediator of the disintegration of cerebral polysomes after dopa l.
12	cardiovascular effects of amphetamine in the horse	Cardiovascular effects of the apos; amphetamine on horses.
12	the role of circulating catecholamines in sweat production in man	The role of circulating catecholamines in human sweat production.
12	functional relationship of longitudinal and circular layers of the muscularis externa of the rabbit large intestine	Functional relationships between the longitudinal and circular layers of the large rabbit intestine muscularis externa.
12	biologically active catecholamines covalentyly bound to glass beads	The biologically active catecholamines are covalently bound to the glass beads.
12	accumulation of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in clonal glial cells labeling of intracellular adenine nucleotides with radioactive adenine	The accumulation of apos; cyclic adenosine 3,5 monophosphate in clonal glia labeled the nucleotides of apos; intracellular adenine with radioactive adenosine.
12	axonal sprouts and 3 h norepinephrine uptake by superior cervical ganglia in organ culture	In organ cultures, axonal germs and 3 h norepinephrine uptake by the superior cervical ganglia were present.
12	role of brain monoamines in the fatal hyperthermia induced by pethidine or imipramine in rabbits pretreated with a monoamine oxidase inhibitor	Role of cerebral monoamines in apos; fatal pethidine- or apos-induced hyperthermia; imipramine in rabbits pretreated with a monoamine oxidase inhibitor.
12	effect of depletion of cerebral monoamines on the concentration of glycogen and on amphetamine induced glycogenolysis in the brain	Effect of cerebral monoamine depletion on glycogen concentration and glycogenolysis induced by apos; amphetamine in brain.
12	effect of long term treatment with high doses of guanethidine on sperm transport and fertility of rats	Long-term treatment with high doses of guanethidine on sperm transport and fertility in rats.
12	myogenic peristalsis in isolated preparations of chicken oesophagus	Myogenic peristalsis in isolated preparations of the chicken oesophagus.
12	a tion of drugs on denervated myoepithelial cells of salivary glands	A quantity of drugs on the denervated salivary gland myoepithelial cells.
12	impaired learning and decreased cortical norepinephrine after bilateral locus coeruleus lesions	Disorders of the apos; learning and decrease of cortical norepinephrine after bilateral lesions of locus coeruleus.
12	the effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline on pentagastrin stimulated gastric acid secretion and mucosal blood flow in the dog	The effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline on pentagastrin were found to stimulate gastric acid secretion and mucosal blood flow in dogs.
12	a comparison of the excitatory and inhibitory effects of non adrenergic non cholinergic nerve stimulation and exogenously applied atp on a variety of smooth muscle preparations from different vertebrate species	Comparison of excitatory and inhibitory effects of non-adrenergic noncholinergic nerve stimulation and anti-adrenergic nerve stimulation; an exogenous application to various smooth muscle preparations of different vertebrate species.
12	the nature of adrenergic mechanisms involved in anaphylatoxin activity in the guinea pig	Nature of adrenergic mechanisms involved in etapos; anaphylatoxin activity in guinea pig.
12	acceleration of catecholamine biosynthesis in sympathetically innervated tissues by angiotensin ii amide	Angiotensin ii amide accelerates catecholamine biosynthesis in sympathetically innervated tissue.
12	stimulation of the production of unesterified fatty acids in nerve endings of guinea pig brain in vitro by noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine	Stimulation of the production of nonesterified fatty acids in the nerve endings of the guinea pig brain in vitro by norepinephrine and 5 hydroxytryptamine.
12	vascular responses in the hands of patients suffering from migraine	Vascular responses in the hands of migraine patients.
12	facilitation of recovery by methyl p tyrosine after lateral hypothalamic damage	The facilitation of methyl p tyrosine recovery from lateral hypothalamic injury.
12	spontaneous activity in isolated bovine mesenteric lymphatics	Spontaneous activity in isolated bovine mesenteric lymphatic cells.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the storage and release of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals	An electrophysiological analysis of noradrenaline storage and release at sympathetic nerve terminals.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the uptake of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals	An electrophysiological analysis of noradrenaline uptake at sympathetic nerve terminals.
12	potentiation of the contractile effects of norepinephrine by hypoxia	The potentiation of the contractile effects of norepinephrine by norepinephrine; hypoxia.
12	glyceride lipases in nerve endings of guinea pig brain and their stimulation by noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine and adrenaline	Glyceride lipases in the nerve terminals of the guinea pig brain and their stimulation by noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine and l' adrenaline.
12	the interaction of catecholamines and adrenal corticosteroids in the induction of phosphopyruvate carboxylase in rat liver and adipose tissue	L' interaction of catecholamines and adrenal corticosteroids in rat liver; induction of phosphopyruvate carboxylase in rat liver and adipose tissue.
12	effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in combination with and receptor blocking substances on the action potential of cardiac purkinje fibres	Effects of norepinephrine and isoprenaline, combined with receptor blocking agents, on the potential of apos; action of cardiac purkinje fibers.
12	selective inhibition of angiotensin pressor responses in the pithed rat by tetraethylthiuram disulphide disulfiram and sodium diethyldithiocarbamate ddc	Selective inhibition of pressor responses to angiotensin in rats killed by tetraethylthiuram disulfide disulfiram and sodium diethyldithiocarbamate dcd.
12	effect of sympathomimetic drugs in eliciting hypertensive responses to reserpine in the rat after pretreatment with monoamineoxidase inhibitors	Effect of sympathomimetic drugs on hypertensive responses to reserpine in rat after pretreatment with monoamine inhibitors-oxidase.
12	long lasting peripheral and central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats	Long-term peripheral and central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats.
12	effects of formyl tetrahydrofolic acid and noradrenaline on the oxygen consumption of rat brain synaptosome mitochondrial preparations	Effects of apos; formyltetrahydrofolic acid and noradrenaline on apo consumption; oxygen in rat brain synaptosomal mitochondrial preparations.
12	clinical investigation of an antagonist at alpha and beta adrenoceptors ah5158a	Clinical examination of apos; an alpha and beta receptor antagonist ah5158a.
12	comparison of blockade at alpha adrenoceptors by thymoxamine and phentolamine in peripheral arteries and veins of man	Comparison of alpha-adrenoceptor blockade by thymoxamine and phentolamine in the peripheral arteries and veins of men.
12	dopaminergic terminals in the rat cortex	Dopaminergic endpoints in rat cortex.
12	dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase in caudate nucleus of rat brain and its similarity to the dopamine receptor	Dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase in the caudate nucleus of rat brain and its similarity to dopaminergic receptor.
12	induction and superinduction of serotonin n acetyltransferase by adrenergic drugs and denervation in rat pineal organ	Induction and superinduction of serotonin n acetyltransferase by adrenergic drugs and pineal organ denervation.
12	changes in human plasma catecholamines and dopamine beta hydroxylase produced by prostaglandin f2 alpha	Modifications to the human plasma catecholamines and dopamine beta hydroxylase produced by prostaglandin f2 alpha.
12	adaptation of the adrenal medulla sustained increase in choline acetyltransferase by psychosocial stimulation	Lapos; adaptation of the adrenal medulla has maintained apos; increase of choline acetyltransferase by psychosocial stimulation.
12	biochemical evidence of anxiety in dental patients	Biochemical evidence of os; anxiety in dental patients.
12	dopamine beta hydroxylase evidence for increased activity in sympathetic neurons during psychotic states	Increased dopamine beta hydroxylase activity in sympathetic neurons during psychotic states.
12	effects of clonidine withdrawal possible mechanisms and suggestions for management	Effect of withdrawal of clonidine: possible mechanisms and suggestions for management.
12	effects of catecholamines and adenosine derivatives given into the brain of fowls	The effects of adenosine and catecholamines in the brain of poultry.
12	effect of drugs on the synthesis of noradrenaline in guinea pig vas deferens	The effect of drugs on the synthesis of noradrenaline in the vas deferens of the guinea pig.
12	effects of clozapine on cerebral catecholaminergic neurone systems	Effects of clozapine on the cerebral catecholaminergic neural system.
12	a new example of a morphine sensitive neuro effector junction adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens	A new example of epos junctional adrenergic transmission; morphine-sensitive neurological effector in the mouse vas deferens.
12	cyclic amp phosphodiesterase in cloned astrocytoma cells norepinephrine induces a specific enzyme form	Apos phosphodiesterase; cyclic ampoule in cloned apos cells; cloned astrocytoma norepinephrine induces a specific norepinephrine-induced enzyme form.
12	maturation of responsiveness to cardioactive drugs differential effects of acetylcholine norepinephrine theophylline tyramine glucagon and dibutyryl cyclic amp on atrial rate in hearts of fetal mice	Maturity of Cardioactive Drug Reactivity Differential effects of lidos; acetylcholine norepinephrine theophylline tyramine glucagon and cyclic dibutyryl amp on atrial frequency in fetal mouse hearts.
12	the adrenergic control of lower esophageal sphincter function an experimental model of denervation supersensitivity	The adrenergic control of the lower esophageal sphincter functions as an experimental model of hypersensitivity to denervation.
12	dopamine synthesis stimulation by a hypothalamic factor	Stimulation of the synthesis of dopamine by a hypothalamic factor.
12	a comparison of the effects of adenosine triphosphate with noradrenaline and with the inhibitory potential of the guinea pig taenia coli	Comparison of the effects of etapos; adenosine triphosphate with those of noradrenaline and the inhibitory effect of guinea pig taenia coli.
12	the effect of tranquillizing drugs on the concentration of the sulphate ester of 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenylethane 1 2 diol in rat brain	The effect of tranquilizing drugs on the sulfate ester concentration of 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenylethane 1-2 diol in rat brain.
12	the actions of prostaglandins e2 and f2alpha on human foetal intestine	The actions of the prostaglandins e2 and f2alpha on the human fetal intestine.
12	morphine and neurotransmitter substances microiontophoretic study in the rat brain stem	Morphine and neurotransmitters, microiontophoretic study in rat brain stem.
12	transmission to the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig vas deferens the effect of pretreatment with guanethidine	Transmission to the longitudinal muscle of guanethidine-pretreated guanethidine guinea pig vas deferens.
12	hyperactivity and brain catecholamines in lead exposed developing rats	The hyperactivity and cerebral catecholamines in lead exposed developing rats.
12	the effects of dopamine on cardiogenic and endotoxin experimental shock	The effects of dopamine on experimental cardiogenic and endotoxic shock.
12	mechanism of suppression of vasopressin during alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine	Mechanism(s) of vasopressin suppression during norepinephrine alpha-adrenergic stimulation.
12	effects of pyridoxine deficiency and dl p chlorophenylalanine administration to rats on 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline concentrations in brain and 5 hydroxytryptamine concentration in blood	Effects of apos; pyridoxine deficiency and apos; administration of chlorophenylalanine to rats on 5 concentrations of apos; hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in the brain and 5 concentrations of apos; hydroxytryptamine in the blood.
12	specific leukocyte receptors for small endogenous hormones detection by cell binding to insolubilized hormone preparations	Specific leukocyte receptors for detection of small endogenous hormones by cell binding to acid-insolubilized preparations.
12	acute parathyroid hormone response to epinephrine in vivo	Acute parathyroid hormone response to apos; epinephrine in vivo.
12	norepinephrine uptake into cerebral cortical synaptosomes after one fight or electroconvulsive shock	Capture of norepinephrine in the cerebral cortical synaptosomes after struggle or electroconvulsive shock.
12	systemic arterial baroreceptors in ducks and the consequences of their denervation on some cardiovascular responses to diving	Systemic arterial baroreceptors in ducks and the consequences of duck denervation on certain cardiovascular responses to diving.
12	interaction of amphetamine with cerebral dopaminergic neurones in two strains of mice that show different temperature responses to this drug	Interaction of l' amphetamine with the cerebral dopaminergic neurons of two strains of mice that show different thermal responses to this drug.
12	the effects of drugs on the sensitivity of the rat anococcygeus muscle to agonists	The effects of these drugs on the sensitivity of rat anococcygeus muscle to agonists.
12	comparison of effects of six cholinomimetic drugs on inhibition of uptake of 3 h noradrenaline by guinea pig atria	Comparison of the effects of six cholinomimetic drugs on epos; noradrenaline uptake inhibition 3 h by guinea pig atria.
12	electrophysiology of cardiac function in teleosts cholinergically mediated inhibition and rebound excitation	Electrophysiology of cardiac function in teleosts: cholinergic inhibition and rebound excitation.
12	plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase a possible aid in the study and evaluation of hypertension	Plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase may aid in the study and assessment of high blood pressure.
12	the accumulation and metabolism of noradrenaline by cells in culture	Accumulation and metabolism of noradrenaline by cultured cells.
12	adrenergic control of tendon jerk reflexes in man	The adrenergic control of the tendon twitch reflexes in men.
12	the effect of desensitization to adenosine triphosphate on the peristaltic reflex in guinea pig ileum	Effect of desensitization at the apos; adenosine triphosphate on the peristaltic reflex in the epos; guinea pig ileum.
12	supersensitivity and subsensitivity of the beta adrenergic receptor in pineal gland regulated by catecholamine transmitter	Subsensitivity and hypersensitivity of the beta-adrenergic receptor in the pineal gland regulated by a catecholamine transmitter.
12	effects of dobutamine on left ventricular performance coronary dynamics and distribution of cardiac output in conscious dogs	Effects of dobutamine on the coronary dynamics of left ventricular performance and the distribution of cardiac output in conscious dogs.
12	the response to distension of the pulmonary vein left atrial junctions in dogs with spinal section	Response to distension of left atrial junctions of the pulmonary vein in dogs with a spinal section.
12	failure to confirm cyclic amp as second messenger for norepinephrine in rat cerebellum	Failure to confirm that the cyclic ampoule is the second messenger of norepinephrine in rat cerebellum.
12	binding of catecholamines to connective tissue and the effect upon the responses of blood vessels to noradrenaline and to nerve stimulation	The binding of catecholamines to connective tissue and l' its effect on blood vessel responses to noradrenaline and nerve stimulation.
12	acidaemia produced by spinal stimulation in the pithed rat	Spinal-stimulated acidemia in the spinal-marrow rat.
12	effects of norepinephrine and dibenamine implanted in the median eminence on the estrous cycle of the rat	Effects of norepinephrine and dibenamine implanted in the apos; median eminence on the rat estrous cycle.
12	catecholamine uptake in cerebral cortex adaptive change induced by fighting	"""Catecholamine uptake in cerebral adaptive cortex (ACAC) change,"" Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol."
12	the maturation of neuromuscular function in a multiply innervated structure development of the longitudinal smooth muscle of the foetal mammalian gut and its cholinergic excitatory adrenergic inhibitory and non adrenergic inhibitory innervation	Neuromuscular function maturation in the development of multiple innervated structure of the longitudinal smooth muscle of the fetal mammal intestine and its cholinergic and inhibitory adrenergic inhibitory innervation.
12	3h adenine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline release evoked by electrical field stimulation perivascular nerve stimulation and nicotine from the taenia of the guinea pig caecum	Release of 3 h of the nucleotide d' adenine and 3 h of noradrenaline, induced by electrical field stimulation of the perivascular nerve and nicotine from the guinea pig caecum taenia.
12	effects of biogenic amines on central thermoresponsive neurones in the rabbit	The effect of biogenic amines on central thermoresponsive neurons in the rabbit.
12	enzyme release from polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomes regulation by autonomic drugs and cyclic nucleotides	Enzyme release from polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomes by cyclic nucleotide and autonomic drugs.
12	modification of the responses of brain stem neurones to transmitter substances by anaesthetic agents	Modification of the responses of brainstem neurons to anesthetic substances.
12	nerve mediated inhibition of mechanical activity in rabbit duodenum and the effects of desensitization to adenosine and several of its derivatives	Nerve-mediated inhibition of l' mechanical activity in the rabbit duodenum and the effects of desensitization to l' adenosine and several of its derivatives.
12	thermogenic alterations in the woman i interaction of amines ovulation and basal body temperature	Thermogenic changes in the body; interaction between the amines; ovulation of the amines and the basic body temperature in the woman i.
12	a new enzymatic assay for guanosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and its application to the ductus deferens of the rat	A new enzyme assay for guanosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate and its application to rat vas deferens.
12	correlation of the directly observed responses of mesenteric vessles of the rat to nerve stimulation and noradrenaline with the distribution of adrenergic nerves	Correlation between directly observed responses of rat mesenteric to nerve stimulation and noradrenaline and adrenergic nerve distribution.
12	characterization of a unique muscle cell line	Characterization of apos cells; a unique muscle cell line.
12	resolution of three distinct populations of nerve endings from rat brain homogenates by zonal isopycnic centrifugation	Resolution of three distinct populations of zonal isopycnic centrifugation mouse brain homogenates.
12	the influence of centrally applied noradrenaline on shivering and body temperature in the pigeon	L' influence of centrally applied noradrenaline on pigeon shivering and body temperature.
12	the importance of central adrenergic neurones in renal hypertension in rabbits	The importance of central adrenergic neurons in apo; renal hypertension in rabbits.
12	neurochemical correlate of a spatial preference in rats	Neurochemical correlation of apos; spatial preference in the rats.
12	an inhibition of post ganglionic motor transmission in the mammalian vas deferens by d lysergic acid diethylamide	An inhibition of post-ganglionic motor transmission in mammalian vas deferens by dysergic acid diethylamide.
12	demonstration of dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase in malignant neuroblastoma cells and change in sensitivity of adenylate cyclase to catecholamines in differentiated cells	Demonstration of apos; dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase in malignant neuroblastoma cells and altered sensitivity of apos; catecholamine adenylate cyclase in differentiated cells.
12	biogenic amines and control of melanophore stimulating hormone release	Biogenic amine and control the release of melanophore-stimulating hormones.
12	biogenic amines in cultured neuroblastoma and astrocytoma cells	Bacterogenic amines in cultured cells of neuroblastoma and d' astrocytoma.
12	lowering of kininogen in rat blood by adrenaline and its inhibition by sympatholytic agents heparin and aspirin	Kininogen reduction in rat blood by adrenaline and its inhibition by heparin and aspirin sympatholytic agents.
12	pineal gland 24 hour rhythm in norepinephrine turnover	The 24-hour pineal rhythm in norepinephrine turnover.
12	norepinephrine sensitive adenylate cyclases in rat brain relation to behavior and tyrosine hydroxylase	Norepinephrine-sensitive adenylate cyclases in rat brain in relation to behavior and tyrosine hydroxylase.
12	lysosomal physiology in tetrahymena 3 pharmacological studies on acid hydrolase release and the ingestion and egestion of dimethylbenzanthracene particles	Lysosomal physiology in pharmacological studies of tetrahymena 3 on acid hydrolase release and apos; ingestion and efestion of dimethylbenzanthracene particles.
12	monoamine oxidase and cerebral uptake of dopaminergic drugs	The monoamine oxidase and the brain-induced uptake of dopaminergic drugs.
12	primary cultures of dissociated sympathetic neurons ii initial studies on catecholamine metabolism	Primary cultures of dissociated sympathetic neurons ii Initial studies on metabolism of catecholamines.
12	studies of the mechanism of oliguria in a model of unilateral acute renal failure	Study of the mechanism of organ failure; oliguria in a mouse model; unilateral acute renal failure.
12	fluid replacement monitoring effect of dextran overload norepinephrine drip and positive pressure ventilation on systemic arterial right atrial pulmonary wedge and left atrial pressures in dogs	Monitoring of apos; effect of norepinephrine infusion and positive pressure ventilation on right atrial corner pulmonary and left atrial pressures of the apos; systemic artery in dog.
12	the cardiovascular effects of morphine the peripheral capacitance and resistance vessels in human subjects	The cardiovascular effects of morphine, peripheral capacitance, and resistance vessels in human subjects.
12	adrenergic coagulation and fibrinolytic responses to heat	Adrenergic coagulation and fibrinolytic responses to heat.
12	cardiovascular responses to noradrenaline in the rat before and after administration of various anaesthetics	Cardiovascular responses to noradrenaline in rats before and after dosing; administration of various anesthetics.
12	oestrogen induced sensitization of the uterine artery of the guinea pig to acetylcholine	Estrogen induced sensitization of the guinea pig uterine artery to acetylcholine.
12	effects of narcotic analgesics and their antagonists on the rabbit isolated heart and its adrenergic nerves	Effects of narcotic analgesics and their antagonists on rabbit isolated heart and adrenergic nerves.
12	3h adenosine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline uptake by cold stored guinea pig taenia caecum mechanical effects and release of 3h adenosine nucleotide by noradrenaline papaverine and nitroglycerine	Nucleotide d' adenosine 3 h and noradrenaline uptake 3 h by the mechanical effects of cold-stored guinea pig taenia caecum and nucleotide release d' adenosine 3 h by noradrenaline papaverine and nitroglycerine.
12	kinetics of the release of noradrenaline from micropipettes interaction between ejecting and retaining currents	The kinetics of noradrenaline release from micropipettes interaction between ejection and retention currents.
12	some actions of sympathomimetic amines and their antagonists on mouse superfused ileum	A few actions of sympathomimetic amines and their antagonists on the mouse liver.
12	inhibition of noradrenaline release by lysergic acid diethylamide	L' inhibition of noradrenaline release by l&apos diethylamide; lysergic acid.
12	monoamine oxidase in rat arteries evidence for different forms and selective localization	In rat arteries, monoamine oxidase shows the existence of different forms and d' selective localization.
12	interaction between tyramine and iproniazid on guinea pig atria	Tyramine interaction with iproniazide; iproniazide on iproniazide; guinea pig atrium.
12	current spread in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta	The current is propagating in the smooth muscle of rabbit aorta.
12	interventions with drugs on blood deposits	Medication interventions on the blood deposits.
12	the uptake of norepinephrine by rat uterine subepithelial cells under normal and experimental conditions	The uptake of norepinephrine by the cells under-uterine epithelials in the rat under normal and experimental conditions.
12	the effect of shock on the inflammatory response a reevaluation of the role of platelets in the active arthus reaction	The effect of shock on the inflammatory response was a reassessment of the role of platelets in the response to apos; active osteoarthritis.
12	ultrastructural and histochemical study of the adrenal medulla in normal and cold stressed syrian hamsters	Ultrastructural and histochemical study of adrenal medulla in normal and cold-stressed Syrian hamsters.
12	effect of acylation with eleostearic acids on the monoamine oxidase inhibitory potency of some hydrazine antidepressants in mice	Apos effect; acylation by fatty acids on the inhibitory capacity of monoamine oxidase of certain antidepressants of l' hydrazine in mice.
12	absence of luteinizing hormone releasing hormone lh rh from catecholaminergic neurons	Absence of apo; release hormone; luteinizing hormone in catecholaminergic neurons.
12	vascular responses to anaesthetic agents	Vascular response to anesthetic agents.
12	vasopressors for treating shock	I need the vasopressors to treat the shock.
12	studies on the metabolism of catecholamines in the central nervous system of the mouse	Studies of catecholamine metabolism in the central nervous system of mice.
12	modification by drugs of the secretagogue effect of dopamine on the pancrease	Drug-induced modification of dopamine; secretagogue effect of dopamine on the pancreas.
12	measurement of renal blood flow with the anger scintillation camera after selective intra arterial injections of 133xenon and 99mtechnetium	Measurement of renal blood flow with the anger scintillation camera after 133xenon and 99mtechnetium intravenous injections.
12	angiographic technique in assessment of renal mass lesions	Assessment of renal mass lesions.
12	effect of p chlorophenylalanine on brain monoamines and behaviour during ethanol withdrawal in mice	Effect of p chlorophenylalanine on brain monoamines and behavior during l' ethanol in mouse.
12	biogenic amines and head twitches in mice during ethanol withdrawal	Biogenic amine and head convulsions in mice during mouse weaning; ethanol.
12	pharmacological observations on the hypotensive action of extracts of teleost fish urophyses urotensin i in the rat	Pharmacological observations on the apos; hypotensive action of apos; extracts of urophyses urotensin i from rat teleost fish.
12	on the mechanism of action of clonidine effects on single central neurones	On the d&apos mechanism; action of clonidine-induced effects on single central neurons.
12	variation in noradrenaline output with changes in stimulus frequency and train length role of different noradrenaline pools	Variation in noradrenaline production as a function of stimulus frequency and the role of train length in different noradrenaline production.
12	a new approach to the measurement and classification of forms of supersensitivity of autonomic effector responses	A new approach to measuring and classifying hypersensitivity forms of autonomous effector responses.
12	investigations on the mode of action of ergotamine in the isolated femoral vein of the dog	To examine the mode of action of the ergotamine in the isolated femoral vein of the dog.
12	sensitization of noradrenaline responses by inhibitors of extraneuronal uptake in a coronary artery preparation	Sensitization of noradrenaline responses by extraneuronal uptake inhibitors in a preparation of d' coronary artery.
12	the action of indoramin and other compounds on the uptake of neurotransmitters into rat cortical slices	Apos; action of apos; indoramine and dos; other compounds on apos; absorption of neurotransmitters in rat cortical slices.
12	the cardiovascular effects of l dopa in the pithed rat	Cardiovascular effects of dopa l in the spinal cord rat.
12	evidence for participation of catecholamines in cardiac action of ouabain positive chronotropic effect	Evidence of catecholamine involvement in apos; cardiac action of apos; positive chronotropic effect of apos; ouabain.
12	effects of catecholamines on thermoregulation in pigeons	The effects of catecholamines on the thermoregulation of pigeons.
12	modification of responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation by the renin angiotensin system in rats	Modification of responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation by the rat renin system-angiotensin.
12	actions of putative transmitters in the chicken vagus nerve oesophagus and remak nerve rectum preparations	Action of presumptive transmitters in the chicken vagus nerve esophagus and remakes preparations of the nervous rectum.
12	effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on 3h adenine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline release from the guinea pig taenia caecum evoked by electrical field stimulation nicotine and perivascular nerve stimulation	Effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on release of 3 h of nucleotide adenine and 3 h of noradrenaline from guinea pig taenia caecum evoked by nicotine electric field stimulation and perivascular nerve stimulation.
12	a vasodilator innervation to the central artery of the rabbit ear	Vasodilator innervation of the apos; central artery of the apos; rabbit's ear.
12	selective parasympathectomy of the heart	Selective parasympathectomy of the heart.
12	the effects of indomethacin and eicosa 5 8 11 14 tetraynoic acid on the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation	Effects of apos; indomethacin and apos; eicosa acid 58,114 tetraynoic on the response of rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation.
12	mechanism of catecholamine antagonism in rat heart produced by pilocarpine and related drugs	Mechanism(s) of apo; catecholamine antagonism in rat heart produced by pilocarpine and related drugs.
12	the effects of acutely administered analgesics on the turnover of noradrenaline and dopamine in various regions of the rat brain	The effects of acutely administered analgesics on norepinephrine and dopamine turnover in various regions of rat brain.
12	effect of sympathomimetic amines on the histamine forming capacity of human leucocytes	Effect of sympathomimetic amines on the ability of human leukocytes to form apos; histamine.
12	the effect of delta1 tetrahydrocannabinol on the release of 3h noradrenaline from the isolated vas deferens of the rat	L' effect of delta1 tetrahydrocannabinol on 3h noradrenaline release from the isolated rat vas deferens.
12	significance of plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase activity as an index of sympathetic neuronal function	Importance of glucose; plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase activity as an index of sympathetic neuronal function.
12	catecholamine levels in the injured spinal cord of monkeys	Catecholamine levels in the spinal cord of the wounded monkeys.
12	coexistence of several putative neurotransmitters in single identified neurons of aplysia	The co-existence of several putative neurotransmitters in single neurons identified from apathy.
12	in vitro interaction of prostaglandin f2alpha and oxytocin in placental vessels	In vitro interaction of prostaglandin f2alpha and of ocytocin in placental vessels.
12	serotonin sensitive adenylate cyclase in neural tissue and its similarity to the serotonin receptor a possible site of action of lysergic acid diethylamide	Serotonin-sensitive adenylate cyclase in neural tissue and its similarity to the serotonin receptor, a site of d' possible action of diethylamide of l' lysergic acid.
12	alteration of vein cyclic 3 5 nucleotide concentrations during changes in contractility	Modification of the venous cyclic nucleotide concentrations at 35C during contractility changes.
12	vascular reactivity in spontaneously hypertensive normotensive and hypotensive rats	Vascular reactivity in the spontaneously hypertensive normotensive and hypotensive rats.
12	the use of stereotactic dissection followed by fluorimetric assay to determine the distribution of noradrenaline dopamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the preoptic hypothalamic area of rabbit brain an alternative approach to histochemistry	Use of a stereotactic dissection followed by a fluorimetric test to determine the distribution of noradrenaline dopamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine in rabbit brain preoptical hypothalamic area, an alternative approach to histochemistry.
12	effects of vinblastine on noradrenergic axons	Effects of vinblastine on noradrenergic axons.
12	mechanism of the pro inflammatory activity of sympathomimetic amines in thermic oedema of the rat paw	Mechanisms of infection; pro-inflammatory activity of sympathomimetic amines in rat paw thermal edema.
12	effect of selective destruction of central and peripheral catecholamine containing neurones with 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine excretion in the rat	Effect of selective destruction of central and peripheral catecholamine containing 6 hydroxydopamine neurons on catecholamine excretion in the rat.
12	thermoregulatory responses to the injection of monoamines acetylcholine and prostaglandins into a lateral cerebral ventricle of the echidna	Thermoregulatory reactions to apos; monoamine injection, acetylcholine and prostaglandins into a lateral cerebral ventricle of the apos; echidna.
12	effect of noradrenaline on triglyceride and glycogen concentrations in liver and muscle from man	Effect of norepinephrine on triglyceride and glycogen levels in the liver and liver muscle; man.
12	plasma catecholamine response of coronary prone subjects type a to a specific challenge	The response to plasma catecholamines of subjects susceptible to type A coronary artery disease has a specific challenge.
12	2 3 diphosphoglycerate a physiological inhibitor of platelet aggregation	Diphosphoglycerate 2-3 a physiological inhibitor of the apos; platelet aggregation.
12	growth behavior and brain catecholamines in lead exposed neonatal rats a reappraisal	Reassessments were made of the growth behaviour and brain catecholamines of newly born lead-exposed rats.
12	biochemical mapping of the noradrenergic projection from the locus coeruleus a model for studies of brain neuronal pathways	Biochemical mapping of the noradrenergic projection of locus coeruleus, a genetic model for the apos; study of brain neural pathways.
12	effects of halothane on automaticity and contractile force of isolated blood perfused canine ventricular tissue	Effects of the apos; halothane on the apos; automaticity and contractile force of canine ventricular tissue perfused in isolated blood.
12	antagonism between parathyroid hormone and norepinephrine on cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate camp levels in isolated tubules from rat kidney cortex	L' antagonism between apos; parathyroid hormone and norepinephrine on cyclic levels of d' adenosine 3-5 monophosphate camp in isolated rat renal cortical tubules.
12	time and rate dependence of the inotropic action of noradrenaline in the isolated guinea pig s atrium	L' inotropic action of noradrenaline in the apos; isolated atria of guinea pig depends on the time and rate of reaction.
12	cyclic amp and cyclic gmp may mediate opposite neuronal responses in the rat cerebral cortex	A cyclic ampoule and cyclic gmp could mediate opposite neuronal responses in the rat cerebral cortex.
12	neurotransmitter control of thyrotropin secretion in the rat	The neurotransmitter will control thyrotropin secretion in the rat.
12	direct myocardial depressant effects of gentamicin	Direct myocardial depressant effects of gentamicin.
12	prostaglandins antipyretic analgesics and adrenergic stimuli on the isolated artery	Antipyretic analgesic prostaglandins and adrenergic stimuli on the apos; isolated artery.
12	norepinephrine induced depolarization of skeletal muscle cells	Norepinephrine also induced depolarization of skeletal muscle cells.
12	influence of the adrenal gland on the pressor effect and antagonistic potency of angiotensin ii analogs	The effects of the adrenal gland on the pressor and antagonistic potency of the analogs of l' angiotensin ii.
12	effects of hexamethonium and other ganglionic blocking agents on electrical activity of the esophagus induced by vagal stimulation in the dog	Episode-induced vagal stimulation in dogs; effects of hexamethonium and dapos; other ganglionic blockers on the immune system; electrical activity of the esophagus; and vagal stimulation in dogs.
12	influence of estrogen and progesterone treatment on ovarian contractility in the monkey	The influence of estrogen and progesterone treatment on ovarian contractility in monkeys.
12	physiologic and pharmacologic studies on the motility of isolated guinea pig ovaries	Physiological and pharmacological studies on the motility of ovaries isolated from guinea pigs.
12	the influence of prolonged painful stimulation on adrenaline and noradrenaline concentration in different regions of the brain and in the adrenals of white rats before and after removal of the superior cervical sympathetic ganglia	Prolonged painful stimulation of the concentration of adrenaline and noradrenaline in different regions of the brain and in the adrenal glands of white rats before and after the apo; removal of the upper sympathetic nodes of the cervix; uterus.
12	melatonin effects on brain interaction with microtubule protein inhibition of fast axoplasmic flow and induction of crystaloid and tubular formations in the hypothalamus	Melatonin effects on apos; brain interaction with microtubule proteins, inhibition of rapid axoplasmic flux and induction of crystalloid and tubular formation in the apos; hypothalamus.
12	3h norepinephrine binding by rat glial cells in culture lack of correlation between binding and adenylate cyclase activation	The 3-h binding to norepinephrine by rat glial cells in culture was not correlated with the apos; activation of the apos; adenylate cyclase.
12	the pharmacological and anatomical substrates of the amphetamine response in the rat	Pharmacological and anatomical substrates of amphetamine response in rat.
12	5 ht and norepinephrine induced release of ach from the thalamus and mesencephalon of the monkey during thermoregulation	Five ht and norepinephrine induced release of apos; ach from monkey thalamus and midbrain during thermoregulation.
12	the effects of psychomotor stimulants on stereotypy and locomotor activity in socially deprived and control rats	Effects of psychomotor stimulants on stereotypy and locomotor activity in social deprivation and control rats.
12	serotonin sensitive adenylate cyclase activity of immature rat brain	Serotonin-sensitive adenylate cyclase activity in immature rat brain.
12	accumulation of cyclic amp in hypothyroidism decreased sensitivity to norepinephrine in rat adipocytes	Lapses; accumulation of cyclic blisters in the liver; hypothyroidism decreases norepinephrine sensitivity in rat adipocytes.
12	vascular reactivity to norepinephrine and hemodynamic parameters in borderline hypertension	The effect of norepinephrine and norepinephrine on the vascular response to norpinephrine and hemodynamics.
12	rabbit testicular contractions bimodal interaction of prostaglandin e1 with other agonists	Testicular Rabbit Contractions Bimodal interaction of prostaglandin e1 with d' other agonists.
12	improvement of parkinsonism in depressed patients treated with ect	Improved Parkinson's disease (PD) in ect-treated depressed patients.
12	fluorimetric assay of dopamine norepinephrine and their 3 o methyl metabolites by using fluorescamine	A fluorometric assay of dopamine norepinephrine and its metabolites 3 o methyl using fluorescamine.
12	norepinephrine depletion in idiopathic orthostatic hypotension	Norepinephrine depletion in idiopathic orthostatic hypotension.
12	localization and characterization of carbohydrates in adrenal medullary cells	Carbohydrate localization and characterization in adrenal adrenal cells.
12	catecholamines in experimental brain ischemia	Chemotherapy regimens in experimental brain ischemia.
12	effect of a general aviation trainer on the stress of flight training	Effects of apo; general apo training; aircraft stress training; flight training.
12	catecholamine and phagocytic responses in infected mice exposed to hyperbaric helium oxygen atmospheres	Catecholamine and phagocytic responses in mice exposed to hyperbaric helium oxygen atmospheres.
12	effects of morphine on coronary and left ventricular dynamics in conscious dogs	Effects of morphine on left coronary and ventricular dynamics in conscious dogs.
12	the effect of dietary lipids on lipolysis in rat adipose tissue	L' effect of dietary lipids on lipolysis in rat fat tissue.
12	catecholamine content of serum and adrenals in protracted anaphylactic shock of guinea pigs	Level of catecholamines in serum and adrenals during apos; prolonged anaphylactic shock in guinea pig.
12	mechanisms of contractile response of cerebral artery to externally applied fresh blood	Mechanisms of the contractile response of the apos; cerebral artery to the apos; fresh external blood application.
12	effects of putative neurotransmitters on neuronal activity in monkey auditory cortex	Effects of putative neurotransmitters on the apos; neural activity in monkey auditory cortex.
12	6 hydroxydopa during development of central adrenergic neurons produces different long term changes in rat brain noradrenaline	L' hydroxydopa-6 during the development of the central adrenergic neurons produces different long-term changes in rat brain noradrenaline.
12	evidence for a central alpha sympathomimetic action of clonidine in the rat	Evidence of a central alpha sympathomimetic action of clonidine in rats.
12	morphine analgesia and the bulbospinal noradrenergic system increase in the concentration of normetanephrine in the spinal cord of the rat caused by analgesics	In rats, the concentration of normetanephrine in the spinal cord caused by painkillers is increased by morphine analgesia and the noradrenergic system.
12	the effect of nerve stimulation on the axonal transport of noradrenaline and dopamine beta hydroxylase	Lapos; effect of nerve stimulation on axonal transport of noradrenaline and dopamine beta hydroxylase.
12	the effect of ethacrynic acid on the guinea pig and rat isolated vas deferens	L' effect of apos; ethacrynic acid on guinea pig and rat isolated the vas deferens.
12	the effect of pithing and of nerve stimulation on the depletion of noradrenaline by reserpine in the rat anococcygeus muscle and vas deferens	L' effect of brain death and nerve stimulation on noradrenaline depletion by reserpine in rat anococcygeus muscle and vas deferens.
12	supersensitivity to isoprenaline induced in rats by prolonged isolation	Hypersensitivity to isoprenaline and isoprenaline induced in rats by prolonged isolation.
12	analysis of the effect of 5 hydroxykynurenamine a serotonin metabolite on isolated cerebral arteries aortas and atria	An analysis of the effects of 5 hydroxykynurenamine, a metabolite of serotonin, on aortae and atria of isolated cerebral arteries.
12	sex and estrogens and responsiveness of terminal arterioles to neurohypophyseal hormones and catecholamines	Sex, estrogen, and responsiveness of the terminal arterioles to neurohypophysial hormones and catecholamines.
12	effect of castration on the smooth muscle cells of the internal sex organs of the rat influence of the smooth muscle on the sympathetic neurons innervating the vas deferens seminal vesicle and coagulating gland	L' effect of castration on smooth muscle cells of the rat internal sex organs influences smooth muscle on sympathetic neurons innervating the vas deferens seminal vesicle and clotting gland.
12	antihypertensive drugs and catecholamine metabolism effects of reserpine and hydralazine on tyrosine hydroxylase activity and norepinephrine concentrations in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effects of reserpine and apos; hydralazine on tyrosine hydroxylase activity and norepinephrine concentrations in spontaneously hypertensive rats, catecholamine metabolism and antihypertensive.
12	characterization by cyproheptadine of the dopamine induced contraction in canine isolated arteries	Cyproheptadine characterization of dopamine-induced contraction in isolated canine arteries.
12	mechanical response in the wall of ovarian follicles mediated by adrenergic receptors	Adrenergic receptor-mediated mechanical response in ovarian follicle wall.
12	biochemical and histofluorescence studies of catecholamines in superior cervical ganglia in organ culture	Biochemical and histofluorescent studies of catecholamines in the superior cervical ganglia in culture of organs.
12	stimulation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate formation in rat cerebral cortical slices by methoxamine interaction with an alpha adrenergic receptor	Stimulation of adenosine 35 monophosphate formation in slices of rat cerebral cortex by interaction of methoxamine with an alpha-adrenergic receptor.
12	effects of noradrenaline infused into the chick hypothalamus on thermoregulation below thermoneutrality	Effects of noradrenaline infused into the chick's body; chick hypothalamus on thermoregulation below thermoneutrality.
12	increased plasma catecholamine concentrations and vas deferens norepinephrine biosynthesis in men with elevated blood pressure	Increases in vas deferens plasma catecholamine concentrations and norepinephrine biosynthesis in men with elevated blood pressure.
12	effect of alterations of arterial blood pressure and heart rate on segmental dyskinesis during acute myocardial ischemia and following coronary reperfusion	Effect of apo placentae; alterations in blood pressure and heart rate on segmental dyskinesia during apo placentae; acute myocardial ischemia and coronary reperfusion.
12	dobutamine development of a new catecholamine to selectively increase cardiac contractility	Dobutamine develops a new catecholamine to selectively increase the rate of cardiac contractility.
12	octopamine presence in single neurons of aplysia suggests neurotransmitter function	The presence of octopamine in the unique neurons of apos; aplysia suggests a neurotransmitter function.
12	effects of cocaine on a hypogastric nerve vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig	Effects of Cocaine on a vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig hypogastric nerve.
12	evidence for a significant contribution from central effects of angiotensin in the development of acute renal hypertension in the greyhound	Acute renal hypertension in greyhound; a significant contribution of the central effects of angiotensin in the development of the apos; acute renal hypertension in greyhound.
12	iron deficiency anemia and increased urinary norepinephrine excretion	Iron-deficiency anemia and increased blood pressure; urinary norepinephrine excretion.
12	free catecholamine excretion in the urine in normal infants and in those with marasmus or kwashiorkor	Free excretion of catecholamines into the body; urine in normal infants and those with marasmus or kwashiorkor.
12	a case of secondary aldosteronism induced by pheochromocytoma	A case of pheochromocytoma secondary aldosteronism.
12	in vitro studies on the human renal calices	In vitro studies of human renal calyces.
12	reduced level of uterine norepinephrine transmitter during hcg induced pseudopregnancy in the rabbit	A reduction in the level of norepinephrine uterine transmitter during the hcg resulted in a rabbit pseudo-pregnancy.
12	the electrical basis of excitation and inhibition in the rat anoccygeus muscle	The electrical basis of the excitation and apos; inhibition in the anoccygian muscle of the rat.
12	membrane properties of the smooth muscle cells of the rat anococcygeus muscle	Membrane properties of smooth muscle cells of rat anococcygeus muscle.
12	motility of the oviduct and uterus of the cow during the oestrous cycle	The motility of the oviduct and the uterus of the cow during the estrous cycle.
12	regeneration of the noradrenergic innervation of the cardiovascular system of the chick following treatment with 6 hydroxydopamine	Regeneration of the apos; noradrenergic innervation of the chick cardiovascular system after 6-hydroxydopamine treatment.
12	intravenous tyramine pressor response in depression	"""Intraveous tyramine pressor response in depression,"" Int J Med."
12	active and passive immunization to angiotensin in experimental acute renal failure	Passive and active immunization with apos; angiotensin in apos; experimental acute renal failure.
12	growth hormone and catecholamine response to exercise in relation to physical training	The response of the growth hormone and catecholamines to aposemia; exercise in relation to apos; physical training.
12	biphasic effect of the alpha adrenolytic phentolamine on hormone stimulated formation of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in isolated fat cells of rats	L' biphasic effect of adrenolytic phentolamine alpha on apos formation; adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate stimulated by apos; hormone in isolated rat fat cells.
12	factors influencing the effect of hormones on the accumulation of cyclic amp in cultured human astrocytoma cells	Factors influencing the immune response; effect of hormones on immune system; accumulation of cyclic blisters in cultured cells; human astrocytoma.
12	effects of norepinephrine on cyclic nucleotide levels in the ductus deferens of the rat	Effects of norepinephrine on cyclic nucleotide levels in vas deferens.
12	modulation of human neutrophil chemotactic responses by cyclic 3 5 guanosine monophosphate and cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	Modulation of the chemotaxic responses of human neutrophils by cyclic guanosine monophosphate (CMS) 3-5 and d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine (CAS) 3.
12	sympathetic control of hepatic glycogenolysis during glucopenia in man	Sympathetic control of hepatic glycogenolysis during glucopenia in males.
12	effects of depletion of brain catecholamines during the development of morphine dependence on precipitated withdrawal in rats	The effects of depletion of cerebral catecholamines during the development of morphine dependence on fast withdrawal were observed in rats.
12	cardiac action potential and inotropic effect of noradrenaline and calcium	Potential for seizures; cardiac action and inotropic effect of noradrenaline and calcium.
12	in vivo rates of tyrosine and tryptophan hydroxylation in regions of rat brain at four times during the light dark cycle	In vivo rate of tyrosine and tryptophan hydroxylation in rat brain regions four times during cycle d' slight darkness.
12	influence of glyceryl trinitrate on force of contraction and action potential of guinea pig myocardium	Influence of glyceryl trinitrate on the force of contraction and the potential d'apos; action of guinea pig myocardium.
12	the biphasic effect of small doses of tranylcypromine on the spontaneous motor activity and learned conditioned behaviour in rats	L' biphasic effect of small doses of tranylcypromine on apos; spontaneous motor activity and conditioned behaviour acquired in rats.
12	the effects of microiontophoretically applied morphine and transmitter substances in rats during chronic treatment and after withdrawl from morphine	The effects of microiontoporetically applied morphine and its transfer in rats during chronic treatment and after withdrawal of morphine.
12	effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on the release by sympathetic nerve stimulation of 3h noradrenaline from rabbit isolated ear arteries and guinea pig atria	Effects of Norepinephrine; muscarinic agonist mcn at 343 on release of 3h noradrenaline from isolated rabbit ears and guinea pig atria by sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	role of endogenous catecholamines in the anti inflammatory activity of alpha adrenoceptor blocking agents	Role of endogenous catecholamines in apos; anti-inflammatory activity of alpha-adrenoceptor inhibitors.
12	cyclic amp mediated induction of the cyclic amp phosphodiesterase of c 6 glioma cells	A cyclic ampoule induced apos; induction of phosphodiesterase from apos; cyclic ampoule from c-glioma cells.
12	stimulation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate formation in incubated rat hypothalamus by estrogenic compounds relationship to biologic potency and blockade by anti estrogens	Stimulation of d&apos formation; adenosine 35 monophosphate in the rat hypothalamus incubated by estrogenic compounds in relation to biological potency and anti-estrogen blockade.
12	use of plasma catecholamine values in diagnosing pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma	Use of plasma catecholamine values for diagnosis of pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma.
12	car factor deficiency revisited	Car factor defect revisited.
12	the involvement of corticosteroids in the supersensitivity produced in the rat anococcygeus muscle by morphine withdrawal thyroidectomy or a single dose of reserpine	L' corticosteroid involvement in muscle; hypersensitivity produced in rat anococcygeus by a morphine withdrawal thyroidectomy or a single dose of reserpine.
12	antagonism of the uterotonic action of oxytocin in vitro	L' antagonism of apos; uterotonic action of ocytocin in vitro.
12	brain monoamine levels in the cow during oestrus and metoestrus	Rate of cerebral monoamine in the cow during the interval; estrus and metroestrus.
12	comparative responses of the isolated human testicular capsule to autonomic drugs	Comparison of the responses of the isolated human testicular capsule to self-contained medications.
12	the functional state of the sympathetic adrenal and pituitary adrenocortical systems during chronic neuro emotional stress	Functional status of the sympathetic and pituitary adrenal systems during apo; chronic neuroemotional stress.
12	effect of serotonin depletion on the central regulation of the carotid sinus reflex in rats	The effect of serotonin depletion on the central regulation of the reflex of the carotid sinus in the rat.
12	preservation of estrogen induced increase of uterine blood volume following catechlamine and mast cell histamine depletion	Preservation of estrogen induced an increase in uterine blood volume after histamine depletion of catechlamin and mast cells.
12	effects of nicotine on plasma corticosterone and brain amines in stressed and unstressed rats	Effects of nicotine on plasma corticosterone and cerebral amines in stressed and nonstressed rats.
12	behavioral and electrocortical activity in rats after neonatal intraventricular 6 hydroxydropamine administration	L' behavioral and electrocortical activity in the rat after dosing; administration of apos; hydroxydropamine 6 intraventricular neonatal.
12	discriminated escape learning and response to electric shock after 6 hydroxydopamine lesions of the nigro neostriatal dopaminergic projection	After 6 lesions by hydroxydopamine of neostriatal neo-negro dopaminergic projection, we were able to distinguish the apos; learning of apos; escape and response to electric shock.
12	blood pressure response to both carotid occlucion and asphyxia as influenced by intracerebroventricular injection of norepinephrine or epinephrine	The response of blood pressure to carotid occlusion and asosphyxia is influenced by apos; intracerebroventricular injection of norepinephrine or d*apos; epinephrine.
12	the ability of collecting veins to sustain sympathetic constriction	The ability of collecting veins to maintain a sympathetic constriction.
12	the cardiovascular effects of ergometrine in the experimental animal in vivo and in vitro	Cardiovascular effects of etapos; ergometrine in animals in vivo and in vitro experimental animals.
12	increased hypothalamic norepinephrine in genetically hypertensive rats following administration of diphenylhydantoin 38407	Augmentation of hypothalamic norepinephrine in genetically hypertensive rats after dosage of diphenylhydantoin 38407.
12	contractility of renal cortex following complete ureteral obstruction	Renal cortical contractility after a complete ureteral obstruction.
12	enhancement of neural and thermal vasoconstriction by prostaglandin b1	Increase of thermal and neural vasoconstriction by prostaglandin b1.
12	uric acid kinetic studies in the immediate post myocardial infarction period	Studies of l*apos kinetics; uric acid during the period immediately following myocardial infarction.
12	concentration of serotonin in intestine and factors affecting its release	Serotonin concentration in the intestine and factors affecting its release.
12	differentiation of nephrotensin from the renin angiotensin system	Renin differentiation in the renin system @-@angiotensin.
12	use of an angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin in the recognition of angiotensinogenic hypertension	Use of apos; an angiotensin antagonist; saralasin ii, to recognize apos; angiotensinogenic hypertension.
12	alterations in brain monoaminergic functioning associated with septal lesion induced hyperreactivity	Hyperresponsiveness was induced by alterations in cerebral monoaminergic function associated with septal lesion.
12	comparison of 2 5 dimethoxy 4 methylamphetamine dom and d amphetamine for in vivo efflux of catecholamines from rat brain	Comparison of 25 dimethoxy-4 methylamphetamine dom and amphetamine for apos; in vivo efflux of rat brain catecholamines.
12	anorexigenic effects of d amphetamine and l dopa in the rat	Anorexensive effects of Dapos; amphetamine and dopa l in rats.
12	the hepatic uptake of individual free fatty acids in sheep during noradrenaline infusion	Hepatic uptake of individual free fatty acids in sheep during infusion of noradrenaline.
12	studies on the synthesis and subcellular distribution of dopamine in the rat adrenal medulla	Studies of the synthesis and subcellular distribution of dopamine in rat adrenal medulla.
12	appearance of hormone sensitive adenylate cyclase in the developing human heart	Appearance of hormone-sensitive adenylate cyclase in the developing human heart.
12	effect of circulating norepinephrine on the renin release from the denervated kidney	Effect of circulating norepinephrine on the release of renin from the denervated kidney.
12	strain differences during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine possible role of receptor sensitivity	Differences among strains during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine may be involved in receptor sensitivity.
12	adrenergic mechanisms in the cephalic and cerebral circulations of the subhuman primate	Adrenergic mechanisms in cerebral and cerebral circulation of primate at @-@human.
12	plasma fatty acids and the control of lipolysis by cathecholamines	Plasma fatty acids and their control of lipolysis by cathecholamines.
12	the effect of visual sexual stimulation on urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline in impotent patients	Dapos; effect of sexual visual stimulation on the immune system; urinary excretion of apos; adrenaline and noradrenaline in impotent patients.
12	adrenergic mechanisms in the hindlimb circulation of baboons	Adrenergic mechanisms in hind limb circulation of baboons.
12	pharmacological analysis of dopamine action on the isolated dog atrium	Pharmacological analysis of the apos; action of dopamine on the apos; isolated dog atrium.
12	eccrine sweat gland sensitivity to catecholamines in patients with pheochromocytoma and primary aldosteronism	Eccrine sweatshirt sensitivity to catecholamines in patients with both pheochromocytoma and d' primary aldosterone.
12	a kinetic evaluation of monoamine oxidase activity in rat liver mitochondrial outer membranes	A kinetic evaluation of monoamine oxidase activity in outer mitochondrial membranes of rat liver.
12	a pharmacological study of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in the stretch reflex of the decerebrate rat	A pharmacological study of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in the reflex d' stretching of the decerebrated rat.
12	studies of rectal mucosal catecholamines in ulcerative colitis	Studies of mucosal catecholamines in ulcerative colitis.
12	acute and chronic morphine treatment and the hydroxylation of 1 14c l tyrosine in the mouse brain	Acute and chronic morphine treatment and 114-cL tyrosine hydroxylation in mouse brain.
12	the effects of gonadectomy on monoamine metabolism in three regions of mouse brain	Effects of gonadectomy on monoamine metabolism in three regions of mouse brain.
12	effects of drugs and sympathetic nerve stimuation on retrograde coronary blood flow in dogs with experimental coronary occlusion	Drug effects and sympathetic nerve stimulation on retrograde coronary blood flow in dogs with experimental coronary occlusion.
12	inhibition of lipolysis and cyclic amp accumulation in white fat cells by tetracycline	Lipolysis inhibition and apos; accumulation of cyclic blisters in white fat cells by tetracycline.
12	the effects of 5 hydroxy 5 4 chlorophenyl 2 3 dihydro 5h imidazo 2 1 a isoindole mazindol sah 42 548 on the metabolism of brain norepinephrine	Effects of 5 hydroxy 5 4 chlorophenyl 2 3 dihydro 5 h imidazo 2 h 1 a isoindole mazindol sah 42,548 on cerebral norepinephrine metabolism.
12	unusual mechanism of hypotensive activity exerted by erytrho 1 1 2 1 4 benzodioxan 2 yl 2 oh et a1 4 piperidyl 2 benzimidazolinone r 28935	Unusual mechanism of onset; hypotensive activity exerted by benzimidazolinone r 28935; erytrho ll ll ll ll ll 2 yl 2 yl 4 piperidyl 2 benzimidazolinone r 28935.
12	noradrenaline secreting glomus jugulare tumor with cyclic change of blood pressure	Noradrenaline secreting glomus jugulare tumor with cyclic changes in blood pressure.
12	effects of gastrointestinal hormones on vascular smooth muscle	Effects of gastro hormones-intestinal on vascular smooth muscle.
12	fetal stress from methadone withdrawal	Fetal stress from methadone withdrawal?
12	dopamine sensitive adenylyl cyclase in human caudate nucleus a study in control subjects and schizophrenic patients	Dopamine-sensitive adenylyl cyclase in the human caudate nucleus, studied in control subjects and in patients with schizophrenia.
12	cerebrospinal fluid amine metabolites in acute schizophrenia	Amino metabolites of cerebrospinal fluid-rachidian in acute schizophrenia.
12	dynamic analysis of gravimetric response of isolated dog hindlimb	A dynamic analysis of the gravimetric response of a single hindlimb of a dog.
12	calcium and angiotensin tachyphylaxis in rat uterine smooth muscle	Calcium and apos tachchyphylaxis; angiotensin in rat uterine smooth muscle.
12	salicylate tryptophan and tyrosine hypothermia	Tryptophan salicylate and tyrosine hypothermia.
12	distribution of biogenic amines in the hippocampal formation in the rabbit	Distribution of biogenic amines in appos formation; hippocampus in rabbit.
12	mechanism of cholecystokinin inhibition of lower esophageal sphincter pressure	Mechanisms of cholecystokinin inhibition of the lower pressure of the esophageal sphincter.
12	plasma hormone and renal function changes in unrestrained dogs exposed to cold	L' plasma hormone and changes in renal function in cold-exposed free dogs.
12	effects of alveolar and perfusion hypoxia and hypercapnia on pulmonary vascular resistance in the lamb	Apo effects; hypoxia and apo; alveolar hypercapnia and perfusion on pulmonary vascular resistance in lamb.
12	cardiovascular responsiveness to beta adrenergic stimulation and blockade in chronic hypoxia	Cardiovascular reactivity to adrenergic stimulation beta and blockade in the apos; chronic hypoxia.
12	hypothalamic heating and cooling in monoamine depleted rabbits	Hypothalamic heating and cooling in monoamine-depleted rabbits.
12	postnatal development of adenylate cyclase in rat salivary glands patterns of hormonal sensitivity	The postnatal development of the etapos; adenylate cyclase in rat salivary glands shows hormonal sensitivity.
12	effect of methylprednisolone upon arterial pressure and the renin angiotensin system in the rat	Effect of methylprednisolone on blood pressure and renin system-angiotensin in the rat.
12	bioassay of oxytocin on the superfused mammary gland of the mouse using an automatic apparatus	It's a biological test; oxytocin on the mammary gland superfused from the mouse to the apos; an automatic device.
12	influence of halothane on the effects of endogenous and exogenous noradrenaline on the isolated rabbit heart perfused at constant pressure	L' influence of l' halothane on the effects of endogenous and exogenous noradrenaline on isolated constant pressure perfused rabbit heart.
12	prevention of decompression sickness during a simulated space docking mission	Preventing the decompression sickness during an emergency mission; simulated mooring in space.
12	analysis of the dynamic action of vasoactive substances on the blood pressure of rabbits author s transl	Analysis of symptoms; dynamic action of vasoactive substances on blood pressure of donor rabbits.
12	selective denervation of the autonomic nerve supply of the nasal mucosa	Selective apo denervation; autonomic nervous supply of the nasal mucosa.
12	rate limiting factors in sympathetic neurotransmitter secretion	Speed limiting factors in secretion of sympathetic neurotransmitters.
12	control of the neurotoxicity of 6 hydroxydopamine by intraneuronal noradrenaline in rat iris	Control of the neurotoxicity of 6 hydroxydopamine by noradrenaline intraneuronal in rat iris.
12	psychophysiological and neurophysiological aspects of schizophrenia	Psychophysiological and neurophysiological aspects of the schizophrenia.
12	biochemical research into psychosis	Biochemical research on psychosis.
12	effectiveness of prodigiozan in the therapy of chronic nonspecific diseases of the lungs	Effectiveness of prodigiozan in the treatment of chronic, non-specific lung diseases.
12	the stimulation by transmitter substances and putative transmitter substances of the net activity of phospholipase a2 of synaptic membranes of cortex of guinea pig brain	Stimulation by transmitters and putative transmitters of l' net phospholipase a2 activity of the synaptic membranes of the guinea pig brain cortex.
12	photically induced epilepsy in papio papio as a model for drug studies	Photically induced epilepsy in papio papio as a model for the drug studies.
12	effect of reserpine on the potency of alpha receptor blockers	The effect of reserpine on the power of the alpha-receptor blockers.
12	drug interactions with dopamin stimulated adenylate cyclasses of caudate nucleus and retina direct agonist effect of a piribedil metabolite	Drug interactions with dopamine stimulated the d&apos cycling; adenylate from the caudate nucleus and l' a direct agonist effect of the retina d' a metabolite of piribedil.
12	an abdominal left ventricular assist device preclinical studies	Preclinical studies on a d*apos device; left ventricular abdominal support.
12	failure of methylhistidines to inhibit platelet aggregation at concentrations found in uremic plasma	Methylhistidines do not inhibit plaque aggregation at concentrations found in the uremic plasma.
12	dopamine in essential arterial hypertension excretion of its metabolite homovanillic acid	Dopamine in apos; essential arterial hypertension excretion of its metabolite lapos; homovanillic acid.
12	studies on the carbohydrate moiety of dopamine beta hydroxylase interaction of the enzyme with concanavalin a	Studies of the carbohydrate moiety of the ester; interaction of dopamine beta hydroxylase of the ester; enzyme with concanavalin a.
12	simulation of catecholamine action in an improved electrical model	L&apos simulation; catecholamine action in improved electrical model.
12	enhancement of hypothalamic pressor responses in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Stimulation of hypothalamic pressor responses in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	catecholamine release mechanism of mercury induced vascular smooth muscle contraction	The mechanism of release of the mercury catecholamines induced vascular smooth muscle contraction.
12	amphetamine and apomorphine responses in the rat following 6 ohda lesions of the nucleus accumbens septi and corpus striatum	Reactions to amphetamines and l' apomorphine in rat following 6 ohda lesions of nucleus accumbens septi and corpus striatum.
12	differentiation of calcium activation mechanisms in vascular smooth muscle by selective suppression with verapamil and d 600 1	Differentiation of vascular smooth muscle calcium activation by selective suppression with verapamil and d 600.1.
12	pharmacological receptors of the cerebral arteries of the goat	Pharmacological receptors for cerebral arteries in goats.
12	ajamline induced changes in mechanical and electrical activity of vascular smooth muscle	Lapses; ajamline induced changes in vascular smooth muscle mechanical and electrical activity.
12	plasma catecholamines in severely injured patients a prospective study on 45 patients with multiple injuries	A prospective study of 45 multiple-injury patients in the study of plasma catecholamines in severely injured patients.
12	noradrenaline and motor transmission in the vas deferens of the mouse	It's called motor transmission and noradrenaline in the mouse vas deferens.
12	effect of morphine on adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens assessment of agonist and antogonist potencies of narcotic analgesics	Effect of morphine on adrenergic transmission in mouse vas deferens evaluation of agonist and antogonist potencies of narcotic analgesics.
12	the effect of some bacterial products on temperature and sleep in rat	The effects of certain bacterial products on the temperature and sleep in the rat.
12	on the phospholipase activity in bovine seminal vesicles and its possible role in the regulation of the prostaglandin biosynthesis	On the apos; phospholipase activity in bovine seminal vesicles and its possible role in regulation of prostaglandin biosynthesis.
12	urine norepinephrine excretion in patients undergoing mitral or aortic valve replacement with morphine anesthesia	Lapos; urinary norepinephrine excretion in patients undergoing either mitral valve replacement or aortic valve replacement with morphine anesthesia.
12	venomotor changes caused by halothane acting on the sympathetic nerves	Vomotor changes caused by breath, halothane acting on sympathetic nerves.
12	neurons from fetal rat brain in a new cell culture system a multidisciplinary analysis	Fetal rat brain neurons in a new cell culture system a multidisciplinary analysis.
12	effect of withdrawal from chronic ethanol ingestion on the camp response of cerebral cortical slices using the agonists histamine serotonin and other neurotransmitters	Effects of withdrawal; chronic ingestion of ethanol; ethanol on the camp response of cerebral cortical slices using histamine serotonin and dapos agonists; other neurotransmitters.
12	dopamine b hydroxylase and catecholamines in an olfactory esthesioneuroma	The dopamine b hydroxylase and catecholamines in an esteuroma olfactory.
12	vascular reactivity to noradrenaline potassium chloride and angiotensin ii in the rat perfused mesenteric vasculature preparation during the development of renal hypertension	The vascular reactivity to potassium chloride and l*apos; angiotensin ii of noradrenaline in the perfused mesenteric vascular preparation of the rat during the development of renal hypertension.
12	chronotropic response to acetylcholine injected into the sinus node artery of the isolated atrium of the dog	Chronotropic response to apos; acetylcholine injected into apos; sinus node artery of apos; isolated atrium of dog.
12	thick filaments in vertebrate smooth muscle	Thick filaments in the smooth muscle of vertebrates.
12	catecholamine fluorescence in the pituitary of the eel anguilla anguilla with special reference to its variation during background adaptation	Fluorescence of the catecholamines in the apos; pituitary of the eel eel eel eel eel eel eelilla, with particular attention to its variation over the course of the epos; background adaptation.
12	the aminergic innervation of the pituitary gland in the roach leuciscus rutilus	L' aminergic innervation of l' pituitary in the roach leuciscus rutilus.
12	effect of some autonomic drugs on heat defence in the pigeon	The effect of certain self-contained drugs on the ability of pigeons to defend themselves against heat.
12	the effect of exogenous catecholamines on the cardiac rhythm and thermoregulation of hibernating hedgehogs erinaceus europaeus l	L' effect of exogenous catecholamines on the heart rate and thermoregulation of hibernating erinaceus europaeus l.
12	modulation by prostaglandins of adrenergic transmission in the isolated perfused rabbit and rat kidney	Prostaglandin modulation of adrenergic transmission in isolated perfused rabbit and rat kidney.
12	histamine potentiation of nerve and drug induced responses of a rabbit cerebral artery	Potentiation by nerve histamine and drug elicited responses from rabbit brain artery.
12	correlation between the response of the heart to sympathetic stimulation and the release of endogenous catecholamines into the coronary sinus of the dog	The cardiac response to sympathetic stimulation correlates with release of endogenous catecholamines in the coronary sinus of the dog.
12	bronchopulmonary arterial shunting without anatomic anastomosis in the dog	Arterial bronchopulmonary shunt with no anatomical anastomosis in the dog.
12	direct effect of beta adrenergic stimulation on renin release by the rat kidney slice in vitro	Direct effect of beta-adrenergic stimulation on renin release from rat kidney slice in vitro.
12	changes in rat adrenal medulla following delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol treatment a histochemical study	Changes in the rat adrenal medulla following treatment with delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol, histochemical study.
12	catecholamines in urine an evaluation of alumina trihydroxyindole methods and a description of an improved method	An improved method for the evaluation of the methods of trihydroxyindole de l'apos; alumina and description of d&apos.
12	results of a study on the circadian rhythm of catecholamine excretion on normal subjects and those with high excretion levels author s transl	Results from a study of the circadian rhythm of apos; excretion of catecholamines in normal subjects and in subjects with high rates of apo; excretion.
12	mechanism of vascular hyperresponsiveness in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Mechanisms of vascular hyperresponsiveness in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	pharmacological effects of alpha methyldopa alpha methylnorepinephrine and octopamine on rat arteriolar arterial and terminal vascular smooth	Pharmacologic effects of lacidosis; alpha methyldopa alpha methylnorepinephrine and lacidosis; octopamine on the apos; arteriolar artery and vascular end of the rat.
12	possible contributions of endogenous prostaglandins to the control of blood pressure	Possible contribution of endogenous prostaglandins to blood pressure control.
12	rise in plasma free norepinephrine during anesthetic induction with ketamine	Augmentation of plasma free norepinephrine during seizures; anesthetic induction by ketamine.
12	effect of low dose intra arterial reserpine on vascular wall norepinephrine content	Effect of low dose intraarterial reserpine on the norepinephrine content of the vascular wall.
12	role of noradrenaline and serotonin in the central control of blood pressure in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The role of noradrenaline and serotonin in the central control of blood pressure in spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats.
12	central nervous systen alpha adrenergic mechanisms and cardiovascular regulation in rats	Central nervous system (CNS), alpha adrenergic mechanisms and cardiovascular regulation in rats.
12	centrally induced hypotension unreleated to alpha adrenergic stimulation	Centrally induced hypotension was not reduced to alpha-adrenergic stimulation.
12	left ventricular pressure mural force relationship during sympathetic stimulation	Mural force ratio of left ventricular pressure during sympathetic stimulation.
12	comparison of central effects of noradrenaline and dopamine injected into the lateral brain ventricle in rats	Comparison of the central effects of noradrenaline and dopamine injected into the lateral cerebral ventricle of rats.
12	rapid transport of noradrenaline in adrenergic axons of rat sciatic nerve distal to a crush	Rapid transport of noradrenaline in crushed distal rat sciatic nerve adrenergic axons.
12	on the noradrenaline loading in axonal amine storage granules in rat crushed sciated nerves	On the noradrenaline charge in the rat's stored granules; axonal amine in crushed sawed nerves.
12	synthesis of catecholamines in the eye after local injection of 3h precursors	Synthesis of catecholamine in the eye after local injection of precursors 3h.
12	vasomotor nerve control of isolated arteries and veins	Control of the vasomotor nerve of isolated arteries and veins.
12	intracellular distribution of amines taken up by rat mast cells	Intracellular distribution of amine absorbed by rat mast cells.
12	specific and unspecific removal of circulating noradrenaline in pulmonary and systemic vascular beds in man	Specific and nonspecific elimination of the circulating noradrenaline from pulmonary and systemic vascular beds in men.
12	affinity of noradrenaline and dopamine for neural alpha receptors mediating negative feedback control of noradrenaline secretion in human vasoconstrictor nerves	Norepinephrine and dopamine affinity for neuronal alpha receptors mediating negative feedback control of noradrenaline secretion in human vasoconstrictor nerves.
12	clinical experimental studies in patients with asympathicotonic hypotension	Clinical trials in patients with asympathonic hypotension.
12	the nyctohemeral rhythm of plasma prolactin effects of ganglionectomy pinealectomy constant light constant darkness or 6 oh dopamine administration	Nycto-dominal rhythm of effects of plasma prolactin of ganglionectomy Pinealectomy constant darkness constant light or administration of dopamine 6 oh.
12	narcotic withdrawal like mouse jumping produced by amphetamine and l dopa	For example, the use of narcotic withdrawal such as mouse jumping produced by amphetamine and dopa l.
12	reactivity of isolated bovine mesenteric and hepatic veins to vasoactive agents and specific antigen	Isolated bovine mesenteric and hepatic veins reactive to vasoactive agents and specific antigen.
12	enterohepatic haemodynamics in calves during acute systemic anaphylaxis	Enterohepatic hemodynamics in calves during apo; acute systemic anaphylaxis in calves.
12	adrenergic lipolysis in human adipose tissue in vitro	Acute adrenergic lepolysis in human adipose tissue in vitro.
12	the central modulatory effect of clonidine on the cardiodepressor reflex after suppression of synthesis and storage of noradrenaline	L' central modulatory effect of clonidine on the cardiodepressor reflex after suppression of noradrenaline synthesis and storage.
12	effects of clonidine on baroreceptor function in anesthetized dogs	Effect of clonidine on baroreceptor function in anesthetized dogs.
12	comparison of structural and stereoisomers of apomorphine on stereotyped behavior of the rat	Comparison of the structure and stereoisomers of apos; apomorphine to rat stereotype.
12	effects of clonidine on morphine withdrawal signs in the rat	Effects of clonidine on the signs of morphine withdrawal in rats.
12	changes in imipramine induced noradrenaline potentiation by varying activity of gastric juice under oral medication	L' imipramine induced a potentiation of noradrenaline by variable gastric juice activity under oral administration.
12	elevated left ventricular stiffness by noradrenaline in myocardial ischaemia	Noradrenaline-induced left ventricular stiffness in the apos; myocardial ischemia.
12	effects of phentolamine on the sa node of the dog heart in situ	Phentolamine effects on the her node of the dog heart in situ.
12	cardiovascular studies of 5 3 tert butylamino 2 hydroxy propoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril hydrochloride opc 1085 a new potent beta adrenergic blocking agent	Cardiovascular studies of 5 tert hydrochloride @-@butylamino 2 hydroxypropoxy 3-4 dihydrocarbostyril opc 1085, a potent new beta-adrenergic blocking agent.
12	mechanical responses to catecholamines in isolated strips of the guinea pig stomach muscle	The mechanical responses to catecholamines in isolated strips of the gastric muscle of the guinea pig.
12	effect of beta phenylethylamine derivatives on the central nervous system iii motor activity changes in mice due to the intracerebral administration of metaraminol	The effect of phenylethylamine beta derivatives on the central nervous system iii changes in lipos; mouse motor activity due to apos; intracerebral administration of metaraminol.
12	adrenoceptors and autonomic nerve control mechanisms in the biliary tract	Adrenoceptors and other autonomic control mechanisms in the biliary tract.
12	effect of dopamine on perfusion pressure in rat peripheral blood vessels	Effect of dopamine on perfusion pressure in peripheral blood vessels of the rat.
12	spasmolytic activity of two synthetic anilide local anaesthetics	L' spasmolytic activity of two local synthetic anesthetic anesthetic agents.
12	comparative circulatory effects of adrenaline and noradrenaline during intra osseous dental anaesthesia	Comparative circulatory effects of epos; adrenaline and norepinephrine during apos; dental anesthesia in the bone.
12	effect of bordetella pertussis extract and vasoactive amines on vascular permeability	Effect of edetella pertussis extract and vasoactive amines on vascular permeability.
12	progesterone mediated increase in monoamine stores and the regulation of enzymes of biosynthesis and metabolism in the adrenal gland during late pregnancy in the rat	Progesterone promoted the accumulation of monoamine stores and the regulation of adrenal gland biosynthetic and metabolic enzymes at the end of pregnancy in the rat.
12	some effects of pilocarpine and acetylcholine on the responses of the guinea pig vas deferens to hypogastric nerve stimulation and transmural stimulation and applied minus noradrenaline	Some effects of pilocarpine and l' acetylcholine on the responses of guinea pig vas deferens to transmural hypogastric nerve stimulation and applied less noradrenaline.
12	microiontophoretic studies of the effects of false transmitter candidates and amphetamine on cerebellar purkinje cells	Microiontophoretic studies of the effects of false candidate transmitters and l' amphetamine on cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	intra and extraneuronal formation of the two major noradrenaline metabolites in the cns of rats	Intra and extraneuronal formation of the two major metabolites of noradrenaline in rat cn channels.
12	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate content in rat caudate nucleus demonstration of dopaminergic and adrenergic receptors	The monophosphate content of the apos; adenosine 3-5 in the rat caudate nucleus demonstrates the presence of dopaminergic and adrenergic receptors.
12	simple isolated perfused artery preparation vasoconstrictor evaluation	Simple evaluation of vasoconstrictors of preparation of isolated perfused artery.
12	specific effect of 5 6 dihydroxytryptamine on the monoamine fluorophore of the frog s gustatory cells	The specific effect of 56 dihydroxytryptamine on the fluorophore monoamine of frog gustatory cells.
12	effects of thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on the actions of pentobarbital and other centrally acting drugs	Effects of thyrotropin releasing apos; hormone trh on the actions of pentobarbital and d' other drugs with central action.
12	induction of tyrosine hydroxylase elicited by beta adrenergic receptor agonists in normal and decentralized sympathetic ganglia role of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	Beta-adrenoceptor agonists induced tyrosine hydroxylase induction in normal and decentralized sympathetic ganglia of the role of d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3.
12	free fatty acids as feedback regulators of adenylate cyclase and cyclic 3 5 amp accumulation in rat fat cells	Free fatty acids as retroactive regulators of the apo; adenylate cyclase and apo; cyclic accumulation of 3,5 amperes in rat fat cells.
12	simultaneous estimation of catecholamines and serotonin after purification on ion exchange resin	Simultaneous estimation of catecholamines and serotonin after ion exchange resin purification.
12	some physiological aspects of bone marrow pressure	Some physiological aspects of bone marrow.
12	tryptamines and some other substances affecting waking and sleep in fowls	Tryptamines and d' other substances affecting poultry wake and sleep.
12	discrimination of monoamine uptake by membranes of adrenal chromaffin granules	The monoamine uptake discrimination of adrenal chromaffin granule membranes is evident.
12	the effects of catecholamines and adrenoceptor blocking drugs on the canine peripheral lymph flow	The effects of catecholamines and adrenoceptor inhibitors on peripheral canine lymphatic flux.
12	indomethacin potentiation of the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation effect of stimulus frequency and train length	Indomethacin potentiation of rabbit portal vein response to apos; electrical stimulation effect of stimulus frequency and train length.
12	evidence for prostaglandin mediated prejunctional control of renal sympathetic transmitter release and vascular tone	Evidence of prostaglandin-mediated, prejunctional control of renal sympathetic transmitter release and vascular tone.
12	adrenergic and cholinergic receptors in the human prostate prostatic capsule and bladder neck	Adrenergic and cholinergic receptors in the prostate capsule of the human prostate and bladder neck.
12	plasma norepinephrine and epinephrine in acromegaly	Norepinephrine and lapos; plasma epinephrine in acromegaly.
12	cardiovascular drug interactions	Cardiovascular drug interactions.
12	influence of sympathomimetic drugs on the motility of bovine teat muscles	Influence of sympathomimetic drugs on bovine teat muscle motility.
12	segmental analysis of spinal cord monoamines after thoracic transection in the dog	Segmental analysis of spinal cord monoamines following dog thoracic section.
12	tuberoinfundibular neurons dopaminergic and norepinephrinergic sensitivity	Tuberoinfundibular neurons, dopaminergic and norepinephrineergic sensitivity.
12	dopamine and norepinephrine levels in the nucleus accumbens olfactory tubercle and corpus striatum following lesions in the ventral tegmentalarea	Dopamine and norepinephrine levels in the olfactory tubercle and striated corpus of the nucleus accumbens as a result of ventral tegmental lesions.
12	interactions between lysergic acid diethylamide and dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase systems in rat brain	Interactions between l&apos diethylamide; lysergic acid and dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase systems in rat brain.
12	monoaminergic mechanisms of stimulation produced analgesia	Monoaminergic mechanisms of stimulation resulted in analgesia.
12	the effect of monoamine oxidase inhibition on formation fixation and reproduction of temporary connections	L' effect of apos; inhibition of monoamine oxidase on formation, binding and reproduction of temporary connections.
12	the effect of caesium on adrenergic transmission in rabbit vas deferens	Cesium effect on adrenergic transmission in rabbit vas deferens.
12	neurochemical mechanisms of the inhibitory influence of the hippocampus on the conditioned food getting reaction in rats	Neurochemical mechanisms of the apos; inhibitory influence of the apos; seahorse on the conditioned food causing a reaction in the rats.
12	clopimozide r 29 764 a new highly potent and orally long acting neuroleptic of the diphenylbutylpiperidine series	Clopimozide r 29,764 is a potent new long-acting oral neuroleptic of the diphenylbutylpiperidine series.
12	a comparison of his bundle electrograms recorded from the aortic root and from a plaque sutured near the his bundle	A comparison of its electrograms recorded from the aortic root and d*apos; a plate suture near its bundle.
12	role of monoamines in the control by hormones of sexual receptivity in the female rat	Role of monoamines in hormonal control of sexual receptivity in female rat.
12	degeneration and regeneration of adrenergic nerves in mesenteric blood vessels iris and atrium of the rat after 6 hydroxydopamine injection	Degeneration and regeneration of adrenergic nerves in the rat mesenteric blood vessels after 6 injections of apos; hydroxydopamine.
12	effects of increased arterial pressure on blood flow in the damaged brain	Increased blood pressure on the blood flow in the damaged brain.
12	concentration gradients of monoamine metabolites in human cerebrospinal fluid	Key words: concentration gradient of monoamino metabolites in human cerebrospinal fluid.
12	orthostatic hypotension associated with paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia	Orthostatic hypotension, associated with paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia.
12	aminergic nuclei in the hypothalamus of the roach leuciscus rutilus	Aminergic nuclei in the apos; hypothalamus of roach leuciscus rutilus.
12	the correlation between spontaneous contractions and postjunctional supersensitivity of the smooth muscle of the rat vas deferens	Correlation between spontaneous contractions and rat vas deferens smooth muscle post-hyperpersensitivity-junctional.
12	inhibition of brain catecholamine synthesis and release of prolactin and luteinizing hormone in the ovariectomized rat	Inhibition of cerebral catecholamine synthesis and prolactin and d&apos release; luteinizing hormone in the ovariectomized rat.
12	regulation of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels in guinea pig cerebral cortex by interaction of alpha adrenergic and adenosine receptor activity	D&apos regulation; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in guinea pig cerebral cortex via the apos; l&apos interaction; alpha-adrenergic receptor and adenosine activity.
12	long term effects of p chloroamphetamine and related drugs on central serotonergic mechanisms	Long-term effects of p-chloro-amphetamine and related drugs on central serotonergic mechanisms.
12	brown adipose tissue in the new born calf bos taurus	Brown adipose tissue from the new @-@. ne bos taurus taurus.
12	changes in monoamine concentrations in mouse brain associated with ethanol dependence and withdrawal	Changes in the concentrations of monoamine in mouse brain tissue associated with dependence on ethanol and withdrawal.
12	analysis of the effects on body temperature of intracerebroventricular injection in anaesthetized dogs of gamma aminobutyric acid	Anesthetic effects on body temperature; intracerebroventricular injection of d' gamma aminobutyric acid in anesthetized dogs.
12	distribution of alpha and beta adrenoceptors in human urinary bladder	Distribution of alpha and beta adrenoceptors in the human bladder.
12	atropine resistant effects of the muscarinic agonists mcn a 343 and ahr 602 on cardiac performance and the release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart	Effects of resistance to apos; muscarinic agonists mcn to 343 and ahr 602 on cardiac performance and noradrenaline release from rabbit perfused sympathetic nerves.
12	release of prostaglandins from the rabbit perfused kidney effects of vasoconstrictors	Prostaglandin release by the perfused renal effects of rabbit vasoconstrictors.
12	virus infections in infant mice causing persistent impairment of turnover of brain catecholamines	Viral Infections in Newborn Mice-causing persistent alteration of the turnover of cerebral catecholamines.
12	the mechanism of renin release from the ischaemic kidney	Mechanism of renin release from the ischemic kidney.
12	secretion of anterior pituitary hormones in man effects of ethyl alcohol	The effects of alcohol; ethyl alcohol on the secretion of previous pituitary hormones in men.
12	n the mechanism of inhibitory action of vibrations as studied in a molluscan catch muscle and in vertebrate vascular smooth muscle	The mechanism of d' inhibitory action of vibrations was studied in a molluscan capture muscle and in vascular smooth muscle of vertebrates.
12	effects of iprindole on responses of single cortical and caudate neurones to monoamines and acetylcholine	Apos; iprindole on the responses of caudate and cortical neurons to monoamines and apos; acetylcholine.
12	effects of norepinephrine and angiotensin ii on the determinants of glomerular ultrafiltration and proximal tubule fluid reabsorption in the rat	Effects of norepinephrine and apos; angiotensin ii on apo determinants; glomerular ultrafiltration and proximal tubular fluid reabsorption in rat.
12	effects of neurotransmitters injected into the posterior and the anterior septal artery on the automaticity of the atrioventricular junctional area of the dog heart	The effects of neurotransmitters injected into the apos; posterior and anterior septal artery on the apos; automaticity of atrioventricular junction zone of the dog heart.
12	interactions of morphine adenosine adenosine triphosphate and phosphodiesterase inhibitors on the field stimulated guinea pig ileum	The interaction of morphine adenosine triphosphate and phosphodiesterase inhibitors in the field stimulates guinea pig ileum.
12	analysis of changes in reactivity of rabbit arteries and veins two weeks after induction of hypertension by coarctation of the abdominal aorta	Analysis of reactivity changes in rabbit arteries and veins 2 weeks after apo; induction of apo; hypertension by coarctation of apo; abdominal aorta.
12	effects of an inotropic agent ro 2 2985 x 537a on regional blood flow and myocardial function in chronically instrumented conscious dogs and anesthetized dogs	Effects of inotropic agent 2,2985 x 537a on the regional blood flow and myocardial function of chronically instrumented conscious dogs and anesthetized dogs.
12	the development and evaluation of a semi automated assay for catecholamines suitable for plasma and urine	Development and evaluation of a semi-automatic plasma- and urine-suitable catecholamine assay.
12	behavior and the balance between norepinephrine and serotonin	Norepinephrine and serotonin: behavior and balance.
12	formation of dopamine and noradrenaline in rat vas deferens comparison with guinea pig vas deferens	Comparison of dopamine and noradrenaline formation in rat vas deferens and guinea pig vas deferens.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effects of reserpine on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission	An electrophysiological analysis of the effects of reserpine on neuromuscular adrenergic transmission.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effects of amine uptake blockers and alpha adrenoceptor blockers on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission	An electrophysiological analysis of the effects of alpha-adrenoceptor amine uptake blockers and blockers on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effect of ca ions on neuromuscular transmission in the mouse vas deferens	An apo electrophysiological analysis; effect of ca ions on neuromuscular transmission in the mouse vas deferens.
12	physical and adrenergic factors affecting systemic vascular resistance in the rainbow trout a comparison with branchial vascular resistance	Physical and adrenergic factors affecting systemic vascular resistance in rainbow trout,-sky, compared to gill vascular resistance.
12	effects of intraventricular 6 hydroxydopamine and replacement therapy with norepinephrine dopamine and serotonin on self stimulation in diencephalic and mesencephalic regions in the rat	Effects of intraventricular 6 hydroxydopamine and replacement therapy with norpinephrine dopamine and serotonin on self-stimulation in diencephalic and mesencephalic regions in the rat.
12	the relationship of plasma levels of pindolol in hypertensive patients to effects on blood pressure plasma renin and plasma noradrenaline levels	Relationship between plasma pindolol levels in hypertensive patients and effects of blood pressure on plasma renin and plasma noradrenaline levels.
12	cardiovascular effects of prazosin in normotensive and genetically hypertensive rats	Cardiovascular effects of prazosin in normotensive and genetically hypertensive rats.
12	9 chloro 2 3 dihydro 5h 1 4 dioxepino 6 5 b benzofuran a novel antilipidemic agent structurally related to clofibrate	Dioxepin 6-5 b benzofuran, a new antilipidemic agent structurally related to clofibrate.
12	behavioral and biochemical interactions of 5 7 dihydroxytryptamine with various drugs when administered intracisternally to adult and developing rats	Behavioral and biochemical interactions of 57 dihydroxytryptamine with various drugs when administered intracisternally to both developing and adult rats.
12	catecholaminergic mechanisms of the lateral hypothalamus their role in the mediation of amphetamine anorexia	C catecholaminergic mechanisms of the apos; lateral hypothalamus their role in the mediation of the apos; amphetamine anorexia.
12	tail pinch induced eating gnawing and licking behavior in rats dependence on the nigrostriatal dopamine system	The pinching of the tail caused rats to be hooked and licked by an addiction to the nigrostriatal dopaminergic system.
12	effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on central noradrenaline neurons during ontogeny	The effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on the central neurons of noradrenaline during ontogeny.
12	quantitative localization of biogenic amines in the spinal cord	Localization of biogenic amines in the spinal cord.
12	effect of hypothalamic implants changing monoamine levels on continuous estrus in rats induced by androgen treatment in the neonatal period	Monoamine-modifying hypothalamic implants; continuous estrus in rats induced by neonatal androgen treatment.
12	thermoregulation in the rabbit following intracranial injection of norepinephrine	Rabbit thermoregulation after etapos; intracranial injection of norepinephrine.
12	effects of phentolamine dihydroergocristine and isoxsuprine on the blood pressure and heart rate in normotensive hypotensive and hypertensive rats	Effects of phentolamine dihydroergocristine and isoxsuprine on blood pressure and heart rate in both hypotensive and hypertensive normotensive rats.
12	discrepancies in the measurement of changes in blood flow using flow and velocity sensitive electromagnetic probes	Measurements of changes in blood flow at the apo, using flow- and velocity-sensitive electromagnetic probes.
12	idiopathic orthostatic hypotension shy drager syndrome results of regional cerebral blood flow measurements author s transl	Orthostatic idiopathic hypotension: results of shy drager syndrome as a result of regional measurements of cerebral blood flow.
12	central noradrenergic regulation of cerebral blood flow and vascular permeability	Central noradrenergic regulation of cerebral blood flow and vascular permeability.
12	the effect of glucagon on glomerular filtration rate in dogs during reduction of renal blood flow	L' effect of glucagon on glomerular filtration rate in dogs during renal blood flow reduction.
12	the effect of noradrenaline adrenergic blocking agents and tyramine on the intrarenal distribution of blood flow in the baboon	L' effect of adrenergic inhibitors of noradrenaline and tyramine on intrarenal blood flow distribution in baboon.
12	the effect of simultaneous administration of levarterenol and phentolamine on renal blood flow	Lapos; effect of apos; simultaneous administration of levartenol and phentolamine on renal blood flow.
12	effect of vasoactive agents on the distribution of renal cortical blood flow in dogs	Effect of vasoactive agents on the distribution of coronary blood flow in dogs.
12	effects of quinidine on blood flow rate and developed tension in blood perfused canine papillary muscle	The effects of quinidine on blood flow and developed tension were observed in blood-perfused canine papillary muscle.
12	neurogenic influence on local cerebral blood flow effect of catecholamines or sympathetic stimulation as correlated with the sympathetic innervation	L' neurogenic influence on apos; effect of catecholamines or sympathetic stimulation on local cerebral blood flow is correlated with apos; sympathetic innervation.
12	neural control of cochlear blood flow	Neural regulation of cochlea blood flow should be controlled.
12	time course changes in blood pressure urinary excretion of norepinephrine and dopamine after administration of fusaric acid in a single dose in elderly hypertensive patients	Lapses; urinary excretion of norepinephrine and dopamine after dosing; single dose of apo; fusaric acid to elderly hypertensive patients varies over time.
12	effect of prolonged administration of clonidine to spontaneously hypertensive rats on blood pressure cerebral norpinephrine content and angiographic finding in the kidney	Effect of apos; prolonged administration of clonidine to spontaneously hypertensive rats on blood pressure, brain norepinephrine content and results of apos; angiography in the kidney.
12	the functional state of the sympathetic adrenal system and blood coagulation in transitory cerebral circulatory disorders	Lapses; functional status of the sympathetic adrenal system and blood clotting in transient circulatory disorders of the brain.
12	changes in local cerebral blood flow during increased general arterial pressure in animals	Changes in local cerebral blood flow during vomiting; increase in general blood pressure in animals.
12	norepinephrine and isoprenaline induced changes of peripheral blood flow acceleration caused by changes of cardiac inotropy	Norepinephrine and isoprenaline induced changes in the apos; acceleration of peripheral blood flow caused by changes in the apos; cardiac inotropy.
12	blood pressure responses to catecholamines during beta adrenergic blockade with propranolol in hypertensive subjects	Effect of propranolol on hypertension.
12	influence of adipose tissue blood flow on the lipolytic response to circulating noradrenaline at normal and reduced ph	L' influence of adipose tissue blood flow on the circulating noradrenaline response to normal and reduced ph.
12	the effect of behavioral stimulant doses of amphetamine on blood pressure	L' effect of dosing; behavioural-enhancing amphetamine on blood pressure.
12	blood pressure responses to noradrenaline and dopamine infusions in parkinson s disease and the shy drager syndrome	Blood pressure reactions to noradrenaline and dopamine infusions in Parkinson's disease and timid drager syndrome.
12	a method for determining segmental resistances in the microcirculation from pressure flow measurements	A method to determine segmental strengths in the microcirculation from pressure-rate measurements.
12	role of endogenous prostaglandins in regulation of uterine blood flow and adrenergic neurotransmission	The role of endogenous prostaglandins in the regulation of uterine blood flow and adrenergic neurotransmission.
12	blood pressure effects of lower abdominal aortic surgery with particular reference to the use of morphine and droperidol in modifying the responses	Effect on blood pressure from oral surgery; lower abdominal aorta, especially apos; use of morphine and droperidol to modify the responses.
12	effect of norepinephrine on intramyocardial distribution of blood flow in normal and ischemic myocardium	Effect of norepinephrine on intramyocardial blood flow in normal and ischemic myocardium.
12	cause of the disproportion between the vast increase in plasma renin and the only small if any increase in blood pressure after manipulation of the submaxillary gland	Causes disproportion between the apos; considerable increase in plasma renin and the only slight increase, if any, in blood pressure after manipulation of the maxillary gland.
12	effects of beta adrenergic blockade on diurnal variability of blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline levels	Effects of beta-adrenergic blockade on diurnal variability of plasma blood pressure and noradrenaline levels.
12	effect of cerebrospinal fluid removal on cerebral blood flow and metabolism in the baboon influence of tyrosine infusion and cerebral embolism on cerebrospinal fluid pressure autoregulation	Effect of apos; removal of cerebrospinal fluid-spinal fluid on cerebral blood flow and metabolism in baboon Tyrosine infusion and cerebral embolism on the apos; self-regulation of cerebral fluid pressure-spinal fluid.
12	comparison of nerves to cerebral and extracerebral blood vessels a differential effect of alpha methyl tyrosine on norepinephrine content	Comparison of the nerves to the cerebral and extracerebral blood vessels of apos; a differential effect of apos; alpha methyl tyrosine on norepinephrine content.
12	tissue blood flow in brain liver renal cortex and renal medulla in experimental hemorrhagic shock	Tissue blood flow in the renal cortex of the brain and the renal medulla during experimental hemorrhagic shock.
12	role of prostaglandins in blood pressure regulation	The role of prostaglandins in the regulation of blood pressure.
12	effect of catecholamines in blood flow in arteries of distribution	Effect of catecholamines on blood flow in distribution arteries.
12	continuous measurement of renal blood flow changes to renal nerve stimulation and intra arterial drug administration in the rat	Ongoing measurement of changes in renal blood flow at renal nerve stimulation and intra-arterial drug administration in the rat.
12	entry of 3h norepinephrine 125i albumin and evans blue from blood into brain following unilateral osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier	Entry of norepinephrine 125i albumin 3h and d' blue evans of blood in the brain after one-sided osmotic opening of the blood transfusion barrier.
12	influence of intravenously administered catecholamines on cerebral oxygen consumption and blood flow in the rat	L' influence of intravenous catecholamines on rat cerebral oxygen consumption and blood flow.
12	the effects of lh adrenaline and noradrenaline on testicular blood flow and plasma testosterone concentrations in anaesthetized rats	The effects of l'adrenaline and noradrenaline lh on testicular blood flow and plasma testosterone levels in anesthetized rats.
12	dithiothreitol induced alterations of blood pressure vascular reactivity and aortic microsomal calcium uptake in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Dithiothreitol induced alterations in blood pressure vascular reactivity and microsomal aortic calcium uptake in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	effect of exogenous noradrenaline on local cerebral blood flow after osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier in the rat	The effect of exogenous noradrenaline on the local cerebral blood flow after the osmotic opening of the blood barrier in the rat.
12	effect of adrenaline noradrenaline histamine and acetylcholine on the blood flow in the vascular bed of the bone marrow	The effect of apos; adrenaline noradrenaline histamine and apos; acetylcholine on blood flow in the bone marrow vascular bed.
12	influence of the cerebrovascular sympathetic innervation on regional flow autoregulation and blood brain barrier function	Influence of the apos; cerebrovascular sympathetic innervation on the apos; regional flow self-regulation and blood-barrier function.
12	autoregulation of cerebral blood flow during alcohol infusion	Autologulation of cerebral blood flow during the infusion of alcohol.
12	interaction between noradrenergic and serotonergic mechanisms on the central regulation of blood pressure in the rat a study using experimental central hypertension produced by chemical lesions of the locus coeruleus	Interaction of noradrenergic and serotonergic mechanisms on the central regulation of rat blood pressure, using rat apos; experimental central hypertension produced by chemical lesions of locus coeruleus.
12	comparison of the effect of catecholamines on the blood flow in the coronary and in the femoral circulation	Comparison of the effects of catecholamines on blood flow in the coronary and femoral circulation.
12	influence of somatostatin on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in the rat	Influence of somatostatin on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity in rats.
12	amphetamine induced increase in rat cerebral blood flow apparent lack of catecholamine involvement	Apos; amphetamine induced an increase in cerebral blood flow in the rat, which suggests an absence of catecholamine involvement.
12	response of norepinephrine and blood pressure to stress increases with age	The response of norepinephrine and blood pressure to stress increases with increasing age.
12	pressure flow relationships and effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline on the hepatic arterial and portal venous vascular beds of the dog	Pressure-flow ratios and effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline on dog portal venous and hepatic arterial vascular beds.
12	blood pressure and mesenteric blood flow in rats during the infusion of biogenic amines effect of supralethal irradiation	Arterial pressure and mesenteric blood flow during infusion of biogenic amines, effect of apos; supra-ethical irradiation.
12	the potentiating effect of clorgyline and pyrogallol on the blood pressure responses to norepinephrine	L' potentiating effect of clorgyline and pyrogallol on blood pressure responses to norepinephrine.
12	alpha and beta receptor blockade of isoproterenol and norepinephrine induced effects on regional blood flow and blood flow acceleration	Blocking of alpha and beta receptors of isoproterenol and norepinephrine-induced effects on regional blood flow and lapos; acceleration of blood flow.
12	clinical assessment of sympathetic tone orthostatic blood pressure responses in borderline primary hypertension	Clinical evaluation of orthostatic arterial pressure responses of sympathetic tone in the apos; primary hypertension limitation.
12	effect of immobilisation on the catecholamine and histamine induced responses of blood pressure and pulse rate in rats adapted to swimming and in controls	L' effect of apo; immobilization on catecholamines and histamine induced heart rate and blood pressure responses in swimming-adapted and control rats.
12	location of cns neurons mediating the blood pressure fall after shock induced fighting in the rat	The localization of cns neurons mediating the fall in blood pressure following combat-induced shock in the rat.
12	interaction studies between three antidepressant drugs chlorimipramine imipramine and zimelidine and noradrenaline tyramine and vagal stimulation on the heart rate and blood pressure in dogs	Studies of the interaction between three chlorimipramine imipramine and zimelidine antidepressants and noradrenaline tyramine antidepressants and vagal stimulation of heart rate and blood pressure in dogs.
12	plasma catecholamines and blood pressure responses to the carotid baroreceptor reflex in essential hypertension	Plasma catecholamines and responses of blood pressure to carotid baroreceptor reflex in the apos; essential hypertension.
12	changes in plasma norepinephrine blood pressure and heart rate during physical activity in hypertensive man	The effect of norepinephrine on the rate of hypertensive meningococcal disease.
12	effects of catecholamines on cardiovascular response and blood flow distribution to normal tissue and liver tumors in rats	Effects of catecholamines on the cardiovascular response and blood flow distribution in normal tissues and liver tumours in rats.
12	estimation of cerebral extraction of circulating compounds by the brain uptake index method influence of circulation time volume injection and cerebral blood flow	Estimation of brain mass; brain extraction of circulating compounds by the rapid reaction method; index of mass; cerebral absorption influences mass; volume injection in circulation time and cerebral blood flow.
12	uterine blood flow and plasma norepinephrine changes during maternal stress in the pregnant ewe	Uterine blood flow and changes in plasma norepinephrine during maternal stress in pregnant sheep.
12	clonidine increases the rate of blood pressure recovery from splanchnic nerve stimulation	Clonidine increased the rate of blood pressure recovery after splanchnic nerve stimulation.
12	quantitative changes in regional cerebral blood flow of rats induced by alpha and beta adrenergic stimulants	Quantitative changes in regional cerebral blood flow induced by alpha- and beta-adrenergic stimulants.
12	raised blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline concentrations in teenagers and young adults selected from an open population	Increases in blood pressure and plasma concentrations of noradrenaline in adolescents and young adults in an open population.
12	transient responses of rabbit cerebral blood vessels to norepinephrine correlation with intrinsic myogenic tone	Transient reactions of rabbit cerebral blood vessels to norepinephrine correlation with their intrinsic myogenic tone.
12	the concept of autoregulation of total blood flow and its role in hypertension	The concept of total blood flow self-regulation and its role in high blood pressure.
12	effects of norepinephrine vasopressin isoproterenol and histamine on blood flow oxygen uptake and capillary filtration coefficient in the colon of the anesthetized dog	Effects of norepinephrine vasopressin isoproterenol and lapos; histamine on blood flow uptake and hair filtration coefficients in the colon of anesthetized dogs.
12	mechanism of enhanced blood pressure rise after reclipping following removal of a renal artery clip in rats	In the rat, the mechanism of apos; increase in blood pressure increases after reclassification; apos ablation; a d&apos clip; renal artery.
12	effect of diphenylhydantoin on blood pressure of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effect of diphenylhydantoin on blood pressure in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	a radioangiographic study of the effects of catecholamines on uteroplacental blood flow in the rhesus monkey	A radioangiographic study of the effects of catecholamines on placental uterus blood flow in rhesus monkeys.
12	ethnic differences in blood pressure with observations on noradrenaline and renin 1 a working population	Ethnic differences in blood pressure, with observations on noradrenaline and renin 1 an active population.
12	increased sympathetic activity and blood pressure in young asymptomatic men with organic t wave aberrations in the electrocardiogram	Increases in cholesterol; sympathetic activity and blood pressure in asymptomatic young men with organic t-wave aberrations in the epos; electrocardiogram.
12	renal blood flow and noradrenaline secretion during treatment with propranolol	Renal blood flow and noradrenaline secretion during propranolol treatment.
12	effects of tiodazosin praxosin trimazosin and phentolamine on blood pressure heart rate and on pre and postsynaptic alpha adrenergic receptors in the rat	Effects of tiodazosine, praxosin, trimazosin and phentolamine on heart rate and pre- and post-adrenergic alpha-adrenergic receptors in rats.
12	blood pressure plasma catecholamines and sympathetic outflow in pithed shr and wky rats	Plasma arterial pressure catecholamines and l' sympathetic flow in both decerebrate and wypsky rats.
12	effects of rate of blood flow on fractional extraction and on uptake of infused noradrenaline by brown adipose tissue in vivo	Effects of blood flow on fractional extraction and in vivo uptake of noradrenaline by brown adipose tissue.
13	changes in the potassium content of sea urchin eggs on fertilization	Change in the potassium content of the eggs; sea urchin at fertilization.
13	the loss of potassium from frog nerves in anoxia and other conditions	Loss of potassium from frog nerves under anoxia and other conditions.
13	clinical potassium problems	Clinical potassium problems?
13	experiments on the role of potassium in the blocking of neuromuscular transmission by curare and other drugs	Experiments on the role of potassium in blocking neuromuscular transmission by curare and other drugs.
13	effect of potassium deficiency on carbon dioxide cation and phosphate content of muscle with a note on the carbon dioxide content of human muscle	Effect of a potassium deficiency on the carbon dioxide cation and the phosphate content of the muscle with a note on the carbon dioxide content of the human muscle.
13	potassium transport in human erythrocytes evidence for a three compartment system	Potassium transport in human erythrocytes also indicates the existence of a three-compartment system.
13	apparent violations of the all or none law in relation to potassium in the protoplasm	Apparent violations of the all-or-nothing law regarding the potassium in the protoplasm.
13	permeation and diffusion of k ions in frog muscle	Permeability and diffusion of k ions in the muscle of frogs.
13	studies on the sodium and potassium transport in rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Studies of sodium and potassium transport in polymorphonuclear rabbit leukocytes.
13	intracellular potassium compartments in nitella axillaris	Intracellular potassium compartments of nitella axillaris.
13	potassium ion current in the squid giant axon dynamic characteristic	Potassium ion current in the epos; characteristic giant squid dynamic axon.
13	average potassium concentration of the human body as a function of age	Average concentration of potassium in the human body as a function of age.
13	potassium ions and the inhibitory process in the crayfish stretch receptor	The potassium ions and the inhibitory process in the d&apos receptor; elongation of the os; crayfish.
13	an all ornone response in thh release of potassium by yeast cells with methylene blue and other basic redox dyes	An all-ornonic response in potassium release from yeast cells with methylene blue and d' other basic redox stains.
13	the efflux of potassium from electroplaques of electric eels	L' potassium efflux from electroplates of electrical eels.
13	rate of antagonism of tubocurarine by potassium ions	D&apos levels; tubocurarine antagonism by potassium ions.
13	estimation of total body fat from potassium 40 content	Estimation of total body fat based on potassium content 40.
13	potassium and the recovery of arterial smooth muscle after cold storage	Potassium and arterial smooth muscle recovery after cold storage.
13	radiocalcium release by stimulated and potassium treated sartorius muscles of the frog	Release of radiocalcium by frog sartorius muscles, stimulated and treated with potassium.
13	accumulation of potassium anaerobically by renal medullary slices	Anaerobic accumulation of potassium by thin slices of renal medulla.
13	the role of calcium ions in the acceleration of resting muscle glycolysis by extracellular potassium	The role of calcium ions in glucose synthesis; acceleration of resting muscle glycolysis by extracellular potassium.
13	role of potassium in the oxidative metabolism of micrococcus sodonensis	Role of potassium in oxidative metabolism of micrococcus sodonensis.
13	factors influencing germination and outgrowth of bacillus popilliae spores i effect of potassium ions	Factors influencing germination and spore growth of the bacillus popilliae and the effect of potassium ions.
13	effect of high oxygen tension on potassium retentivity and colony formation of baker s yeast	The effect of high oxygen tension on the retention of potassium and the formation of colonies of bakers' yeasts.
13	lysosomes in the renal papillae of rats formation induced by potassium deficient diet	Lysosomes in the renal papillae form formation induced by a potassium-deficient diet.
13	some differences in the action of penicillin bacitracin and vancomycin on bacillus megaterium	Some differences in the action of penicillin bacitracin and vancomycin on megaterium bacillus cells.
13	nasal salt excretion and the possible function of the cloaca in water conservation	L' salt nasal excretion and the possible role of the cloaca in preserving the water.
13	action of the calcium antagonists cocaine and ethanol on contraction and potassium efflux of smooth muscle	L' action of cocaine and ethanol calcium antagonists on contraction and l' potassium efflux of smooth muscle.
13	delayed rectification and anomalous rectification in frog s skeletal muscle membrane	Delayed rectification and abnormal rectification of the frog skeletal muscle membrane.
13	hospital experience with cardiac resuscitation	Hospital-based cardiac resuscitation experiment.
13	antibiotic sensitivity of proteus species	Antibiotic sensitivity of protein species.
13	the enzymatic response of astrocytes to various ions in vitro	Enzyme response of astrocytes to various ions in vitro.
13	time factors in interhemispheric transfer of learning	Temporal factors in inter hemispheric transfer of learning.
13	the genus veillonella 3 hydrogen sulfide production by growing cultures	D&apos sulfide production; veillonella 3 hydrogen production by growing cultures.
13	potassium loss during galvanotaxis of slime mold	During myxomycete galvanotaxis, loss of potassium occurs.
13	the metabolism of the volatile amines vii the clinical significance of two components of the blood ammonia level	Volatile amine metabolism is the clinical significance of two components of the concentration of ammonia in the blood.
13	density gradient centrifugation of a murine leukemia virus	Dapos density gradient centrifugation; murine leukemic virus.
13	phosphate incorporation in desheathed nerves effects of potassium and calcium ions	L' incorporation of phosphate into the effects of potassium and calcium ions on the nerves.
13	the relation of potassium to digitalis effectiveness and toxicity	The relationship between potassium and the efficacy and toxicity of digitalin.
13	electrophorus adenosine triphosphatase sodium activated exchange after n ethylaleimide treatment	Apos-activated exchange; apos electrophoresis; sodium adenosine triphosphatase after apos treatment; ethylaleimide is activated.
13	erythritol production by a yeastlike fungus	Production of d' erythritol by a yeast-like fungus.
13	the after potential that follows trains of impulses in frog muscle fibers	L' after-potential that follows trains d' pulses in frog muscle fibers.
13	the recovery of contractile ability following a contracture in skeletal muscle	Restoration of contractile capacity after contracture in skeletal muscle.
13	photosensitivity of the frog iris	Photosensitivity of the leaf; iris of frog.
13	the interaction of some stimulant and depressant drugs on the frog heart	L' the interaction of certain stimulants and depressants on frog heart.
13	elasticity of articular cartilage effect of ions and viscous solutions	Elasticity of the articular cartilage effect of ions and viscous solutions.
13	studies on the pathogenesis of fever xii electrolytic factorys influencing the release of endogenous pyrogen from polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Studies on the pathogenesis of xii plant fever; electrolysis affecting the release of endogenous pyrogens from the polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
13	correlation of speciation with lytic responses of the achromobacter	Correlation between speciation and the lytic responses of the achromobacterium.
13	glycolic acid oxidation by escherichia coli adapted to glycolate	Glycolic acid and glycolic acid oxidation by glycolate-adapted escherichia coli.
13	nutrition of leptospira pomona iii calcium magnesium and potassium requirements	Leptospira pomona nutrition iii calcium magnesium and potassium requirements.
13	blood free medium for the rapid growth of pasteurella tularensis	Blood-free environment for rapid growth of pasteurella tularensis.
13	changes in serum and urinary potassium levels during profound hypothermia in man	Changes in serum and urinary potassium levels during severe hypothermia in a man.
13	infectivity of histone poliovirus ribonucleic acid preparations	Infectivity of apo preparations; ribonucleic acid of poliovirus histones.
13	nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xii ion activation of adenosine triphosphatase in membranes of marine bacterial cells	Nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xii ion activation of l' adenosine triphosphatase in marine bacterial cell membranes.
13	environmental radiation measurements of dose rates	Ambient radiation dose rate measurements.
13	the mechanism of isotonic water transport	The isotonic transport mechanism of the water.
13	specificity of potassium activated phosphodiesterase of escherichia coli	Potassium-activated phosphodiesterase specificity in escherichia coli was demonstrated.
13	effect of ions on the efflux of acetylcholine from peripheral nerve	Effect of ions on the apos; efflux of apos; acetylcholine from the peripheral nerve.
13	anion permeability of the olfactory receptive membrane	The anionic permeability of the receptive olfactory membrane material.
13	time course of tea induced anomalous rectification in squid giant axons	L' temporal evolution of tea induced abnormal rectification in the giant axons of squid.
13	the electroosmotic effects arising from the interaction of the selectively anion and selectively cation permeable parts of mosaic membranes	Electroosmotic effects arising from the interaction of selectively permeable parts with the anion and selectively permeable cations of the mosaic membranes.
13	factors which modify the effect of sodium and potassium on bacterial cell membranes	Factors that modify the cell surface; effect of sodium and potassium on bacterial cell membranes.
13	influence of the physical state of the bacterial cell membrane upon the rate of respiration	L' influence of cell wall tissue; physical condition of bacterial cell membrane on respiration rate.
13	the suppression of the late after potential in rubidium containing frog muscle fibers	Removal of late potential in rubidium containing frog muscle fibers.
13	effects of internal and external ionic environment on excitability of squid giant axon a macromolecular approach	Effects of pH; internal and external ionic environment on pH; excitability of pH; giant squid axon using macromolecular approach.
13	reisolation and emendation of description of vibrio marinus russell ford	Reisolation and modification of the description of vibrio marinus Ford.
13	small bowel ulceration associated with enteric coated potassium chloride and hydrochlorothiazide	Ulceration of the apos; small intestine associated with enteric potassium chloride and apos; hydrochlorothiazide.
13	stabilization of pertussis vaccine in the presence of benzethonium chloride	Pertussis vaccine stabilization in the presence of benzethonium chloride.
13	tracer and non tracer potassium fluxes in frog sartorius muscle and the kinetics of net potassium movement	Tracer and non-tracer potassium flow in frog's designer muscle and kinetics of net potassium movement.
13	response of the infant kidney to diuretic drugs	Kidney response to diuretics in the infant.
13	the role of the microbial flora in uremia ii uremic colitis cardiovascular lesions and biochemical observations	The role of the microbial flora in uremia Cardiovascular lesions in uremic colitis and biochemical observations.
13	relation between membrane potential changes and tension in barnacle muscle fibers	Relationship between changes in membrane potential and tension in barnacle muscle fibers.
13	the relation between the late after potential and the size of the transverse tubular system of frog muscle	The relationship between late potential and size of the frog muscle transverse tubular system.
13	treatment of congestive heart failure with triamterene	Treatment of heart failure; congestive heart failure with triamterene.
13	cationic glass electrode response in aqueous solutions of sodium chloride and potassium chloride	Reaction of sodium chloride and potassium chloride in aqueous solutions with cationic glass electrode.
13	serotonin and adenosine triphosphate synergistic effect on the beat frequency of cilia of mussel gills	A synergistic effect of serotonin and epos; adenosine triphosphate on the frequency of mussel gill cilia beating.
13	gastric secretion mechanism for production of hydrogen ions	Gastric secretory mechanisms for production of d*apos; d*apos; hydrogen.
13	the time course of the loss and recovery of contracture ability in frog striated muscle following exposure to ca free solutions	Temporal evolution of loss and restoration of contracture capacity in frog striated muscle after exposure to free Ca solutions.
13	anomalous rectification in the squid giant axon injected with tetraethylammonium chloride	Abnormal correction in the giant squid axon injected with tetraethylammonium chloride.
13	studies on ion accumulation in muscle cells	Apos studies; accumulation of apos; ions in muscle cells.
13	reversal response elicited in nonbeating cilia of paramecium by membrane depolarizatin	Parameterization-induced depolarization-induced membrane depolarizatin in non-battering cilia elicited an opposite reaction.
13	effects of minerals on neomycin production by streptomyces fradiae	Effects of minerals on streptomyces fradiae neomycin production.
13	synthesis of malformin by an enzyme preparation from aspergillus niger	Synthesis of malformin by enzyme preparation from d'apos; aspergillus niger.
13	microbial metabolism of amino ketones aminoacetone formation from 1 aminopropan 2 ol by a dehydrgenase in escerichia coli	Microbial metabolism of aminoketones Formation of d' aminoacetone from 1 aminopropane 2 ol by dehydrgenase in escerichia coli.
13	in vivo stability of bacteriophage t4 messenger ribonucleic acid	Stability in vivo of bacteriophage t4 ribonucleic acid messenger.
13	nutritional requirements for germination outgrowth and vegetative growth of putrefactive anaerobe 3679 in a chemically defined medium	The nutritional requirements for germination of vegetative growth and of vegetative growth of the putrefied anaerobe 3679 in a chemically defined medium.
13	induced and spontaneous movements of potassium ions into mitochondria	Induced and spontaneous movement of potassium ions in mitochondria.
13	the action of ketonic prostaglandins on the guinea pig myometrium	L' action of ketone prostaglandins on guinea pig myometrium.
13	the effect of membrane fixed charges on diffusion potentials and streaming potentials	L' effect of fixed charges of the membrane on diffusion and flux potentials.
13	tracer and nontracer potassium fluxes in squid giant axons and the effects of changes in external potassium concentration and membrane potential	Flux of tracer and non-traceable potassium into giant squid axons and effects of changes in external potassium concentration and membrane potential.
13	enhanced permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction studies of the role of ca	Increased sugar permeability associated with muscle contraction studies on the role of ca.
13	the electrical and mechanical activity of the esophageal cell of ascaris lumbricoides	Electrical and mechanical activity of the esophageal cell of the ascaris lumbricoides.
13	the further preparation of inorganic cationic yeasts and some of their chief properties	Further preparation of the inorganic cationic yeasts and some of their main properties.
13	iodide transport inhibition by agents reacting at the membrane	L' inhibition of phosphate transport; iodide by membrane-reactive agents.
13	experimental pain in general practice	Experimental pain in general practice.
13	altered effect of potassium ions on cerebral respiration in vitro following subcortical lesions	Modified effect of potassium ions on in vitro respiration following lesions at-corticalales.
13	contribution of protein and lipid components to the salt response of envelopes of an extremely halophilic bacterium	A highly halophilic bacterium, the contribution of protein and lipid components to the saline response of d&apos envelopes.
13	actions of calcium and certain multivalent cations on potassium contracture of guinea pig s taenia coli	Action of calcium and certain multivalent cations on guinea pig taenia coli potassium contracture.
13	release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro	Release of apo; neurohypophysial hormones in vitro.
13	the distribution of 14c sucrose within the skeletal muscle of the rat in vitro	In vitro distribution of sucrose 14c in rat skeletal muscle.
13	mechanism of action of phenethyl alcohol breakdown of the cellular permeability barrier	Mechanisms; action of apo; phenethyl alcohol decomposition of barrier cell permeability.
13	fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus ii synthetic media for the production of streptomycin	Fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus ii, synthetic media for the production of streptomycin.
13	effects of univalent cations on the inductive formation of nitrate reductase	Effects of univalent cations on nitrate reductase inductive formation.
13	caffeine and potassium induced contractures of frog striated muscle fibers in hypertonic solutions	Caffeine and potassium induced contractions of the frog striated muscle fibers in hypertonic solutions.
13	analysis of depolarizing and hyperpolarizing inactivation responses in gymnotid electroplaques	Analysis of depolarizing and hyperpolarizing inactivation responses in the daily electroplaques.
13	cation effects on chloride fluxes and accumulation levels in barley roots	Effects of cations on chloride fluxes and chloride levels; accumulation in roots of barley.
13	nickel substitution for calcium in excitation contraction coupling of skeletal muscle	Nickel substitution for calcium in skeletal muscle excitation-contraction coupling.
13	active transport by the cecropia midgut ii fine structure of the midgut epithelium	Active transport by intestinal caecropy; middle intestine ii fine structure of the apos; epithelium of the apos; middle intestine.
13	the relation between external potassium concentration and the relaxation rate of potassium induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	The relationship between external potassium concentration and relaxation rate of potassium-induced contractions in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of ph on the 36 cl efflux from frog skeletal muscle	L' effect of ph on apos; efflux of 36 cl of frog skeletal muscle.
13	potassium contractures in single muscle fibres of the crayfish	Potassium shrinkage in the simple muscle fibers of the apos; crayfish.
13	the effects of urea and hydrochlorothiazide on the renal functions of rat and domestic fowl	Effects of urea and apo; hydrochlorothiazide on renal function in rat and domestic poultry.
13	the distribution of free amino acids in subcellular fractions of guinea pig brain	The distribution of free amino acids in the subcellular fractions of guinea pig brain.
13	cation transport in escherichia coli vi k exchange	Cation transport in the intestinal tract; exchange of escherichia coli vi k k.
13	the influence of the intracellular potential on potassium uptake by beetroot tissue	L' influence of intracellular potential on beet tissue; absorption of potassium by beet tissue.
13	excitation of mytilus smooth muscle	This is excitation of the smooth muscle of the mytilus.
13	alcohol dehydrogenase activity and electron transport in living yeast	Activity of l' alcohol dehydrogenase and transport of d' electrons in live yeast.
13	neurosecretory cell capable of conducting impulse in rats	Neurosecretory cell capable of conducting rat impulses.
13	application of the sucrose gap method to determine the ionic basis of the membrane potential of smooth muscle	Application of the sucrose gap method to determine the ionic basis of smooth muscle membrane potential.
13	light enhanced potassium absorption by corn leaf tissue	Light has increased the absorption of potassium by corn leaf tissue.
13	ammonium ion concentration in the primitive ocean	Concentration of acid; ammonium ions in the epos; primitive ocean.
13	effects of external calcium deprivation on single muscle fibers	Effects of external calcium deficiency on the simple muscle fibers.
13	the function of antidiuretic hormone in the sheep	The function of l' antidiuretic hormone in sheep.
13	factors modifying renal tubular bicarbonate reabsorption in the dog	Factors affecting reabsorption of renal tubular bicarbonate in dogs.
13	control of glycolysis in cerebral cortex slices	Control glycolysis in cerebral cortical slices.
13	foam separation of pseudomonas fluorescens and bacillus subtilis var niger	Separation of mosses of pseudomonas fluorescens and bacillus subtilis var niger.
13	the effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the potassium exchange of human platelets	L' effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine on apos; potassium exchange of human platelets.
13	metabolic effects of human growth hormone in corticosteroid treated children	Metabolic effects of the apo; human growth hormone in corticosteroid-treated children.
13	the effect of water diuresis on electrolyte excretion in unanaesthetized dogs	Lapos; effect of aqueous diuresis on apos; excretion of apos; electrolytes in unanesthetized dogs.
13	potassium stimulated respiration and intra cellular calcium releae in from skeletal muscle	Potassium stimulates respiration and intracellular calcium is released from skeletal muscle.
13	membrane currents at large positive internal potentials in single myelinated nerve fibres of rana pipiens	Membrane currents with large positive internal potentials in the individual myelinated nerve fibers of rana pipiens.
13	phospholipids of thiobacillus thiooxidans	Phospholipids of thiobacillus thiooxidan.
13	the dependence on external cations of the oxygen consumption of mammalian non myelinated fibres at rest and during activity	Dependence on external cations from the consumption of nonmyelinated mammalian fibers at rest and during breathing; activity.
13	quinine and caffeine effects on 45ca movements in frog sartorius muscle	Effects of quinine and caffeine on frog sartorius muscle 45ca movements.
13	acetylcholine and calcium on membrane permeability and contraction of intestinal smooth muscle	Calcium and acetylcholine on the membrane permeability and contraction of intestinal smooth muscle.
13	binding of ca ions by paramecium caudatum	Binding of ca ions by the paramecium caudatum.
13	effects of atp on the interaction of ca mg and k with fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle	Effects of apos; apos on apos; interaction of ca mg and k with isolated rabbit skeletal muscle fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum.
13	the action of caffeine on the activation of the contractile mechanism in straited muscle fibres	L' action of caffeine on lipids; activation of the contractile mechanism in stratified muscle fibers.
13	resting and action potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method in the superior cervical ganglion of the rabbit	The action of the method of sucrose partitioning in the upper cervical ganglion of the rabbit.
13	calcium binding properties of sarcoplasmic reticulum as influenced by atp caffeine quinine and local anesthetics	The calcium binding properties of the sarcoplasmic reticulum are influenced by the atp quinine caffeine and local anesthetics.
13	changes of total water and sucrose space accompanying induced ion uptake or phosphate swelling of rat liver mitochondria	Changes in total apo, water and sucrose accompanying apo, phosphate absorption or swelling in the rat liver mitochondria induce changes in apo; space.
13	resting and spike potentials of skeletal muscle fibres of salt water elasmobranch and teleost fish	Resting potential and peak potential of the skeletal muscle fibers of saltwater and teleost fish elasmobranchs.
13	permeability changes associated with the action potential in procaine treated crayfish abdominal muscle fibers	Changes in permeability associated with the potential for apo; action in abdominal muscle fibers; procaine-treated crayfish.
13	the influence of ionic strength on potassium contractures and calcium movements in frog muscle	L' influence of ionic strength on the potassium contractions and calcium movements in frog muscle.
13	resting and stimulated respiration in vitro in the central nervous system regional distribution and relation to cell density	Resting and stimulated respiration in vitro in the regional distribution of the central nervous system and the relationship with cell density.
13	removal of potassium negative resistance in perfused squid giant axons	Suppression of negative potassium resistance in giant, perfused squid axons.
13	decreased k conductance produced by ba in frog sartorius fibers	Ba-induced conductance k decreased in frog sartorius fibers.
13	an extrarenal mechanism of potassium adaptation	An extrarenal mechanism adapted to potassium.
13	morphological and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria from fetal neonatal and adult liver and from neoplastic tissues	Morphological and biochemical studies of isolated neonatal and adult fetal liver and neoplastic tissue mitochondria.
13	adrenaline mechanism of action on the pacemaker potential in cardiac purkinje fibers	Apo mechanisms; action of epos; adrenaline on pacemaker potential in cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	salt transport in valonia inhibition of potassium uptake by small hydrostatic pressures	Saline transport in the valonium inhibits the uptake of potassium by small hydrostatic pressures.
13	4 leucine oxytocin natriuretic diuretic and antivasopressin polypeptide	Four diuretic natriuretic leucine oxytocin and an antivasopressin polypeptide.
13	cytochemistry of phosphatases in myxococcus xanthus	Phosphatase cytochemistry in the xanthus myxococci.
13	electrical signs of new membrane production during cleavage of rana pipiens eggs	Electrical signs of rana pipiens production; new membrane during rana pipiens egg cleavage.
13	a proton spin echo study of the state of water in frog nerves	L&apos study; lipid status; water in frog nerves by proton spin echo.
13	ionic mechanisms controlling behavioral responses of paramecium to mechanical stimulation	Ionic mechanisms controlling the behavioral responses of paramecia to mechanical stimulation.
13	exchangeable potassium study in patients undergoing chronic haemodialysis	A study of exchangeable potassium in patients undergoing chronic haemodialysis.
13	action of steroidal diamines on active transport and permeability properties of escherichia coli	The action of steroidal diamines on the active transport and permeability properties of escherichia coli.
13	morphology and electrophysiological properties of squid giant axons perfused intracellularly with protease solution	The morphology and electrophysiological properties of giant squid axons perfused intracellularly with a protease solution.
13	stomatal opening role of potassium uptake by guard cells	Role of disease; stomatal aperture of disease; absorption of potassium by guard cells.
13	ventricular function in noncardiacs with alcoholic fatty liver role of ethanol in the production of cardiomyopathy	Ventricular function in non-cardiac patients with the alcoholic fatty liver role of l' ethanol in the production of cardiomyopathy.
13	potential responses of nutrient membrane of frog s stomach to step changes in external k and cl concentrations	Potential responses of the frog stomach to gradual changes in external concentrations k and cl.
13	exchangeability of radioactive acetylcholine with the bound acetylcholine of synaptosomes and synaptic vesicles	Exchangeability of synaptosomes and synaptic vesicles; radioactive acetylcholine with attached acetylcholine.
13	thermal metabolic blood and circulatory adjustments in prolonged outdoor exercise	Thermal adjustments to the blood and circulatory metabolism during prolonged outdoor exercise.
13	actions of some anions on electrical properties and mechanical threshold of frog twitch muscle	Action of certain anions on electrical properties and mechanical thresholds of frog-striking muscle.
13	effects of potentiators of muscular contraction on binding of cations by sarcoplasmic reticulum	Effects of muscle contraction potentiators on sarcoplasmic reticulum cation binding.
13	potassium in gastric juice under non steady state conditions	Potassium in the gastric juice under conditions that are not stable.
13	a note on transmembrane potential in dermal melanophores of the frog and movement of melanin granules	A note on transmembrane potential in frog dermal melanophores and melanin granule movement.
13	expansion of the inner membrane compartment and its relation to mitochondrial volume and ion transport	Expansion of inner membrane compartment and its relationship to mitochondrial volume and ion transport.
13	ionic conductances of the surface and transverse tubular membranes of frog sartorius fibers	Ion conductances of superficial and transverse tubular membranes of frog sartorius fibers.
13	action potentials afterpotentials and excitation contraction coupling in frog sartorius fibers without transverse tubules	Action potentials afterpotentials and excitation contraction coupling in frog sartorius fibers without transverse tubules.
13	adipose tissue pyruvate kinase properties and interconversion of two active forms	Properties of fat tissue pyruvate kinase and interconversion of two active forms.
13	the dependence on dicarboxylic acids and energy of citrate accumulation in depleted rat liver mitochondria	Dependence on pH; dicarboxylic acids and pH; energy of pH; accumulation of citrate in depleted rat liver mitochondria.
13	biophysical and mechanical properties of red and white muscle fibres in fish	Biophysical and mechanical properties of red and white muscle fibers in fish.
13	a pharmacological study of the toxin in a cnidarian chironex fleckeri southcott	A pharmacological study of the toxin in a chironex cnidary fleckeri Southcott.
13	control of teichoic acid and teichuronic acid biosyntheses in chemostat cultures of bacillus subtilis var niger	Monitoring of l&apos biosynthesis; teichoic acid and l' teichuronic acid in chemostat cultures of the bacillus subtilis var niger.
13	vitamin d intoxication with hypernatraemia potassium and water depletion and mental depression	Vitamin D poisoning with potassium hypernatraemia and apo; exhaustion; water and mental depression.
13	the attachment of polyuridylic acid to reticulocyte ribosomes	L' l&apos attachment; polyuridylic acid to the reticulocyte ribosomes.
13	the influence of h on the membrane potential and ion fluxes of nitella	L' influence of h on membrane potential and ionic fluxes of nitella.
13	the role of calcium in excitation contraction coupling of lobster muscle	The role of calcium in lobster muscle contraction-excitation coupling.
13	the clinical spectrum of renal potassium wasting	The clinical spectrum of renal potassium loss.
13	inhibition of membrane transport in streptococcus faecalis by uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation and its relationship to proton conduction	L' inhibition of membrane transport in streptococcus faecalis by oxidative phosphorylation uncouplers and its relation to proton conduction.
13	the interaction of presynaptic polarization with calcium and magnesium in modifying spontaneous transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals	Interaction of presynaptic polarization with calcium and magnesium in modifying spontaneous release of transmitters from mammalian motor nerve terminals.
13	evidence for one functional phenylalanyl trna binding site on the 30s ribosomal subunit	Evidence of apos; existence of apos; a functional phenylalanyl trna binding site on the sub-ribosomal unit 30s.
13	use of zonal ultracentrifuge systems for biophysical studies of rhinoviruses	The use of d&apos systems; zonal ultracentrifugation for rhinovirus biophysical studies.
13	accumulation of caesium and rubidium in vivo by red and white muscles of the rat	Cesium and rubidium accumulation in vivo by rat red and white muscles.
13	ventricular arrhythmias related to antibiotic usage in dogs	Ventricular arrhythmia associated with apos; use of antibiotics in dogs.
13	potassium corticosterone and adrenocorticotropic hormone release in vitro	Potassium corticosterone and adrenalocorticotropic hormones release in vitro.
13	the effects of calcium and magnesium ions on the adenosine triphosphatase and inosine triphosphatase activities of myosin a	Effects of calcium and magnesium ions on activities of myosin adenosine triphosphatase and l' inosine triphosphatase a.
13	quantitative determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in rat brain	Quantitative determination of l' deoxyribonucleic acid in rat brain.
13	adenohypophysial transmembrane potentials polarity reversal by elevated external potassium ion concentration	The polarity of the adenohypophysial transmembrane potentials is reversed by increasing the external concentration of potassium ions.
13	effect of divalent cations on potassium conductance of squid axons determination of surface charge	Effect of divalent cations on the potassium conductance of squid axons, surface charge determination.
13	a theoretical examination of ionic interactions between neural and non neural membranes	A theoretical examination of ionic interactions between neuronal and nonneural membranes.
13	influence of calcium and magnesium on manganese absorption	The influence of calcium and magnesium on calcium and magnesium; manganese absorption.
13	potassium inactivation and impedance changes during spike electrogenesis in eel electroplaques	Inactivation and apo; potassium impedance changes during apo; peak electroplate electrogenesis; eel.
13	striated muscle fibers inactivation of contraction induced by shortening	Inactivation by striated muscle fibers of shortening-induced contraction.
13	regulation of protein synthesis in zoospores of blastocladiella	Regulation of protein synthesis in blastocladiella zoospores.
13	intersubstrate competitions and evidence for compartmentation in mitochondria	Competition among substrates and evidence of mitochondrial compartmentalization.
13	neuroglia gliosis and focal epilepsy	Neuroglide gliosis and focal epilepsy?
13	effect of chemicals on the early stages of tobacco mosaic virus protein polymerization	The effect of chemicals on the early polymerization of tobacco mosaic virus proteins.
13	ionic permeability of the inhibitory postsynaptic membrane of lobster muscle fibers	Ion permeability of the membrane post-inhibitory synaptic of the muscle fibers of the lobster.
13	analysis of the effects of calcium or magnesium on voltage clamp currents in perfused squid axons bathed in solutions of high potassium	Analysis of the effects of calcium or magnesium on voltage clamp currents of perfused squid axons bathed in potassium-rich solutions.
13	changes in extracellular potassium concentration produced by neuronal activity in the central nervous system of the leech	Changes in extracellular potassium concentration due to apos; neural activity in central nervous system of leech.
13	after effects of nerve impulses on signalling in the central nervous system of the leech	After the effects of nerve impulses on signalling in the leech's central nervous system.
13	oesophageal obstruction and ulceration caused by oral potassium therapy	Esophageal obstruction and ulceration due to oral potassium therapy?
13	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes i	Co-operative effects in transportation models; state of repair; membrane balance i.
13	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes 3 simulation of potassium ion transport in nerve	Cooperative effects in transport models at apos; steady state across membranes 3 simulation of phosphate transport; potassium ion in nerve.
13	the steps between depolarization and the increase in the respiration of frog skeletal muscle	Steps between depolarization and l' increased respiration of frog skeletal muscle.
13	a lesion of the transverse tubules of skeletal muscle	Transversal tubular lesion of skeletal muscle.
13	some effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction and excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscles	Some effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction and contraction coupling were observed; excitation in skeletal muscle of frogs.
13	the pharmacology of the cholinoceptor in muscle preparations of ascaris lumbricoides var suum	Pharmacology of cholinoceptor in muscle preparations of apos; ascaris lumbricoides var suum.
13	solution conformation of valinomycin potassium ion complex	Conformation of the l&apos complex; valinomycin potassium ion into solution.
13	modified two phase system for partition of bacillus macerans spores	Modified two-phase system for the distribution of spores of the maceran bacillus.
13	potassium balance and acid base changes in patients undergoing regular haemodialysis therapy	Pesticide balance and acid base changes in patients with regular haemodialysis therapy.
13	effects of caffeine on crayfish muscle fibers ii refractoriness and factors influencing recovery repriming of contractile responses	The effects of caffeine on the muscle fibers of the body; crayfish ii refractory and factors influencing the recovery of contractile responses.
13	falsely high plasma potassium values in patients with hyperaldosteronism	Falsely elevated plasma potassium values in patients with a history of hyperaldosterone.
13	antagonism by ddt of the effect of valinomycin on a synthetic membrane	Apos antagonist Ddt; effect of valinomycin on a synthetic membrane.
13	ultrastructural studies on mitochondrial swelling	Ultrastructural studies on the swelling of mitochondria.
13	the mechanism of the paralysing action of tetramisole on ascaris somatic muscle	Mechanism of l' paralyzing action of tetramisole on ascaris somatic muscle.
13	drinking and eating elicited by cortical spreading depression	Drinking and eating, caused by cortical depression.
13	independence of antimineralocorticoid and catatoxic effects of various steroids	Independence from the anti-mineralocorticoid and catatoxic effects of various steroids.
13	inactivation of the potassium conductance and related phenomena caused by quaternary ammonium ion injection in squid axons	Inactivation of the potassium conductance and related phenomena caused by the apos; injection of quaternary ammonium ions into the axons of squid.
13	effect of potassium supplements on the exchangeable potassium in chronic heart disease	Effect of potassium supplements on exchangeable potassium in chronic cardiac disease.
13	mode of action of vibriocin	Dapos mode; action of vibriocin.
13	mechanical threshold as a factor in excitation contraction coupling	Mechanical threshold as a factor in coupling contraction d' excitation.
13	slow synaptic excitation in sympathetic ganglion cells evidence for synaptic inactivation of potassium conductance	Slow synaptic excitation in sympathetic ganglion cells suggests synaptic inactivation of potassium conductance.
13	calcium and potassium currents of the membrane of a barnacle muscle fibre in relation to the calcium spike	Calcium and potassium currents of the dapos membrane; a goose muscle fiber relative to the calcium peak.
13	structure and some contractile properties of fast and slow muscles of the chicken	Structure and some contractile properties of chicken fast and slow muscles.
13	urine concentration and dilution in hypokalemic and hypercalcemic dogs	Disposition and dilution of the urine concentration in hypokalemic and hypercalcemic dogs.
13	ventricular parasystole in acute myocardial infarction	Ventricular parasystolic acute myocardial infarction.
13	the effect of reserpine treatment and decentralization on the ion distribution in the vas deferens of the guinea pig	L' effect of reserpine treatment and decentralization on ion distribution in the guinea pig vas deferens.
13	electrocardiographic changes and plasma potassium levels in patients on regular haemodialysis	Electrocardiographic changes and plasma potassium levels in patients receiving regular hemodialysis.
13	uptake of antimony potassium tartrate by mouse liver slices	Dapos tartrate; antimony, potassium, uptake by thin slices of mouse liver.
13	partial purification and properties of carbamoyl phosphate synthetase of alaska pea pisum sativum l cultivar alaska	Partial purification and properties of the alaska cultivar carbamoyl phosphate synthetase from pisum sativum l.
13	digoxin intoxication the relationship of clinical presentation to serum digoxin concentration	Digoxin toxicity the relationship between the clinical presentation and the serum digoxin concentration.
13	effect of potassium ions on the attachment of polyribosomes to the membranes in lysates of exponential phase cells of bacillus amyloliquefaciens	Effect of potassium ions on apos; attachment of polyribosomes to membranes in the lysates of the exponential phase cells of the amyloliquefacian bacillus.
13	shark pit organs enhancement of mechanosensitivity by potassium ions	The organs of sharks' pools increase the mechanosensitivity to potassium ions.
13	ribonucleic acid dependent deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase in visna virus	L&apos polymerase; deoxyribonucleic acid; ribonucleic acid in visna virus.
13	the effects of probenecid and thiazides and their combination on the urinary excretion of electrolytes and on acid base equilibrium	The effects of the probenecides and thiazides and their combination on apos, urinary excretion of apos, electrolytes and apos; acid balance-base.
13	properties and substrate specificities of the phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases of aesculus species	Properties and substrate specificity of loos synthetases; phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid of loos species; esculus.
13	cyclic adenosine and guaosine monophosphates and gucagon effect on liver membrane potentials	Adenosine and guaosine cyclic monophosphates and effect of gucagon on hepatic membrane potentials.
13	conditions for activity of glutaminase in kidney mitochondria	Conditions of liver enzymes; glutaminase activity in renal mitochondria.
13	renal tubular acidosis and autoimmune liver disease	Renal tubular acid and auto liver disease-immune.
13	potassium transport in neurospora evidence for a multisite carrier at high ph	Potassium transport in the neurospores indicates the existence of high pH multisite transporters.
13	fetal kidney in organ culture abnormalities of development induced by decreased amounts of potassium	Defects in fetal kidney development in potato cultures; organs induced by reduced amounts of potassium.
13	cyclic adenosine monophosphate potassium dependent action on vascular smooth muscle membrane potential	Potassium-dependent action of cyclic adenosine monophosphate (CMA) on vascular smooth muscle membrane potential.
13	concentration of rift valley fever and chikungunya viruses by precipitation	Concentration of rift valley fever and chikungunya virus infection by precipitation.
13	structural and nonstructural proteins of saint louis encephalitis virus	Lapos virus structural and nonstructural proteins; St.-Louis encephalitis.
13	epinephrine induced vacuole formation in parotid gland cells and its independence of the secretory process	L' epinephrine induced vacuole formation in parotid gland cells and its secretory independence.
13	cooperative control of potassium accumulation by ouabain in vascular smooth muscle	Co-operative control of apos; accumulation of potassium by ouabain in vascular smooth muscle.
13	inhibition of host protein synthesis during infection of escherichi coli by bacteriophage t4 3 inhibition by ghosts	Inhibition of protein synthesis of the host during apo; escherichia coli infection by apo; inhibition of bacteriophage t4 3 by phantoms.
13	a dipole model for negative steady state resistance in excitable membranes	A dipolar model for negative capacitance resistance; capacitance state; equilibrium in excitable membranes.
13	preganglionic stimulation increases calcium uptake by sympathetic ganglia	Preganglionic stimulation also increases calcium uptake by sympathetic ganglia.
13	the effects of papaverine on the electrical and mechanical activity of the guinea pig taenia coli	Effects of papaverine on the electrical and mechanical activity of taenia coli of guinea pigs.
13	metabolic hormonal and vascular changes after synthetic oestrogen therapy in oophorectomized women	Effect of estrogen therapy on oophorectomized women.
13	two fast transient current components during voltage clamp on snail neurons	Two rapid components of the transient current during voltage imposed on the neurons of l' snail.
13	potassium uptake during microcyst formation in myxococcus xanthus	L' absorption of potassium during microcyst formation in xanthus myxococcus.
13	on the adaptation in potassium excretion associated with nephron reduction in the dog	On the apos; adaptation of apos; potassium excretion associated with nephronic reduction in dogs.
13	the effect of quinine on tension development membrane potentials and excitation contraction coupling of crab skeletal muscle fibres	L' effect of quinine on membrane tension development potentials and contraction coupling; crab skeletal muscle fiber excitation.
13	salt and water permeability of the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in the normal and dehydrated fowl gallus domesticus in vivo perfusion studies	Permeability to epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in normal and dehydrated poultry flocks in vivo gallus domesticus perfusion studies.
13	sodium chloride absorption and solute linked water flow across the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in the normal and dehydrated fowl gallus domesticus in vivo perfusion studies	Sodium chloride absorption and solute bound flow; water through the epithelium; coprodeum epithelium and large intestine in in vivo perfusion studies of gallus domesticus in normal and dehydrated poultry.
13	analysis of clostridium botulinum toxigenic types a b and e for fatty and carbohydrate content	Fat and carbohydrate analysis of Clostridium botulinum a- and e-toxigenes of types a b and e.
13	ultrastructure of azotobacter vinelandii	L' apos ultrastructure; azotobacter vinelandii.
13	structural properties and features of parasitic bdellovibrio bacteriovorus	Structural properties and characteristics of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus are described.
13	interaction of tetraethylammonium ion derivatives with the potassium channels of giant axons	Interaction of derivatives of l' tetraethylammonium ion with potassium channels of giant axons.
13	cooperative aspects of small ion small molecule interactions with nucleic aicds potassium polyriboadenylic acid polyribouridylic acid	Cooperative aspects of interactions between small molecules of small ions and polyriboadenylic acid polyriboadenylic acid nucleic acids.
13	characterization of the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase of aspergillus nidulans	Characterization of the reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase d' aspergillus nidulans.
13	potassium sparing agents during diuretic therapy in hypertension	Potassium saving agents during diuretic treatment of high blood pressure.
13	electrophysiological studies of neuromuscular transmission in hereditary motor end plate disease of the mouse	Electrophysiological studies of neuromuscular transmission in the hereditary disease of the motor plaque in mice.
13	the relative contribution of k and cl to the total increase of membrane conductance produced by adrenaline on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli	The relative contribution of k and cl to apos; the total increase in membrane conductance produced by epos; adrenaline on guinea pig taenia coli smooth muscle.
13	action potentials and release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro	Potentials of apo action and release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro.
13	effect of electrical stimulation and high potassium concentrations on the effux of 14c glycine from slices of spinal cord	Effect of electrical stimulation and high concentrations of potassium on the spinal cord; glycine efflux 14c from spinal cord slices.
13	gas exchange in renal failure i dangers of hyperkalaemia during anaesthesia	Gas exchange in kidney failure; danger of kidney failure; hyperkalemia during anesthesia.
13	calcium carbonate concretions cyclic occurrence in the hamster vagina	Calcium carbonate is a manifestation of the cyclic presence in the hamster vagina.
13	loss of membrane components in the pathogenesis of antibody induced spherocytosis	Spherocytosis is induced by the loss of membrane components in the pathogenesis of the antibody.
13	polypeptide secretion from the isolated parietovisceral ganglion of aplysia californica	The polypeptide secretion of the parietovisceral ganglion isolated from l' aplysia californica.
13	biophysical effects of adrenaline on the smooth muscle of the rabbit common carotid artery	Biophysical effects of apos; adrenaline on smooth muscle of apos; common carotid artery of rabbit.
13	effect of glucagon on ventricular arrhythmias after coronary artery occlusion and on ventricular automaticity in the dog	Effect of glucagon on ventricular arrhythmias following coronary artery occlusion and apos; dog ventricular automaticity.
13	biosynthesis of rat serum albumin	Biosynthesis of the rat serum albumin.
13	exchangeable and total body potassium in patients with chronic renal failure	Total and exchangeable body potassium in patients with apo; chronic renal failure.
13	ultrastructure and contractures of the pigeon iris striated muscle	Ultrastructure and contractures of pigeon iris striated muscle.
13	chloride conductance in normal and myotonic muscle fibres and the action of monocarboxylic aromatic acids	Conduct of chlorides in normal and myotonic muscle fibers and action of monocarboxylic aromatic acids.
13	release of an antidiuretic substance by bradykinin in the rat	An antidiuretic substance released by bradykinin in the rat.
13	studies on prostaglandin antagonists	Prostaglandin antagonist studies.
13	potassium effect on dna synthesis and multiplication of baby hamster kidney cells cell cycle membrane potential synchronization transformation	Effect of potassium on the synthesis of DNA and the multiplication of the membrane synchronization potential of baby hamster kidney cells.
13	binding of thyrotropin releasing hormone to plasma membranes of bovine anterior pituitary gland hormone receptor adenylate cyclase equilibrium constant 3 h thyrotropin	Apos binding; thyrotropin-releasing hormone to apos receptor plasma membranes; apos adenylate cyclase; constant bovine anterior pituitary hormone; 3 h thyrotropin balance.
13	the effect of an intrauterine thread on tissue changes in the endometrium of the pseudopregnant rat	L' effect; an intra-uterine thread on tissue changes in the pregnant pseudo-rat endometrium was observed.
13	an unusual case of self induced electrolyte depletion	An unusual case of auto-induced electrolyte depletion-electrolytes.
13	effects of removing the external potassium on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli	Effect of leprosy; elimination of external potassium on the smooth muscle of the taenia coli of guinea pig.
13	voltage clamp studies of a transient outward membrane current in gastropod neural somata	Voltage clamp studies of a transient outward membrane current in neural somata.
13	prediction of repetitive firing behaviour from voltage clamp data on an isolated neurone soma	Prediction of repetitive discharge behaviour from voltage-clamping data on an isolated neuronal soma.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane ii potassium ion kinetics and cooperativity with x 4	The theory of ion transport across the kinetic nerve membrane ii of l' potassium ion and cooperativity with x 4.
13	stimulation of rna transcription from pea and corn dna by protein retained on sepharose coupled to 2 4 dichlorophenoxyacetic acid	Stimulation of rna transcription from pea and maize DNA by 24 dichlorophenoxyacetic acid-coupled protein on sepharose.
13	automated method for the determination of phenol in biological products	Automatic determination of phenol in biological products.
13	characterization of ribonucleic acid from visna virus	Characterization of visna virus ribonucleic acid.
13	the effect of supplemental oral phosphate on the bone mineral changes during prolonged bed rest	L' dapos effect; an oral phosphate supplement changes during prolonged bed rest.
13	conformational model of active transport	Conformational model of active transport.
13	chloride and potassium activities in luminal fluid of turtle thyroid follicles as determined by selective ion exchanger microelectrodes	Chloride and potassium activity in the luminal fluid of turtle thyroid follicles was determined by ion-selective exchange microelectrodes.
13	spasmolytic effects of cadmium and zinc ions upon the guinea pig isolated ileum preparation	Acute effects of cadmium and zinc ions on the preparation of isolated guinea-pig ileum.
13	helical nucleocapsid structure of the oncogenic ribonucleic acid viruses oncornaviruses	Nucleoside structure of the nucleocapsids of oncogenic viruses of l' ribonucleic acid oncornavirus.
13	the arrangement of ribosomes in ribosome tetramers from hypothermic chick embryos	L'apos; organization of ribosomes in tetramers of ribosomes; embryos of hypothermic chickens.
13	on the presynaptic acetylcholine receptors in sympathetic ganglia of the frog	On the presynaptic receptors of acetylcholine in frog sympathetic ganglia.
13	potassium ion release and enzyme secretion adrenergic regulation by alpha and beta receptors	Apos release; potassium ion and adrenergic regulation of alpha and beta receptor enzyme secretion.
13	comparison by gas liquid chromatography of the fatty acids acids of mycobacterium avium and some other nonphotochromogenic mycobacteria	Gas chromatographic comparison of fatty acids of avium and d' other non-photochromogenic mycobacteria.
13	lipids of a t strain of mycoplasma	Lipids from the liver; a t-strain of mycoplasma.
13	the effect of low level activation on the mechanical properties of isolated frog muscle fibers	L' effect of low level activation on mechanical properties of isolated frog muscle fibers.
13	the effect of prolonged depolarization on synaptic transfer in the stellate ganglion of the squid	The effect of prolonged depolarization on the synaptic transfer in the stellar ganglion of the squid.
13	structure of concanavalin a at 4 25 ngstr m resolution	Concanavalin structure a at 425 ngstr m resolution.
13	turnover of genetically defined catalase isozymes in maize	Renewal of genetically defined catalase isozymes of maize.
13	variation in the toxicity of arsenic compounds to microorganisms and the suppression of the inhibitory effects by phosphate	Variation in the toxicity of phosphate-inhibiting compounds; arsenic for microorganisms.
13	trypsin action on the growth of sendai virus in tissue culture cells i restoration of the infectivity for l cells by direct action of tyrpsin on l cell borne sendai virus	Action of trypsin on the growth of sentai virus in tissue culture cells; infectivity to l cells by the direct action of tyrpsin on sentai virus transmitted by l cells.
13	proteins of vesicular stomatitis virus and of phenotypically mixed vesicular stomatitis virus simian virus 5 virions	Vesicular stomatitis virus and simian vesicular stomatitis virus proteins 5 phenotypically mixed virions.
13	potassium uptake in synchronous and synchronized cultures of escherichia coli	Absorption of potassium in synchronous and synchronized Escherichia coli cultures.
13	the distribution of chloride ions in the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig s taenia coli	The distribution of chloride ions in guinea pig smooth muscle cells.
13	the effect of potassium and chloride ions on the volume and membrane potential of single barnacle muscle cells	The effect of potassium and chloride ions on the volume and potential membrane of single barnacle muscle cells.
13	effect of administered mineralocorticoids or acth in pregnant women attenuation of kaliuretic influence of mineralocorticoids during pregnancy	Effect of apo; administration of mineralocorticoids or dolipids; acth in pregnant women; mitigation of apo; kaliuretic influence of mineralocorticoids during pregnancy.
13	germination and outgrowth of single spores of saccharomyces cerevisiae viewed by scanning electron and phase contrast microscopy	Scanning electron microscopy and phase-contrast microscopy revealed germination and outgrowth of individual spores of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
13	site of stimulation of aldosterone biosynthesis by angiotensin and potassium	Site of stimulation of the biosynthesis of apos; aldosterone by apos; angiotensin and potassium.
13	the effect of diffusible acids on potassium ion uptake by yeast	L' effect of diffusible acids on l' absorption of l' potassium ion by yeasts.
13	genetic approaches to the nosology of muscular disease myotonias and similar diseases	Genetic approaches to nosology of myotonic muscle diseases and similar diseases.
13	the effect of low temperature on the excitation contraction coupling phenomena of frog single muscle fibres	L' effect of low temperature on the contraction coupling phenomena; frog single muscle fiber excitation.
13	the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	L' temporal evolution of the potassium contractions of single muscle fibers.
13	electromechanochemical model of mitochondrial structure and function	Electromechanochemical model of mitochondrial structure and function.
13	pyruvate phosphate dikinase from bacteroides symbiosus	Pyruvate phosphate dikinase activity of bacteroides symbiosus.
13	oxalate silica gel thin layer system for free 2 hydroxy fatty acids and for fatty acyl coenzyme a	Gel thin-layer system; silica oxalate for 2 free hydroxylic fatty acids and for l'apos; acyl fatty acid.
13	reversal of digoxin toxicity with specific antibodies	Reversal of the toxicity of digoxin with specific antibodies.
13	the effect of type d botulinum toxin on frog neuromuscular junctions	L' effect of botulinum toxin type d on frog neuromuscular junctions.
13	rectification in instantaneous potassium current voltage relations in myxicola giant axons	Correcting the instantaneous potassium current relationships in myxicole giant axons.
13	the myofilament lattice studies on isolated fibers ii the effects of osmotic strength ionic concentration and ph upon the unit cell volume	Studies of the network of myofilaments on isolated fibers ii the effects of ionic concentration of osmotic force and ph on unit cell volume.
13	ionic basis of the photoresponse of aplysia giant neuron k permeability increase	The ionic basis of the photoresponse of the giant neurons of apos; aplysia increases k permeability.
13	interaction of prostaglandin e 1 and calcium in the guinea pig myometrium	Interaction of prostaglandin e 1 and calcium in guinea pig myometrium.
13	total body potassium in non dialysed and dialysed patients with chronic renal failure	Non-dialysed and dialysed patients with chronic renal failure.
13	effect of hydroxybutyrate on the release of monoamines from the rat striatum	Effect of sodium phosphate; hydroxybutyrate on the release of rat striatum monoamines.
13	modification by calcium ions of adenine nucleotide translocation in rat liver mitochondria	Calcium ion modification of the translocation of adenine nucleotides in rat liver mitochondria.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane 3 potassium ion kinetics and cooperativity with x 4 6 9	Theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane 3 kinetics of the apos; potassium ion and co-operativity with x4 and x6 kinetics.
13	cushing s syndrome complicating pregnancy a case report	Cushing syndrome which complicates pregnancy.
13	an active electrical response in fibroblasts	An active electrical response in fibroblasts.
13	activation heat activation metabolism and tension related heat in frog semitendinosus muscles	Metabolism of apos; activation by heat and tension-related heat in frog's semi-tendinous muscles.
13	transport of potassium at the blood brain barrier	Potassium transport at blood barrier-encephalic.
13	control of pancreatic amylase release in vitro effects of ions cyclic amp and colchicine	Control of Dapos release; pancreatic amylase in vitro effects of the cyclic ampoules and colchicine.
13	the inner quaternary ammonium ion receptor in potassium channels of the node of ranvier	The inner quaternary ammonium ion receptor in potassium channels at the range node.
13	rhodopsin of the larval mosquito	Rhodopsin of the mosquito larvae.
13	active transport of chloride by the giant neuron of the aplysia abdominal ganglion	Active transport of chloride by the giant neuron of the abdominal ganglion of the apos; aplysia.
13	active transport of potassium by the giant neuron of the aplysia abdominal ganglion	The active transport of potassium by the giant neuron of the abdominal ganglion of the apos; aplysia.
13	hodgkin huxley axon increased modulation and linearity of response to constant current stimulus	L' huxley hodgkin axon increased modulation and linearity of response to a constant current stimulus.
13	the relation of total body potassium to height weight and age in normal adults	Relationship between total body potassium and height, weight, and age in normal adults.
13	isolation and characterization of myosin from cloned mouse fibroblasts	Isolate and characterize myosin from cloned mouse fibroblasts.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane iv noise from the open close kinetics of k channels	On the theory of ion transport across the iv nerve membrane the noise of open k-channel proximal kinetics.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane v two models for the cole moore k hyperpolarization delay	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane two models for delay d' hyperpolarization cole moore k.
13	glycerol as an enzyme stabilizing agent effects on aldehyde dehydrogenase	Enzyme stabilizing effects of glycerol on apos; aldehyde dehydrogenase.
13	regeneration of cation transport capacity in hela cell membranes after specific blockade by ouabain	Cation-carrying capacity regeneration in helical cell membranes after specific ouabain blockade.
13	laboratory mill for pulverizing and homogenizing nail specimens as an aid to microscopy and culture confirmation of onychomycosis	Laboratory mill to spray and homogenize fingernail samples to help with microscopy and culture confirmation of onychomycosis.
13	relationship between sporulation specific 20s ribonucleic acid and ribosomal ribonucleic acid processing in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Relationships between l' 20s ribonucleic acid specific for sporulation and transformation of l' saccharomyces cerevisiae ribonucleic acid.
13	inducible and constitutive galactosidase formation in cells recovering from protein synthesis inhibition	Inducible and constitutive formation of galactosidase in cells recovering from apos; inhibition of protein synthesis.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane vii cooperativity between channels of a large square lattice	On the theory of ionic transport across the nerve membrane, vii cooperativity between d&apos channels; a large square lattice.
13	effect of several clay minerals and humic acid on the survival of klebsiella aerogenes exposed to ultraviolet irradiation	Effect of several clay minerals and lidos; humic acid on survival of klebsiella aerogenes exposed to ultraviolet radiation.
13	the efflux of calcium from single crab and barnacle muscle fibres	Calcium efflux from crab and barnacle muscle fibers.
13	the voltage dependence of the chloride conductance of frog muscle	Dependence on-to-voltage is dependent on chloride conductance of the existence of a frog muscle.
13	the nature of the renal adaptation to chronic hypocapnia	Nature of the liver; renal adaptation to apos; chronic hypocapnia.
13	on the mechanism of rhabdomyolysis in potassium depletion	The mechanism of rhabdomyolysis in potassium depletion.
13	an effect of extrarenal beta adrenergic stimulation on the release of renin	An effect of d' beta-adrenergic stimulation extra-renal on renin release.
13	the interactions of thiazide diuretics with parathyroid hormone and vitamin d studies in patients with hypoparathyroidism	The interactions of diuretic thiazide with parathyroid hormone and vitamin d studies in patients with hypoparathyroidism.
13	electrolytes and water in the brain and cerebrospinal fluid of the foetal sheep and guinea pig	Electrolytes and lytes; water in the brain and cerebrospinal fluid-spinal fetal sheep and guinea pig.
13	fluorometric determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria with ethidium bromide	Fluorometric determination of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria containing d*apos bromide; ethidium.
13	malignant hyperpyrexia further muscle studies in asymptomatic carriers identified by creatinine phosphokinase screening	Lapses; malignant hyperpyrexia has been the subject of further muscle studies in asymptomatic carriers identified by creatinine phosphokinase testing.
13	the effects of tetanus toxin on neuromuscular transmission and on the morphology of motor end plates in slow and fast skeletal muscle of the mouse	The effects of tetanus toxin on neuromuscular transmission and motor morphology of slow and fast skeletal muscle of the mouse.
13	protein kinase and specific phosphate acceptor proteins associated with vaccinia virus cores	Specific protein kinase and phosphate acceptor proteins associated with nuclei of the vaccinia virus.
13	kinetic studies on the regulation of rabbit liver pyruvate kinase	Kinetic studies on regulation of rabbit liver pyruvate kinase.
13	cumulative and persistent effects of nerve terminal depolarization on transmitter release	Cumulative and persistent effects of depolarization of nerve endings on transmitter release.
13	the specific effect of potassium on transmitter release by motor nerve terminals and its inhibition by calcium	L&apos is the specific effect of potassium on transmitter release from motor nerve endings and its inhibition by calcium.
13	the role of calcium in depolarization secretion coupling at the motor nerve terminal	The role of calcium in depolarization secretory coupling at motor nerve terminals.
13	early biochemical consequences of denervation in fast and slow skeletal muscles and their relationship to neural control over muscle differentiation	The early biochemical consequences of denervation in fast and slow skeletal muscle tissue and its relation to the neural control of muscle differentiation.
13	virus associated nucleases location and properties of deoxyribonucleases and ribonucleases in purified frog virus 3	Localization of virus-associated nucleases and properties of the deoxyribonucleases and ribonucleases in purified frog virus 3.
13	double blind trial of carbenoxolone sodium capsules in duodenal ulcer therapy based on endoscopic diagnosis and follow up	Carbenoxolone sodium capsules double-blind test in duodenal ulcer based on endoscopic diagnosis and follow-up.
13	axon schwann cell interaction in the squid nerve fibre	Interaction of axonal schwann cells in squid nerve fiber.
13	initiation of protein synthesis in hela cells	Initiation of protein synthesis in the helical cells.
13	tension in isolated frog muscle fibers induced by hypertonic solutions	Tension in isolated frog muscle fibers was induced by hypertonic solutions.
13	transport of axonal enzymes in surviving segments of frog sciatic nerve	Transport of axonal enzymes into surviving segments of frog sciatic nerve.
13	the proton translocating nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenase of rat liver mitochondria	The proton translocating nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenase from mitochondria of rat liver.
13	adrenocortical steroidogenesis the effects of prostaglandins	Adrenalocortical steroidogenesis, effects of prostaglandins.
13	tracer microinjection study of renal tubular phosphate reabsorption in the rat	Tracer microinjection studies of renal tubular phosphate reabsorption in rats.
13	rapid changes of potassium concentration at the outer surface of exposed single neurons during membrane current flow	Rapid changes in the concentration of potassium at the outer surface of isolated neurons exposed during the flow of the membrane current.
13	conductance change during the inhibitory potential in the guinea pig taenia coli	Change of conductance during inhibitory potential in guinea pig taenia coli.
13	control of moderately raised blood pressure report of a co operative randomized controlled trial	Moderately high blood pressure control d&apos ratio; randomized controlled trial co @-@operatory.
13	the fine structure potassium content and respiratory activity of isolated rat liver parenchymal cells prepared by improved enzymatic techniques	The potassium content of the fine structure and the respiratory activity of isolated rat liver parenchymatous cells were prepared in vitro using improved enzymatic techniques.
13	proton coupled accumulation of galactoside in streptococcus lactis 7962	Proton-coupled galactoside accumulation in Streptococcus lactis 7962.
13	inhibitory and excitatory effects of dopamine on aplysia neurones	Inhibitory and excitatory effects of dopamine on neurons in apos; aplysia.
13	human embryonic kidneys in organ culture abnormalities of development induced by decreased potassium	In organ cultures, human embryonic kidneys exhibit potassium-induced developmental abnormalities.
13	simplified method for producing pyocins from pseudomonas aeruginosa	Simplified method for production of pyocins from Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
13	two malic enzymes in pseudomonas aeruginosa	Two malic enzymes in Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
13	transmission on an active electrical response between fibroblasts l cells in cell culture	Transmission on an active electrical response between l fibroblasts of cell cultured cells.
13	potassium content during growth and sporulation in bacillus subtilis	Potassium during growth and sporulation of bacillus subtilis.
13	changes in kidney medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium deficient rat i	Changes in renal medullary phospholipid metabolism in potassium-deficient rat i.
13	changes in kidney medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium depleted rat ii	Changes in renal medullary phospholipid metabolism in potassium-depleted rats ii.
13	potassium accumulation in smooth muscle and associated ultrastructural changes	L' accumulation of potassium in the smooth muscle and associated ultrastructural changes.
13	actions of the selective inhibitor of cholinesterase tetramonoisopropyl pyrophosphortetramide on the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Action of tetramonoisopropyl pyrophosphortetramide selective cholinesterase inhibitor on rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation.
13	the actions of dehydroemetine on isolated guinea pig atria influence of ouabain and calcium	The actions of dehydroemetine on isolated guinea pig atria influenced etapos; ouabain and calcium.
13	microbial degradation of crude oil factors affecting the dispersion in sea water by mixed and pure cultures	Microbial deterioration of crude oil factors affecting dispersal in seawater by pure and mixed cultures.
13	mobility of potassium ion in frog muscle cells both living and dead	Apos motility; potassium ion in live and dead frog muscle cells.
13	halobacterium cutirubrum ribosomes properties of the ribosomal proteins and ribonucleic acid	Halobacterium cutirubrum ribosomes are properties of ribosomal proteins and l' ribonucleic acid.
13	the effect of oxygen concentration on the growth and metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae grown with excess of potassium or in potassium deficient media	The effect of oxygen concentration on growth and metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae grown in the presence of potassium excess or in low-potassium media.
13	circadian rhythm of plasma aldosterone concentration in patients with primary aldosteronism	Plasma concentration of apos; aldosterone in patients with apos; primary aldosterone.
13	studies on the tachyphylaxis to nicotinic stimulant drugs in the perfused hypogastric ganglion of the guinea pig	Studies of nicotinic stimulant tachyphylaxis in the perfused guinea pig hypogastric ganglion.
13	relaxation spectra of potassium channel noise from squid axon membranes	Squid axonal membrane potassium channel noise relaxation spectrum.
13	a micropuncture study of potassium excretion by the remnant kidney	Micropuncture study of the intestine; potassium excretion by the remaining kidney.
13	cation reversal of inhibition of growth by valinomycin in streptococcus pyogenes and clostridium sporogenes	Cationic reversal of vascular cells; growth inhibition by valinomycin in streptococcus pyogenes and clostridium sporogenes.
13	localization of transport adenosine triphosphatase in rat cornea	Localization of the transport of l' adenosine triphosphatase in the rat cornea.
13	renal bicarbonate wasting during phosphate depletion a possible cause of altered acid base homeostasis in hyperparathyroidism	Loss of renal bicarbonate during phosphate depletion is a possible cause of phosphate depletion; alteration of the apos; acid base homeostasis in the apos; hyperparathyroidism.
13	biogenesis of mitochondria the effects of altered membrane lipid composition on cation transport by mitochondria of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Mitochondrial biogenesis, effects of d' modification of membrane lipid composition on cation transport by saccharomyces cerevisiae mitochondria.
13	scanning transmission electron microscope studies of deep frozen unfixed muscle correlated with spatial localization of intracellular elements by fluorescent x ray analysis	Scanning electron microscopy studies of deep-frozen unattached muscle correlated with the spatial localization of intracellular elements by etapos; fluorescent X-ray analysis.
13	growth requirements of pathogenic leptospira	Growth needs of pathogenic leptospira.
13	direct effects of salicylate on renal function in the dog	Direct effects of salicylate on dog renal function.
13	properties and mechanism of action of creatine kinase from ox smooth muscle anion effects compared with pyruvate kinase	The anionic effects of bovine smooth muscle on the properties and mechanism of creatine kinase action are similar to pyruvate kinase.
13	extracellular acidosis protects ehrlich ascites tumor cells and rat renal cortex against anoxic injury	The extracellular acidosis protects the ehrlich ascites tumor cells and the rat renal cortex from anoxic lesions.
13	some effects of histamine in the depolarized rat uterus	Some effects of histamine in depolarized rat uterus.
13	effects of an isolated toxin from australian tiger snake notechis scutatus scutatus venom at the mammalian neuromuscular junction	Effects of apos; a toxin isolated from the venom of Australian tiger snake notechisatus scutatus at the mammalian neuromuscular junction.
13	red face and reduced plasma volume	Red face and reduced plasma volume.
13	membrane currents carried by ca sr and ba in barnacle muscle fiber during voltage clamp	Membrane currents transported by ca sr and ba in goose muscle fibers during voltage clamping.
13	improved kcn medium	Improvement of the kcn medium.
13	primer requirement and template specificity of a dna polymerase of chick embryo	Required data; model primers and specificity for potato DNA polymerase; chick embryo.
13	the sensitivity of helix aspersa neurones to injected calcium ions	Aspersa neuronal responsiveness of the propeller to injected calcium ions.
13	ionic basis of hyperpolarizing receptor potential in scallop eye increase in permeability to potassium ions	The ionic basis of the potential d' hyperpolarization of receptors in the scallop eye increases potassium ion permeability.
13	mechanical and electrical oscillations in cardiac muscle of the turtle	Mechanical and electrical oscillations in the turtle's cardiac muscle.
13	k permeability of nitella clavata in the depolarized state	Permeability of nitella clavata to depolarized state.
13	disruptive action of potassium phosphotungstate on phit the temperate bacteriophage of bacillus megaterium 899a	Potassium phosphotungstate disruptive activity on the temperate bacteriophage phit of the bacillus megaterium 899a.
13	a calcium ionophore simulating the action of epinephrine on the alpha adrenergic receptor	A calcium ionophore that simulates the action of epinephrine on the alpha-adrenergic receptor.
13	phosphate induced protein chromatography	Protein chromatography induced by phosphate.
13	nodal gap substance in diabetic nerve	Substance of the nodal gap in the diabetic nerve.
13	attenuated vasodilator responses to k in essential hypertensive men	Mitigated vasodilator responses to k in essential hypertensive men.
13	differential effects of glycerol treatment on membrane capacity and excitation contraction coupling in toad sartorius fibres	Differential effects of glycerol treatment on membrane capacity and contraction coupling; excitation in sartorius fibers of toad.
13	speed of repolarization and morphology of glygerol treated frog muscle fibres	Rapid repolarization and morphology of glygerol-treated frog muscle fibers.
13	effects of manganese on the electrical and mechanical properties of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Effects of manganese treatment on the electrical and mechanical properties of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	prevention of endemic goitre with iodized salt	Prevention of goitre with iodized salt.
13	potassium chloride absorption and excretion	Absorption and excretion of potassium chloride.
13	properties of physarum myosin purified by a potassium iodide procedure	Properties of myosin physarum purified by a phosphate procedure; potassium iodide.
13	nature of the specificity of alcohol coupling to l alanine transport into isolated membrane vesicles of a marine pseudomonad	The nature of the specificity of the alcohol – alanine coupling in the membrane vesicles isolated from d'apos; a marine pseudomonad.
13	specific electron donor energized transport of alpha aminoisobutyric acid and k into intact cells of a marine pseudomonad	A specific electron donor activated the transport of apos, aminoisobutyric acid, and k in the intact cells of apos; a marine pseudomonad.
13	calcium entry in response to maintained depolarization of squid axons	Calcium input in response to the maintenance of depolarization of squid axons.
13	effects of membrane depolarization on light scattering by cerebral cortical slices	Effects of membrane depolarization on light scattering from cerebral cortical slices.
13	kinetic analysis of the delayed outward currents in frog atrium existence of two types of preparation	Kinetic analysis of retarded outward currents in frog atrium of the apos; existence of two types of preparation.
13	light and x ray diffraction studies on chick skeletal muscle under controlled physiological conditions	X-ray and light diffraction studies on the skeletal muscle of chickens under controlled physiological conditions.
13	total body potassium in long term frusemide therapy is potassium supplementation necessary	Total body potassium in long-term frusemide treatment is a necessary supplement of potassium.
13	the effect of bathing solution tonicity on resting tension in frog muscle fibers	L' effect of tonicity of bath solution on resting tension in frog muscle fibers.
13	control of membrane n permeability in a hyperpolarizing photoreceptor similar effect of light and metabolic inhibitors	Control of n-membrane permeability in hyperpolarizing photoreceptor, similar effect of light and metabolic inhibitors.
13	non transmitting neuromuscular junctions during an early stage of end plate reinnervation	Non-emitting neuromuscular junctions at the beginning of the end-plate reinnervation process.
13	on the repetitive discharge in myotonic muscle fibres	Repetitive discharge in myotonic muscle fibers.
13	noncovalent modification of deoxyhemoglobin s solubility and erythrocyte sickling	Non-covalent modification of the solubility of deoxyhemoglobin and apos; draft erythrocytes.
13	laxative induced diarrhoea a continuing clinical problem	Laxative-induced diarrhea is a persistent clinical problem.
13	effect of calcitonin on the formation composition and enzymatic activity of the hepatic bile in guinea pgs	Effect of calcitonin on composition and liver enzymes; hepatic bile enzyme activity in guinea pgs.
13	protein synthesis in bacillus subtilis differential effect of potassium ions on in vitro peptide chain initiation and elongation	Protein synthesis in subtilis bacillus, differential effect of potassium ions on apos; initiation and apos; peptide chain elongation in vitro.
13	enhancement by carbachol of transmitter release from motor nerve terminals	Carbachol increases transmitter release from the motor nerve terminals.
13	influence of external potassium on the synthesis and deposition of matrix components by chondrocytes in vitro	L' influence of external potassium on synthesis and deposition of matrix components by chondrocytes in vitro.
13	structure activity relations for caffeine a comparative study of the inotropic effects of the methylxanthines imidazoles and related compounds on the frog s heart	A comparative study of the inotropic effects of imidazole methylxanthines and related compounds on frog heart was carried out.
13	analysis of hyperpolarizations induced by glutamate and acetylcholine on onchidium neurones	Analysis of glutamate and l' acetylcholine induced hyperpolarizations on on onchid neurons.
13	calcium influxes and tension development in perfused single barnacle muscle fibres under membrane potential control	Calcium influx and tension development in d&apos muscle fibers; a single membrane-potential perfused ring.
13	the effect of glucagon on the liver cell membrane potential	L' effect of glucagon on liver cell membrane potential.
13	inhibition of carbonic anhydrase by parathyroid hormone and cyclic amp in rat renal cortex in vitro	Lapos; inhibition of apos; carbonic anhydrase by apos; parathyroid hormone and apos; cyclic ampoule in rat renal cortex in vitro.
13	potassium and amino acid transport in human leukocytes exposed to phagocytic stimuli	The transport of amino acids and potassium in human leukocytes exposed to phagocytic stimuli.
13	potassium flux and leaf movement in samanea saman i rhythmic movement	Flux of potassium and leaf movement in samanea saman i rhythmic movement.
13	diuretic induced hypokalemia	Well, the diuretic induced hypokalemia.
13	twitch potentiation by potassium contractures in single muscle fibres of the frog	The potentiation of potassium contractions in single frog muscle fibers.
13	direct effect of prostaglandins in renal function and renin release in the presence of renal ischemia in the dog	Direct effect of prostaglandins on renal function and renin release in the presence of apos; renal ischemia in dogs.
13	the effects of certain anaesthetic and anti convulsant drugs on the csf potassium fluxes of the dog	The effects of some anesthetics and anti-convulsants on csf potassium fluxes in dogs.
13	energy coupling in the uptake of hexose phosphates by escherichia coli	"Toxicol, J., ""Energy Coupling in the uptake of hexose phosphates by escherichia coli."""
13	influence of glutaraldehyde and or osmium tetroxide on cell volume ion content mechanical stability and membrane permeability of ehrlich ascites tumor cells	Glutaraldehyde and/or tetroxide d&apos influence osmium on mechanical stability of ionic cell volume and membrane permeability of ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
13	a bone calcium index based on partial body calcium measurements by in vivo activation analysis	Bone calcium index based on partial measurements of body calcium levels by in vivo activation.
13	tyrosine hydroxylase activation by nerve stimulation	L' activation of tyrosine hydroxylase by nerve stimulation.
13	paired moving charges in mitochondrial energy coupling	The coupled mobile charges in mitochondrial energy coupling.
13	antibiotics as probes of ribosome structure binding of chloramphenicol and erythromycin to polyribosomes effect of other antibiotics	Antibiotics as probes for binding the ribosomal structure of chloramphenicol and l' erythromycin to polyribosomes as probes; other antibiotics.
13	differences in action potentials and accommodation of sensory and motor myelinated nerve fibres as computed on the basis of voltage clamp data	Differences in the potentials of action and apo; adaptation of sensory and motorized myelinated nerve fibers, calculated on the basis of the voltage-clamping data.
13	energy provision tissue utilization and weight loss in prolonged starvation	Food intake; energy from food; tissue utilization and weight loss during pregnancy; prolonged deprivation of food.
13	restoration of potassium stimulated respiration of glycerol treated muscle	Potassium recovery stimulated respiration in the glycerol-treated muscle.
13	the action of amantadine on the rat uterus its interaction with oxytocin and the effects of several ionic modifications of the medium	L' the action of amantadine on the rat uterus, its interaction with apos; and oxytocin, and the effects of several ionic changes in the rat uterus.
13	effect of different doses of chlorthalidone on blood pressure serum potassium and serum urate	Effect of different doses of chlorthalidone on blood pressure, serum potassium, and serum urate.
13	ionic excitation of a clone of mouse neuroblastoma	Ion excitation of etapos; clone of mouse neuroblastoma.
13	pointers to possible malnutrition in the elderly at home	Some clues about the possibility of poor nutrition among the elderly at home.
13	carbamylation of alkaline mesentericopeptidas	Carbamylation of alkaline mesentericopeptidas.
13	renal response to secretin	Renal response to secretin.
13	collaborative study of a semiautomated method for the analysis of acenocoumarol phenprocoumon and potassium warfarin tablets	Collaborative study by d' semi-automated method for analysis of apos tablets; phenoprocoumon acenocoumarol and potassium warfarin.
13	cardiac arrest due to oral potassium administration	Cardiac arrest due to oral administration of potassium.
13	pathogenesis of hypertension in cushing s syndrome	Pathogenesis of the apos; hypertension in cushing syndrome.
13	glycogen its chemistry and morphological appearance in the electron microscope 11 the complex formed in the selective contrast staining of glycogen	The glycogen contrast selective staining complex, chemical composition, and morphological appearance by electron microscopy, 11 is the result of selective staining of glycogen.
13	identical behavior of the two active sites of myosin with respect to trinitrophenylation	The identical behaviour of the two active myosin sites with respect to trinitrophenylation.
13	effect of osmolarity on intracellular ph of rat diaphragm muscle 22	Effect of apos; osmolarity on the intracellular phage of rat diaphragm 22.
13	potassium translocation in yeast mitochondria and its relationship to ergostrol biosynthesis	Translocation of potassium into yeast mitochondria and its relationship to l' ergostrol biosynthesis.
13	endogenous messenger ribonucleic acid directed polypeptide chain elongation in a cell free system from the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	An endogenous messenger, l' ribonucleic acid, directed the apos; polypeptide chain elongation in a cell-free system of saccharomyces cerevisiae yeast.
13	laser induced spreading arrest of mytilus gill cilia	The laser caused the apos; progressive arrest of the gill cilia of the mytilus.
13	synthesis of superhelical simian virus 40 deoxyribonucleic acid in cell lysates	Synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid of simian superhelical virus 40 in cell lysates.
13	release of growth hormone from ox pituitary slices after pronase treatment	Apos release; slice growth hormone; pituitary after pronase treatment.
13	enhanced phosphatidylinositol labelling in rat parotid fragments exposed to alpha adrenergic stimulation	Increased phosphatidylinositol labeling in the parotid fragments of rats exposed to alpha-adrenergic stimulation.
13	effect of potassium depletion in normal males an apollo 15 simulation	The effect of potassium depletion on normal male rats is not known.
13	seasonal and nutritional effects on serum proteins and urea concentration in the reindeer rangifer tarandus tarandus l	Seasonal and nutritional effects on serum protein and urea levels in reindeer rangifer tarandus tarandus l.
13	ion effects on protein nucleic acid interactions the disassembly of the 50 s ribosomal subunit from the halophilic bacterium halobacterium cutirubrum	Ion effects on protein nucleic acid interactions: disassembly of halophilic halobacterium cutirubrum 50 s sub-unit ribosomal 50 s disassembly.
13	release of corticotrophin releasing factor and other hypophysiotropic substances from isolated nerve endings synaptosomes	Release of the corticotropin-releasing factor and d' other hypophysiotropic substances from isolated synaptosome nerve terminals.
13	microbial oxidation of amines partial purification of a trimethylamine mono oxygenase from pseudomonas aminovorans and its role in growth on trimethylamine	Microbial oxidation of amines, partial purification of apos; trimethylamine monooxygenase from pseudomonas aminovorans and its role in trimethylamine growth.
13	polyene sensitivity during germination of conidia of aspergillus fumigatus	Sensitivity to polyene during germination of d' aspergillus fumigatus conidia.
13	comparative enzymology of the adenosine triphosphate sulphurylases from leaf tissue of selenium accumulator and non accumulator plants	Comparison of apo; adenosine triphosphate sulfurylase enzyme enzyme from leaf tissue of plants accumulating and non-accumulating selenium.
13	product inhibition studies on bovine liver carbamoyl phosphate synthetase	Bovine hepatic carbamoyl phosphate synthetase inhibition.
13	nicotine induced relaxation in isolated canine cerebral arteries	Nicotine induced relaxation in isolated canine cerebral arteries.
13	excitation and contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle	L' excitation and contraction of bovine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	voltage current relationship of a carbachol induced potassium ion pathway in aplysia neurones	The voltage current relationship of carbachol-induced potassium ion channel in neurons of the apothecium.
13	genetic studies on the mechanism of action of aldosterone in mice	Genetic studies of the mechanism of the action of aldosterone in mice.
13	mechanical responses to linearly rising currents in the red and white muscles of the silver carp	Mechanical responses to linear updraft in red and white muscle of silver carp.
13	cloacal resorption of salt and water in the galah cacatua roseicapilla	Cloacal resorption of salt and lidos; water in the galah cacatua roseicapilla.
13	pancreatic secretion of patients with chronic renal insufficiency author s transl	Translation of pancreatic secretion in patients with apo placentae; chronic renal insufficiency, translations.
13	increase in pituitary adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate content and potentiation of growth hormone release from heifer anterior pituitary slices incubated in the presence of 3 isobutyl 1 methylxanthine	Increased cyclic monophosphate content of l' pituitary adenosine 3-5 and potentiation of l&apos release; d&apos slice growth hormone; heifer pituitary in the presence of 3 isobutyl 1 methylxanthine.
13	the effects of potassium 5 hydrocytryptamine adrenocorticotrophin and angiotensin ii on the concentration of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in suspensions of dispersed rat adrenal zona glomerulosa and zona fasciculata cells	The effects of potassium hydrocytryptamine 5, adrenocorticotropin and l' angiotensin ii on the concentration of apos; cyclic adenosine 3, monophosphate, in dispersed cell suspensions of the adrenal glomerular zone and the rat fascicular zone.
13	sucrose in oral therapy for cholera and related diarrhoeas	Sucrose in the oral therapy for cholera and related diarrhoea.
13	antivenom in sea snake bit poisoning	L' antivenom in the sea serpent has bitten the apos; poisoning.
13	the role of calcium and cyclic nucleotides in alpha amylase release from slices of rat parotid studies with the divalent cation ionophore a 23187	The role of calcium and cyclic nucleotides in alpha amylase release from rat slices with the divalent ionophore cation.
13	possible role of laxatives in analgesic nephropathy	Possible role of laxatives in analgesic nephropathy.
13	effects of epinephrine on the pacemaker potassium current of cardiac purkinje fibers	Effects of apos; epinephrine on potassium current of cardiac pacemaker of cardiac purkin fibers.
13	on the presence of a msh release inhibiting system in the rat neurointermediate lobe	On the presence of apos; an inhibitory system of msh release in the neuro lobe-rat intermediate.
13	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the regulation of plasma potassium in chronic renal disease	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in regulating plasma potassium in chronic renal disease.
13	changes in some plasma parameters in the course of dextran 40	Change of certain plasma parameters during dextran treatment: 40.
13	genetics of chemical induction of conjugation in paramecium aurella	The genetics of l' chemical induction of conjugation in paramecium aurella.
13	integrative recombination of bacteriophage lambda dna in vitro	Integrative recombination of apos; lambda bacteriophage DNA in vitro.
13	electroimpulse therapy of auricular fibrillation	Electro treatment-atrial fibrillation impulses.
13	cardiac sensitivity to hyperkalemia in adrenalectomized dogs	"""Heart sensitivity to hyperkalemia in adrenalectomized dogs,"" Adrenalectomized Dog, Vol."
13	donnan potential of rabbit skeletal muscle myofibrils i electrofluorochromometric detection of potential	Potential for rabbit skeletal muscle myofibrils i electrofluorochromometric potential detection.
13	role of vasoactive substances in active hyperemia in skeletal muscle 38520	The role of vasoactive substances in the development of active skeletal muscle hyperemia.
13	kaluresis and cardiac sensitivity to hyperkalaemia in intact and adrenalectomized rabbits	Kaluresis and cardiac sensitivity to apos; hyperkalemia in intact and adrenalectomized rabbits.
13	pancreatic cholera benefical effects of treatment with streptozotocin	The beneficial effects of streptozotocin treatment on pancreatic cholera.
13	eosinophilic gastroenteritis report of a clinical case	Report of gastro-eosinophilic enteritis d' clinical case.
13	intracellular distribution of free potassium in chironomus salivary glands	Intracellular distribution of free potassium in salivary glands of chironomus.
13	role of adenosine or amp as a probable mediator of blood flow regulation in canine hindlimb muscles	The role of l' adenosine, or d' a bulb as a probable mediator of blood flow regulation in canine hindlimb muscles.
13	dimethyl adipimidate a new antisickling agent	The dimethyl adipimidate is a new anti-sickling agent.
13	mode of action of chronotropic agents in cardiac purkinje fibers does epinephrine act by directly modifying the external surface charge	The mode of action of chronotropic agents in cardiac purkin fibers directly modifies the external surface charge and acts on epinephrine.
13	a survey of asthma mortality in patients between ages 35 and 64 in the greater london hospitals in 1971	Asthma mortality survey of 35-64 year old patients in major London hospitals in 1971.
13	effects of drugs and environmental factors on ciliary movement author s transl	Effects of drugs and environmental factors on translated ciliary movement.
13	ureteroileosigmoidostomy long term results	Long-term results ureterooileosigoidostomy.
13	exchange transfusions with concentrated acd blood ii effects on bilirubin total protein chloride phosphate calcium magnesium and potassium	Exchanges of transfusions with concentrated blood from animals; effects on bilirubin chloride total protein calcium phosphate magnesium and potassium.
13	structural and functional asymmetries of myelinated branches in the frog muscle spindle	Structural and functional asymmetries of myelinated branches in the muscular spindle of frogs.
13	induction of a myogenic response in tonic airway smooth muscle by tetraethylammonium	Induction of apos; a myogenic response in airway tonic smooth muscle by tetraethylammonium.
13	the force velocity relation in phasic contractions of venous smooth muscle	Force relationship-velocity in phasic contractions of the venous smooth muscle.
13	isometric and isotonic relaxation in venous smooth muscle	Isometric and isotonic relaxation in smooth muscle venous.
13	association of basal atpase activity and cholesterol with a distinct group of rabbit skeletal muscle microsomal particles	Association of l' basal atpase and cholesterol activity with a distinct group of rabbit skeletal muscle microsomal particles.
13	interaction of o2 and co2 in sustained exercise hyperemia of canine skeletal muscle	Interactions of o2 and co2 in long-term skeletal muscle hyperemia.
13	swelling and loss of potassium in perfused livers following the influence of the vapours of carbon tetrachloride chloroform and halothane on the perfusion medium author s transl	Swelling and loss of potassium in the perfused liver following refluxing; influence of chloroform carbon tetrachloride and d&apos vapours; halothane on the perfusion medium.
13	effects of hypoxia cyanide and ischaemia on myocardial contraction observations in isolated muscle and intact heart	Effects of apo; cyanide and apo hypoxia; ischemia on observations of myocardial contraction in isolated muscle and intact heart.
13	altered ion transport in aortic smooth muscle during deoxycorticosterone acetate hypertension in the rat	Modification of ion transport in the aortic smooth muscle during apos; apos hypertension; deoxycorticosterone acetate in the rat.
13	inotropic effects of different calcium ion concentration on the embryonic chick ventricle comparison of single cultured cells and intact muscle strips	Inotropic effects of different concentrations of calcium ions on the comparison of the ventricles of embryonic chicks from single cultured cells and intact strips of muscle.
13	dual action of chloroquine on frog s skeletal muscle contraction	Double action of chloroquine on contraction of frog skeletal muscle.
13	role of potassium and calcium ions in changes in the membrane potential of secretory cells of the mammary glands	The role of potassium and calcium ions in altering the membrane potential of mammary gland secretory cells.
13	barbiturates and aortic and venous smooth muscle function	Aortic and venous smooth muscle function and barbiturates.
13	the reversibility of skeletal muscle pyruvate kinase and an assessment of its capacity to support glyconeogenesis	Reversibility of skeletal muscle pyruvate kinase and an evaluation of its ability to support glyconeogenesis.
13	acetylcholine contracture of the fast muscle fibers in the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis	The contraction by l' acetylcholine of fast muscle fibers in lamprey lampetra fluviatilis.
13	magnitude and location of surface charges on myxicola giant axons	Extent and location of surface charges on giant axons of myxicola.
13	contractile inactivation in frog single denervated muscle fibers	Contractile inactivation in single muscle fibers denervated from frog.
13	contractile repriming of single muscle fibers inactivation and tubular diffusion	Contractile repair of the apos; inactivation and tubular diffusion of single muscle fibers.
13	evidence for a transient potassium membrane current dependent on calcium influx in crab muscle fibre	Evidence of calcium influx into crab muscle fibers, a transient potassium-dependent membrane current.
13	a comparison of radioactive thallium and potassium fluxes in the giant axon of the squid	A comparison of the radioactive thallium and potassium fluxes in the giant squid axon.
13	correlation between skeletal calcium mass and muscle mass in man	Skeletal calcium mass correlates with muscle mass in men.
13	effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Effect of dantrolene sodium on frog skeletal muscle contraction coupling.
13	total body potassium potassium retention and potassium intake in protein energy malnutrition	Determination of retention and potassium intake in protein energy malnutrition.
13	effect of naphthenic acids on the permeability of ascitic tumor cells to potassium ions	Effect of naphthenic acids on permeability of ascitic tumor cells to potassium ions.
13	interactions of aminopyridines with potassium channels of squid axon membranes	Aminopyridine interactions with potassium channels of squid axonal membranes.
13	dual effects of calcium ions on pacemaker activity in guinea pig taenia coli	Double effect of calcium ions on guinea pig lipids; pacemaker activity in guinea pig taenia coli.
13	modification of potassium current by 4 aminopyridine case of the isolated giant axon of the cockroach periplaneta americana	Modification of the potassium current by 4 cases of the giant axon isolated from the cockroach periplaneta americana.
13	barbiturates block calcium uptake by stimulated and potassium depolarized rat sympathetic ganglia	Barbiturates block calcium uptake by the sympathetic ganglia of potassium depolarized and stimulated rats.
13	initial and delayed membrane currents in crab muscle fibre under voltage clamp conditions	Initial and delayed membrane currents in crab muscle fibers under voltage-clamping conditions.
13	the effect of zinc ions on the gating of the delayed potassium conductance of frog sartorius muscle	L' effect of zinc ions on delayed potassium conductance binding of frog sartorius muscle.
13	ultrastructure of frog muscle fiber thick filaments at rest and during potassium contracture	Ultrastructure of thick filaments of frog muscle fibers at rest and during potassium contracture.
13	ethanol and contraction of venous smooth muscle	L' ethanol and venous smooth muscle contraction.
13	99mtc diphosphonate uptake in skeletal muscle a quantitative index of acute damage	Absorption of diphosphonate 99 mtc from skeletal muscle is a quantitative indicator of acute injury.
13	stimulation of 45ca efflux from smooth muscle cells by metabolic inhibition and high k depolarization	Stimulation of the apo; 45ca efflux of smooth muscle cells by metabolic inhibition and high k-depolarization.
13	stacking of safranine in liposomes during valinomycin induced efflux of potassium ions	Lapses; stacking of safranin into liposomes during valinomycin induced apos; efflux of potassium ions.
13	the effect of biologically active substances acetylcholine histamine and bradykinin on depolarization of taenia coli smooth muscle	The effect of biologically active substances, acetylcholine histamine and bradykinin on taenia coli smooth muscle depolarization.
13	the effects of ammonium inorganic phosphate and potassium ions on the activity of phosphofructokinases from muscle and nervous tissues of vertebrates and invertebrates	Effects of inorganic phosphate, ammonium and potassium ions on muscle and nervous tissue phosphofructokinase activity in vertebrates and invertebrates.
13	voltage dependent potassium fluxes and the significance of action potentials in acetabularia	Voltage-dependent potassium flux and significance of d&apos potentials; action in acetabulars.
13	influence of potassium and calcium ions on the phosphatidylinositol and phosphatidylcholine metabolism in rat fibroblasts after growth stimulation by calf serum	L' influence of potassium and calcium ions on the metabolism of phosphatidylinositol and phosphatidylcholine in rat fibroblasts after calf serum stimulation of growth.
13	effects of cytochalasin b on the electrical activity of frog muscle fibers	Effects of cytochalasin b on apos; electrical activity of frog muscle fibers.
13	the effect of verapamil on potassium fluxes in canine cardiac purkinje fibres	L' effect of verapamil on potassium fluxes in canine cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration i movement of potassium accompanying ions and water	The abnormal relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of the muscle fibers with a decrease in the concentration of intracellular potassium i movement of potassium accompanying the ions and the water.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration ii rate of forward and reverse k42 transport through muscle fiber membranes in saccharose sulfate solutions with potassium concentrations of 2 5 and 75 mm	The abnormal relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of the muscle fibers with a decrease in the concentration of intracellular potassium ii the rate of transport of k42 to and before and after the muscle fiber membranes in solutions of sucrose sulfate with potassium concentrations of 2-5 and 75 mm.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration iii change in the membrane potential during prolonged muscle incubation in saccharose sulfate media containing 2 5 or 75 mm of potassium	The abnormal relationship between the potassium concentration in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibres, with a decrease in the intracellular potassium concentration, iii, changes the membrane potential during apos; prolonged muscle incubation in a sucrose sulfate medium containing 25 or 75 mm of potassium.
13	separation of two voltage sensitive potassium currents and demonstration of a tetrodotoxin resistant calcium current in frog motoneurones	Separation of two voltage-sensitive potassium currents and demonstration of tetrodotoxin-resistant calcium current in frog motoneurons.
13	potassium activation in helix aspersa neurones under voltage clamp a component mediated by calcium influx	Potassium activation in aspersa cell neurons of the apos; voltage helix closes an apos-mediated component; calcium influx.
13	calcium binding of synaptosomes isolated from rat brain cortex iii binding with some divalent heavy metal ions and calcium binding sites	The calcium binding of synaptosomes isolated from the cerebral cortex of rat iii binds to some divalent heavy metal ions and to calcium binding sites.
13	interaction between drugs and potassium rich solutions in producing contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle studies in normal and calcium depleted tissues	Interaction between potassium-rich drugs and solutions to produce contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle studies in normal, calcium-depleted tissues.
13	effects of ph and ionic strength on the potassium system in the internally perfused giant barnacle muscle fibre	Effects of ph and ionic strength on the potassium system of the giant internally perfused bernacular muscle fibers.
13	voltage clamp analysis of transmembrane ionic currents in guinea pig myometrium evidence for an initial potassium activation triggered by calcium influx	L' voltage clamp analysis of transmembrane ion currents in guinea-pig myometrium revealed initial activation of potassium elicited by calcium influx.
13	potassium influx in the frog atrium during the cardiac cycle	Injection of potassium into the frog's atrium during the cardiac cycle.
13	the effect of caffeine on excitation contraction coupling in skeletal and smooth muscle	L' effect of caffeine on contraction coupling; excitation in smooth and skeletal muscle.
13	potassium current and the effect of cesium on this current during anomalous rectification of the egg cell membrane of a starfish	The potassium current and lapos; effect of cesium on this current during it; an abnormal rectification of the membrane of lapos; ovule d'apos; a starfish.
13	role of superficially membrane bound calcium on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	The role of surface membrane bound calcium on contraction coupling d' excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effect of conditioning potential on potassium current kinetics in the frog node	Effect of conditioning potential on the kinetics of potassium current in the frog knot.
13	radiation induced decrease in influx rates of potassium ions into thymocytes in vitro in relation to decreased intracellular adenosine triphosphate concentrations	Radiation induced a decrease in apo levels; potassium ions influx into thymocytes in vitro in relation to a decrease in intracellular concentrations of apos; adenosine triphosphate.
13	reversible inhibition of potassium contractures by optical isomers of verapamil and d 600 on slow muscle fibres of the frog	Reversible inhibition of potassium contractions by the optical isomers of verapamil and d 600 on the slow muscle fibers of frogs.
13	cesium induced rectifications in frog myelinated fibres	Cesium induces correction in frog myelinated fibers.
13	the role of potassium ion in muscle glycogenolysis and glycolysis	Role of potassium ion in muscle glycogenolysis and glycolysis.
13	influence of magnesium on calcium and potassium related responses in vascular smooth muscle	The influence of magnesium on calcium- and potassium-related responses in vascular smooth muscle.
13	depolarization induced calcium release from sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments i release of calcium taken up upon using atp	Depolarization induced calcium release from fragments of sarcoplasmic reticulum i release of absorbed calcium using apos; atp.
13	the effect of caffeine and tetracaine on the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	L' effect of caffeine and tetracaine on apos; temporal evolution of potassium contractions of single muscle fibers.
13	potassium and calcium conductance in slow muscle fibres of the toad	The potassium and calcium conductance in the slow muscle fibers of the toad.
13	adenosine and active hyperemia in dog skeletal muscle	Adenosine and active hyperemia in dog skeletal muscle.
13	an evaluation of the membrane constants and the potassium conductance in metabolically exhausted muscle fibres	An evaluation of membrane constants and potassium conductance in metabolically depleted muscle fibers has been performed.
13	active transport of calcium across the isolated midgut of hyalophora cecropia	Active transport of calcium through the apos; medium intestine isolated from the apos; hyalophora cecropia.
13	effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation contraction coupling of frog toe muscle	Effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation coupling-frog toe contraction.
13	contractile responses to epinephrine serotonin and potassium in arterial smooth muscle	Reproductive responses to epinephrine serotonin and potassium in arterial smooth muscle.
13	aminopyridines and sparteine as inhibitors of membrane potassium conductance effects on myxicola giant axons and the lobster neuromuscular junction	aminopyridines and sparteine inhibit the effects of membrane potassium conductance on myxicola giant axons and lobster neuromuscular junction.
13	influence of changes in external potassium and chloride ions on membrane potential and intracellular potassium ion activity in rabbit ventricular muscle	L' influences changes in external potassium and chloride ions on membrane potential and l' l&apos activity; intracellular potassium ion in rabbit ventricular muscle.
13	effect of calcium ions on potential dependent potassium channels in the membrane of the soma of giant mollusc neurons	Effect of calcium ions on potential potassium-dependent channels within the soma membrane of giant molluscan neurons.
13	physostigmine induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	Physostigmine elicited contractions in frog skeletal muscle.
13	voltage current relationships in skeletal muscles of rats	Relationships between tension currents in rat skeletal muscles.
13	myosin and actomyosin from human skeletal muscle	I mean, myosin and actomyosin from human skeletal muscle.
13	pulsed nuclear magnetic resonance study of 39k in frog striated muscle	Study of 39k pulsed nuclear magnetic resonance in frog striated muscle.
13	electrochemical profile of k and cl ions across the proximal tubule of bullfrog kidneys a study using double barreled ion sensitive microelectrodes	Electrochemical profile of k and cl ions in bullfrog kidney proximal tube using two-barrel ion-selective microelectrodes.
13	hepatic drug metabolism in iron magnesium and potassium deficient rats	"""Hepatic drug metabolism in iron magnesium and potassium deficiency rats,"" J. Toxicol."
13	calcium and the contractile response to prostaglandin in the smooth muscle of guinea pig stomach	Calcium and contractile response to prostaglandins in smooth muscle of guinea pig stomach.
13	a comparison of effects of skf 525 a and procaine on excitation contraction coupling in single crayfish muscle fibers	Comparison of the effects of skf 525 a and procaine on coupling of contraction; excitation in single muscle fibers; crayfish.
13	depolarization induced phosphorylation of specific proteins mediated by calcium ion influx in rat brain synaptosomes	Depolarization induced phosphorylation of specific rat calcium ion influx-mediated proteins in cerebral synaptosomes.
13	characteristics of response of isolated smooth muscle cells to cholinergic drugs	Characteristics of the response of isolated smooth muscle cells to cholinergic drugs.
13	effects of intracellular ph on plateau formation following the action potential of squid giant axons	Effects of the intracellular phantom on platelet formation according to the potential of apos; action of the giant axons of the squid.
13	release of proteins from the inner surface of squid axon membrane labeled with tritiated n ethylmaleimide	Release of proteins from the inner surface of the axonal membrane of tritiated nethyl maleimide-labeled squid.
13	potassium current kinetics in myxicola axons effects of conditioning prepulses	Kinetics of potassium current in myxicola axons effects of pre-impulse pre-impulse conditioning.
13	dynamics of aminopyridine block of potassium channels in squid axon membrane	Apos; aminopyridine dynamics blocks potassium channels in the axonal membrane of squid.
13	investigation of the relationship between cell surface calcium ion gating and phosphatidylinositol turnover by comparison of the effects of elevated extracellular potassium ion concentration on ileium smooth muscle and pancreas	L' study of the relationship between calcium ion binding to cell surface and phosphatidylinositol turnover was carried out by comparing the effects of d' high concentration of extracellular potassium ion on smooth muscle and the pancreas of ileum.
13	the effect of extracellular potassium on the intracellular potassium ion activity and transmembrane potentials of beating canine cardiac purkinje fibers	L' effect of extracellular potassium on apo; apo activity; intracellular potassium ion and transmembrane potentials of canine cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	control of the delayed outward potassium currents in bursting pace maker neurones of the snail helix pomatia	Control of delayed outward potassium currents in the slow pacemaker neurons of the pomatia snail helix.
13	extracellular potassium and trasmitter release at the giant synapse of squid	Release of extracellular potassium and trasmitter at giant squid synapse.
13	diazepam blockade of repetitive action potentials in skeletal muscle fibres a model of its membrane action	Diazepam blockade of the d&apos potentials; repetitive action in skeletal muscle fibers is a model of its membrane action.
13	depletion and accumulation of potassium in the extracellular clefts of cardiac purkinje fibers during voltage clamp hyperpolarization and depolarization	Depletion and leakage; accumulation of potassium in the extracellular cleft of cardiac purkin fibers during leakage; hyperpolarization and voltage depolarization.
13	differential effects of tetracaine on delayed potassium channels and displacement currents in frog skeletal muscle	Differential effects of tetracaine on delayed potassium channels and displacement currents in the frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of internal and external 4 aminopyridine on the potassium currents in intracellularly perfused squid giant axons	L' effect of inner and outer 4 aminopyridine on potassium currents in intracellularly perfused giant squid axons.
13	continuous direct measurement of intracellular chloride and ph in frog skeletal muscle	Continuous direct measurement of intracellular chloride and ph in skeletal muscle of frogs.
13	effects of certain cations on the formation and infectivity of phytophthora zoospores 1 effects of calcium magnesium potassium and iron ions	Effect of certain cations on the formation and infectivity of zoospores; effects of potassium calcium magnesium and iron ions.
13	influence of calcium and potassium ions on the parasympathetic stimulation secretory response of the isolated and perfused submandibular gland author s transl	Influence of calcium and potassium ions on the secretory response of parasympathetic stimulation of translocation of l&apos, an isolated perfused gland under-mandibular.
13	studies on normal human skeletal muscle in relation to the pathopharmacology of malignant hyperpyrexia	Study of normal human skeletal muscle in relation to pathopharmacology of malignant hyperpyrexia.
13	calcium requirement for activation of intact aortic smooth muscle	Calcium required for intact aortic smooth muscle activation.
13	the facilitatory actions of aminopyridines and tetraethylammonium on neuromuscular transmission and muscle contractility in avian muscle	The facilitative actions of aminopyridines and tetraethylammonium on neuromuscular transmission and muscle contractility in avian muscle.
13	calcium modulation in brain extracellular microenvironment demonstrated with ion selective micropipette	Calcium modulation in the cerebral extracellular microenvironment has been demonstrated with selective ionic micropipette.
13	activation of gastro intestinal smooth muscle induced by the calcium ionophore a23187	Gastro-intestinal smooth muscle activation induced by apos; calcium ionophore a23187.
13	cardiac purkinje fibres ca2 i controls the potassium permeability via the conductance components gk1 and gk2	Cardiac purkinje fibers control potassium permeability via the gk1 and gk2 conductance components intermediate.
13	model of the effect of 4 aminopyridine at the level of potassium channels of the giant axon of the squid logigo forbesi l	Apos model; effect of 4 aminopyridine at the apos potassium channel level; giant squid axon logigo forbesi l.
13	internal calcium concentration and potassium permeability in paramecium	Internal calcium concentration and permeability to potassium permeability in paramecium.
13	influence of muscle length on the force velocity relation of k contractures in smooth muscle from rabbit urinary bladder	L' influence of muscle length on the relationship between force velocity and muscle contractions k in rabbit bladder smooth muscle.
13	effects of strychnine on the potassium conductance of the frog node of ranvier	Effects of strychnine on the potassium conductance of range frog nodes.
13	delayed rectification in the transverse tubules origin of the late after potential in frog skeletal muscle	Delayed correction in the apos; transverse tubular origin of late potential in frog skeletal muscle.
13	lanthanum block of contraction and of relaxation in response to serotonin and dopamine in molluscan catch muscle	Lanthanum-induced contraction and relaxation block in response to serotonin and dopamine in shellfish harvesting muscle.
13	oscillation of membrane potential in l cells iii k current voltage curves	Membrane potential oscillation in l iii k current voltage curves.
13	inhibitory action of dantrolene sodium on the activation of excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Inhibitor action of dantrolene sodium on the apos; activation of d&apos contracture coupling activity; excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	k localization in muscle cells by autoradiography and identification of k adsorbing sites in living muscle cells with uranium binding sites in electron micrographs of fixed cell preparations	Localization of k in muscle cells by autoradiography and identification of d&apos sites; adsorption of k in living muscle cells with l&apos binding sites; uranium in electron micrographs of fixed cell preparations.
13	voltage sensitive potassium channels in limulus ventral photoreceptors	Voltage-sensitive potassium channels in ventral photoreceptors of the limulus.
13	permeability and phase boundary potentials determined from conductance in a transmitter activated potassium channel in aplysia californica in the absence of a constant field	Permeability and potentials at phase boundaries determined from conductance in a transmitter-activated potassium channel in apos; apos California aplysia; absence of apos; constant field.
13	prenylamine induced contracture of frog skeletal muscle	Prenylamine caused the frog skeletal muscle to contracture.
13	effect of tetraethylammonium on electrophysiologic properties of pulmonary artery smooth muscle cells	Effect of tetraethylammonium on electrophysiological properties of smooth muscle cells in the lung artery.
13	effects of caffeine and procaine on the membrane and mechanical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the rabbit main pulmonary artery	Effects of caffeine and procaine on the membrane and mechanical properties of rabbit main pulmonary artery smooth muscle cells.
13	experimental investigations on the contraction induced by lead in arterial smooth muscle	Experimental lead-induced contraction studies in arterial smooth muscle were performed.
13	the potassium metabolism of typical northern algerian soils i global evaluation of the potassium supply of soils	The metabolism of potassium of typical soils in the north of the country; Algeria i overall evaluation of the plants; supply of potassium of the soils.
13	solid state physical replacement of hodgkin huxley theory phase transformation kinetics of axonal potassium conductance	Physical replacement at the apos; solid state of the phase transformation kinetics of the hodgkin huxley theory of axonal potassium conductance.
13	a calcium dependent inward current in frog skeletal muscle fibres	A calcium-dependent, inward current in frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	effect of low concentration potassium ion solution on the frog neuromuscular synapse	Effect of low-concentration potassium ion solution on frog neuromuscular synapse.
13	comparative evaluation of the in vitro effects of hydralazine and hydralazine acetonide on arterial smooth muscle	Comparative evaluation of the in vitro effects of apos; hydralazine and apos; d*apos acetonide; hydralazine on arterial smooth muscle.
13	collecting duct hydrogen ion secretion in the rabbit role of potassium	Collect the secretion of sodium hydroxide; hydrogen ions from the canal in the role of potassium rabbit.
13	desensitization onset and recovery at the potassium depolarized frog neuromuscular junction are voltage sensitive	Tension is sensitive to early desensitization and recovery at the depolarized frog neuromuscular junction.
13	blocking of the squid axon potassium channel by external caesium ions	Blocking of the apos potassium canal; squid axon by external cesium ions.
13	inhibition by hypertonic solutions of ca dependent electrogenesis in single crab muscle fibers	L' inhibition by hypertonic solutions in single muscle fibers of crab; electrogenesis ca @-@.
13	calcium and the control of potassium efflux in the sublingual gland	Calcium and control of potassium efflux into sublingual gland.
13	species differences in sodium potassium adenosine triphosphatase activity in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig and rat vas deferens	Specific differences in vas deferens; adenosine triphosphatase; sodium adenosine triphosphatase activity in guinea pig and rat vas deferens.
13	a potassium conductance activated by hyperpolarization in paramecium	Potassic conductance activated by paramecial hyperpolarization.
13	influences of extracellular calcium and potassium concentrations on adrenaline release and membrane potential in the perfused adrenal medulla of the rat	Influences of extracellular calcium and potassium concentrations on adrenalin release and membrane potential in the rat adrenal medulla.
13	ion selective electrode studies on the effects of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the intracellular level of potassium in an insect salivary gland	Electrodes selective to the ions on the effects of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the intracellular potassium level in the salivary gland of one insect.
13	the compensation of potential changes produced by trivalent erbium ion in squid giant axon with applied potentials	The compensation of potential changes produced by the trivalent erbium ion in the giant squid axon with applied potentials.
13	effects of diltiazem and lanthanum ion on the potassium contracture of isolated guinea pig smooth muscle	Effects of diltiazem and lapos; lanthanum ion on the potassium contraction of guinea pig isolated smooth muscle.
13	selective inhibition of the tonic component of portal vein smooth muscle cell potassium contracture by verapamil	Selective inhibition of the tonic component of potassium contraction of portal smooth muscle cells by verapamil.
13	3 4 diaminopyridine a potent new potassium channel blocker	The diaminopyridine 3-4 is a powerful new potassium channel blocker.
13	the toxicity of thallium i to cardiac and skeletal muscle	The toxicity of thallium i to heart and skeletal muscle.
13	potassium activation associated with intraneuronal free calcium	Potassium activation associated with free calcium intraneuronal.
13	contraction of detergent treated smooth muscle	Contraction of the smooth muscle, treated with detergent.
13	relaxation of the ach induced potassium current in the rabbit sinoatrial node cell	Relaxation of the apos; ach induced a potassium current in the rabbit atrial node cell.
13	inward rectification in skeletal muscle a blocking particle model	Internal rectifying in the skeletal muscle of d' a model of blocking particles.
13	response of delayed k channels to the time dependent clamping functions in squid giant axon ii descending ramps hyperbolae and exponentials	The response of delayed k channels to time-dependent clamping functions in the giant squid axon ii exponential and hyperbolae descending ramps.
13	membrane currents in a calcium type muscle membrane under voltage clamp	Membrane currents in a calcium-like muscle membrane under tension clamp.
13	protein release from the internal surface of the squid giant axon membrane during excitation and potassium depolarization	Release of proteins from the inner surface of the giant axonal membrane of squid during excitation and potassium depolarization.
13	reactivation of membrane charge movement and delayed potassium conductance in skeletal muscle fibres	Membrane charge movement reactivation and delayed potassium conductance in skeletal muscle fibers.
13	cs causes a voltage dependent block of inward k currents in resting skeletal muscle fibres	It causes voltage-dependent blockade of inward k currents in resting skeletal muscle fibers.
13	change in nuclear potassium electrochemical activity and puffing of potassium sensitive salivary chromosome regions during chironomus development	Changes in apos; electrochemical activity of nuclear potassium and swelling of potassium-sensitive salivary chromosome regions during chironomus development.
13	modified k channel gating by exhaustion and the block by internally applied tea and 4 aminopyridine in muscle	Gating of the k channel modified by exhaustion and blockade by internal application of tea and 4 aminopyridine in the muscle.
13	the properties of the extraocular muscles of the frog iii morphological mechanical and pharmacological properties of the isolated retractor bulbi muscle	The properties of frog extracellular muscle tissue iii morphological, mechanical, and pharmacological properties of the isolated retractor bulb.
13	the interactions of protons calcium and potassium ions on cardiac purkinje fibres	Proton interactions, calcium and potassium ions, on cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	the effect of acid base changes on skeletal muscle twitch tension	L' effect of acidic base changes on twitch tension of skeletal muscle was investigated.
13	potassium contracture of smooth muscle in the presence of dextran	Potassium contracture of the smooth muscle in the presence of dextran.
13	influence of prostaglandins e1 and f1alpha on k induced responses in vascular smooth muscle	L' influence of prostaglandins e1 and f1alpha on k induced responses in the vascular smooth muscle.
13	metabolic correlates of fatigue and of recovery from fatigue in single frog muscle fibers	Metabolic correlates of fatigue and recovery from fatigue in muscle fibers from a single frog muscle.
13	separation of potassium and calcium channels in the nerve cell soma membrane	Separation of the potassium and calcium channels in the membrane of the soma from nerve cells.
13	inhibitory action of hypertonic urea solution on the potassium contracture of the heart ventricular muscle	Inhibitor action of apos; hypertonic urea solution on cardiac ventricular muscle potassium contraction.
13	glutamate secretion and nad p h levels during calcium dependent depolarization of slices of the dentate gyrus	Glutamate secretion and nad p-h levels during calcium-dependent depolarization of the serrated gyrus slices.
13	increased sensitivity of frog skeletal muscle to procaine in the presence of organic anions	Increased sensitivity of frog skeletal muscle tissue to procaine in the presence of organic anions.
13	transient potassium currents in slow muscle fibers	Transient potassium currents in slow muscle fibers.
13	changes in the contractile properties of tonic muscle fibers following denervation	Changes in the contractile properties of the tonic muscle fibers after denervation.
13	effects of some vasodilators on calcium translocation in intact and fractionated vascular smooth muscle	Effects of Certain Vasodilators on Ca2+ translocation in intact and fractionated vascular smooth muscle.
13	intestinal and renal excretion of phosphorus and calcium in rats receiving potassium metabisulfite tannic acid and ethanol alone or in combination	Intestinal and renal excretion of phosphorus and calcium in rats receiving apos; tetanus metabisulfite and apos; ethanol alone or in combination.
13	the role of membrane electrical activities and extracellular calcium in high k induced contracture of guinea pig ureter	The role of membrane electrical activities and extracellular calcium in high-k induced contraction caused contraction of the guinea pig ureter.
13	dissociation between ion permeability and the lethal action of polyene antibiotics on candida albicans	Dissociation between ionic permeability and lethal action of polyene antibiotics on albicans.
13	relationship between theophylline induced relaxation and excitation contraction coupling in intestinal smooth muscle	The relationship between theophylline induced relaxation and coupling of d&apos contraction; excitation in intestinal smooth muscle.
13	reversible depletion of synaptic vesicles induced by application of high external potassium to the frog neuromuscular junction	Reversible depletion of synaptic vesicles induced by the application of high external potassium at the frog's neuromuscular junction.
13	interrelationship between the striated structure of muscle and the distribution of calcium in it i the changes in the protofibrillary structure of the frog fast muscle fibers in steady potassium contracture	Interrelation between skeletal muscle structure and calcium distribution in that of-i changes in the protofibrillary structure of fast frog muscle fibers in stable potassium contraction.
13	some properties of potassium stimulated calcium influx in presynaptic nerve endings	Some properties of potassium stimulated the apos; calcium influx in the presynaptic nerve terminals.
13	distribution of potassium and chloride permeability over the surface and t tubule membranes of mammalian skeletal muscle	Distribution of potassium and chloride permeability on mammalian skeletal muscle t-tubule surface and membranes.
13	effect of scn on potassium contracture in twitch muscle fibers of the frog	The effect of scn on potassium contraction in frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	biphasic time course of inactivation of potassium contractures in single twitch muscle fibers of the frog	A biphasic time course of potassium contracture inactivation in single twitch muscle fibers of the frog.
13	contractility of the frog ventricular myocardium in sodium free lithium solution	Contractility of frog ventricular myocardium in a sodium-free lithium solution.
13	the calcium current and the activation of a slow potassium conductance in voltage clamped mouse neuroblastoma cells	Calcium current and vas activation; slow potassium conductance in mouse neuroblastoma cells with voltage clamp.
13	contractile responses to direct stimulation of frog slow muscle fibres before and after denervation	Contractile responses to direct stimulation of slow frog muscle fibers before and after denervation.
13	extracellular calcium and potassium changes in hippocampal slices	Extracellular changes in calcium and potassium levels in slices; seahorse.
13	voltage dependent calcium and potassium ion conductances a contingency mechanism for an associative learning model	The voltage-dependent conductances of calcium and potassium ions are a contingency mechanism for a d&apos model; associative learning.
13	the effect of septic shock on skeletal muscle action potentials in the primate	L' effect of septic shock on potentials; action of primate skeletal muscle.
13	after hyperpolarization conductance time course and repetitive firing in a motoneurone model with early inactivation of the slow potassium conductance system	After l' time evolution of the conductance of the apos; hyperpolarization and repeated discharge in a motor neuron model with early inactivation of the slow potassium conductance system.
13	in vitro effects of desoxycorticosterone on vascular smooth muscle	In vitro effects of deoxycorticosterone on vascular smooth muscle.
13	electrophysiological properties of resting secretory membranes of lamellibranch mantles interaction between calcium and potassium	Electrophysiological properties of resting secretory membranes of calcium-potassium interaction lamellibranchs.
13	survival of k permeability and gating currents in squid axons perfused with k free media	Survival of permeability k and barrier currents in squid axons perfused with a free k medium.
13	influence of chloride potassium and tetraethylammonium on the early outward current of sheep cardiac purkinje fibers	L' influence of potassium chloride and tetraethylammonium on the early outward current of cardiac purkinje fibers of sheep.
13	naloxone and naltrexone actions and interactions at an opiate drug receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers	The action and interaction of naloxone and naltrexone on an opiate receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	a dual effect of formaldehyde on the inwardly rectifying potassium conductance in skeletal muscle	A double effect of formaldehyde on the internally rectified potassium conductance in the skeletal muscle.
13	extracellular potassium accumulation in voltage clamped frog ventricular muscle	Accumulation of extracellular potassium in frog ventricular muscle at voltage clamp.
13	potassium channels in nodal and internodal axonal membrane of mammalian myelinated fibres	Potassium channels in the nodal and internodal axonal membranes of mammalian myelinated fibers.
13	antagonism of calcium induced contractions by some non specific spasmolytics in depolarized smooth muscles	L' calcium antagonism induced contractions by nonspecific spasmolytics in smooth depolarized muscles.
13	on the possible role of potassium ions in the action of terbutaline on skeletal muscle contractions	The possible role of potassium ions in the esterosis; the action of terbutaline on skeletal muscle contractions.
13	some determinants of latency of off response to electrical field stimulation in circular layer of smooth muscle of opossum esophagus	Determinants of response latency without electrical field stimulation in the smooth muscle circular layer of the oesophagus of l' opossum.
13	muscarinic suppression of a novel voltage sensitive k current in a vertebrate neurone	The muscarinic suppression of apos; a new voltage-sensitive voltage in a vertebrate neuron.
13	the effects of calcium deprivation upon mechanical and electrophysiological parameters in skeletal muscle fibres of the frog	The effects of calcium deficiency on mechanical and electrophysiological parameters in frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	the effect on plasma potassium of a combined preparation of frusemide and slow release potassium chloride diumide k continus tablets	The effect on plasma potassium of a combination of potassium chloride diumide and potassium bromide.
13	functional profile of the isolated uremic nephron potassium adaptation in the rabbit cortical collecting tubule	Functional profile of l' potassium adaptation of uremic nephron isolated from rabbit cortical collecting tubule.
13	prostaglandins and potassium relaxation in vascular smooth muscle of the rat the role of na k atpase	Prostaglandins and potassium relaxation in rat vascular smooth muscle the role of na k atpase.
13	a histoenzymatic study of rat intrafusal muscle fibres	Histoenzymatic study of rat intrafusal muscle fibers.
13	coupling of electrical processes on the membrane to the contractile activity of anococcygeus smooth muscle cells	Coupling of membrane electrical processes to l' contractile activity of anococcygeal smooth muscle cells.
13	control of ion distribution in isolated smooth muscle cells i potassium	Control of ion distribution in smooth muscle cells isolated i potassium.
13	potassium concentration changes in the transverse tubules of vertebrate skeletal muscle	Changes in the concentration of potassium in transverse tubules of vertebrate skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of gramicidin a on the k conductance of the membrane of isolated frog skeletal muscle fibres	L' effect of gramicidin a on membrane conductance k of isolated frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	a voltage dependent gate in series with the inwardly rectifying potassium channel in frog striated muscle	A voltage-dependent serial gate with the internal rectified potassium channel in frog striated muscle.
13	conditioning hyperpolarization induced delays in the potassium channels of myelinated nerve	L&apos conditioning; hyperpolarization induced delays in potassium channels of myelinated nerve.
13	single channel recordings of k currents in squid axons	Single channel recordings of k currents in the squid axons.
13	activation of contraction of arterial smooth muscle in the presence of nitrate and other anions	Activation of arterial smooth muscle contraction in the presence of nitrate and other anions.
13	comparative studies on muscle amp deaminase ii regulation by monovalent cations atp and orthophosphate of the enzyme from hen frog and pikeperch muscle	Comparative studies of the regulation of l' the muscle deaminase ii by the monovalent cations atp and l' orthophosphate of l' enzyme of frog muscle and pike.
13	action of salicylate ions on the electrical properties of sheep cardiac purkinje fibres	The action of salicylate ions on the electrical properties of cardiac purkinje fibers of sheep.
13	effects of smooth muscle stimulants on 1 isoprenaline beta adrenoceptor interaction in taenia from guinea pig caecum	Effects of smooth muscle stimulants on the brain; interaction of beta @-@apos adrenoceptor; isoprenaline and adrenergic receptors in guinea pig caecal taenia.
13	circumstantial evidence for increased potassium conductance of membrane of cardiac muscle by 2 nicotinamidoethyl nitrate sg 75	Circumstantial evidence of an increase in the potassium conductance of the cardiac muscle membrane by 2 nicotinamidoethyl nitrate sg.
13	effect of gramicidin on the potassium conductance of an isolated frog muscle fiber	Effect of gramicidin on the potassium conductance of isolated frog muscle fibers.
13	on the kinetics of the potassium channel activated by acetylcholine in the s a node of the rabbit heart	Kinetics of the potassium channel activated by etapos; acetylcholine in a rabbit heart node.
13	separation of current induced by potassium accumulation from acetylcholine induced relaxation current in the rabbit s a node	The current separation induced by the accumulation of potassium and acetylcholine induces a relaxation current in the rabbit a node.
13	effects on muscle electrolytes of potassium and magnesium infusions spironolactone medication and operation in a case of primary aldosteronism	Effects on the muscle electrolyte; infusion of potassium and magnesium spironolactone drug and lytes; operation in a case of apos; primary aldosterone.
13	transmembrane ion currents in pulmonary artery smooth muscle	Transmembrane ion currents in smooth muscle of the pulmonary artery.
13	renal potassium adaptation na k atpase activity along the nephron after chronic potassium loading	Adaptation of renal potassium to epos; na k atpase activity along the nephron surface following chronic potassium loading.
13	effects of phasic and tonic activation on contraction dynamics in smooth muscle	Effects of l' phasic and tonic activation on the dynamics of contractions in smooth muscle.
13	effect of potassium ions on electrogenesis and contraction of ureter smooth muscle	Effect of potassium ions on urethra smooth muscle electrogenesis and contraction.
13	mechanism of opiate induced permeability of mitochondrial membranes for potassium ions	The mechanism of l' opioid induces the permeability of mitochondrial membranes to potassium ions.
13	fast photo induced changes in the light scattering of vertebrate photoreceptor membrane preparations study of suspensions of vesicles obtained by ultrasonic treatment of the outer segments of retinal rods	Rapid photos induce changes in light scattering of vertebrate photoreceptive membrane preparations; they are concerned with the apos; and they study vesicle suspensions obtained by ultrasonic treatment of the outer segments of retinal rods.
13	smooth muscle membrane vesicle orientation a study on intactness and sidedness of rat myometrium plasma membrane vesicles	L' orientation of smooth muscle membrane vesicles was studied on the intact state and vesicle profile of rat myometrium plasma membrane.
13	the contractile response of smooth muscle to immersion in hypertonic solutions	Contractile response of smooth muscle to apos; immersion in hypertonic solutions.
13	calcium action potentials and potassium permeability activation in pancreatic beta cells	Potentials in pancreatic beta cells; calcium action and activation of potassium permeability.
13	rectifying properties of the membrane of single freshly isolated smooth muscle cells	Correct the membrane properties of uniquely isolated and freshly isolated smooth muscle cells.
13	neocortical pyramidal cells a model with dendritic calcium conductance reproduces repetitive firing and epileptic behavior	The neocortical pyramidal cells, a dendritic calcium conductance (DCA) model, mimicked repetitive discharge and epileptic behaviour.
13	potassium chloride versus voltage clamp contractures in ventricular muscle	"""Potassium chloride versus voltage clamp contractures"" in ventricular muscle."
13	intracellular chloride concentration and evidence for the existence of a chloride pump in frog skeletal muscle	Intracellular chloride concentration and evidence of apos; existence of chloride pump in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of energy deprivation and hyperosmolarity upon tubular structures and electrophysiological parameters of muscle fibres	The effects of starvation; energy and heat loss; hyperosmolarity on tubular structures and electrophysiological parameters of muscle fibers.
13	the effects of temperature local anaesthetics ph divalent cations and group specific reagents on repriming and repolarization induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	The effects of local bivalent cation anesthetic temperature and group-specific reagents on repriming and repolarization induce contractions in frog skeletal muscle.
13	pgf2 alpha on drug induced contractile responses of frog rectus abdominis muscle	Pgf2 alpha on frog-induced contractile responses to the frog rectus abdominis muscle drug.
13	effects of monochromatic x radiation on the membrane of nodes of ranvier under voltage and current clamp conditions	Effects of monochromatic radiation on the rudder node membrane, under voltage and clamp current conditions.
13	interaction of calcium and potassium with neuromuscular blocking agents	Interaction of calcium and potassium with neuromuscular blockers.
13	absence of potassium conductance in central myelinated axons	Absence of a potassium conductance in central myelinated axons.
13	comparison between the delayed outward current in slow and fast twitch skeletal muscle in the rat	Comparison of delayed outward current in rat skeletal muscle with slow and fast outward outward current.
13	effects of nonspecific smooth muscle relaxants on tissue concentrations of high energy phosphates and mechanical activity of normal polarized and depolarized intestinal smooth muscles from guinea pig	Effects of nonspecific smooth muscle relaxants on tissue high-energy phosphate concentrations and l' mechanical activity of normal depolarized and polarized guinea pig intestinal smooth muscles.
13	effect of ruthenium red on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Effect of ruthenium red on coupling of d&apos contractions; excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of diazepam on tension and electrolyte distribution in frog muscle	L' effect of diazepam on the tension and electrolyte distribution of frog muscle.
13	calcium metabolism in the young adult male as affected by level and form of phosphorus intake and level of calcium intake	Calcium metabolism in the young adult male is influenced by the level and shape of the phosphorus and the level of calcium intake.
13	membrane electrical properties of frog slow muscle fibres	Membrane electrical properties of slow frog muscle fibers.
13	interaction of barium ions with potassium channels in squid giant axons	Interaction of barium ions with potassium channels in giant axons of squid.
13	inhibition of potassium conductance with external tetraethylammonium ion in myxicola giant axons	Inhibition of potassium conductance by external tetraethylammonium ion in the giant axons of myxicola.
13	a dichtomy of the membrane potential response of rat soleus muscle fibers to low extracellular potassium concentrations	A dichtomy of membrane potential response of rat soleus muscle fibers to low extracellular potassium concentrations.
13	potassium induced cardioplegia in patients undergoing correction of congenital heart defects	In addition, it has been shown that potassium induces heart disease in patients undergoing correction for congenital heart defects.
13	rubidium block and rubidium permeability of the inward rectifier of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Rubidium block and rubidium permeability of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	extracellular potassium activity during frequency dependent conduction block of giant axons in the metathoracic ganglion of the cockroach	L' extracellular potassium activity during the frequency-dependent conduction blockade of giant axons in the cockroach metathoracic ganglion.
13	mechanisms of activation of coronary vessel smooth muscle contraction	Dapos mechanisms; smooth muscle contraction activation of the coronary vessel.
13	inhibitors of mitochondrial ca uptake dissociate potassium induced tension responses from increased 45ca retention in rabbit aortic smooth muscle	Mitochondrial uptake inhibitors dissociate responses to tension induced by l' increased retention of 45ca in rabbit aortic smooth muscle.
13	effect of transmembrane ph gradient changes on potassium induced relaxation in vascular smooth muscle	The effect of changes in the transmembrane pharyngeal gradient on potassium induced relaxation in the vascular smooth muscle.
13	use of aequorin to study excitation contraction coupling in mammalian smooth muscle	Use of apos; equorin to study coupling of contractions; excitation in mammalian smooth muscle.
13	biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers and effects of various agents on the contractures	"""Biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers"" and the effects of various agents on contractions."
13	epileptiform burst afterhyperolarization calcium dependent potassium potential in hippocampal ca1 pyramidal cells	Epileptiform pulse following apos; hyperolarization, calcium-dependent potassium potential in ca1 pyramidal cells of the hippocampus.
13	potassium maintenance potassium supplements or potassium sparing agents	Potassium supplements; maintenance or preservatives of potassium.
13	current recorded from a cut open giant axon under voltage clamp	The recorded current of d' a giant axon cut and opened under clamp voltage.
13	effect of homologous n alkanoic acids on the function of isolated skeletal muscles v relations between twitch tetanus and contracture	Effect of homologous n-alkanoic acids on the function of isolated skeletal muscles v relationship between twitch tetanus and contracture.
13	bound potassium in muscle ii	Bound potassium in the muscle ii.
13	carbon dioxide membrane potential and intracellular potassium activity in frog skeletal muscle	Carbon dioxide membrane potential and intracellular potassic activity in frog skeletal muscle.
13	protein from beef heart mitochondria inducing the potassium channel conductivity of bilayer lipid membrane	Beef heart mitochondrial protein inducing the conductance of bilayer lipid canals.
13	apical k channels in frog skin rana temporaria cation adsorption and voltage influence gating kinetics	Frog skin apical k channels rana temporaria, l' cation adsorption and tension influence block kinetics.
13	voltage oscillations in the barnacle giant muscle fiber	Stress oscillations in the giant muscle fibers of the barnacle.
13	voltage clamp of single freshly dissociated smooth muscle cells current voltage relationships for three currents	A tension clamp of smooth muscle cell current relations, freshly dissociated, for three current currents.
13	potassium conductance and internal calcium accumulation in a molluscan neurone	Potassium conductance and internal accumulation of calcium in a mollusc neuron.
13	evidence that histamine and carbachol may open the same ion channels in longitudinal smooth muscle of guinea pig ileum	Evidence indicates that hisapos; histamine and carbachol can open the same ion channels in the longitudinal smooth muscle of guinea pig ileum.
13	direct measurement of the increase in intracellular free calcium ion concentration in response to the action of complement	Direct measurement of glucose levels; increase in intracellular concentration of calcium ions; free calcium ions in response to glucose; complement action.
13	synaptic excitation may activate a calcium dependent potassium conductance in hippocampal pyramidal cells	L&apos, synaptic excitation, may activate a calcium-dependent potassium conductance in hippocampal pyramidal cells.
13	myelinated central vertebrate axon lacks voltage sensitive potassium conductance	L' central axon of myelinated vertebrates n' has no voltage-sensitive potassium conductance.
13	intracellular and exchangeable potassium in cirrhosis evidence against the occurrence of potassium depletion in cirrhosis with ascites	Intracellular and exchangeable potassium in cirrhosis also proves that there is no potassium depletion in cirrhosis with ascites.
13	the initiation of phasic and tonic contraction by potassium and the effect of calcium multivalent cations and ca antagonist on potassium contracture in guinea pig vas deferens	The initiation of phasic and tonic contraction by potassium and the effect of multivalent cations and Ca antagonists on the potassium contracture in coinea vas deferens.
13	deleterious effects of calcium deprivation on freshly isolated hepatocytes	Harmful effects of calcium deprivation on freshly isolated hepatocytes.
13	unidirectional flux ratio for potassium ions in depolarized frog skeletal muscle	Unidirectional flux ratio for potassium ions in depolarized frog skeletal muscle.
13	effect of short term co2 breathing on the co2 content and intracellular ph in skeletal muscle of man	The effect of short-term co2 respiration on the content of co2 and the intracellular phloem in the skeletal muscle of men.
13	transient and steady state kinetic studies of sodium potassium adenosine triphosphatase using beta 2 furyl acryloyl phosphate as chromophoric substrate assay	Apos kinetic studies; transient and apos state; apos state; apos equilibrium; sodium adenosine triphosphatase using beta-2 furyl acryloyl phosphate as chromophoric substrate.
13	calcium dependent slow action potentials in potassium depolarized guinea pig ventricular myocardium enhanced by barium ions	Potential for calcium-dependent slow action in potassium-depolarized barium-stimulated guinea pig ventricular myocardium.
13	electrophysiology of phagocytic membranes iii evidence for a calcium dependent potassium permeability change during slow hyperpolarizations of activated macrophages	L' phagocyte membrane electrophysiology iii indicates a calcium-dependent change in potassium permeability during slow hyperpolarizations of activated macrophages.
13	actions of various muscarinic agonists on membrane potential potassium efflux and contraction of longitudinal muscle of guinea pig intestine	The action of various muscarinic agonists on the apos; potassium efflux of membrane potential and longitudinal muscle contraction of guinea pig intestine.
13	potassium stimulated calcium dependent release of 3h gaba from neuron and glia enriched cultures of cells dissociated from rat cerebellum	Potassium stimulated calcium-dependent release of 3-h-gaba from neurons, and dissociated cell cultures from rat cerebellum were enriched with glial cells.
13	evidence for a sodium electrogenic pump in airway smooth muscle	Evidence of sodium generator pump in airway smooth muscle.
13	the selective inhibition of serotonin induced contractions of rabbit cerebral vascular smooth muscle by calcium antagonistic dihydropyridines an investigation of the mechanism of action of nimodipine	Selective inhibition of serotonin induced contractions of rabbit cerebral vascular smooth muscle by calcium antagonist dihydropyridines, a study of nimodipine action.
13	nickel substitution for calcium and the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	The substitution of calcium by nickel and l' temporal evolution of potassium contractions of single muscle fibers.
13	field potential induced by injection of potassium ion into the frog retina a test of current interpretations of the electroretinographic erg b wave	Potential field induced by apos; injection of potassium ion into frog retina, a test of current interpretations of apos; electro-etetinographic wave erg b.
13	localization of calcium in an annelid visceral muscle by pyroantimonate deposition and by x ray microprobe analysis	Localization of calcium in annelid visceral muscle by pyroantimonate deposition and x-ray microprobe analysis.
13	blockage of squid axon potassium conductance by internal tetra n alkylammonium ions of various sizes	Blocking of the potassium conductance of l' squid axon by tetra ions-n alkylammonium of various sizes.
13	a new interpretation of the pace maker current in calf purkinje fibres	A new interpretation of pacemaker current in calf purkinje fibers.
13	electrical current induced contraction in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta	The electric current induced a contraction in the smooth muscle of rabbit aorta.
13	effects of external calcium reduction on the kinetics of potassium contractures in frog twitch muscle fibres	Effects of external calcium reduction on the kinetics of potassium-induced contractions in frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	slow calcium and potassium currents across frog muscle membrane measurements with a vaseline gap technique	Slow calcium and potassium currents pass through the frog's muscle membrane at the apos; aided by a dapos technique; vascular opening.
13	ca k bi ionic action potential in squid giant axons	Ca k potential d' ionic action in giant squid axons.
13	a k selective three state channel from fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum of frog leg muscle	A three-state selective k channel from the fractured sarcoplasmic reticulum of frog leg muscle.
13	a comparison of the differential effects of nitroglycerin nifedipine and papaverine on contractures induced in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle by potassium and lanthanum	Comparison of the differential effects of nifedipine and papaverine on potassium and lanthanum-induced vascular and intestinal smooth muscle contractions.
13	antagonism of calcium induced contraction in potassium depolarized rabbit detrusor muscle strips by dicyclomine hydrochloride and rociverine	L' antagonism of calcium-induced contraction in strips of detrital muscle depolarized by dicyclomine hydrochloride and rociverine produced a potassium depolarization.
13	fast outward current controlling electrical activity in rat uterine smooth muscle during gestation	A fast outflow current controls l' electrical activity in rat uterine smooth muscle during pregnancy.
13	tris does not inhibit isolated vascular or intestinal smooth muscle contraction	Tris n&apos does not inhibit contraction of isolated intestinal or vascular smooth muscle.
13	manifestation of latent alpha excitatory response in the canine tracheal smooth muscle preparation relation to basal tone	Evidence of a latent alpha excitatory response in the basal tone-related preparation of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	inactivation of voltage gated delayed potassium current in molluscan neurons a kinetic model	L' inactivation of voltage retarded potassium current in mollusk neurons is a kinetic model.
13	a theoretical study on the sucrose gap technique as applied to multicellular muscle preparations ii methodical errors in the determination of outward currents	A theoretical study of the sucrose gap technique applied to multicellular muscle preparations ii systematic errors in the determination of the outward currents.
13	dynamics of potassium ion currents in squid axon membrane a re examination	Dynamics of potassium ionic currents in axonal membrane of squid reexamined.
13	potassium ion currents in the crayfish giant axon dynamic characteristics	D&apos currents; potassium ions in the dynamic characteristics of the plant's giant axons; crayfish.
13	biological activities of cystic fibrosis serum iv stimulation of the calcium mediated k efflux from rat submandibular gland fragments	L' biological activity of cystic fibrosis serum IV stimulates l' calcium-mediated efflux k from gland fragments under rat mandibular.
13	time dependence of the calcium activated potassium current	The temporal dependence of potassium current activated by calcium.
13	alteration of smooth muscle contractility after muscarinic agonist induced k loss	Modification of smooth muscle contractility after loss of k induced by the muscarinic agonist.
13	reconstitution in planar lipid bilayers of a ca2 dependent k channel from transverse tubule membranes isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle	Rebuilding in planar lipid bilayers, d' a k channel dependent on ca2 from transverse tubular membranes isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle.
13	role of the medullary collecting duct in potassium excretion in potassium adapted animals	Role of medullary collecting duct in apos; potassium excretion in potassium adapted animals.
13	potassium ion influx and na k atpase activity are required for the hamster sperm acrosome reaction	Apos; potassium ions and apos; na katpase activity are required for the reaction of hamster semen; hamster semen acrosome.
13	inactivation of potassium current in squid axon by a variety of quaternary ammonium ions	Inactivation of the potassium current in the squid axon by various quaternary ammonium ions.
13	acute effects of hemodialysis on echographic determined cardiac performance improved contractility resulting from serum increased calcium with reduced potassium despite hypovolemic reduced cardiac output	The acute effects of hemodialysis on cardiac performance as determined by ultrasound improved the contractility resulting from an increase in serum calcium and a reduction in potassium, despite a hypovolemic reduction in cardiac output.
13	role of calcium in the contraction of normal tonic muscle fibers and following denervation	The role of calcium in the contraction of both normal and denervated muscle tonic fibers.
13	potassium contracture in the tonic bundle isolated from the enlarged flexor carpi radialis muscle of the frog	Potassium contracture in the isolated tonic bundle of frog enlarged carpi radialis flexor muscle.
13	potassium recycling in the renal medulla effects of acute potassium chloride administration to rats fed a potassium free diet	Recycling potassium into effects on the kidney medulla of lacid; acute potassium chloride administration to rats fed a potassium-free diet.
13	steady state effects of extracellular potassium concentration on vascular smooth muscle reactivity	Effects at baseline; balance of extracellular potassium concentration on vascular smooth muscle reactivity.
13	modulation of synaptic output by the transient outward potassium current in aplysia	Modulation of the synaptic flow rate by the transient outward potassium current in the apices; aplysia.
13	intracellular local changes of resistance in muscle fibers in relation to membrane potential	Local intracellular changes in resistance patterns in muscle fibers in relation to membrane potential.
13	ba2 ions block k induced contractures by antagonizing k induced membrane depolarization in frog skeletal muscle fibres	Ba2 ions blocked k-induced contractions by antagonizing k-induced membrane depolarization in frog skeletal muscle fibres.
13	single k channel currents of anomalous rectification in cultured rat myotubes	Dapos currents; a single dapos k channel; abnormal rectification in cultured rat myotubes.
13	potassium current suppression by quinidine reveals additional calcium currents in neuroblastoma cells	Suppression of the potassium current by quinidine revealed additional calcium currents in neuroblastoma cells.
13	magnesium increases rate of onset of desensitization in frog muscle	Magnesium increases the rate of desensitization; appearance of desensitization in frog muscle.
13	membrane properties of smooth muscle cells in pulmonary hypertensive rats	Membrane properties of smooth muscle cells in pulmonary hypertensive rats.
13	stereoselective and non stereoselective effects of d 600 methoxyverapamil in smooth muscle preparations	Stereoselective, non-stereoselective effects of d 600 methoxyverapamil in smooth muscle preparations.
13	the effect of tetraethylammonium chloride on potassium permeability in the smooth muscle cell membrane of canine trachea	Effect of tetraethylammonium chloride on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membranes.
13	transient and delayed potassium currents in the egg cell membrane of the coelenterate renilla koellikeri	Transient and delayed potassium currents in the membrane of cells of the egg coelenterate renilla koellikeri.
13	simultaneous changes in the equilibrium potential and potassium conductance in voltage clamped ranvier node in the frog	Simultaneous changes in the potential d'apos; equilibrium and the potassic conductance in the rudder node imposed by stress in frogs.
13	evidence for the existence of three types of potassium channels in the frog ranvier node membrane	Three types of potassium canals were found in the range node membrane of the frog.
13	tension stiffness unloaded shortening speed and potentiation of frog muscle fibres at sarcomere lengths below optimum	The stiffness of the unloaded tension reduced the speed of shortening and potentiation of frog muscle fibers to suboptimal sarcomere lengths.
13	the t sr junction in contracting single skeletal muscle fibers	The t-square junction in the contraction of single skeletal muscle fibers.
13	properties of a calcium and voltage activated potassium current in helix pomatia neurons	The properties of calcium- and voltage-activated potassium current in the neurons of the apos; helix pomatia were activated.
13	activation characteristics of the calcium dependent outward potassium current in helix	Features include calcium-dependent activation of outbound potassium current in the helix.
13	dissociation of k induced tension and cellular ca2 retention in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle in normoxia and hypoxia	Dissociation of k induced cellular ca2 tension and retention in intestinal and vascular smooth muscle during normoxia and l' hypoxia.
13	effect of procaine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle	The effect of procaine on the potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	evidence for the presence of potassium channels in the internode of frog myelinated nerve fibres	Evidence of potassium channels in the apos; between-nodes of frog myelinated nerve fibers.
13	calcium currents in internally perfused nerve cell bodies of limnea stagnalis	Calcium currents in neuronal bodies perfused at the interior of limnea stagnalis.
13	assessment of ca2 antagonist effects of drugs in k depolarized smooth muscle differentiation of antagonist subgroups	Evaluation of the Ca2 antagonistic effects of drugs on the differentiation of sub--groups d' antagonists of depolarized smooth muscle k.
13	divalent cations and the activation kinetics of potassium channels in squid giant axons	Cations divalent and kinetics d' activation of potassium channels in the giant axons of squid.
13	gk ca dependent cyclic potential changes in the sensory nerve terminal of frog muscle spindle	Gk ca-dependent cyclic potential changes in sensory nerve end of frog muscle spindle.
13	stimulation by calcium and other cations of the cholesterol binding to steroid free cytochrome p 450scc purified from bovine adrenocortical mitochondria the implication of acth mediated calcium homeostasis on the cholesterol availability	Calcium stimulation and d' other cations of cholesterol binding to purified free cytochrome p 450scc bovine adrenal cortical mitochondria, l' apos involvement; apos-mediated calcium homeostasis; cholesterol availability.
13	slowing effects of dopamine and calcium channel blockers on frequency of sodium spikes in rat pars intermedia cells	Slowing effects of the dopaminergic and calcium channel blockers on the frequency of sodium peaks in rat pars intermedia cells.
13	mechanisms of relaxation induced by activation of beta adrenoceptors in smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig mesenteric artery	Relaxation mechanisms induced by apos; beta-adrenergic receptor activation in smooth muscle cells of guinea pig; mesenteric artery.
13	extracellular potassium concentration and membrane potential in rabbit gastrocnemius muscle during tourniquet ischemia	Extracellular potassium concentration and membrane potential in the rabbit gastrocnemius muscle during tourniquet ischemia.
13	effects of flurazepam and diazepam in isolated guinea pig taenia coli and longitudinal muscle	Effects of flurazepam and diazepam on isolated guinea pig taenia coli and on longitudinal muscle.
13	apamin as a selective blocker of the calcium dependent potassium channel in neuroblastoma cells voltage clamp and biochemical characterization of the toxin receptor	L' apamin as a selective calcium-dependent potassium channel blocker in neuroblastoma cell voltage and biochemical characterization of the toxin receptor.
13	electrogenesis and contraction of smooth muscle taenia coli kept in a solution with elevated concentration of potassium ions	Electrogenesis and contraction of taenia coli smooth muscle are maintained in a solution containing elevated potassium ions.
13	some effects of carbon dioxide on intracellular potassium in frog muscle	Effects of carbon dioxide on intracellular potassium in frog muscle.
13	calcium activated and voltage dependent potassium conductances in clonal pituitary cells	Stress-dependent, calcium-activated potassium responses in clonal pituitary cells.
13	the behavioral effects of phencyclidines may be due to their blockade of potassium channels	Behavioral effects of phencyclidines may be due to blockade of potassium channels.
13	effect of concentration of potassium salts on the activity of the n ethylmaleimide treated hemin controlled translational inhibitor	Effect of potassium salt concentration on apo; apo activity; apo-mediated translation inhibitor; apo-treated hemin; and ethylmaleimide.
13	the stimulation of protein degradation in muscle by ca2 is mediated by prostaglandin e2 and does not require the calcium activated protease	Stimulation of protein degradation in muscle by ca2 was mediated by prostaglandin e2 and did not require calcium-activated protease.
13	physiological and ultrastructural studies on the longitudinal retractor muscle of a sea cucumber stichopus japonicus ii intracellular localization and translocation of activator calcium during mechanical activity	Physiological and ultrastructural studies on the longitudinal retractor muscle of a sea cucumber, stichopus japonicus ii Intracellular localization and translocation of activating calcium during mechanical activity.
13	single calcium dependent potassium channels in clonal anterior pituitary cells	Key words:unique calcium-dependent potassium channels in anterior clonal pituitary cells.
13	block of squid axon k channels by internally and externally applied barium ions	Blockage of the k channels of the elapos; squid axon by barium ions applied to the inner and outer elapos.
13	calcium and potassium currents in muscle fibres of an insect carausius morosus	The calcium and potassium currents in the muscle fibers of a single insect, carausius morosus.
13	calmodulin dependent regulation of calcium activated outward current in frog atrial membrane	Calcium calmodulin-dependent regulation activated the outward current in frog atrial membrane.
13	interaction of acidosis and increased extracellular potassium on action potential characteristics and conduction in guinea pig ventricular muscle	Interaction of acidosis and apos; increase of extracellular potassium on the characteristics and conduction of d&apos potential; action in guinea pig ventricular muscle.
13	the activation and inactivation in biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers	L&apos activation and apos; inactivation of biphasic potassium contractions in single frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	the effects of reducing the extracellular calcium concentration on the twitch in isolated frog s skeletal muscle fibres	Effects of reduced extracellular calcium concentration on twitch in isolated frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	calcium antagonists and alpha 2 adrenoceptors possible role of extracellular calcium ions in alpha 2 adrenoceptor mediated vasoconstriction	Calcium antagonists and alpha 2 adrenoceptors may play a role in alpha 2 adrenoceptor-mediated vasoconstriction.
13	effects of hypertonicity on frog muscle contractures induced by quinine	Effects of apos; hypertonicity on muscle contractions of frogs induced by quinine.
13	slow inward calcium currents have no obvious role in muscle excitation contraction coupling	There is no obvious role for slow inward calcium currents in coupling muscle contraction.
13	effect of carbacholine on miniature potentials and currents of rat skeletal muscle endplates	Effect of carbacholine on the miniature end-plate potentials and currents of rat skeletal muscle.
13	relation between mineral fertilization and supply of potassium calcium magnesium and phosphorus to the population under conditions of intensive plant production in east germany	Relationship between mineral fertilization and potassium-calcium magnesium and phosphorus supply to the population under conditions of intensive plant production in East Germany.
13	the effect of tetraethylammonium and the decrease in the extracellular chloride concentration on membrane depolarization and contraction of skeletal muscle fiber induced by a hyperpotassium solution	The effects of tetraethylammonium and the decrease in extracellular chloride concentration on membrane depolarization and skeletal muscle fiber contraction induced by d*apos; hyperpotassium.
13	a comparison of the effect of combined frusemide and controlled release potassium tablets diumide k continus tablets and frusemide and slow k tablets in elderly patients with cardiac failure	Comparison of the effects of continuous diumide-controlled frusemide and potassium k tablets and frusemide and slow k tablets in elderly patients with diabetes mellitus; heart failure.
13	a late increase in potassium conductance follows synaptic stimulation of granule neurons of the dentate gyrus	A late increase in potassium conductance parallels synaptic stimulation of serrated gyrus granular neurons.
13	protein kinase injection reduces voltage dependent potassium currents	L' protein kinase injection reduces voltage-dependent potassium current.
13	skeletal muscle injury after magnesium depletion in the dog	Skeletal muscle injury after magnesium depletion in dog.
13	brain potassium ion homeostasis anoxia and metabolic inhibition in turtles and rats	Anoxia of the intestines; homeostasis of the intestines; cerebral potassium ion and metabolic inhibition in turtles and rats.
13	calcium mediated decrease of a voltage dependent potassium current	Calcium-mediated decrease d&apos, a voltage-dependent, potassium current.
13	the calcium activated potassium conductance in guinea pig myenteric neurones	Calcium-activated potassium conductance in guinea-pig myenteric neurons.
13	block and activation of the pace maker channel in calf purkinje fibres effects of potassium caesium and rubidium	Blockage and activation of pacemaker channel in calf purkinje fibers, effects of potassium cesium and rubidium.
13	effects of thyroxine on transmembrane resting potentials of skeletal muscle cells in culture	Effects of thyroxine on resting transmembrane potentials of skeletal muscle cells in culture.
13	calcium ions and calcium antagonists in ischaemia	Calcium ions and calcium antagonists in apos; ischemia.
13	specific drug sensitive transport pathways for chloride and potassium ions in steady state ehrlich mouse ascites tumor cells	Specific drug-sensitive transport pathways for chloride and potassium ions in cancer cells from ehrlich mice to apos; disease states; balance.
13	effects of dantrolene and d2o on k stimulated respiration of skeletal muscle	The effects of dantrolene and d2o on k stimulate respiration of the skeletal muscle.
13	net metabolic changes of zinc copper nitrogen and potassium balances in skeletal trauma patients	Net metabolic changes in nitrogen and potassium budgets for zinc and copper in skeletal trauma patients.
13	regenerating mammalian nerve fibres changes in action potential waveform and firing characteristics following blockage of potassium conductance	After potassium conductance is blocked, the nerve fibers of regenerating mammals change the shape of the d' wave of the potential d' action and firing characteristics.
13	the effect of x 537a lasalocid on potassium contracture in rat ventricular muscle	L' effect of lasalocidal x 537a on potassium contraction in rat ventricular muscle.
13	t system optical signals associated with inward rectification in skeletal muscle	The optical signals of the t system are associated with an internal rectification in the skeletal muscle.
13	conditioning prepulses and kinetics of potassium conductance in the frog node	Prepare prepulsations and kinetics of the potassium conductance in the knot.
13	single potassium channel currents in cultured mouse oligodendrocytes	Single potassium channel in cultured mouse oligodendrocytes.
13	effects of 4 aminopyridine on inward rectifying and pacemaker currents of cardiac purkinje fibres	Effect of 4 aminopyridine on inward rectification and pacemaker currents of cardiac purkin fibers.
13	time courses of late after potentials following tetanus or single shock in skeletal muscle fibers	Post-potential period after tetanus or single shock in the skeletal muscle fibers.
13	effects of calmodulin antagonists on tension and cellular calcium content in depolarized vascular and intestinal smooth muscles	Effects of calmodulin antagonists on the tension and cellular calcium content of the depolarized vascular and intestinal smooth muscles.
13	physiological synaptic interactions mediated by potassium ions	Potassium ion-mediated physiological synaptic interactions.
13	long term measurement of skeletal and lean body mass in paget s disease of bone treated with synthetic human calcitonin	Long-term measurement of the skeletal mass and lean mass in paget bone disease treated with human synthetic calcitonin.
13	the effect of external potassium on the blockade of the inward going rectification by cesium ions in the frog atrial trabeculae	L' effect of external potassium on the block of internal cesium ion-induced rectification in frog atrial trabeculae.
13	activity induced potassium accumulation and its uptake in frog ventricular muscle	The activity induced the accumulation of potassium and its uptake in frog ventricular muscle.
13	contractures produced by carbamate anticholinesterases in bovine tracheal smooth muscle	"""Correlations by carbamate anticholinesterases in bovine tracheal smooth muscle"", Arch."
13	calcium and excitation contraction coupling in vascular smooth muscles	Calcium and contraction; excitation in vascular smooth muscles.
13	calcium in excitation contraction coupling of frog skeletal muscle	Calcium in frog skeletal muscle contraction; excitation of frog skeletal muscle.
13	calcium currents of frog and insect skeletal muscle fibres measured during voltage clamp	Calcium currents of frog and d&apos skeletal muscle fibers; insects measured during voltage clamping.
13	external calcium and contractile activation during potassium contractures in twitch muscle fibres of the frog	External calcium and contractile activity during potassium contractions in frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	acetylcholine and potassium 42 movements in right atrial muscle of the guinea pig	Acetylcholine and potassium 42 movements in guinea pig right atrial muscle.
13	aminopyridine block of transient potassium current	Aminopyridine blocks the transient potassium current.
13	calcium channel and calcium pump involved in oscillatory hyperpolarizing responses of l strain mouse fibroblasts	Calcium channel and calcium pump mediate oscillatory hyperpolarizing responses of strain l mouse fibroblasts.
13	voltage activated and calcium activated currents studied in solitary rod inner segments from the salamander retina	Both calcium- and voltage-activated currents were studied in inner segments of solitary rodlets of the salamander retina.
13	activation of contraction and atpase activity in intact and chemically skinned smooth muscle of rat portal vein dependence on ca and muscle length	The activation of contraction and apos; activity of apos; atpase in chemically denuded intact smooth muscle depends on the muscle length and ca of the rat portal vein.
13	membrane potential in smooth muscle cells from hypertrophic rat portal vein	Potential membrane in smooth muscle cells of hypertrophic rat portal vein.
13	potassium mediation of calcium induced terminal differentiation of epidermal cells in culture	Potassium mediation of calcium induced terminal differentiation of cultured epidermal cells.
13	nature of electromechanical connections in the smooth muscle cells of the pulmonary artery	Nature of electromechanical connections in smooth muscle cells of the lung artery.
13	site of action and active form of aminopyridines in squid axon membranes	Site d' action and active form of aminopyridines in squid axonal membranes.
13	transport of ornithine carbamoyltransferase precursor into mitochondria stimulation by potassium ion magnesium ion and a reticulocyte cytosolic protein s	Apos precursor transport; ornithine carbamoyltransferase in mitochondrial stimulation by apos; potassium ion magnesium ion and reticulocyte cytosolic protein.
13	correlation between manifestations of digoxin toxicity and serum digoxin calcium potassium and magnesium concentrations and arterial ph	Correlation between the manifestations of digoxin toxicity and the serum concentrations of digoxin calcium, potassium and magnesium, and arterial pharynx.
13	interaction of internal anions with potassium channels of the squid giant axon	Interaction of internal anions with the potassium channels of l' giant axon of squid.
13	gating kinetics of ca2 activated k channels from rat muscle incorporated into planar lipid bilayers evidence for two voltage dependent ca2 binding reactions	The kinetics of blockade of the ca2-activated k channels of rat muscle incorporated into planar lipid bilayers demonstrated the existence of two voltage-dependent Ca2 binding reactions.
13	kinetics of ca2 activated k channels from rabbit muscle incorporated into planar bilayers evidence for a ca2 and ba2 blockade	The kinetics of the ca2-activated k channels of rabbit muscle incorporated into planar bilayers indicate the existence of d' a blockade by ca2 and ba2.
13	diazepam a highly effective twitch potentiator in isolated muscle fibres of the frog	Diazepam is a very effective twitch potentiator in isolated frog muscle fibers.
13	the actions of sodium nitroprusside and diltiazem on calcium potassium and histamine induced contractile responses in isolated rabbit basilar artery aorta taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle	The actions of sodium nitroprusside and diltiazem on calcium, potassium, and histamine elicited contractile responses in the apos, aortic aorta, rabbit basilar artery, taenia coli, and tracheal smooth muscle.
13	perchlorate induced alterations in electrical and mechanical parameters of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Changes in the electrical and mechanical parameters of frog skeletal muscle fibers were induced by perchlorate.
13	the influence of the permeant ions thallous and potassium on inward rectification in frog skeletal muscle	L' influence of permeant thallus and potassium ions on internal rectification in frog skeletal muscle.
13	potassium propionate causes preferential loss of bound acetylcholine in frog muscle	Potassium propionate causes a preferential loss of bound acetylcholine etapos in frog muscle.
13	slow components of potassium tail currents in rat skeletal muscle	Slow components of potassium tail currents in rat skeletal muscle.
13	acyltryptophols reversibly inhibit muscle contractions caused by the actions of acetylcholine and raised potassium ion concentrations	Acyltryptophols reversibly inhibit muscle contractions caused by the actions of l' acetylcholine and increase concentrations of potassium ions.
13	liver and skeletal muscle metabolism extracellular k concentrations and survival in spontaneously hypertensive rats following acute blood loss	Liver and skeletal muscle metabolism, extracellular k-concentration and survival in spontaneously hypertensive rats after acute blood loss.
13	basolateral potassium channel in turtle colon evidence for single file ion flow	The basolateral potassium channel in the colon of turtles indicates the existence of apos, a single-tailed ion flow.
13	chemical modification of potassium channel gating in frog myelinated nerve by trinitrobenzene sulphonic acid	Chemical modification of the blockade of potassium channels in frog myelinated nerve by trinitrobenzene sulfonic acid.
13	depression of calcium dependent potassium conductance of guinea pig myenteric neurones by muscarinic agonists	Decrease in the calcium-dependent potassium conductance of guinea pig myenteric neurons by muscarinic agonists.
13	mammalian skeletal muscle long lasting contractures and potentiated tetani produced by conditioning with weak acid anions	Long-term contractions of mammalian skeletal muscle and potentiated tetanis produced by conditioning with weak acidic anions.
13	properties of caffeine and potassium contractures in fatigued frog single twitch muscle fibers	The effect of potassium and potassium contractures on the fatigue of frog single twitch muscle fibers.
13	nicardipine actions on smooth muscle cells and neuromuscular transmission in the guinea pig basilar artery	The action of nicardipine on smooth muscle cells and neuromuscular transmission in the guinea pig basilar artery.
13	structural changes in nerve endings of rat median eminence superfused with media rich in potassium ions	Structural changes in the nerve endings of rat eminence superfused with potassium ion-rich media.
13	nalorphine actions at an opiate receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers	The action of nalorphine on an opiate receptor of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	voltage and ca2 activated k channel in baso lateral acinar cell membranes of mammalian salivary glands	Voltage and ca2-activated k channel in lateral acinar basement membranes of mammalian salivary glands.
13	dissociation of calcium and barium induced contractions of the rat duodenum smooth muscle	Dissociation of calcium and barium induced rat duodenum smooth muscle contractions.
13	asymmetrical charge movement in slow and fast twitch mammalian muscle fibres in normal and paraplegic rats	Asymmetrical charge movements in the muscle fibers of slow- and fast-twitch mammalian muscle fibers in normal and paraplegic rats.
13	k depolarization and phospholipid metabolism in frog sartorius muscle	Depolarization k and phospholipid metabolism in frog-swimming muscle.
13	excitation contraction coupling role of k activation within the transverse tubular system	Coupling role of contraction d' excitation of l' activation k in the transverse tubular system.
13	influence of length of aortic occlusion with cold potassium cardioplegia on early and late mortality in cardiac valve replacement	Influence of length of aortic occlusion with cold potassium cardioplegia on early and late cardiac valve replacement.
13	influence of divalent cations on potassium contracture duration in frog muscle fibres	L' influence of divalent cations on the duration of the potassium contraction in frog muscle fibers.
13	effects of 3 4 diaminopyridine on mechanical and electrical responses of frog single muscle fibres	The effects of 3-4 diaminopyridine on the mechanical and electrical responses of single frog muscle fibers.
13	patch clamp studies of slow potential sensitive potassium channels in longitudinal smooth muscle cells of rabbit jejunum	Patch clamp studies of slow potassium sensory channels in longitudinal smooth muscle cells of rabbit jejunum.
13	effects of an outward water flow on potassium currents in a squid giant axon	Effects of an apo flow; water to the outside on the potassium currents in a giant axon of squid.
13	opiate activation of potassium conductance inhibits calcium action potentials in rat locus coeruleus neurones	L' opiate activation of potassium conductance inhibits calcium potentials in coeruleus neurons of rat locus.
13	alpha adrenergic stimulation of potassium efflux in guinea pig hepatocytes may involve calcium influx and calcium release	Alpha adrenergic stimulation of potassium efflux into guinea pig hepatocytes may involve calcium influx and calcium release.
13	characterization of benextramine as an irreversible alpha adrenergic blocker and as a blocker of potassium activated calcium channels	Characterization of benextramine as an irreversible adrenergic alpha blocker and a potassium activated calcium channel blocker.
13	effect of ascorbate on the contractile response induced by dmpp in guinea pig ileal longitudinal muscle strip	Effect of ascorbate on the dmpp-induced contractile response in guinea-pig ileal longitudinal muscle.
13	adenosine activates a potassium conductance in guinea pig atrial heart muscle	Adenosine activates a potassium conductance in guinea pig atrial cardiac muscle.
13	predominant blocking of fast potassium current channels in mollusk neurons by 4 aminopyridine	Prevalent blockage of fast potassium current channels in mollusk neurons by aminopyridines.
13	the resting membrane parameters of human intercostal muscle at low normal and high extracellular potassium	Resting membrane parameters of low and high extracellular potassium human intercostal muscle.
13	isolation and contractile properties of single smooth muscle cells from guinea pig taenia caeci	Isolation and contractile properties of simple smooth muscle cells of guinea pig taenia caeci.
13	activation of calcium channels by novel 1 4 dihydropyridines a new mechanism for positive inotropics or smooth muscle stimulants	L' activation of the calcium channels by new dihydropyridines 1-4 is a new mechanism for positive inotropes or smooth muscle stimulants.
13	on the physiological role of internodal potassium channels and the security of conduction in myelinated nerve fibres	On the physiological role of internodal potassium channels and conduction safety in myelinated nerve fibers.
13	functional interactions of calcium antagonists in k depolarized smooth muscle	Functional interactions of calcium antagonists in k-k depolarized smooth muscle.
13	the inhibitory effects of n2 dansyl l arginine 4 t butylpiperidine amide ti233 on contraction of vascular and intestinal smooth muscle	The inhibitory effects of n2 in lyl arginine 4 t-butylpiperidine amide ti233 on vascular and intestinal smooth muscle contraction.
13	electrophysiological study of frog eggs at different stages of development iii ionic currents activated by intense hyperpolarization and depolarization of the oocyte at the final stage of vitellogenesis	Electrophysiological study of frog eggs at different stages of development iii ionic currents activated by intense hyperpolarization and depolarization of l' oocyte at late vitellogenesis.
13	the contribution of calcium and potassium to the alpha action of adrenaline on smooth muscle cells of the portal vein pulmonary artery and taenia caeci of the guinea pig	The contribution of calcium and potassium to the alpha action of the epos; adrenaline on the smooth muscle cells of the epos; pulmonary venous artery portal and taenia caeci of the guinea pig.
13	effects of 4 aminopyridine and tetraethylammonium chloride on the electrical activity and cable properties of canine tracheal smooth muscle	Effects of aminopyridine 4 and tetraethylammonium chloride on electrical activity and cable properties of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	calcium dependence of open and shut interval distributions from calcium activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle	The calcium dependence of the d&apos distributions; open and closed intervals of activated calcium potassium channels in cultured rat muscle.
13	burst kinetics of single calcium activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle	D&apos kinetics; bursting of calcium-activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle.
13	nature of the dual caffeine sodium benzoate effect on the tonic component of the potassium contracture of the myocardium in the frog	Nature of the drug; effect of sodium benzoate double caffeine on the tonic component of frog myocardial potassium contraction.
13	inhibition by ba of background current and of its modifications by carbachol in frog atrium	Ba inhibition of bottom current and its modification by carbachol in frog atrium.
13	calcium action potentials in rat fast twitch and slow twitch muscle fibres	Key words:potential d' calcium action in rat twitch and slow-twitch muscle fibers.
13	the effect of cellular energy reserves and internal calcium ions on the potassium conductance in skeletal muscle of the frog	L' effect of cellular energy stores and internal calcium ions on potassium conductance in frog skeletal muscle.
13	kinetic properties of calcium channels of twitch muscle fibres of the frog	Frog twitching muscle fibers kinetic properties of calcium channels.
13	voltage dependent k conductance at the apical membrane of necturus gallbladder	Necturus conductance k is dependent on the tension at the apical membrane of the gallbladder.
13	the actions of d 600 aspaminol and papaverine on calcium potassium and histamine induced contractions of isolated rabbit basilar artery aorta taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle	L' action of 600-fold aspaminol and papaverine on calcium, potassium, and l' histamine induced contractions of the rabbit basilar aorta, taenia coli, and tracheal smooth muscle.
13	potassium induced depolarizations and generation of tension in barnacle muscle fibres effects of external calcium strontium and barium	Potassium induced depolarizations and tension production in the barnacle muscle fibers, the effects of external strontium calcium and barium.
13	effect of 4 aminopyridine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membrane	Effect of 4 aminopyridine on permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membrane.
13	ruthenium red differential effects on excitation and excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Differential effects of ruthenium red on excitation-contraction d' excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effects of ouabain and potassium on rabbit arterial smooth muscle cells in culture	Effect of ouabain and potassium on smooth muscle cells in cultured rabbit arterial.
13	effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction of frog tonic muscle fibers	Effects of hypertonic solutions on frog tonic muscle fiber contraction.
13	calcium mediates the light induced decrease in maintained k current in limulus ventral photoreceptors	Calcium plays a role in the light-induced decrease of the maintained k-current in limulus ventral photoreceptors.
13	intracellular injection of guanyl nucleotides alters the serotonin induced increase in potassium conductance in aplysia neuron r15	L' intracellular injection of guanyl nucleotides alters l' serotonin-induced increase of the potassium conductance in neuron r15 of l' aplysia.
13	non stationary fluctuations of the potassium conductance at the node of ranvier of the frog	Non-stationary fluctuations of the frog's keratin conductance at the rump knot.
13	regulation of delayed afterdepolarizations and aftercontractions in dog ventricular muscle fibres	Regulation of delayed contractions in dog ventricular muscle fibers post-depolarizations and post-contractions.
13	assessment of selective inhibition of rat cerebral cortical calcium independent and calcium dependent phosphodiesterases in crude extracts using deoxycyclic amp and potassium ions	Evaluation of apo; selective inhibition of the calcium phosphodiesterases-dependent and independent of rat cerebral cortex in crude extracts at apo; aid of deoxycyclic and apo light bulbs; potassium ions.
13	potential and k activity in skinned muscle fibers evidence against a simple donnan equilibrium	Potential and activity in denuded muscle fibers indicate that there is no potential; simple balance of data.
13	analysis of the effects of cesium ions on potassium channel currents in biological membranes	Analysis of the effects of cesium ions on the potassium channel currents in biological membranes.
13	potassium channel kinetics in squid axons with elevated levels of external potassium concentration	Potassium channel kinetics in the squid axons exhibit high concentrations of external potassium.
13	hydrogen isotope effect on transport of potassium ion in rice seedlings equilibrated with deuterium oxide	Isotope effect of apos; hydrogen on phosphate transport; potassium ion in rice seedlings equilibrated with phosphate phosphate; deuterium oxide.
13	potassium in skeletal muscle in untreated primary hypertension and in chronic renal failure studied by x ray fluorescence technique	Potassium in skeletal muscle of untreated primary hypertension and lacidosis; chronic renal failure has been studied by the X-ray fluorescence technique.
13	localized ca2 and calcium activated potassium conductances in terminals of a barnacle photoreceptor	Calcium- and ca2-activated potassium conductances located at the d&apos terminals; a barnacle photoreceptor were activated by calcium.
13	role of dietary potassium and magnesium in diuretic treated patients with cardiac insufficiency	The role of potassium and magnesium in the diet; diuretics for patients with diabetes; heart failure.
13	potassium conductivity of the plasma membrane of frog photoreceptor cells	Potassic plasma membrane conductivity of frog photoreceptor cells.
13	charge movement in skeletal muscle fibers paralyzed by the calcium entry blocker d600	Load movement in skeletal muscle fibers, which is paralyzed by the d600 d*apos blocker; calcium input.
13	asymmetric proton block of inward rectifier k channels in skeletal muscle	Asymmetric proton block of k channels of the rectifier entering the skeletal muscle.
13	calcium channel activation in vascular smooth muscle by bay k 8644	Activation of the calcium channel in vascular smooth muscle by 8644 bay.
14	sequelae of bacterial meningitis in infants	Meningococcal meningitis in infants.
14	cryothalamectomy for parkinson s disease	Cryothalamectomy for Parkinson's Disease.
14	interventricular communication with heart failure in newborn and older infants evaluation of medical treatment	Interventricular communication with heart failure in newborn-and older infants Assessment of medical treatment.
14	a clinical study of chronic pancreatitis	Clinical study of chronic pancreatitis.
14	post necrotic cirrhosis with chronic cholestasis	Cirrhosis post-necrotic with a chronic cholestasis.
14	adult coeliac disease	Celiac disease of adults.
14	the course and prognosis of ulcerative colitis	L' evolution and prognosis of ulcerative colitis.
14	prognostic value of high 10 minute i 131 uptake in non toxic goitres	Prognostic value d' high intake of 131 by non-toxic goitres for 10 minutes.
14	observations on the value of mitral commissurotomy an analysis of long term results	Observations on the value of mitral commissurotomy: an analysis of long-term outcomes.
14	syringomyelia a clinical review of 75 cases	Syringomyelia, clinical review of 75 cases.
14	is phenacetin a nephrotoxin a report on twenty three users of the drug	C' is the phenacetin, a nephrotoxin, a report on twenty-three users of this drug.
14	acute purulent meningitis in alaska natives epidemiology diagnosis and prognosis	Acute Purulent Meningitis (APM) among indigenous people in Alaska; Epidemiological diagnosis and epidemiologic prognosis.
14	a follow up evaluation of the treatment of chronic alcoholics	This is a follow-up evaluation of chronic alcohol abuse treatment.
14	skin homografts in patients with cancer of the cervix	Homografts of the skin in patients with cervical cancer.
14	x ray pelvimetry	X-ray pelvimetry.
14	the value of pulmonary function studies in the assessment of patients for cardiac surgery	The value of studies on lung function in the evaluation of patients for cardiac surgery.
14	pathology of tumours in children	Tumor pathology in children.
14	myeloma proteins and the clinical response to melphalan therapy	The protein content of myeloma and the clinical response to melphalan therapy.
14	the significance of regional lumph node metastases in breast carcinoma	The importance of breast cancer in the prevention of coronary artery disease.
14	sarcoidosis and polyarthritis	Sarcoidosis and polyarthritis.
14	malignant neoplasms of the nasopharynx	Malignant nasopharyngeal neoplasms.
14	traumatic intrauterine adhesions the fritsch asherman syndrome	Intra-traumatic uterine adhesions to Fritsch Asherman syndrome.
14	diagnosis and treatment of delirium	Diagnosis and treatment of the delusion.
14	sarcoidosis	Sarcoidosis.
14	the clinical spectrum of renal insufficiency during acute glomerulonephritis in the adult	The clinical spectrum of kidney failure during acute glomerulonephritis in adults.
14	clinical results of thromboendarterectomy for peripheral atherosclerotic occlusive disease	Clinical results of a thromboendarterectomy for peripheral atherosclerotic occlusive disease.
14	ovarian cancer at the ontario cancer foundation clinics 1938 1958	Cancer de l'apos; ovary in clinics of foundation against cancer of l'apos; ontario 1938 1958.
14	the prognostic significance of circulating tumour cells a five year follow up study of patients with cancer of the breast	Lapses; prognostic importance of circulating tumour cells in a five-year follow-up study in breast cancer and stroke patients.
14	dizziness and head injury	Vertigo and head injuries.
14	the acid base status in cyanotic congenital heart disease	L' acid-base status in cyanotic congenital heart disease.
14	the natural history of tumours of the urinary tract	Lapos; natural history of urinary tract tumors.
14	gastric lymphosarcoma and pseudolymphoma reappraisal of 12 cases of gastric lymphosarcoma	Gastric lymphosarcoma and pseudolymphoma have re-evaluated 12 cases of gastric lymphosarcoma.
14	mammary tumor inhibition and lung adenoma induction by isonicotinic acid hydrazide	Inhibition of mammary tumours and induction of apo; lung adenomas by apo; apo-hydrazide; and isonicotinic acid.
14	reticuloendothelial system phagocytic function in patients with hodgkin s disease	Phagocytic functions of the reticulo system in patients with Hodgkin's disease.
14	epidemiological basis of tuberculosis eradication 7 application of life table methods for assessing the prognosis for tuberculosis patients	Epidemiological Basis of Disease; Tuberculosis Eradication 7 Application of life table methods to assess the prognosis of the TB patient.
14	the management of acute leukemia	Acute leukemia is a major health problem in Canada.
14	the influence of morphology on prognosis in acute leukemia	L' influence of morphology on acute leukemia disease prognosis.
14	prognosis for patients with ventricular septal defect and severe pulmonary vascular obstructive disease	The prognosis will be determined for patients with ventricular septal defects and severe obstructive pulmonary vascular disease.
14	ulcerative colitis with liver disease	Ulcer colitis with liver disease.
14	epidemiological basis of tuberculosis eradication 8 some factors of significance for the prognosis for a tuberculosis patient	Disease Epidemiological Basis; Tuberculosis Eradication 8 Some important factors in the prognosis of a TB patient.
14	lethal complications of the ehlers danlos syndrome	Fatal complications of ehlers danlos syndrome.
14	lactic acidosis in diabetes	L' lactic acidosis in diabetes.
14	acidaemia and salicylate poisoning in adults	Acute acidemia and salicylate poisoning in adults.
14	carcinoma of the breast in women 35 years of age or younger	Breast cancer among women 35 years and younger.
14	prognosis in tetraplegia	Projection of tetraplegia.
14	clinical classification of extent of disease in cancer of the breast	Clinical classification of breast cancer; extent of disease in breast cancer.
14	value of routine cardiac monitoring in the management of acute myocardial infarction outside a coronary care unit	The value of routine cardiac surveillance in the treatment of acute myocardial infarction; external d' coronary care unit.
14	erythraemia in renal transplantation	Erythraemia in renal transplants.
14	objectivized diagnosis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease diagnostic and prognostic value of routine laparoscopy	Objective diagnosis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease (PID) and prognostic value of routine laparoscopy.
14	return to work experiences of a hospital rehabilitation officer	Return to work from a rehabilitation officer at a hospital.
14	indirect assessment of left ventricular performance in acute myocardial infarction	Indirect evaluation of left ventricular performance in the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	prognosis in early adult life of coeliac children treated with a gluten free diet	Early adult prognosis; children treated with a gluten-free diet.
14	infection with the avian battey group of mycobacteria in england and wales	Infection by the group of avian Mycobacterial Mice (AMM) bats in England and Wales.
14	operative treatment of typhoid perforation of the bowel	Surgical treatment of the perforation of the apos; bowel by typhoid.
14	malignant degeneration of benign cystic teratomas of the ovary review of the literature and report of a chondrosarcoma and carcinoid tumor	Malignant degeneration of mild cystic teratoma of the ovary after literature review and report; chondrosarcoma and d' a carcinoid tumour.
14	myosarcomas of the bladder and prostate	Bladder and prostate myosarcomas.
14	lymphovenous shunts in man	Acute lymphoblastic aberrations in men.
14	testing the vision of cataract patients by means of laser generated interference fringes	Testing the vision of patients with cataracts using d*apos fringe; laser-generated interference.
14	cardiovascular state of newly discovered diabetic women	L-apos; cardiovascular status of newly discovered diabetic women.
14	gastrointestinal lymphoma in childhood	Gastro lymphoma-intestinal in children.
14	management of high risk pregnancy report of a combined obstetrical and neonatal intensive care unit	Management of reported high-risk pregnancies in a combined obstetric and neonatal intensive care unit.
14	enzyme activity acidic nuclear proteins and prognosis in human breast cancer	Acid nuclear protein enzymatic activity and prognosis in human breast cancer.
14	earlier diagnosis and survival in lung cancer	Early diagnosis and survival of lung cancer.
14	natural history of diverticular disease of the colon a review of 521 cases	Natural history of diverticular bowel disease: a review of 521 cases.
14	reappraisal of clinical features of diverticular disease of the colon	Re-evaluation of the clinical characteristics of patients with diverticular bowel disease.
14	long term prognosis after mitral annuloplasty for acquired mitral insufficiency clinical evaluation	In the long term, the prognosis after os; mitral annuloplasty for os; clinical assessment of os; acquired mitral insufficiency has been established.
14	long term follow up of direct current cardioversion after cardiac surgery with special reference to quinidine	Long-term follow-up of current direct cardioversion following cardiac surgery, particularly with respect to quinidine therapy.
14	value of serial p wave changes in indicating left heart failure in myocardial infarction	The value of serial changes in the apos; p-wave indicating left heart failure in the apos; myocardial infarction.
14	primary pulmonary hypertension eosinophilia and filariasis in ceylon	Eosinophilia-induced primary pulmonary hypertension and filariasis in ceylon.
14	mesonephroid tumours of the ovary	Mesonephroid tumours of the epidermis; ovary.
14	liquor bilirubin levels in normal pregnancy a reassessment of early prediction of haemolytic disease	Liqueur bilirubin level during normal pregnancy; reassessment of early prediction of hemolytic disease.
14	accidental hypothermia	Accidental hypothermia!
14	host resistance and survival in carcinoma of breast a study of 104 cases of medullary carcinoma in a series of 1 411 cases of breast cancer followed for 20 years	Drug Resistance; Host and Survival of Breast Cancer: Study of 104 cases of spinal cord carcinoma in a series of 1,411 cases of breast cancer followed for 20 years.
14	myelomatosis comparison of melphalan and cyclophosphamide therapy	Comparison of the myelomatosis of melphalan and cyclophosphamide.
14	medical presentations of choriocarcinoma	Medical evidence of a choriocarcinoma.
14	bleeding from esophageal varices in cirrhosis of the liver hemodynamic and radiological criteria for the selection of potential bleeders through hepatic and umbilicoportal catheterization studies	Oesophageal varicose vein haemorrhage in cirrhosis of the liver, hemodynamic and radiological criteria for the selection of potential hepatic and umbilicoportal vascular bleeding.
14	growth of metastases from p 388 sarcoma in the rat followig whole body irradiation	The growth of metastasis from p 388 sarcoma in rats follows whole-body irradiation.
14	possible clinical implications of therapeutically induced temperature changes in continuously monitored tumour mass preliminary report	Possible clinical effects of temperature changes; therapeutic origin in preliminary report of tumour mass under continuous monitoring.
14	pericarditis after acute myocardial infarction	Pericarditis from acute myocardial infarction.
14	natural history and treatment of wilms s tumour an analysis of 335 cases occurring in england and wales 1962 6	Natural history and tumour treatment wilms an analysis of 335 cases in England and Wales in 1962.
14	management of breast cancer in old age	Management of breast cancer in the elderly population.
14	long term prognosis following ventricular fibrillation in acute ischaemic heart disease	Long-term projection after ventricular fibrillation in acute ischemic heart disease.
14	the prognosis and risk of missing malignant disease in patients with unexplained and functional diarrhoea	The prognosis and risk of diabetes mellitus; absence of malignant neoplasm in patients with unexplained and functional diarrhea.
14	neuraminidase activity in bacterial meningitis	L' neuraminidase activity in bacterial meningitis.
14	fate of surviving low birth weight infants with coagulation deficiencies on the first day of life	The fate of new low-birth-weight-with problems with clotting on the first day of life.
14	sudden death in hospital after discharge from coronary care unit	Acute death in a hospital after discharge; coronary care unit.
14	electroencephalographic prediction of fatal anoxic brain damage after resuscitation from cardiac arrest	Electroencephalographic prediction of fatal anoxic brain damage following resuscitation from heart arrest.
14	long term ventricular pacing in treatment of sinoatrial block	Long-term ventricular stimulation in the treatment of-atrial sino blockade.
14	reliability of physical signs in patients with severe attacks of ulcerative colitis	Reliability of physical signs in patients with apo; a severe case of ulcerative colitis.
14	ileo rectal anastomosis for crohn s disease of the colon	Isoo rectal anastomosis for Crohn's disease of the colon.
14	ventricular hypertrophy in cardiomyopathy	Ventricular hypertrophy to cardiomyopathy.
14	prognosis of idiopathic cardiomegaly in jamaica with reference to the coronary arteries and other factors	The prognosis of idiopathic cardiomegaly in Jamaica for coronary and dapos arteries; other factors.
14	prognosis in acute cerebrovascular accidents in relation to respiratory pattern and blood gas tensions	The prognosis of acute stroke related to respiratory and blood gas stress.
14	a two year experience with human heart transplantation	A two-year experience in the field of human heart transplantation.
14	indications for hypophysectomy in diabetic retinopathy and cancer of the breast and prostate	Indications of apo; hypophysectomy in diabetic retinopathy and in breast and prostate cancer.
14	prediction of hypothyroidism after partial thyroidectomy for thyrotoxicosis	Hypothyroidism after partial thyroidectomy for thyrotoxicosis.
14	lignocaine therapy for ventricular ectopic activity after acute myocardial infarction a double blind trial	Treatment with lignocaine of the apos; ventricular ectopic activity following acute myocardial infarction in a double-blind trial.
14	factors influencing survival in carcinoma of the ovary	The factors that influence survival in ovarian cancer.
14	spina bifida cystica an orthopaedic criterion for the early closure of myelomeningocoeles	Spina bifida cystica is an orthopaedic criterion for early closure of myelomeningocles.
14	comparison of streptokinase and heparin in treatment of isolated acute massive pulmonary embolism	Streptokinase vs. heparin in the treatment of apos; isolated acute massive pulmonary embolism.
14	rheumatic diseases of the central nervous system in children	Rheumatic diseases of the central nervous system in the children.
14	right bundle branch block and left axis deviation in acute myocardial infarction	Right bundle branch block and left bundle deflection in the left bundle; left bundle in the left bundle; acute myocardial infarction.
14	classification of leukemias	Classification of the leukemia.
14	histological diagnosis of precancerous and early stages in cancer of the cervix uteri	Histological diagnosis of the pre-cancer and early stages of cervical cancer.
14	trial of maintenance therapy in schizophrenia	Apos testing; apo therapy; maintenance in schizophrenics.
14	an analysis of clinical and histopathological features in 101 cases of carcinoma of breast in women under 35 years of age	Clinical and histopathological characteristics of 101 cases of breast carcinoma in women under 35 years of age.
14	the use of discriminant analysis for examining the histological feathers of oral keratoses and lichen planus	L' use of l' discriminant analysis to examine histological feathers of oral keratoses and planus lichens.
14	adrenocortical activity in disseminated malignant disease in relation to prognosis	L*apos; adrenocortical activity in disseminated malignant neoplasm relative to prognosis.
14	peritoneal dialysis by indwelling catheter for chronic renal failure 1963 1968	Lifelong peritoneal dialysis for chronic renal failure 1963-1968.
14	polycythemia and budd chiari syndrome apropos of 17 cases	Bud polycythemia and budding Chiari syndrome have been reported in 17 cases.
14	prognosis for patients with severe brain injuries	Prognosis for patients with severe brain damage.
14	kantamaneni bd curzon g comparison of benefit from l dopa in parkinsonism with increase of amine metabolites in the csf	Kantamaneni bd curzon g compare the benefits of l dopa in the parkinsonism with apos; increase of amine metabolites in csf.
14	closed head trauma and aphasia	Closed head trauma and aphasia.
14	symptomatic cysts of the telencephalic choroid plexus	Symptomatic telencephalic choroid plexus cysts.
14	congenital aortic stenosis follow up of surgical management	Follow-up of the congenital aortic stenosis after surgical management.
14	spontaneous intracerebral haemorrhage in patients suspected of multiple sclerosis	Acute spontaneous intracerebral bleeding in patients suspected of multiple sclerosis.
14	complications of the landry guillain barr strohl syndrome	Stroboscopic syndrome complications Landry Guillain Barr Strohl.
14	a combined clinical and histological assessment of survival of patients with hodgkin s disease	Combined clinical and histological assessment of the survival of Hodgkin's patients.
14	acute myocardial infarction home and hospital treatment	Acute myocardial infarction at home and treatment at hospital.
14	fat laden macrophages in cerebrospinal fluid as an indication of brain damage in children	Fat-laden cerebrospinal fluid macrophages-spinal cord as an indication of brain damage in children.
14	recurrence of crohn s disease after primary excisional surgery	Recurrence of Crohn's disease after primary surgery; excision.
14	ischaemic heart disease a secondary prevention trial using clofibrate report by a research committee of the scottish society of physicians	Ischemic heart disease is a secondary prevention trial using a d&apos clofibrate report; a research committee of the Scottish Society of Physicians.
14	the pattern of female genital tuberculosis in ibadan	A profile of female genital tuberculosis in ibadan.
14	prognosis of pituitary adenomas with arteriographic abnormal vascularization	The prognosis of pituitary adenomas showing abnormal arteriographic vascularity.
14	ependymal cyst of the spinal cord case report	Ependymal cyst from spinal cord case report.
14	common carotid ligation for the treatment of ruptured posterior communicating aneurysms	Ligation of the common carotid artery for the treatment of ruptured posterior aneurysms.
14	idiopathic polyneuritis serial studies of nerve and immune functions	Serial studies of the idiopathic polynaeuritis of immune and neural functions.
14	histology in breast cancer prognosis	L' histology of prognosis of breast cancer.
14	portal hypertension in primary biliary cirrhosis	L' hypertension is found in primary biliary cirrhosis.
14	the posterior operation in treatment of cervical spondylosis with myelopathy a long term follow up study	L' postoperative treatment of cervical spondylosis with myelopathy in a long-term follow-up study.
14	invasion of cranial nerves by salivary cylindroma four cases treated by radiotherapy	Cranial nerve infection by salivary cylinder four cases treated with radiotherapy.
14	hormonal treatment of metastases of renal carcinoma	Hormonal treatment of oral mets; hypernephrome.
14	breast cancer grading	Classification of breast cancers.
14	survival of burkitt s lymphoma patients in ghana	Survival of patients suffering from lymphoma burkitt s in the ghana.
14	the relative significance of prognostic factors in breast carcinoma	L'apos; the relative importance of prognostic factors in breast cancer.
14	pathological factors in survival of lung tumours local extent size and nodal involvement	Pathological factors in the survival of lung tumors locally extensive size and size; nodal involvement.
14	adenocarcinoma of the large bowel	Adenocarcinoma of the large intestine?
14	duration of survival of children with acute leukaemia report to the medical research council from the committee on leukaemia and the working party on leukaemia in childhood	The duration of survival of children with acute leukemia is reported by the Leukemia Committee and the Child Leukemia Working Group to the Medical Research Council.
14	factors influencing immediate prognosis in acute renal failure with special reference to prophylactic hemodialysis	Factors influencing immediate prognosis of apotism; acute renal failure, particularly apo; prophylactic hemodialysis.
14	diagnostic and prognostic value of the eeg in the immediate aftermath of cranial trauma	Diagnostic and prognostic value of apos; eg immediately after head trauma.
14	liquor bilirubin levels and false prediction of severity in rhesus haemolytic disease	Dapos; bilirubin alcohol and false prediction of rhesus hemolytic disease severity.
14	prognostic typing in breast cancer	Prognostic typing of breast cancer.
14	prognosis for the infertile couple	Well, the prognosis for the infertile couple.
14	the effects of levodopa therapy in patients with parkinson s disease i clinical response	The effects of levodopa treatment in patients with Parkinson's disease i the clinical response.
14	prognostic implications of electroencephalographic findings of hypsarrhythmia in first year of life	Prognostic effects of electroencephalographic results of apo; hypsarrhythmia in the first year of life.
14	recent advances in neuroblastoma	Recent progress in neuroblastoma.
14	efficacy of a regional poisoning treatment centre in preventing further suicidal behaviour	Efficacy of treatment; a regional treatment centre for suicide; poisoning to prevent other suicidal behaviours.
14	idiopathic palsy of the recurrent laryngeal nerve a transient cranial mononeuropathy	Recurrent idiopathic paralysis of the laryngeal nerve, a type of transient cranial mononeuropathy.
14	natural history of patients with x ray negative dyspepsia in general practice	Natural history of patients with negative X-ray dyspepsia in general practice.
14	outpatient treatment trial of mild and severe hypertension	Trial of outpatient treatment of l*apos; mild and severe hypertension.
14	relation between age of onset of obesity and size and number of adipose cells	Relationship between age; age; appearance of obesity; size and number of fat cells.
14	accuracy of predictions of survival in later stages of cancer	L' accuracy of predictions of survival at later stages of cancer.
14	assisted circulation following myocardial infarction a review of 25 patients treated before 1971	Assisted Circulation following Myocardial Infarction: examination of 25 patients treated prior to 1971.
14	nephrotic syndrome in adult africans in nairobi	Nephrotic syndrome in African adults in Nairobi.
14	analgesic nephropathy	Pain medication nephropathy.
14	venous graft surgery in treatment of coronary heart disease	Venous transplant surgery for the treatment of coronary heart disease.
14	75 se selenomethionine scanning in the diagnosis of tumours of the pancreas and adjacent viscera the use of the test and its impact on survival	Scan 75 is selenomethionine in the diagnosis of pancreatic tumors and adjacent viscera; use of the test and its impact on survival.
14	alpha fetoprotein in abortion	Lapses; fetoprotein alpha in abortion.
14	the surgical significance of methaemalbuminaemia	The surgical significance of methaemalbuminemia.
14	in vitro oestrogen sensitivity of breast cancer	In vitro, estrogen sensitivity in breast cancer.
14	neurophysiological identification of a late infantile form of neuronal lipidosis	Neurophysiological identification of a late childhood form of neural lipidosis.
14	factors in pathogenesis of central nervous system leukaemia	Pathogenic factors to central nervous system leukemia.
14	plama estradiol estriol and progesterone in human pregnancy ii clinical applications in rh isoimmunization disease	Plama estradiol estriol and progesterone during human pregnancy ii Rh isoimmunization disease clinical applications.
14	small strokes in the carotid territory associated with a normal carotid arteriogram	Small strokes in his carotid artery associated with a normal carotid arterogram.
14	impairment of memory functions after acute head injury	Deterioration of the memory function after acute head trauma.
14	cubital tunnel external compression syndrome	This is an external compression syndrome of the cuital tunnel.
14	chronic lumbar extradural haematoma simulating disc syndrome	Chronic lumbar extradural hematoma simulating disc syndrome?
14	medulloblastoma treatment and prognosis a study of seventeen cases in ten years	Treatment and prognosis of medulloblastoma infection: study of ten-seven cases in ten years.
14	phenothiazine poisoning a review of 48 cases	Poisoning phenothiazine an examination of 48 cases.
14	long term study of disodium cromoglycate in treatment of severe extrinsic or intrinsic bronchial asthma in adults brompton hospital medical research council collaborative trial	In addition, the results of a long-term study of disodium cromoglycate in the treatment of severe extrinsic or intrinsic bronchial asthma in adult brompton Hospital Medical Research Council.
14	cerebellar haematomas caused by angiomas in children	Brain hematoma caused by angioma in children.
14	clinical features of yellow fever cases at vom christian hospital during the 1969 epidemic on the jos plateau nigeria	Clinical characteristics of cases of yellow fever at apo; Christian vomit hospital during apo; 1969 plague on jos nigeria plateau.
14	evolution of the acid base status in cardiac arrest	L'évolution de l'apos; state of the acid base in the apos; cardiac arrest.
14	chronic budd chiari syndrome due to obstruction of the intrahepatic portion of the inferior vena cava	Symptoms of chronic rhinitis; obstruction of the intrahepatic portion of the inferior vena cava.
14	structural changes in the early stages of duchenne muscular dystrophy	Structural changes in the early stages of muscular dystrophy of the duchenne.
14	russell s diencephalic syndrome of early childhood	Early childhood dencephalic syndrome, Russell.
14	pneumoencephalo roulette tomography of operated primary pontine haemorrhage with long survival report of two cases	Pneumoencephalo roulette tomography of the apos; primary pontic hemorrhage procedure performed with long-term survival ratio of two cases.
14	national surgical breast project	National breast-surgical project.
14	placental lactogen levels as guide to outcome of threatened abortion	Lactogen placental rate as an indicator of pregnancy; outcome; unsafe abortion.
14	herpesvirus hominis infection in patients with myeloproliferative and lymphoproliferative disorders	Herpesvirus hominis infection in patients with myeloproliferative disorders and lymphoproliferative disorders.
14	spontaneous rupture of hepatocellular carcinoma	Acute spontaneous rupture of the hepatocellular carcinoma.
14	evaluation of a rapid latex agglutination test for detection of alpha1 fetoprotein	Evaluation of a rapid latex agglutination test for the detection of foetoprotein alpha1.
14	cranial and spinal meningiomas in a pair of identical twin boys	Spinal and cranial meningiomas in a pair of identical twins.
14	onset early stages and prognosis of rheumatoid arthritis a clinical study of 100 patients with 11 year follow up	Early stages and prognosis of rheumatoid arthritis begin in a clinical study of 100 patients with 11 years of follow-up.
14	prognosis of guillain barr syndrome in the african the nigerian experience	The prognosis of Guillain Barr syndrome in Africa l' Nigerian experience.
14	relation between radiographic categories of coalworkers pneumoconiosis and expectation of life	Relationship between the radiographic categories of workers in pneumoconiosis and l' life expectancy.
14	a comparison of two methods of prognostic typing in breast cancer	Comparison of prognostic typing methods for breast cancer.
14	short and long term prognosis after myocardial infarction	A long-term and short-term prognosis after a post-mortem MI.
14	life threatening dermatoses	It's fatal dermatosis.
14	acute renal cortical necrosis variable course and changing prognosis	Variable acute renal cortical necrosis and a change in prognosis.
14	tubal ectopic pregnancy etiology and obstetric and gynecologic sequelae	Pregnancy etiology extra-uterine and obstetric and gynaecological sequelae.
14	prognostic typing in breast cancer further investigation of a necropsy series compared with recent surgical specimens	Prognostic typing of breast cancer was the subject of a further investigation in the course of a series of necropsies compared to recent surgical specimens.
14	narcolepsy	Narcolepsy.
14	the immediate antecedents of myocardial infarction in active men	Immediate history of onset of myocardial infarction in active men.
14	motor neuron disease in nova scotia	Motor neuron disease in the scotia scotia nova.
14	children with recurrent abdominal pain how do they grow up	Children with recurrent, abdominal pain, how do they grow up @-@?
14	malignant testicular tumours	Malignant testicular tumors.
14	sleep epilepsy its pattern and prognosis	L'apos; sleep epilepsy his prognosis and pattern.
14	mixed mesodermal tumors of the uterus	Mixed, mesodermal tumours of the uterus.
14	kidney transplantation improvement in patient and graft survival	Improved survival of patients and transplants following renal transplantation.
14	influence of selection of patients on results of clinical trials	L' influence of patient selection on clinical trial results.
14	comparison of mobilization after two and nine days in uncomplicated myocardial infarction	Mobilization after two and nine days of uncomplicated myocardial infarction.
14	talking with people about to die	Talking with people who are gonna die.
14	recurrent haematuria and mesangial iga deposition	Recurrent hematuria and mesangial iga deposit, please.
14	influence of amniotic fluid volume on lecithin estimation in prediction of respiratory distress	Lapos; influence amniotic fluid volume on apos; estimate lecithin in prediction of respiratory distress.
14	cerebral blood flow and oxygen uptake and cerebrospinal fluid biochemistry in severe coma	Cerebral blood flow, absorption of epos; oxygen and cerebrospinal fluid biochemistry-spinal cord in a severe coma.
14	hypertrophic mononeuropathy	Hypertrophic mononeuropathy!
14	surgery in management of patients with leukaemia	Surgery in the management of leukemia patients.
14	neonatal necrotizing enterocolitis clinical and radiological features	Clinical and radiological characteristics of the neonatal enterocolitis.
14	failure of cerebrospinal fluid homovanillic acid to predict levodopa response in parkinson s disease	Failure of l' homovanillic acid of cerebrospinal fluid to predict levodopa response to Parkinson's disease.
14	group characteristics of children with cerebral and spinal cord tumours	Characteristics of brain tumours and spinal cord in children.
14	evaluation of tnm classification of carcinoma of the breast	Breast carcinoma tnm classification evaluation.
14	epidemiology and course of gastrointestinal haemorrhage in north east scotland	Epidemiology and Course of Gastrointestinal Hemorrhage in North East Scotland.
14	fibrin degradation products in the serum and cerebrospinal fluid of patients with group a meningococcal meningitis	Fibrin degradation products in serum and cerebrospinal fluid from apos patients; group meningococcal meningitis.
14	proceedings clinical value of predictive tests for advanced breast cancer	Clinical value of advanced breast cancer predictive testing procedures.
14	screening for hypertension some epidemiological observations	Apos testing; hypertension Some epidemiologic findings.
14	liver biopsy and prognosis in acute liver failure	Liver biopsy and prognosis; acute liver failure.
14	fibrosis as in indication of time in infiltrating breast cancer and its importance in prognosis	Fibrosis as time indication in invasive breast cancer and its importance in prognosis.
14	survival rates of lung cancer according to histological type	Lung cancer survival rate by histological type.
14	a trial of corticotrophin gelatin injection in acute optic neuritis	A test of apos; injection of corticotropin gelatin into acute optic neuritis.
14	chlorodyne dependence	Chlorodyne addiction.
14	benign rheumatoid arthritis of the aged	Benign rheumatoid arthritis in elderly persons.
14	late residua of acute idiopathic polyneuritis	Late-onset residuals; acute idiopathic polyneuritis.
14	the electroencephalogram after resuscitation of cardiocirculatory arrest	Lapses; electroencephalogram after resuscitation; cardiocirculatory arrest.
14	scleronodular type of hodgkin s disease experience at the sherbrooke university hospital center	Scleronodular type dapos; experience of Hodgkin's disease at the Sherbrooke University Hospital.
14	carcinoembryonic antigen in management of colorectal carcinoma	Carcinogenic antigen-embryonic in the management of colorectal carcinoma.
14	primary carcinoma of the gallbladder	Primary gallbladder cancer.
14	five to twenty year followup after surgery for chronic pancreatitis in 148 patients	Monitoring 5 to 20 years after onset; surgical intervention for chronic pancreatitis in 148 patients.
14	short term course and prognosis of crohn s disease	Short-term progress and prognosis of Crohn's disease.
14	retroperitoneal fibrosis associated with malignant disease	Retroperitoneal fibrosis associated with malignant liver disease.
14	selection for treatment in spina bifida cystica	Selection for treatment of spina bifida cystica.
14	predictive factors in open myelomeningocele with special reference to sensory level	Predictive factors in open myelomeningocele, especially sensory level.
14	placental lactogen levels in rhesus isoimmunization	Placental lactogen level in rhesus isoimmune events-iso.
14	evaluation of hyperventilation in treatment of head injuries	Head injury assessment; hyperventilation in the treatment of head injuries.
14	regional cerebral blood flow and intraventricular pressure in acute head injuries	Regional cerebral blood flow and intraventricular pressure in acute head injuries.
14	thrombolytic therapy in haemolytic uraemic syndrome	Thrombolytics in hemolytic uremic syndrome.
14	non specific factors that may influence significance of urinary steroid excretion in breast cancer	The non-specific factors that may influence the importance of urinary steroid excretion in breast cancer.
14	perforative carcinoma of colon and rectum	Puncture wound to the colon and rectum.
14	the significance of post traumatic status epilepticus in childhood	The significance of epilepsy; post-emergency condition-epileptic trauma in childhood.
14	posterior fossa aneurysms simulating tumours	Posterior aneurysms of the pit simulating tumors.
14	the nitroblue tetrazolium test following acute myocardial infarction	The nitroblue tetrazolium test following an acute myocardial infarction.
14	treatment of bone metastases of breast cancer with progestogens	Treatment of bone metastasis of breast cancer; aid in progestin.
14	significance of intravascular coagulation and fibrinolysis in acute hepatic failure	Labs; importance of intravascular coagulation and fibrinolysis in apos; acute hepatic failure.
14	prognosis in coronary artery disease angiographic hemodynamic and clinical factors	Coronary heart disease prognosis, hemodynamic and clinical angiographic factors.
14	pancreatic disease	Pancreatic disease.
14	prognostic significance of chronic versus acute bundle branch block in acute myocardial infarction	The prognostic significance of chronic versus acute blockade of bundle branches in acute myocardial infarction.
14	effect of aprotinin in acute myocardial infarction clinical double bind study author s transl	Effect of apo; aprotinin in apo; acute myocardial infarction, double clinical link, apo translation; study.
14	immunosuppressive therapy in pure red cell aplasia	Pure erythrocyte aplasia: immunosuppressive treatment.
14	gastric polyps prognosis and treatment	The prognosis and treatment of the gastric polyps.
14	planned splenectomy in treatment of idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura	In addition, it is recommended that patients be treated with a splenectomy for the treatment of idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura.
14	wilms tumour treatment of 113 patients from 1960 to 1971	Treatment of tumors wilms for 113 patients from 1960 to 1971.
14	prognostically favorable immunogens of human breast cancer tissue antigenic similarity to murine mammary tumor virus	Pronospecifically, human breast cancer immunogens have an antigenic similarity to murine breast tumour virus.
14	a clinicopathologic study of 92 cases of granulosa cell tumor of the ovary with special reference to the factors influencing prognosis	A clinical study of 92 cases of tumours of the ovary caused by granulosa cells, particularly with respect to factors influencing prognosis.
14	total body irradiation tbi as primary therapy for advanced lymphosarcoma	TBI of the lymphosarcoma; total body irradiation as primary therapy for advanced lymphosarcoma.
14	the in situ iud and pregnancy outcome	L-Aceos; in-situ assessment and pregnancy outcome.
14	combined modality therapy of ewing s sarcoma	Ewing sarcoma is a type of combination therapy.
14	percoelioscopy biopsy of the ovary a propos of 121 cases	Percoelioscopic biopsy of the apos; ovary about 121 cases.
14	delivery in cases with anomalous uterus	Delivery in cases where the uterus is abnormal.
14	the role of parental translocations in cases of repeated miscarriages	The role of parental translocations in the occurrence of repeated miscarriages.
14	present data on pathological anatomy of female breast carcinoma	Current data on the anatomy of breast cancer in women.
14	statistical analysis of 1 430 determinations of 24 hour urinary estriol clinical conclusions	Statistical analysis of 1,430 determinations of 24-hour clinical findings on urinary estriol.
14	autoagglutinating sperm one form of immunological male sterility	Self-agglutinating sperm, a form of immunological male sterility.
14	male breast cancer 6 factors influencing prognosis	Cancer of the breast in men 6 factors influencing prognosis.
14	prognostic significance of subacute hepatic necrosis in acute hepatitis	Lapses; prognostic importance of subacute hepatic necrosis in hepatitis; acute hepatitis.
14	radiographs of the thorax in acute myocardial infarction	Chest x-rays in the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	experimental pyelonephritis in the monkey ii the prognostic value of radionuclide evaluation of the urinary tract	Experimental Pyelonephritis in monkeys ii prognostic value of apos; evaluation of radionuclides in the urinary tract.
14	the surgical correction of fallot s tetralogy	Surgical correction of tetralogy of fallots.
14	long term results after closed mitral valvotomy	Long-term results after completion of mitral valvotomy.
14	an approach to the surgery of mitral valve disease in children	An approach to mitral valve surgery in children.
14	long term results of valve replacement in children suffering from rheumatic heart disease	The long-term results of the use of valve replacement in children with rheumatic heart disease.
14	the late fate of autologous fascia lata valve grafts in the aortic position	The late fate of fascia lata autologous valve grafts in an aortic position.
14	experience with tissue heart valves	Experience with tissue cardiac valves.
14	surgery for tricuspid valve disease	Surgery for tricuspid valvulopathy?
14	surgical therapy in acute ischemic syndromes	Surgical treatment for acute ischemic syndromes.
14	postinfarction ventricular aneurysm	Ventricular aneurysm post-infarctus.
14	results of surgery for mitral insufficiency due to coronary artery disease	Surgical results for mitral insufficiency due to coronary artery disease.
14	revascularization via healthy myocardial arteriolar networks compared with that through diseased surface coronary arteries	Relative to diseased surface coronary arteries, revascularization is mediated through the apos of healthy myocardial arteriolar networks.
14	transposition with ventricular septal defect and pulmonary stenosis the rastelli operation	Transposition with defective ventricular septation and pulmonary stenosis; rastelli operation.
14	the surgical treatment of total anomalous pulmonary venous connection	The surgical treatment of the entire abnormal pulmonary venous connection.
14	approach to assessment of risk factors in mild hypertension	Approach to assessment; assessment of risk factors in low blood pressure; mild hypertension.
14	the first urinary tract infection in the female infant prevalence recurrence and prognosis a 10 year study in private practice	The first urinary tract infection in female child prevalence recurs and prognosis d' a 10-year private practice study.
14	methods of burn treatment comparison by probit analysis	Burn treatment methods were compared with those of probit analysis.
14	early predictors of incomplete recovery in children with guillain barr e polyneuritis	Incomplete recovery in children with guillain barr and polyneuritis.
14	a clinical method for detecting subendocardial ischemia after cardiopulmonary bypass	Clinical method for detection of epos; ischemia in patients with endocardial bypass graft-respiratory.
14	myocardial revascularization in patients with poor ventricular function	Myocardial revascularization in patients with impaired ventricular function.
14	diagnosis and prognosis in colon cancer based on a profile in immune reactivity	Diagnosis and prognosis of colon cancer based on immune reactivity profile.
14	renal pelvic tumors	Renal pelvis.
14	quantitative morphometry of glomerulonephritis with crescents diagnostic and predictive value	Quantitative glomerulonephritis morphometry with diagnostic crescents and predictive value.
14	the value of radiation therapy in uterine sarcoma	The value of radiotherapy for uterine sarcoma.
14	enzymatic alterations in reye s syndrome prognostic implications	The effects of enzyme changes on the prognosis of rye syndrome.
14	optimal treatment for the technically resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the supraglottic larynx	Optimal treatment of superglotally resectable squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) of the supraglottic larynx.
14	mucosal melanomas of the head and neck	Mucous melanoma of the head and the neck.
14	therapy of consumption coagulopathy and hyperfibrinolysis with urokinase in a case of acute promyelocytic leukemia	Treatment of drinking coagulopathy and apo; hyperfibrinolysis by apo; urokinase in acute promyelocytic leukemia.
14	did the introduction of rehabilitation improve the course and prognosis of myocardial infarct	L' introduction of rehabilitation-t-improved course and prognosis of myocardial infarction?
14	predicting the duration of guam amyotrophic lateral sclerosis	Forecast the duration of Guamese amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
14	current trends in radiation therapy	Current trends in radiation therapy.
14	perceived life stress and psychopathology among mothers of young children	Perception of Stress and Psychopathology Among Mothers of Young Children.
14	a comparison of voluntary and involuntary patients in a state hospital	Comparison of voluntary and involuntary patients in a hospital in the state.
14	a teaching drill in child psychiatry	An exercise in child psychology.
14	difficulties in brief conjoint treatment of sexual dysfunction	Difficulties during birth; short treatment of joints or joints; sexual dysfunction.
14	the functions of medical care	This is what medical care is all about.
14	glomus tumors in the head and neck iii analysis of clinical manifestations	Glomus tumours in the head and neck iii analyze the clinical manifestations.
14	radiotherapy combined with hormone therapy for prostate cancer	It's called radiation therapy and hormonal therapy for prostate cancer.
14	monitoring myelomatosis	Surveillance for myeloma.
14	cellular kinetics in multiple myeloma a new approach to staging and treatment	Cell kinetics in multiple myeloma is a novel approach to staging and treatment.
14	clinical classification of plasma cell myeloma	A Clinical Classification of Plasma Myeloma.
14	igd multiple myeloma review of 133 cases	Review of 133 cases of igd multiple myeloma.
14	influence of left ventricular function on survival 3 to 4 years after aortocoronary bypass	L' influence of left ventricular function (LVF) on survival 3 to 4 years after coronary artery bypass graft.
14	precocity of pulmonary vascular obstruction of down s syndrome	Early onset of apo; pulmonary vascular obstruction of Down S Syndrome.
14	keloids in ibadan	The cheloids in ibadan.
14	hypothermia in the tropics a review of 24 cases	Hypothermia in the Tropics, study of 24 cases.
14	premonitory sign of heart block in acute posterior myocardial infarction	Early warning sign of cardiac blockage in the posterior acute myocardial infarction.
14	fibrin ogen split products of nephropathies	Fibrin ogen separate products of nephropathic nephropathy.
14	carcinoembryonic antigen test in renal cell carcinoma	Carcinoembryonic antigen test in renal cell carcinoma.
14	testicular lymphoma	Tesular lymphoma.
14	a clinicopathological review of 68 carcinomas of the gallbladder	A clinical-pathological review of 68 gallbladder carcinomas.
14	primary carcinoma of the gallbladder	Primary gallbladder cancer.
14	a clinical trial designed to discover if the primary treatment of varicose veins should be by fegan s method or by an operation	Clinical trial to determine if primary treatment of varicose veins should be done by the method of fegany or by surgery.
14	health hazard appraisal in patient counseling	Health risk assessment in the area of patient counselling.
14	chronic granulocytic leukaemia effect of elective splenectomy on the course of disease	Effect of chronic granulocytic leukemia from elective splenectomy on apos; disease progression.
14	serum ferritin in acute leukaemia at presentation and during remission	Serum ferritin in acute leukaemia patients at presentation and during remission.
14	ski injuries during growth	You know, skiing injuries while growing up.
14	cancer of the breast a study of prognostic factors as a guide in selecting cases for conservative treatment	Cancer of the breast A study of prognostic factors as a guide in the selection of cases for a conservative treatment.
14	prognosis and incidence of sex chromatin in breast cancer a preliminary report	Progress and incidence of sexual chromatin in breast cancer Preliminary report.
14	pulmonary mechanics in infants surviving severe neonatal respiratory insufficiency	Pulmonary mechanics in infants who survive severe neonatal respiratory failure.
14	the sick sinus syndrome in africans	Sine syndrome in Africa?
14	transient st segment elevation with postmyocardial infarction angina prognostic significance	Transient elevation of the st segment with prognostic significance of the apos; angina for the apos; post-infarct-myocardium.
14	age and type of onset as critical variables in early infantile autism	Age and type of onset are critical variables in early childhood autism.
14	effect of long term treatment of hyperactive children with methylphenidate	Effect of methylphenidate long-term treatment of hyperactive children.
14	non hodgkin s lymphoma patterns of relapse from complete remission after combination chemotherapy	Relapse patterns of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma following complete remission after combined chemotherapy.
14	the glycolytic enzyme activity of the human cervix uteri	Glycolytic enzyme activity of the cervix; human uterus.
14	prediction of the response to chemotherapy in acute leukemia	Prediction of response to chemotherapy in acute leukemia.
14	hemangiosarcoma of spleen with spontaneous rupture	Spleen hemangiosarcoma with spontaneous rupture.
14	adrenal cortical carcinoma a study of 32 patients	Adrenal cortical adenocarcinoma: study of 32 patients.
14	carcinoid tumors of the gastrointestinal tract	Cervoid gastrointestinal tract tumours-intestinal.
14	prognosis of the second breast cancer the role of previous exposure to the first primary	The prognosis of second breast cancer the role of lapos; pre-primary exposure.
14	malignant melanoma of the extremities a clinicopathologic study using levels of invasion microstage	Malignant melanoma of the extremities, a clinical-psychological study using micro-levels of the extremities; invasion.
14	medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland	Spinal cancer of the thyroid gland?
14	the pathologic behavior of primary vaginal carcinoma and its relationship to cervical cancer	The pathological behaviour of the primary vaginal carcinoma and its relationship to cervical cancer.
14	management of the acute abdomen in children with leukemia	Management of Immune Absorption; acute abdomen in children with leukemia.
14	cea as a monitor of gastrointestinal malignancy	This would be like a gastro-malignity monitor-intestinal.
14	primary fibrosarcoma of bone a clinicopathologic study of 130 patients	Primary Fibrosarcoma of the apos; bone a clinicopathological study of 130 patients.
14	the treatment of acute childhood leukemia predictions for the future based on extrapolations from the past	Treatment of acute leukemia in children, based on extrapolations from the past.
14	new looks in leukemia	New look in leukemia.
14	trends in surgery for childhood rhabdomyosarcoma	Trends in pediatric rhabdomyosarcoma surgery.
14	spontaneous regression and leukoderma in malignant melanoma	Spontaneous regression and leucoderm in the melanoma.
14	american burkitt s lymphoma a clinicopathologic study of 30 cases i clinical factors relating to prolonged survival	American Burkitt s lymphoma a clinical study of clinical factors related to long-term survival.
14	significance of cervicovaginal cytology after radiation therapy for cervical carcinoma	L' importance of cervical cytology after radiotherapy for carcinoma of the cervix.
14	prediction of fetal outcome in threatened abortion by maternal serum placental lactogen and alpha fetoprotein	Prediction of fetal outcome in threatened abortion by maternal serental placental lactogen and alpha fetoprotein.
14	homologous mixed m llerian tumors carcinosarcomal confined to endometrial polyps	Mixed Llerian Tumours, homologous carcinosarcoma, confined to the endometrial polyps.
14	krukenberg s spindles	Krukenberg spindles.
14	systemic endotheliomatosis a case report	Case report; systemic endotheliomatosis.
14	prognostic value of electroencephalography in cardiac surgery	Prognostic value of apo; cardiac surgical electroencephalography.
14	supervision of the initial interview a study of two methods	Supervision of the supervision of files; initial interview of files; initial interview of files; analysis of files; analysis of two methods, presence of files; change of two methods; absence of files; use of files; JJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJ
14	diagnostic criteria and five year outcome in schizophrenia a report from the international pilot study of schizophrenia	Diagnostic Criteria and Five-Year Results of Schizophrenia A report from the International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia.
14	intertrochanteric fractures the role of complications of fixation	Intertrochanteric fractures the role of the fixation complications.
14	hemipelvectomy	Hemipelectomy.
14	perfusion of ischemic ulcers of the extremity a prognostic indicator of healing	A prognostic indicator of healing is the infusion of ischemic end ulcers.
14	herpes simplex encephalitis prognosis and long term follow up	The prognosis of herpes simplex encephalitis and the long-term follow-up.
14	invasive squamous cell carcinoma of the conjunctiva	Invasive, squamous cell carcinoma of the conjunctiva.
14	long term maintenance therapy with azathioprine in systemic lupus erythematosus	Dosage; long-term apo maintenance; azathioprin in systemic lupus erythematosus.
14	pneumococcal antigen in lobar pneumonia	Acute pneumococcal antigen in the lobar pneumonia.
14	the prognosis in aplastic anemia	The prognosis of aplastic anemia.
14	quality of survival following direct surgery for anterior communicating artery aneurysms	Survival quality after apo; direct surgery for apo aneurysms; communicating anterior artery.
14	complex surveillance of streptococcus pyogenes i immunological surveys of anti m antibodies and possibilities of long term epidemiological prognosis	Complex surveillance of streptococcus pyogenes i antibody immunologic studies-m and long-term epidemiologic prognosis.
14	capsular and vascular invasion important prognostic factors in wilms tumor	Invasion of capsular and vascular important prognostic factors in wilms tumour.
14	the efficacy of combining radiation therapy with a surgical procedure in patients with cervical metastasis from squamous cancer of the oropharynx and hypopharynx	Effectiveness of radiotherapy combined with surgical intervention in patients with apo; cervical metastasis caused by squamous cell cancer; oropharyngeal cancer; hypopharyngeal cancer.
14	the possible prognostic usefulness of assessing serum proteins and cholesterol in malignancy	Lapses; possible prognostic utility of immunotherapy; assessment of serum protein and cholesterol in malignant neoplasms.
14	prognosis of squamous cell carcinoma of the gums with cytologically verified cervical lymph node metastases	Cytologically verified cervical lymph node metastasis of squamous cell carcinoma of the gums.
14	early childhood development of four boys with 47 xxy karyotype	Early childhood development of four boys with 47 xxy karyotypes.
14	psycho sexual disorders and their treatment part ii	Psychosocial disorders-sexual and their treatment ii.
14	the prognosis in pregnancy after threatened abortion	Your pregnancy prognosis after a threat of abortion.
14	urinary oestrone and chorionic gonadotrophin in threatened abortion	Urinary anestrone and chorionic gonadotropin (CHG) in cases of unsafe abortions.
14	bleeding in early pregnancy investigated by ultrasound plasma progesterone and oestradiol	Hemorrhage early in pregnancy studied by ultrasonic plasma progesterone and estradiol.
14	evaluation of the outcome of pregnancy in threatened abortion by biochemical methods	Assessment of pregnancy outcome in cases of biochemically threatened abortion.
14	constitutional narrowing of the cervical spinal canal radiological and clinical findings	Clinical and radiological results of the cervical spinal canal are reduced.
14	renal cell carcinoma natural history and chemotherapeutic experience	Natural history of diabetes mellitus; renal adenocarcinoma and chemotherapy experience.
14	nephrocalcinosis in infancy and childhood	Bacteriological effects of chloroquine in rats.
14	angiographic study of congenital aortic stenosis author s transl	Angiographic study of congenital aortic stenosis.
14	recurrent acute renal failure with idiopathic paroxysmal myoglobinuria	Recurrent acute renal failure with idiopathic paroxysmal myoglobinuria.
14	prognosis of the immediate outcome of myocardial infarct according to data of acid base and blood oxygen balance	Prognosis of diabetes; immediate outcome of stroke; myocardial infarction based on acid-base and blood oxygen balance data.
14	survival and state of patients during the 1st year after myocardial infarct according to data of epidemiological study myocardial infarct register	Survival and condition of patients in the first year following myocardial infarction according to data from the myocardial infarction registry; epidemiological study.
14	intraarterial vasopressin in the treatment of upper gastrointestinal hemorrhage a prospective controlled clinical trial	Intra-<-> arterial vasopressin in the treatment of gastro-vascular hemorrhage-intestinal superior to prospective controlled clinical trial.
14	phlegmonous gastritis	Gastriosis phlegmatic.
14	narrowing the gap between medical and mental health evaluation	Reducing the gap between assessments; medical assessment and assessment; mental health assessment.
14	acute renal failure in multiple myeloma	Acute renal failure in multiple myeloma.
14	mononeuritis multiplex a complication of open heart surgery	Mononeuritis multiplex is a complication of open-heart surgery.
14	hepatic reaction in ulcerative colitis and crohn s disease author s transl	Hepatic reaction to both ulcerative colitis and Crohn's disease.
14	investigations on the heredity of the nephrotic syndrome author s transl	Studies on apos; heredity of apos; translator of nephrotic syndrome.
14	long term results of surgical treatment of spinal tumours in children and adolescents	Long-term outcomes of the surgical treatment of the spinal tumours in children and adolescents.
14	hemolytic uremic syndrome in families	Hemolytic and uremic syndrome in the family.
14	clinical aspects of bilateral renal dysplasia in children	The clinical aspects of bilateral renal dysplasia (RCD) in children.
14	prognosis of chronic renal failure iii survival after one peritoneal dialysis	The prognosis of chronic renal failure iii survival following peritoneal dialysis.
14	mycotic keratitis by fusarium a review and report of two cases	Mysococcal keratitis per fusarium, review and report of two cases.
14	long term treatment and prognosis of malignant tumors of the nasopharynx	Long-term treatment and prognosis of the nasopharyngeal malignancies.
14	malignant tumours of the oral cavity a study of 177 cases	Study of 177 cases of malignant bowel tumours.
14	clinical course of post traumatic coma	L' clinical evolution of the post-mortem coma-traumatic.
14	prognosis of traumatic decerebrated rigidity	The prognosis of a decerebrated, traumatic stiffness.
14	computerized eeg predictor of outcome in schizophrenia	Episode-based predictor of diabetes mellitus.
14	testicular tumors in childhood	Testicular tumors in the early childhood.
14	plasma gonadotropins and androgens in surgically treated cryptorchid patients	Surgical gonadotropins and androgens in cryptorchid patients.
14	silastic abdominal patch for temporary hepatomegaly in stage iv s neuroblastoma	Neuroblastoma nervosa: an abdominal silicone patch for temporary hepatomegaly in stage iv.
14	cancer of the transverse colon a cancer diagnosed too late	Transverse colorectal cancer diagnosed too late.
14	hypovolemic shocks simulating severe pulmonary embolism 20 cases	Acute hypovolemic shock simulating severe pulmonary embolism 20 cases.
14	acute necrotizing enterocolitis in infancy a review of 64 cases	Infants with acute necrotizing Enterocolitis, 64 cases examined.
14	new data about oligoblastic leukemias apropos of an analysis of 120 cases	New data on the traceletal leukemias about apoes; analysis of 120 cases.
14	correlation of pre treatment serum 17 hydroxycorticosteroid values with survival in patients with prostatic cancer	Correlation among 17 serum apo values; pre-treatment hydroxycorticosteroids in patients with apo; prostate cancer.
14	acute pancreatitis	Pancreatitis, acute.
14	prognosis of the effect of cardiac glycosides on the extrasystole in ischemic heart disease	Apos prognosis; effect of cardiac glycosides on apos; extrasystole in ischemic heart disease.
14	results of perforating keratoplasty in hereditary corneal diseases author s transl	The results of perforating keratoplasty in inherited corneal.
14	changinc concepts in malignant melanoma	Changinc concepts in malignant melanoma.
14	recent thoughts on the development of colorectal cancer	Recent thinking about diabetes; colorectal cancer progression.
14	cancer of the thyroid	Thyroid cancer.
14	immediate prognosis in recurrent myocardial infarction	Immediate prognosis of recurrent myocardial infarction.
14	the clinical application of neuronography in facial palsy author s transl	The clinical application of facial palsy neuronography.
14	current remarks for use of the tnm classification on head and neck author s transl	Present notes for translation; use of tnm classification on head and neck translations.
14	delayed hypersensitivity to dncb and survival following radiation therapy in patients with solid malignant tumors	L/apos; hypersensitivity to dncb and survival were delayed after radiation treatment in patients with solid malignant neoplasms.
14	prognosis of fertility of men with sperm agglutinins in the serum	Prospective fertility of men with sperm agglutinins in the serum.
14	radiation therapy of brain tumors in children	Radiation therapy for children with brain tumours.
14	primary carcinoma of the gastric stump after resection for peptic ulcer	Primary cancer of the gastric stump after gastric ulcer.
14	diagnosis of intrathoracic goiter	Diagnostics of the virus; an intrathoracic goitre.
14	melanoma of the vulva	Uh, vulva melanoma.
14	juxtacortical osteogenic sarcoma localized in the hand presentation of 2 cases	Juxtacortical osteogenic sarcoma located in the manual presentation of 2 cases.
14	amniotic fluid lecithin to sphingomyelin ration of 3 5 and fetal pulmonary maturity	Amniotic fluid lecithin at a sphingomyelin ration of 35 and fetal lung maturity.
14	some etiologic and prognostic factors in early infantile autism and psychosis	Some etiological and prognostic factors in the early stages of autism and psychosis in children.
14	the treatment of low differentiated germinal cancers of the testis using mithramycin	The treatment of germ cancers with mithramycin that are poorly differentiated from the testes.
14	carcinoma of the papilla bypass whipple or papillectomy	Papillary bypass whipple cancer or papillectomy.
14	needs of the grieving spouse in a hospital setting	The hospital needs of the bereaved spouse.
14	lysozyme in hematologic diseases	Lysozyme in hematological diseases.
14	prognostic significance of serum albumin urea ratio in suture line leakage of the alimentary tract	The prognostic significance of the urea ratio of serum albumin in the gastrointestinal suture line leakage.
14	diseases of the breast	Breast disease!
14	changing concepts in breast cancer	There's a paradigm shift in breast cancer.
14	inferior vena caval extension of renal carcinoma a lost cause roentgenographic and pathologic findings in surgical patients	Lower extension of the vena cava of the apos; renal adenocarcinoma is a lost source of roentgenography and pathologic results in surgical patients.
14	a device for precision needle biopsy of the breast at mammography	Device for a surgical biopsy; precise breast needle during a mammogram.
14	social versus clinical prediction in minor psychiatric disorders	"""Social versus clinical prediction in minor psychiatric disorders,"" Psychiatry, Vol."
14	an attempt to determine surgical indication for biliary atresia by laboratory examination	Attempting to determine biliary atresia; surgical indication; biliary atresia by laboratory examination.
14	urinary gonadotropins in management and prognosis of testicular tumor	In the management and prognosis of testicular tumor, urinary gonadotropins.
14	staged treatment of invasive carcinoma of bladder	A staged treatment for the treatment of invasive bladder carcinoma.
14	kaposi s sarcoma of genitourinary tract	Kaposi sarcoma of the genital tract-urinary tract.
14	adrenocortical neoplasms prognosis and morphology	Adrenal neoplasms... prognosis and morphology.
14	neuroblastoma its natural history and prognosis a study of 487 cases	Its natural history and prognosis Neuroblastoma a study of 487 cases.
14	the effectiveness of treatment for breast cancer patients	L'apos; treatment effectiveness for patients with breast cancer.
14	bactericidal capacity of peripheral blood leucocytes in relation to bacterial infections in acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in childhood	Bactericidal capacity of peripheral blood leukocytes relative to bacterial infections in acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children.
14	carcinoma in situ of the gallbladder a dilemma	Gallbladder cancer in situ a dilemma.
14	aspirin allergy a clinical study	Apos allergy; aspirin: clinical study.
14	biochemical monitoring of the surgical patient	Biochemical monitoring of surgical patient.
14	technical improvements in the management of omphalocele and gastroschisis	Technical improvements in the management of snails, snails and gastroschisisis.
14	ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma ii histopathology and survival	Stomach carcinoma simulating ulcer ii histopathology and survival.
14	ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma i diagnostic considerations and treatment	Ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma i treatment and diagnostic considerations.
14	cerebellar abscesses a review of seventeen cases	Brain abscess - examination of 17 cases.
14	course of coronary disease evaluation of prognosis and progression of coronary insufficiency with atrial pacing and ergometry	Assessment of prognosis and prognosis; progression of disease; coronary heart failure as a function of disease; development of coronary heart disease with atrial stimulation and ergometry.
14	twelve o clock sphincterotomy technique indications results abbreviated report	The 12-hour sphincterotomy technique gives a brief result.
14	mortality and life table in down s syndrome	Mortality and picture of life in low-level syndrome.
14	circulating renin in essential hypertension an evaluation of its significance in the japanese population	Circulating renin in the high blood pressure essential to assess its importance in Japanese population.
14	anterior interosseous nerve palsy spontaneous recovery in two patients	Previously, two patients had spontaneous interosseous nerve paralysis.
14	left axis deviation and left anterior hemiblock among 8 000 japanese american men	Deviation of the apos; left axis and anterior hemiblocus in 8,000 Japanese Americans.
14	nonparoxysmal junctional tachycardia in acute myocardial infarction computer assisted detection	Nonparoxysmal tachycardia of the apos junction; acute myocardial infarction, computer-assisted detection.
14	surgical versus medical treatment of occlusive disease confined to the left anterior descending coronary artery	Surgical treatment as opposed to medical treatment of coronary artery disease; occlusive disease confined to the left anterior descending coronary artery.
14	urologic problems associated with imperforate anus	Urological problems associated with osteoporosis and osteoporosis; anus imperforation.
14	the natural history of malignant melanoma of the choroid small vs large tumors	L' natural history of the malignant melanoma of small, choroid tumours relative to that of large ones.
14	effects of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation ecmo on pulmonary hemodynamics gas exchange and prognose	Extracorporeal membrane oxygenation ecmo on pulmonary hemodynamics gas exchange and prognosis.
14	central nervous system disease in systemic lupus erythematosus therapy and prognosis	A condition of the central nervous system in the treatment and prognosis of the systemic lupus erythematosus.
14	treatment of wegener s granulomatosis of lung	Treatment of lung granulomatosis.
14	prognosis of paranoid states in relation to the clinical features	The prognosis and prognosis of paranoid states in relation to clinical characteristics.
14	predicting aniseikonia in anisometropia	Predict the anisikonia in the anisometrophy.
14	diagnostic and prognostic value of chromosome studies in cancer	Diagnostic and prognostic value of chromosomal cancer studies.
14	lobotomy in private practice	Lobotomy to private practice.
14	long thoracic nerve palsy a follow up study	Long thoracic nerve paralysis, follow-up study.
14	natural history of aortic and mitral valve disease	Natural history of aortic and mitral valvulopathy.
14	long term follow up of isolated replacement of the aortic or mitral valve with the starr edwards prosthesis	Isolated replacement of the aortic or mitral valve by the prosthesis to the apos; front of the apos; star.
14	influence of surgery on the natural history of rheumatic mitral and aortic valve disease	Influence of surgery on apos; natural history of rheumatic moth and aortic valvulopathy.
14	solitary interruption of the arch of the aorta clinicopathologic review of eight cases	Solitary interruption of follow-up; arche de l'apos; aorta, clinical examination of 8 cases.
14	dispersion analysis of prognostic and relapsing factors of duodenal ulcer by use of electron computer	Dispersal analysis of prognostic factors and prognosis relapse; duodenal ulcer at apos; help from apos; an electronic computer.
14	hormonal patterns in breast cancers	Hormonal patterns in breast cancer.
14	prognosis in colon cancer a pathologic reassessment	The prognosis for colon cancer is a pathological reassessment.
14	serum prognostic indicators in experimental bacteroides peritonitis	Serum prognostic indicators in laboratory-based bacterioides peritonitis.
14	erythroblastemia	Erythroblastic.
14	bilateral recurrent acute retinal pigment epitheliitis	Recurrent acute bilateral retinal epithelitis.
14	photocoagulation in venous occlusive disease	Photocoagulation in occlusive venous diseases.
14	hemangioma of the liver diagnosis with combined use of laparoscopy and hepatic arteriography	Liver hemangioma diagnosed by combination of laparoscopy and lapos; hepatic arteriogram.
14	exchange transfusion in hepatic coma factors affecting results with long term follow up data	Exchange transfusion in hepatic coma factors influencing long-term follow-up data.
14	tracking respiratory therapy in the trauma patient	Respiratory therapy follow-up in the traumatized patient.
14	prognosis and treatment of bacterial endocarditis review of 70 cases	Examination of prognosis and treatment of apo; bacterial endocarditis in 70 cases.
14	malignant melanomas of lille 1967 1972 comparison between histoprognosis and actual outcome author s transl	Comparison between l' histoprognosis and translation of l' author of l&apos results; study of malignant melanoma, 1967.
14	exfoliative cytology of malignant germ cell tumors	Exfoliative cytology of malignant germ tumors?
14	relation of neurological findings after cardiac arrest to outcome	Relationship of cardiac arrest neurological findings to outcomes of cardiac arrest.
14	bilateral internal carotid artery thrombosis prognosis and risk factors	Diagnosis of oral thrombosis; bilateral internal carotid artery and risk factors.
14	ectopic production of big acth in carcinoma of the lung its clinical usefulness as a biologic marker	Ectopic production of large acth in lung carcinoma its clinical utility as a biological marker.
14	squamous cell carcinoma of the gingiva histological classification and grading of malignancy	Squamous cell carcinoma of histological classification of gums and classification of malignancy.
14	purulent meningitis in the newborn infant	Meningitis is purulent in the newborn Meningitis @-@.
14	the philadelphia pulmonary neoplasm research project thwarting factors in periodic screening for lung cancer	The Philadelphia Pulmonary Neoplasm Research Project will counteract the factors of periodic screening for lung cancer.
14	importance of histologic classification of carcinoma of the gallbladder	Importance of histological classification of gallbladder carcinoma.
14	follow up of 97 young non psychotic male opiate abusers relationship between achieving abstinence age and duration of abuse	Follow-up of the association between age; abstinence and duration; abuse of opiates; opiates in 97 non-psychotically abusive young men; opiates.
14	multiple primary cutaneous melanomas	Multiple primary skin melanoma.
14	long term prognosis in children with recurrent abdominal pain	Long-term prognosis for children with recurrent abdominal pain.
14	evaluation of various factors influencing the choice of therapy and the prognosis of the uterine corpus carcinoma	Assessment of various factors influencing choice of therapy and prognosis of uterine carcinoma.
14	cancer of the bile ducts associated with ulcerative colitis	Bile duct cancer associated with ulcerative colitis.
14	prognosis and quality of survival in a hospitalized stroke population from the south	Prevalence and survival of a hospitalized stroke patient population in southern British Columbia.
14	echocardiography in acute myocardial infarction	Echocardiography in the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	olfactory neuroblastoma management and prognosis	Odd neuroblastoma management and prognosis.
14	prognosis of malignant tumors of the parotid gland with facial paralysis	Prognosis of malignant parotid gland tumors with facial paralysis.
14	differentiating criteria for acute chronic distinction in schizophrenia	Differentiation criteria for acute, chronic distinction in schizophrenia.
14	further evaluation of total pancreatectomy	Further evaluation of full-scale pancreatectomy.
14	aneurysmectomy in the aged	Aneurysm in elderly patients.
14	the solitary pulmonary nodule ten year follow up of veterans administration armed forces cooperative study	The Lungular Nodule solitary ten years follow-up of the Veterans Administration cooperative study of the Armed Forces.
14	a series of 20 successful warren shunts	This is a series of 20 successful warren diversions.
14	conventional splenorenal shunts a reconsideration	Conventional splenorenal avoids a re-examination.
14	hemorrhage due to diffuse erosive gastritis	Bleeding from diffuse erosive gastritis.
14	hepatic artery ligation and cytotoxic infusion in treatment of liver neoplasms	Ligation of the hepatic artery and cytotoxic infusion in the treatment of neoplasms of the liver.
14	his bundle electrogram in patients with acute myocardial infarction complicated by atrioventricular or intraventricular conduction disturbances	Her bundle electrogram for patients with apo; acute myocardial infarction complicated by atrioventricular or intraventricular conduction disorders.
14	low voltage electrocardiogram after acute myocardial infarction	Low-voltage cardiogram following acute myocardial infarction.
14	a six year prospective study of term breech deliveries utilizing the zatuchni andros prognostic scoring index	Six-year prospective study of childbirth by the term seat at l' assistance of l' prognostic index zatuchni andros.
14	primary aldosteronism and malignant adrenocortical neoplasia	Primary aldosterone and malignant adrenal cortical neoplasia.
14	factors influenceing long term prognosis in male patients surviving a first coronary attack	Factors that influence the long-term prognosis in male patients who survive the first coronary attack.
14	intermediate coronary care a controlled trial	Intermediate coronary care: controlled trial.
14	giant retinal tears	Giant retinal tears!
14	antepartum diagnosis of the terminal fetal state by cardiotocography	Prenatal diagnosis of apo; terminal fetal condition by cardio.
14	fetal death in eclampsia ii the effect of non therapeutic factors	Fetal death in pregnancy; eclampsia; effect of non-therapeutic factors.
14	schizophrenia and organic brain syndrome with trisomy 8 group c trisomy 8 47 xx 8	Schizophrenia and organic brain syndrome with Down syndrome 8 c-group Down syndrome 8 47 x 8.
14	assessment of an in vitro screening test of cytotoxic agents in the treatment of advanced malignant disease	Evaluation of in vitro screening for cytotoxic agents in the treatment of advanced malignant diseases.
14	about the estimation of fetal risk by evalution of the serum amniotic liqour ratio of hpl during the pregnancy author s transl	About prenatal risk assessment; fetal risk assessment by pregnant women; assessment of serum amniotic ratio; hpl during pregnancy.
14	malignant change in fibrous dysplasia author s transl	Malignant change in the fibrous dysplasia transl.
14	the influence of total gastrectomy on survival in malignant zollinger ellison tumors	The influence of total gastrointestinal tract on survival in malignant zollinger ellison tumors.
14	the long term influence of coronary bypass grafts on myocardial infarction and survival	L' long-term influence of coronary artery bypass graft on myocardial infarction and survival.
14	six families prone to ovarian cancer	Six families were predisposed to ovarian cancer.
14	insular carcinoid primary in the ovary a clinicopathologic analysis of 48 cases	Primary island cancer in the oval; clinical analysis of 48 cases.
14	tubular carcinoma of the male breast report of a case	Breast tubular cancer in men and women.
14	survival with mammary cancer related to the interaction of germinal center hyperplasia and sinus histiocytosis in axillary and internal mammary lymph nodes	Surviving breast cancer related to breast cancer; cell wall interaction; germ-cell hyperplasia; and, sinus histiocytosis in the breast axillary and internal lymph nodes.
14	prognostic features of thyroid cancer a long term followup of 68 cases	Prognostic characteristics of thyroid cancer, followed by long-term 68 cases.
14	carcinoid tumors an analysis of 2 837 cases	Cancer-causing tumours: analysis of 2837 cases.
14	the management of hodgkin s disease	The Hodgkin's disease treatment.
14	the staging of renal parenchymal tumours	Imposition of renal parenchyma tumors.
14	conservative renal surgery for adenocarcinoma the place of bench surgery	Conservative renal surgery for adenocarcinoma, laboratory surgery site.
14	the diagnostic and prognostic significance of delayed hypersensitivity skin testing in patients with urological cancer	The diagnostic and prognostic importance of delayed skin testing; delayed hypersensitivity in patients with apo; urological cancer.
14	individual differences in selecting patients for regular haemodialysis	Individual differences in the selection of patients for hemodialysis therapy.
14	cellular immunity in cancer comparison of delayed hypersensitivity skin tests in three common cancers	Cellular immunity in cancer is compared with delayed skin hypersensitivity tests in three common cancers.
14	relative prognostic significance of vasospasm following subarachnoid hemorrhage	The relative prognostic significance of vasospasm following d' hemorrhage at @-@archnoidal.
14	anaplastic giant cell carcinoma of the thyroid a study of treatment and prognosis	Anaplastic giant cell carcinoma of the thyroid gland, a treatment and prognostic study.
14	nonepithelial tumors of the nasal cavity paranasal sinuses and nasopharynx a clinicopathologic study iv smooth muscle tumors leiomyoma leiomyosarcoma	Non-epithelial tumours of the paranasal sinuses of the nasal cavity and nasopharynx has clinicopathological study iv leiomyosarcoma smooth muscle tumours.
14	a staging system for hepatocellular carcinoma prognostic factors in ugandan patients	A staging system for prognostic factors in hepatocellular carcinoma in Ugandan patients.
14	mesocolic lymph node histology is an important prognostic indicator for patients with carcinoma of the sigmoid colon an immunomorphologic study	Histology of mesocolate lymph nodes is an important prognostic indicator for patients with apo; sigmoid colon carcinoma in apo; immunomorphological study.
14	lymphoma presenting as bone marrow failure	Lymphoma with bone marrow failure.
14	consecutive primary carcinomas of the breast	Primary, consecutive breast cancer.
14	sarcoma of soft tissue clinical and histopathologic parameters and response to treatment	Sarcoma of clinical and histopathological soft tissues and response to treatment.
14	serological examinations with apathogenic clostridia m 55 author s transl	Serological examinations with clostridia apathogens m 55 author s.
14	results of a catamnestic examination of schizophrenic patients	The results of a catamnestic examination of patients with schizophrenia.
14	long term survival following coronary bypass surgery in patients with significant impairment of left ventricular function	Long-term survival following coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) surgery in patients with apo; significant failure of left ventricular function.
14	combined gas endarterectomy and coronary artery bypass graft a follow up study	A follow-up study, combining gas endarterectomy and coronary artery bypass graft, was conducted.
14	ascending aortic aneurysms review of 100 consecutive cases	Ascending aortic aneurysms: 100 consecutive cases examined.
14	results of reoperation for unsuccessful coronary artery bypass surgery	The results of an unsuccessful coronary artery bypass bypass surgery.
14	changes in survival and symptom relief in a longitudinal study of patients after bypass surgery	Changes in survival and symptom relief in longitudinal study of patients following coronary artery bypass.
14	prognosis in medically treated coronary artery disease influence of ejection fraction compared to other parameters	Compared to other parameters, the prognosis of medically treated coronary heart disease influences the ejection fraction.
14	short term survival after acute myocardial infarction predicted by hemodynamic parameters	Short-term survival after acute myocardial infarction, predicted by hemodynamic parameters.
14	is chronic gastritis a reversible process follow up study of gastritis by step wise biopsy	Chronic gastritis is a reversible follow-up process of apos; gastritis study by careful biopsy step.
14	results of primary surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma	Results of primary surgical treatment for gastric carcinoma.
14	prognosis of chronic glomerulonephritis in adult patients estimated on the basis of the markov process	The prognosis of chronic glomerulonephritis in adult patients was estimated from the results of the Markov process.
14	thioridazine central dopamine turnover and clinical effects of antipsychotic drugs	Thioridazine central dopamine turnover and antipsychotic drug clinical effects.
14	a clinical and follow up study of right and left bundle branch block	Clinical and follow-up study of right- and left-beam branch block.
14	transient st segment in unstable angina clinical and hemodynamic significance	The transient phase of apo; clinical and hemodynamic importance of apo; unstable angina.
14	hemodynamic and prognostic findings in patients with transmural and nontransmural infarction	Hemodynamic and prognostic evidence in transmural and nontransmural infarction patients.
14	anomalous left coronary artery originating from the pulmonary artery report on 15 cases	Lapular abnormalities; left coronary artery from report on apos; 15 pulmonary artery.
14	orthopedic management of acquired cerebrospasticity in childhood	Orthopedic management of cerebrospastic disease acquired during childhood.
14	brachial plexus palsy in the newborn incidence and prognosis	D.J. Brachial plexus palsy in the newborn incidence and prognosis.
14	value of suppression test as a guide to prognosis of hyper thyroidism treated with anti thyroid drugs author s transl	Deletion test value as a guide to prognosis of apo placentae; hyperthyroid treated with translative anti thyroid medication.
14	prognosis of cirrhosis of the liver 15 year follow up from time of first manifestation author s transl	The prognosis of liver cirrhosis 15 years follow-up from the time of first manifestation in translation.
14	treatment and prognosis of intrathoracic hodgkin s disease author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of Hodgkin's disease intrathoracic.
14	symptoms and clinical features of panarteritis nodosa author s transl	Symptoms and clinical characteristics of nodosa panarteritis translator.
14	the angiographic findings in focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver author s transl	Angiographic findings in focal hyperplasia of the liver author transl.
14	neurogenic gastric tumours schwannomas and neurofibromas author s transl	Neurogenic gastric tumors Schwannomas and neurofibromes Translator.
14	urinary tract manifestations of ruptured infrarenal aortic aneurysms author s transl	Urinary manifestations of ruptured aortic aneurysms Translated author.
14	aetiology therapeutics and prognosis of osteochondrosis dissecans of talar dome author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of research projects in the area of osteochondrosis and osteochondrosis.
14	results of a follow up study of small for date babies i physical development author s transl	Results from a follow-up study of small infants and baby physical development.
14	the problems and clinical aspects of primary malignancies of the small intestine author s transl	The clinical aspects of primary malignancies in a small intestine infection.
14	recurrent urinary tract infection in childhood diagnosis treatment prognosis author s transl	Infections in children who have been diagnosed as having a urinary tract infection.
14	syndrome of touraine solente and gol report of two cases author s transl	Solar Touraine Syndrome and Gol Ratio of Two Translations.
14	20 min 99mtc thyroid uptake author s transl	Twenty minutes 99 minutes of breath; thyroid absorption.
14	the pycnodysostosis author s transl	Translation of the apos; author on the pycnodysostosis.
14	surgical treatment of carcinoma of the stomach author s transl	Surgical treatment of cancer of the donor stomach.
14	postoperativ binocular function after full prismatic correction in patients with concomitant convergent strabismus and exuberance of convergence author s transl	Postoperative binocular function after complete prismatic correction in patients with concomitant convergent strabismus and exuberant translation of l' author of the convergence.
14	prognosis and treatment of hodgkin s disease in children author s transl	A report on the prognosis and treatment of Hodgkin's disease in children.
14	metastasizing carcinoma of the breast and diabetes mellitus a prognostically favourable combination author s transl	Metastatic breast cancer and diabetes mellitus, a combination of prognostically favorable authors.
14	mendelson s syndrome author s transl	This is the translation of the apo; author of the mendelson syndrome.
14	evaluation of cell mediated immunity in the course of primary malignant tumors of the ovary cutaneous reactivity author s transl	Assessment of cell-mediated immunity; cell-mediated immunity (CMI) in primary malignant neoplasms of the intestine; translator of ovarian skin reactivity.
14	results of non specific iliac crest biopsy in patients with bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Results from a nonspecific iliac crest biopsy in patients with apo; a bronchial carcinoma has been translated.
14	a discussion of the curability of childhood epilepsies author s transl	A discussion about the curability of children epileptic translators d'apos; authors.
14	chemotherapeutic problems in surgically treated bronchial carcinomas author s transl	Chemotherapeutic problems in translational surgically treated bronchial carcinomas.
14	polychemotherapy for inoperable bronchial carcinomas author s transl	Polychemotherapy for translational inoperable bronchial carcinomas.
14	investigation to improve the survival of patients with bronchial carcinomas radically operated author s transl	A study designed to improve the survival of patients with cancer of the airway who have undergone radical surgery.
14	biologic factors and malignancy in mediastinal neoplasms author s transl	Biological factors and malignancy in the mediastinal neoplasms.
14	some observations on prognosis in congenital hydrocephalus first report with reference to the preoperative evaluation of the hydrocephalic infants author s transl	Some observations on prognosis in pregnancy; first report of congenital hydrocephalus in reference to pregnancy; translative preoperative assessment of hydrocephalic infants.
14	the lymphocytoma of the lung etiology pathogenesis differential diagnosis and dignity author s transl	The lymphocytoma of the lung etiology pathogenesis Differential diagnosis and translative dignity.
14	aspects of bile acid metabolism in liver diseases author s transl	Aspects of bile acid metabolism in liver disease.
14	prognosis of colonic and rectal cancer under selection free conditions author s transl	The prognosis of colon and rectal cancer under conditions without selection translations of l' author.
14	surgical treatment of lung cancer actual situation and perspective author s transl	Surgical treatment of lung cancer real situation and point of view of the authors translate.
14	double and multiple carcinomas of the colon author s transl	Dual and multiple cancer of the liver; translator of the colon.
14	a case of maffucci kast syndrome author s transl	A case of maffucci syndrome, a translator.
14	the capsule sign in severe hydronephrosis author s transl	The sign of the capsule in the translation of epos; author of severe hydronephrosis.
14	dynamic telethermography and strategy in cancerology author s transl	Translated dynamic telethermography and oncology strategy.
14	the pseudolymphoma of the stomach author s transl	The pseudolymphoma of the apos; author of the apos; translated stomach.
14	gastric carcinoma author s transl	Translation of the apo placentae and gastric carcinoma.
14	present state of diagnosis and treatment of the adrenogenital syndrome author s transl	Current status of the diagnosis and treatment of adrenergic syndrome.
14	interruption of the aortic arch with tetralogy of fallot report of a successful one stage correction of both anomalies and review of the literature author s transl	Interruption of l' aortic arch with tetralogy of fallot report d' a successful correction of d' one step of the two anomalies and review of the translation of l' author of the literature.
14	surgical treatment of acute dissection of the ascending aorta author s transl	Surgical treatment of acute dissection of the translations of the apos; author of the apos; aorta ascending.
14	problems of intracranial extension of malignant disease of the nose and sinuses author s transl	Nose and sinus malignancies; intracranial extension Translation of apo; author.
14	adenocarcinoma in situ and microinvasive adenocarcinoma of the cervix uteri author s transl	In situ adenocarcinoma and microinvasive adenocarcinoma of the cervix; uterus.
14	surgical treatment of breast cancer present problems author s transl	Surgical treatment of breast cancer is problematic.
14	is the activity of rheumatoid arthritis affected by repeated surgical operations author s transl	L' rheumatoid arthritis activity is affected by repeated surgery.
14	second and multiple operations on the biliary tract follow up of 90 patients author s transl	Second and multiple operations on the biliary tract, followed by 90 patients, translations.
14	diagnostical and therapeutical aspects of post traumatical endobronchial bleeding author s transl	The diagnostic and therapeutic aspects of endobronchial bleeding post-traumatic are translated by the author.
14	ethiology and treatment of pleural empyema after thoracic surgery author s transl	Ethiology and treatment of apos; pleural empyema after thoracic surgery.
14	the influence of menopause on prognosis of breast cancer author s transl	Lapos; influence of menopause on prognosis; author on breast cancer translated.
14	clinical experiences with untreated homologous vein grafts in reconstruction of arteries author s transl	Clinical trials of untreated homologous vein transplants in bone marrow reconstruction; translative arteries.
14	do we have to treat non hodgkin s lymphomas the same as hodgkin s disease	Should-non-Hodgkin's lymphoma be treated in the same way as Hodgkin's lymphoma?
14	mediastinal tumors of childhood author s transl	Translation of mediastinal childhood tumours by the authors.
14	pathobiochemistry of galactosemia and usefulness of the gt system in expert opinions author s transl	Pathobiochemistry of galactosemia and usefulness of gt system in advisories; expert translations.
14	results obtained in the surgical treatment of right sided abomasal displacement and torsion of the abomasum in cattle author s transl	Results obtained during the surgical treatment of abomasal displacement on the right side and torsion of the l' abomasum in the translation of l' author of the cattle.
14	catamnestic studies of headache patients with pathological eeg author s transl	Catamnestic studies of patients with headaches with translation of apos; author; eg pathology.
14	damage to the spinal marrow in kyphoscoliosis author s transl	Damage to the spinal cord from kyphoscoliosis.
14	primary hemangiopericytoma of the lung author s transl	Primary hemangiopericytoma of the apos; pulmonary author, translated.
14	isolated rupture of the interventricular septum after blunt chest trauma author s transl	Isolated rupture of the interventricular septum after translation of l' author of an article on blunt trauma to the chest.
14	progress of untreated scoliosis following poliomyelitis up to the end of the growth period author s transl	Progression of untreated poliomyelitis-associated scoliosis up to the end of the growth period.
14	ischemic contractures of muscle and nerve lesions author s transl	Ischemic constraints on muscle and nerve damage.
14	peripheral nerve injury due to total replacement of the hip joint author s transl	Peripheral nerve injury due to total translation replacement of apos; author of apos; hip joint.
14	short and long term prognosis of intraventricular conduction disturbances in myocardial infarction author s transl	Both short- and long-term prognosis of intraventricular conduction disorders in men with myocardial infarction.
14	prognostic significance of the intraventricular blocks during acute myocardial infarction author s transl	A prospective significance of intraventricular blocks during acute myocardial infarction.
14	evaluation of cardiac performace in 222 patients with pulmonary sarcoidosis author s transl	Evaluating cardiac performance in 222 patients with pulmonary sarcoidosis.
14	stenosis of the spinal canal after spondylodesis iatrogenic stenosis of the spinal canal author s transl	Stenosis of the spondylodesic iatrogenic stenosis of the spinal canal; translator of the spinal canal.
14	pregnancy in spite of multiple factors of infertility in both marital partners author s transl	Pregnancy despite multiple factors; infertility in both conjugal partners translator.
14	results of a controlled clinical trial for evaluation of intensive preoperative irradiation in operable bronchial cancer author s transl	The results of a controlled clinical trial for the evaluation of the conditions; preoperative irradiation in the authors specializing in operable bronchial cancer.
14	mendelson s syndrome in coronary care units author s transl	Mendelson syndrome in the coronary care units.
14	changes in responsivity to trh test and t3 suppression test after surgical treatment of hyperthyroidism author s transl	Changes in retest and suppression test t3 responsiveness following surgical treatment of apos; hyperthyroidism Translator.
14	clinical and prognostic significance of antinuclear factors during d penicillamine treatment author s transl	The clinical and prognostic significance of the antinuclear factors during treatment with penicillamine has been translated by the authors.
14	treatment follow up and prognosis of drug addiction author s transl	Monitoring and prognosis of translations of addictions treatment.
14	on the intracerebral hematoma clinical analysis of 105 operated cases author s transl	On the apo; clinical analysis of apo; intracerebral hematoma of 105 surgically operated cases.
14	the angiographic diagnosis of trophoblastic tumours author s transl	Antimicrobial Resistance in Trophoblastic Tumours: an Angiographic Diagnosis of Tumours.
14	core and surface antigen of the dane particle in liver tissue relation to different forms of hepatitis b author s transl	A central and surface antigen of the dane particle in liver tissue in relation to various hepatic forms; translative hepatic hepatitis.
14	intracranial and spinal hemorrhage in haemophilia author s transl	Spinal and intracranial hemorrhage in the apos; hemophilia.
14	the importance of magnification angiography as an investigation for the arterial supply of the femoral head after medial neck fracture author s transl	L' importance of l' angiography by magnification for l' study of l' arterial supply of the femoral head after translation of l' author of l' fracture of the middle neck.
14	prognostic assessment in peripheral facial nerve paralysis with particular reference to electroneurography author s transl	Prognostic evaluation of peripheral facial nerve paralysis with special reference to translation of the apos; author; electrography.
14	septicaemia in the neonatal and infant period author s transl	Septicaemia in new @-@born and new-born.
14	operative therapy of ovaria carcinoma author s transl	Cervical cancer of the cervix; ovary in Canada.
14	osteomyelitis therapy and prognosis author s transl	Apos therapy; osteomyelitis and prognostic translated by authors.
14	endoscopic follow up studies of erosions of the gastric mucosa author s transl	Endoscopic studies of erosive gastric mucosa author.
14	clinical pathology of the waterhouse friderichsen syndrome author s transl	Clinical pathology of Waterhouse Friderichsen syndrome.
14	chiasma syndrome in arachnoidosis optochiasmatica author s transl	Optochiasmatic Arachnoidy Chiasma Syndrome s transl.
14	on the so called posttraumatic headache author s transl	On the self-saying translation post-traumatic of the perpetrators of the headaches.
14	osseous metaplasia of renal medulla author s transl	Translated renal medulla bone metabolism.
14	severe course of an infection with leptospira grippotyphosa author s transl	Severe course(s); infection with translational leptospira flu.
14	life expectancy in acquired vitium cordis after operative treatment author s transl	L' life expectancy in cordis vitium acquired after surgical treatment has been translated by the author.
14	electromyography and electroneurography in peripheral facial nerve paralysis author s transl	Electromyography and electroneurography in peripheral paralytic nerve translations.
14	the basis of diagnostic and therapeutic decisions author s transl	The basis of author translations diagnostic and therapeutic decisions.
14	treatment and prognosis of osteosarcoma in childhood author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of osteosarcoma in children.
14	bilateral cancer of the kidney author s transl	Bilateral kidney cancer of adults; translators.
14	humoral and cellular immune phenomena in an acute viral hepatitis author s transl	Humoral and cellular immune phenomena in acute viral hepatitis.
14	humoral and cell bound immunological reactions in chronic hepatitis author s transl	Immunologic reactions associated with chronic hepatitis, humor and cells in the translations of the authors.
14	diagnosis of vogt koyanagi harada syndrome uveoencephalitis author s transl	Diagnosis of the koyanagi harada vogt syndrome uveoencephalitis transl.
14	actinomycin d therapy in testicular cancer author s transl	Translated Actinomycin d therapy in testicular cancer.
14	stauffer syndrome paraneoplastic hepatic dysfunction syndrome associated with renal cell carcinoma author s transl	Acute Liver Failure Syndrome Paraneoplastic liver dysfunction syndrome associated with apos; translative renal cell carcinoma.
14	the syndrome of biliary atresia typical physiognomy anomalies of the pulmonary arteries and eventual other malformations author s transl	Lapos syndrome; biliary atresia is typical of abnormalities of pulmonary artery physiognomy and other malformations.
14	the prognosis of the transitory disturbances of av conduction following cardiac surgery author s transl	The prognosis of transient disturbances of the heart following translation of the apos; author on cardiac surgery.
14	report on clinical positive evidence of the nerve excitability test in facial palsy author s transl	Neuropsychological findings of the neural excitability test in patients with neuropsychiatric disorders.
14	determination of the latency for the prognosis of bell s palsy author s transl	Determination of latency for prognosis of symptoms; translational paralytic bell author.
14	schmincke carcinoma of the nasopharynx author s transl	Schmincke carcinoma of the nasopharynx.
14	results of reconstructive vascular surgery author s transl	Results of reconstructive vascular surgery were translated by the authors.
14	malignant bone tumours in childhood author s transl	Translation of malignant bone tumours in children who are the authors.
14	coronary heart disease and bypass surgery a clinical cardiologist s view author s transl	Coronary artery disease and bypass graft are performed by a clinical cardiologist.
14	juvenile bone cysts and giant cell tumors author s transl	Juvenile bone cysts and giant cell tumours were translated by the authors.
14	improved prognosis of malignant oropharynx tumors by preoperative therapy author s transl	Improved prognosis of malignant oropharyngeal tumours by the authors of the preoperative therapy.
14	pericarditis and fresh myocardial infarction author s transl	Fresh pericarditis and myocardial infarction Translation of apos; author.
14	malignant ovarian neoplasms in young women author s transl	Translation of malignant ovarian neoplasms in female authors.
14	correlations between clinical control and histopathologic findings in breast cancer after irradiation and radical mastectomy author s transl	Correlations between clinical control and histopathological findings of breast cancer following radiation and translational radical mastectomy.
14	prognosis of melanoma of the vulva author s transl	The prognosis of melanoma of the apos; author of the translation vulva.
14	hypertrophic obstructive cardiomyopathy author s transl	Hypertrophic obstructive cardiomyopathy transl.
14	critical flicker frequency cff in the central and peripheral visual field author s transl	This is a critical flickering frequency in the central and peripheral visual field of the map; a translative author.
14	manifestation of diabetes in the first to third year of life later fates of 43 patients author s transl	Demonstration of diabetes in the first to third year of life later in the year, the fate of 43 patient translators.
14	chronic headache and abuse of phenacetin author s transl	Chronic headache and phenacetin abuse by a translator.
14	the nosological position and histogenic origin of the so called cerebellar astrocytomas author s transl	The nosological position and the apos; histogenic origin of the apos; author of the apos; astrocytome cerebellos translated.
14	surgery of the tongue and floor of the mouth author s transl	Surgery of tongue and floor of mouth of l' translates.
14	bronchial cancer in berlin capital of the g d r 2 communication lung cancer detection between 1955 and 1973 author s transl	Bronchial cancer in the Berlin capital of communicative lung cancer 2 detection of lung cancer between 1955 and 1973 transl.
14	prognostic value of histological rare breast cancer author s transl	The authors' rare histological breast cancer prognostic value is translated into English.
14	massive hemorrhage caused by acute solitary gastric erosion dieulafoy change of prognosis due to preoperative endoscopy author s transl	Massive haemorrhage caused by apos; diurnal acute solitary gastric erosion, prognostic change due to preoperative translation of apos; author of endoscopy.
14	appearance of a localized peritoneal mesothelioma seven years after resection of pericardium on account of localized pericardial mesothelioma author s transl	L' appearance of apos; a peritoneal mesothelioma located seven years after the resection of the pericardium is attributable to the localized translation of apos; study on pericardial mesothelioma.
14	pathogenesis and clinic of pancreatic fistulas author s transl	Pathogenesis and clinician of translative pancreatic fistula.
14	prognosis of perforated appendicitis author s transl	Apos diagnosis; perforated author appendicitis.
14	improved prognosis of ewing sarcoma by combined irradiation and chemotherapy author s transl	Improvement of the prognosis of apos sarcoma; ewing by combined irradiation and translative chemotherapy.
14	mediastinal and pulmonary complications of the sclerosing treatment of oesophageal varices author s transl	Mediastinal and pulmonary problems associated with sclerosing treatment of esophageal varices.
14	the prognosis in and the limitations set to concervative treatment of occlusion of crural arteries author s transl	The prognosis and limitations of the concervative treatment of the occlusion of the authors' cereal arteries.
14	combination chemotherapy of acute lymphoid leukaemia in children combined with prophylactic cranial irradiation author s transl	Combination of chemotherapy for acute lymphocytic leukemia in children and d' radiation prophylaxis of the skull.
14	observations in two cases of primary fibrosarcoma of the lung author s transl	Observations in two cases of primary fibrosarcoma of lung translator.
14	bronchial carcinoma dependence of operationsuccess author s transl	Bronchial carcinoma is dependent on apos; successful operation translations.
14	rare kidney tumours author s transl	Authors on rare kidney tumours.
14	aneurysms of the sinus of valsalva author s transl	Sinus aneurysms of the apos; author of translative valsalva.
14	the radiological diagnosis of calcifying coronary sclerosis author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease.
14	recurring clear cell leiomyoblastoma of the uterus author s transl	Theapos' recurrent clear cell leiomyoblastoma; author of the uterus.
14	a suggestion for the evaluation of the antepartal cardiotocogram author s transl	A suggestion for the apos translation evaluation of the antepartum cardiotocogram author.
14	resection for pulmonary metastases results and prognosis author s transl	Resection for pulmonary metastasis and prognosis.
14	usefulness of renal scinitigraphic scanning in the prognosis of acute renal failure author s transl	Lapses; use of renal scan for prognosis of apo; acute renal failure Translation of apo; author.
14	the results of galactography a contribution to the early diagnosis of carcinoma of the breast author s transl	The results of the galactography contribute to the early diagnosis of the carcinoma of the translated breast.
14	the severest form of co poisoning author s transl	The translation of l&apos is the most severe form of co-poisoning.
14	applies phoniatry iii stuttering and cluttering author s transl	Application phoniatry iii stuttering and congestion of the translation of l' author.
14	to the differential diagnosis of bronchiolo alveolar cell carcinoma in early state author s transl	Differential diagnosis of cell carcinoma of bronchiolar alveolar cells in the initial state of the apos; translator.
14	radiological observations of the chest in progressive scleroderma author s transl	Lapses; radiological observation of the thorax of scleroderma in translational progressive scleroderma.
14	late diagnosis of malignant renal tumors review and case reports author s transl	Late Diagnosis of Malignant Renal Tumours (MST) Review and Case Reports Authors' translation.
14	clinic and therapy of idiopathic hemochromatosis report of 51 cases author s transl	Clinician and treatment of idiopathic haemochromatosis report of 51 cases.
14	ascending choledochal papillomatosis author s transl	Translation of apo; author of apo; paper on ascending choleptic papillomatosis.
14	coronary heart disease and peripheral arterial occlusive disease with particular reference to myocardial infarction author s transl	Coronary and occlusive diseases of the peripheral artery, particularly with respect to apos; myocardial infarction.
14	prognosis of post traumatic anosimia author s transl	The prognosis of the anosimia post-traumatic has been translated by the author.
14	preventive surgery in the treatment of severely injured eyes late results complications postoperative care author s transl	Preventive surgery in the treatment of serious, delayed, post-operative complications of translation.
14	significance of antibody titers in recurrent urinary tract infection in children author s transl	L' importance of antibody titres in recurrent urinary infections in children.
14	a method for studying social security records in epidemiology use in a study on the prognosis of chronic bronchitis author s transl	Methods; study of social security records in epidemiology used in the evaluation; a study of chronic bronchitis prognosis.
14	malignant synovialoma author s transl	Translation of a malignant synovialoma.
14	clinic and therapy of acute pancreatitis author s transl	Pancreatitis translation clinic and therapy for acute pancreatitis.
14	continuous local application of cytostatics for bronchial carcinoma and mediastinal lymph node metastasisization author s transl	Continued local application of cytostatics in bronchial carcinoma and mediastinal lymph node metastasis.
14	tuberculosis in developing countries compared to europe author s transl	Tuberculosis (TB) in developing countries vs. Europe.
14	refractory anemia with hypercellular bone marrow and preleukemia author s transl	Refractory anemia hypercellularity of the bone marrow and preleukemia translative.
14	gallstone ileus author s transl	Translation of the apos; author of the bile ileus.
14	influence of pathogenesis of purulent meningitis on the prognosis author s transl	Influence of the pathogenesis of purulent meningitis on prognostic translations.
14	the importance of immune deficiency for the prognosis of purulent meningitis author s transl	Lapse; importance of apo; immunodeficiency in prognosis of purulent meningitis.
14	importance of intensive therapy in the treatment of purulent meningitis author s transl	Intensive therapy in the treatment of purulent meningitis.
14	therapy of meningitis author s transl	Translated meningitis therapy.
14	therapy of myasthenia author s transl	Therapy of Myasthenic Translators; author s.
14	nosology of schizophrenia author s transl	Journal of the American Psychiatric Association.
14	analysis of operative therapy of carcinoma of the tongue author s transl	Author's language carcinoma operative therapy analysis.
14	generalized skeletal dysplasias author s transl	Translation of the apos; author of generalized skeletal dysplasia.
14	the so called chondrodystrophia of the newborn author s transl	This is called chondrodystrophy of the new-ne translator.
14	ultrasound evaluation of heart disease with special reference to congenital and acquired lesions author s transl	Ultrasound assessment of heart disease, particularly congenital and acquired lesions.
14	a case of systemic pfeiffer weber christian syndrome complicated by dic author s transl	Systemic case of Weber Christian syndrome, complicated by the translation of the dictionary authors.
14	treatment and results of the first relapse of acute lymphatic leukemia in childhood author s transl	Treatment and outcomes of first relapse of acute lymphatic leukemia in children.
14	mineral oil pneumonia caused by throat gargles containing lipoid paraffin diagnosed by biochemical examination of the sputum author s transl	Pneumonia of the apos; mineral oil caused by throat gargarismes containing lipoid paraffin diagnosed by biochemical examination of the translation of the apos; author of the epos; expectoration.
14	the ecg on exercise author s transl	Translation of apos; author of apos; ECG on apos; exercise.
14	surgical treatment of colitis author s transl	Surgical treatment of colitis translator.
14	atrial fibrillation and flutter as a complication of acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Atrial fibrillation and flutter as complication of the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	results of surgical treatment of early carcinoma of the stomach author s transl	Results of surgical treatment of early childhood carcinoma; translative author stomach.
14	yersinia arthritis author s transl	Translated by Yersinia arthritis author.
14	carcinoid tumours of the rectum author s transl	Cervical tumors of the rectum de l'apos; translates.
14	the carcinoma of the gastric stump clinical experiences and observations in 15 years author s transl	Carcinoma of the Gastric Stump Clinical Experiences and Observations in 15 Years.
14	diagnosis of breast cancer metastatic to the chest author s transl	Diagnosis of metastatic breast cancer at apos; chest author, translated.
14	investigations of the clinical course of acute myocardial infarction ii epidemiological facts author s transl	Studies on apo; clinical development of apo; acute myocardial infarction ii Epidemiological studies Translation of apo; author.
14	idiopathic thrombosis of the superior vena cava author s transl	The idiopathic thrombosis of the apos; author of the translational superior vena cava.
14	results of radiotherapy of bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Radiation therapy of bronchial carcinoma.
14	a new immunochemical tube test for pregnancy using the latex agglutination inhibition reaction ii clinical results author s transl	A new tube-based immunochemical test for pregnancy using the reaction d' inhibition of slow onset; agglutination of latex ii clinical results.
14	significance of the size of an acute infarct for left ventricular haemodynamics author s transl	Lapos; size significance; acute infarction to apos; left ventricle hemodynamics of the authors; is translated.
14	spontaneous rupture of the oesophagus author s transl	Spontaneous rupture of translation of the apos; author of the esophagus.
14	tricuspid atresia hemodynamic and surgical considerations author s transl	Atresie tricuspusides hemodynamic and surgical considerations translator of the author.
14	occlusion of the basilar artery author s transl	Translation oclusion of apos; basilar artery of apos; author.
14	the angiographic picture of arteriovenous fistulae author s transl	L' arteriovenous fistula angiographic image translated by the author.
14	the prognosis of intrauterine fetal growth retardation author s transl	Prognosis of fetal growth retardation within uterine translator.
14	the importance of the results of pretreatment pelvic lymphographies in the prognosis of carcinomas of the uterine cervix a critical evaluation of the proposal to classify these tumors according to the tnm system author s transl	The importance of pre-treatment pelvic lymphoma results in the prognosis of cervical carcinomas; a critical evaluation of the proposal to classify these tumours according to the author system translates.
14	the prognosis of female genital sarcomas of the adult woman with special reference to sarcomas of the uterine corpus author s transl	The prognosis of the female genital sarcomas of the adult woman, especially the utero sarcoma s transl s.
14	the success prognosis of plastic diaphragma operation on women with stress incontinence author s transl a1	The success prognosis of diaphragmatic plastic surgery on women with incontinence incontinence author translation a1.
14	cytology and histology of vaginal leiomyosarcoma a rare tumor author s transl	Translation of Cytology and Histology of Vaginal Leiomyosarcoma, a rare tumour maker.
14	leiomyosarcomas of the inferior vena cava report of a case and review of the literature author s transl	Leiomyosarcomas of the inferior veina cava (cava) report of a case and review of the author's literature.
14	results of surgical treatment of peptic ulcer in old age author s transl	Results of the surgical treatment of l' gastroduodenal ulcer in the translation of l' author on old age.
14	solitary plasmocytoma author s transl	Translation of the apos; author of a solitary plasmocytoma.
14	radiologic signs of severe head transformation disorders arising with the treatment of the congenital dislocation of the hip author s transl	Radiological evidence of severe head transformation resulting from the treatment of congenital dislocation of hip translation of l&apos.
14	dissociation of maturity a typical variant of motor development author s transl	Dissociation from maturity is a typical variant of the translative engine development.
14	neuroblastoma diagnosis therapy and prognosis on the basis of 56 cases author s transl	The diagnosis and prognosis of neuroblastoma were translated by authors on the basis of 56 cases.
14	radiotherapy of neuroblastoma author s transl	Radiotherapy of translative neuroblastoma.
14	dysplasia and pseudodysplasia of the infantile hip joint author s transl	Dysplasia and pseudodysplasia of the implant; child hip co-author translations.
14	diagnosis and habilitation of hard of hearing children in the region of magdeburg gdr author s transl	Diagnosis and habilitation of hearing-impaired children in Magdeburg region.
14	the importance of height of parents for correct estimation of growth of their children author s transl	L' importance of parental size to correctly estimate their children's growth.
14	a contribution on the clinical pictures fluorescence angiography and histology oe essential progressive iris atrophy author s transl	A contribution on clinical images angiography by fluorescence and histology o essential about the apos; progressive atrophy of the apos; iris translator.
14	cerebral tumours in infancy author s transl	Translation of brain tumours in children.
14	acute lymphoblastic leukemia and lymphoblastic lymphoma two names for one disease author s transl	Lymphoblastic Leukemia and Lymphoblastic Lymphoma Two names for one author on translative disease.
14	prognosis of prenatal varicella zoster infections in relation to their onset during pregnancy author s transl	The authors have established the prognosis of prenatal infections caused by varicella zoster relative to their occurrence during pregnancy.
14	new views referred to gamma glutamyl transpeptidase author s transl	New views refer to the translation of the gamma glutamyl transpeptidase.
14	the intraarticular fracture of the distal end of the tibia as a prognostic criterion author s transl	Intraarticular fracture of the spine; distal tip of the tibia as a prognostic criterion.
14	classification of intracerebral hematoma lateral type on c t and its relation to the shift of the lenticulostriate arteries author s transl	Classification of the lateral type d' intracerebral hematoma on ct and its relation to the displacement of lenticulostriate arteries at the time of translation of apos; author of the apos; lateral hematoma.
14	a contribution of the course of vitreous haemorrhage author s transl	It's a contribution from the evolution of the apogee; the hemorrhage of the glass and the translations.
14	a new case of leydigioma of the testis author s transl	A new case of leydigiome from the apos; the author is a translator.
14	reoperations in cancer surgery author s transl	Reoperations in the area of cancer surgery.
14	surgery in recurrences of breast carcinoma author s transl	Surgery in the event of a recurrence of a translated breast carcinoma.
14	reoperation in bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Reoperation in bronchial carcinoma.
14	reoperation in recurrence of carcinoma of the esophagus cardia and stomach author s transl	Reactivity in recurrence of esophageal and esophageal carcinoma; translative stomach.
14	pseudarthrosis growth deformity and malpostioning after fractures in childhood author s transl	Pseudo growth malformation-arthrosis and malpostion after fractures in a child who is a translator.
14	postoperative acute renal failure author s transl	Translation of apos; author on apos; acute postoperative renal failure.
14	the prognostic evaluation of bell s palsy by combined functional diagnosis author s transl	L' prognostic evaluation of bells paralysis by the author; a translated combined functional diagnosis.
14	the association scleroderma silicosis or erasmus syndrome author s transl	A combination of silicosis scleroderma or translational erasmic syndrome.
14	prognosis of hematopoietic dysplasia author s transl	The prognosis of hematopoietic dysplasia has been translated in the author.
14	clinical signs and therapy of familial polyposis of the colon and recutum author s transl	Clinical signs and therapy for family polyposes of colon and intestine.
14	surgical therapy of carcinoma of the colon and rectum author s transl	Surgical treatment of colon and rectal carcinoma.
14	carcinoma of the anus clinical signs and symptoms therapy and prognosis author s transl	Carcinoma of clinical signs and symptoms of therapy and prognosis.
14	short and long term prognosis of cardiac arrest in acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Short- and long-term prognosis of the disease; cardiac arrest in acute myocardial infarction.
14	corrected transposition of the great vessels a clinical review of 21 cases author s transl	Transposition of large vessels corrected a clinical review of 21 translator cases of 21 cases.
14	precordial mapping and enzymatic analysis for estimating infarct size in man a comparative study author s transl	Pre-cordial mapping and enzymatic analysis to estimate the size of the bones; infarct in the human, translation of the apos; comparative study.
14	spontaneous return of sinus rhythm in mitralic fibrillation of long duration author s transl	Spontaneous return of the sinus rhythm in mitral fibrillation of translation of long duration of l' author.
14	hodgkin s disease stage ivb survival for 12 years author s transl	Survival of stage IVb Hodgkin's disease for 12 years.
14	cogans s syndrome in childhood author s transl	Childhood syndrome Translation of words; author by author.
14	is there any evidence that the maternal hpl serum concentration is of prognostic value in cases of threatened abortion author s transl	Is there any indication that maternal hpl serum serum concentration has prognostic value in cases of abortion threats?
14	multicentric chondro myxoid fibroma of bone with extraskeletal foci author s transl	Multicentric chondro bone myxoid fibroma with translative extrastic foci.
14	the landry guillain barr strohl syndrome prognosis in adults author s transl	A legend to the committee codes appears at the end of this list.
14	therapy and prognosis of obstetrical lesions of the brachial plexus author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of the obstetrical lesions of the apos; author of the brachial plexus.
14	male breast cancer author s transl	This is a translation of the author's work on male breast cancer.
14	the disseminated intravascular coagulation diagnosis and therapy on a medical intensive care unit author s transl	Disseminated intravascular clotting diagnosis and therapy in a medical intensive care unit.
14	the problem of the internal mammary chain author s transl	The internal breast-chain problem of the apos; translations.
14	the problem of the treatment of the operable breast cancer author s transl	The problem of the treatment of breast cancer; operable author on breast cancer treatment translated into English.
14	the tolosa hunt syndrome author s transl	This is the translation of the apo, the author of the tolosa hunting syndrome.
14	differential diagnosis of malignant and benign lymphomas of the cns author s transl	Differential Diagnosis of Malignant and Benign Lymphomas in Immune Deficiency Syndrome; author.
14	pulmonary artery end diastolic pressure recordings after myocardial infarction author s transl	Diastolic pressure recordings of the apos; pulmonary artery after myocardial infarction.
14	gorlin goltz phakomatosis author s transl	Gorlin goltz phakomatosis author, translatosis.
14	a survey about findings and courses of 300 facial palsies a correlation of clinical and electrophysiological findings on computer author s transl	A survey of the results and prices of 300 facial palsies a correlation of clinical and electrophysiological results on the authors' translation of l' computer.
14	the special position of primary lymphosarcoma of the lung author s transl	Special position of primary lymphosarcoma of the translated lung.
14	basic features of diphtheria author s transl	Basic Characteristics of Authors' Translation on Diphtheria.
14	urothelial carcinoma in the prostate author s transl	Carcinoma urothelial de la prostate, translation from l' author.
14	clinical pathology and treatment of upper urinary tract urothelial tumors a 10 year review author s transl	Treatment and clinical pathology of upper urinary tract urothelial tumours.
14	tomodensitometric appearances in medical cerebral haemorrhages author s transl	The tomodensitometric apparitions in medical cerebral haemorrhages are translated by the authors.
14	generalized congenital fibromatosis a new case report author s transl	Generalized congenital fibromatosis (GCCF) is a new case of congenital fibromatosis.
14	myelomonocytic leukemia clinical cytological and cytogenetic studies of acute subacute and chronic forms author s transl	Myelomonocyte leukemia clinical cytological and cytogenetic studies of acute subacute and chronic, translative forms.
14	bone tuberculosis of the bovine type after bcg vaccination author s transl	Bone-borne bovine-type tuberculosis following BCG vaccination.
14	non rheumatic carditis a diagnostic study in a period of 11 years author s transl	Non-rheumatic carditis: a 11-year diagnostic study.
14	the mitral valve prolapse syndrome in childhood author s transl	Mitral valve prolapse syndrome in childhood author s translations.
14	immunoblastic lymphadenopathy malignant neoplasia or hyperimmune reaction author s transl	L' neoplastic immunoblastic neoplastic adenopathy or hyperimmune reaction by a translator.
14	bone marrow biopsy investigation an important prognostic factor in aplastic anaemia author s transl	Bone marrow biopsy is an important prognostic factor in the translation of apos; author of apos; aplastic anemia.
14	prognosis of acute upper gastrointestinal bleeding before and after the introduction of emergency endoscopy author s transl	The prognosis of acute gastrointestinal haemorrhage (GIH) before and after birth; introduction of apos; endoscopy; urgency is translated by the author.
14	prognosis of occupational bronchial asthma after change of occupation and elimination of antigen author s transl	Occupational bronchial asthma prognosis after change of occupation and death; elimination of antigen s translations.
14	the determination of calcitonin for hospital use author s transl	The determination of calcitonin for hospital use by the author of l'apos.
14	grafting in dentistry today author s transl	The transplant in dentistry is now the translation of the author.
14	particular aspects of testicular tumor in the elderly author s transl	Particular aspects of testicular tumour in elderly translators.
14	esophageal varices hemorrhage in portal hypertension author s transl	Varicular esophageal hemorrhage in the apos; portal hypertension.
14	a longterm rational control of the course of sarcoidosis in ambulatory practice author s transl	Long-term rational control of sarcoidosis course in ambulatory practice.
14	surgical treatment of cerebral ischemia indications for surgery in carotid artery stenosis author s transl	Surgical treatment for apo indications; cerebral ischemia (CIs) for stenosis surgery; carotid artery.
14	treatment of breast cancer author s transl	Treatment of the authors on breast cancer.
14	changed aspects of gastric cancer author s transl	Change of name; authors translation aspects on gastric cancer.
14	carcinoma of the head of the pancreas diagnosis surgical indications and results author s transl	Pancreatic head cancer is a diagnosis of surgical indications and the results are translations.
14	possibilities for operative therapy of carcinoma of the large intestine author s transl	Translation of large bowel carcinoma (LBI) surgical therapy opportunities.
14	survival time and life quality after operative treatment of colonic cancer author s transl	Survival time and quality of life after completion of surgical treatment for colon cancer.
14	study on the surgery of malignant biliary tumors author s transl	Study on the Surgery of Malignant Biliary Tumours Translation de l'apos; author.
14	the prognostic value of the laser interference fringe test with cataract patients author s transl	The prognostic value of laser fringe interference test with licensed cataract patients.
14	research concerning the spontaneous course of 135 cases of meni re s disease critical study of operative indications author s transl	Research concerning the apo; spontaneous evolution of 135 cases of disease meningema critical study of the translations operational indications of the authors.
14	contribution to differential diagnostic validity of mmpi to prognosis of efficiency of autogeneous training author s transl	Contribution to the differential diagnostic validity of mmpi to the prognosis of mmpi; effectiveness of translative autogenic formation.
14	breast cancer postoperative care author s transl	Translating the apo and apo; author of postoperative breast cancer care.
14	the dieulafoy s ulcer author s transl	I'd like to thank you for your time.
14	long term radiological and clinical observations following surgery for tibio fibular syndesmosis after fractures of the upper ankle joint author s transl	Long-term radiological and clinical observations following surgery for fibular tibia syndesmosis after apo fractures; translational upper ankle articulation; author.
14	lymphography in malignant ovarian tumours author s transl	Lymphography in Ovarian Malignant Tumours: a review of the literature.
14	contrast medium persistence in lymph nodes as a prognostic criterion in hodgkin s disease author s transl	In comparison, mean persistence in lymph nodes is a prognostic criterion for translation of Hodgkinian disease.
14	are clotting disorders a pathogenetic factor in nephrosclerosis and hypertension author s transl	Clotting disorders are a pathogenic factor in high blood pressure and nephrosclerosis.
14	immunological tests in the diagnosis and prognosis of disseminated lupus erythematosus before treatment author s transl	Immunologic tests in the diagnosis and prognosis of the lupus erythematosus disseminated before translation of the text; author of the treatment.
14	alcoholic cardiomyopathies author s transl	Alcoholic cardiomyopathies translations.
14	the e e g in ruptured cerebral aneurysms before operation use of carotid compression and the controlled hypotension test author s transl	In cerebral aneurysms ruptured before implantation; surgery; use of carotid compression and apo test; controlled hypotension.
14	subacute cytosteatonecrosis of pancreatic origin surgical problem in 5 cases author s transl	Cytosteatonecrosis subacute apos; pancreatic origin Surgical problem in 5 cases.
14	surgical problems of the primary sclerosing cholangitis author s transl	Surgical problems of the apos; author of the first multiple sclerosis of cholangitis translation.
14	clinicopathological study of diffuse carcinoma of stomach author s transl	A clinical study of diffuse cell carcinoma of the oral cavity.
14	urologic aspects of retroperitoneal hematoma author s transl	Translation of apo; author of urological aspects of apo; hematoma retroperitoneum.
14	varicocele spermiogram testicular biopsy plasma testosterone results of therapy author s transl	Varicocoel spermiogram testosterone plasma testicular biopsy results from translative author therapy.
14	transurethral resection of bladder tumors indication technique and results author s transl	Apos technique; indication of transurethral resection of bladder tumours and translation of apo; author of results.
14	bilateral intrauterine torsion of the spermatic cord case report author s transl	Intra @-@bilateral uterine Torsion of the apos; author of spermatic cord case report.
14	a simple procedure to forecast the course of diseases author s transl	A simple procedure to predict the evolution of translator diseases.
14	the prognosis of intrathoracic sarcoidosis on the basis of the clinical picture and the histological feature in the mediastinal lymph nodes author s transl	The prognosis of intrathoracic sarcoidosis based on the histologic and clinical presentation of the mediastinal lymph nodes is given by the author.
14	colon carcinoma duration of anamnesis and survival time author s transl	The duration of colon cancer history and survival time were translated by the authors.
14	malignant testicular tumours author s transl	This is a translation of the authors of malignant testicular tumours.
14	electron microscopic studies of lumbar sympathetic chains resected for arteritis of the lower limbs author s transl	Electron microscopy of lumbar sympathetic chains resected for apos; arteritis of lower limbs of apos; transl.
14	is curative treatment of breast cancer necessarily connected with radical mastectomy after rotter halsted author s transl	Treatment of breast cancer necessarily related to the radical mastectomy after rotting of l'apos; weightlifter translator.
14	explorative laparotomy and splenectomy for staging hodgkin s disease in children author s transl	Exploratory splenectomy and Laparotomy for stage determination of Hodgkin's disease in children.
14	exudative senile maculopathy clinical picture pathogenesis prognosis and therapy author s transl	Clinical diagram of pathogenic exudative senile maculopathy prognosis and therapies authors s transl.
14	spontaneous or idiopathic colonic perforation in the newborn author s transl	Spontaneous or idiopathic colonic perforation in translation of l' new author-born.
14	prognostic value of the eeg in pre term and full term babies author s transl	Projective value of apo; eg for pre-term and term babies.
14	intravesical and intraurethral pressure studies significance for the prognosis and the treatment of children with myelomeningocele author s transl	Dosage studies; importance of intravesical and intraurethral pressure for prognosis and treatment of children with myelomeningocles.
14	prostate carcinoma determination of progression following high voltage therapy author s transl	Determination of prostate carcinoma progression following high-voltage therapy.
14	urologic symptoms in the abdominal muscle deficiency syndrome author s transl	Urologic symptoms in translational abdominal muscle deficiency syndrome.
14	epithelial tumors of the urinary bladder in the first twenty years of life author s transl	Epithelial urinary bladder tumours in the first 20 years of life.
14	hyperergic collagenoses clinical aspects differential diagnosis and therapy author s transl	Hyperergenic collagenosis clinical aspects Differential diagnosis and therapeutic outcome.
14	diabetes and pregnancy treatment and results author s transl	Treatment of diabetes and pregnancy and translated results.
14	experimental investigation on non specific foreign body sarcoma induction of al2o3 ceramic implants author s transl	Experimental study on apo; sarcoma induction by nonspecific foreign bodies; al2o3 ceramic implants; translator.
14	interstitial pneumonia in children with malignancies during cytotoxic therapie clinical picture analysis of promoting factors and detailed discussion of etiology author s transl	Interstitial pneumonia in children with cancer; malignancies during seizures; cytotoxic therapy Clinical analysis of the promotion factors and detailed discussion of the translation of the apos; author of the apos; etiology.
14	thygeson s superficial punctate keratitis author s transl	Themeon keratitis superficial translator of l' author.
14	haematuria in children i differential diagnosis of haematuria in childhood author s transl	Children's hematuria i differential diagnosis of apos; translated children's hematuria.
14	the influence of moderate intrauterine nutrition on later physical and mental development in twins author s transl	The influence of moderate intrauterine nutrition on subsequent physical and mental development.
14	surgical management of liver trauma author s transl	Surgical management of liver injury.
14	whipple s disease a case of undiagnosed malabsorption with fatal outcome author s transl	Whipple disease: undiagnosed malabsorption with a fatal outcome.
14	non resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the bronchus study of the immunological status as prognosis factor and attempt at immunorestoration with b c g author s transl	Epidermoid squamous cell carcinoma non-resectable; lung bronchial study; immunologic status as prognostic factor and prognosis attempt; immunoremediation with genetic translators.
14	cerebro costo mandibular syndrome three new cases author s transl	Cerebro Costo Mandibular Costo Disorder-Vascular Three new translator cases.
14	complications and lethality after kidney grafts author s transl	Complications and lethality after translation of apos; author of a kidney transplant.
14	are convulsions on the fifth day of life a distinct clinical and electrophysiological entity author s transl	Seizures are the fifth day of life, a distinct clinical and electrophysiological entity.
14	clinical course following a neonatal e e g recording reported as severely abnormal author s transl	Clinical course following birth registration reported as a seriously abnormal author translation.
14	hydronephrosis due to pelvi ureteric junction syndrome in the adult and child 3 reports 78 adults and 33 children representing 118 hydronephrosis author s transl	Lapos; Pale ureteric junction syndrome (PJJD) hydronephrosis in adults and adults; pediatric 3 reports 78 adults and 33 children representing 118 perpetrators; hydronephrosis.
14	controlling the course of arterial occlusive diseases in practice and prognostic aspects author s transl	Progression of occlusive arterial diseases in practice and prognostic aspects.
14	radiation therapy of anal carcinome experiences in 28 cases during the years 1950 to 1975 author s transl	Radiotherapy of anal carcinoma experiments in 28 cases during 1950 to 1975 translators.
14	perforating keratoplasty preconditions indications complications follow up treatment author s transl	The perforation of the preconditions for keratoplasty indicates complications after the translation of the product.
14	statistics on 1231 patients with cancer of the larynx 1940 to 1974 author s transl	Statistics on 1,231 patients with laryngeal cancer from 1940 to 1974 Translation of apo; author.
14	splenectomy in idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura short and long term results author s transl	Splenectomy in both short- and long-term idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura.
14	treatment of vulvar cancer author s transl	Authors' treatment of vulvar cancer.
14	a scala of malignancy of the histomorphological forms of p rimary pulmonary sarcomas author s transl	A Scala of Malignancy of Histomorphological Forms of Pimary Pulmonary sarcomas Author s transl.
14	hernia incarcerata in the aged author s transl	Hernia epitomized in the translation of l' older author.
14	morbus wilson pathogenesis diagnosis therapy and course author s transl	Morbus Wilson diagnostic therapy of pathogenesis and course authors translate s.
14	correlation of the cytochemical classification of acute leukemia in children with the course of their disease author s transl	Correlation between cytochemical classification of acute leukemia in children and progression of their disease.
14	bronchial carcinoma problems and treatment with special reference to radiotherapy author s transl	Aircarcinoma and treatment with special reference to radiotherapy translative.
14	a comparative clinical and pathological study on the classification and prognostic features of 57 thymomas ii prognostic features author s transl	A comparative clinical and pathological study of the classification and prognostic characteristics of 57 thymosomes ii.
14	eosinophilic meningitis author s transl	Translation of the apo; author of eosinophilic meningitis.
14	radiologic diagnosis of injuries of the epiphyses in childhood author s transl	Radiological diagnosis of lesions of epiphysis in childhood.
14	early post traumatic epilepsy in childhood significance and short term prognosis author s transl	Pre-traumatic post traumatic epilepsy in childhood significance and short term prognosis.
14	emg prognosis of facial palsy associated with herpes zoster oticus ramsay hunt s syndrome a longitudinal study of 11 cases author s transl	The prognosis of facial paralysis associated with hunting syndrome; herpes zoster oticus ramsay, a longitudinal study of 11 cases, was translated by the author.
14	intraoperative measurements of prognostic value in coronary bypass surgery author s transl	Intraoperative measures of prognostic value of coronary artery bypass graft are reported by the author.
14	carcinoma of the penis symptomatics therapy and prognosis author s transl	Cancer of the penile symptomatic therapy and prognosis.
14	diagnostic laparotomy in hodgkin s disease indication management results author s transl	Diagnostic Laparotomy in Hodgkin's Indicator Management Results was translated by the author.
14	polycystic liver report of one case and therapeutic discussion author s transl	Patient polycystic liver report; one case and author therapeutic discussion.
14	eosinophil granuloma of bones report of 15 cases including 10 survivals with an average follow up of 4 years author s transl	Eosinophilic bone granuloma (ESB) reports 15 cases, 10 of which are survival cases with an average follow-up of 4 years.
14	pancreatic reflux into wirsung s duct during peroperative biliary radiomanometry in acute and chronic pancreatitis author s transl	Pancreatic reflux in the wirsung canal during surgery; intraoperative biliary radiomanometry in apos; author of apos; acute pancreatitis and chronic pancreatitis.
14	can one treat cases of multiple trauma in several stages author s transl	Can-multiple trauma cases can be treated in several stages of translating the text.
14	late ileal metastases from a skin melanoma with mainly hemorrhagic symptoms report of one case author s transl	Late ileal metastasis d'apos; a cutaneous melanoma presenting mainly hemorrhagic symptoms was reported by the author of one translation case.
14	septic shock in the urologic patient iv monitoring and therapy author s transl	Septic shock in urological patient IV surveillance and transl s author therapy.
14	the endocrine psychosyndrome in the long term i a cantamnestic reexamination of patients suffering from panhypopituitarism author s transl	Long-term endocrine psychosis i cantamnestic reexamination of panopituitarism patients transl.
14	the endocrine psychosyndrome in the long term ii a catamnestic reexamination after treatment of patients suffering from cushing s syndrome author s transl	Long-Term Endocrine Disorder (EDD) ii a catamnestic re-examination after treatment of patients with transl Cushing syndrome.
14	dysostotic changes and the prognosis of perthes disease after operation author s transl	Dysostotic changes and prognosis of Perth disease after surgery are reported by the author.
14	the osteomyelitis of the hip in newborns and its functional treatment with extensionsreposition and hanausek retention author s transl	L' hip osteomyelitis in newborns and its functional treatment with extension-reposition and writer hanausek s transl.
14	the results of radiotherapy managements in hodgkin s disease author s transl	The results of the management of radiation therapy in the authors of Hodgkin's disease are being translated.
14	left ventricular contraction reserve in coronary heart disease evaluation quantification and prognostic value author s transl	Reserve left ventricular contraction in the apos; evaluation of quantification and prognostic value of coronary artery disease.
14	first experiences with the fischer score for antepartal cardiotocograms author s transl	First experience with fisherman's score for translation of l' author of prenatal cardiotograms.
14	prognosis and therapy of sporadic seizures author s transl	The prognosis and treatment of sporadic seizures are provided by the authors.
14	liver disease in homozygous alpha1 antitrypsin deficiency author s transl	Liver disease in adults; alpha1 antitrypsin deficiency transl.
14	considerations of malignant ocular tumours in children author s transl	Canadian Journal of Gerontology, 3rd Edition, Ottawa, Ontario.
14	malignant tumours of the small intestine author s transl	Translation of the malignant tumors of the apos; author of the apos; small intestine.
14	the eeg in multiple sclerosis author s transl	Eg in multiple sclerosis: translations.
14	lactacidosis of the cerebrospinal fluid in apoplexy as indicator of prognosis author s transl	Lactacidosis of cerebrospinal fluid in apoplexy as an indicator of translational pronosis.
14	the shy drager syndrome author s transl	Translation of the apos; author of Drager syndrome shy.
14	hemodynamic classification of acute myocardial infarction physiopathological aspects and prognostic implications considerations on 130 cases author s transl	Hemodynamic classification of the pathophysiological aspects of apos; acute myocardial infarction and prognostic considerations in 130 cases.
14	reversible mental disturbances in craniocerebral injuries author s transl	Reversible mental disorders in craniocerebral injuries, translation of l' Author.
14	the prognostic value of the time of progression of symptoms and signs in carcinomas of the pharyngo larynx author s transl	The prognostic value of the time of progression of symptoms and signs in laryngeal carcinomas translates.
14	coats disease early detection and early treatment author s transl	Early detection and treatment of the disease.
14	epipleural branchiogenic cervical cyst author s transl	Translation of branchiogenic epipleural cervical cysts.
14	results of therapy in cases of tumors of the nasal cavity and paranasal sinuses in relation to different tumor classifications author s transl	Treatment results for nasal cavity and sinus paranasals in relation to different classifications of tumours Authors translate.
14	keratoplasty in complicated cases author s transl	In complicated cases, keratoplasty is the translation of l&apos.
14	cerebral av fistula with cardiac insufficiency in newborns author s transl	Avian cerebral fistulas showing heart failure in newly born @-@.
14	intracranial saccular aneurysms in the first three decades of life author s transl	The first three decades of life have been marked by intracranial saccular aneurysms.
14	clinic and therapy of the lingual thyreoid author s transl	Clinic and language therapy; author of linguistic thyroid s.
14	the cancer of the middle ear author s transl	Cancer of adults; middle ear authors translate translations.
14	lymphogranulomatosis in infancy histology therapy and prognosis author s transl	Lymphogranulomatosis in early childhood histological therapy and prognosis; translates.
14	diagnosis and therapy of acute penetrating myocardial injury author s transl	Diagnosis and treatment of acute, penetrating myocardial lesions.
14	renal cell carcinoma in childhood case report and review of the literature author s transl	Report of cases of apo; renal adenocarcinoma in children and literature review for apo translation.
14	herpes genitalis and herpes neonatorum author s transl	Herpes genitalis and herpes neonatorum translat author.
14	pathological anatomical aspects of organ preserving surgical procedures for breast carcinomas author s transl	Pathological anatomical aspects of the preservation of translatosed surgical intervention organs for breast carcinoma.
14	hypertension in old age author s transl	Lapse; hypertension in seniors.
14	surgical treatment of gastric stump carcinoma causes of the poorer results compared with primary gastric carcinoma author s transl	The surgical treatment of the carcinoma of the gastric strain is in progress; the results obtained are less good than those obtained by the sponsor; the study of gastric carcinoma.
14	results after resection of left ventricular aneurysm author s transl	Results after resection of translation of the apos; author of the apos; left ventricular aneurysm.
14	indications for rabies vaccination and prophylactic immunization in man author s transl	Recommended use for rabies and immunizations; Prophylactic immunizations in adults; men Translation of HIV infection; author.
14	therapy and prognosis of testicular tumors the seminoma results from radiation therapy in 100 patients author s transl	Therapy and prognosis of testicular tumours seminoma results from radiotherapy in 100 patients who translate patients.
14	therapy and prognosis of testicular tumors the teratocarcinoma results from 52 patients author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of testicular tumours teratocarcinoma results from 52 patient translators.
14	generic symptoms of hodgkin s disease in relation to other prognostic criteries author s transl	Generic symptoms of Hodgkin's disease compared to other prognostic criteria translated.
14	results from radiation therapy of 68 inoperable brain tumors 1950 to 1975 author s transl	Results of radiation treatment of 68 brain tumours inoperative from 1950 to 1975 Translation by the authors.
14	hodgkin s disease the value of prognostic criteria and of the combination of radiotherapy and chemotherapy in localised lymphoid stages i and ii 94 patients undergoing laparotomy author s transl	Hodgkin's disease, the value of prognostic criteria and the value of combining radiation and chemotherapy in the localized lymphoid stages i and ii 94 patients undergoing laparotomy.
14	systolic strangulation of the anterior interventricular artery a rare cause of myocardial ischaemia author s transl	Systolic strangulation of the apos; anterior interventricular artery, a rare cause of apos; myocardial ischemia.
14	diagnosis and therapy of the so called malignant external otitis author s transl	Self diagnosis and treatment-so-called external malignant otitis media.
14	crohn s disease indication for surgery author s transl	L' indication of Crohn's disease for surgery has been translated by the authors.
14	the prognosis in primary chronic glomerulonephritis in the adult 298 clinicopathological cases author s transl	The prognosis of primary chronic glomerulonephritis in adults is 298 clinical cases.
14	osteosarcoma 1978 a turning point in prognosis through adjuvant chemotherapy following adequate surgery author s transl	Osteosarcoma 1978 a turning point in the prognosis by adjuvant chemotherapy following the adequate translation of l' author on surgery.
14	prognosis of the retinal detachment in children author s transl	The prognosis of retinal detachment in translated children.
14	clinical signs and therapy of the abdominal aortic aneurysm author s transl	Clinical signs and oral therapy; author of apo; aneurysm of the apo; abdominal aorta.
14	results of 289 cadaver kidney transplantations at the berlin friedrichshain centre author s transl	Results of 289 cadaver kidney transplants at Berlin Friedrichshain Centre.
14	resistance testing and chemotherapy results of bronchial tumours author s transl	Resistance testing and results of bronchial cancer chemotherapy s s s transl.
14	retroperitoneal non chromaffin paraganglioma of the right kidney author s transl	Paragangliome retroperitoneal non chromaffin of the right kidney of the apos; transl.
14	angio immunoblastic lymphadenopathy author s transl	L' author; Angio lymphadenopathy study-immunoblastic translated into English.
14	mammary carcinoma author s transl	Translating breast cancer; author on breast cancer.
14	principles of radical surgery of gastric carcinoma author s transl	Principles of radical surgery; translations of gastric carcinoma.
14	tumor surgery principles of radical treatment author s transl	The principles of translational radical treatment tumour surgery s authors.
14	an attempt to predict the noise induced pts beginning a long time study author s transl	An attempt to predict the induced noise pts begins a long time author of l' study of translations of l' author.
14	course and prognosis of patients with myocardial infarction during 7 years observations in a cardiological clinic with an intensive care unit author s transl	The evolution and prognosis of patients with dementia; myocardial infarction over 7 years; observation in a cardiac clinic with an intensive care unit were translated by the author.
14	congenital cyst of the common hepatic duct adenocarcinoma of the gall bladder and of the stomach author s transl	Congenital cyst of the apos; common adenocarcinoma of the liver canal of the gallbladder translation of the apos; author of the apos; article on the apos; stomach.
14	non hodgkin s lymphoma in children improved prognosis through aggressive multiple drug combination and irradiation author s transl	Childhood non-Hodgkin's lymphoma has improved prognosis through aggressive combination of multiple medications and translation of the apos; radiation.
14	a prospective study on course and prognostic criteria in preleukemia author s transl	Prospective study and prognostic criteria in preleukemia.
14	injuries of the pelvis author r transl	Translation of wounds of the apos; author of the pelvis.
14	breast cancer in the male author s transl	Cancer of the breast in l'apos; author masculine.
14	roentgen diagnosis of necrotizing enterocolitis in the newborn author s transl	Diagnosis of the rodent; a necrotizing enterocolitis in the new-native translator.
14	radiotherapy of oral cancer late results author s transl	Oral Cancer Radiation Translated late results.
14	causes of death in road traffic injuries a comparison between 1970 and 1976 author s transl	The causes of death in road traffic injuries: a comparison between 1970 and 1976 (English version) The causes of death in road traffic injuries: a comparison.
14	hypothermic circulatory arrest after total blood exchange in dogs author s transl	Hypothermic circulatory arrest following complete blood exchange in the dogs.
14	on the rejection reaction against corneal grafts and first trails with tissue typed and hla adapted donor material author s transl	Rejection reaction against corneal grafts and early tracings with typed and hla tissue adapted to the material of the donor s translations of the author.
14	liposarcoma of the soft tissues of extremities a contribution to clinical diagnosis and treatment author s transl	End soft tissue liposarcoma a contribution to clinical diagnosis and author s translation therapy.
14	experiences with temporary epiphyseal stapling by blount author s transl	Experiences from translation; temporary stapling; epiphysis by epos; blount translator.
14	carcinoma of the apocrine glands of the vulva with intraepidermal spreading under the picture of invasive paget s disease author s transl	Cancer of the apocrine glands of the vulva with propagation intra@epidermal under the apos; image of the apos; author of the invasive disease of Paget transl.
14	results of surgical treatment of benign and malignant parotid tumors author s transl	Results of the surgical treatment of both benign and malignant parotid arteries.
14	radiotherapeutic aspects of testicular tumours results and problems author s transl	Radiotherapy effects of testicular tumours: findings and issues.
14	present views of limb replantation author s transl	To present the views of the replanters of the members.
14	ten years analysis of cancer of the female breast author s transl	Ten-year analysis of women's breast cancer rates in translated texts.
14	mycosis fungoides the practionner confronted with the nosological diagnostic and prognostic problems of epidermotrophic lymphomas author s transl	Mycosis fungoides the practitioner is faced with nosological diagnostic and prognostic problems of translative epidermotrophic lymphoma.
14	incidence natural history and complications of chronic arterial hypertension author s transl	The impact of diabetes; natural history and complications of diabetes; chronic, translative hypertension.
14	schizophrenia in childhood author s transl	Translation of Schizophrenia in the Children's Literature.
14	studies on the fibrinolytic system in ruptured intracranial aneurysm part 2 fibrinogen changes in acute stage of sah as a risk factor of the ischemic complications following vasospasm author s transl	Studies on the fibrinolytic system in ruptured epos; part 2 intracranial aneurysm, fibrinogenic changes in the acute phase of sah as risk factor for ischemic complications after translation of apos; author of vasospasm.
14	problems of a stage based therapeutic approach to surgery in breast carcinoma author s transl	Issues; a therapeutic step-by-step approach to surgery in translating breast carcinoma.
14	late results of tracheal resection author s transl	The late results of the tracheal resection are interpreted.
14	clinical experience in the diagnosis and therapy of plasmacytoma author s transl	Clinical experience in the diagnosis and treatment of the translator plasmacytome.
14	chemotherapy of gastrointestinal cancer author s transl	Gastro cancer chemotherapy translations-intestinal authors.
14	the value of scintigraphy and osteoscintimetry for the early detection of legg calv perthes disease author s transl	The value of scintigraphy and lapos; osteosc intimometry for early detection of leg calves perthes translation of lapos; author of disease.
14	calcifying and non calcifying chronic pancreatitis a statistical study author s transl	Calcification and Non-Calcification of Chronic Pancreatitis, author of a statistical study.
14	prediction test of nomifensine prescription from symptomatic pre therapeutic status author s transl	Predictive test of the prescription of nomifensin from the pre- symptomatic-therapeutic author s transl.
14	cerebral hemodynamics in the vegetative state patients relationship between patterns of dysautoregulation and prognosis author s transl	Cerebral hemodynamics in the vegetative patients relationship between the models of self-regulation and prognosis translates.
14	oculomotor palsy caused by aneurysms at the internal carotid posterior communicating artery junction and its prognosis following intracranial surgery author s transl	Oculomotor paralysis caused by aneurysms at the internal posterior carotid junction of the apos; connective artery and prognosis following apos; intracranial surgery.
14	csf lactate and eeg changes in comatose patients with various medical conditions author s transl	Csf lactate and eeg changes in comatose patients with various author medical conditions as translated by the authors.
14	epiphysiodesis in the treatment of discrepancies in length of the lower extremities author s transl	L' epiphysiodesis in the treatment of lower end length deviations, is translated by the authors.
14	diagnosis and differential diagnosis of acute hematogenous osteomyelitis in infants author s transl	Diagnosis and differential diagnosis of osteomyelitis; acute haematogenic osteomyelitis in infants.
14	muco epidermoid tumor of the bronchus in a 8 year old girl author s transl	Mucosal epidermoid tumour in the bronchi of an 8-year-old girl who is a translator.
14	cutaneous periarteritis nodosa critical study about 4 cases author s transl	Critical study of periarteritis nodosa skin in approximately 4 cases.
14	new aspects in the treatment of elderly people with carcinoma of the urinary bladder author s transl	A new approach to the treatment of elderly people with apos; a bladder carcinoma of the apos; author of the urinary translation.
14	the acute calculus cholecystitis in the elderly patients prognosis and therapy author s transl	The acute calculation of cholecystitis in elderly patients with oral pronosis and therapy.
14	parasternal lymphoscintigraphy in mastocarcinoma its diagnostic value and significance for prognosis author s transl	The parasitic lymphoscintigraphy of mastocarcinoma has diagnostic value and significance for translation of the prognosis.
14	benign solitary enchondroma author s transl	L' author; solitary and benign enchondroma s' is being translated.
14	the diagnosis of bleeding small bowel tumours author s transl	Diagnosis of bowel tumour hemorrhage; small intestine.
14	radiotherapy of the medulloblastoma development of methods and results of the treatment of 30 patients from 1963 to 1976 author s transl	Radiotherapy of the development of medulloblastoma of treatment methods and results for 30 patients from 1963 to 1976 transl.
14	is drepanocitic trait asymptomatic author s transl	Translating the asymptomatic drepanotic characteristic of the author.
14	the indications for operative revascularization of acute and chronic renal artery embolism author s transl	Acute and chronic renal artery embolism is the most common form of renal artery embolism.
14	surgery of the mitral valve author s transl	Surgical work on the translation of the apos; author of the mitral valve.
14	reye s syndrome in adults author s transl	Reye's Syndrome (RSA) in the apos; adult author.
15	epidemiologic studies of carcinoma of the kidney ii association of renal adenoma with smoking	Epidemiological studies of renal carcinoma ii association between renal adenoma and smoking.
15	early childhood brain damage and neuroses in adults	Early childhood brain injury and neurosis in adults.
15	epidemiology and etiology of clefts	Epidemiology and etiology of cervical cracks.
15	facial features associated with predisposition to cleft lip	Facial characteristics associated with predisposition to cleft lip.
15	skin cancer and immunosuppression	Skin cancer and immunosuppression.
15	case fatality of hyperplasia of the prostate in two teaching and three regional board hospitals	Lifecality of apo; prostate hyperplasia in two hospitals; teaching and three regional administration.
15	legal abortion a critical assessment of its risks	Legal abortion; abortion; critical assessment of pregnancy; risk risk risk assessment; access to pregnancy; legal abortion; abortion; assessment of pregnancy; absence of pregnancy; abortion.
15	detection of individual susceptibility toward coronary disease	Detection of individual susceptibility to coronary heart disease.
15	prevention of myocardial infarction	Preventing stroke; myocardial infarction.
15	factors of high fetal risk in a peripheral clinic	High fetal risk factors for diabetes mellitus in peripheral clinics.
15	extrathoracic bypass for stenosis of innominate artery	Extrathoracic bypass for oral stenosis; innominated artery.
15	surgical treatment of chronic constrictive pericarditis using cardiopulmonary bypass	Surgical treatment for osteoarthritis; chronic constrictive pericarditis (CP) with apos; cardiopulmonary bypass graft.
15	bladder cancer smoking beverages and artificial sweeteners	Cigarette drinks for bladder cancer and artificial sweeteners.
15	sequential aspects of spontaneous abortion maternal age parity and pregnancy compensation artifact	Sequential aspects of pregnancy; spontaneous abortion Gender; maternal age and pregnancy compensation.
15	occult breast carcinomas detected by xeroradiography clinical considerations	Carcinoma occult of the breast detected by xeroradiography, clinical considerations.
15	treatment of myeloma comparison of melphalan chlorambucil and azathioprine	Treatment of the myeloma by comparing melphalan chlorambucil and l' azathioprine.
15	sequential therapy compared with combination therapy in multiple myeloma	Sequential treatment compared to multiple myeloma combination therapy.
15	a reassessment of the distribution of multiple sclerosis part one	Reassessing the distribution of the first part of multiple sclerosis (MS) in Canada.
15	evaluation of oral pharyngeal laryngeal and esophageal cancer risk in reverse smokers of chuttas	A prospective study of oral pharyngeal laryngeal and esophageal cancer risk in the United States.
15	ethical issues in family planning for hospitalized psychiatric patients	Ethical issues related to family planning for in-patients and psychiatric patients.
15	emotional problems of residents in psychiatry	Emotional problems of psychiatric residents.
15	classification of suicidal behaviors i quantifying intent and medical lethality	Classification of Suicide Behaviours i. quantification of intent and medical lethality.
15	controlling the abuse of illicit methadone in washington dc	Drug monitoring; illicit methadone abuse in D.C. DC.
15	the awareness of risk and personal relevance in alcoholics	Awareness of risk and self-relevance in the alcoholics.
15	risk of coronary surgery two hundred consecutive patients with no hospital deaths	There are 200 consecutive patients with no deaths in the hospital.
15	carotid endarterectomy complications and preoperative assessment of risk	Complications of apo; carotid endarterectomy and preoperative risk assessment.
15	a simple epidemiological model for evaluating the malaria inoculation rate and the risk of infection in infants	Simple epidemiological model to assess rates of disease; malaria inoculation and risk of infection in infants.
15	clinician attitudes toward the suicide attempter	Attitudes of clinicians toward suicide attempters.
15	changes in creatine kinase and its isoenzymes in human fetal muscle during development	Changes in the creatine kinase and its isoenzymes in human fetal muscle during development.
15	routine screening for venous thrombosis by ultrasound in the elderly	Routine screening for thrombosis by ultrasound in the elderly.
15	depression followed by suicide a comparison of depressed suicides with living depressives	Depression followed by suicide, a comparison between depressive suicide and life-threatening depression.
15	idiopathic facial paralysis pregnancy and the menstrual cycle	Facial idiopathic paralysis, pregnancy and menstrual cycle.
15	aortocoronary bypass in the diabetic patient	I.C.G. bypass surgery in the diabetic patient.
15	ball valve prostheses current appraisal of late results	Ball valve prostheses current late performance evaluation.
15	carcinoembryonic antigen in patients suffering from ulcerative proctocolitis	Carcino antigen-embryonic in patients with ulcerative proctocolitis.
15	the detection of aberrant dna synthesis in a member of a high risk cancer family	Detection of apos; aberrant synthesis of apos; DNA in a member of a high-risk cancer family.
15	a comparative clinico genetic study of attack like schizophrenia with late and early manifestation with regard to age	A clinical genetic comparative study of seizures such as schizophrenia, with late and early manifestations in relation to age.
15	coronary artery anatomy before and after direct revascularization surgery clinical and cinearteriographic studies in 67 selected patients	Anatomy of the apos; coronary artery before and after direct revascularization surgery Clinical and cinerearterographic studies in 67 selected patients.
15	pyridoxal phosphate and hypertensive disorders of pregnancy	Pyridoxal phosphate and hypertensive pregnancy disorders.
15	psychiatric resident suicide an analysis of five cases	Suicide d' one psychiatric resident, analysis of five cases.
15	a comparative study of predictive criteria in the predisposition of homicidal adolescents	A comparative study of predictive criteria for adolescents' predisposition to suicide and homicide.
15	protease inhibitors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease	Protease inhibitors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
15	parent child relationships and psychopathological disorder in the child	Parenting-child and psychopathological disorders in children.
15	major factors in the development of diabetes mellitus in 10 000 men	Major factors in the development of diabetes mellitus in over 10,000 men.
15	hereditary pancreatitis nonspecificity of aminoaciduria and diagnosis of occult disease	Pancreatitis not specific of l' aminoaciduria and diagnosis of occult disease.
15	pre natal irradiation and childhood malignancy a review of british data from the oxford survey	Prenatal irradiation and childhood malignancy, a review of UK data from the Oxford survey.
15	myocardial infarction in young men study of risk factors in nine countries	Risk factors for myocardial infarction in young men in nine countries.
15	determinants of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in patients with intermediate levels of alpha antitrypsin	Determinants of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in patients with intermediate levels of d' alpha @-@antitrypsin.
15	myocardial infarction in young women with special reference to oral contraceptive practice	Myocardial infarction in young women, especially oral contraception.
15	oral contraceptives and death from myocardial infarction	I'm talking about oral contraceptives and death from myocardial infarction.
15	parenteral iron in treating surgical patients and the importance of routine evaluation of serum iron binding capacity report of three cases	Parenteral iron in surgical and non-surgical patients; importance of apo; regular assessment of serum iron binding capacity 3 case report.
15	some risk factors of ischaemic heart disease in the prague male population	Some risk factors for ischemic heart disease in the male population are prague.
15	hereditary progressive atrioventricular conduction defect	Progressive hereditary conduction failure atrio-ventricular.
15	infections in cancer patients on a protected environment prophylactic antibiotic program	Infections in patients with cancer as part of a community-based prophylactic antibiotic program in a protected environment.
15	epidemiology of severe mental retardation in children community studies	Epidemiology of diabetes mellitus; severe mental retardation in children Community studies.
15	infants home environments a comparison of high risk families and families from the general population	The family environment of infants is a comparison between high-risk families and families in the general population.
15	identification of women at risk for unwanted pregnancy	Identification of women at risk of unwanted pregnancy outcomes.
15	radioactive contamination of the environment and the possible consequences	Radioactive contamination of the environment and possible consequences.
15	the problems of abdominal operations in elderly patients	The problem of the use of abdominal procedures in elderly patients.
15	continuing evaluation of coronary care	Ongoing evaluation of the coronary care.
15	the incidence of otosclerosis in the general population	Labs; incidence of osteoarthritis; otosclerosis in the general population.
15	coronary heart disease risk factors in school children the muscatine study	Coronary heart disease risk factors in school children.
15	the interrelationship of maternal smoking and increased perinatal mortality with other risk factors further analysis of the ontario perinatal mortality study 1960 1961	The relationship between maternal smoking and increased perinatal and perinatal mortality has been the subject of further analysis in the framework of the Canadian Perinatal Mortality Study, conducted in 1960.
15	general anaesthesia during early pregnancy	Early pregnancy general anesthesia.
15	problem of the evaluation of experimental research for clinical testing of new drugs in man	Issue; evaluation of experimental drug research; clinical trial of new drugs in patients; men.
15	evaluation of side effects	Side effects assessment.
15	children vulnerable to psychopathology the stony brook high risk project	Children vulnerable to psychopathology rocky creek high risk project.
15	coronary artery disease in young women	Young women with coronary artery disease.
15	hazards of cardiac pacing	Risks related to cardiac stimulation.
15	tympanoplasty on only hearing ears	Tympanoplasty is performed on hearing ears only.
15	inheritance of idiopathic nephrotic syndrome	Heredity of the idiopathic nephrotic syndrome.
15	prenatal diagnosis of a neural tube defect meckel syndrome	Prenatal diagnosis of l*apos syndrome; neural tube defect.
15	reserpine and breast cancer in a retirement community	Reserpine and breast cancer in retired community.
15	editorial oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction	Oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction.
15	recurrent ventricular fibrillation and modes of death in survivors of out of hospital ventricular fibrillation	Recurrent ventricular fibrillation and modes of death in the survivors of stroke; ventricular fibrillation outside the apo; hospital.
15	near maximal ecg stress testing and coronary artery disease risk factor analysis in los angeles city fire fighters	Stress tests and risk factor analysis for coronary heart disease are almost maximal in the Los Angeles City Fire Department.
15	radiation safety in flights of high altitude aircraft	Radiation safety in high altitude aircraft; high altitude aircraft.
15	drug and risk perception on ninth grade students sex differences and similarities	The perception of drugs and risk among grade 9 students is gender-differentiated and similar.
15	coronary risk factors in 287 cases of myocardial infarct treated in a coronary unit	Coronary risk factors in 287 cases of cardiac myocardial infarction treated in coronary units.
15	cancer incidence in the mexican american	The incidence of cancer in Mexico.
15	prodromata of myocardial infarction and sudden death	Protromata d' myocardial infarction and sudden death.
15	monitoring for serious arrhythmias and high risk of sudden death	Severe arrhythmia and high risk of sudden death surveillance.
15	ventricular premature beats and mortality of men with coronary heart disease	Preterm mortality and premature heartbeat in men with coronary artery disease.
15	ventricular premature beats in a population sample frequency and associations with coronary risk characteristics	Frequency of premature ventricular beats in a population sample and association with coronary risk characteristics.
15	coronary revascularization in patients surviving unexpected ventricular fibrillation	Coronary revascularization in patients who have survived unplanned ventricular fibrillation.
15	medical information bureau	Canadian Centre for Management Development.
15	the role of intraaortic balloon counterpulsation in patients undergoing cardiac operations	The role of intraaortic balloon counterpulsation in the treatment of heart failure.
15	the assessment of maternal nutrition	Maternal nutrition assessment.
15	panel 2 phase ii investigations	Panel 2 Phase II Surveys; ii.
15	risk indicators in childhood malignancies	Risk indicators for childhood cancer; malignancies.
15	an endocrine model for the diagnosis of intrauterine growth retardation as demonstrated by the determination of total estrogen and pregnandiol 24 hour urinary excretion in 222 at risk pregnancies	Endocrine model for diagnosis of intra-@ uterine growth retardation as demonstrated by determination of total urinary excretion of estrogen and pregnandiol over 24 hours in 222 high-risk pregnancies.
15	validity of clinical examination and mammography as screening tests for breast cancer	Validity of oral contraceptives; clinical examination and mammography as breast screening tests.
15	risk factors and age	Risk factors and attitudes; age.
15	physician suicide risk practical recognition and management	The risk of suicide in doctors is recognised and managed in practice.
15	evaluating suicidal risk	Evaluation of suicidal risk.
15	prediction of sudden death in patients discharged after acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction (AMI) is a major cause of sudden death in patients discharged after an acute MI.
15	coronary risk factors in a community findings in tecumseh michigan	"""Coronary risk factors in a community findings in tecumseh michigan"", Journal of Infectious Diseases."
15	elevated serum levels of estrogen and prolactin in daughters of patients with breast cancer	High serum estrogen and prolactin levels in the daughters of patients with breast cancer.
15	the relative risk of spontaneous complete atrioventricular block in elderly patients with impaired intra ventricular conduction	Relative risk of spontaneous complete atrioventricular blockade in elderly patients with impaired intraventricular conduction.
15	can the oxytocin challenge test serve as the primary method for managing high risk pregnancies	Oxytocin challenge test can be used-as the primary method of managing high-risk pregnancies.
15	cystourethrography procedures in children evaluation of benefits versus dose	Cystourethrography procedures in children dose-related benefit assessment.
15	genetic counseling in cases of chromosome insertions	Genetic counseling in chromosome insertions.
15	estimation of radiation dosage and transmutation effect of 14 c involved in measuring rate of albumin synthesis with 14 c carbonate	Estimation of radiation dose and dose; transmutation effect of 14 c involved in measuring the rate of synthesis of l' albumin with carbonate 14 c.
15	abdominal wound disruption	Disturbance of the abdominal wounds.
15	critical appraisal of domiciliary obstetric and neonatal practice	Critical evaluation of home obstetric and neonatal practice.
15	valve replacement a perspective	Replacement of apos; valve a perspective.
15	neonatal risk following late gestational genital herpesvirus hominis infection	Neonatal risk following late gestational genital herpesvirus (MSV) hominis infection.
15	the iowa 500 suicide in mania depression and schizophrenia	Iowa 500 suicide in manic depression and schizophrenia.
15	observations on the epidemiology of post partum mental illness	Observations on mental illness and addiction; epidemiology post @-@partum.
15	cerebral infarctions study of their prevention	The prevention of cerebral infarction is being studied.
15	toxicological investigations with fluorescent whitening agents	Tox screen with fluorescent bleaching agents, please.
15	prevention of thrombo embolic complications in urology using sub cutaneous calcium heparinate author s transl	Prevention of embolic thrombo complications in urology at birth; help with translation of apos; author of apos; calcium heparin under-skin.
15	a surrogate system for informed consent	It's a substitution system for informed consent.
15	the incidence of myocardial infarction in hospitalized patients and the risk factors of myocardial infarction	Incidence of stroke; myocardial infarction in hospitalized patients and risk factors for myocardial infarction.
15	empirical risk of oligophrenia in siblings of proband oligophrenics in populations with high levels of inbreeding	Empirical risk of oligophrenes in oligophrenic proband brothers and sisters in populations with high levels of inbreeding.
15	risk vulnerability and enrollment in a prepaid group practice	Risk vulnerability and pre-paid group practice registration.
15	risk factors for coronary artery disease in children of affected families	Risk factors for coronary heart disease (CHD) in children in affected families.
15	the uterine cervix from adolescence to the menopause	Cervical cancer is the most common type of cancer.
15	prediction of suicide a replication study	Prediction of suicide, replication study.
15	the occupation of fishing as a risk factor in cancer of the lip	L' fishing occupation as a risk factor for cancer of the lip.
15	oral contraceptives as related to cancer and benign lesions of the breast	The use of oral contraceptives for cancer and minor lesions of the breast.
15	primary risk factors in patients with myocardial infarction	Prevalent risk factors in patients with myocardial infarction.
15	diagnostic x rays in late pregnancy and in the neonate	X-ray diagnosis at the end of pregnancy and new-born.
15	hospital acquired infections i surveillance in a university hospital	Infections acquired in a teaching hospital; hospital surveillance.
15	psychosocial factors and the risk of myocardial infarctions in white women	Psychosocial factors and risk of myocardial infarction in white women.
15	previous fetal loss and risk of sudden infant death syndrome in subsequent offspring	Anterior fetal loss and risk of sudden infant death in the offspring.
15	coffee drinking and death due to coronary heart disease	Drinking coffee and dying as a result of a coronary heart disease.
15	serum lipoproteins and coronary heart disease in a population study of hawaii japanese men	Prevalence of coronary heart disease in a population-based study of hawaii japanese men.
15	association between maternal diabetes and the respiratory distress syndrome in the newborn	Association between maternal diabetes mellitus and respiratory distress syndrome in the new-born.
15	oral contraceptives and reduced risk of benign breast diseases	Oral contraceptives and reducing the risk of minor breast diseases.
15	liver cell adenomas associated with use of oral contraceptives	Hepatic cell adenomas associated with oral contraceptive use.
15	thrombosis with low estrogen oral contraceptives	Thrombosis with low-dose oral contraceptives; oral contraceptives; estrogen.
15	a genetic study of bipolar affective disorder	A genetic study of bipolar affective disorder?
15	breast cancer detection today an opinion	Detection of breast cancer today; ooh, one opinion.
15	length of interbirth intervals in female psychiatric patients and controls	The length of the intervals between births in psychiatric patients and in female controls.
15	association of exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinoma	Association of exogenous estrogens and endometrial carcinomas.
15	increased risk of endometrial carcinoma among users of conjugated estrogens	Increased risk of birth weight carcinoma; endometrium in users of conjugated estrogen.
15	editorial cancer risk and estrogen use in the menopause	Editorial on cancer risk and risk factors; use of estrogen in menopause.
15	editorial risks and benefits of estrogen use	Editorial risks and benefits of estrogen use.
15	nosocomial respiratory syncytial virus infections	Nosocomial infections with respiratory syncytial virus.
15	serum lipids and uric acid relationship in ischemic thrombotic cerebrovascular disease	Serum lipids and uric acid relation in cerebrovascular ischemic thrombotic disease.
15	stoke in the young a four year study 1968 to 1972	Stoke in the Young, four-year study, 1968 @-@1972.
15	portosystemic shunting in patients with primary biliary cirrhosis a good risk disease	Portosystemic shunt in patients with primary cirrhosis of the liver, a high-risk condition.
15	factors predictive of perioperative myocardial infarction during coronary operations	Predictive factors in perioperative myocardial infarction during coronary operations.
15	the cardiologist s responsibility for preventing coronary heart disease	The cardiologist is responsible for the prevention of coronary heart disease.
15	early risks of open heart surgery for mitral valve disease	Early risks of open-heart surgery for mitral valve disease.
15	subacute sclerosing panencephalitis an epidemiologic study in israel	Subacute, sclerosing Panencephalitis, an epidemiological study in the israel.
15	endometrial adenocarcinoma and the polycystic ovary syndrome	Endometrial adenocarcinoma and polycystic ovary syndrome.
15	antirabies treatment in man in relation to epidemiological conditions nordrhein westfalen 1972	Anti-rabies treatment for men in relation to north-eastern epidemiological conditions Westfalen 1972 North-rhein.
15	implications of precancerous rectal biopsy in patients with inflammatory bowel disease	Effects of precancerous rectal biopsy in patients with apo, an inflammatory bowel disease.
15	patients at high risk for low birth weight delivery	Patients at high risk of low birthweight deliveries.
15	aortocoronary artery bypass present indications and risk factors	Coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) is indicated and presents risk factors.
15	gastrointestinal complications after renal transplantation predictive factors and morbidity	Gastro-intestinal complications following renal transplant predictive factors and morbidity.
15	cardiovascular risk factors and hearing loss a study of 1 000 fifty year old men	Cardiovascular risk factors and hearing loss: a study of 1,000 50-year-old men.
15	risk factors in postoperative myocardial infarction	Postoperative myocardial infarction: risk factors.
15	risk factors revisited	A review of risk factors has been undertaken.
15	infection risk in meningococcal infection the effect of the duration and closeness of the contact in transmission of the meningococcus	Risk of meningococcal disease; meningococcal infection Effect of contact duration and proximity on meningococcal transmission.
15	the activated plasma recalcification time a measurement encompassing the activated partial thromboplastin time and platelet function with improved detection of bleeders	Activated plasma recalcification time, a measure encompassing activated partial thromboplastin time and platelet function, with better detection of hemorrhage events.
15	lung cancer and air pollution in southcentral los angeles county	Lung cancer and air pollution in the center-southern Los Angeles County.
15	prevalence and incidence data in the assessment of the risk of coronary heart disease	Prevalence and prevalence data; incidence in the population; coronary heart disease risk assessment.
15	cancer of the colon socioeconomic variables in a community	Cancer of socioeconomic colonic variables in a community.
15	tucson epidemiologic study of obstructive lung diseases i methodology and prevalence of disease	Clinical epidemiological study of obstructive pulmonary diseases i methodology and disease prevalence.
15	tucson epidemiologic study of obstructive lung diseases ii effects of in migration factors on the prevalence of obstructive lung diseases	Tucson Epidemiological Study of Obstructive Pulmonary Diseases ii effects of migration factors on the prevalence of obstructive pulmonary disease.
15	the effect of menopause on serum cholesterol in american pima indian women	The effects of menopause on serum cholesterol in American pima Indian women.
15	tuberculin sensitivity in a high risk canine population	Tuberculin sensitivity in a high risk dog population. http://www.pubs.gc.ca/pubs/pubs/index_e.html.
15	fetal monitoring its effect on the perinatal mortality and cesarean section rates and its complications	Fetal monitoring of its effect on perinatal and caesarian mortality rates and complications.
15	gynaecologic surgery on elderly patients	Uh, gynaecological surgery on elderly patients.
15	the heritable hyperlipoproteinemias and atherosclerosis	Hereditary hyperlipoproteinemia and apos; atherosclerosis.
15	heritable factors in the severity of affective illness	Hereditary factors of the severity of emotional illness.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california distribution of biochemical risk factors	Epidemiological studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in Japanese men living in Hawaii and in California, distribution of biochemical risk factors.
15	fetal risk in hyperextension of the fetal head in breech presentation	Fetal risk in the fetus; hyperextension of the fetal head through the fetal seat.
15	the effect of availability and utilization of prenatal care and hospital services on infant mortality rates summary of the findings of the louisiana infant mortality study part ii	Effect of availability and utilization of prenatal care and hospital services on infant mortality rates; Louisiana Infant Mortality Study, part ii.
15	oral contraceptives and thromboembolism a reassessment	Oral contraceptives and thromboembolism are subject to re-evaluation.
15	study of coronary risk factors related to physical activity in 15 171 men	Coronary heart disease risk factor study; physical activity in 15,171 men.
15	what is barbiturate dependence and who is at risk	What' is-what addiction to barbiturates and who is at risk?
15	primary angle closure glaucoma oculometry epidemiology and genetics in a high risk population	"""Primary angle closure glaucoma oculometry epidemiology and genetics in a high-risk population"", American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
15	familial risk and cancer control	It's called family risk and cancer control.
15	rubella vaccine in postpubertal women experience in western washington state	The vaccine against rubella in women post-pubertaires in the west of the state of Washington.
15	comparative results of total detections and detection in a group of patients with high risk for tuberculosis in an urban environment	Comparative total detection and detection results for a group of patients at high risk of tuberculosis in urban settings.
15	psychiatry morphology and behaviour genetics author s transl	Psychiatric Morphology and Behavioural Genetics, transl.
15	multiple sequential skin cancers the risk of skin cancer in patients with previous skin cancer	Sequential multiple skin cancer, risk of skin cancer in patients who have had skin cancer.
15	estrogen use and stroke risk in postmenopausal women	"""Estrogen use and stroke risk in postmenopausal women,"" American Journal of Oestrogen."
15	changing risks in tuberculosis	Evolution of risk of tuberculosis infection.
15	effect of a mass screening program on the risk of cervical cancer	Effect of mass screening program on risk of cervical cancer.
15	chemoprophylaxis in inactive tuberculosis long term evaluation of a canadian trial	Chemoprophylaxis in apo; long-term evaluation of apo, a Canadian trial of inactive tuberculosis.
15	laparoscopy in the obese patient	Uh, Laparoscopy on the obese patient.
15	a simple assessment of the risk of low birth weight to select women for nutritional intervention	Simple risk assessment; low birth weight to select women for prenatal screening; subject matter; a nutritional intervention.
15	polyps and diverticulosis of large bowel in autopsy population of akita prefecture compared with miyagi high risk for colorectal cancer in japan	Polyps and diverticulosis of the large intestine in the population; autopsy of the prefecture d'apos; Akita compared to the high risk of colorectal cancer of miyagi in Japan.
15	age at the time of the first birth a variable with simple double or triple significance in breast cancer studies	Age at first birth is a variable variable that may have a simple double or triple significance in breast cancer studies.
15	what is early diagnosis doing	What' is-what does early diagnosis do?
15	what should the physician ask	What is-what should the doctor ask?
15	malignant neoplasms in the families of patients with ataxia telangiectasia	Malignant neoplasms in families of patients with telangiectatic ataxia.
15	association between juvenile onset obesity and severe adult obesity in 73 532 women	Association between childhood obesity and obesity; severe obesity among adults; and 73,532 women.
15	nasopharyngeal cancer in bermuda	Nasopharyngeal cancer in the Bermuda.
15	the effect of different modes of artificial ventilation and of some prophylactic means on the incidence of postoperative deep vein thrombosis	L' effect of different modes of artificial ventilation and certain means of prophylaxis on post-operative, deep vein thrombosis.
15	effects of medicare on hospital use a disease specific study	A disease-specific study is being carried out to investigate the effects of medicare on hospitals.
15	anatomical site and size of 222 early asymptomatic oral squamous cell carcinomas a continuing prospective study of oral cancer ii	Anatomical site and size of 222 early asymptomatic buccal squamous cell carcinoma; ongoing prospective oral cancer study ii.
15	risk for breast cancer development determined by mammographic parenchymal pattern	Breast cancer risk as determined by mammographic parenchyma profile.
15	ventricular arrhythmias during unstable angina pectoris	Ventricular arrhythmia during apos; unstable angina.
15	treadmill exercise testing of mass screening for coronary risk factors	Mass treadmill screening tests for coronary risk factors.
15	studies of tuberculosis in man in relation to infection in cattle	Tuberculosis studies in adults; men associated with diabetes; infection in cattle.
15	the risk of tuberculous infection in sweden	Tuberculosis infection in sweden.
15	tetralogy of fallot risk factors associated with complete repair	Tetralogy of the Fallot risk factors associated with complete repair.
15	lung cancer following exposure to chloromethyl methyl ether an epidemiological study	Lung cancer following exposure to chloromethyl methyl ether, epidemiological study.
15	editorial considerations of risks versus benefits	Editorial considerations of risk versus benefit issues.
15	atherosclerosis of the internal mammary artery	Atherosclerosis of the spinal cord; internal mammary artery.
15	influence of rejection on graft survival after renal transplantation	L' influence of rejection on survival of renal transplant.
15	some possible childhood indicators of adult schizophrenia inferred from children of schizophrenics	Some possible childhood indicators of adult schizophrenia have been inferred from children with schizophrenia.
15	use of creatine kinase for detecting severe x linked muscular dystrophy carriers	Use of creatine kinase to detect carriers of apos; severe x-related muscular dystrophy.
15	chronic pulmonary heart disease and its risk factors among a worker population in teheran	Chronic lung disease and its associated risk factors in a working population in Tehran.
15	an unusual occurrence of multiple sclerosis in a small rural community	Unusual manifestation of multiple sclerosis in a small rural community.
15	comparison of rehospitalized and nonrehospitalized psychiatric patients on community adjustment self assessment guide	Comparison of rehospitalized and non-rehospitalized psychiatric patients according to the mental health rehabilitation guide; auto-assessment; community adaptation.
15	surveillance and monitoring of cardiovascular disease assessment of trends	Surveillance and Control of Cardiovascular Diseases Trend Assessment.
15	clinical review of 106 consecutive carotid endarterectomies	Clinical review of 106 consecutive carotid endarterectomies.
15	recent trends in breast cancer incidence and mortality in relation to changes in possible risk factors	Recent trends in mortality; incidence of breast cancer and related mortality; changes in potential risk factors.
15	workshop on late effects of irradiation to the head and neck in infancy and childhood	A workshop on the effects of radiation on the head and neck during infancy and childhood was held.
15	excess occurrence of cancer of the oral cavity lung and bladder following cancer of the cervix	Incidence of lung and bladder cancer in the oral cavity due to cancer of the cervix; uterus.
15	principles of organization of an obstetrical unit from scratch	The principles of d' organization; a unit of physicians; obstetrics from scratch.
15	long term treatment with beta blockers after myocardial infarction	Long-term treatment with beta-blockers after a heart attack.
15	acoustic neuroma in von recklinghausen s disease	Acoustic neuroma in recklinghausen s.
15	the oxytocin challenge test	The oocytocin challenge test.
15	early proliferative changes in intestinal cells	Rapid proliferative changes in intestinal cells.
15	effects of physical training on mood	The effects of elapse training, physical activity and elapse, elapse training, elapse training, elapse training, elapse training, physical activity on elapse, elapse mood, elapse mood, spirit and elapse, enter, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, etc.
15	comparative studies on dysplasia of esophageal epithelium in four prefectures of japan miyagi nara wakayama and aomori with reference to risk of carcinoma	Comparative studies of the dysplasia of the apos; esophageal epithelium in four prefectures of Japan (miyagi nara wakayama and aomori) in relation to carcinoma risk.
15	dependence of immediate hypersensitivity on the month of birth	L' immediate hypersensitivity depends on month of birth.
15	radiation hazards from 241am sources used in thyroid studies	Radiation Risks from Sources 241am used in thyroid studies.
15	evaluation of the hazard of surgical intervention at the height of gastroduodenal hemorrhage	Risk assessment; surgical intervention at peak dose; gastroduodenal bleeding.
15	oral contraceptive patient information a questionnaire study of attitudes knowledge and preferred information sources	Information on oral contraceptives for use by patients, a questionnaire study on attitudes, knowledge and sources; preferred information.
15	a longitudinal psychophysiological study of three year old mauritian children preliminary report	A longitudinal psychophysiological study of three-year-old Mauritian children is also being carried out.
15	results of epidemiologicalm mineralogical and cytotoxicological studies on the pathogenicity of coal mine custs	Results; mineralogical and cytotoxicological epidemiological studies on the pathogenicity of coal mine crusts in the Canadian environment.
15	cardiovascular risk and use of estrogens or estrogen progestagen combinations stanford three community study	Cardiovascular risk and use of estrogen or progestin combinations of estrogen and estrogen Community Study Stanford 3.
15	alcoholism hopelessness and suicidal behavior	Alcoholism, desperation and suicidal behavior.
15	a procedure for management of acquired tracheoesophageal fistula in ventilator patients	A procedure for the treatment of tracheal fistulas acquired from ventilator patients.
15	etiology incidence and prognosis of renal failure following cardiac operations results of a prospective analysis of 500 consecutive patients	Etiological incidence and prognosis of apo; renal failure following surgery; cardiac outcome; prospective analysis of 500 consecutive patients.
15	preoperative or postoperative deep vein thrombosis	Deep vein thrombosis pre- or post-operative.
15	hashimoto s thyroiditis and breast cancer	Hashimoto has thyroiditis and breast cancer.
15	how general practitioners assess risks in using new drugs	How general practitioners assess the risks associated with the use of new prescription drugs.
15	myocardial infarction in the familial forms of hypertriglyceridemia	Myocardial infarction in familial forms of hypertriglyceridemia.
15	violence television and the health of american youth	Televised violence and the health of American youth.
15	multiple sclerosis and childhood infections	Multiple sclerosis and childhood infections.
15	tricuspid atresia results of treatment in 160 children	Acute tricuspid atresia resulting from treatment in 160 children.
15	the yugoslavia cardiovascular disease study ii factors in the incidence of coronary heart disease	The incidence of coronary heart disease (CHD) in Yugoslavia; the incidence of coronary heart disease.
15	life events and subsequent illness	Events of life and subsequent diseases.
15	mental retardation in a national population of young men in the netherlands ii prevalence of mild mental retardation	L' mental retardation in a national population of young men in countries-Bas ii prevalence of l' mild mental retardation.
15	vaccine associated poliomyelitis in the united states 1961 1972	Polio-associated immunization in the United States.
15	physical therapy in rehabilitation after myocardial infarction author s transl	Rehabilitative physiotherapy after myocardial infarction Translation of the apo; author.
15	estrogens and endometrial cancer in a retirement community	Estrogen and cancer of the apos; endometrium in a community of pensioners.
15	oral prostaglandin e2 for labor induction in high risk pregnancy	Oral prostaglandin e2 for pregnancy; induction of labor during high-risk pregnancy.
15	an evaluation of the ifa gc procedure in a low risk population	Evaluation of ifa gc procedure in a population at low risk.
15	anesthetic practice and pregnancy controlled survey of male anaesthetists in the united kingdom	The practice of l' anaesthesia and controlled pregnancy investigates male anesthesiologists in the united kingdom.
15	twins with academic learning problems antecedent characteristics	Twins with learning disabilities have a distinctive history.
15	the risk and accuracy of pancreatic biopsy	The risk and the accuracy of the biopsy.
15	the increase in working years due to elimination of cancer as a cause of death	The increase in the number of years of work due to illness; the elimination of cancer as a cause of death.
15	plasma prolactin and its relationship to risk factors in human breast cancer	Plasma protactin and its relationship to the risk factors for human breast cancer.
15	the variation of recurrence risks with penetrance for isolated cases of autosomal dominant conditions	The variation of recurrence risks with penetrance in the isolated cases of the dominant autosomal conditions.
15	prolonged ultraviolet light induced erythema and the cutaneous carcinoma phenotype	Prolonged ultraviolet light exposure induces erythema and the phenotype of skin carcinoma.
15	ototoxicity of tobramycin a clinical overview	"""Ototoxicity of tobramycin a clinical overview,"" in Clinical Review, Vol."
15	operative and nonoperative risks in the cardiac patient	Both surgical and non-operative risks to the cardiac patient.
15	does anaemia increase the risks to the fetus caused by smoking in pregnancy	L' anaemia increases-t-Does it increase the risks to the fetus from smoking cigarettes during pregnancy?
15	genital cytologic abnormalities in patients having therapeutic abortion	Analogous cytological abnormalities in patients who have undergone therapeutic abortions.
15	viral infections that affect the fetus	Viral infections affecting the foetus.
15	antiarrhythmic drugs for ischemic heart disease	Anti-arrhythmic drugs for ischemic heart.
15	evaluation of suicide risk in adolescents	Adolescent suicide risk assessment.
15	how is the acceptability of risks to the health of the workers to be determined	How should the acceptability of health risks to workers be determined?
15	observation on the familial appearance of diseases associated with metabolic disorders of the mother	Comment on apo; familial onset of diseases associated with maternal metabolic disorders.
15	incidence predisposing factors and outcome of pharyngocutaneous fistulas complicating head and neck cancer surgery	Factors predisposing to breast cancer; incidence and outcomes of pharyngocutory fistulas that complicate head and neck cancer surgery.
15	maternal anticonvulsants and perinatal risk	Maternal anticonvulsant and perinatal risk.
15	parental smoking its effects on fetus and child health	Smoking by parents has an effect on the health of the fetus and the child.
15	experience with surgical salvage in pulmonary tuberculosis application to general thoracic surgery	Experience in surgical recovery in apo; application of pulmonary TB to general thoracic surgery.
15	renal biopsy in pregnancy induced hypertension	Renal biopsy during induced high blood pressure pregnancy.
15	incidence of hyperuricemia and gout in coronary insufficiency from angina pectoris to myocardial infarct	Incidence of aposemia and gout in apos; coronary heart failure; angina at apos; myocardial infarction.
15	long term study of the risk factors in atherosclerosis	Long-term study of risk factors for apos; atherosclerosis.
15	long term toxicity of antischistosomal drugs summary and perspectives	Synthesis and Perspective on Long-Term Toxicity of Antischistosomal Drugs.
15	coronary heart disease and its risk factors in a group of 5 000 middle aged men in urban environment	The prevalence of coronary heart disease and its risk factors among a group of 5,000 Canadian men; the average age in urban areas.
15	temporal lobe surgery around the world results complications and mortality	All over the world, temporal lobe surgery causes complications and mortality.
15	suicide by persons with and without psychiatric contacts	Suicide by people with and without psychiatric contacts.
15	self destructive consequences of sex role socialization	Consequences-auto destructive of socialization of gender roles.
15	oestrogen profiles of parous and nulliparous women	Estrogenic profiles of nulliparous and parent women.
15	practical prenatal care i initial prenatal care	Antenatal care i first-aid prenatal care.
15	epidemiological research on cancer risk by aldol and aliphatic aldehydes	Epidemiological cancer risk research associated with aldose and aliphatic aldehydes.
15	screening for risks of cardiovascular disease in children a preliminary report	Risk Assessment for Cardiovascular Disease in Children, Draft Report.
15	14 the patient classification for long term care developed by four research groups in the united states	Patient Classification for Long-Term Care developed by four research groups in the U.S. states.
15	evidence for hyperoestrogenaemia as a risk factor for myocardial infarction in men	In addition, there is evidence of hyperoestrogenemia as a risk factor for myocardial infarction in men.
15	the risk of pelvic inflammatory disease in women using intrauterine contraceptive devices as compared to non users	Women who use intra-@uterine contraceptives are at risk of pelvic inflammatory disease compared to women who do not use these contraceptives.
15	injuries to research subjects a survey of investigators	Injuries to research subjects: a survey of research subjects.
15	predictors of epilepsy in children who have experienced febrile seizures	Predictors of apos; epilepsy in children with febrile convulsions.
15	self poisoning with follow up considerations	Auto-poisoning with follow-up considerations.
15	hopelessness an indicator of suicidal risk	Desperation is an indicator of suicide risk, sir.
15	risks of mortality of suicide attempters compared with psychiatric and general populations	Mortality risks among suicide attempters as compared to psychiatric and general populations.
15	suicide behavior community attitudes and beliefs	Suicidal behaviour Attitudes and beliefs of the community.
15	multivariate prediction of coronary heart disease during 8 5 year follow up in the western collaborative group study	Multivariate prediction of coronary heart disease over time; 8-5 years follow-up as part of follow-up; collaborative study with a group of physicians; West.
15	a high risk pregnancy management protocol	It's a protocol for managing high-risk pregnancy.
15	a physiologic model of the dehydroepiandrosterone to estrogen conversion system in the fetoplacental unit ii preliminary clinical application the dehydroepiandrosterone loading test	Physiological model of dehydroepiandrosterone to estrogen conversion system in the estos; foestoplacent unit ii Preliminary clinical application of dehydroepiandrosterone load test.
15	circulation and anesthesia	Circulation and anesthetic.
15	experience with sephadex gel filtration in assessing the risk of bilirubin encephalopathy in neonatal jaundice	Sephadex gel filtration experience in apos; risk assessment of bilirubin encephalopathy in neonatal jaundice.
15	menopausal estrogens and breast cancer	Menopausal estrogen and breast cancer.
15	damage risk an evaluation of the effects of exposure to 85 versus 90 dba of noise	Risk of Damage An assessment of the effects of noise exposure to 85 to 90 dBA.
15	cancer in the offspring of fathers in hydrocarbon related occupations	Cancer in the offspring of fathers working in professions related to hydrocarbons.
15	risk factors for myocardial infarction in young women	Myocardial infarction: risk factors for young women.
15	familial colon cancer	Familial colon cancer?
15	late effects of therapeutic irradiation on the skeleton and bone marrow	Late effects; therapeutic irradiation on skeleton and bone marrow.
15	decreased risk of radiation associated second malignant neoplasms in actinomycin d treated patients	Reduced risk of secondary malignant neoplasms associated with radiation in patients treated with actinomycin d.
15	bacillus calmette gu rin vaccination and cancer prevention a critical review of the human experience	Bacillus smears vaccines and cancer prevention a critical examination of the human experience.
15	current epidemiological evidence for transmission of hodgkin s disease	Current epidemiological evidence of transmission of Hodgkin's disease.
15	a pediatric screening examination for psychosocial problems	A pediatric screening test for psychosocial problems.
15	oral contraceptive use in older women and fatal myocardial infarction	Use of oral contraceptives in elderly women and women with fatal myocardial infarction.
15	principles in selection of therapy	Therapeutic selection principles.
15	risk estimates for chronic bronchitis in smokers a study of male female differences	Estimates of the risk of chronic bronchitis among smokers; study of the differences between men and women.
15	prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects i problems and pitfalls analysis of 2495 cases using the alpha fetoprotein assay	Prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects (NTDs) and problems; trapping analysis of 2,495 cases at baseline; fetoprotein alpha test aid.
15	the addition of mammography to breast carcinoma screening in a general gynecology practice one year s experience	L'apos; addition of mammography screening to breast cancer screening in a general gynaecological practice one year; experience.
15	the incidence of bacteremia in pediatric patients following tooth extraction	Labs; incidence of bacteremia in pediatric patients post-pubertal; removal of teeth.
15	recurrence risks in children having one parent with a congenital heart disease	Risks of recurrence in children with heart disease; one of the child's parents has a congenital heart disease.
15	polygenic inheritance of otosclerosis	Polygenic inheritance of otos; otosclerosis.
15	genetic factors in breast cancer identification of a high risk group by means of dermatoglyphic investigation	Genetic factors in the identification of breast cancer; a high-risk group through diagnosis; a dermatoglyphic investigation.
15	the risk of heart disease in various psychiatric diseases	Risk of heart disease in psychiatric conditions.
15	smoking and other risk factors for coronary heart disease in british civil servants	Smoking and stroke; other risk factors for coronary heart disease among public servants in the UK.
15	population cancer screening	Cancer screening in the population.
15	hazards in the operative treatment of ductus botallo author s transl	Risks in the surgical treatment of botallo de l'apos.
15	risk factors associated with nasopharyngeal carcinoma	Risk factors for developing nasopharyngeal carcinoma.
15	the intrauterine device and deaths from spontaneous abortion	Intra device-uterine and deaths due to a miscarriage.
15	cigarette smoking and atherosclerosis in autopsied men	Cigarette smoking and cigarette smoking; atherosclerosis in post-mortem males.
15	chemical carcinogens in the human environment problems and quantitative aspects	Chemical carcinogens in the human environment and quantity.
15	evaluation of environmental carcinogens for cancer in man	Evaluation of cancer-related environmental carcinogens in humans.
15	some examples of dose response studies in chemical carcinogenesis	Some examples of dose-response chemical carcinogenesis studies.
15	myocardial infarction in car assembly workers	Myocardial infarction in car assemblers.
15	relationship of passive cigarette smoking to sudden infant death syndrome	Relationship between passive smoking and sudden infant death syndrome.
15	antenatal identification of women at high risk of spontaneous pre term birth	Prenatal identification of women at high risk of preterm premature birth.
15	the natural history of coronary artery stenosis a longitudinal angiographic assessment	Lapos; natural history of sinus stenosis; coronary artery is a longitudinal angiographic evaluation.
15	breast cancer screening benefit and risk for the first annual screening	Below are the benefits and risks of breast screening for the first annual screening.
15	who chooses prepaid medical care survey results from two marketings of three new prepayment plans	Who selects the results; paid physician survey; advance from two marketing of three new advance payment plans?
15	imminent shock a useful diagnosis in drug pathology	Imminent shock, useful diagnosis in drug pathology.
15	the epidemiology of self reported drug misuse in the united kingdom	L' epidemiology of self-reported drug abuse in the UK.
15	splenectomy in childhood a review in england and wales 1960 4	Splenectomy in Childhood, Review in England and Wales, 1960 4.
15	cardiovascular birth defects and antenatal exposure to female sex hormones	Prenatal exposure to female sexual hormones and cardiovascular congenital anomalies.
15	alcoholism as blaming the alcoholic	Alcoholism as a means of condemning alcoholism.
15	deep venous thrombosis of the legs after strokes part i incidence and predisposing factors	Deep vein thrombosis of legs after stroke Part i incidence and predisposing factors.
15	coronary heart disease and risk factors in some special type collectivities	Myocardial infarction and related risk factors in some special communities.
15	ischemic colitis incidence following abdominal aortic reconstruction a prospective study	Ischemic colitis incidence after reconstruction of the abdominal aorta Prospective study.
15	cardiac surgery in geriatric patients	Cardiac surgery in geriatric patients?
15	central nervous system damage as a possible component of unexpected deaths in infancy	L'apos; alteration of central nervous system may be an unintended cause of death in infants.
15	valve replacement by ball prosthesis study of risk factors	Balloon prosthesis valve replacement risk factors study.
15	nutrition and disease	Nutrition and disease.
15	assessment of the findings of fibrogastroscopy with gastrobiopsy and determination of hexokinase activity in the serum and gastric juice of stomach ulcer patients	Evaluation of the results of gastro-biopsy fibrogastroscopy and determination of apos; apos activity; serum and gastric juice hexokinase in patients with apos; stomach ulcer.
15	clinical manifestations of polyposis and polyps of the large intestine and risk groups	Clinical polyposis and polyps of the large intestine and at-risk groups.
15	tobacco and tobacco smoke	Tobacco, and tobacco smoke.
15	continuous vowel discrimination in normal and at risk infants	Continued discrimination on the basis of vowel sighting in normal and at-risk infants.
15	a multivariate study of the effects of high risk factors on performance on the brazelton neonatal assessment scale	A multi-variate study of the effects of high risk factors on performance on the D&apos scale; neonatal evaluation by Brazelton.
15	high school football injuries prevention of injury to the central nervous system	Prevention of injuries to the central nervous system caused by football injuries in high schools.
15	shigellosis transmitted by nurses	Nurses transmitted Shigellosis.
15	hodgkin s disease in siblings	Hodgkin's disease in siblings.
15	an estimation of somatic hazards to the united states population from dental radiography	An estimate of the somatic risks to the population of the states-United from dental x-ray.
15	problems in extrapolating toxicity data for laboratory animals to man	Problems encountered; extrapolation of toxicity data to experimental animals to humans.
15	assessment of environmental carcinogen risks in terms of life shortening	Carcinogenic Risk Assessment for the Environment in terms of shortening life.
15	preliminary report of the lung cancer detection program in new york	Preliminary Report of the Lung Cancer Detection Program, New York.
15	chronic myelogenous leukemia management of splenectomy in a high risk population	The management of splenectomy by chronic, myelogenous leukemia in a high-risk population.
15	buffering capacity of the smoke of different tobaccos in relation to lung cancer risks	The buffering capacity of tobacco smoke from different types of tobacco products relative to lung cancer risks.
15	value of routine estimation of erythrocyte sedimentation rate in surgical patients	Value of apo; current estimate of erythrocyte sedimentation rate in surgical patients.
15	amputations for arteritis criteria of choice of the level of the amputation	Amputations for arteritis criteria for choice of level of apos; amputation of apos; amputation.
15	the reproductive counseling process comments based on experience	Feedback from the reproductive counselling process is based on experience.
15	renal stones and coronary heart disease	Renal anemia and coronary artery disease.
15	angiographic findings in asymptomatic aircrewmen with electrocardiographic abnormalities	Electrocardiographic abnormalities in asymptomatic aircrew members.
15	a study of the relationship between goodwin s high risk score and fetal outcome	Study the relationship between Goodwin's high risk rating and fetal outcomes.
15	some social and medical correlates of pregnancy outcome	There are also some social and medical correlates of pregnancy.
15	incest children at risk	Children at risk of incest.
15	complications of lymphangiography in patients of advanced age	Lymphangiography and lymphangiography in the United States.
15	myelodysplasia the natural history of kyphosis and scoliosis a preliminary report	Myelodysplasia, lycos, natural history of kyphosis and scoliosis a preliminary report.
15	stomach cancer in japan	Cancer of the intestines; stomach in Japan.
15	a general cardiovascular risk profile the framingham study	An overall cardiovascular risk profile was developed in the Framingham study.
15	present status of coronary artery surgery	The current state of coronary heart surgery.
15	radiation cancer safety standards and current levels of exposure	Safety standards for radiation-induced cancer and current levels of radiation exposure.
15	epidemiological aspects in carcinogenic risk evaluation arising from pollution	Epidemiological aspects of the disease; assessment of carcinogenic risks from pollution.
15	geographic patterns of lung cancer industrial correlations	Geographic patterns of industrial correlations of lung cancer.
15	place and time aspects of the occurrence of down s syndrome	The aspects related to the location and timing of death; onset of Down syndrome.
15	short pregnancy interval low birthweight and the sudden infant death syndrome	Interval of pregnancy low birth weight and sudden infant death syndrome.
15	assessment of intrauterine growth retardation by diagnostic ultrasound	Diagnostic ultrasound assessment of intra-@ uterine growth retardation.
15	cryptorchidism hernia and cancer of the testis	Uh, cryptorchidic Hernia and testicular cancer.
15	hyaline membrane disease in twins a 7 year review with a study on zygosity	Hyaline membrane pathology in twins, a 7-year review with a zygosity study.
15	circulating maternal serum progesterone in high risk pregnancies	Circulating maternal serum progesterone in high-risk pregnancies.
15	gonadal radiation dose and its genetic significance in radioiodine therapy of hyperthyroidism	The dose of gonadal radiation and its genetic significance in the radioiodin therapy of hyperthyroidism.
15	carbohydrate homeostasis in chronic lymphocytic thyroiditis increased incidence of diabetes mellitus	Carbohydrate homeostasis in chronic lymphocytic thyroiditis has increased; incidence of diabetes mellitus.
15	bcg vaccination and epidemiological situation a decision making approach to the use of bcg	Vaccination against foot-and-mouth disease and the epidemiological situation constitute a decision-making approach to the use of foot-and-mouth disease.
15	prophylactic central nervous system therapy in childhood acute lymphatic leukemia effect of poor risk patients on the results	Central nervous system prophylaxis for apos; effect of acute lymph leukemia in children of low risk patients on outcome.
15	familial polyposis	Polyposis family.
15	colorectal polyps and carcinoma in southern iran	Colorectal polyps and carcinomas in southern Laos; Iran.
15	medical versus surgical treatment of unstable angina	Medical vs. surgical treatment of the apos; unstable angina.
15	effect of a high beef diet on the fecal bacterial flora of humans	A diet rich in beef on the faecal bacterial flora of humans.
15	fear appeals and attitude change effects of a threat s noxiousness probability of occurrence and the efficacy of coping responses	Effects of fear and change; attitude related to likelihood of harm; threat and response; effectiveness of response; adaptation.
15	prevention of venous thromboembolism in surgical patients by low dose heparin prepared by the council on thrombosis of the american heart association	Prevention of venous thromboembolism in surgical patients by low-dose heparin prepared by the American Cardiac Association.
15	the course of pregnancy in patients with artificial heart valves	L' pregnancy development in patients with artificial cardiac valves.
15	why do women liver longer than men	The why why why why the liver of the woman, the liver of the goose; winter of the apos; gap between the apos; man, the apos; back.
15	health patterns associated with type a behavior a managerial population	Models of health outcomes associated with the typology of health outcomes; one behaviour, one management population.
15	sudden death	Sudden death!
15	intestinal bypass operation as a treatment for obesity	It's a surgical procedure called bypass surgery to treat weight loss.
15	changes in the benefit of immunization	Changes in the benefits of oral contraceptives; immunizations.
15	comparative histologic study of adenomas of the large intestine in japan and england with special reference to malignant potential	A comparative histological study of large intestinal adenomas in Japan and England, particularly with respect to malignant potential.
15	risk factors in juveniles indications of cardiovascular risk in higher grade school children of cologne	Risk Factors in the Youth Cardiovascular risk indicators in children of l'apos; upper primary school receiving apos; cologne.
15	ototoxicity of amikacin	L-apos; ototoxicity of amikacin; amikacin.
15	recurrence risks for retinoblastoma a model for autosomal dominant disorders with complex inheritance	Risks of recurrence of retinoblastoma, a dominant autosomal pattern with complex inherited transmission.
15	screening high risk populations a challenge to primary medical care	The screening of high-risk populations is a challenge for primary medical care.
15	demographic data and mental health planning	Demographic data and population mental health planning.
15	prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects	Prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects?
15	clinical decision analysis the hazard of using additional data	Clinical decision analysis hazard of using additional data.
15	midtrimester amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis safety and accuracy	Mid-term amniocentesis for safety and safety; accuracy of prenatal diagnosis.
15	detecting early colon cancer	Early detection of colon cancer?
15	high risk factors for childhood asthma	High risk factors for lung cancer; asthma in children.
15	some social and medical characteristics of army men with testicular cancer	Social and medical characteristics of CF members with testicular cancer.
15	the risk of meningitis among classroom contacts during an epidemic of meningococcal disease	Meningitis among school contacts during an epidemic of meningococcal disease.
15	estimating the risks for offspring of first cousin matings an approach	Estimating the risks to offspring of mating between first cousins is one approach.
15	amniocentesis for antenatal diagnosis review of problems and outcomes in a large series	Apo amniocentesis; prenatal diagnostic examination of problems and birth outcomes; a wide range of tests.
15	the individual at high risk for endometrial carcinoma	The person who is at high risk of cancer; endometrium.
15	cancer risk in diethylstilbestrol exposed offspring	The risk of cancer in the offspring exposed to diethylstilbestrol.
15	rauwolfia derivatives and breast cancer	Rauwolfia derivative and breast cancer.
15	methodological issues underlying multiple decrement life table analysis	Methodological issues at @-@jacentes at l' analysis of the life tables at multiple decrement.
15	subjective multivariable analysis bu computer for evaluation of coronary artery bypass	Computer-based subjective multivariate analysis for diagnosis; evaluation of derivation of the coronary artery.
15	operative risk in patients with previous coronary artery bypass	Operating risk in patients who have undergone bypass bypass surgery.
15	various risk factors in the precipitaiton of complications caused by anesthetics and muscle relaxants	Various risk factors in the complication precipiton caused by anesthetics and muscle relaxants.
15	high risk factors in anesthesiology and methods of detection	High risk factors in the field of anesthesia and methods of detection.
15	menopause and risk of cardiovascular disease the framingham study	Menopause and risk of cardiovascular disease in pregnancy; study by Framingham.
15	risk of congenital abnormality after inadvertent rubella vaccination of pregnant women	Risk of diabetes; congenital anomaly following accidental rubella vaccination of pregnant women.
15	hepatic angiosarcomas in dogs an excessive frequency as compared with man	Hepatic angiosarcomas in dogs at excessive frequency compared to men.
15	fluoridated drinking water and the occurrence of cancer	Fluorinated drinking water and case of cancer.
15	mantel haenszel analysis of oxford data ii independent effects of fetal irradiation subfactors	Mantel analysis of oxford data ii independent effects of-factors in foetal irradiation.
15	gastric cancer in colombia i cancer risk and suspect environmental agents	Colombia's gastric cancer is at risk of cancer and suspects environmental agents.
15	occupation and hodgkin s disease	Hodgkin's profession and disease.
15	ocular alkali burns in a large urban area	Ocular burns d' alkalis in a large urban area.
15	the observation and analysis of cancer deaths among classified radiation workers	Lapses; observation and causes; analysis of cancer deaths among workers classified as radiation workers.
15	inidications for multivalve prostheses	Multiple-vector implant insertions.
15	substrate mobilization a new hypothesis for the aetiology of the idiopathic respiratory distress syndrome	Substrate mobilization is a new hypothesis for the etiology of idiopathic, respiratory distress syndrome.
15	the macandrew alcoholism scale as a general measure of substance misuse	L' d&apos scale; alcoholism macanders as a general measure of addiction; substance abuse.
15	family history as a predictor of alcoholism in u s navy personnel	Family history as predictor of alcoholism among U.S. Navy personnel.
15	recognition and operative management of patients with arteriosclerotic coronary artery aneurysms	Identification and management of patients with apo; arteriosclerotic aneurysms of the apo; coronary artery.
15	combined valvular and coronary artery surgery	Valvular and coronary surgery combined.
15	comparison of patients with coronary artery or valve disease intraoperative differences in blood volume and observations of vasomotor response	A comparison of patients with intraoperative differences in blood volume and observations of the vasomotor response of the coronary artery or valvulopathy.
15	myocardial infarction comparative study of principal risk factors in the two sexes	Injury of the myocardium: comparative study of the major risk factors in both sexes.
15	discussion of genetics and mental health	Discussion on mental health and genetics.
15	genetic counseling for congenital heart disease	Genetic Counselling for Cardiac Congenital Diseases.
15	the coronary prone behavior pattern and the suppression of fatigue on a treadmill test	Coronary behaviour profile and fatigue suppression in a treadmill test.
15	maximum acid output and risk of peptic ulcer	Maximum production of acid and risk of gastroduodenal ulcer.
15	coronary risk factors and socioeconomic status the oslo study	Coronary risk factors and socio-economic status of immigrants; study in Oslo.
15	the swine influenza decision	The swine flu decision.
15	septicemia and meningitis in children splenectomized for hodgkin s disease	Septicaemia and meningitis in children who are splenectomized for Hodgkin's disease.
15	an assay for selecting high risk population for gastric cancer by studying environmental factors	Screening of high-risk population for cancer of the intestine; study of environmental factors.
15	mass screening in the diagnosis of precancerous diseases of the stomach	Mass screening for pre-cancerous diseases of the stomach.
15	surgical versus medical treatment of coronary artery disease long term survival	Surgical or medical treatment of coronary heart disease, long-term survival.
15	medical fitness for sports with particular reference to cardiovascular conditions	Sports medical fitness with a special reference to cardiovascular conditions.
15	health risks of various sports	Risks to the health and safety of various sports.
15	a study of occupational stressor and the incidence of disease risk	A study of stressors in the workplace and their impact on risk of illness.
15	cancer mortality and saccharin consumption in diabetics	Cause of death and saccharin consumption among diabetics.
15	the risk of birth defects jacobs v theimer and parents right to know	The risk of congenital anomalies Jacobs v Theimer and parents deserve to know.
15	the case for a more aggressive approach to staghorn stones	Arguments in favour of a more aggressive approach to stone cutting.
15	brief communication possible increased risk of lung cancer among beauticians	Brief communication increased risk of lung cancer in estheticians.
15	general practice observed child abuse and general practice	General practice was observing child abuse and general practice.
15	child health clincs and inverse care laws evidence from longitudinal study of 1878 pre school children	Child Health Clincs and Reverse Care Laws, longitudinal study of 1878.
15	general criteria for assessing the evidence for carcinogenicity of chemical substances report of the subcommittee on environmental carcinogenesis national cancer advisory board	General Criteria for Completion; Assessment of Evidence of Chemical Carcinogenicity Report from the Environmental Carcinogenesis Committee, National Advisory Council on Cancer.
15	carrier detection and genetic counselling in duchenne muscular dystrophy a follow up study	"""A follow@ up@ study of duchenne muscular dystrophy,"" American Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Vol."
15	primary hyperlipoproteinemia in childhood and adolescence identification and treatment of persons at risk for premature atherosclerosis	Primary hyperlipoproteinemia in childhood and youth; adolescence Identification and treatment of people at risk of apo; premature atherosclerosis.
15	carcinogenicity of fibrous glass pleural response in the rat in relation to fiber dimension	The fibrous pleural response of the rat glass is carcinogenic in relation to fiber size.
15	assessment of drugs in schizophrenia diagnosis and patient selection	Drug evaluation in diagnosis of schizophrenia and patient selection.
15	cancer of the uterine corpus after hormonal treatment for breast cancer	Corpus uterus cancer after hormonal treatment of breast cancer.
15	estimation of risk as a function of risk factors ii application to the multivariate analysis of coronary heart disease in a middle aged male population author s transl	Risk assessment based on risk factors; application to patients; multivariate analysis of coronary heart disease in a male population; mean age.
15	chronic bronchitis and risk factors in employees of the sanitation d partment city of geneva	Chronic bronchitis and risk factors among health workers in Geneva City.
15	abnormal polygraphic findings in near miss sudden infant death	Anomalous polygraph results from near-missing infant sudden death syndrome.
15	legal abortion mortality in the united states epidemiologic surveillance 1972 1974	Mortality due to legal abortion in states-United Epidemiological surveillance 1972.
15	one view follow up mammogram efficacy in screening for breast cancer	One view is to monitor the effectiveness of mammography in breast cancer screening.
15	normal children abnormal results	Normal children don't have normal results.
15	a migrant study of adopted apache children	A migrant study on adopted Apache children.
15	impending child abuse psychosomatic symptoms in adults as a clue	Immediate onset of psychosomatic symptoms of childhood abuse in adults is an indication.
15	minimizing the risk of amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis	Minimize the risk of developing an amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis.
15	myocardial ischaemia risk factors and death from coronary heart disease	Risk factors for coronary artery disease; myocardial ischemia and coronary death.
15	toward preventing coronary death from ventricular fibrillation	Prevent coronary death by ventricular fibrillation.
15	obesity in childhood a community study in newcastle upon tyne	Obesity in children: community-based study in Newcastle, Tyne.
15	n methylnicotinamide excretion and affective disorders	N methylnicotinamide excretion and emotional distress.
15	the influence of childbirth on psychiatric morbidity	L' influence of apos; delivery on psychiatric morbidity.
15	cerebral function and the eeg in psychiatric disorder a hypothesis	Brain function and seizures; self-sorgement in psychiatric disorders a hypothesis.
15	results of a two year health education campaign on dietary behavior the stanford three community study	Results from a two-year public health education campaign on eating habits; community-based study, Stanford Three.
15	the discovery of drug induced illness	The discovery of drug-induced illness.
15	relationship between the development of experimental leukemia and animals capacity for a humoral immune response	The relationship between the development of experimental leukemia and the ability of the animals to produce a humoral immune response.
15	childhood antecedents of adult obesity do chubby infants become obese adults	The history of obesity among adults during childhood years causes chubby babies to become obese adults.
15	enrollment choice in a mutli hmo setting the roles of health risk financial vulnerability and access to care	Choice of treatment; inclusion in a clinical trial defining the roles of financial vulnerability to health risk and access to care.
15	risk factors of sports injuries in winter	Risk factors for sports injuries in the winter months.
15	gonorrhoea in women and exposure to risk	Gonorrhea in women and risk exposure.
15	risk factors in pulmonary embolism	Risk factors for heart failure; pulmonary embolism.
15	design and methodology of the zagreb preliminary study response rates at the study stages	Design and methodology of project; preliminary zagrébine response rate to the stages of the project; study.
15	hyperglycaemia a risk factor for hypertension	Hyperglycemia is a risk factor for developing high blood pressure.
15	the concept of risk in epidemiology point of view of a public health officer author s transl	The concept of risk in epidemiology from the perspective of an author, a public health officer, translator, and author.
15	oestrogens and endometrial cancer a point of view	Estrogen and cancer of the apos; endometrium d' perspective.
15	malignant transformation and natural history of oral leukoplakia in 57 518 industrial workers of gujarat india	Malignant transformation and natural history of oral leukoplasty among 57,518 industrial workers in Gujarat India.
15	preventive cardiology what should the clinician be doing about it	Preventive Cardiology - What should the clinician do about it?
15	relationship of wives preventive health orientation to their beliefs about heart disease in husbands	Relationship between socio-economic status; direction of preventive health of wives and their beliefs about heart disease in husbands.
15	components of blood pressure and risk of atherothrombotic brain infarction the framingham study	Components of blood pressure and the risk of atherothrombotic brain infarction.
15	investigation of some risk factors in tubercular infection in children	Study of selected risk factors for the development of TB in children.
15	reducing the risk of tuberculosis in children vaccinated with bcg	To reduce the risk of TB in children vaccinated with bcg vaccine.
15	neuropsychological deficit in polydrug users a preliminary report of the findings of the collaborative neuropsychological study of polydrug users	Neuropsychological Impairment in Polydrug Users A preliminary report of results from the collaborative neuropsychological study of polydrug users.
15	health related aspects of integrated pest management	Health aspects of Integrated Pest Management (IPM) management.
15	defining the malignant potential of the giant pigmented nevus	Define the malignant potential of giant pigmented naevus.
15	maternal serum unconjugated estriol and urine estriol concentrations in normal and high risk pregnancy	Unconjugated esterol in maternal serum and serum levels; estriol in pregnancy; urine in normal or high-risk pregnancy.
15	the diagnosis and management of intrauterine growth retardation	Diagnosis and management of growth retardation within the uterus.
15	palmar crease variants and their clinical significance a study of newborns at risk	Variations from the pli palmar and their clinical importance A study of new-babies at risk.
15	homograft and prosthetic aortic valve replacement a comparative study	A comparative study of aortic valve homograft and replacement by a prosthesis.
15	survey of amniocentesis for fetal sex determination in hemophilia carriers	Lapses; examination of abs; amniocentesis for determination of fetal sex in papillomavirus carriers; hemophilia.
15	the initial manifestations of acute myocardinal infarction	The first signs of the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
15	estrogens and atherosclerosis	Estrogen and atherosclerosis.
15	prevention of thromboembolic phenomena	Thromboembolic prevention and prevention.
15	protective efficacy of vaccination in children in four episodes of natural varicella and zoster in the ward	Immunization protective efficacy in children with four episodes of natural varicella and four bouts of shingles in the ward.
15	the thromboembolic risk of the pill	Thromboembolic risk of the pill.
15	characteristic features of ischaemic strokes in young adults author s transl	Characteristics of ischemic stroke in young adults.
15	coronary risk factors and anginal pain patterns	Coronary risk factors and patterns of anginal pain.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california incidence of myocardial infarction and death from coronary heart disease	Epidemiological studies of coronary heart disease (CHD) and stroke in Japanese men living in Hawaii and California, Japan and California, incidence of stroke; myocardial infarction and death from coronary artery disease.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california coronary heart disease risk factors in japan and hawaii	Epidemiological studies of coronary artery disease and stroke in Japanese men living in Hawaii and California, risk factors for coronary artery disease in Hawaii and Japan.
15	genetic counselling i definition and present status author s transl	Genetic counselling he definition and current status of the translators.
15	reuse of disposable catheters and guide wires	Reuse disposable catheters and threads-guides.
15	assessing the intellectural consequences of early intervention with high risk infants	Assessment of the mental health consequences of early intervention with high-risk infants.
15	abortion deaths associated with the use of prostaglandin f2alpha	Mortality by abortion associated with suicide; use of prostaglandin f2alpha.
15	identification of subjects at high coronary risk in the roman project of coronary heart disease prevention author s transl	Identification of high coronary risk subjects within the Roman coronary disease prevention project.
15	coccidioidomycosis and renal transplantation	Coccidioidomycosis and renal transplant.
15	evaluation and measurement some dilemmas for health education	Evaluation and measurement of dilemmas in health education.
15	complications of cardiac surgery	The complications of heart surgery.
15	thromboembolism following total hip replacement arthroplasty the efficicy of dextran aspirin and dextran warfarin in prophylaxis	Thromboembolism after total hip replacement arthroplasty; effectiveness of hip replacement; dextran aspirin and warfarin dextran in prophylaxis.
15	surgery and coronary heart disease	Surgery and coronary artery disease.
15	risk factors for developing asthma and allergic rhinitis a 7 year follow up study of college students	Risk factors for asthma and allergic rhinitis in a 7-year follow-up study with college students.
15	emotional history and pathogenesis of cancer	Emotional history and pathogenicity of the cancer.
15	radiations and public health author s transl	Authors' translation on radiation and public health.
15	a prospective study of cerebrovascular disease in japanese rural communities akabane and asahi part 1 evaluation of risk factors in the occurrence of cerebral hemorrhage and thrombosis	A prospective study of cerebrovascular disease in rural communities in Japan, Akabane and Asahi Part 1 assessment of risk factors in apo; onset of apo; cerebral haemorrhage and thrombosis.
15	rational prescribing of drugs	This is a rational prescription of medication.
15	surgery for gastric ulcer	Gastric ulcer surgery, please.
15	significance of indices of potential epidemiologic valency of natural foci of tick borne encephalitis and methods of determining them	Potential epidemiological valence indices of natural tick-borne outbreaks and tick-borne encephalitis and methods to determine them.
15	cholecystostomy in the high risk patient with biliary tract disease	Choleystostomy in the high-risk patient with d*apos, bile tract disease.
15	parental transactional style deviance as a possible indicator of risk for schizophrenia	Deviance of parental transactional style as a possible indicator of the risk of schizophrenia.
15	attempt at evaluation of the risk of mortality in utero	Evaluate the risk of in utero mortality.
15	risk and postoperative complications in abdominal surgery in elderly patients author s transl	The risk and post-operative complications of abdominal surgery in elderly patients.
15	selenium vitamin e and copper in multiple sclerosis	Selenium, vitamin e and copper in Multiple Sclerosis.
15	birthweights of male and female schizoprenics offspring	The birth weight of male and female schizoprenic offspring.
15	rheoencephalographic method of of analyzing several risk factors for cerebrovascular disease epidemiologic study	A rheoencephalographic method; analysis of several risk factors for stroke; epidemiological study of cerebrovascular diseases.
15	ischemic heart disease in death discordant twins a study on 205 male and female pairs with special reference to hereditary factors	"""Ischemic heart disease in death discordant twins"", a study of 205 couples of men and women, focusing on hereditary factors."
15	risk benefit analysis for industrial and social needs	Risk/benefit analysis for both industrial and social purposes.
15	risk factors and early diagnosis in pancreatic carcinoma	Pancreatic carcinoma: risk factors and early diagnosis in pancreatic carcinoma.
15	brain infarction in young adults with particular reference to pathogenesis	Cerebrovascular infarction in young adults, particularly in relation to the pathogenesis.
15	a hypothesis the role of a high risk male in the etiology of cervical carcinoma a correlation of epidemiology and molecular biology	An hypothesis on the role of a high-risk man in stroke; etiology of cervical carcinoma; uterus correlation; epidemiology and molecular biology.
15	cigarette smoking use of oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction	Smoking use of oral contraceptives and myocardial myocardial infarction.
15	methodical study of multifactorial prevention of ischemic heart disease	Systematic study of multifactorial prevention of coronary heart disease.
15	myocardial infarct in young persons	Myocardial infarction in the young.
15	relative risk factors in chronic open angle glaucoma an epidemiological study	The relative risk factors in angle-angled chronic glaucoma are an epidemiological study.
15	exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinoma case control and incidence study	Case study-controls and placebo study; incidence of exogenous estrogen and endometrium carcinomas.
15	the nutritionally at risk child part 1 study of some socio economic and cultural factors	Study of socio-economic and cultural factors on nutritionally at-risk children, part 1.
15	the nutritionally at risk child part 2 study of factors pertinent to the child siblings or mother	Study of children at nutritional risk Part 2 on factors relevant to the child; siblings or mother.
15	asymptomatic autoimmune thyroiditis and coronary heart disease cross sectional and prospective studies	Cross-sectional and prospective studies on auto thyroiditis-immune asymptomatic and coronary artery disease.
15	fire on ice	Oh, fire on the ice.
15	tests of competency to consent to treatment	The tests of competence to consent to the treatment.
15	disulfiram toxicity and carbon disulfide poisoning	Toxicity of disulfiram and carbon disulfide poisoning.
15	adverse effects on offspring of maternal alcohol abuse during pregnancy	Adverse effects on the offspring; alcohol abuse by the mother during pregnancy.
15	estrogen and endometrial carcinoma an independent pathology review supporting original risk estimate	Cancer of the intestine; estrogen and endometrium; independent pathological examination at baseline; support for follow-up; initial risk assessment.
15	mortality among patients with ankylosing spondylitis not given x ray therapy	Death in patients with ankylosing spondylitis who have not received X-rays.
15	sounding board the pill a perspective for assessing risks and benefits	Survey the pill from a perspective to assess risks and benefits.
15	coffee alcohol and risk of coronary heart disease among japanese men living in hawaii	L' alcohol of coffee and risk of coronary artery disease in Japanese men living in Hawaii.
15	policy responses to complex issues the case of black infant mortality	Policy responses to complex questions, such as the case of black child mortality.
15	what is meant by the at risk pregnancy	Wha' means-on by risk pregnancy?
15	the doctor and the patient in early breast cancer diagnosis	The doctor and the patient in their early diagnosis of breast cancer.
15	anorexia nervosa and gonadal dysgenesis further evidence of a relationship	Nervous anorexia and gonadal dysgenesis are further evidence of the existence of a relationship.
15	the psychological approach in cardiovascular epidemiology	L' Psychological Approach to the Epidemiology of Cardiovascular Disease.
15	myocardial function of the chronic hemodialysed patient evaluation by measurement of systolic time intervals	The myocardial function of the apos; evaluation of the chronic hemodialysis patient by measurement of stroke time intervals.
15	occupational differences in rates of lung cancer	There are also occupational differences in lung cancer rates.
15	exotic diseases ounce of prevention or pound of cure	Exotic Diseases ounce of prevention or book of cure.
15	prophylaxis of myocardial infarction and follow up treatment author s transl	Prophylaxis of the spine; myocardial infarction and follow-up treatment.
15	epidemiology of diabetes mellitus in riga	Epidemiology of diabetes mellitus.
15	surgical management of unruptured asymptomatic aneurysms	Surgical management of unbroken, asymptomatic aneurysms.
15	legionnaires disease description of an epidemic of pneumonia	Legionnaires' disease Description of a pneumonia epidemic.
15	family structure and the mental health of children concurrent and longitudinal community wide studies	The family structure and mental health of children simultaneous and longitudinal studies at the scale of the community.
15	analysis of familial factors in bipolar affective illness	Analysis of family-related factors in bipolar affective disorder.
15	acute hyperkalemia risks in recipients of kidney graft cooled with collins solution	Apos risks; acute hyperkalemia in apos recipients; cooled renal transplant with a collin solution.
15	the responsibility to report occupational health risks	The responsibility to report on the risks to the health of the workers.
15	the occupational determinants of chronic disabling pulmonary disease in rubber workers	Occupational determinants of disabling chronic lung disease in rubber workers.
15	occurrence of childhood cancers among sibs and estimation of familial risks	Incidence of childhood cancer in siblings and adults; family risk estimates.
15	study of prenatal des exposure and its consequences in rochester minnesota	Study of l' prenatal exposure of exposures and consequences in Rochester, Minnesota.
15	preceding pregnancy loss as an index of risk of stillbirth or neonatal death in the present pregnancy	Previous pregnancy loss as a result; index of risk of stillbirth or neonatal death in the current pregnancy.
15	spontaneous premature birth in twin pregnancy	Spontaneous premature birth in twins.
15	identifying patients at risk for thromboembolism use of 125i labeled fibrinogen in patients with acute myocardial infarction	Identification of patients at risk of apo; thromboembolic embolism taking 125i-labeled fibrinogen in patients with apo; acute myocardial infarction.
15	the estimation and interpretation of attributable risk in health research	L' estimates and assumptions; and, interpretation of attributable risk in health research.
15	exogenous estrogens and endometrial carcinoma review and comments for the clinician	Review of endometrial and exogenous estrogens and comments to apo; clinician intent.
15	risk of bladder tumors among benzidine workers and their serum properdin levels	Risk of developing bladder tumours in benzidine workers and their serum levels of propellin.
15	epidemiology of cancer of the testis in upstate new york	Epidemiology of testicular cancer in northern Los Angeles, New York.
15	characteristics in youth indicative of adult onset hodgkin s disease	Characteristics of youths indicating onset of Hodgkin's disease in adults.
15	lack of acknowledgment in the family rorschachs of families with a child at risk for schizophrenia	Lack of recognition in family rorschach families with a child at risk of schizophrenia.
15	pao2 levels and retrolental fibroplasia a report of the cooperative study	Pao2 levels and retrolental fibroplasia, a report of the co-operative study.
15	chronic mastopathy and breast cancer a follow up study	Chronic mast disease and breast cancer, follow-up study.
15	present status of thermography ultrasound and mammography in breast cancer detection	The current status of ultrasound and mammography in the detection of cancer of the breast.
15	do risk factor interventions prevent or reverse arteriosclerosis	Risk factor interventions prevent-them or reverse-them they l' arteriosclerosis?
15	clinical judgement is not sufficient for the management of conduction defects indications for diagnostic electrophysiologic studies	Clinical judgement is not sufficient for the management of the observed conductive abnormalities indicated in the diagnostic electrophysiological studies.
15	is early revascularization following acute coronary occlusion a safe and effective surgical procedure	Early revascularization following acute coronary occlusion is a safe and effective surgical procedure.
15	the rebuck skin window as a guide in cancer chemotherapy	Rebuck the skin's window as a guide in the chemotherapy of cancer.
15	heart disease indicators in patients with aortocoronary bypass operation	Indicators of heart disease in patients who have undergone bypass surgery.
15	epidemiological features of canine renal neoplasms	Epidemiological characteristics of canine renal neoplasms.
15	experience with fifty repeat procedures for myocardial revascularization	Experience with 50 repeated myocardial revascularization procedures.
15	prescribing of tetracycline to children less than 8 years old a two year epidemiologic study among ambulatory tennessee medicaid recipients	Prescribing tetracycline to children under the age of 8 as part of a 2-year epidemiological study in Tennessee Medicaid ambulatory patients.
15	benign breast disease and oral contraceptive use	Benign breast diseases and the use of oral contraceptives.
15	genetic damage from diagnostic radiation	Genetic damage from diagnostic radiation.
15	association between oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction a review	Associations between oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction were examined.
15	risk of developing breast cancer determined by mammography	Mammogram-induced risk of developing breast cancer.
15	bacterial endocarditis in patients with pulmonary stenosis aortic stenosis or ventricular septal defect	Lapses; bacterial endocarditis in patients with defective pulmonary stenosis, aortic stenosis or ventricular septation.
15	the troms heart study high density lipoprotein and coronary heart disease a prospective case control study	The trombone heart high density lipoprotein and coronary heart disease study prospective case-control.
15	prenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies a review of 15 cases	Prenatal diagnosis of the apo; hemoglobinopathy after 15 cases.
15	juvenile delinquency adult criminality and adult psychiatric treatment an epidemiological study	Juvenile delinquency Adult delinquency and psychiatric treatment of adults: epidemiological study.
15	familial cancer in the general population	Family cancer in the general population of the United States.
15	multiple primary cancers relative risk in new mexico s triethnic population	Relative risk of multiple primary cancers in the triethnic New-Mexico population.
15	multiple primary cancers at memorial hospital 1949 1962	Multiple primary cancer in adults; Memorial Hospital 1946-1962.
15	role of heredity in multiple primary cancer	Heredity in multiple primary cancer.
15	breast cancer in families	Breast cancer in families.
15	second malignant tumors after cancer in childhood	Second malignant tumour after the cancer in childhood.
15	multiple primary cancer risk after therapy for hodgkin s disease	Primary multiple risk of cancer after treatment of Hodgkin's disease.
15	a death certificate analysis of nasal cancer among furniture workers in north carolina	This is an analysis of the death certificate for nose cancer among furniture workers in North Carolina.
15	new concepts in prevention and treatment of sunburn	These are new concepts in the prevention and treatment of sunburn.
15	new estimates of mortality associated with fertility control	New estimates of the mortality associated with fertility control.
15	an audit of obstetric care in a university family medicine department and an obstetrics gynecology department	An audit of the state of obstetrical care in a university department of family medicine and a department of obstetric gynecology.
15	on 23 cases of postinfartual interventricular septal rupture s	Out of 23 cases of rupture of the interventricular septum, post-ventricular, s.
15	importance of coronarographic evaluation in valvular diseases for correct surgical indication author s transl	Importance of apo; coronary angiography in valvular diseases for correct surgical indication Translation of apo; by the author; by the author.
15	a retrospective analysis of the systolic bp iop ratio in glaucoma screening	Retrospective analysis of systolic bp iop ratio in glaucoma screening.
15	more evidence for the recessive inheritance of selective adult type lactose malabsorption	More dosage; indications of recessive heredity of selective adult-type lactose malabsorption.
15	effects of stimulus intensity and stimulus duration during acoustic priming on audiogenic seizures in c57bl 6j mice	Effects of noise; intensity and duration of the stimulus during breathing; acoustic initiation on the audiogenic seizures in c57bl 6j mice.
15	stroke incidence and risk factors	The incidence of stroke and risk factors.
15	intensive plasmapheresis as a risk factor for arteriosclerotic cardiovascular disease	Intensive plasmapheresis as a risk factor for cardiovascular arteriosclerotic disease.
15	spinocerebellar ataxia and hla linkage risk prediction by hla typing	Spinal cord ataxia and hazard prediction of hla binding by hla typing.
15	mid trimester abortion by dilatation and evacuation a safe and practical alternative	Mid-term abortion by expansion and evacuation, which is a safe and convenient alternative.
15	endotracheal intubation and its relationship to bacterial colonization and systemic infection of newborn infants	Endotracheal intubation and its relation to bacterial colonization and l' systemic infection of newborns, @-@.
15	gallbladder disease as a side effect of drugs influencing lipid metabolism experience in the coronary drug project	Gallbladder disease as a side effect of drugs affecting appetite; experience with lipid metabolism in the CAD project.
15	surgical indication author s transl	Translation of apos; author of apos; indication for surgery.
15	a new variety of hereditary sensory neuropathy	A new variety of inherited sensory neuropathies.
15	results of long term use of a low dose estroprogestatif in diabetics and high risk women	Results of long-term use of a low-dose estrogen replacement therapy in high-risk diabetics and women.
15	schizophrenia genetic factors	Genetic factors Schizophrenia genetic factors.
15	possibilities and limitations of air travel	Opportunities and limitations of opportunities and limitations of opportunities and limitations of opportunities; use of airspace; limitations of opportunities and limitations of airspace; use of airspace; air travel, opportunities and limitations of airspace; opportunities and limitations of airspace; limitations of airspace; use of airspace; air travel space, opportunities and limitations of airspace; opportunities and limitations of airspace; analysis of opportunities and limitations of airspace; information of limitations of airspace; opportunities before and limitations of airspace; and, before and before and before the limits of air travel.
15	congenital malformations in infants of diabetic mothers	Birth defects in infants of diabetic mothers.
15	estrogens and endometrial carcinoma	Estrogen and carcinoma of the endometrium.
15	gonorrhea screening program in a women s hospital outpatient department results and analysis of risk factors	Results of gonorrhea screening program at outpatient clinic; women's hospital; and risk factor analysis.
15	epidemiologic treatment of syphilis	Epidemiological treatment of syphilis.
15	body height and body mass as determinants of basal blood pressure in children the bogalusa heart study	Body height and body mass as determinants of baseline blood pressure in children; bogalusa study.
15	tests for homogeneity of effect in an epidemiologic investigation	Dapos testing; homogeneity of findings; epidemiological investigation effect.
15	prediction of treatment effectiveness in a drug free therapeutic community	Prediction of drug use; treatment effectiveness in drug-free therapeutic community.
15	pathogenesis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease role of contraception and other risk factors	Acute pelvic inflammatory disease pathogenesis role of contraception and other risk factors.
15	mortality experience in relation to a measured arsenic trioxide exposure	Experience in mortality associated with measured exposure to arsenic trioxide.
15	corneal transplantation reaction in avascular keratoconus patients due to hla associated immune aberration against infection a hypothesis	Corneal transplant reaction in avascular keratoconus patients due to apos; immune aberration associated with hla against apos; infection one hypothesis.
15	lcoc regional sarcoid reaction sarcoidosis and malignant tumors	A sarcoid reaction to regional lcoc acid sarcoidosis and malignant tumors.
15	the association of hl a b8 and childhood celiac disease in an israeli population	The association of b8 and childhood celiac disease.
15	prospective screening for deep vein thrombosis in high risk patients	Prospective testing for deep vein thrombosis in high-risk patients.
15	does intensive prenatal care during childbirth lead to a greater risk of infection	Intensive prenatal care during delivery increases the risk of infection.
15	optimal function and health	Health and safety issues.
15	are we mobilizing early enough	We are mobilizing early enough to be mobilized early enough.
15	the value of assessing intent in attempted suicide	The value of the apos; assessment of the apos; intent with respect to suicide attempt.
15	platelet hyperaggregability in young patients with completed stroke	L' platelet hyper-aggregation in young patients with a complete stroke.
15	submaximal treadmill exercise testing of patients with coronary artery disease	Submaximal treadmill exercise testing of coronary artery disease patients.
15	risks of mercury poisoning in the dental laboratory	Risks of mercury poisoning in dental laboratory.
15	diffusible cholesterol as a risk factor in the biochemical stage of atherosclerosis	Diffusible cholesterol as a risk factor in biochemical phase of apos; atherosclerosis.
15	salivary gland neoplasms as a late consequence of head and neck irradiation	Neoplasms of the salivary glands as a late consequence of apos; irradiation of the head and neck.
15	ectopic ossification after total hip arthroplasty predisposing factors frequency and effect on results	Ectopic ossification after total arthroplasty of the hip predisposing factors frequency and effect on results.
15	genetic studies in outpatients plasma cholesterol in family and twin studies	Genetic studies in the outpatient setting of plasma cholesterol in the family and in the twin studies.
15	national views australia	National Australian Views.
15	perthes disease treated by prolonged recumbency and femoral head containment a long term appraisal	Perths disease treated by prolonged elongation and confinement of the femoral head a long-term assessment.
15	prediction of the reading and spelling performances of normal and retarded readers a four year follow up	Forecasting read and write performance; normal reader spelling and four years of follow-up delayed.
15	further investigation on the predictive value of human placental lactogen in high risk pregnancies	D' further research on the predictive value of human placental lactogen for high-risk pregnancies.
15	oxytocinase and human placental lactogen for the prediction of intrauterine growth retardation	Ocytocinase and human placental lactogen for predicting intra-uterine growth retardation.
15	perinatal addiction outcome and management	Results and management of the problem of perinatal drug abuse.
15	use of the exercise test in the diagnosis of coronary disease	Use of Dapos test; exercise in diagnosis of coronary heart disease.
15	screening for breast cancer	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	the potential of organizations of fee for service physicians for achieving significant decreases in hospitalization	The potential of paid physician organizations to achieve significant decreases in the number of hospitalizations.
15	risk factors in mitral valve replacements	Risk factors for mitral valve replacements.
15	incidence and evaluation of the risk of coronary disease prospective study in paris	The risk of coronary heart disease is estimated by the number of cases per 100,000 population.
15	informed consent some newer aspects and their relation to the specialty of radiology	Informed Consent Recent developments and their relationship to the specialty of radiology.
15	techniques for assessing teratogenic effects epidemiology	Techniques for Assessing Teratogenic Effects; Epidemiology of Teratogenic Effects.
15	behavioral testing as a method for assessing risk	Behavioural testing as a risk assessment method.
15	childhood accidents three epidemiological studies on the etiology	Childhood Accidents Three epidemiological studies on etiology.
15	perinatal intracranial hemorrhage incidence and clinical features	Impact of apo; perinatal intracranial hemorrhage; and clinical characteristics.
15	multistage scoring system for identifying infants at risk of unexpected death	Multi-step scoring system to identify infants at risk of unplanned death.
15	evaluation and management of suicidal behavior	Evaluation and Management of Suicidal Behaviour.
15	the need demand problem in patients with oro mandibular functional disorders	The problem of demand in patients with impaired or obstructive function.
15	tests of fibrin metabolism in recurrent venous thromboembolism	Tests for fibrin metabolism in the recurrent venous thromboembolism.
15	acute myocardial infarction in newark n j a study of racial incidence	Acute myocardial infarction in Newark nd a study of the incidence of race.
15	deep wound sepsis following total hip arthroplasty	A deep sepsis following a total hip replacement.
15	epidemiological study of youth suicide comparison between primary suicidals and repeaters	A comparative epidemiological study of suicide among young people between those who have committed suicide and those who have recidivism.
15	alcohol consumption among pregnant women and outcome of pregnancy author s transl	Consumption of alcohol in pregnant and post-pregnancy women.
15	disease physician patient contacts and work disability in a general practice	Contacts with physicians and disability; inability to work in a general practice.
15	assessment of myocardial performance and optimal volume loading during elective abdominal aortic aneurysm resection	Evaluation of myocardial performance and optimum volume load during elective abdominal aortic aneurysm resection.
15	a planned approach to coexistent cerebrovascular disease in coronary artery bypass candidates	A planned approach to the co-occurrence of cerebrovascular disease in coronary artery bypass graft candidates.
15	mutagenicity testing and risk estimation with mammals	Mutagenicity testing and estimation of mammalian risk.
15	carcinogenic mutagenic and teratogenic risks associated with vinyl chloride	Mutagenic and teratogenic risks associated with the use of vinyl chloride.
15	practical evaluation of mutagenicity data in mammals for estimating human risk	Practical evaluation of mammalian mutagenicity data for assessment of human risk.
15	metabolic studies and the evaluation of genetic risk from the viewpoint of industrial toxicology	Metabolic studies and genetic risk assessment studies from an industrial toxicology perspective.
15	parental focus of attention in a videotape feedback task as a function of hypothesized risk for offspring schizophrenia	Concentration of apo; parental attention in a video-taped, feedback task based on the hypothetical risk of progeny schizophrenia.
15	physiologic reactions to social challenge in persons evidencing the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Physiological responses to social challenges in individuals exhibiting behavioural patterns predisposed to coronary heart disease.
15	influenza infections during pregnancy in the mouse	Influenza-like illness during pregnancy in mice.
15	extraocular muscle surgery in the presence of complete paralysis of the fifth sixth and seventh cranial nerves	Muscle surgery extraocular in the presence of apos; complete paralysis of the cranial nerves 5th and 7th.
15	the contribution of genetics to biological psychiatry	The contribution of genetics to the field of biological psychiatry.
15	the natural course of coronary heart disease	L' natural history of coronary heart disease.
15	early onset of oral cancer among women who drink and smoke	Lapses; early onset of oral cancer among drinking and smoking women.
15	nocturnal asthma and sudden death	Night asthma and sudden death.
15	the effect of high level sound exposure on the loudness difference limen	L' effect d' high level noise exposure on noise difference limen noise.
15	neurofibromatosis a neoplastic birth defect with two age peaks of severe problems	Neurofibromatosis, neoplastic birth defects, with two peaks of onset; age of severe conditions.
15	controlled trial of bicarbonate therapy in high risk premature newborn infants	Effect of bicarbonate on the treatment of high-risk, early-born infants.
15	determination of the importance of environmental factors in human cancer the role of epidemiology	Determination of risk; importance of environmental factors in human cancer; epidemiology.
15	environmental health education a different orientation	L' education; hygiene; environment has a different orientation.
15	alcohol and the fetus	Alcohol and the fetus.
15	treatment of borderline diabetes controlled trial using carbohydrate restriction and phenformin	Treatment of diabetes mellitus: a controlled trial using glucose restriction and phenformin.
15	practical utilization of a hazard catalogue for the early detection of pre and dysmaturity	Practical use of apos; a catalogue of hazards for early detection of pre- and dysmaturation.
15	risk factors for lung cancer in singapore chinese a population with high female incidence rates	Lung cancer risk factors for Chinese in Singapore, a population with high lung cancer rates; female incidence.
15	relationship between steroid excretion patterns and breast cancer incidence in israeli women of various origins	Relationship of drug profiles; steroid excretion to disability; incidence of breast cancer among Israeli women of various origins.
15	non accidental childhood injury presenting at a hospital casualty department	Non-accidental child injuries reported to the emergency department of a hospital.
15	the prevention of prematurity	Prevention of prematurity.
15	results in the management of pregnancies involving risk factors	Outcomes of the Management of Pregnancy and Pregnancy Risk Factors.
15	lead absorption in a community of potters in barbados	L' lead absorption in a potting community of barbados.
15	hyperdynamic beta adrenergic circulatory state a case report	Beta-adrenergic circulatory state-hyperdynamic adrenergic state.
15	primary immunisation and febrile convulsions in oxford 1972 5	Primary immunization and febrile convulsions at Oxford 1972.
15	cancer in asbestos mining and other areas of quebec	Cancer in asbestos and d&apos mines; other regions of Quebec.
15	material and thickness the important factors in the impact resistance of spectacle lenses	Material and thickness are important factors in the impact resistance of eyeglass lenses.
15	risks of discontinuing anticoagulant therapy in a selected group of patients with atherosclerotic heart disease a prospective study	Risks of apo; discontinuation of anticoagulant therapy in selected group of patients with atherosclerotic heart disease as part of a prospective study.
15	pregnancy in renal transplant recipients report of two successful pregnancies in a patient with impaired renal function	Pregnancy in kidney transplants reports two successful pregnancies in a patient with impaired renal function.
15	liver toxicity after acetaminophen ingestion inadequacy of the dose estimate as an index of risk	Hepatic toxicity following ingestion of acetaminophen; inadequacy of dose; dose estimate as risk index.
15	high school contact among persons with leukemia and lymphoma	Contact with apo; high school in people with leukemia and with lymphoma.
15	regular drug use and cancer	Routine drug use and cancer.
15	lung cancer risk among beauticians and other female workers brief communication	Risk of lung cancer in women who are estheticians or other female workers Brief communication is required.
15	the identification of individuals at high risk for large bowel cancer an overview	Identification of those at high risk of large bowel cancer provides an overview.
15	early detection of colonic neoplasia in patients at high risk	Early detection of colonic neoplasia in high-risk patients.
15	ski injuries	Ski injuries.
15	cancer of the esophagus in southern iran	Cervical cancer of the intestines; esophagus in the south of the country.
15	phase ii study of oral methyl ccnu and prednisone in previously treated alkylating agent resistant multiple myeloma	Phase II study of oral methyl ccnu and prednisone in a previously treated oral ccnu and prednisone-resistant multiple myeloma.
15	subcellular distribution a factor in risk evaluation of pentachlorophenol	Subcellular distribution of a factor in pentachlorophenol exposure; risk assessment.
15	surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma in the elderly clinical considerations on a group of patients undergoing major surgical destruction	Surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma in elderly patients, clinical considerations for a group of patients undergoing major surgical destruction.
15	precordial mapping in acute myocardial infarction	Pre-cordial appendage in apos; acute myocardial infarction.
15	bowel transit time and stool weight in populations with different colon cancer risks	Transit time to bowel and stool weight in populations at different risk of colon cancer.
15	unilateral breast feeding and breast cancer	Unilateral breastfeeding and breast cancer.
15	alcohol consumption cardiovascular risk factors and mortality in two chicago epidemiologic studies	Cardiovascular risk factors and mortality in two epidemiological studies in Chicago.
15	cancer experience among coke by product workers	L' cancer experience in coke production workers by product.
15	cancer mortality among rubber workers an epidemiologic study	Cancer mortality among workers in the rubber industry, epidemiological study.
15	case study 1 asbestos the tlv approach	Case study #1 on asbestos and l' approach tlv.
15	respiratory disease mortality among uranium miners	Mortality due to respiratory diseases among uranium mining workers.
15	immunotherapy of chronic myelocytic leukemia effects of different vaccination schedules	Immunotherapy for the effects of chronic myelocytic leukemia according to different immunization schedules.
15	unstable angina comparison of medical and surgical management	An unstable comparison between angina and medical and surgical management.
15	a nurse rehabilitator s impact on patients with myocardial infarction	Myocardial infarction: impact of a rehabilitation nurse on patients with myocardial infarction.
15	clinically silent pericardial effusions in patients on long term hemodialysis pericardial effusions in hemodialysis	Clinically silent pericardial effusion in patients on long term hemodialysis pericardial effusion.
15	artificial sweeteners and human bladder cancer	Artificial sweeteners and human bladder cancer.
15	correlation between leucocyte migration inhibition by breast cancer antigens mammographic findings and other breast cancer risk factors	Correlation between leukocyte migration inhibition by breast cancer antigens, results of mammography and seizures; other risk factors for breast cancer.
15	identification of sudden death risk factors in acute and chronic coronary artery disease	Identification of the risk factors for sudden death in acute and chronic coronary heart disease.
15	patients admitted to the coronary care unit for chest pain high risk subgroup for subsequent cardiovascular death	Patients admitted to the coronary care unit for chest pain under <-@ group at high risk of subsequent cardiovascular death.
15	noninvasive predictors of sudden cardiac death in men with coronary heart disease predictive value of maximal stress testing	A randomized trial of coronary heart disease.
15	biologic and psychosocial risk factors of sudden death from coronary disease in white women	Journal of the American Medical Association, 2nd Edition, 2 p.
15	gastrointestinal hemorrhage in patients in a respiratory intensive care unit	Gastro haemorrhage-intestinal in patients from d' respiratory intensive care unit.
15	ethical issues in investigation of screening strategies	Issues of ethics within the framework of the apos; investigation of the apos; study of the apos; impact of screening strategies of screening strategies of the apos; other end of the apos; the apos; other end of the apos; other end of the apos; the opening of the apos; the apos; the other end of the apos; the end of the apos; the end of the apos; other end of the apos; the apos.
15	estimation of risks due to environmental carcinogenesis	Risk estimation of environmental carcinogenesis.
15	breast cancer and fertility trends in canada	Breast cancer and patterns of fertility in Canada.
15	the rising frequency of hysterectomy its effect on uterine cancer rates	Lapses; increased frequency of seizures; hysterectomy has an effect on cervical cancer rates.
15	bias due to misclassification in the estimation of relative risk	Bias due to misclassification in appendix; relative risk estimate.
15	high density lipoprotein as a protective factor against coronary heart disease the framingham study	High-density lipoproteins as protective factor against coronary heart disease; study by Framingham.
15	cellular immune responses in familial medullary thyroid carcinoma	Cell cell immune responses in family medullary thyroid carcinoma.
15	decision analysis to evaluate lymphangiography in the management of patients with hodgkin s disease	Decision Analysis to evaluate lymphangiography in management of Hodgkin's disease patients.
15	low gynecologic an obstetric risk factor	Low gynaecological rate, obstetric risk factor.
15	aphakic retinal detachment as a function of the technic and course of cataract extraction	Detachment of the retina aphakique according to the technique and course of the apos; extraction of cataract.
15	changes in menstrual cycle length and regularity after use of oral contraceptives	Changes in the duration and regularity of the menstrual cycle after birth; use of oral contraceptives.
15	coffee and health	Coffee and health!
15	social risk factors for rheumatoid arthritis epidemiologic social medical study	Social risk factors for rheumatoid arthritis Social medical epidemiological study Social medical study.
15	is epa s radium 226 drinking water standard justified	The standard epa s radium 226 for drinking water is-is it justified?
15	hospitalization for laparoscopy the exception rather than the rule	Hospitalization for laparoscopy is the exception rather than the rule.
15	acute leukemia after alkylating agent therapy of ovarian cancer	Acute leukemia after alkylation agent therapy of ovarian cancer.
15	recommendations for a national policy on poliomyelitis vaccination	Recommendations for a National Policy on Immunization against Polio.
15	the relationship of childhood respiratory illness to adult obstructive airway disease	The relationship between childhood respiratory illness and obstructive airway disease in adults.
15	use of the smooth teflon clip to prevent pulmonary embolism in the postoperative period	Use smooth teflon clip to prevent seizures; pulmonary embolism during postoperative period.
15	factors influencing contraceptive behavior of single college students	The factors that influence the contraceptive behaviour of unmarried university students.
15	survival in traumatic transverse myelitis	Surviving transverse myelitis traumatic.
15	multifactorial index of cardiac risk in noncardiac surgical procedures	Multi-factorial index of cardiac risk in surgical non-cardiac procedures.
15	laboratory acquired rocky mountain spotted fever the hazard of aerosol transmission	The lab has contracted the purple fever of the rocky mountains, a risk of aerosol transmission.
15	genetics of juvenile diabetes mellitus a recessive gene closely linked to hla d and with 50 per cent penetrance	The genetics of juvenile diabetes mellitus is a recessive gene that is closely linked to hla d and has a 50 percent penetrance.
15	evidence favoring the use of anticoagulants in the hospital phase of acute myocardial infarction	Evidence for the use of antibiotics; anticoagulants in the hospital phase of the disease; acute myocardial infarction.
15	amniotic fluid neutrophils prior to cesarean section and intrauterine infection	Amniotic fluid neutrophils before caesarean section and intra-uterine infection.
15	a formula for selective lymphadenectomy its application to cancer of the vulva	A selective lymphadenectomy applied to vulvar cancer.
15	abnormal fetal growth patterns ultrasonic diagnosis and management	Acute ultrasound diagnosis and management of abnormal fetal growth.
15	endometrial cancer after menopausal use of estrogens	Cervical cancer; endometrium after infection; use of estrogen in menopause.
15	atherosclerosis a major cause of peripheral vascular disease	L' atherosclerosis is a major cause of peripheral vascular disease.
15	exacerbation of diabetic renal failure following intravenous pyelography	Lapos; exacerbation of apos; diabetic renal failure after an intravenous pyelogram.
15	development of drug therapy for children	Drug therapy for children.
15	a practical classification of the risk factor in restorative surgery of the fallopian tube	A convenient classification of the risk factor in fallopian tube repair surgery.
15	long term safety and use effectiveness of intrauterine devices	Long-term safety and product effectiveness; intra-uterine device use.
15	risk for short arm 10 trisomy a segregation analysis of eleven families with different translocations	Risk of short arm trisomy 10 A segregation analysis of 11 families with different translocations.
15	family planning and the primary care physician	Family planning and primary care physician.
15	the risk of advanced heart block in surgical patients with right bundle branch block and left axis deviation	Risk of advanced cardiac block in surgical patients with a right bundle branch block and a deviation from the left axis.
15	relationships among ventricular arrhythmias coronary artery disease and angiographic and electrocardiographic indicators of myocardial fibrosis	Relationships between ventricular arrhythmias, coronary heart disease, and angiographic and electrocardiographic indicators of myocardial fibrosis.
15	effect of coronary bypass surgery on longevity in high and low risk patients report from the v a cooperative coronary surgery study	The effects of coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) on the longevity of high-risk and low-risk patients have been reported in a collaborative coronary surgery study.
15	a fever index evaluation of chloramphenicol or clindamycin in patients with serious pelvic infections	An assessment of the symptoms; an index of chloramphenicol fever or clindamycin in patients with severe pelvic infections.
15	cesarean section and maternal mortality in rhode island incidence and risk factors 1965 1975	Caesarean section and maternal mortality in the United States; incidence of island rhodiacs and risk factors, 1965 @-@1975.
15	sustained attention in children at risk for schizophrenia report on a continuous performance test	Continued attention to children at risk of schizophrenia is indicated in a report on ongoing performance testing.
15	retinal detachment following congenital cataract surgery	Congenital cataract surgery results in detachment of the retina.
15	lens implantation surgery in the second eye	It's called a lentil implantation in the second eye.
15	results of primary and secondary implants using choyce mark viii lenses	Results of the primary and secondary implants using Choyce brand lenses viii.
15	adenocarcinoma in regional enteritis of the small intestine	"""Adenocarcinoma in regional enteritis of the small intestine,"" Int J Med."
15	orbital expansion for anophthalmia and micro orbitism	Orbital expansion for both anophthalmia and microorbiting.
15	patterns of breast parenchyma on mammography	Mammographic parenchyma.
15	prevention of heart disease in the asymptomatic post infarction patient	Prevention of heart disease in asymptomatic patients with a heart attack.
15	caregiver child interactions and the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Interactions with individual; caregiver; child; and type of behaviour predisposed to coronary heart disease.
15	coronary risk factors in flying personnel a progress report	The Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coron Coron Coronary Coronary Coron Coronary Cor
15	prevention of heart disease in the young coronary candidate	Prevention of heart disease in young CHD candidate.
15	gonorrhea screening in family planning clinics when should it become selctive	In family planning clinics, when gonorrhea screening should be @-@, it should become auto-administered?
15	cholesterol and dna content in arterial tissue in severe obesity their relation to some risk factors for ischaemic heart disease	Cholesterol and dapos levels are linked to certain risk factors for ischemic heart disease; DNA in arterial tissue in the event of severe obesity.
15	notes on experiments with drugs in psychiatry	Notes on drug experimentation in psychiatry.
15	workload and risk of myocardial infarction a prospective psychosocial analysis	Workload and risk of myocardial infarction prospective psycho-social analysis.
15	cardiovascular risk factors among japanese and american telephone executives	Cardiovascular risk factors for both Japanese and U.S. telephone executives.
15	a competing risk model based on the life table procedure in epidemiological studies	A competing risk model based on the life table approach in epidemiological studies.
15	the incidence and characteristics of acute myeloid leukaemia arising in hodgkin s disease	The incidence and characteristics of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) from Hodgkin's disease.
15	importance of glycosuria in pregnant women as a risk factor in relation to diabetes mellitus	The importance of glycosuria in pregnant women as a risk factor for developing diabetes mellitus.
15	a new endoprosthesis for nonoperative intubation of the biliary tract in malignant obstructive jaundice	A new endoprosthesis for non-operative intubation of the biliary tract into malignant obstructive jaundice.
15	evaluation of a serologic test for gonorrhea in a low risk female population	Evaluation of serologic testing for gonorrhea in a female population at low risk.
15	hla islet cell antibodies and types of diabetes mellitus	Antibodies to islet cells and types of diabetes mellitus.
15	side effects of antihemophilic concentrates	Side effects of Hemophilic Concentrates.
15	postoperative wound infection rates	Rate of infection; infection of postoperative wounds.
15	risk factors of breast cancer in finland	The risk factors for breast cancer among Finnish women and men.
15	mortality risk associated with the use of oral contraceptives	The risk of mortality from the use of oral contraceptives is high.
15	therapy for cholelithiasis	Cholelithiasis therapy.
15	single dose intra incisional antibiotic prophylaxis of surgical wound sepsis a controlled trial of cephaloridine and ampicillin	Intravenous antibiotic prophylaxis-single-dose incision of sepsis surgery, controlled trial of both cephaloridine and d' ampicillin.
15	donor pretreatment in cadaver renal transplantation	Donor pretreatment as part of a kidney transplant in a cadaver.
15	effects of a health screening on mortality and causes of death in middle aged men a prospective study from 1970 to 1974 of mean in malm born 1914	Health screening effects on mortality and causes of death in Canadian men; average age, prospective study 1970-1974 on the mean age of children born in 1914.
15	measures for the prevention of incidents in ambulatory dental surgery	Measures to Prevent Incidents of Outpatient Dental Surgery.
15	complete surgical correction of congenital cardiopathies in infants	Complete surgical correction of congenital heart disease in infants.
15	some issues in research on stressful life events	Some research questions about stressful life events.
15	dentofacial orthopedics and morphopsychology	Orthopaedics dento-facial and morphopsychology.
15	androgen and estrogen formation in women with ovarian hyperthecosis	The formation of androgen and estrogen in women with ovarian hyperthecosis.
15	amniotic fluid analysis its role in maternal neonatal infection	Analysis of amniotic fluid and its role in maternal neonatal infection.
15	inidcations for prenatal diagnosis in relatives of patients with neural tube defects	Inidcations for prenatal diagnosis in parents of neural tube defects.
15	induction of labor in the high risk pregnancy with pgf 2 alpha	Work induction during high-risk pregnancy with pgf 2 alpha.
15	on conservative estimates of radiation hazards	It's about conservative estimates of radiation hazard.
15	carcinogenic risk assessment	Carcinogenic risk assessment.
15	infection surveillance identifying the problems and the high risk patient	Surveillance of apo; infection identifying high-risk patient and problem.
15	principles and tasks of biochemical research at centers participating in the accomplishment of the national program for the control of cardiovascular diseases	Principles and tasks of biochemical research in the centres involved in the implementation of the national programme for the control of cardiovascular diseases.
15	exogenous hormones reproductive history and breast cancer	Exogenous Hormones Reproductive history and breast cancer?
15	dentition diet tobacco and alcohol in the epidemiology of oral cancer	Dietary teething, tobacco and alcohol use; oral cancer epidemiology.
15	studies on herediatary spherocytosis in iceland	Hereditary spherocytosis studies in Iceland.
15	preoperative bowel preparation in urologic surgery	Pre-operative bowel prep in a urological surgery.
15	lecithin sphingomyelin ratio in amniotic fluid and its value for the prediction of neonatal respiratory distress syndrome in pregnant diabetic women	Lecithin-sphingomyelin ratio in amniotic fluid and its predictive value for neonatal respiratory distress syndrome in pregnant diabetic women.
15	the incidence of macular pucker after retinal detachment surgery	L' incidence of macular folds after retinal detachment.
15	evaluation of the risk of postoperative pulmonary complications	Risk assessment for postoperative pulmonary complications.
15	coffee consumption and coronary heart disease in middle aged swedish men	Coffee consumption and coronary heart disease among Swedish seniors; average age.
15	calculation of the size of the population group necessary for evaluation of the results of measures for the prevention of cardiovascular diseases on the example of the kaunas survey	Calculation of the size of the population group needed to prevent coronary heart disease; evaluation of the results of cardiovascular disease prevention measures; example of l'apos; kaunas survey.
15	participation of the population in mass screening and the role of complete population surveillance for detection of the disease studied from the experience of the methodical measures for the prevention of ischemic heart disease in kaunas	Population participation in mass screening and role of comprehensive population surveillance in the detection of disease studied from apo; experience with methodological measures for the prevention of ischemic heart disease in kaunas.
15	organization of collecting and analysis of the data on nutrition in epidemiological study of cardiovascular diseases	Organization of data collection and analysis; analysis of nutrition data in the Canadian population; epidemiological study of cardiovascular disease.
15	population surveillance and its importance in the study of the effectiveness of primary and secondary prevention of ischemic heart disease among the population	Population surveillance and its importance in population studies; effectiveness of primary and secondary prevention of ischemic heart disease in population.
15	ergometry and the risk factors in ischemic heart disease	Ergometry and risk factors for ischemic heart disease.
15	asymptomatic coronary artery disease and coronary bypass surgery	Asymptomatic coronary disease and surgical coronary bypass surgery.
15	dietary and serum lipids in the multifactorial etiology of atherosclerosis	Dietary and serum lipids in apos; multifactorial etiology of apos; atherosclerosis.
15	testing the lipid hypothesis clinical trials	Lipoprotein testing; lipid hypothesis clinical trials.
15	angina pectoris and middle aged man	Angina and men of average age.
15	the tromso heart study risk factors for coronary heart disease related to the occurrence of myocardial infarction in first degree relatives	Trumpeter heart study risk factors for coronary heart disease related to the occurrence of first-degree myocardial infarction.
15	risk factors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease copd	Risk factors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) copd.
15	determination of significant relative risks and optimal sampling procedures in prospective and retrospective comparative studies of various sizes	Identification of significant relative risks and procedures; optimal sampling in comparative prospective and retrospective studies of various sizes.
15	prader willi syndrome variable severity and recurrence risk	The severity and risk of recurrence of prader willi varies.
15	the identification of infants at risk of malnutrition in kingston jamaica	Identification of infants at risk of infant malnutrition in Kingston Jamaica.
15	growth profile of preschool children from an urban low socio economic community in india	Growth profile of children; pre-school age; urban community with low socio-economic status in India.
15	cholesterol in preteen children of parents with premature coronary disease	Cholesterol in preteen children of parents with premature coronary disease.
15	screening in family medicine the current situation	Screening in Family Medicine The Present Situation.
15	clinical application of high risk scoring on an obstetric service	L' clinical application of high risk rating to an obstetric service.
15	home observation for measurement of the environment a validation study of screening efficiency	Home-based observation for measurement of apos; environment, validation of apos; filtering efficiency.
15	reproductive counseling in patients who have had a spontaneous abortion	Reproductive counselling for women who have had a miscarriage.
15	the use of delayed primary wound closure in preventing wound infections	Use of delayed primary healing to prevent infection of wounds.
15	the effects of moderate alcohol consumption during pregnancy on fetal growth and morphogenesis	Effects of Dapos; moderate consumption of alcohol during pregnancy on fetal growth and morphogenesis.
15	problems in follow up studies	Problems in Follow-Up Studies Follow-up studies should be undertaken.
15	iron burden in sickle cell anemia	You know, iron levels in sickle cell.
15	are breast patterns a risk index for breast cancer a reappraisal	Breast profiles are an index of risk for breast cancer - a reassessment.
15	toxocara infection in animal hospital employees	Toxocara infection in pet hospital workers.
15	hydatid disease in new zealand an epidemiological study of transmission among maoris	Hydatid disease in new zealand, an epidemiological study of transmission in Maori.
15	indications and guidelines for mammographic examinations	Indications and guidelines for mammography.
15	preoperative intra aortic balloon assist in high risk revascularization patients	Preoperative aortic intra-@ balloons help patients at high risk of revascularization.
15	lung cancer among black migrants interaction of host and occupational environment factors	Lung cancer in black migrants interaction of the host and factors of the occupational environment.
15	prevention of complications of histamine liberation occurring after administration of anesthetic agents and adjuvants	Prevention of complications of release of apos; histamine after apos; administration of anaesthetics and additives.
15	factors favoring anaphylactic reactions to general anesthetics	Factors which promote anaphylactic reactions to general anesthetics.
15	symposium on intensive care 2 infection control in the surgical intensive care unit	A review of the epidemiology of cervical cancer in the United States.
15	detection and dispensary care of groups of persons at increased risk of bronchogenic cancer disease in czechoslovakia	Screening and care in a clinic for groups of people at increased risk of bronchogenic cancer in Czechoslovakia.
15	assessment of the danger of bronchological studies under polyclinic conditions	Evaluating the hazard of airborne studies under polyclinic conditions.
15	coronary risk factor reduction through biofeedback aided relaxation and meditation	The reduction of coronary risk factor by biofeedback helped relaxation and meditation.
15	toward classifying psychoactive chemical use	The use of psychoactive chemicals in the classification of drugs.
15	successful chemoprophylaxis for pneumocystis carinii pneumonitis	Successful chemoprophylaxis against pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
15	risk of coeliac disease in children of patients and effect of hla genotype	The risk of CD in children of patients and the effect of the hla genotype.
15	antituberculous therapy in pregnancy risks to the fetus	Anti-tuberculosis treatment during pregnancy poses risks to the fetus.
15	right coronary endarterectomy a procedure with increased risk of perioperative infarction	Right coronary endarterectomy is an intervention that carries an increased risk of perioperative infarction.
15	breast neoplasms in women treated with x rays for acute postpartum mastitis	Breast neoplasms in women receiving x-rays for acute breast mastitis post @-@partum.
15	oral contraceptives and nonfatal myocardial infarction	Oral contraceptives and non-fatal myocardial infarction.
15	noncontraceptive estrogens and nonfatal myocardial infarction	Non-contraceptive estrogen and non-fatal myocardial infarction?
15	treatment of common dog bites infection risk factors	Treatment of common dog bites risk factors for the development of infection.
15	children at risk performance of three year olds and their mentally ill and well mothers on an interaction task	At-risk children and their mentally ill and healthy mothers perform on a daily basis; interaction.
15	significance of fatty tissue hypertrophy for the metabolic risk	Lapos; importance of apos; hypertrophy of adipose tissue for metabolic risk.
15	female adolescent drinking behavior potential hazards	Consumption of alcoholic beverages by adolescents: potential health risks.
15	the natural history of calcium urolithiasis	L' natural history of l' calcium urolithiasis.
15	estrogen treatment of postmenopausal women benefits and risks	Estrogenic treatment for post-menopausal women presents benefits and risks.
15	hla and chronic active hepatitis	Hla with chronic active hepatitis.
15	influence of height weight and obesity on risk of breast cancer in an unselected swedish population	The risk of breast cancer in a population that has not been selected is determined by the risk of breast cancer.
15	normal serum cholesterol but low h d l cholesterol concentration in young patients with ischaemic cerebrovascular disease	Cholesterol is normal but low cholesterol h dl in young patients with ischemic cerebrovascular disease.
15	safety of cimetidine	Cimetidine security.
15	incidence of skin carcinoma after renal transplantation	Impact of apos; skin adenocarcinoma after a kidney transplant.
15	sequential evaluation of the supine hypertension or roll over test in a high risk population	Serologic evaluation of supine hypertension or reverse test in a high-risk population.
15	the early risk of re replacement of aortic valves	Early risk of replacement of the aortic valves.
15	selective screening for cervical cancer experience of the finnish mass screening system	Selective screening for cervical cancer; Finnish uterus as part of the mass screening system.
15	the hazard of old lead mines in wales	The danger of lead mines in Wales.
15	the harlem regional stroke program an overview	The Harlem Regional Stroke Program provides an overview of the situation.
15	thyroid disease following irradiation for benign conditions	Symptomatic thyroid disease; radiation under benign conditions.
15	translumbar aortography a study of its safety and usefulness	Aortography translombaire: study of its safety and usefulness.
15	soft tissue fluid determination by dichromatic absorptiometry	Determination of the soft tissue fluid by dichromatic absorptiometry.
15	the extracapsular cataract extraction without phacoemulsification	L' extraction of the extracapsular cataract without phaco-emulsification.
15	photocoagulation treatment of proliferative diabetic retinopathy the second report of diabetic retinopathy study findings	Photocoagulation treatment of proliferative diabetic retinopathy is the second report on the diabetic retinopathy study.
15	epidemiology of hodgkin s disease in the young	Epidemiology of Hodgkin's disease in Canadian youth.
15	histocompatibility leukocyte antigen patterns in nasopharyngeal carcinoma cases from california	Leukocyte histocompatibility antigen patterns in nasopharyngeal carcinoma cases from California.
15	psychological factors in failure to wear the milwaukee brace for treatment of idiopathic scoliosis	"Psychological factors of the ""no""-wearing milwaukee support for the treatment of idiopathic scoliosis."
15	the intermediate coronary care unit a stage in continued coronary care	The Coronary Intermediate Care Unit is a step in the continuum of coronary care.
15	an assessment of community suicide risk	Assessment of the risk of suicide in the community.
15	religiosity and self destructive crises in the institutionalized elderly	Crises of religiosity and apos; self-destruction in elderly people placed in institutions.
15	attempted suicides 35 years afterward	Attempted suicide, 35 years later.
15	estimation of suicide risk by the use of clinical models	Assessments of the risk of suicide have been made through the use of clinical and clinical models.
15	abo blood groups and chicken pox in an indian population	Blood type abo and varicella in an Indian population.
15	electrocardiographic response to intravenous urography prospective evaluation of 275 patients	Intravenous cardiographic response to intravenous urography: a prospective assessment of 275 patients.
15	further comments on novel schedule tlvs	D' further comments on the new schedule tlvs.
15	symptomatic myocardial infarction without chest pain prevalence and clinical course	Symptomatic myocardial infarction with no prevalence of chest pain and clinical progression.
15	influence of etiology of atrial fibrillation on incidence of systemic embolism	Influence of vomiting; etiology of atrial fibrillation on vomiting; incidence of vomiting; systemic embolism.
15	provocative testing for coronary arterial spasm rationale risk and clinical illustrations	Challenge tests for risk of coronary spasms and clinical illustrations.
15	treatment of chronic stable angina a preliminary report of survival data of the randomized veterans administration cooperative study	Treatment of apo; stable chronic angina, preliminary report of apo survival data; randomized cooperative study of apo; administration to veterans.
15	abnormal regulation of ventilation in infants at risk for sudden infant death syndrome	Abnormal ventilation regulation in infants at risk of sudden infant death syndrome.
15	smoking a risk factor for spontaneous abortion	Smoking is a risk factor for abortion.
15	lassa fever response to an imported case	Lassa fever response to imported case.
15	the aetiology of acute pulmonary embolism and the identification of high risk groups	Lapos; etiology of apo; acute pulmonary embolism and apo; identification of high-risk groups.
15	coronary risk factors in various occupational groups the oslo study	Coronary risk factors in various occupational groups; study in Oslo.
15	stress effects on affiliation preferences among subjects possessing the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Effects of stress on coronary preference affiliation in subjects with a pattern of coronary predisposition behaviour.
15	lung cancer in coastal georgia a death certificate analysis of occupation brief communication	Lung cancer in the coastal zone georgia an analysis of the death certificate of l' brief communication occupation.
15	detection of presymptomatic carriers of huntington s chorea	Detection of the presymptomatic carriers of the chorae of Huntington.
15	febrile convulsions followed by nonfebrile convulsions a clinical electroencephalographic and follow up study	Febrile convulsions followed by non-febrile convulsions, electroencephalographic clinical study, and follow-up study.
15	gram negative endocarditis following cystoscopy	Gram-negative endocarditis from a cystoscopy.
15	imported diseases an assessment of trends	Trend assessment for imported diseases.
15	diet and cancer of endocrine target organs	Endocrine target organ feeding and cancer.
15	the high risk perinatal registry a systematic approach for reducing perinatal mortality	High-risk perinatal birth registry is a systematic approach to reducing perinatal mortality.
15	emergency decision making a theoretical analysis of responses to disaster warnings	Decision-making in case of emergencies; Urgency Theoretical analysis of responses to warnings.
15	precursor lesions in familial melanoma a new genetic preneoplastic syndrome	The precursor lesions to the familial melanoma are a new genetic pre-neoplastic syndrome.
15	pregnancy and delivery among immigrants	Pregnancy and waiting; childbirth among immigrants.
15	changing patterns and mortality of acute myocardial infarction in a coronary care unit	Acute myocardial infarction in a coronary care unit.
15	autopsy study of unoperated abdominal aortic aneurysms the case for early resection	Apos study; abdominal autopsy; unoperated abdominal aortic aneurysms justifying early resection.
15	incidence and mortality of perioperative myocardial infarction in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass grafting	Incidence and mortality of perioperative myocardial infarction in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) surgery.
15	ischemic heart disease in a group of men 35 to 44 engaged in stressful mental work data from the 1st examination	"""Ischemic heart disease in a group of 35 to 44 men engaged in stressful mental work data from the first review,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
15	selection of groups of the male population 40 to 49 with risk factors for conducting primary prophylaxis of ischemic heart disease	Screening for risk factors for men aged 40 to 49 years for primary prophylaxis of ischemic heart disease.
15	medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland in norway serum calcitonin in 300 relatives of 43 patients	Thyroid medullary carcinoma in norway serum calcitonin in 300 parents from 43 patients.
15	risk and complications in peritoneoscopy	Risk and complications of peritoneoscopy.
15	hla b27 in ankylosing spondylitis differences in frequency and relative risk in american blacks and caucasians	"""Hla b27 in ankylosing spondylitis differences in frequency and relative risk in American blacks and caucasians,"" American Blacks, Vol."
15	how can the largest possible number of people be reached by a prophylaxis program in a country with a scattered population	How can we-reach as many people as possible through a malaria prophylaxis program in a country where the population is dispersed?
15	concomitants of atherosclerotic carotid artery stenosis	Apos stenosis; concomitant atherosclerotic carotid artery.
15	menstrual regulation the method and the issues competing risks of unnecessary procedures and complications	To regulate the methods and the issues of competing risks; to regulate unnecessary procedures and complications.
15	a simplified antepartum high risk pregnancy scoring form statistical analysis of 5459 cases	A simplified method of scoring high-risk pregnancies prior to delivery and delivery is a statistical analysis of 5,459 cases.
15	adriamycin cardiomyopathy risk factors	Adriamycin cardiomyopathy: risk factors.
15	forecasting the development of primary hepatocellular carcinoma by the use of risk factors studies in west africa	To anticipate onset; primary hepatocellular carcinoma at baseline; assistance; risk factor studies in West Africa.
15	induction of labour	Induction de main-d' oeuvre.
15	fatalities in 2 070 psychiatric outpatients	Death tolls in 2,070 ambulatory psychiatric patients.
15	coronary artery surgery in south australia 1970 1976	Surgery of the intestines; coronary artery in the south of the island.
15	neoplasms of the large bowel following ureterosigmoidostomy	Neoplasms of the large intestine following a large intestinal urethrosigmoidostomy.
15	evaluation of nephrotoxic and ototoxic effects of tobramycin in worldwide study	A global study evaluating the nephrotoxic and ototoxic effects of tobramycin.
15	follow up of survivors of childhood cancer	Follow-up with childhood cancer survivors.
15	epidemiology of vaginal adenosis and adenocarcinoma associated with exposure to stilbestrol in utero	Epidemiology of vaginal adenosis and adenocarcinoma associated with exposure to the stilbestrol in utero.
15	oral contraceptives and breast neoplasia	Oral contraceptives and breast neoplasia.
15	dose response evaluation of adriamycin in human neoplasia	Dose Assessment-response of l' adriamycin in human neoplasia.
15	assessment of behavioral risk for coronary disease by voice characteristics	Behavioural risk assessment for coronary heart disease, based on voice characteristics.
15	uterine cancer and estrogen therapy	Cancer of the uterus and estrogen therapy?
15	vascular complications of long term oestrogen therapy	Vascular complications of the estrogen; long-term estrogen therapy.
15	relative risks of saccharin and calorie ingestion	Relative risk of aspiration; ingestion of saccharin and calories.
15	preoperative oral antacid therapy for patients requiring emergency surgery	Pre-operative oral anti-acid therapy for patients requiring pre-operative surgery; emergency.
15	fecal bile acids and cholesterol metabolites of patients with ulcerative colitis a high risk group for development of colon cancer	A high risk group for colon cancer includes fecal bile acids and cholesterol metabolites from ulcerative colitis patients.
15	adjuvant chemotherapy and immunotherapy in high risk patients with melanoma	Adding chemotherapy and immunotherapy for high-risk patients with melanoma.
15	mortality from pneumonia and risk conditions during influenza epidemics high influenza morbidity during nonepidemic years	Mortality due to pneumonia and conditions at risk during influenza epidemics High mortality due to influenza; influenza in non-epidemic years.
15	the spectrum of vitamin k deficiency	This is the spectrum of the vitamin K deficiency.
15	cooperative study of hospital frequency and character of transient ischemic attacks iii variations in treatment	Co-operative study of hospital frequency and nature of transient ischemic attacks: iii changes in treatment.
15	distribution of various coronary risk factors in an urban general practice	Distribution of coronary risk factors in urban general practice.
15	the clinical significance of the risk factor hyperlipoproteinemia study on 2700 patients	Risk factor hyperlipoproteinemia in 2700 patients; clinical importance of apo; study.
15	ischaemic heart disease in the elderly	Ischemic heart disease in seniors.
15	spontaneous abortion and the use of sugar substitutes saccharin	The use of sugar substitutes replaces the use of saccharin.
15	the pattern of food and mortality in belgium	Food structure and mortality in belgium.
15	community education for cardiovascular health	Community-based Cardiovascular Health Education.
15	port moresby infant feeding survey	Port moresby, infant feeding survey, etc.
15	survey of serum lipid levels in icelandic men aged 34 61 years an epidemiological and statistical evaluation	Survey of serum lipid levels among Icelandic men aged 34-61 years, epidemiological and statistical evaluation.
15	possibilities of error in eeg in sleep and consciousness electroencephalographic observations in 153 children	Opportunities; error in electroencephalographic observations of sleep and consciousness in 153 children.
15	home testing for recurrent bacteriuria using nitrite strips	Home testing for recurrent bacteriuria; help with nitrite strips.
15	massive colonic diverticular hemorrhage in a transplant patient	Massive, diverticular, colonic hemorrhage in a transplant recipient.
15	management of household contacts of leprosy patients	Management of family contacts of leprosy patients.
15	life threatening surgical infection its development and prediction	Surgical infection with life-threatening potential, development and prediction.
15	relation between the race and economic status of patients and who performs their surgery	The study of the relationship between race and economic status of patients and who performs their surgery.
15	estrogen use and cancer of the uterine corpus in alberta	Lapses; use of estrogen and cervical cancer in Alberta.
15	high risk breast tumor patients	High-risk patients with breast cancer.
15	risk factors and angiographically determined coronary occlusion	Risk factors and l-apos; angiography-determined coronary occlusion.
15	fecal constituents of a high risk north american and a low risk finnish population for the development of large bowel cancer	Faecal components of diabetes; high-risk U.S. high- and low-risk northern population; low-risk Finnish population for diabetes development; large bowel cancer.
15	neonatal resuscitation	NICU.
15	estimation of relative risk from matched pairs in epidemiologic research	Estimation of the relative risk of the pairs in the epidemiological research.
15	stress and workload in pilots	Stress and workload at drivers.
15	risk factors associated with post cesarean section febrile morbidity	Risk factors associated with febrile morbidity post-@-@césarienne.
15	obstetrics in cuba 1974	Obstetrics in '74 in Cuba.
15	how old people tolerate intracranial surgery for aneurysm	How the elderly tolerate intracranial surgery for apos; aneurysm.
15	a case control study of regular aspirin use and coronary deaths	Case study:-control of apos; regular use of apos; aspirin and coronary death.
15	pre cancers and liability to other diseases	Pre-cancer and liability for other diseases.
15	an assessment of the possible association of isoniazid with human cancer deaths	Assessment of risk; possible association between isoniazide and human cancer deaths.
15	sodium etidronate in the treatment of paget s disease of bone a study of long term results	Sodium spacer in the treatment of paget bone disease a study of long-term outcomes.
15	detection of a new lipoprotein lp a its occurrence in atherosclerosis with or without hyperlipemia	Detection of apos; a new lipoprotein is now appearing in the apos; atherosclerosis with or without hyperlipidemia.
15	a 4 year prospective study of the relationship of different habitual vocational physical activity to risk and incidence of ischemic heart disease in volunteer male federal employees	Four-year prospective study of the relationship between occupational physical activity and risk and risk; incidence of ischemic heart disease among male volunteer federal employees.
15	organic impairment in polydrug users risk factors	Poly-drug-consumer risk factors are degraded organically.
15	ano rectal abnormalities and esophageal atresia familial and epidemiological studies	Ano rectal abnormalities and familial esophageal atresia and epidemiological studies.
15	assessment of cardiac risk in surgical patients	Cardiac risk assessment for patients in surgery.
15	the case against pot	Case against l'apos; l'herbe.
15	risk factors in stroke in a mexican american population houston	"""Risk factors in stroke in a Mexican-American population houston,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
15	retrolental fibroplasia a new analysis of risk factors based on recent cases	Retinal fibroplasia is a new risk factor analysis based on recent cases.
15	risk of neonatal streptococcus b infection	Risk of Dapos; neonatal streptococcal infection.
15	follow up studies in patients with right bundle branch block and left anterior hemiblock significance of h v interval	Follow-up studies in patients with a significant right bundle branch block and anterior left shoulder hemibloc; hv interval.
15	prophylactic antibiotics in neonates with umbilical artery catheter placement a prospective study of 137 patients	Prophylactic antibiotics in the newborn-babies; help from patients; a d*apos catheter; umbilical artery Placement d*apos; a prospective study of 137 patients.
16	antihistaminic drugs in dermatology	Antihistamines in dermatology.
16	studies on spreading factors i the importance of mechanical factors in hyaluronidase action in skin	Studies on propagation factors; importance of mechanical factors in the immune system; action of apos; hyaluronidase on skin.
16	liquid nitrogen in the treatment of skin diseases	Liquid nitrogen (liquid nitrogen) in the treatment of skin diseases.
16	the role of non precipitating antibodies in the passive sensitization of human skin by rabbit anti ovalbumin	The role of non-precipitating antibodies in the passive sensitization of human skin by antibodies against rabbit ovalbumin.
16	studies of hypersensitivity to low molecular weight substances ii reactions of some allergenic substituted dinitrobenzenes with cysteine or cystine of skin proteins	Dosage studies; hypersensitivity to low molecular weight substances ii reactions of certain substituted allergenic dinitrobenzenes with skin protein cystine or cysteine.
16	studies on the antibodies in rabbit antisera responsible for sensitization of human skin i the role of impurities in crystalline egg albumin in stimulating the production of skin sensitizing antibody	Antibody studies in rabbit antisera responsible for sensitizing human skin i the role of impurities in apos; albumin d' crystalline egg in stimulating production of apos; skin sensitizing antibodies.
16	histology and cytochemistry of human skin ix the distribution of non specific esterases	Histology and cytochemistry of human skin ix nonspecific esterase distribution.
16	an electron microscope study of the epidermis of mammalian skin in thin sections i dermo epidermal junction and basal cell layer	An electron microscopic study of mammalian skin epidermis in thin sections of the i dermo epidermal junction and basal cell layer.
16	investigation of the structure of the cornified epithelium of the human skin	Examination of the structure of the epithelium; corneal epithelium of human skin.
16	electrolyte distribution and active salt uptake in frog skin	Electrolyte distribution and active frog skin salt absorption.
16	olfactory perception in migrating salmon i l serine a salmon repellent in mammalian skin	Migratory salmon have olfactory perception and serine a repellent for salmon in mammalian skin.
16	change in enzyme activity and ribonucleic acid concentration within the epidermal cell of the rat during the growth stage of the hair cycle	Changes in apos; enzymatic activity and concentration of apos; ribonucleic acid in rat epidermal cell during growth stage of the hair cycle.
16	the basement lamelia of amphibian skin its reconstruction after wounding	The under-skin lamellar floor d&apos amphibian its reconstruction after injury.
16	histology and cytochemistry of human skin xi the distribution of beta glucuronidase	Histology and cytochemistry of human skin x the distribution of beta glucuronidase.
16	the characterization and localization of frog skin cholinesterase	Characterization and localization of frog cutaneous cholinesterase.
16	collagen formation by fibroblasts of the chick embryo dermis	Collagen formation by dermal fibroblasts of the chicken embryo.
16	nervous pathways of cutaneous pains	Nervous channels of skin pain.
16	nervous pathways of cutaneous pains	Nervous channels of skin pain.
16	electron microscope studies of the human epidermis the clear cell of masson dendritic cell or melanocyte	Electron microscopic study of the apos; human epidermis of the clear cell of the mace or melanocyte dendritic cell.
16	the fine structure of the adepidermal reticulum in the basal membrane of the skin of the newt triturus	The fine structure of the adepidermal reticulum in the triturus triturus skin basal membrane.
16	electron microscope observations of the melanocyte of the human epidermis	Electron microscopic observations of the apos melanocyte; human epidermis.
16	electron microscope studies of the human epidermis the cell boundaries and topography of the stratum malpighii	An electronic microscopic study of the epidermis, cell boundaries, and topography of the stratum malpighii.
16	a study of the distribution of 2 4 dinitrobenzene sensitizers between isolated lymph node cells and extracellular medium in relation to induction of contact skin sensitivity	A study of the distribution of 2-4 dinitrobenzene sensitizers between isolated lymph node cells and the extracellular medium in relation to etapos; induction of contact dermal sensitivity.
16	fine structure of the larval anuran epidermis with special reference to the figures of eberth	The Eberth figures are particularly referenced by the fine structure of the larval epidermis of the anurans.
16	the fine structure of the interrelationship of cells in the human epidermis	The fine structure of the epidermis; the inter-cellular relationship in the epidermis.
16	permeability of frog skin to choline	Permeability of the skin of a choline frog.
16	the effect of aminomethylpteroylglutamic acid on the development of skin hypersensitivity and on antibody formation in guinea pigs	The effect of the drug on the development of the immune system; the effect of the drug; aminoethylpteroylglutamic acid on the development of the immune system; skin hypersensitivity and on the formation of antibody in guinea pigs.
16	efficiency tests on a series of common skin antiseptics under ward conditions	Dapos tests; effectiveness on a series of common skin antiseptics, under room conditions.
16	staphylococci in septic fingers	Staph infection in his septic fingers.
16	staining of skin with dihydroxyacetone	A dye of the skin with dihydroxyacetone.
16	influence of the physical state of endotoxic preparations on dermal toxicity	L' influence of apo; physical condition of endotoxic preparations on dermal toxicity.
16	homologous disease in the adult rat a model for autoimmune disease i general features and cutaneous lesions	A disease that is homologous in adult rats with a model auto-disease-immune i general characteristics and skin lesions.
16	skin resistance levels and galvanic skin response unilateral differences	Skin resistance levels and galvanic response differ unilaterally.
16	properties of acatalasic cells growing in vitro	Properties of acatalase cells grown in vitro.
16	burns and other skin lesions microcirculatory responses in man during healing	Injuries and other skin lesions, microcirculatory responses in the apos; man during recovery.
16	sex chromatin mass in living cultivated human cells	A mass of sexual chromatin in live-grown human cells.
16	the effect of hydrocortisone on the response of fetal rat skin in culture to ultraviolet irradiation	Effect of apos; hydrocortisone on the response of cultured fetal rat skin to ultraviolet irradiation.
16	action of antidiuretic hormone on the equivalent pore radius at both surfaces of the epithelium of the isolated toad skin	Action of l' antidiuretic hormone on the radius of the pore equivalent to the two surfaces of l' epithelium of the skin isolated from the toad.
16	cutaneous sensory end organs of some anthropoid apes	Cutaneous sensory organs of certain anthropoid monkeys.
16	calciphylaxis passive transfer	Calcalphylaxis passive transfer.
16	radiation dose to the skin and to the gonads from diagnostic x ray procedures	Radiation dose to the skin and gonads resulting from X-ray diagnostic procedures.
16	a study of the fine structure of the epidermis of rana pipiens	A study of the fine structure of the epidermis of pipian rana pipiens.
16	assay of vitamins and amino acids with cultured tissue cells and antimetabolites	Vitamins and d&apos testing; amino acids with cultured tissue cells and antimetabolites.
16	collagenolytic activity of intact and necrotic connective tissue	Collagenolytic activity of intact, necrotic connective tissue tissue tissue.
16	resurfacing of the thumb following major skin loss	Significant loss of skin due to thumb reshaping.
16	chromosome studies of normal and psoriatic skin fibroblasts	Chromosome studies of normal and psoriatic fibroblast skin.
16	ultraviolet induced acantholysis in pemphigus	Ultraviolet induces apos; acantholysis in pemphigus.
16	dermojet histopathological artifacts	Histopathological artifacts of dermojets.
16	intermolecular cross linking of collagen and the identification of a new beta component	Collagen intermolecular linkage and identification of apos; a new beta component.
16	complement as a mediator of inflammation enhancement of vascular permeability by purified human c 1 esterase	Complimentary as apo mediator; inflammatory increase in vascular permeability by purified human esterase c 1.
16	hurler s syndrome demonstration of an inherited disorder of connective tissue in cell culture	Screaming syndrome showing an inherited connective tissue disorder in a cell culture.
16	the susceptibility of chick embryo skin organ cultures to influenza virus following excess vitamin a	Vulnerability of food crops; organ failure; influenza virus embryos following influenza; excess vitamin a.
16	effects of anti rheumatic compounds and pyridine derivatives on the cutaneous response to thurfyl nicotinate in the guinea pig	Effects of anti @-@rheumatizers and pyridine derivatives on skin response to thurfyl nicotinate in guinea pig.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles i determinants of the chronic nodular lesion of connective tissue	Biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles i determinants of chronic connective tissue (CTB) nodular injury.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles ii purification by density gradient column electrophoresis	Biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles ii density gradient column electrophoresis purification.
16	effect of a new inhibitor of cholesterol biosynthesis ay 9944 on serum and tissue sterols in the rat	Effect of a novel cholesterol biosynthetic inhibitor ay 9944 on serum and tissue sterols in rat.
16	specific sites of fatty acid sterol synthesis in isolated skin components	Specific site of synthesis of fatty acid sterols in isolated skin components.
16	fine structure of desmosomes hemidesmosomes and an adepidermal globular layer in developing newt epidermis	A fine d&apos structure; desmosome hemidesmosomes and an epidermal globular layer in the development of the apos; newt epidermis.
16	a fine structural analysis of the epidermis of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l	Fine structural analysis of the epidermis of the earthworm Lumbricus terrestris l.
16	mediators of inflammation in leukocyte lysosomes ii mechanism of action of lysosomal cationic protein upon vascular permeability in the rat	Lysosomal mediators; inflammation in leukocyte lysosomes ii mechanism; action of lysosomal cationic protein on vascular permeability in rat.
16	hurler s syndrome a genetic study in cell culture	It's called a genetic study in cell culture.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles 3 dermonecrotic reaction to cell wall mucopeptides	Biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles 3 dermonecrotic response to cell wall mucopeptides.
16	passage of lipid across vascular endothelium in newborn rats an electron microscopic study	The passage of lipids through the vascular endothelium of newly born-rats was studied by electron microscopy.
16	a special fibril of the dermis	A special fibrillar of the dermis.
16	effects of d2o and osmotic gradients on potential and resistance of the isolated frog skin	The effects of d2o and osmotic gradients on the potential and resistance of isolated frog skin.
16	quantitative studies of the antagonism by nalorphine of some of the actions of morphine like analgesic drugs	Quantitative studies of l' nalorphin antagonism of certain actions of morphine such as analgesics.
16	collagen defect induced by penicillamine	Penicillamine-induced collagen failure, sir.
16	itch and vibration	The itching and vibration!
16	cell junctions in amphibian skin	Cellular junctions in the skin of amphibians.
16	the intraepidermal innervation of the snout skin of the opossum a light and electron microscope study with observations on the nature of merkel s tastzellen	L' innervation of the epidermal skin of the snout of l' opossum was studied by light and electron microscopy with observations on the nature of merkel s tastzellen.
16	soluble proteins of a melanoma and normal skin from the swordtail platyfish and their hybrids	Soluble proteins; a melanoma and d' normal skin; platyfish swordfish and their hybrids.
16	sweating direct influence of skin temperature	Sweating directly affects the temperature of your skin.
16	polysome morphology evidence for endocrine control during chick embryogenesis	Polysome morphology, chick embryogenesis, endocrine control during apo.
16	the dstribution of calcium 47 in the rat	The contribution of calcium level 47 in the rat.
16	absence or singular specificity of carotenoids in some lower fishes	The absence or singularity of carotenoids in some lower-order fishes.
16	transformation of mycelial and yeast forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis in cultures and in experimental inoculations	Conversion of mycelial and yeast forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis into culture and experimental inoculations.
16	skin temperature recording with phosphors toxicity studies on animals	Skin temperature recording using apo; phosphorus toxicity studies in animals.
16	skin temperature recording with phosphors a new technique	Recording skin temperature with phosphores, a new technique.
16	striae and their relation to topical steroid therapy	Striations and their relationship to topical steroid therapy.
16	effects of arterial hypoxia on the cutaneous circulation of the rabbit	Effects of apos; arterial hypoxia on rabbit skin circulation.
16	presence and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in bovine skin	Presence and persistence of foot-and-mouth disease virus in the skin of cattle.
16	thermal denaturation of soluble calf skin collagen	Thermal denaturation of soluble collagen of calf skin.
16	preparation and properties of a cell free system from rat skin that catalyzes sterol biosynthesis	Preparation and properties of a rat skin cell-free system that catalyzes sterol biosynthesis.
16	ultrastructural studies of human cutaneous nerve with special reference to lamellated cell inclusions and vacuole containing cells	Ultrastructural studies of the human skin nerve, lamellar cell inclusions and cells containing vacuoles.
16	lipogenesis from amino acids in perfused isolated dog skin	Lipogenesis from amino acids in isolated and perfused dog skin tissue.
16	hurler s syndrome effect of retinol vitamin a alcohol on cellular mucopolysaccharides in cultured human skin fibroblasts	Hurler s syndrome effect of retinol, vitamin a alcohol on cell mucopolysaccharides in human skin fibroblasts cultured.
16	staphylococcus aureus on the hair	Staphylococcus aureus on your hair?
16	collagen structural studies based on the cleavage of methionyl bonds	Structural studies of collagen structure based on methionyl bond cleavage.
16	development of antigens in human cells infected with simian virus 40	Antigenesis in human cells infected with simian virus.
16	delayed dermal hypersensitivity in mice to spherule and mycelial extracts of coccidioides immitis	In mice, l' dermal hypersensitivity to spherule and mycelial extracts of coccidioides immitis was delayed.
16	enzymatic solubilization of insoluble proteins at neutral ph	Enzyme solubilization of insoluble proteins in neutral ph.
16	degradation of streptococcal cell wall antigens in vivo	Streptococcal cell wall antigens degraded in vivo.
16	a comparison of the responses of frog skin receptors to mechanical and electrical stimulation	Comparison of the responses of frog skin receptors to both mechanical and electrical stimulation.
16	a visco elastic theory of mechanoreceptor adaptation	A visco-elastic theory of l' mechanical receptor adaptation.
16	mechanoreceptors in rabbit ear skin innervated by myelinated nerve fibres	In the skin of rabbit ears innervated by myelinated nerve fibers, mechanoreceptors are innervated by nerve fibers.
16	persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls related to chronic inflammation of rabbit dermal connective tissue	The persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls is related to chronic inflammation of the rabbit dermal connective tissue.
16	cocoon surrounding desert dwelling frogs	Cocoon surrounding Frogs, domiciled in the desert.
16	vitamin c induced increase of dermatan sulfate in cultured hurler s fibroblasts	Vitamin c increased dermatan sulfate in cultured Hurler fibroblasts.
16	hypophyseal control of genetic expression during chick feather and skin differentiation	Control of the pituitary gland; genetic expression during differentiation of feathers and chick skin.
16	langerhans cells uptake of tritiated thymidine	Langerhans cells pick up tritiated thymidine.
16	chemical cue preferences of inexperienced snakes comparative aspects	The chemical preferences of landmarks of inexperienced comparative snakes.
16	responses of human somatosensory cortex to stimuli below threshold for conscious sensation	Reactions of the human somatosensory cortex to stimuli below the threshold level of conscious sensation.
16	susceptibility of human diploid fibroblast strains to transformation by sv40 virus	In addition, it is not possible to determine the susceptibility of human diploid fibroblast strains to transformation by sv40.
16	the serologic specificity of tropocollagen telopeptides	The serological specificity of tropocollagin telopeptides.
16	the interrelation of thermoregulatory and baroreceptor reflexes in the control of the blood vessels in the human forearm	L' interrelation of thermoregulatory and baroreceptor reflexes in blood vessel control of the apos; before-human arm.
16	leukotactic factor elaborated by mixtures of genetically dissimilar cells	A leukotactic factor developed by genetically dissimilar cell mixtures.
16	skin sensory afterglows	The skin glows under the skin; effect of light.
16	centromere absence of dna replication during chromatid separation in human fibroblasts	L' lack of replication of apos; DNA in centromeres during chromatid separation in human fibroblasts.
16	synthesis and turnover of collagen precursors in rabbit skin	Synthesis and renewal of collagen precursors in rabbit skin.
16	the separation of the alpha chains of collagen by free flow electrophoresis	Free flow gel electrophoresis to separate the alpha chains of collagen.
16	refsum s disease nature of the enzyme defect	Refsum disease of the apos; deficient enzyme.
16	myelinated afferent fibres innervating the primate skin and their response to noxious stimuli	Myelinated afferent fibers innervating primate skin and response to noxious stimuli.
16	peripheral modification of sensory nerve responses after cross regeneration	Peripheral modification of sensory nerve responses following cross-regeneration.
16	local and reflex factors affecting the distribution of the peripheral blood flow during arterial hypoxia in the rabbit	Local factors and reflexes affecting the distribution of peripheral blood flow during apo; rabbit hypoxia.
16	distribution of peripheral blood flow in primary tissue hypoxia induced by inhalation of carbon monoxide	Distributions of peripheral blood flow in the apos; primary tissue hypoxia induced by inhalation of carbon monoxide.
16	effects of haemorrhage on the distribution of the peripheral blood flow in the rabbit	Effect of apos; hemorrhage on the distribution of rabbit peripheral blood flow.
16	responses of skin blood vessels to bradykinin histamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine	Reactions of the skin's blood vessels to bradykinin histamine and to 5 hydroxytryptamine.
16	animal identification i liquid nitrogen branding of cattle	Identification of animals i marking with liquid nitrogen from cattle.
16	animal identification ii freeze branding of seals for laboratory identification	Identification of animals ii Cold marking of seals for identification in laboratory.
16	the topology of dermatomal projection in the medial lemniscal system	Topology of dermatomal projection in the median lemniscal system.
16	biological effects of leptospiral lipids	Biological effects of leptospiral lipids.
16	hurler s syndrome a genetic study of clones in cell culture with particular reference to the lyon hypothesis	Syndrome hurler s a genetic study of clones in cell culture with a specific reference to the cell line; lyon hypothesis.
16	concanavalin a in vivo induction of hemorrhagic skin lesions arthus like reactions in mice	Concanavalin a in vivo induction of arthrotic hemorrhagic skin lesions such as mouse reactions.
16	copper relation to penicillamine induced defect in collagen	Copper to Penicillamine Ratio Penicillamine-induced collagen failure.
16	the effect of gamma irradiation on soluble collagen	Effect of exposure to gamma irradiation on soluble collagen.
16	the lipid substances and cytopathic effects in man of bcg strain copenhagen and attenuated vole bacillus strain prague	Lipid substances and cytopathic effects in men of the copenhagen strain bcg and the attenuated vole strain prague.
16	effect of diethylstilbestrol on skin sterols of the male rat	Effect of diethylstilbestrol on sterols in male rat skin.
16	multiple temperature sensitive spots innervated by single nerve fibers	Multiple heat-sensitive stains innervated by single nerve fibers.
16	neuronal specification of cutaneous nerves through connections with skin grafts in the frog	Neuronal specification of the skin nerves by means of connections with skin grafts in the frog.
16	sensitization of smooth muscle to plasma kinins effects of enzymes and peptides on various preparations	Smooth muscle sensitization to plasma kinins effects of enzymes and peptides on various preparations.
16	the influence of the cellular infiltrate on the evolution and intensity of delayed hypersensitivity reactions	L' influence of apos; cell infiltration on apos; evolution and apos; intensity of reactions; delayed hypersensitivity.
16	collagen has a discrete family of reactive hydroxylysyl and lysyl side chain amino groups	Collagen has a discrete family of reactive amino groups of the hydroxylysyl and lysyl side chains.
16	variations in purine metabolism of cultured skin fibroblasts from patients with gout	Purine metabolism of cultured skin fibroblasts from patients with gout.
16	size discrimination on the skin	She's got size discrimination on her skin.
16	herpesvirus type 2 association with carcinoma of the cervix	Association of lupus; cervical carcinoma type 2 herpesvirus; uterus.
16	l lactic acid a mosquito attractant isolated from humans	Lactic acid, an attractant of mosquitoes isolated from humans.
16	gaucher s disease a genetic disease detected in skin fibroblast cultures	Genetic disease detected in cultured cutaneous fibroblasts.
16	the metabolism of n triphenylmethylmorpholine in the dog and rat	The metabolism of n-triphenylmethylmorpholine in dogs and rats.
16	sources of gas gangrene in hospital	Sources of gaseous gangrene at the hospital.
16	serial reconstruction of the characteristic granule of the langerhans cell	Serial reconstruction of the characteristic langerhans granule.
16	the effects of oral contraceptives on the endometrium	Effects of oral contraceptives on the endometrium.
16	the dermal chromatophore unit	L' dermal chromatophore unit.
16	the conversion of testosterone to 5 alpha androstan 17 beta ol 3 one dihydrotestosterone by skin slices of man	The conversion of testosterone into 5 alpha androstan 17 beta ol 3 1 dihydrotestosterone by slices of skin d'apos; man.
16	synthesis and degradation of collagen in the developing corium of the chick embryo	Synthesis and degradation of collagen in developing corium of chicken embryo.
16	a study of the mechanism of water transfer across frog skin by a comparison of the permeability of the skin to deuterated and tritiated water	A study of the transfer mechanism of water through frog skin by comparing the permeability of the skin to the skin; deuterated and tritiated water.
16	rapid diagnosis of herpesvirus hominis infections in superficial lesions by immunofluorescent antibody technics	American Journal of Medicine, vol.: Rapid diagnosis of herpesvirus hominis infections in surface lions by immunofluorescent antibody techniques.
16	vitamin a induced synthesis of alkaline phosphatase	The vitamin induced synthesis of the alkaline phosphatase.
16	cystathionine synthase in tissue culture derived from human skin enzyme defect in homocystinuria	Cystathionine synthase in tissue culture is derived from apos; a defect of the human skin enzyme in apos; homocystinuria.
16	sexual behavior stimulation by painful electrical shock to skin in male rats	Stimulation of sexual behaviour by painful electrical shock to the skin of male rats.
16	study of delayed hypersensitivity to myxoviruses induced by vaccines	Study of vaccines; delayed hypersensitivity to vaccine-induced myxoviruses.
16	elastofibroma dorsi	Elastofibroma dorsi.
16	embryonic morphogenesis role of fibrous lattice in the development of feathers and feather patterns	Embryonic morphogenetic role of the fibrous tissue network in feather development and feather patterns.
16	comparative antibacterial activity of hexachlorophane in different formulations used for skin disinfection	Comparative antibacterial activity of hexachlorophane in different formulations for skin disinfection.
16	increased free cystine content of fibroblasts cultured from patients with cystinosis	Increases in free cystine content of cultured fibroblasts from cystinosis patients.
16	cystic fibrosis of the pancreas a study in cell culture	Cystic fibrosis of the pancreas is a cell culture study.
16	hurler and hunter syndromes mutual correction of the defect in cultured fibroblasts	Hurler Syndrome-Hunter Mutual correction of defect in cultured fibroblasts.
16	morphological and biochemical characterization of goldfish erythrophores and their pterinosomes	Morphological and biochemical characterization of goldfish erythrophores and their pterinosomes.
16	glycolipid and mucopolysaccharide abnormality in fibroblasts of fabry s disease	Glycolipid and mucopolysaccharide defects in the fibroblasts of Fabry's disease.
16	human wound repair i epidermal regeneration	Repair and repair of human injuries i epidermal regeneration.
16	human wound repair ii inflammatory cells epithelial mesenchymal interrelations and fibrogenesis	Repair of human wounds ii epithelial mesenchymal inflammatory cells and fibrogenesis.
16	cholesterol requirement of primary diploid human fibroblasts	The cholesterol requirements of primary human fibroblasts.
16	partial hydroxylation of certain lysines in collagen	Partial hydroxylation of some lysines in the collagen.
16	keratohyalin extraction and in vitro aggregation	Extraction of keratohyaline and in vitro keratohyaline aggregation.
16	skin replication procedure for the scanning electron microscope	Cutaneous replication procedure for a scanning electron microscope.
16	acth and decubitus ulceration an experimental study	An experimental study of acth and apos; ulceration of the decubitus.
16	myotonic muscular dystrophy abnormalities in fibroblast culture	Myotonic abnormalities of muscular dystrophy in fibroblast culture.
16	permeability increasing activity in hereditary angioneurotic edema plasma ii mechanism of formation and partial characterization	Increased permeability; activity in the angioneurotic hereditary plasma of apotism cells; edema ii mechanism of formation and partial characterization.
16	activation of hageman factor by collagen	Collagen activation of lamb factor.
16	a symmetrical extracellular fibril	A symmetrical extracellular fibril!
16	carbenicillin resistance in pseudomonas aeruginosa from clinical material	Carbenicillin resistance of Pseudomonas aeruginosa from clinical specimens.
16	role of candida albicans infection in napkin rashes	The role of lapos; infection with candida albicans in towel rash.
16	new sialic acid containing sulfolipid ungulic acid	New sialic acid containing ungulic acid sulfolipid.
16	demonstration of a bactericidal substance against beta hemolytic streptococci in supernatant fluids of staphylococcal cultures	Evidence of the presence of a bactericidal substance against beta-hemolytic streptococci in supernatants of staphylococcal cultures.
16	melanoma and pigmentation of the leptomeninges in ugandan africans	Melanoma and Pigmentation of Leptomeninges in Ugandan Africanans.
16	white blood cell cultures in genetic studies on the human mucopolysaccharidoses	White blood cell cultures in human mucopolysaccharide genetic studies.
16	induction of melanin synthesis in albino mouse skin by dna from pigmented mice	Melanin synthesis induced in albino mouse skin by pigmented mouse DNA.
16	the defect in hurler and hunter syndromes ii deficiency of specific factors involved in mucopolysaccharide degradation	Failure of howler and hunter syndromes ii Failure of the specific factors involved in the degradation of mucopolysaccharides.
16	the classification of staphylococci from colonized ventriculo atrial shunts	Classification of staphylococci from ventricular atrial derivatives colonized by the ventricle.
16	studies on the migratory behavior of melanocytes in guinea pig skin	Studies of migration behaviour of melanocytes in guinea pig skin.
16	polysaccharide in delayed hypersensitivity i pneumococcal polysaccharide as inducer and elicitor of delayed reactivity in guinea pigs	Delayed hypersensitivity i pneumococcal polysaccharide as an inducer and trigger for delayed responsiveness in guinea pigs.
16	polydactyly and other minor stigmata associated with 46 xx 47 xx d mosaicism	Polydactyly and other minor stigmas associated with 46 x 47 x x x x mosaic d.
16	beta glucuronidase activity in skin components of children with cystic fibrosis	Glucuronidase beta activity in skin components of children with cystic fibrosis.
16	comparison of the reflex reactivity of skin and muscle veins in the human forearm	Comparison of the reflex reactivity of the skin and muscular veins of l' before-human arm.
16	chick cartilage collagen a new type of alpha 1 chain not present in bone or skin of the species	Chicken cartilage collagen is a new type of alpha 1 chain that does not appear in chicken cartilage bones or skin; species.
16	the role of skin and muscle resistance vessels in reflexes mediated by the baroreceptor system	The role of skin and muscle resistance vessels in baroreceptor-mediated reflexes.
16	increased vascular permeability produced by human platelet granule cationic extract	Increased vascular permeability produced by the cationic extract of human platelet granules.
16	cuticular lipids of adults and puparia of the australian sheep blowfly lucilia cuprina wied	The cuticular lipids of adult and adult Australian meat fly pupae lucilia cuprina were examined.
16	ultraviolet light alteration of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid in vivo	Alteration by ultraviolet radiation of the cell; cellular deoxyribonucleic acid in vivo.
16	evidence for intergenic complementation in hybrid cells derived from two human diploid strains each carrying an x linked mutation	Evidence of intergenic complementation in hybrid cells derived from two human diploid strains, each carrying an x-linked mutation.
16	metachromatic leukodystrophy arylsulfatase a deficiency in skin fibroblast cultures	Metachromatic leukodystrophy arylsulfatase, a deficiency in cutaneous fibroblast culture.
16	reversible transformation of fibrous collagen to a soluble state in vivo	Reversible transformation of fibrous collagen into an in vivo soluble state.
16	parasexual cycle in cultivated human somatic cells	Parasexual cycle in cultured human somatic cells.
16	erythropoietic protoporphyria iv protection from sunlight	Protoporphyria erythropoietica iv protection against sunlight.
16	evidence that xeroderma pigmentosum cells do not perform the first step in the repair of ultraviolet damage to their dna	It appears that xeroderma pigmentosum n&apos cells do not perform the first step in repairing the damage caused by ultraviolet radiation to their DNA.
16	chemical and electrical synaptic connexions between cutaneous mechanoreceptor neurones in the central nervous system of the leech	Chemical and electrical synaptic connections between cutaneous mechanoreceptor neurons in the leech central nervous system.
16	presence of caerulein in extracts of the skin of leptodactylus pentadactylus labyrinthicus and of xenopus laevis	Cerulein was present in skin extracts of leptodactylus pentadactylus labyrinthicus and xenopus laevis.
16	osmium zinc iodide reactive sites in the epidermal langerhans cell	Zinc iodide; osmium in the epidermal cell langerhans.
16	severe local reaction following live measles virus in guinea pigs previously inoculated with killed virus	Severe local reaction following measles virus; live measles virus inoculation of guinea pigs previously inoculated with the killed virus.
16	acute effects of a monoamine oxidase inhibitor tranylcypromine on thermoregulation in the conscious rabbit	Acute effects of tranylcypromine, a monoamine oxidase inhibitor, on the thermoregulation of the conscious rabbit.
16	the action of glucosulphone n n di glucose sodium sulphonate of 4 4 diaminodiphenyl sulphone on pancreatic kallikrein	L' action of the glucosulphone n of glucose sodium sulfonate of 4 diaminodiphenyls sulphone on the pancreatic kallikrein.
16	structure and pharmacological actions of phyllocaerulein a caerulein like nonapeptide its occurrence in extracts of the skin of phyllomedusa sauvagei and related phyllomedusa species	Phyllocaerulein structure and pharmacological actions a caerulein as a non-apeptide present in extracts from the skin of phyllomedusa sauvagei and related phyllomedusa species.
16	wound healing and collagen formation vi the origin of the wound fibroblast studied in parabiosis	Wound healing and collagen formation are the origin of wound fibroblasts studied in parabiosis.
16	the metabolism of the insecticide carbaryl 1 naphthyl n methylcarbamate by fat body of the blowfly larva calliphora erythrocephala	Metabolism of l' carbaryl insecticide 1 naphthyl n methylcarbamate by fat body of calliphora erythrocephala fly larvae.
16	which disposable chest electrode	What's a disposable chest electrode?
16	interferon induction increased through chemical modification of a synthetic polyribonucleotide	Lapos; induction of apos; interferon has increased by chemical modification of a synthetic polyribonucleotide.
16	the role of normal skin in the spread of streptococcal pyoderma	The role of normal skin tissue in the spread of streptococcal pyoderma.
16	staphylococcal epidemiology in antarctica	Staphyloccal epidemiology in antarctica.
16	correlation of initial changes in the mouse epidermal cell population with two stage carcinogenesis a quantitative study	The correlation between initial changes in the mouse epidermal cell population and two-stage carcinogenesis was established in a quantitative study.
16	effect of pregnancy on sebum excretion	Effect of pregnancy on pregnancy; sebum excretion.
16	differentiating neoplasms of hair germ	Neoplasms to differentiate hair germ.
16	dimethylbenzanthracene tumorigenesis and aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in mouse skin inhibition by 7 8 benzoflavone	Dimethylbenzanthracene tumorigenesis and aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in skin inhibition by 7-8 benzoflavone.
16	genetic inactivation of the alpha galactosidase locus in carriers of fabry s disease	Genetic inactivation of the alpha galactosidase locus in Fabry s.
16	optimum skin blending method for quantifying poultry carcass bacteria	Optimal cutaneous blending method to quantify bacteria in poultry carcasses.
16	lesch nyhan syndrome preventive control by prenatal diagnosis	Prevention of Lesch Nyhan syndrome by a prenatal diagnosis.
16	defect in dna synthesis in skin of patients with xeroderma pigmentosum demonstrated in vivo	Failure of synthesis of apo; demonstrated in vivo DNA in the skin of patients with pigment xeroderma.
16	tissue distribution of progesterone 7 h3 in the female genital tract 8 hours after intravenous administration	Tissue distribution of progesterone 7 h3 in the apos; female genital apparatus 8 hours after dosing; intravenous administration.
16	bactericidal properties of tego 103 s and tego 103 g	Bactericidal properties of tego 103 s and tego 103 g.
16	scheie and hurler syndromes apparent identity of the biochemical defect	It is not possible to determine the identity of the biochemical defect.
16	nitrogen requirements and uricolytic activity of cutaneous bacteria	Nutrient requirements and uricolytic activity of skin-dwelling bacteria.
16	collagen molecules distribution of alpha chains	Distribution of the alpha chains by the collagen molecules.
16	comparative enumeration of lipophilic and nonlipophilic cutaneous diphtheroids and cocci	Comparative counts of lipophilic and non-lipophilic skin diphtheroids and cocci.
16	effects of systemic demethylchlortetracycline on human cutaneous microflora	Effects of systemic demethylchlortetracycline on the human skin microflora.
16	mechanism of prophylaxis by silver compounds against infection of burns	Compound-based prophylaxis mechanisms; money against disease; infection from burns.
16	toxin from skin of frogs of the genus atelopus differentiation from dendrobatid toxins	The skin toxin of frogs of the genus atelopus is found to differentiate from dendrobatid toxins.
16	studies in vivo on the biosynthesis of collagen and elastin in ascorbic acid deficient guinea pigs	Collagen and elastin biosynthesis studies in vivo in ascorbic acid deficient guinea pigs.
16	the relationship between reversibility of fibril formation and subunit composition of rat skin collagen	Relationship between reversibility of fibrillar formation and sub@-@unit composition of rat skin collagen.
16	cell free transmission and in vivo replication of marek s disease virus	Cell-free transmission and in vivo replication of the mares disease virus.
16	synthesis of lipids from acetate by human preputial and abdominal skin in vitro	Lipid synthesis from d' acetate via preputial and human abdominal skin in vitro.
16	evidence for the chylomicron origin of lipids accumulating in diabetic eruptive xanthomas a correlative lipid biochemical histochemical and electron microscopic study	Evidence of lipid synthesis; chylomicron origin of lipid accumulation in diabetic eructive xanthomas, correlative lipid histochemistry and electron microscopy.
16	localization of antigenic determinants in the polypeptide chains of collagen	Location of antigenic determinants in polypeptide chains of collagen.
16	peritoneal infections in patients on long term peritoneal dialysis before and after human cadaveric renal transplantation	Peritoneal infections in long-term peritoneal dialysis patients before and after human cadaveric renal transplantation.
16	the extraction of polymeric collagen from biopsies of human skin	L' Polymeric collagen extraction from biopsies of human skin.
16	foot skin ischaemia in atherosclerotic peripheral vascular disease	Foot skin ischemia in peripheral vascular atherosclerotic diseases.
16	cellular and vascular components of the allograft reaction evidence from returned skin allografts	Cellular and vascular components of the d&apos reaction; allograft return evidence of allograft allograft skin allograft.
16	the effects of histamine in malaria	The effects of histamine and histamine on malaria.
16	human skin collagenase the role of serum alpha globulins in the control of activity in vivo and in vitro	Human skin collagenase is the role of serum alpha globulins in the control of apos; activity in vivo and in vitro.
16	eggshell thinning in japanese quail fed mercuric chloride	The eggshell is s' thinning in Japanese quails fed on mercuric chloride.
16	kinetics of acetylcholine synthesis and hydrolysis in myasthenia gravis	Kinetics of synthesis and synthesis; hydrolysis of l' acetylcholine in severe myasthenia.
16	the glycosaminoglycans of neonatal rat skin	Glycosaminoglycans from neonatal rat skin.
16	skin collagen and thickness in women with hirsuties	It's called collagen and skin thickness in women with hirsuties.
16	the natural history of molluscum contagiosum in fijian children	L' natural history of the molluscum contagiosum in children of Fijian origin.
16	the lymphatic status of hamster cheek pouch tissue in relation to its properties as a graft and as a graft site	L' lymphatic state of hamster cheek tissue in relation to its graft and graft site properties.
16	determination of arterial blood flow by percutaneously introduced flow sensors in an external magnetic field i the method	Determination of arterial blood flow rate using flow sensors introduced percutaneously into an external magnetic field i the method.
16	localization of permeability barriers in the frog skin epithelium	Localization of permeability barriers in frog skin epithelium.
16	formation and origin of basal lamina and anchoring fibrils in adult human skin	Formation and origin of the basal lamina anchoring the fibrils in adult human skin.
16	skin collagen and thickness in simple obesity	Collagen and skin thickness in the skin; simple obesity.
16	skin capillary blood flow in scleroderma	Dermal capillary blood flow into scleroderma.
16	the influence of thyroactive substances on the induction of cervico vaginal tumours in intact and castrate rats	The influence of thyroactive substances on cervical vaginal tumours in intact and castrate rats.
16	fabry s disease antenatal detection	Prenatal diagnosis of Fabry disease.
16	cutaneous reactions to intradermal prostaglandins	Skin reactions to intradermal prostaglandins.
16	studies on the nature of sweat gland fatigue in the goat	Studies of the nature of sweat gland fatigue in goats.
16	nuclear magnetic resonance of sodium 23 linoleate water basis for an alternative interpretation of sodium 23 spectra within cells	Sodium linoleate 23 nuclear magnetic resonance based on d' water for an alternative interpretation of the cellular interior spectra of sodium 23 at l&apos.
16	chloroquine concentrations in the skin of rabbits and man	Levels of chloroquine in the skin of both humans and rabbits.
16	inhibition of contact sensitivity in the mouse by topical application of corticosteroids	Inhibition of contact sensitivity in mice by epos; topical corticosteroid application.
16	hyposensitization with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus antigen trial in asthma induced by house dust	Dapos testing; potato hyposensitization; dermatophagoides pteronyssinus antigen in household dust; asthma.
16	skin bacteria and skin disinfection reconsidered	Skin bacteria and skin disinfection have been reconsidered.
16	distinctive characteristics of nucleoli of two established cell lines	Distinct nucleolus characteristics of two established cell lines.
16	disinfection of the skin an assessment of some new preparations	Disinfection of skin and skin and evaluation of some new preparations.
16	inductive interactions between human dermis and chick chorionic epithelium	Inductive interactions between human dermis and liver; Chorionic Epithelium of Chicken.
16	neurofibromatosis and leprosy	Neurofibromatosis and leprosy.
16	studies on purified rheumatoid synovial collagenase in vitro and in vivo	Synovial rheumatoid collagenase studies purified in vitro and in vivo.
16	localized skin changes induced by depot injections of vitamin a in the rat	Localized skin changes induced by rat vitamin a depot injections.
16	significance of cytoplasmic microtubules in lupus nephritis	L*apos; importance of cytoplasmic microtubules in lupus nephritis.
16	human phosphoglycerate kinase and inactivation of the x chromosome	Human phosphoglycerate kinase and l' x chromosome inactivation.
16	osteoporosis skin collagen and androgen	Collagen and androgen for osteoporosis.
16	cutaneous changes associated with marek s disease of chickens	Skin changes associated with mares disease in chickens.
16	early and late incorporation of tritiated thymidine into skin cells and the presence of a long lived g 0 specific precursor pool	Early and late incorporation of the tritiated thymidine into skin cells and the presence of apos; a long-lasting g0 specific precursor pool.
16	effect of estradiol 17 on collagen biosynthesis degradation and re utilization in vivo	Effect of estradiol 17 on the degradation of collagen biosynthesis and collagen reuse in vivo.
16	the distribution of cutaneous receptors in the rabbit s hind limb and differential electrical stimulation of their axons	Distribution of cutaneous receptors in the hindlimb of the rabbit and differential electrical stimulation of their axons.
16	diffusible factors from malignant cells which affect epidermal survival and differentiation	Dissolving factors of malignant cells affecting epidermal survival and differentiation.
16	cytochalasin b effects on microfilaments and movement of melanin granules within melanocytes	Effect of cytochalasin b on microfilaments and movement of granules of melanin in the interior of melanocytes.
16	water uptake by the crab eating frog rana cancrivora as affected by osmotic gradients and by neurohypophysial hormones	Absorption of water by crab feeding on rana cancrivora frogs is affected by osmotic gradients and neurohypophysial hormones.
16	histrionicotoxins roentgen ray analysis of the novel allenic and acetylenie spiroalkaloids isolated from a colombian frog dendrobates histrionicus	Histrionicotoxin analysis of roentgen rays of new allenic and acetylenic spiroalkaloids isolated from Apos; a Colombian dendrobate histrionicus frog.
16	potentially infectious agents associated with shearling bedpads effect of laundering with detergent disinfectant combinations on staphylococcus aureus and pseudomonas aeruginosa	Potentially infectious agents associated with shear bed pads have the effect of washing with combinations of detergent disinfectants on staphylococcus aureus and pseudomonas aeruginosa.
16	lactic acid utilization by the cutaneous micrococcaceae	Use of l' lactic acid by skin micrococcaceae.
16	rapid identification and typing of herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 by a direct immunofluorescence technique	Rapid identification and typing of viruses; herpes simplex types 1 and 2 by direct immunofluorescence.
16	the distribution of antigenic determinants in rat skin collagen	Distribution of antigenic determinants in rat skin collagen.
16	cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity i a new look at the jones mote reaction general characteristics	Basophilic skin hypersensitivity i a new look at the general features of the Jones mote reaction.
16	the use of an unnatural prostaglandin in the termination of pregnancy	Use of unnatural prostaglandin during pregnancy termination.
16	an analysis of graft versus host disease in syrian hamsters i the epidermolytic syndrome description and studies on its procurement	An analysis of the relationship between graft and Syrian hamster host disease was carried out as part of epidermolytic syndrome description and acquisition studies.
16	an analysis of graft versus host disease in syrian hamsters ii the epidermolytic syndrome studies on its pathogenesis	An analysis of the graft versus the disease of the host in the Syrian hamster ii studies of the epidermolytic syndrome on its pathogenesis.
16	implantation transplantation and epithelial mesenchymal relationships in the rat uterus	Transplantation and epithelial mesenchymal intercourse in the rat uterus.
16	further studies on metachromasia in cultured human fibroblasts staining of glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharides by alcian blue in salt solutions	D' further metachromasis studies in cultured human fibroblasts staining mucopolysaccharide glycosaminoglycans with d&apos blue; alcian in saline solutions.
16	melanin pigmentation an in vivo model for studies of melanosome kinetics within keratinocytes	Melanin pigmentation is an in vivo model for keratinocyte melanosome kinetics.
16	clinical evaluation of kethoxal against cutaneous herpes simplex	Clinical evaluation of kethoxal for apos; herpes simplex.
16	immunobiological activity of cell wall antigens of staphylococcus aureus	Immunobiological activity of staphylococcus aureus (staphylococcus aureus) cell walls.
16	cellular reaction in the footpad and draining lymph nodes of mice induced by mycobacterial fractions and bcg bacilli	Cellular response in mouse pedal cushion and drainant lymph nodes induced by mycobacterial fractions and bcg bacilli.
16	united states standard diphtheria toxin for the schick text and the erythema potency assay for the schick text dose	States @-@U.S. Standard diphtheria toxin for schick text and l&apos potency test; erythema for schick text dose schick text.
16	cell mediated hypersensitivity in rabbits infected with trypanosoma brucei and trypanosoma rhodesiense	Cell-mediated hypersensitivity in trypanosoma brucei and trypanosoma rhodesiense infected rabbits.
16	the preparation of an alkali soluble collagen from demineralized bone	Preparation of alkali-soluble collagen from demineralized bone.
16	blood flow characteristics and tissue nutrition in apparently ischaemic feet	Blood flow characteristics and tissue nutrition in the apparently ischemic feet.
16	immunological evidence for an inactive precursor of collagen proline hydroxylase in cultured fibroblasts	Immunologic evidence of d' an inactive precursor of collagen proline hydroxylase in cultured fibroblasts.
16	prolonged survival of glutaraldehyde treated skin homografts	Prolonged survival of homografts treated with glutaraldehyde.
16	the melanocyte model colchicine like effects of other antimitotic agents	Melanocyte colchicine model as the effects of other antimitotic agents.
16	polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis of corynebacterium diphtheriae a possible epidemiological aid	Corynebacterium diphtheriae polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis, a possible epidemiological aid.
16	the role of passenger leukocytes in the anomalous survival of neonatal skin grafts in mice	The role of passenger leukocytes in the abnormal survival of neonatal skin transplants in mice.
16	intracellular enzymes and protein synthesis in rabbit skin after thermal injury	Intracellular enzymes and protein synthesis in rabbit skin following thermal injury.
16	effects of ranatensin a polypeptide from frog skin on isolated smooth muscle	Effects of ranatensin, a frog skin polypeptide on isolated smooth muscle.
16	serum stimulated release of cell contacts and the initiation of growth in contact inhibited chick fibroblasts	Serum stimulates release of cell contacts and l' initiation of contact growth inhibits chick fibroblasts.
16	characterization of human platelet vascular permeability enhancing activity	Characterization of apos; activity enhancing human platelet vascular permeability.
16	metabolism of testosterone 14 c by cultured human cells	Metabolism of testosterone 14 c by cultured human cells.
16	morphogenesis of rabbit fibroma virus correlation with pathogenesis of the skin lesion	Morphogenesis of the correlation between rabbit fibroma virus and skin lesion pathogenesis.
16	the effects of glycols on the renaturation of soluble collagen	The effects of glycols on soluble collagen renaturation.
16	transport and metabolism of sarcosine in hypersarcosinemic and normal phenotypes	Transport and metabolism of sarcosin in hypersarcosinemic and normal phenotypes.
16	natural history of impetigo i site sequence of acquisition and familial patterns of spread of cutaneous streptococci	Natural history; impetigo i sequence of the site; acquisition and family patterns of spread of streptococci.
16	natural history of impetigo ii etiologic agents and bacterial interactions	Natural history of l' impetigo ii etiological agents and bacterial interactions.
16	hypohidrotic ectodermal dysplasia with multiple associated anomalies	Hypohidrotic ectodermal dysplasia associated with multiple abnormalities.
16	xeroderma pigmentosum and pigmented xerodermoid	Xeroderma pigmentosum and xerodermoid pigment.
16	lipoid proteinosis	Lipoid proteinosis.
16	pilosebaceous abnormalities in apert type acrocephalosyndactyly	Pilosebaceous abnormalities in acrocephalosyndactyly type acrocephalosyndactyly.
16	syndrome of unilateral ectromelia psoriasis and central nervous system anomalies	Unilateral ectromelic psoriasis syndrome and central nervous system abnormalities.
16	investigation of a case of oculocutaneous albinism	Investigation of a skin-related albinism.
16	the biology of keratinization	The biology of keratinization?
16	possible genetic heterogeneity of x linked ichthyosis	Potential genetic heterogeneity of x-linked ichthyosis.
16	familial focal facial dermal dysplasia	Family focal dermal dysplasia.
16	lysyl protocollagen hydroxylase deficiency in fibroblasts from siblings with hydroxylysine deficient collagen	Lysyl protocollagen hydroxylase deficiency in sibling fibroblasts with a hydroxylysine-deficient collagen.
16	early reactions of the subcutaneous tissue to repeated injections of carcinogens in aqueous solutions	Early tissue reactions under-skin to repeated injections of carcinogens in aqueous solutions.
16	the induction of adenomata in mouse lung homografts by chemical carcinogens	Lapos; induction of apoes; adenomas in mouse lung homografts by chemical carcinogens.
16	hydroxylysine in the n terminal regions of the 1 and 2 chains of various collagens	L' hydroxylysine in the n-terminal regions of chains 1 and 2 of various types of collagen.
16	the effects of certain glycols substituted glycols and related organic solvents on the thermal stability of soluble collagen	The effects of certain glycol-substituted glycols and related organic solvents on the thermal stability of the soluble collagen.
16	changes in plasma volume and protein content during exposures of working men to various temperatures before and after acclimatization to heat separation of the roles of cutaneous and skeletal muscle circulation	Changes in plasma volume and protein content during pregnancy; exposure of workers to various temperatures before and after pregnancy; acclimation to thermal separation of skeletal muscle circulation and skin circulation.
16	connective tissue synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in cell culture	Sclerodermal skin fibroblasts synthesize connective tissue in cell culture.
16	aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase and polycyclic hydrocarbon tumorigenesis effect of the enzyme inhibitor 7 8 benzoflavone on tumorigenesis and macromolecule binding	Aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase and polycyclic hydrocarbon tumorigenesis effect of enzyme inhibitor 7-8 benzoflavone on tumorigenesis and macromolecule binding.
16	fine structural observations relating to the production of color by the iridophores of a lizard anolis carolinensis	Fine structural observations on the production of colour by an anolis carolinensis iridophores.
16	oyster ciliary inhibition by cystic fibrosis culture medium	Ciliary inhibition of oysters by cystic fibrosis culture media.
16	induction of benzo pyrene hydroxylase in human skin	Induction of the benzo pyrene hydroxylase in human skin.
16	deficiency of alpha l fucosidase	Alpha-fucosidase deficiency.
16	the survival of salmonellas on finger tips and transfer of the organisms to foods	Survival of Salmonella on finger tips and food transfer of organisms.
16	excretion of sterols from the skin of normal and hypercholesterolemic humans implications for sterol balance studies	L' excretion of sterols by the skin of normal and hypercholesterolemic humans has implications for studies of l' sterol balance.
16	the isolation and amino acid and carbohydrate composition of polymeric collagens prepared from various human tissues	The isolation and amino acid and carbohydrate composition of collagen polymers prepared from various human tissues.
16	compartmentalization of spermine and spermidine in the herpes simplex virion	Comparison of spermine and spermidine in herpes simplex virion.
16	cardiovascular reflex responses to cutaneous and visceral stimuli in spinal man	Cardiovascular responses to both skin and visceral stimuli in the spinal cord.
16	isolation and identification of pharmacologically active amino acids in skin and their structure activity relationship on the guinea pig ileum	Isolation and identification of pharmacologically active amino acids in the skin and their relationship to d' structural activity on guinea pig ileum.
16	histological and ultrastructural findings in a case of the s zary syndrome	Histological and ultrastructural observations in the case of a case of szary syndrome.
16	dna synthesis in mixed cultures of rat leukocytes and allogeneic dissociated skin cells	Synthesis of DNA synthesis in mixed cultures of allogeneic dissociated rat leukocytes and skin cells.
16	uridine diphosphate glucuronic acid production and utilization in various tissues actively synthesizing glycosaminoglycans	Production and use of apos; glucuronic acid uridine diphosphate in various tissues actively synthesizing glycosaminoglycans.
16	prostaglandin biosynthesis by human skin and its inhibition by corticosteroids	The biosynthesis of prostaglandins by human skin and its inhibition by corticosteroids.
16	permeability and enterotoxic factors of nonagglutinable vibrios vibrio alcaligenes and vibrio parahaemolyticus	Permeability and enterotoxic factors of nonagglutinable vibrions vibrions and parahaemolyticus vibrions.
16	infections in a hospital for patients with diseases of the skin	Infections in a hospital setting for patients with skin diseases.
16	critical role of the carbohydrate side chains of collagen in platelet aggregation	Critical role of collagen carbohydrate side chains in the apos; platelet aggregation.
16	cuticle deposition in imaginal disks effects of juvenile hormone and fat body in vitro	Depositing cuticles in imaginary discs effects of juvenile hormone and body fat in vitro.
16	pepsin treatment of avian skin collagen effects on solubility subunit composition and aggregation properties	Fine treatment of collagenic effects of d&apos skin; bird on composition of sub@solubility units and d&apos properties; aggregation.
16	serologically demonstrable alloantigens of mouse epidermal cells	Helantigens serologically demonstrable mouse epidermal cells.
16	further observations on the pathogenesis of acne	Additional observations on pathogenesis of acne.
16	the erythrasma microorganism in situ studies using the skin surface biopsy technique	L' in-situ study of micro-@organism erythrasma at apos; assistance with skin surface biopsy technique.
16	inhibition of prostaglandin biosynthesis by corticosteroids	Inhibition of prostaglandin biosynthesis by corticosteroids.
16	simulation of genetic mucopolysaccharidoses in normal human fibroblasts by alteration of ph of the medium	Simulation of the genetic mucopolysaccharidoses in normal human fibroblasts by alteration of medium ph.
16	reducible crosslinks in hydroxylysine deficient collagens of a heritable disorder of connective tissue	Reductible crosslink in hydroxylysine deficiency collagenens of a Heritable Disorder of Connective Tissues.
16	steam versus hot water scalding in reducing bacterial loads on the skin of commercially processed poultry	Steam versus hot water by reducing bacterial loads on commercially processed poultry skin.
16	skin trauma in patients receiving systemic corticosteroid therapy	Skin trauma in patients receiving systemic corticosteroid therapy.
16	new in vitro test for ige mediated hypersensitivity in man	New in vitro test for posos; skin-mediated hypersensitivity in men.
16	isolation of a mycoplasma from sarcoid tissue	Isolate mycoplasma from sarcoid tissue.
16	coeliac disease vasculitis and cryoglobulinaemia	Celiac vasculitis and cryoglobulinemia?
16	immunologic tolerance role of the regional lymph node	The role of regional lymph node immunological tolerance.
16	tests for antibody and cell mediated hypersensitivity to trypanosome antigens in rabbits infected with trypanosoma congolense	Antibody and antibody tests; cell-mediated hypersensitivity to the trypanosome antigens in rabbits infected with the trypanosome congolense.
16	an inherited defect affecting the tricarboxylic acid cycle in a patient with congenital lactic acidosis	A hereditary abnormality affecting the liver cycle; congenital lactic acidosis; tricarboxylic acid in a patient with d*apos.
16	cholesterol distribution in the bulk tissues of man variation with age	Distributions of cholesterol in the raw tissues of the apos; men vary with the apos; age.
16	the viability of fetal skin of abortuses induced by saline or prostaglandin	The fetal skin viability of saline- or prostaglandin-induced abortions.
16	the release of collagenase as an inactive proenzyme by bone explants in culture	Collagenase release as an inactive proenzyme from bone explants in culture.
16	uptake of 63 ni 2 from its complexes with proteins and other ligands by mouse dermal fibroblasts in vitro	L' absorption of 63 or 2 protein and d&apos complexes; other ligands by mouse dermal fibroblasts in vitro.
16	social interaction and wounding in the genesis of spontaneous murine amyloidosis	Injury and social interaction in the genesis of amyloidosis spontaneous murine.
16	adenovirus susceptibility to human interferon during one step replication	Apos-susceptible adenovirus; human interferon during apos; one-step replication.
16	yeasts in a hospital for patients with skin diseases	You know, yeasts in a hospital for patients with skin diseases.
16	use of 4 per cent chlorhexidine detergent solution hibiscrub and other methods of skin disinfection	Chlorhexidine detergent and other skin disinfection methods are used as a solution; hibiscrub containing 4% chlorhexidine detergent and dapos.
16	diphtheria infection in north west canada 1969 1970 and 1971	Diphtheria infection in northern Canada, 1969-1970 and 1971.
16	simulated human skin scales	Simulated scales in human skin.
16	patterns of reflex excitability change after widespread cutaneous stimulation in man	The patterns of reflex excitability change after extensive stimulation of the skin in humans.
16	the effect of increasing the innervation field sizes of nerves on their reflex response time in salamanders	L' effect of apos; increase of the size of the field d' innervation of the nerves on their reflex response time in salamanders.
16	input from muscle and cutaneous nerves of the hand and forearm to neurones of the precentral gyrus of baboons and monkeys	Bringing muscle and cutaneous nerves from the hand and hands; fore-arms to pre-central gyrus neurons from baboons and monkeys.
16	delayed manifestation of ultraviolet reaction in the guinea pig caused by anti inflammatory drugs	The manifestation of the ultraviolet reaction in the guinea pig has been delayed by anti-@-@inflammatory drugs.
16	effect of alcohols and neutral salt on the thermal stability of soluble and precipitated acid soluble collagen	The effect of neutral alcohols and salts on the thermal stability of soluble and precipitin-soluble collagen; acid.
16	sanfilippo syndrome profound deficiency of alpha acetylglucosaminidase activity in organs and skin fibroblasts from type b patients	Sanfilippo syndrome: profound lacid deficiency; alpha acetylglucosaminidase activity in organs and skin fibroblasts of patients of type b.
16	the defect in the hunter syndrome deficiency of sulfoiduronate sulfatase	Hunter syndrome sulfoiduronate sulfatase deficiency.
16	characterization of cystic fibrosis factor and its interaction with human immunoglobulin	Characterization of cystic fibrosis factor and its interaction with the human immunoglobulin.
16	development of an equine herpesvirus in two cell culture systems light and electron microscopy	Development of an equine herpesvirus in two light and electron microscopic cell culture systems.
16	occurrence of bombesin and alytesin in extracts of the skin of three european discoglossid frogs and pharmacological actions of bombesin on extravascular smooth muscle	Presence of bombesin and d'apos; allytesin in skin extracts of three discoglossided European frogs and pharmacological action on extravascular smooth muscle.
16	value of desiccated swabs for streptococcal epidemiology in the field	Value of dried swabs for dosage; epidemiology of streptococci in the field.
16	characterization of staphylococcus aureus in a pediatric burn unit	Characterization of staph infection aureus in a pediatric burn unit.
16	somatotopic organization of vibrissal responses in the ventro basal complex of the rat thalamus	A somatotopic organization of the vibrissal responses in the ventro complex-basal of the rat thalamus.
16	perinatal coagulopathies complicating fetal blood sampling	Perinatal coagulopathies complicating the collection of fetal blood.
16	the isolation of glycoproteins from bovine achilles tendon and their interaction with collagen	L' isolation of bovine achenes and their interaction with collagen.
16	delayed hypersensitivity reactions provoked by ribosomes from acid fast bacilli i ribosomal isolation characterization delayed hypersensitivity and specificity	Delayed hypersensitivity reactions caused by fast acidic bacilli ribosomes have delayed characterization of the hypersensitivity and specificity.
16	a collagenase in extracts of the invertebrate bipalium kewense	A collagenase in extracts from the invertebrate bipalium kewense.
16	amyloidogenesis in healing wound electron microscopic studies of biopsied wounds in macular amyloidosis	Microscopic electron wound healing studies of biopsied wounds in macular amyloidosis.
16	histochemical investigation of the activity of oxidoreductases in the skin lesions of lepromatous leprosy patients	Histochemical study of the apos; oxidoreductase activity in leper skin lesions.
16	a test for the determination of competency in clearing bacilli in leprosy patients	A test to determine proficiency in the elimination of leprosy bacilli in lepers.
16	activation of the viral genome in simian virus 40 transformed nonpermissive cells by permissive cell extracts	The activation of the viral genome of simian virus 40 transforms the cells that are not allowed by the permissive cell extracts.
16	effects of heating and cooling the spinal cord and medulla oblongata on thermoregulation in monkeys	Effects of spinal cord and spinal bulb heating and cooling on thermoregulation in monkeys.
16	antibody responses to group a streptococcal infections in the hamster	Antibody reactions to group an infection in the hamster.
16	differences in the urea extracted proteins of mouse epidermis and squamous cell carcinomata determined by fluorescence microscopy	The differences in the proteins extracted from the urea of the mouse epidermis and the carcinomas of the squamous cells were determined by fluorescence microscopy.
16	fabry s disease differentiation between two forms of galactosidase by myoinositol	The differentiation of Fabry's disease between two forms of galactosidase by myoinositol.
16	detection of inborn errors of metabolism galactosemia	Detection of innate errors of galactosemia metabolism.
16	menkes kinky hair disease further definition of the defect in copper transport	Perverse hair disease Menues further definition of the disease; abnormality in the transport of copper.
16	sanfilippo disease type b enzyme replacement and metabolic correction in cultured fibroblasts	Sanfilippo disease type b enzyme replacement and metabolism correction in culture fibroblasts.
16	the hurler syndrome a study of cultured lymphoid cell lines	A study of cultured lymphoid cell lines.
16	effects of intrabrachial arterial infusion of pyruvate on forearm tissue metabolism interrelationships between pyruvate lactate and alanine	Effects of the intrabranchal arterial infusion of pyruvate on the metabolism of apos tissues; before-interactions between pyruvate lactate and alanine.
16	spinal pathways projecting to the cerebral first somatosensory area in the monkey	Spinal pathways projecting to the first zone of somatosensory brain in monkeys.
16	selective destruction of skin permeability activity in cholera toxin effect of acid on cholera enterotoxin	Selective destruction of dosage; skin permeability activity in dosage form; effect of acid cholera toxin on dosage form; cholera enterotoxin.
16	effect of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on cell proliferation	The effect of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate on cell proliferation.
16	subcutaneous bacteria in turkey carcasses	Bacteria under-cutaneous in turkey carcasses.
16	the molecule microscope a new instrument for biological and biomedical research	The molecular microscope is a novel tool for biological and biomedical research.
16	two actions of cyclic amp on melanosome movement in frog skin dissection by cytochalasin b	Cyclic Amp on the movement of frog skin melanosomes during cytochalasin b dissection.
16	familial hypercholesterolemia identification of a defect in the regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity associated with overproduction of cholesterol	Familial hyperpercholesterolemia, identification of apos; a defect in the regulation of 3 methylglycerol hydroxy 3 coenzyme a reductase activity associated with overproduction of cholesterol.
16	experience with an image analyzing computer in virus plaque measurements	Apo experience; apo analysis; computer images to measure viral plaques.
16	cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity in contact sensitized guinea pigs i transfer with immune serum	Basophilic skin hypersensitivity on contact with sensitized guinea pigs and transfer to immune serum.
16	interferon production by human cells in vitro	Production of ectomycorrhizal cells by human cells in vitro.
16	stimulus response functions of rapidly adapting mechanoreceptors in human glabrous skin area	Stimulation functions of mechanoreceptor response; rapid adaptation in the glabrous region of human skin.
16	production of high titered interferon in cultures of human diploid cells	Production of high-title interferon in human diploid cell cultures.
16	schistosoma mansoni infection in mice depleted of thymus dependent lymphocytes i eosinophilia and immunologic responses to a schistosomal egg preparation	Mansoni Schistosome infection in mice lacking thymus-dependent lymphocytes, eosinophilia and immunological responses to the preparation of a schistosome egg.
16	improved experimental model for measuring skin degerming activity on the human hand	Improved experimental model for skin measurement; skin wiggle activity on human hand.
16	reflex vascular responses to left ventricular outflow obstruction and activation of ventricular baroreceptors in dogs	Reflex vascular responses to apo; left ventricular output obstruction and apo; activation of ventricular bar receptors in the dog.
16	a guide to bullous lesions of the skin	Guide to bubble lesions on the skin.
16	regulation of cholesterol metabolism in the dog ii effects of complete bile diversion and of cholesterol feeding on pool sizes of tissue cholesterol measured at autopsy	Regulation of cholesterol metabolism in dogs ii effects of a complete diversion of bile and cholesterol; size of tissue cholesterol pools measured at baseline; necropsy.
16	effect of copper containing intrauterine contraceptive devices on human cells in culture	Effect of copper containing intra-uterine contraceptives-on human cells in culture.
16	role of the clotting system in cell mediated hypersensitivity i fibrin deposition in delayed skin reactions in man	Role of clotting system in apo; cell-mediated hypersensitivity, fibrin deposition, in delayed skin reactions in men.
16	indirect cutaneous immunofluorescence ii clinical significance	Immunofluorescence of the skin ii Clinical importance ii.
16	transient increase in capillary permeability induced by clostridium perfringens type a enterotoxin	Transient increase in capillary permeability induced by Clostridium perfringens type a enterotoxin.
16	chromosome studies in induced abortions	L' Chromosome studies in induced abortions.
16	biosynthesis of prostaglandin e 2 in human skin subcellular localization and inhibition by unsaturated fatty acids and anti inflammatory drugs	The biosynthesis of prostaglandin in subcellular localization of human skin and its inhibition by unsaturated fatty acids and anti-@inflammatory drugs.
16	color changes unusual melanosomes and a new pigment from leaf frogs	The color changes the unusual melanosomes and a new pigment of leaf frogs.
16	immunity to syphilis i passive transfer in rabbits with hyperimmune serum	Immunity to syphilis infection i passive transfer in rabbits with hyperimmune serum.
16	quantitative aspects of pinocytosis and the intracellular fate of n acetyl alpha d glucosaminidase in sanfilippo b fibroblasts	Quantitative aspects of pinocytosis and the intracellular fate of glucosaminidase acetyl alpha in sanfilippo fibroblasts b.
16	cultured skin fibroblasts in storage disorders an analysis of ultrastructural features	Cutaneous fibroblasts grown in storage disorders an analysis of the ultrastructural characteristics.
16	a sex linked defect in the cross linking of collagen and elastin associated with the mottled locus in mice	A sex-related defect in collagen and elastin cross-linking associated with the labelled locus in mice.
16	influence of medroxypregesteroneacetate on testosterone metabolism by cultured human fibroblasts a model for drug steroid interaction	A model for drug-induced steroid interaction in human culture fibroblasts.
16	changes in the fungal autoflora of apollo astronauts	Changes in apollo astronauts' fungal autoflora.
16	a specific collagenase from rabbit fibroblasts in monolayer culture	Specific collagenase from rabbit fibroblasts in monolayer culture.
16	attempt to immunize guinea pigs against leukemia by skin scarification with leukemic cell suspensions	Attempting to immunize guinea pigs against leukemia by skin scarification using a leukemia cell suspension.
16	infectious dna from herpes simplex virus infectivity of double stranded and single stranded molecules	Apos infectivity; apos virus infectious DNA; herpes simplex double-stranded and single-stranded molecules.
16	the acquisition of specificity in cutaneous sensory neurons a reconsideration of the integumental specification hypothesis	L' acquisition of specificity in skin sensory neurons (SENS) re-evaluates the apos; hypothesis of the integumentary specification.
16	virulence of two mastitis strains of staphylococcus aureus in bovine skin enhancement by growth in high carbohydrate high salt medium or in raw milk	Virulence of two strains of staphylococcus aureus mastitis in rabbits; improved bovine skin by growth in high-carbohydrate and salt medium or raw milk.
16	inhibition of cell growth in the g1 phase by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Inhibition of cell growth in the g1 phase by the adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate.
16	lymph flow and lymph protein concentration in the skin and muscle of the rabbit hind limb	Lymphatic flow and concentration of lymphatic proteins in rabbit skin and hindlimb muscles.
16	clonal selection attenuation and differentiation in an in vitro model of hyperplasia	In vitro attenuation and differentiation of clonal selection in a d&apos model.
16	the role of cathepsin d in the pathogenesis of tuberculosis a histochemical study employing unlabeled antibodies and the peroxidase antiperoxidase complex	The role of cathepsin d in the pathogenesis of tuberculosis has been the subject of a histochemical study using unlabeled antibodies and peroxidase complex.
16	relationship of unkeratinized skin to bovine fetal mummification an hypothesis	The relationship between unkeratinized skin and bovine fetal mummification (BFM) is hypothesized.
16	follicular contact dermatitis due to coloured permanent pressed sheets	Follicular contact dermatitis caused by permanent and permanent coloured pressed sheets.
16	antinociceptive action of bradykinin and related kinins of larger molecular weights by the intraventricular route	Antinociceptive action of bradykinin and related higher molecular weight kinins via the intraventricular route.
16	the contribution of membrane hyperpolarization to adaptation and conduction block in sensory neurones of the leech	The contribution of membrane hyperpolarization to adaptation and block of conduction in the sensory neurons of the leech.
16	relative rates of transcapillary movement of free thyroxine protein bound thyroxine thyroxine binding proteins and albumin	Relative rates of transcapillary movement of thyroxine-free proteins bound the thyroxine-binding proteins to l' thyroxine albumin.
16	assignment of three gene loci pgk hgprt g6pd to the long arm of the human x chromosome by somatic cell genetics	Assigning three pgk hgprt g6pd gene loci to the long arm of the human x chromosome by somatic cell genetics.
16	immunoglobulin in clinically uninvolved skin in systemic lupus erythematosus association with renal disease	Lapos; clinically uninvolved immune globulin in skin; association of disseminated lupus erythematosus with renal disease.
16	the immunopathology of epidermolysis bullosa acquisita	The immunopathology of acquired epidermosis bullosa.
16	recommended daily allowances for vitamin c	Recommended Daily Allowances for Vitamin c.
16	deficient dna repair in human progeroid cells	Deficient apo repair; DNA in human progeroid cells.
16	a guide to the histological identification of fungi in tissues	Tissue foliar guide; histological identification of fungi in tissue.
16	vascular leakage through intraendothelial channels induced by cholera toxin in the skin of guinea pigs	Vascular leakage in the intraendothelial ducts caused by cholera-induced toxin in guinea pig skin.
16	collagen biosynthesis in nonfibroblastic cell lines	Collagen biosynthesis in non-fibroblastic cell lines.
16	effectiveness of septisol antiseptic foam as a surgical scrub agent	The effectiveness of the antiseptic septic foam as a surgical washing agent.
16	isolation and characterization of corynebacteria from burned children	Isolation and characterization of corynebacteria in burnt children.
16	evidence for fetal antigen in human sarcoma	Evidence of the presence of fetal antigen in human sarcoma.
16	collagen polymorphism characterization of molecules with the chain composition alpha 1 3 03 in human tissues	Characterization of collagen polymorphism of alpha 1–0 chain composition molecules in human tissue.
16	bicycle injuries in children	Bicycle injuries in children?
16	evidence that axoplasmic transport of trophic factors is involved in the regulation of peripheral nerve fields in salamanders	Evidence suggests that trophic factor axoplasmic transport plays a role in the regulation of peripheral nerve fields in salamanders.
16	extracellular factor synthesized by bacillus cereus which evokes a dermal reaction in guinea pigs	This is an extracellular factor synthesized by the cereus bacillus that suggests a dermal reaction in guinea pigs.
16	the importance of the included serum proteins in the immune response in rabbits to a rat skin xenograft	The importance of serum proteins in the immune response of rabbits to rat skin xenograft exposure was emphasized.
16	neutralization studies with marek s disease virus and turkey herpesvirus	Neutralization studies with whiting virus and herpes simplex virus.
16	evidence for complement activation via the alternate pathway in skin diseases i herpes gestationis systemic lupus erythematosus and bullous pemphigoid	Evidence of lupus; activation of the alternative complement pathway in gestation herpes gupus systemic and bulleous pemphigoid skin diseases.
16	cartilage collagen a staggered substructure in reconstituted fibrils	Collagen cartilaginous is a sub-offset structure in reconstituted fibrils.
16	pain perception modification of threshold of intolerance and cortical potentials by cutaneous stimulation	Change in the perception of pain threshold; intolerance and cortical potentials by skin stimulation.
16	prostaglandin activity in human cutaneous inflammation detection by radioimmunoassay	Lapos; prostaglandin activity in detection of apos; human skin inflammation by radioimmunoassay.
16	microfilaments in epidermal cancer cells	Microfilaments in epidermal cancer cells.
16	systemic lupus erythematosus studies of the antibodies bound to skin	Studies of systemic lupus erythematosus of skin-bound antibodies.
16	phage typing of coagulase negative staphylococci and micrococci	Lysotyping of staphylococci and coagulase-negative micrococci.
16	trophic skin ulceration of leprosy skin and serum zinc concentrations	Trophic skin ulceration of leprosy and serum levels of zinc.
16	one death and a cluster of febrile complications related to saline abortions	One death and a cluster of febrile complications from saline abortions.
16	daytime variation in the density of onchocerca volvulus microfilariae in human skin	Diurnal variation of microfilariae in human skin; onchocerca volvulus.
16	skin tests with influenza virus	Skin tests with hepatitis C virus; influenza.
16	dispersal and transfer of staphylococcus aureus in an isolation ward for burned patients	Dispersal and transfer of Staphylococcus aureus to an apo ward; isolation for burn patients.
16	defect in conversion of procollagen to collagen in a form of ehlers danlos syndrome	Failure to convert procollagen to collagen in the form of elixirum danlos.
16	preoperative sterilization of the perineum a comparison of six antiseptics	Preoperative sterilization of the perineum by six antiseptics.
16	cutaneous and ocular reactions to practolol	Skin and eye reactions to practolol.
16	cell mediated immunity in humans during viral infection i effect of rubella on dermal hypersensitivity phytohemagglutinin response and t lymphocyte numbers	Cell-mediated immunity in humans during apo placenta; viral infection effects of rubella; phytohemagglutinin skin hypersensitivity response and lymphocyte t lymphocyte count.
16	development of a purified cholera toxoid ii preparation of a stable antigenic toxoid by reaction of purified toxin with glutaraldehyde	Development of apos; purified cholera anatoxin ii preparation of apos; stable antigenic anatoxin by reaction of purified toxin with glutaraldehyde.
16	relationship of antimicrobial cellular immunity to delayed hypersensitivity in listeriosis	Relationship between drug; antimicrobial cell immunity and immunos; delayed hypersensitivity in listeriosis.
16	skin testing of guinea pigs and footpad testing of mice with a new antigen for detecting delayed hypersensitivity to cryptococcus neoformans	Guinea pig skin tests and mouse foot pad tests with a new antigen to detect delayed hypersensitivity to cryptococcus neoformans.
16	saphenous nerve injury caused by stripping of the long saphenous vein	Damage to the saphenous nerve caused by stripping the long saphenous vein.
16	instability of polymeric skin collagen in osteogenesis imperfecta	Instability of polymeric skin collagen in inferior osteogenesis.
16	chemical characterization of isolated epidermal desmosomes	Chemical characterization of isolated epidermal desmosomes.
16	uptake and release of bilirubin by skin	Acute absorption and release of bilirubin through the skin.
16	role of sweat in accumulation of orally administered griseofulvin in skin	The role of sweat in the accumulation of oral griseofulvin in the skin.
16	cutaneous reflexes in small muscles of the hand	Thin reflexes on the skin in the small muscles of the hand.
16	onchocerciasis in canada	Onchocerciasis in Canada.
16	skin scales among airborne particles	Skin scales among particles suspended in the air.
16	elimination of bacteria from dogs with antibiotics	Elimination of bacteria in antibiotic-treated dogs.
16	cytotoxic activity of mycobacterium ulcerans	Cytotoxic mycobacterium ulcerans activity.
16	the behaviour of carcinoma of the large bowel in man following transplantation into immune deprived mice	The behaviour of large intestinal carcinoma (LIC) in men following transplantation in immunocompromised mice.
16	tetracycline and acne vulgaris a clinical and laboratory investigation	Tetracycline and acne vulgaris are laboratory and clinical studies.
16	from phisohex to hibiscrub	Phisohex to hibiscrub?
16	sj gren larsson syndrome in two sibs with peripheral nerve involvement and bisalbuminaemia	Pancar larsson sj syndrome in two siblings with peripheral nerve involvement and bisalbuminemia.
16	retention of 14c labeled tuberculin purified protein derivative in the skin of sensitized and nonsensitized animals	Retention of the purified protein derivative by 14c-labelled tuberculin in the skin of sensitized and non-sensitized animals.
16	effect of estrogen therapy on climacteric symptoms and tissue changes	Effect of estrogen replacement therapy on climacteric symptoms and tissue changes.
16	dna repair in potorous tridactylus	Apos repair; potent tridactylus DNA.
16	distribution of serratia species in clinical specimens	Distribution of serratia species in the clinical specimens.
16	regulation of blood flow in paget s disease of bone	The regulation of blood circulation in paget bone disease.
16	responses in human a and c fibres to repeated electrical intradermal stimulation	Human a- and c-fiber responses to repeated electrical intradermal stimulation.
16	naegleria another pathogenic ameba studies in germfree guinea pigs	Naegleria, another study on apos; amoebae pathogenesis in germless guinea pigs.
16	human mycobacterium ulcerans infections developing at sites of trauma to skin	Human ulcer mycobacterial infections developing on sites of skin trauma.
16	hexachlorophene in mice effects after long term percutaneous applications	Long-term effects of hexachlorophene on mice after percutaneous application.
16	the effect of travase on heat injured skin	L' effect of the travase on heat-injured skin.
16	the pathology of tangier disease a light and electron microscopic study	Light and electron microscopy were used to study the pathology of tangential disease.
16	mucous metaplasia and gap junctions in the vitamin a acid treated skin tumor keratoacanthoma	Mucous metastaplasia and gap junctions in the vitamin-a-acid-treated keratoacanthoma skin tumor.
16	dynamic telethermography in mammary carcinoma	Dynamic telethermography in breast carcinoma.
16	afferent connections to the fast conduction pathway in the central nervous system of the leech hirudo medicinalis	Connections associated with the fast-conducting pathway in the central nervous system of the hirudo medicinalis leech.
16	testosterone 5alpha reductase in rat skin homogenates measurement in the skin at various anatomical sites in males and females	Testosterone 5alpha reductase in rat skin homogenates measures in the skin of males and females at a variety of anatomical sites.
16	changes in the mitotic cycle induced by alpha solanine	Changes in mitotic cycle induced by alpha solanine.
16	cutaneous everted nipple ureterostomy	Skin urethostomy of the nipple with fraying.
16	tyrosinases in rana pipiens purification and physical properties	Tyrosinases in rana pipiens purification and physical properties.
16	osmotic gradients across snail epidermis evidence for a water barrier	Omotic gradients across the epidermis of the snails indicate the existence of apoes; a barrier to apos; water.
16	evidence of cholecystokinin release by bombesin in the dog	Evidence of release of cholecystokinin from bombesin in dogs.
16	arteriosclerotic changes within the diabetic oral vasculature	Arteriosclerotic changes in the oral diabetic vascular system.
16	ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iii determination of the volumes of nuclei and cytoplasm of cells in murine epidermis	Ultrastructural studies of the keratinized epithelia of mice iii determine the volumes of the nuclei and cytoplasm of the cells in the mouse epidermis.
16	epidermal chalone and cyclic amp an in vivo study	Epidermal chalone and cyclic bulb, in vivo study.
16	the effect of vitamin a on growth and differentiation of human keratinocytes in vitro	In addition, vitamin A can affect the growth and differentiation of human keratinocytes in vitro.
16	in vitro epidermal cell proliferation in rat skin plugs	In vitro proliferation of epidermal cells in rat skin plugs.
16	glycocalyx of epidermal cells in vitro demonstration and enzymatic removal	Epidermal cell glycocalyx in vitro and enzymatic removal.
16	ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iv quantitative studies of lysosomes	Ultrastructural studies of keratinized mouse epithelia iv quantitative studies of lysosomes.
16	persistent individual differences in the bacterial flora of the skin of the forehead numbers of propionibacteria	Persistent individual differences in skin bacterial flora of the number of propionibacteria in the forehead.
16	ultrastructural localization of in vivo bound immunoglobulins in bullous pemphigoid a preliminary report	A preliminary report on the ultrastructural localization of immunoglobulins bound in vivo in pemphigoid bulldozers was prepared.
16	congenital circumscribed hypomelanosis a characterization based on electron microscopic study of tuberous sclerosis nevus depigmentosus and piebaldism	Congenital circumscribed hypermelanosis, an apos-based characterization of tuberous sclerosis nevus depigmentosus and piebaldism.
16	morphometric evaluation of sebaceous gland volume in intact castrated and testosterone treated rats	Morphometric evaluation of sebaceous gland volume in intact, testosterone-treated, castrated rats.
16	treatment of variola major with cytosine arabinoside	Treatment of major smallpox infection with cytosine arabinoside.
16	normal and branched alkanes from cast skins of the grasshopper schistocerca vaga scudder	Normal and branched alkanes from grasshopper grasshopper schistocerca vaga scudder flows.
16	xenoplastic combinations between chick chorionic epithelium and fetal monkey dermis	Xenoplastic combinations between chicken epithelium and monkey fetal dermis.
16	subepidermal deposition of immunoglobulin in nzb nzw f hybrid mice	Subepidermal deposition of immunoglobulin in nzb nzw f hybrid mice.
16	acute destruction of rat skin grafts by alloantisera	The acute destruction of rat skin grafts... by alloantiers.
16	the transfer of tolerance to dncb contact sensitivity in guinea pigs by parabiosis	Perabiosis transfer of sensitivity to dncb contact in parabiosis guinea pigs.
16	esterification of low density lipoprotein cholesterol in human fibroblasts and its absence in homozygous familial hypercholesterolemia	Low-density lipoprotein cholesterol esterification in human fibroblasts and cholesterol deprivation in the apos; homozygous familial hypercholesterolemia.
16	antibody to myosin the specific visualization of myosin containing filaments in nonmuscle cells	Myosin antibody specific visualization of myosin containing filaments in non-muscle cells.
16	plasma membrane components of skin fibroblasts from normal individuals and patients with cystic fibrosis	Components of the plasma membrane of fibroblasts from normal subjects and from patients with cystic fibrosis.
16	variation in the phenotypic expression of beta glucuronidase deficiency	Variation in the apos; phenotypic expression of beta glucuronidase deficiency.
16	polyinosinic polycytidylic acid inhibition of cell proliferation in carcinogen treated epidermis and in carcinogen induced skin tumors in mice	"Toxicol, J., ""Polyinosinic polycytidylic acid inhibition of cell proliferation in carcinogen treated epidermis and carcinogen skin tumors in mice."""
16	correlation between the carcinogenicities of nitrofuran derivatives and their destructive actions on sebaceous glands of mouse skin	Correlation between the carcinogenicity of nitrofuran derivatives and their destructive action on sebaceous mouse skin glands.
16	variation in response of channel catfish to henneguya sp infections protozoa myxosporidea	Variation in the response of channel catfish to infection by protozoans, henneguya sp. myxosporidea.
16	human antigen and enzyme markers in man chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids evidence for synteny between the hl a pgm3 me1 and ipo b loci	The antigen and human enzyme markers of Chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids show a synteny between the hl a pgm3 me1 and ipo b gene loci.
16	free and membrane bound ribosomes in normal and methylcholanthrene treated mouse epidermis	Membrane-bound free ribosomes in the epidermis of normal and methylcholanthrene-treated mice.
16	prostaglandins kinin and inflammation in the rat	Prostaglandins kinins and l' inflammation in rat.
16	preoperative disinfection of surgeons hands use of alcoholic solutions and effects of gloves on skin flora	Preoperative disinfection of the hands of oral surgeons; use of alcoholic solutions and effects of gloves on skin flora.
16	disinfection of the skin with detergent preparations of irgasan dp 300 and other antiseptics	Skin disinfection with detergent preparations of 300 dp irgasan and other antiseptic.
16	locked in syndrome report of seven cases	Syndrome report locked on seven cases, sir.
16	percutaneous aspiration biopsy of the pancreas under ultrasonic guidance	Percutaneous aspiration biopsy of the pancreas by ultrasound.
16	lobomycosis as a disease of the atlantic bottle nosed dolphin tursiops truncatus montagu 1821	Lobomycosis as a disease of dolphin tursiops truncatus monttagu 1821.
16	onchocerciasis in guatemala iii daytime periodicity of microfilariae in skin	Onchocerciasis in Guatemala iii diurnal periodicity of microfilariae in the skin.
16	onchocerciasis prevalence of microfilaruria and other manifestations in village of cameroon	Prevalence of microfilaruria and other manifestations in the cameroon village.
16	methods for evaluating topical antibacterial agents on human skin	Methods used; evaluation of topical antibacterial agents on human skin.
16	the effects of x irradiation on the mechanical properties of skin	The effects of apo; radiation on the mechanical properties of the skin.
16	oral contraceptives and porphyria cutanea tarda	Oral contraceptives and oral porphyria cutanea were delayed.
16	skin graft survival on avascular defects	Survival of apos; a skin graft on avascular defects.
16	ultrastructural studies of regenerating spines of the sea urchin strongylocentrotus purpuratus i cell types without spherules	Ultrastructural studies of regenerating spines of nonspherule Strongylocentrotus purpuratus i.
16	lipoid proteinosis report of 2 cases with histology of the vocal folds	Two cases of lipoid proteinosis with vocal folds histology have been reported.
16	the anti map and anti group a carbohydrate antibodies response in streptococcal human infections	The anti- and anti-group card a glucose antibody response in human streptococcal infections.
16	renal excretion of fluoride in renal failure and after renal transplantation	Renal fluoride excretion during kidney failure and after renal transplantation.
16	expression in organ culture of agouti locus genes of the mouse	Expression in d&apos cultures; gene organs of the agouti locus of the mouse.
16	the development of the primitive epithelium and true tegument in the cercaria of schistosoma mansoni	The development of the primitive epithelium and the true integument in the schistosoma mansoni epithelium.
16	the sebotrophic effect of pregnancy	L' sebotrophic effect of the pregnancy.
16	glycosidases in human skin fibroblast cultures alpha fucosidase alpha galactosidase alpha glucosidase beta mannosidase and n acetyl alpha glucosaminidase	Glycosidases in human skin alpha fucosidase alpha galactosidase alpha glucosidase beta mannosidase and nacetyl alpha glucosaminidase cultures.
16	morphochemical analysis of mucosubstances in some epithelial tissues of the eel anguilla japonica	Morphochemical analysis of the mucosubstances in selected epithelial tissues of the eel, eel eel, japonica.
16	benzene hexachloride poisoning in cattle	Poisoning by benzene hexachloride in livestock.
16	hypotrichosis in miniature poodle siblings	L' hypotrichosis in miniature poodles.
16	transformation of horse skin cells by type c sarcoma viruses	Transformation of horse skin cells by c-type sarcoma viruses.
16	new type of exfoliatin obtained from staphylococcal strains belonging to phage groups other than group ii isolated from patients with impetigo and ritter s disease	A novel type of efoliatin from staphylococcal strains belonging to phage groups other than group ii has been isolated from patients with apo placentae; phylococcal impetigo and ritter.
16	streptozotocin therapy in 22 cancer patients	The effect of streptozotocin therapy on the treatment of streptozotocin-induced cancer.
16	physiochemical and biological properties of the major basic protein from guinea pig eosinophil granules	Physiochemical and biological properties of the major basic protein of guinea pig eosinophilic granules.
16	a selective stain for mast cells	A selective patch for mast cells.
16	effects of human chorionic gonadotropin preparations on complement in vitro	Effects of human chorionic gonadotropin preparations on complement in vitro.
16	stimulation of synthesis of free chondroitin sulfate chains by beta d xylosides in cultured cells	Stimulation of xyloside beta synthesis of free chondroitin sulfate chains in cultured cells.
16	capillary density in developing and healing tuberculous lesions produced by bcg in rabbits a quantitative study	Capillary density in the development and healing of rabbit bcg-induced tubercular lesions, quantitative study.
16	phosphate compounds in bone scanning	Phosphate compounds in bone scintigraphy.
16	altered control of skin blood flow at high skin and core temperatures	Change in the control of cutaneous blood circulation at high skin and high heart temperatures.
16	effect of chronic hypercapnia on body temperature regulation	Effect of hypercapnia; chronic hypercapnia on body temperature control.
16	animal experiments in radiotherapy iii large versus small animals	Experiences from animals using radiotherapy iii. Large animals vs. small animals.
16	dose fractionation schedules biologic aspects and applications to high let radiotherapy	Dose splitting plans the biological aspects and applications to high-dose radiation therapy.
16	clinical trials with new radiation modalities	Clinical trials with new modalities for radiation.
16	intradermal catabolism of rabbit igg and its fragments	Intradermal catabolism of rabbit and fragments.
16	increased collagen synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in vitro a possible defect in the regulation or activation of the scleroderma fibroblast	L' enhancement of collagen synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in vitro may be a regulatory or l&apos defect; activation of scleroderma fibroblast.
16	sanfilippo a syndrome sulfamidase deficiency in cultured skin fibroblasts and liver	Sanfilippo has sulfamidase deficiency syndrome in liver and cutaneous fibroblast cultures.
16	systemic nodular panniculitis with cardiac involvement	Nodular systemic panniculitis with cardiac involvement.
16	a clinico radiological survey of deep venous thrombosis of the leg	Clinical radiological study of deep vein thrombosis of the leg.
16	operations for lymphoedema of the lower limbs a study of the results in 108 operations utilizing vascularized dermal flaps	Lower limb lymphedema surgery: study of the results of 108 procedures using vascularized dermal remnants.
16	skin changes secondary to hydroxyurea therapy	Skin changes following apo therapy; hydroxyurea.
16	livedo vasculitis the vasculitis of atrophie blanche immunohistopathologic study	Livingo vasculitis vasculitis of l' immunohistopathological study of white atrophy.
16	mummified cutaneous mixed tumor	It's a mummified mixed-cutaneous tumor.
16	intralesional triamcinolone therapy for pretibial myxedema	Intralesional therapy with triamcinolone for pretibial myxedema.
16	fixed long ultraviolet eruption	Long ultraviolet rash fixed.
16	epidermolysis bullosa acquisita with electron microscopical studies	Epidermolysis bullosa acquired with electron microscopy studies.
16	acute eruptive darier disease keratosis follicularis	Follicular keratosis stinger rash.
16	erythema gyratum repens with metastatic adenocarcinoma	Erythema gyratum repens with adenocarcinoma metastatic.
16	the skin in the winchester syndrome	Skin in the Winchester syndrome.
16	dermatomyositis in six patients without initial muscle involvement	Dermatomyosite in six patients with no initial muscle involvement.
16	mast cells in the epidermis of piebaldism	Mastocytes in the apos; epidermis of piebaldism.
16	the permeability barrier in mammalian epidermis	It is the most common type of permeability barrier in mammals.
16	changes in distribution pattern of cytoplasmic filaments in human melanocytes during ultraviolet mediated melanin pigmentation the role of the 100 angstrom filaments in the elongation of melanocytic dendrites and in the movement and transfer of melanosomes	Changes in the pattern of distribution of cytoplasmic filaments in human melanocytes during the apo-mediated melanin pigmentation; ultraviolet, the role of 100 apo filaments; angstrom in apo; melanocytic dendrite elongation and melanosome movement and transfer.
16	the fine structure and cell kinetics of mouse epidermis after wounding	The fine structure and cellular kinetics of the mouse epidermis after wounding.
16	distribution and metabolism of 2 4 5 2 5 pentachlorobiphenyl	Distribution and metabolism of pentachlorobiphenyl.
16	pneumatic orthosis pilot study	Pilot study on orthotics; pneumatic braces.
16	long term maintenance of psoriatic human skin on congenitally athymic nude mice	Long term maintenance of human skin psoriatic on congenitally athymic nude mice.
16	cutaneous effects of topical indomethacin an inhibitor of prostaglandin synthesis on uv damaged skin	Apos skin effects; topical indomethacin, an inhibitor of prostaglandin synthesis, on skin damaged by apos; uv.
16	epidermal synthesis of prostaglandins and their effect on levels of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate	Epidermal synthesis of prostaglandins and their effect on cyclic adenosine levels.
16	the effect of anthralin and its derivatives on epidermal cell kinetics	L' effect of anthraline and its derivatives on epidermal cell kinetics.
16	prostaglandin and dna synthesis in human skin possible relationship to ultraviolet light effects	The synthesis of prostaglandins and DNA in human skin could be related to the effects of ultraviolet light.
16	cyclic 3 5 nucleotide phosphodiesterase in rat skin ii biochemical characterization	Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase 3-5 in rat skin ii Biochemical characterization.
16	esterification of 4 14c cholesterol by cutaneous bacteria staphylococcus epidermidis propionibacterium acnes and propionibacterium granulosum	Esterification of cholesterol 4c 14c by the skin bacterium staphylococcus epidermidis propionibacterium acnes et propionibacterium granulosum.
16	analysis of lipid composition of isolated human sebaceous gland homogenates after incubation with cutaneous bacteria thin layer chromatography	Analysis of lipid composition of isolated homogenates from human sebaceous glands after thin-layer chromatography incubation with skin bacteria.
16	the effects of a nonsteroid antiandrogen flutamide on sebaceous gland activity	Effects of non-steroidal antiandrogen flutamide on sebaceous gland activity.
16	vasoconstrictor activities of some novel synthetic steroids in alcoholic solution	Vasoconstrictor activity of some of the new synthetic steroids in alcoholic solution.
16	movement of beta irradiated epidermal basal cells to the spinous granular layers in the absence of cell division	Movement of beta-rayed epidermal basal epidermal cells to the spiny granular layers in l' lack of cell division.
16	human necrotizing vasculitis immunoglobulins and complement in vessel walls of cutaneous lesions and normal skin	Immune globulin against human necrotizing vasculitis and complement in normal skin lesions and vascular walls.
16	in vivo studies of sterol and squalene secretion by human skin	In vivo studies of the secretion of sterol and squalene by human skin.
16	immunoglobulin deposits in skin in systemic lupus erythematosus	Immunoglobulin in the skin of disseminated lupus erythematosus.
16	comparison of the cyanogen bromide peptides of insoluble guinea pig skin and scar collagen	Comparison of guinea pig skin and scar collagen peptides to cyanogen bromide.
16	structural studies of alpha melanocyte stimulating hormone and a novel beta melanocyte stimulating hormone from the neurointermediate lobe of the pituitary of the dogfish squalus acanthias	Structural studies of l' melanocytic alpha-hormone and d' a novel melanocytic beta-hormone of the neuro-lobe-intermediates of l' pituitary pituitary; aiguillate squalus acanthias.
16	studies on onchocerca cervicalis railliet and henry 1910 v the development of onchocerca cervicalis larvae in the vectors	Epos studies; onchocerca cervicalis railliet and Henry 1910 v. development of dapos larvae; onchocerca cervicalis in vectors.
16	a comparative study of horseradish peroxidase conjugates prepared with a one step and a two step method	A comparative study of horseradish peroxidase conjugates prepared by one-step and two-step methods.
16	comparative ultrahistochemistry of the adepidermal granules of salmo irideus lebistis reticulatus and hynobiuo tokyoensis enzyme digestive experiment for the epoxy embedded sections	L' comparative ultrahistochemistry of the epidermal granules of salmo irideus lebistis reticulatus and l' hynobiuo tokyoensis was tested by enzymatic digestion for sections coated with d' epoxy.
16	a comparison of hexachlorophene and lactacyd on growth of skin flora in healthy term newborn infants	A comparison of hexachlorophene and lactacyd on the growth of the skin flora in healthy newborn infants.
16	pacemaker infections a 12 year review	Pacemaker infections after 12 years of diabetes; study.
16	self inoculation with milk as a cause of recurrent cellulitis	L' auto-milk inoculation as a cause of recurrent cellulitis.
16	correlation of human in vivo and in vitro cutaneous antimicrobial factors	Correlation of antimicrobial skin factors in vivo and in vitro in humans.
16	transient bacteremia associated with percutaneous liver biopsy	Hepatic percutaneous biopsy associated with transient bacteremia.
16	control of sterol synthesis and of hydroxymethylglutaryl coa reductase in skin fibroblasts grown from patients with homozygous type ii hyperlipoproteinemia	Control of the synthesis of sterols and hydroxymethylglutaryl coa reductase in skin fibroblasts obtained from patients with type II homozygous hyperlipoproteinemia.
16	pressure dependent factors in edema formation in canine forelimbs	Pressure-dependent factors in the formation of oedema in canine forelimbs.
16	an analysis of the specificity in pharmacological inhibition of the passive cutaneous anaphylaxis reaction in mice and rats	An analysis of the specificity of the apos; pharmacological inhibition of passive anaphylactic skin reaction in mice and rats.
16	the isolation and characterization of polycyclic hydrocarbon binding proteins from mouse liver and skin cytosols	Isolation and characterization of polycyclic hydrocarbon binding proteins in cytosols of mouse liver and mouse skin.
16	procollagen peptidase its mode of action on the native substrate	Procollagen peptidase acts on the native substrate.
16	growth in agarose of human cells infected with cytomegalovirus	Growth in agarose of cytomegalovirus infected human cells.
16	theoretical and experimental principles and clinical aplications of the antiandrognes author s transl	Theoretical and experimental principles and clinical aplications of l' author antiandrognes translations.
16	an unusual variant of klippel trenaunay weber syndrome	Unusual variant of the Klippel Trenaunay Weber Syndrome.
16	capacities of humans and monkeys to discriminate vibratory stimuli of different frequency and amplitude a correlation between neural events and psychological measurements	The ability of humans and monkeys to discriminate vibration stimuli at different frequencies and amplitudes, a correlation between neural events and psychological measures.
16	effect of zinc deficiency and repletion on thymidine metabolism	Effect of zinc deficiency and deficiency on thymidine metabolism.
16	vitiligo and dysgammaglobulinemia a case report and family study	Vitiligo and dysgammaglobulinemia, case report and family survey.
16	afferent new fiber activity responding to temperature changes of scrotal skin of the rat	A novel afferent fibrous activity is responsive to changes in skin temperature in the rat scrotum.
16	cerebroside sulfatase activity in cultivated human skin fibroblasts and amniotic fluid cells	Cerebroside sulfatase activity in cultured human skin fibroblasts and amniotic fluid cells.
16	the locus for human adenine phosphoribosyltransferase on chromosome no 16	L&apos locus; human adenine phosphoribosyltransferase on chromosome number 16.
16	a disease of freshwater fishes caused by tetrahymena corlissi thompson 1955 and a key for identification of holotrich ciliates of freshwater fishes	Fish disease; freshwater caused by tetrahymena corlissi thompson 1955 and key; identification of holotrichous ciliates of fishes; freshwater.
16	studies on the immune status of patients with renal adenocarcinoma	Studies on apo; immune status of patients with apo; renal adenocarcinoma.
16	fatal pox infection in a rough legged hawk	Fatal infection with smallpox in a rough-legged falcon.
16	the histopathology of fin rot disease in winter flounder from the new york bight	L' histopathology of fin rot in New York Bay winter flounder.
16	stimulus response functions of slowly adapting mechanoreceptors in the human glabrous skin area	Stimulation functions of mechanoreceptor response to slow adaptation in the glabrous region of human skin.
16	ibuprofen or aspirin in rheumatoid arthritis therapy	Ibuprofen or aspirin for the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis.
16	properties of strains of escherichia coli isolated from a variety of sources	These are the characteristics of the strains of Escherichia coli isolated from various sources.
16	clinical implications of the presence of drug residues in food	Clinical consequences of drug residues in food.
16	persistent modification of synaptic interactions between sensory and motor nerve cells following discrete lesions in the central nervous system of the leech	Persistent modification of synaptic interactions between sensory and motor nerve cells as a result of discrete lesions in the central nervous system of the leech.
16	mouse skin tumorigenesis and induction of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase by tobacco smoke fractions	Mouse skin tumorigenesis and induction of tobacco smoking fractions by aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase.
16	characterization of spontaneous chemicak and viral transformants of a c3h 3t3 type mouse cell line by transplantation into young chick blastoderms	Characterization of spontaneous chemicak and viral transformants d'apos; a c3h3t3 mouse cell line transplants into young chick blastoderm.
16	self mutilation in mice associated with otitis media	Auto-mutilation in mice associated with a moderate ear infection.
16	prolonged inhibition of mouse epidermal dna synthesis by dexamethasone	Prolonged inhibition of mouse epidermal DNA synthesis by dexamethasone.
16	role of human skin in the photodecomposition of bilirubin	The role of human skin in the photodecomposition of the bilirubin.
16	half lives of two types of rat homocytotropic antibodies in circulation and in the skin	Half-life of two types of rat homocytotropic antibodies circulating and skin.
16	subcellular fractions from dermis and epidermis in contact sensitization of guinea pigs to 1 chloro 2 4 dinitrobenzene	Subcellular features of the dermis and the apos; epidermis in sensitization to contact with 1-chloro-24-dinitrobenzene guinea pigs.
16	studies in immunodermatology vi if studies of autoantibodies to the stratum corneum and of in vivo fixed igg in stratum corneum of psoriatic lesions	Immunodermatology studies vi if auto-antibodies to stratum corneum and in vivo fixed igg antibodies in the stratum corneum of psoriatic lesions.
16	studies in immunodermatology vii four compartment system studies of igg in stratum corneum and of stratum corneum antigen in biopsies of psoriasis and control dermatoses	Immunodermatology studies vii four-compartment systems studies of apo; stratum corneum and apo; stratum corneum antigen in psoriasis and control dermatoses biopsies.
16	influence of ascorbic acid on ribosomal patterns and collagen biosynthesis in healing wounds of scorbutic guinea pigs	"""Ascorbic acid on ribosomal patterns and collagen biosynthesis in healing injuries of scorbutic guinea guinea guinea guinea guinea"", Arch."
16	gloved hand as applicator of antiseptic to operation sites	Hand gloved as antiseptic applicator at d&apos sites operation.
16	a newly reported toxic australian frog genus heleioporus	A new toxic Australian frog genus, Heleioporus.
16	involvement of the skin in late infantile and juvenile amaurotic idiocies neuronal ceroid lipofuscinoses	Implication of skin in late amaurotic and juvenile amaurotic idiocyst, neural ceronal lipofuscinoses of lipofuscinosis.
16	an evaluation of skin snip techniques used in the quantitative assessment of microfilarial densities of onchocerca volvulus	Evaluation of the skin-cutting techniques used in the apos; quantitative evaluation of microfilariae density of the apos; onchocerca volvulus.
16	a new look at osteogenesis imperfecta a clinical radiological and biochemical study of forty two patients	A new look at osteogenesis imperfecta a radiological and clinical biochemical study of 42 patients.
16	relationship between lipids in plasma and skin secretions of neonatal calf with particular reference to linoleic acid	Ratio of lipids in the plasma to dermal secretions of the neonatal calf, particularly with respect to the lipids; linoleic acid.
16	saprophytic occurrence of trichophyton mentagrophytes and microsporum gypseum in the coats of healthy laboratory animals preliminary report	Saprophytic occurrence of trichophyton mentagrophytes and microsporum gypseum in freshwater mantles; healthy laboratory animals, preliminary report.
16	mycotic flora of the interdigital spaces of the human foot a preliminary investigation	Mycotic flora of the human foot's interdigital spaces, a preliminary study.
16	an on line system for measurement of opacity pulse propagation times in atraumatic screening of patients for occlusive vascular disease	An online system for measuring pulse propagation times; opacity in atraumatic screening for occlusive vascular disease in patients.
16	nondestructive measurements of the properties of healing burn scars	A non-destructive measure of the healing properties of the scars.
16	werner s syndrome autopsy report of one case with a review of pathologic findings reported in the literature	Report of an autopsy of Werner's syndrome d' one case, with accompanying evidence; a review of pathological findings reported in the literature.
16	letter side benefits of the pill	I think the benefits of the pill are next to the letters.
16	reticulosarcoma like skin lesions in phenylketonuria author s transl	Reticulosarcoma as skin lesions in phenylketonuria s transl.
16	role of meningococcal endotoxin in meningococcal purpura	Role of apo; meningococcal endotoxin in meningococcal purpura.
16	the role of the skin in active specific immunization against leukemia in guinea pigs	The role of the skin in the specific vaccination active against leukemia in guinea pigs.
16	demonstration and assaying of igg antibodies in tissues and on cells by labeled staphylococcal protein a	Protein a labeled staphylococcal antibody is demonstrated and quantitated in the tissues and on the cells.
16	absolute concentrations of dithranol and triacetyl dithranol in the skin layers after local treatment in vivo investigations with four different types of pharmaceutical vehicles	Absolute concentrations of dithranol and triacetyl dithranol in skin layers after local in vivo treatment with four different types of pharmaceutical vehicles.
16	effect of polysorbate 85 on human skin	Effect of polysorbate 85 on human skin.
16	the innervation of hyperplastic epidermis in the mouse a light microscopic study	L' innervation of apos; hyperplastic epidermis in mice has been studied by light microscopy.
16	the detection of carotenoid pigments in human skin	The detection of carotenoid pigments in the human skin.
16	lattice and rodlet nuclear inclusions in merkel cells in rabbit epidermis	Network and rod nuclear inclusions in rabbit merkel cells; epidermis.
16	distribution of radioactivity in the organs of the rat and mouse after injection of l 3h prolyl l leucyl glycinamide	Distribution of radioactivity in rat and mouse organs after injection of prolyl leucyl glycinamide 3h.
16	feeding of boophilus microplus larvae on a partially defined medium through thin slices of cattle skin	The feeding of microplus boophilus larvae on a medium that is partially defined by thin slices of bovine animal skin.
16	isotope kinetics of human skin cholesterol secretion	Isotope kinetics of human skin cholesterol.
16	relief of pain by transcutaneous stimulation	Pain relief by means of transcutaneous stimulation.
16	skin carcinogenesis cholesterol 5alpha 6alpha epoxide hydrase activity in mouse skin irradiated with ultraviolet light	Skin cancer cholesterol 5alpha 6alpha activity of epoxide hydrates in the skin of mice irradiated by ultraviolet light.
16	prevention of malignant change in mammalian cells during prolonged culture in vitro	Preventing malignant changes in mammalian cells during prolonged in vitro culture.
16	topical treatment of dermatophytoses and candidoses	Topical treatment of dermatophytosis and dermatophytosis.
16	t rosettes in alcoholic cirrhosis of the liver	T-rosettes in alcoholic cirrhosis of the liver.
16	patients with ehlers danlos syndrome type iv lack type iii collagen	Patients with Type IV Danlos syndrome do not have type iii collagen.
16	human epidermal growth factor isolation and chemical and biological properties	The isolation of human epidermal growth factor and chemical and biological properties.
16	response of muscular and cutaneous vessels to physiologic stimulation of chemoreceptors 38505	Reaction of the muscle and skin vessels to physiological stimulation of the chemoreceptors 38505.
16	distribution and metabolism of 3h 2 5 2 5 tetrachlorobiphenyl in rats	Distribution and metabolism of tetrachlorobiphenyl 3h2 5h5 in rats.
16	kaposi s varicelliform eruption complicating local facial trauma case report	The report of local cases of facial trauma is complicated by the Kaposi varicella rash.
16	panniculectomy specimens as a convenient and inexpensive of homograft skin	Panniculectomy specimens as a convenient and inexpensive way for d*apos skin; homograft.
16	hazards from simian herpes viruses reactivation of skin lesions with virus shedding	Risks Associated with Epos Virus; Simian Herpes Reactivation of skin lesions by apos; virus shedding.
16	flow and composition of skin and muscle lymph of the hind limb of the rabbit after injury	After injury, flux and composition of the skin and muscle lymph of the rabbit hindlimb.
16	a study of connective tissue macromolecules in skin of mice with goldthioglucose induced obesity	A study of connective tissue macromolecules in the skin of mice treated with orthoglucose has induced obesity.
16	enhancement of interferon production in vitro a property of tilorone poly rl rc deae dextran	Increased production of d' in vitro interferon is a property of poly rl rc deae dextran tilorone.
16	chromosomal instability in cell lines derived from patients with xeroderma pigmentosum	Chromosome instability in cell lines from xeroderma pigmentosum patients.
16	dose time relationships for skin reactions and structural damage in rat feet exposed to 250 kvp x rays	Dose relations-time for skin reactions and structural damage to the feet of rats exposed to 250 kvp X-rays.
16	relative doses to skin and superficial nodes from 10 mv photons as a function of field size and distance from shadow tray	Skin and surface node doses from 10 mv photons as a function of field size and shelf distance; shade.
16	early and late radiation changes following a second course of irradiation	Early and late changes in radiation as a result of second irradiation.
16	the rate of mitotic division in regenerating epithelium in the dog	The rate of mitotic division in the dog; epithelium regeneration.
16	the effect of induced arterial hypertension upon regional blood flow in subcutaneous tissue in patients with arterial insufficiency of the legs	Effect of apo; induced hypertension on regional blood flow in tissue under-cutaneous in patients with leg arterial insufficiency.
16	histochemical study of erythema nodosum leprosum enl lesions	Histochemical study of nodosum lesions; erythema nodosum removed.
16	acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 1 storage of hyaluronic acid and its possible significance in the pathogenesis of leprosy	Metabolism of acidic mucopolysaccharides in leprosy 1 storage of l' hyaluronic acid and its possible importance in the pathogenesis of leprosy.
16	acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 2 subcellular localization of hyaluronic acid and beta glucuronidase in leprous infiltrates suggestive of a host mycobacterium leprae metabolic relationship	Metabolism of acidic mucopolysaccharides in leprosy 2 subcellular localization of l' hyaluronic acid and beta glucuronidase in leprosy infiltrates suggests a host metabolic relationship-mycobacterium leprae.
16	the effects of light on the human body	The effects of light on human bodies.
16	diagnosis of scabies	Diagnosis of the scabies.
16	liquid gel partition chromatography of vitamin a compounds formation of retinoic acid from retinyl acetate in vivo	Liquid-gel partition chromatography of vitamin a compounds forming l-apos; retinoic acid from l-apos; retinyl acetate in vivo.
16	the effect of suture materials on healing wounds of the bladder	The effects of suture materials on healing bladder injuries.
16	atypical fibroxanthoma of the skin	Atypical fibroxanthoma of the skin.
16	histochemical and electron microscopic studies of the human cutaneous lymphatic capillary	Histochemical and microscopic electron studies of the lymphatic capillaries of human skin.
16	the deltopectoral flap an anatomical and hemodynamic approach	L' anatomical and hemodynamic approach to the lambe deltopectoral.
16	detection of small vessels for microsurgery by a doppler flowmeter	Detection of small vessels for microsurgery at the apos; help from a Doppler flow meter.
16	absorption metabolism and excretion by goldfish of the anionic detergent sodium lauryl sulphate	Dapos metabolism; goldfish absorption and excretion of anionic detergent sodium lauryl sulfate.
16	residual radiation damage in mouse skin 5 to 8 months after irradiation	Radiation damage in the skin of mice 5 to 8 months after implantation; irradiation.
16	contamination of broiler chickens by salmonella during processing in a number of poultry processing plants author s transl	Salmonella contamination of broiler chickens during processing in a number of poultry processing establishments.
16	tegumentary glands of the supra anal pit of scutigerellidae symphala myriapoda	Integumentary glands of the supraanal pit of the symphala myriapoda-like scutigerellid.
16	osler weber rendu syndrome urologist s view	D'apos syndrome; osler weber made urology.
16	induction of neural differentiation in cultures of amphibian undetermined presumptive epidermis by cyclic amp derivatives	Induction of neural differentiation in apos cultures; presumptive undetermined apos epidermis; amphibian epidermis by apos derivatives; cyclic ampoules.
16	prurigo nodularis and uremia	Prurigo nodularis and uremia?
16	hard x ray therapy with special reference to postoperative irradiation of breast carcinoma	Hard X-ray therapy with special reference to post-operative breast carcinoma radiation.
16	histological studies after experimental grid irradiation iv findings in the skin	Histological studies after experimental irradiation discovered in the skin.
16	a herpesvirus type agent associated with skin lesions of green sea turtles in aquaculture	Herpesvirus associated with skin lesions of green marine turtles in aquaculture.
16	pathogenic considerations in systemic lupus erythematosus d l e immunohistologic studies author s transl	Pathogenic considerations in disseminated lupus erythematosus; translated immunohistological studies.
16	burn sepsis and burn toxin	To burn the sepsis and burn the toxin.
16	deposits of immunoglobulins and complement c3 in clinically normal skin of patients with lupus erythematosus	Immune globulin and c3 complement deposits in the clinically normal skin of patients with lupus erythematosus.
16	keratinosomes in psoriatic skin	Keratinosomes in psoriatic skin.
16	a case of halo nevus with effete melanocytes	Case of halo nevus with melanocyte effete.
16	testosterone 5alpha reduction in the skin of normal subjects and of patients with abnormal sex development	Reduction of testosterone 5alpha in the skin of normal subjects and patients with impaired sexual development.
16	the geographical distribution of onchocerca volvulus infection in liberia	The geographic distribution of onchocercia volvulus infection in the wild.
16	avulsion injuries in patients receiving corticosteroids	Avulsion injuries in patients receiving corticosteroids.
16	ultrastructural studies in epidermolysis bullosa heriditaria i dominant dystrophic type of pasini	Ultrastructural studies of the apos; bullosa heriditaria epidermal i dominant dystrophic type of pasini.
16	mycosis fungoides with marked brain involvement a case report	Fungoid fungus with marked cerebral involvement, case report.
16	epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis and neurodermatitis lichen simplex hypertrophicus	Epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis and lichen simplex hypertrophicus neurodermatitis hypertrophicus.
16	epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis during treatment with dithranol	Epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis during treatment with dithranol.
16	protein requirements of men in a hot climate decreased urinary nitrogen losses concomitant with increased sweat nitrogen losses during exposure to high environmental temperature	The protein requirements of men in a hot climate decreased the losses of urine nitrogen at the same time as the increased losses of urine nitrogen; sweat nitrogen during heat; exposure to high ambient temperatures.
16	giant melanosomes in moles and in normal human epidermis author s transl	Giant melanosomes in moles and apoes; translational normal human epidermis.
16	trophic phenomena in dermatology author s transl	Trophic phenomena in dermatology translation of the authors.
16	systemic lupus erythematosus in a 1 year old child	Lupus erythematosus dispersed in 1 year old.
16	viral infection and interferon in cell cultures aged in vitro	Viral infection and interferon in aged cell cultures in vitro.
16	a comparison of methods for collecting clean catch urine specimens in a clinic population of obstetric patients	Comparison of procedures for collecting urine samples from clean-tap patients in an obstetric patient population in a clinic.
16	trancutaneous determination of aortic blood flow velocities in man	D.J. Trancutaneous determination of aortic blood flow velocities in man.
16	hemodynimic effects of systemic and central administration of clonidine in the monkey	Hemodynimal effects of the drug; systemic and central administration of clonidine in monkeys.
16	a case of hartmannellid amebic meningoencephalitis in zambia	Case of hartmannellide amebic meningoencephalitis in Zambia.
16	the survival and growth of microorganisms in mascara during use	Survival and growth of micro-@organisms in mascara during use.
16	epoxide hydrase activity in mouse skin eidermis	L' epoxy hydrase in mouse skin; eiderm of mouse skin.
16	the subcellular localization of labelled tyrosine in the vitelline cells of schistosoma mansoni	The subcellular localization of labelled tyrosine in schistosoma mansoni yolk cells.
16	the fine structure of the cysticercoid of hymenolepis diminuta iii the scolex	The fine structure of the cysticercoid of l' hymenolepis decreased iii of the scolex.
16	epidemiological study of an hand foot and mouth disease outbreak observed in rome in the fall of 1973	Epidemiological study of a foot-and-mouth outbreak in Rome in the fall of 1973.
16	the structure of the sternal bursa of turkeys	The structure of the turkey sternal stock market.
16	the peripheral perfusion pressure a new non invasive parameter for the circulatory monitoring of patients author s transl	Peripheral perfusion is a new, non-invasive parameter for the monitoring of the circulatory systems of patient translators.
16	dipetalonema streptocerca macfie and corson 1922 description of the adult female	Dipetalonema streptocerca macfie and corson 1922 Description of adult female.
16	plantar epidermis of the guinea pig and characteristics of the stratum corneum	Plantar epidermis of the guinea pig and stratum corneum characteristics.
16	use of the pulse wave monitor as a measurement of diagnostic sympathetic block and of surgical sympathectomy	Use of the d*apos monitor; pulsed waves as a measure of diagnostic sympathetic blockage and surgical sympathectomy.
16	spatial distribution of mitosis in mouse epidermis	Spatial distribution of mitosis in epidermis of mouse.
16	postinflammatory acquired atresia of the external auditory canal	It's an inflammation of the external ear canal, which is acquired after the implantation.
16	tachyphylaxis to the action of topically applied corticosteroids	Tachyphylaxis at the apos level; action of locally applied corticosteroids.
16	basal cell carcinomas and basal cell carcinoma like changes overlying dermatofibromas	Both basal cell carcinomas and basal cell carcinomas appear to be changes that cover dermatofibromas.
16	miconazole therapy for endemic fungal disease	Micronazole for endemic fungal diseases.
16	erythema gyratum atrophicans transiens neonatale	Erythema gyratum atrophicans transiens neonatal.
16	psoriasis on tumor	Uh, Psoriasis on tumor.
16	the importance of being visually literate observations on the art and science of making a morphological diagnosis in dermatology	L' importance of having a good visual knowledge of art and science; making a morphological diagnosis in the field of dermatology.
16	the histoid variety of lepromatous leprosy	The histoid variety of leprosy.
16	nerves and nerve endings in pigmented nevi part i	Nervous and nerve endings in the pigmented area nevi i.
16	separation of human epidermal cells from fibroblasts in primary skin culture	Separation of human epidermal cells from fibroblasts in primary cultured skin.
16	the chemotactic effect of blister roof blister fluid and blister floor on polymorphonuclear leucocytes in dermatitis herpetiformis duhring author s transl	In dermatitis herpetiformis duhring author s transl. the chemotactic effect of blister blistering fluid and blister floor on polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
16	the effect of some solvents on the epidermis author s transl	The effects of certain solvents on epidermis; skin; translative author.
16	scabies histological study of inflammatory lesions	Histological study of scabies in inflammatory lesions.
16	a new formula for depigmenting human skin	A new formula for depigmentation of human skin.
16	precocious noduloulcerative cutaneous syphilis	Nodulo skin syphilis-early ulcerative.
16	orally given indomethacin and blood flow response to uvl	Indomethacin and response of blood flow to oral dosage.
16	immunoglobulin deposits in lepromatous leprosy skin presence of deposits in apparently uninvolved skin and occurrence of serum antiepithelial antibodies	D&apos deposits; immunoglobulin in the lepromous skin of leprosy presence of deposits in the skin apparently not involved and appearance of anti-epithelial antibodies in the serum.
16	pruritic maculopapular skin lesions in sarcoidosis an unusual clinical presentation	The pruritic maculopapular lesions of the skin in sarcoidosis present an unusual clinical presentation.
16	time of onset and regression of d penicillamine activity measured by rupture load of rat skin	The timing of onset and regression of onset; penicillamine activity as measured by the rupture charge of rat skin.
16	the effect of salicylic acid on epidermal cell proliferation kinetics in psoriasis autoradiographic in vitro investigations author s transl	The effect of salicylic acid on the epidermal cell proliferation kinetics in autoradiographic psoriasis in vitro.
16	hydrotherapy in cauterization wounds a histologic study author s transl	L' hydrotherapy in the cauterization hurts an author d' a histological study.
16	ultrastructural demonstration of cystine in guinea pig back stratum corneum	The ultrastructure shows the presence of cystine in the stratum corneum of guinea pig back.
16	cutaneous hydroxystereoid dehydrogenases and rat hair cycle	Skin hydroxysteroid dehydrogenases and rat hair cycle.
16	repeated topical applications of 1 2 4 trichlorobenzene effects on rabbit ears	Repeated topical application of 14 different effects of trichlorobenzene on rabbit ears.
16	environmental health hazards from high powered infrared laser devices	Risks to health and safety; environment posed by high-powered infrared (IR) laser devices.
16	skin dose with cones and diaphragms in 137cs teletherapy a study using lithium borate thermoluminescent dosimeters	Cutaneous dose with cones and diaphragms in 137cs teletherapy a study using thermoluminescent dosimeters of lithium borate.
16	molecular pathogenesis of systemic lupus erythematosus	Molecular pathogenesis of disseminated lupus erythematosus.
16	congenital insensitivity to noxious stimuli	She has a congenital insensitivity to harmful stimuli.
16	leishmaniasis in brazil x some observations of intradermal reactions to different trypanosomatid antigens of patients suffering from cutaneous and mucocutaneous leishmaniasis	Leishmaniasis in Brazil x a few observations of intradermal reactions to different trypanosomatic antigens in skin and mucocutaneous leishmaniasis patients.
16	5 methoxy n acetyltryptamine melatonin in enterochromaffin cells	Five acetyltryptamine n-methoxy melatonin in enterochromaffin cells.
16	histidinemia classical and atypical form in siblings	Classic histidinemia and atypical form in brothers and sisters.
16	acute gastric disease after cutaneous thermal injury	Acute gastric illness due to thermal cutaneous injury.
16	ultrastructure of the skin in mucopolysaccharidoses studies performed before and after plasma infusion therapy	L' skin ultrastructure in mucopolysaccharide studies before and after plasma perfusion therapy.
16	cutaneous reactions of alloxan diabetic rats to local thermal trauma	Skin reactions of alloxan-induced diabetic rats to localized heat shock.
16	ultrastructure of the skin in systemic scleroderma	Ultrastructural skin in systemic scleroderma.
16	skin and homograft cartilage reconstruction	Reconstruction of the cartilage of the skin and the apos; homograft.
16	blood flow measurements in skin flaps	Measurement of blood flow through skin flaps.
16	pharmacology of d penicillamine	Penicillamine Pharmacology d.
16	structure of cultured fibroblasts from dermatosparaxic calves	Structure of cultured fibroblasts of calves.
16	tissue specificity of the epidermal chalones	Tissue specificity of epidermal chalones.
16	activity of alpha d mannosidase in human langerhans epidermal cells	Alpha mannosidase activity in human langerhans epidermal cells.
16	solar urticaria a case with possible increase of skin mast cells	Solar Urticaria - a case with a possible increase in skin mast cells.
16	the interaction of concanavalin a and the surface coat of stratified squamous epithelium	L' interaction of concanavalin a and surface layer of laminated squamous epithelium.
16	the erythemal action spectrum and deoxyribonucleic acid repair synthesis in xeroderma pigmentosum	The spectrum of d' erythemal action and repair synthesis by deoxyribonucleic acid in xeroderma pigmentosum.
16	the bacteriological ecosystem of the skin of children in an african tropical envirovment tanzania	L' bacteriological ecosystem of children's skin in an envirovment tanzania African Tropical.
16	cell migration and dna synthesis in organ culture of human skin	Cellular migration and synthesis of DNA in human skin organ cultures.
16	the areal extent of dermatophyte infection	Lapos; extent of apos; dermatophytic infection.
16	the length breadth ratio of skin flaps on the trunk two new long narrow flaps	The skin flap length/width ratio on the trunk two new long and narrow flaps.
16	the proliferative response to epidermis of hairless mice to full thickness wounds	The proliferative response to hairless mouse epidermis to thick wounds.
16	the skin of primates xlii the skin of the silvered sakiwinki pithecia monachus	The skin of primates xlii... the skin of the silver sakiwinki pithecia monachus.
16	phylogenetic significance of the skin of new world monkeys order primates infraorder platyrrhini	The phylogenetic significance of the skin of the apes of the new world ordains primates infra-order platyrrhini.
16	diagnosis of familial hypercholesterolemia by measurement of sterol synthesis in cultured skin fibroblasts	Dosage; familial hypercholesterolemia by measuring sterol synthesis in cultured skin fibroblasts.
16	loss of cholesterol from muscle and skin of monkeys treated with nicotinic acid	Loss of cholesterol in the muscles and in the skin of monkeys treated with nicotinic acid.
16	reflex vascular responses in kidney ileum and forelimb to carotid body stimulation	Reflex vascular reactions of the renal ileum and forelimb to carotid body stimulation.
16	changes in vesical function produced by cutaneous stimulation in rats	Changes in bladder function induced by skin stimulation in the rat.
16	gamma heavy chain disease rapid sustained response to cyclophosphamide and prednisone	Acute and sustained response to cyclophosphamide and prednisone.
16	heat destruction of some bacterial strains attached to broiler skin	Heat-killing of certain bacterial strains attached to broiler skin.
16	feather pecking and cannibalism in a caged layer flock	Yeah, nogging feathers and cannibalism in a caged herd.
16	the effectiveness of in plant chlorination in poultry processing	Chlorination efficiency in poultry processing plants.
16	clinical and physiological aspects of transcutaneous oxygen measurements in perinatal medicine author s transl	The clinical and physiological aspects of the measurement of transdermal oxygen in perinatal medicine.
16	onchocerca cervicalis infection in horses from the western united states	Onchocerca cervicalis infection in state horses-United West.
16	elimination of sulfamethazine from edible tissues blood urine and feces of turkey poults	Elimination of sulfamethazine from turkey urine and feces edible tissue.
16	the immunofluorescent band test in mixed connective tissue disease	Mixed connective tissue disease immunofluorescent bands test.
16	changes in cutaneous flora after wet occlusion	Acute changes in the skin flora after wet occlusion.
16	isolation of dermatophytes candida species and systemic fungi from dermatologic specimens in montr al 1963 to 1973	Isolation of candida dermatophytes and systemic fungi from montane dermatological specimens from 1963 to 1973.
16	dilantin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation with purpura fulminans a case report	Dilantine induces a disseminated intravascular coagulation process with purpura fulminans, a case report.
16	thymic origin of abnormal lymphoid cells in s zary syndrome	Thymic origin of abnormal lymphoid cells of szary syndrome.
16	mosaic 14 trisomy in a female child with multiple abnormalities	Mosaic 14 trisomy in a little girl who has multiple abnormalities.
16	on the functions of the pore cells in the connective tissue of terrestrial pulmonate molluscs	On the functions of porous cells in connective tissue of terrestrial pulmonary molluscs.
16	induction of the polyamine biosynthetic enzymes in mouse epidermis by tumor promoting agents	Induction of polyamine biosynthetic enzymes in mouse epidermis by agents promoting tumors.
16	the fine structure of the epidermis of two species of salmonid fish the atlantic salmon salmo salar l and the brown trout salmo trutta l i general organization and filament containing cells	The fine structure of the epidermis of two species of salmonid fishes, salmo salar Atlantic salmon and salmo brown trout, trutta general organization and cell-containing filament.
16	differential cytotoxic acitivity of anticollagen serum on rat osteoblasts and fibroblasts in tissue culture	Differential cytotoxic activity of anticollagen serum on tissue cultured rat osteoblasts and fibroblasts.
16	development of high intensity narrow band lamps and studies of the irradiation effect on human skin irradiation with high intensity lamps	Development of high-intensity narrow-band lamps and lamp studies; effect of apo; radiation on apo; irradiation of human skin with high-intensity lamps.
16	products of epidermal protein synthesis	Products of protein synthesis epidermal.
16	electron microscopic study of nevic corpuscle	Electron microscopic study of the neuralgic corpuscle.
16	epidermal intercellular binding of concanavalin a and pemphigus antibody	Epidermal intercellular binding of concanavalin a and apos; anti-conjugation antibody-pemphigus.
16	histochemical analysis of epidermal cells and mucous cells in the skin of torpedo ocellata rafinesque	Histochemical analysis of epidermal and mucous cells from the rafinesque torpedo skin.
16	human evoked responses to potentially noxious tactile stimulation i	Human reactions to potentially harmful tactile stimulation i.
16	necrotizing vasculitis etiologic aspects of immunology and coagulopathy	Vascular Necrosis Etiologic aspects of apos; immunology and coagulation.
16	cutis laxa ultrastructural and biochemical studies	Ultrastructural and biochemical studies of the cutis laxa.
16	treatment of psoriasis with 6 aminonicotinamide	Treatment of psoriasis with 6 aminonicotinamide.
16	acne aestivalis	Acne aestivalis acne.
16	nodular subcutaneous fat necrosis a manifestation of silent pancreatitis	Nodular skin necrosis of fats, manifestation of d' silent pancreatitis.
16	low dosage cytarabine therapy for herpes zoster with pneumonia	Low dose cytarabine treatment for shingles with pneumonia.
16	mannosidosis deficiency of a specific alpha mannosidase component in cultured fibroblasts	Mannose deficiency in apo; a specific component of alpha mannosidase in cultured fibroblasts.
16	familial opsonization defect associated with fatal infantile dermatitis infections and histiocytosis	Familial opsonization associated with fatal childhood dermatitis and l*apos; histiocytosis.
16	pathogenetic aspects of bromocarbamide intoxication	Pathogenic aspects of apo; bromocarbamide poisoning.
16	thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase their ultrastructural localization in rat skin	Thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase are localized in rat skin ultrastructure.
16	effect of high dosis of d penicillamine and paramethasone on mechanical properties of rat connective tissue author s transl	Effect of high dose of penicillamine and paramethasone on mechanical properties of connective tissue of the rat.
16	the management of traumatic tattoos	Traumatic tattoo management.
16	fabry s disease on the mechanism of the peripheral nerve involvement	Fabry disease on mechanism of the peripheral nerve involvement.
16	bacterial flora in relation to cataract extraction i material methods and preoperative flora	Bacterial flora in relation to cataract extraction material methods and preoperative flora.
16	local tissue effects of surface applied ent drugs	Local Tissue Effects of Applied Surface Drugs ent.
16	reticulosarcomatosis originating from skin a clinicopathological study	Reticulosarcomatosis from skin, a clinicopathological study.
16	exacerbation and reactivation of herpesvirus hominis infection in mice by cyclophosphamide	Herpesvirus-Hominis infection exacerbated and reactivated in mice by cyclophosphamide.
16	incontinentia pigmenti	Pig incontinence-lied.
16	cystic fibrosis heterozygote detection a study on a normal population	Cystic fibrosis heterozygosity in a normal population study.
16	effect of spinal sympathetic blockade upon local regulation of blood flow in subcutaneous tissue	Effect of d' a medullary sympathetic blockade on the local regulation of blood flow in tissue under-skin.
16	studies on soft tissue reactions to implantation of glass ceramics author s transl	Soft-tissue reaction studies to implantation of translucent glassware.
16	hairlessness in mus musculus a pathologic study	L' absence of hair in the musculus is a pathological study.
16	perianal paget disease histochemical differentiation utilizing the borohydride koh pas reaction	"""Perianal paget disease histochemical differentiation using the borohydride koh non reaction"", Arch."
16	topography and topology in functional recovery of regenreated sensory and motor systems	Functional recovery topography and topology of regenerated sensory and motor systems.
16	feather pattern development	D&apos development; a feather pattern.
16	labelling of murine epidermal langerhans cells with h3 thymidine	Marking of mouse epidermal langerhans cells with thymidine-h3.
16	clinical picture and pathomorphology of traumatic high pressure oil injections the so called grease gun injury	Clinical image and pathomorphology of traumatic injections of high-pressure oil are known as the fat gun wound.
16	translation of mrna for 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine decarboxylase isolated from epidermis tissue of calliphora vicina r d in a heterologous system dependence of mrna concentration on the insect steroid hormone ecdysone	Translation of mrna for the 3 dihydroxyphenylalanine decarboxylase isolated from the epidermal tissue of calliphora vicina r in a mrna concentration-dependent system; ecdysone, an insect steroid hormone.
16	collagen biosynthesis in normal human skin normal and hypertrophic scar and keloid	Collagen biosynthesis in normal human skin and keloid hypertrophic scar.
16	the palmo mental reflex an electrophysiological study	The mental reflex of Palmo is an electrophysiological study.
16	globoid cell leucodystrophy krabbe s disease peripheral nerve lesion author s transl	Peripheral nerve lesion translates into krabbe globoid cell leucodystrophy.
16	transcutaneous electrical stimulation in treatment of postoperative pain	Transdermal electrical stimulation in the treatment of post-operative pain.
16	glycogen in epidermal nerve terminals of lacerta sicula squamata reptilia	Glycogen in the epidermal nerve terminals of lacerta sicula squamata reptilia reptilia.
16	appearance of sex hormone receptors in frog rana esculenta tadpole skin during metamorphosis	L' appearance of d&apos receptors; sexual hormones in frog tadpole skin esculenta during metamorphosis.
16	langerhans cells in tissue cultures of guinea pig epidermal cells	Langerhans tissue cultures from guinea pig epidermal cells.
16	immunoglobulins in the skin in dermatitis herpetiformis and their relevance in diagnosis	Dermatology of the skin in dermatitis herpetiformis and their importance in diagnosis.
16	micro determination of cyclic amp levels in human epidermis dermis and haif follicles	Microscopic determination of the concentrations of cyclic light sources in the dermis; human epidermis and hair follicles.
16	further studies on adenyl cyclase in psoriasis	D' other studies on apos; psoriasis adenylate cyclase were conducted.
16	dermal epidermal deposition of complement components and properdin in systemic lupus erythematosus	Disseminated lupus erythematosus, skin epidermal deposition of complement and propidin components.
16	tumour angiogenic factor associated with subcutaneous lymphoma	An angiogenic tumour factor associated with lymphoma under-cutaneous.
16	primary cell culture for biochemical studies of human keratinocytes a method for production of very large numbers of cells without the necessity of subculturing techniques	Cultivation of primary cells for the biochemical studies of human keratinocytes is a method of producing a very large number of cells without qu*apos; it is necessary to use sub@-@ culture techniques.
16	the junctional zone beneath migrating epidermis	The junction zone, under @-@jacent to the migration of the epidermis, is the junction zone of the epidermis.
16	pretibial epidermolysis bullosa report of two families and review of the literature	L' epidermal pretibiale bullosa reports two families and d' a review of the literature.
16	elimination of circulating antibodies attempts to eliminate antibodies circulating in rabbits using a fraction of normal human epidermis	The elimination of circulating antibodies attempts to remove circulating antibodies in rabbits using a fraction of the antibody; normal human epidermis.
16	study on the mode of action of dithranol increased lipid peroxidation and enzyme inhibition	L' study of mode of action; action of dithranol increased lipid peroxidation and l' enzyme inhibition.
16	on the facial muscles in perodicticus potto and nycticebus coucang author s transl	On the facial muscles in translator perodicticus potto and nycticebus coucang s.
16	effect of dietary copper deficiency in the rat on fatty acid composition of adipose tissue and desaturase activity of liver microsomes	Effect of a dietary deficiency of copper in the rat on fatty acid composition of adipose tissue and liver enzymes; desaturase activity of liver microsomes.
16	tularaemia in the rat i the cellular basis on host resistance to infection	Tularemia in the rat the cell base on resistance of the host to infection.
16	the amino acid sequence of chick skin collagen alpha1 cb7	The amino acid sequence of collagen alpha1 cb7 from chicken skin.
16	bullous dermatosis of hemodialysis	Dermatoses Bubbles of the apos; hemodialysis.
16	tropomyosin antibody the specific localization of tropomyosin in nonmuscle cells	Tropomyosin antibody is the specific localization of tropomyosin in nonmuscle cells.
16	some laboratory studies on the accuracy of bite mark comparison	Some laboratory studies on the accuracy of comparing bite marks.
16	specificity of antigens in aqueous phenol extracts of skin examined by means of guinea pig and rabbit immune sera	The specificity of antigens in aqueous extracts of skin phenol was examined using rabbit and guinea pig immune sera.
16	a comparative evaluation of bacteriologic and morphologic indices of mycobacterium leprae in skin lymph node bone marrow nerve and muscle	Comparative evaluation of bacteriological and morphological indices of leprae mycobacterium in nerve and bone marrow muscle of cutaneous lymph nodes.
16	a radioautographic study of collagen synthesis by earthworm epidermis	A radioautographic study of collagen synthesis by the epidermis of earthworms.
16	the fine structure of epidermal glands of regenerating and mature globiferous pedicellariae of a sea urchin lytechinus pictus	The fine structure of the epidermal glands of regenerating and maturing lytechinus pictus sea urchins.
16	diagnostic significance of the immunofluorescent pattern in dermatitis herpetiformis	L' diagnostic importance of the pattern; immunofluorescence in herpetiform dermatitis.
16	s zary s syndrome case report	Zarys syndrome case report.
16	experimental studies of the pathogenesis of infections due to pseudomonas aeruginosa description of a burned mouse model	Experimental studies of the pathogenesis of pseudomonas aeruginosa infections describes a model of burned mice.
16	isolates of california encephalitis la crosse virus from field collected eggs and larvae of aedes triseriatus identification of the overwintering site of california encephalitis	Field isolates of the California encephalitis virus (CIV) were used to collect eggs and larvae of d'apos, aedes triseriatus, and d' to identify the site of d' overwintering of apos; and California encephalitis.
16	efferent pathways of the coronary chemoreflex	Efferative pathways of coronary chemoreflex.
16	some peculiarities of skin metabolism with vitamin a deficit	Some peculiarities of the dermal metabolism with vitamin deficiency a.
16	microbial flora of nurses hands iii the relationship between staphylococcal skin populations and persistence of carriage	Microbial flora in the hands of nurses iii the relationship between staphylococcal skin populations and persistence of carriage.
16	intracutaneous cornifying epithelioma keratoacanthoma in the dog a retrospective study of 25 cases	A retrospective study of 25 cases of d' epithelioma kerato-intracutaneous acanthoma in dogs was performed.
16	the ultrastructure of adult brugia malayi brug 1927 nematoda filarioidea	L' ultrastructure of brugia malayi brug 1927 nematoda filarioidea adult.
16	the collagen content of skin and gingival tissues in ascorbic acid deficient monkeys	The collagen content of skin and gum tissue in ascorbic acid-deficient monkeys.
16	excoriation injuries of the penis and scrotum author s transl	Journal of the American Psychiatric Association.
16	chemexfoliation as an adjunct to facial rejuvenation	Chemexfoliation is used as a complement to facial rejuvenation.
16	a new mucolipidosis with psychomotor retardation corneal clouding and retinal degeneration	New mucolipidosis with apos; psychomotor cornea and dapos delay; retinal degeneration.
16	distribution and persistence of staphylococcus and micrococcus species and other aerobic bacteria on human skin	Distribution and persistence of staphylococci, micrococcus and d' other aerobic bacteria on human skin.
16	a mucocutaneous disease in the dog resembling pemphigus vulgaris in man	It's a type of mucocutaneous disease in dogs that resembles Pemphigus vulgaris in humans.
16	a disease in dogs resembling human pemphigus vulgaris case reports	There has been one report of a disease in dogs resembling a human pemphigus vulgaris.
16	an unusual epizootic of actinobacillosis in dairy heifers	An unusual outbreak of actinobacillosis in milk heifers.
16	the functional status and columnar organization of single cells responding to cutaneous stimulation in neonatal rat somatosensory cortex s1	L' functional status and apo; organization of individual cells responding to skin stimulation in the rat s1 somatosensory cortex of the newborn rat.
16	treatment of corns by injectable silicone	The treatment of the horns by the technique of the injection of silicone.
16	hairy cutaneous malformations of palms and soles a hereditary condition	Hereditary hairy skin defects of the palms and plant of the hands.
16	immunocytochemical localization of cathepsin d in rabbit skin	Immunocytochemical localization of cathepsin d in the rabbit skin.
16	pustular patch test reactions in atopic dermatitis	Pustular patch test reactions in atopic dermatitis, Int J Med.
16	embryology of the epidermis ultrastructural aspects iii maturation and primary appearance of dendritic cells in the mouse with mammalian comparisons	L' embryology of ultrastructural aspects of epidermis; epidermis iii maturation and l' primary appearance of dendritic cells in mice with comparisons with mammals.
16	structure of the toad epidermis during the moulting cycle ii electron microscopic observations on bufo bufo l	Moose structure; toad epidermis during molting cycle ii Electron microscopy observations on bufo bufo l.
16	in vitro growth and maturation of epithelial cells from postembryonic skin	In vitro growth and maturation of the postembryonic skin epithelial cells.
16	metabolism of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in cultivated bovine arterial cells ii quantitative studies on the uptake of 35so4 labeled proteoglycans	Metabolism of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in cultured bovine arterial cells ii Quantitative studies on apos; uptake of 35so4-labeled proteoglycans.
16	ehlers danlos syndrome in two siblings with deficient lysyl hydroxylase activity in cultured skin fibroblasts but only mild hydroxylysine deficit in skin	Dilos syndrome in two siblings whose l&apos, lysyl hydroxylase activity, is deficient in cultured skin fibroblasts, but only a mild hydroxylysine deficiency in the skin.
16	effects of uv radiation of different spectral composition on content of sterols in rat skin	Effects of ultraviolet radiation of different spectral compositions on the sterol content of rat skin.
16	evaluation of two kinds of smallpox vaccine cvi 78 and calf lymph vaccine i clinical and serologic response to primary vaccination	Evaluation of two smallpox vaccines cvi 78 and calf lymph vaccines i clinical and serologic response to primary immunization.
16	skin lesions of the legs and feet and skeletal lesions of the feet in familail amyloidosis with polyneuropathy	Skin lesions of legs and feet and skeletal lesions of feet in the family amyloidosis with polyneuropathy.
16	comparative investigation on the influence of human and bovine collagen types i ii and iii on the aggregation of human platelets	Comparative study of apo; influence of human and cattle type iii and iii collagen on apo; aggregation of human platelets.
16	state of certain indices of natural nonspecific immunity in workers engaged in the manufacture of neomycin and monomycin	Status of certain indications of non-specific natural immunity for workers involved in the manufacture of neomycin and monomycin.
16	investigations on the mechanism of the activity of urea upon the epidermis author s transl	Research on the mechanism of attachment; activity of attachment; urea on attachment; epidermis; transl.
16	ultrastructural evidence for lack of tissue damage in a local immune complex reaction a study of a mild passive arthus reaction	Ultrastructural evidence of apo; absence of tissue damage in a complex local immune response; mild passive arthritic response.
16	the effect of the activity of psoriasis on the response to autologous ground skin extract	Effects of apos; psoriasis activity on response to apos; autologous ground skin extract.
16	cell mediated immunity in chronic polymorphous light eruptions leukocyte migration inhibition assay with irradiated skin as antigen	Cell-mediated immunity in a d&apos assay; inhibition of leukocyte migration by polymorphic, chronic luminous eruptions with irradiated skin as antigen.
16	discoid lupus erythematosus as part of a larger disease spectrum correlation of clinical features with laboratory findings in lupus erythematosus	Lupus erythematosus discoid within the framework of apos; a broader correlation between clinical characteristics and laboratory results for lupus erythematosus.
16	testosterone metabolism in the skin a review of its function in androgenetic alopecia acne vulgaris and idiopathic hirsutism including recent studies with antiandrogens	Metabolism of the testosterone in the skin a review of its function in the androgenetic alopecia of the andapos; acne vulgaris and l' idiopathic hirsutism, including recent antiandrogen studies.
16	subcellular distribution of phosphatases proteinases and ribonucleases in normal human stratum corneum and psoriatic scales	Subcellular protein phosphatase and ribonuclease distribution in normal human stratum corneum and psoriatic scales.
16	investigative studies of the dermatitis caused by the larva of the brown tail moth euproctis chrysorrhoea linn ii histopathology of skin lesions and scanning electron microscopy of their causative setae	Dapos studies; investigation of dermatitis caused by larvae of the moth, euproctis chrysorrhoea linn ii histopathology of skin lesions and scanning electron microscopy of their causal setae.
16	concentrations of ampicillin in human urogenital tissue serum and urine after intake of pivampicillin	Dosage levels; serum and serum ampicillin; urine of human urogenital tissue following swallowing pivampicillin.
16	lysosomal hydrolases of the epidermis 3 peptide hydrolases	Lysosomal 3 peptide hydrolases l' epidermis.
16	comparison of the shock inducing effect of anti mouse anti thymocyte horse serum and normal horse serum i experiments with three week old mice	Comparison of apo; effect; induction of anti-mouse horse thymocyte serum shock with normal horse serum i experiments with three-week-old mice.
16	soft tissue radiography in determining contact and near contact gunshot wounds	Soft tissue X-ray to determine gunshot wounds at and near contact.
16	in vitro uptake of calcium by dermis of patients with pseudoxanthoma elasticum	In vitro calcium uptake by dermis in patients with pseudoxanthoma elasticum.
16	cytotoxic and mutagenic effects of carcinogenic aromatic amides and polycyclic hydrocarbons and ultraviolet irradiation in normally repairing and repair deficient xeroderma pigmentosum diploid human skin fibroblasts	Cytotoxic and mutagenic effects of carcinogenic aromatic amides, polycyclic hydrocarbons and lapos; ultraviolet irradiation in normal repair and repair of xeroderma pigmentosum diploid human skin fibroblasts.
16	the regulatory role of steroid hormones on the pgf pge ratio in target tissues	The regulatory role of steroid hormones in the pgf pge ratio in target tissues.
16	the differential effects of cyclophosphamide and 6 mercaptopurine on the renal disease and skin immunoglobulin deposits of the nzb nzw f1 hybrid mice	The differential effects of cyclophosphamide and mercaptopurine 6 on skin and renal immunoglobulin deposits of nzb nzw f1 hybrid mice have been studied.
16	aspects of teratology of vitamin a acid beta all trans retinoic acid	Aspects of teratology of vitamin a beta acid all l' trans retinoic all.
16	an unusual pattern of testosterone metabolism in tissue associated with a keratin filled cutaneous cyst	Unusual testosterone metabolism in tissues associated with keratin-filled skin cysts.
16	ultrastructure of inborm errors of keratinization vii porokeratosis mibelli and disseminated superficial actinic porokeratosis	L' ultrastructure of inbormal keratinization errors vii porokeratosis mibelli and disseminated superficial actinic porokeratosis.
16	effects of steriod hormones on human fibroblasts in vitro ii antagonism by androgens of cortisol induced inhibition	Effects of Steroid hormones on human fibroblasts in vitro ii androgen antagonism of andos; cortisol-induced inhibition.
16	the repair of impaired epidermal barrier function in rats by the cutaneous application of linoleic acid	Repair of epidermal barrier defect function in rats by dermal application of d' linoleic acid.
16	kinetics of in vitro bovine keratohyalin synthesis	In vitro synthesis kinetics of bovine keratohyaline.
16	induced tolerance in cold urticaria caused by cold evoked histamine release	Induced intolerance in cold urticaria due to cold-evoked release of apos; histamine.
16	ultrastructure of keloid an unusual incident involving lepromatous leprosy	L' keloid ultrastructure is an unusual incident involving leprosy.
16	electron microscopy of ancient egyptian skin	Electron microscopy of d' ancient Egyptian skin.
16	the local antinociceptive and topical anti inflammatory effects of propyl gallate in rodents	Antinociceptive and topical anti-inflammatory effects of propyl gallate in the rodents.
16	chronic urticarial lesions and macroglobulinemia apropos of 5 cases	Chronic urticarial and macroglobulinemia at baseline; origin of 5 cases.
16	effect of bases and accelerants on the anti inflammatory activity of topical corticosteroids	Base and accelerator effects on apos; anti-@-@ inflammatory activity of topical corticosteroids.
16	circulatory effects of isometric muscle contractions performed separately and in combination with dynamic exercise	Circulatory effects of isometric muscle contractions were performed separately and in combination with exercise.
16	synthesis and biological activity of camel and bovine beta melanotropins	Synthesis and biological activity of beta-camel and bovine melanotropins.
16	the skin of the palms and soles of the marmosets callithrix jacchus and callithrix penicillata	The skin of the palms and soles of the callithrix jacchus and penicillata callithrix.
16	nonimmune and immune surveillance i growth of tumors and normal fetal tissues grafted into newborn mice	Non-immune and immunological surveillance of tumours and normal fetal tissue grafted into newborn mice.
16	the treatment of hypermelanosis with 4 isopropylcatechol	Treatment of etapos; hypermelanosis with 4 isopropylcatechol.
16	histopathological spectrum of erythema multiforme	Histopathological spectrum of the intestine; erythema multiforme.
16	abnormal chemotaxis in patients with cutaneous anergy	Abnormal chemotaxis in patients with apo; anergy to the skin.
16	the effect of orthostasis on the i 131 clearance in the metatarsal and crural subcutis in patients with occlusive arterial diseases	L' effect of apo; orthostasis on clearance i 131 in undercooking of metatarsus and crural in patients with occlusive arterial disease.
16	transformation from lepromatous to borderline leprosy under clofazimine therapy	Lecomatous leprosy to leprosy is limited by clofazimine treatment.
16	inhibition of vaccinia virus replication in skin of tuberculin sensitized animals challenged with ppd	L' inhibition of replication of the vaccine virus in the skin of tuberculin-sensitized animals in the presence of ppd.
16	ultrastructure of the epidermal cells of the teleost pimelodus maculatus lac p de 1803 pisces	Epidermal cell ultrastructure of teleostan pimelodus maculatus lac p of 1803 pisces.
16	biosynthesis of pyrrolidone carboxylic acid in hairless mouse epidermis	Apos biosynthesis; carboxylic pyrrolidone acid in the apos; hairless mouse epidermis.
16	binding of dexamethasone by the subcellular fractions of mouse epidermis and dermis	Binding of dexamethasone by the subcellular fractions of the epidermis and dermis of mice.
16	scanning electron microscopic and x ray microanalysis study of the mineral deposits in pseudoxanthoma elasticum	Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and X-ray microanalysis (X-ray) of pseudoxanthoma elasticum mineral deposits.
16	myocardial infarction without pain a study of the sensory function of the upper limbs	Painless myocardial infarction studies sensory function of the upper limbs.
16	interaction between collagen type i and type iii in conditioning bundles organization	Interaction between collagen type iii and collagen type ii in the organization of the conditioning beams.
16	influence of mounting media on the fading of basic aniline dyes in epoxy embedded tissues	Effect of mounting media on discoloration of base dyes; aniline in coated tissues; epoxy.
16	the effect of anti eosinophil serum on skin histamine replenishment following passive cutaneous anaphylaxis in the guinea pig	L' effect of anti-eosinophil serum on skin histamine turnover after passive skin anaphylaxis in guinea pig.
16	hypothalamic hypothyroidism and xxy xy sex chromosome mosaicism report of a case	The hypothalamic hypothyroidism and the mosaic of xxy xy sex chromosomes are reported as one case.
16	stewart treves syndrome the histopathological evolution of epithelial metastases	Stewart Treves Syndrome, histopathological evolution of epithelial metastasis.
16	histopathological characteristics of the inguinal lymph nodes and skin in onchocerciasis	Histopathological characteristics of the inguinal lymph nodes and the inguinal skin; onchocerciasis.
16	keratin filaments of cultured human epidermal cells formation of intermolecular disulfide bonds during terminal differentiation	Keratin filaments of cultured human epidermal cells forming intermolecular disulfide bonds during the terminal differentiation.
16	transcutaneous monitoring of po2 in different skin areas in the neonate and in the scalp of the fetus during labor methodological and physiological observations	Transcutaneous monitoring of po2 in different areas of skin of newborn-and fetal scalp during apo; methodological and physiological observations at work.
16	role of sterol photoconversion products in the regulation of cholesterol biosynthesis in rat skin	Role of sterol photoconversion products in the regulation of rat skin cholesterol biosynthesis.
16	mysterious form of referred sensation in man	A mysterious form of sensation referenced by the male.
16	cutaneous response to dinitrochlorobenzene in patients with genito urinary cancers	Dermal reaction to dinitrochlorobenzene in patients with apos; urinary genital cancer,-urinary.
16	antibodies to an antigen of human thymus epithelial tissue common to the epidermis of the skin in malignant myasthenia	Antibody to an antigen from the epithelial tissue of the human thymus common to the apos; epidermis of the skin in the malignant myasthenia.
16	the effect of long term oral oestriol succinate therapy on the skin of castrated women	Effect of long-term oral estriol succinate therapy on the skin of castrated women.
16	studies on parafilaria bovicola tubangui 1934 2 chemotherapy and pathology	Bovicola tubangui parafilaria studies 1934 2 chemotherapy and pathology.
16	sinus histiocytosis with massive lymphadenopathy rosai and dorfman and significant skin involvement	Sinus histiocytosis with massive rosai and dorfman lymphadenopathy and significant skin involvement.
16	variability of fibroblast lysosomal acid hydrolases with reference to the detection of enzyme deficiencies	Variability of lysosomal acid hydrolase fibroblasts with respect to detection of enzyme deficiencies.
16	histone phosphorylation and synthesis of dna and rna during phases of proliferation and differentiation induced in mouse epidermis by the tumor promoter 12 o tetradecanoyl phorbol 13 acetate	Histone phosphorylation and synthesis of DNA and apos; rRNA during proliferation and differentiation phases induced in the apos; mouse epidermis by tumor promoter 12 o tetradecanoyl phorbol 13 acetate.
16	low level dna exchanges in normal human and xeroderma pigmentosum cells after uv irradiation	Exchange of low level DNA in normal human cells and xeroderma pigmentosum cells after irradiation at apos; uv.
16	the importance of man mouse and rat skin surface lipid fractions on the in vitro penetration of schistosoma mansoni cercariae author s transl	L' importance of mouse and rat skin lipid fractions on in vitro penetration of translating schistosoma mansoni cercariae.
16	skin tumor initiating activities of the twelve isomeric phenols of benzo a pyrene	Activity of d' initiation of skin tumours of the twelve isomeric benzo a pyrene phenols.
16	moulting and morphogenesis of sensilla in a prostigmate mite acari actinotrichida actinedida caeculidae i mechanoreceptive bristles	Sense ecdysis and morphogenesis in a prostigmate acari actinotrichida actinedida caeculidae i mechanoreceptives.
16	measurement of chloride in sweat by use of a selective electrode and strip chart recorder	Chloride measurement in sweat at home; help from a select and convenient electrode; tape recorder.
16	plastic embedding of cutaneous specimens for light microscopy using araldite epoxy resin	Plastic nesting of skin specimens for light microscopy at apos; assistance; an aralite epoxy resin.
16	the permeability of epidermis lacking normal membrane coating granules an ultrastructural tracer study of kyrle flegel disease	The permeability of the epidermis without normal membrane coating granules was investigated by ultrastructural ultrastructural study with assistance of a phlegel disease tracer.
16	phage typing and biotyping of coagulase negative staphylococci	Lysotyping and biotyping of negative coagulase staphylococci.
16	x linked ocular albinism in blacks ocular albinism cum pigmento	X albinism related ocular in black albinism ocular cum pigmento pigmento.
16	effect of soap and detergents on the restitution of acidity and lipids of the skin surface	Effect of soap and detergents on the recovery of skin acidity and lipids.
16	giant pigment granules in dermal melanocytes of rat scrotal skin	Giant pigment granules are found in the dermal melanocytes of rat scrotal skin.
16	response of cattle to inoculation with atypical mycobacteria of bovine origin	Cattle response to apo; inoculation with atypical mycobacteria of apo, bovine origin.
16	the direct demonstration of histamine release in allergic reactions in the skin using a skin chamber technique	The direct demonstration of the release of d' histamine in allergic reactions of the skin to l' a technique of skin chamber.
16	multivesicular vacuolization in malignant histiocytoma of the skin author s transl	Molecular vacuolation in malignant histiocytoma of the skin author.
16	effect of retinyl acetate on sulfated glycosaminoglycan biosynthesis in dermal and epidermal cells in vitro	Effect of apos; retinyl acetate on the biosynthesis of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in dermal and epidermal cells in vitro.
16	regional variation in the deposition of subepidermal immunoglobulin in nzb w f1 mice association with epidermal dna synthesis	Regional variation in the deposition of immunoglobulin subepidermal in nzb w f1 mice associated with epidermal dna synthesis.
16	the influence of acids and bases on the development of morphological and biochemical wound reactions author s transl	The influence of acids and bases on the development of morphological and biochemical responses to injury is shown by the author.
16	mucinosis follicularis provoked by light exposure	Follicular mucinosis (FMD) caused by apos; exposure to light.
16	changes in structure of ventral epidermis of rana ridibunda during metamorphosis	Changes in the structure of the ventral epidermis of rana ridibunda during metamorphosis.
16	predictive evaluation in animals of the contact allergenic potential of medically important substances i comparison of different methods of inducing and measuring cutaneous sensitization	Predictive assessment in animals of contact allergenic potential of medically important substances compared with different methods of skin sensitization induction and measurement.
16	neural representation of cutaneous aftersensations by spinothalamic tract neurons	Neural representation of skin sensations by neurons in the spinothalamic tract.
16	metabolism and formation of dna adducts of benzo a pyrene in human diploid fibroblasts	Metabolism and formation of benzo a pyrene DNA adducts in human diploid fibroblasts.
16	transcutaneous oxygen monitoring in aminophylline treated apneic infants	Transcutaneous oxygen monitoring in aminophylline treated apneic infants. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/english/index.html.
16	formation and removal of specific acetylaminofluorene dna adducts in mouse and human cells measured by radioimmunoassay	Formation and elimination of apos; apos-specific adducts; acetylaminofluorene dna in mouse and human cells measured by radioimmunoassay.
17	on the existence of a gradient of sensitivity to the lack of sodium in the spinal roots of the bullfrog	On the left are the existence of sodium sensitivity gradients in the spinal roots of bullfrogs.
17	the effects of administration of sodium iodate to man and animals	Effects of iodine; dosing; sodium iodate on humans and animals.
17	the transport of sodium into human erythrocytes in vivo	Sodium transport in human erythrocytes in vivo.
17	active sodium transport by the isolated toad bladder	Active transport of sodium by the isolated toad-bladder.
17	an enzymatic ion exchange model for active sodium transport	Model d' sodium exchange; enzymatic ions for active sodium transport.
17	action of external divalent ion reduction on sodium movement in the squid giant axon	The action of the external reduction of the divalent ion on the motion of the sodium in the giant axon of the squid.
17	studies on the carrier function of phosphatidic acid in sodium transport i the turnover of phosphatidic acid and phosphoinositide in the avian salt gland on stimulation of secretion	Studies of phosphate-carrier function in sodium transport, phosphate turnover, and phosphatidic acid and phosphoinositide in the avian saline gland on the stimulation of secretion.
17	ion transport in nitellopsis obtusa	Ion transport in nitellopsis obtusa.
17	na cl and water transport by rat colon	Na cl and the transport of water by rat colon.
17	the effect of calcium on sodium transport by frog skin	L' effect of calcium on sodium transport through frog skin.
17	movement of sodium across the mucosal surface of the isolated toad bladder and its modification by vasopressin	Sodium movement through the mucous surface of the isolated bladder and its modification by vasopressin.
17	electronic measurement of the intracellular concentration and net flux of sodium in the squid axon	Electronic measurement of intracellular concentration and net flux of sodium in squid axons.
17	active ion transport across canine blood vessel walls	D&apos transport; active ions through the walls of canine blood vessels.
17	the effects of mechanical stimulation on some electrical properties of axons	The effects of mechanical stimulation on certain axonal electrical properties.
17	hypernatremia its significance in pediatric practice	Lapos; hypernatremia, importance in pediatric practice.
17	hypernatraemia in cerebral disorders	L' hypernatraemia in brain disorders.
17	the concentration dependence of sodium efflux from muscle	Sodium efflux from the muscle is also concentration dependent.
17	thermal inactivation of poliovirus under anaerobic conditions	Thermal inactivation of poliovirus under conditions of anaerobiosis.
17	an analysis of the striated muscle fiber action current	Analysis of d&apos current; action of striated muscle fibers.
17	effect of sodium alginate on staphylococcus aureus during mild heating and freezing	Effect of sodium alginate on staphylococcus aureus during heating and freezing.
17	the electrical characteristics of active sodium transport in the toad bladder	Electrical characteristics of active sodium transport in toad bladder.
17	nonbiological conversion of cephalosporin c to a new antibiotic by sodium thiosulfate	Non-biologically based conversion of cephalosporin c to a novel antibiotic by sodium thiosulfate.
17	heart action potential dependence on external calcium and sodium ions	Potential dependence of glucose; external calcium and sodium ion cardiac action.
17	short term n2 15 incorporation by azobacter	Short-term incorporation of n2-15 by l' azobacteria.
17	treatment of hypertension the special place of alpha methyldopa a short term study	Treatment of apo; hypertension special site of apo; alpha methyldopa a short-term study.
17	ionic conductance changes in lobster axon membrane when lanthanum is substituted for calcium	When lanthanum is substituted for calcium, the ion conductance changes in the axonal membrane of the lobster.
17	electron microscopy sodium localization in normal and ouabain treated transporting cells	Electron microscopic localization of sodium in normal and ouabain-treated transport cells.
17	salt transport organelle in artemia salenis brine shrimp	A salt transport organ of marine shrimp, artemia salenis.
17	villous adenoma of the rectum with electrolyte depletion diabetes and hypogonadism	Rectal adenoma with electrolyte depletion, diabetes and hypogonadism.
17	after potentials and large depolarizations of single nodes of ranvier treated with veratridine	After potentials and large depolarizations of single veratridine treated ranvier nodes.
17	phenacetin nephropathy	Phenacetin nephropathy.
17	significance of soil salinity on the ecology of coccidioides immitis	L' importance of soil salinity on coccidioides immitis ecology.
17	transepidermal potential difference development in anuran larvae	Differential transepidermal potential is developed in anuran larvae.
17	studies on the inhibition of intestinal absorption of radioactive strontium 3 the effect of administration of sodium alginate in food and in drinking water	Dosage studies; inhibitors; intestinal absorption of radioactive strontium 3; oral mucosal effects; administration of sodium alginate in food and water; drinking water.
17	the effect of adaptation of the taste threshold observed with a semiautomatic gustometer	L' effect of l' adaptation of the gustatory threshold observed with a gustometer semi-automatic.
17	sodium movement across single perfused proximal tubules of rat kidneys	Perfused sodium movement in proximal tubules of rat kidneys.
17	the mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a fresh water fish carassius auratus i evidence for an independent uptake of sodium and chloride ions	The mechanism of uptake of sodium and chloride by the gills of freshwater fish, carassius auratus, indicates that there is an independent absorption of sodium and chloride ions.
17	the mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a fresh water fish carassius auratus ii evidence for nh4 ion na ion and hco3 ion c1 ion exchanges	Sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a freshwater fish, carassius auratus ii., indicates the presence of apoes; sodium and chloride exchange; naive ion ions and ionic ions.
17	ion transport in isolated rabbit ileum 3 chloride fluxes	In isolated rabbit ileum 3, chloride fluxes are used to transport ions.
17	the ac impedance of frog skin and its relation to active transport	L' ac impedance of frog skin and its relation to the active transport.
17	the sedimentation behaviour of ribonuclease active and inactive ribosomes from bacteria	The sedimentation behaviour of both active and inactive bacterial ribonuclease ribosomes.
17	maximum rate of depolarization of single muscle fiber in normal and low sodium solutions	Maximum rate of depolarization of apos; a single muscle fiber in low-sodium, normal solutions.
17	the effect of calcium withdrawal on the structure and function of the toad bladder	Effect of calcium removal on structure and function of toad bladder.
17	the dual effect of calcium on the action potential of the frog s heart	The double effect of calcium on the frog heart's action potential.
17	cytological alterations related to stimulation of the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal gland	Cytological alterations related to the stimulation of the glomerular zone of the adrenal gland.
17	energetics of anaerobic sodium transport by the fresh water turtle bladder	"Toxicol, J., ""Energy entics of anerobic sodium transport by the fresh water turtle vesadder."""
17	differences in na and ca spikes as examined by application of tetrodotoxin procaine and manganese ions	Differences between peaks na and ca were examined by application of procaine tetrodotoxin and manganese ions.
17	the adenosine diphosphate adenosine triposphate excange reaction of cerebral microsomes and its relation to he sodium ion stimulatd adenosine triphosphatase reaction	Triposphate d' adenosine diphosphate d' adenosine excites cerebral microsomal reaction and its relationship to apos; adenosine triphosphatase stimulated by sodium ion.
17	movements of radioactive sodium in cerebral cortex slices in response to electrical stimulation	Radioactive sodium movement in cerebral cortical slices in response to electrical stimulation.
17	uptake and loss of na rb and cs in relation to an active mechanism for extrusion of na in scenedesmus	Absorption and loss of na rb and cs in relation to an active mechanism d' na extrusion in scenedesmus.
17	purified staphylococcal alpha toxin effect on epithelial ion transport	Effect of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on epithelial ion transport.
17	crayfish muscle permeability to sodium induced by calcium depletion	Muscle permeability of the intestine; sodium crayfish induced by calcium depletion.
17	effects of sodium azide on sodium fluxes in frog striated muscle	Sodium azide effects on sodium fluxes in frog striated muscle.
17	fluid transport in the rabbit gallbladder a combined physiological and electron microscopic study	Fluid transport in rabbit gallbladder was the subject of a physiological and immunological study and an electron microscopic study.
17	sodium transport inhibitory factor in sweat of patients with cystic fibrosis	Sodium transport inhibitors in sweat from patients with cystic fibrosis.
17	electron spin resosnance of gamma irradiated oriented dna prepared by wet spinning	Resistance to electron spins of l' gamma-irradiated oriented DNA prepared by wet spinning.
17	nature of the renal concentrating defect in sickle cell disease	Nature of the disease; a renal abnormality in sickle cell anemia.
17	discrimination of single transport systems the na plus sensitive transport of neutral amino acids in the ehrlich cell	Discrimination of single transport systems transport of neutral amino acids in the cell d' ehrlich.
17	strophanthidin sensitive transport of cesium and sodium in muscle cells	Cesium and sodium transport in muscle cells was sensitive to strophanthidin.
17	regulation of intracellular sodium concentrations in rat diaphragm muscle	Regulation of the intracellular sodium concentrations in the rat diaphragm.
17	giant axon of myxicola some membrane properties as observed under voltage clamp	L&apos, the giant axon of myxicola, has certain membrane properties observed under voltage clamp.
17	control of aldosterone secretion by the pituitary gland	Control of the secretion of apos; aldosterone by the pituitary gland.
17	effects of dinitrophenol and oligomycin on the coupling between anaerobic metabolism and anaerobic sodium transport by the isolated turtle bladder	Effects of dinitrophenol and lidos; oligomycin on coupling between anaerobic metabolism and anaerobic sodium transport by the isolated bladder of turtle.
17	relation between sodium concentration electrical potential and transfer capacity of rat small intestine	Ratio between the sodium concentration of electrical potential and the transfer capacity of the rat small intestine.
17	effects of hypotonic saline loading in hydrated dog evidence for a saline induced limit on distal tubular sodium transport	The effects of hypotonic saline loading in the hydrated dog indicate the existence of saline-induced limitations on distal tubular sodium transport.
17	changes in proximal and distal tubular reabsorption produced by rapid expansion of extracellular fluid	Changes in proximal and distal tubular reabsorption due to apos; rapid expansion of extracellular fluid.
17	blockage of sodium conductance increase in lobster giant axon by tarichatoxin tetrodotoxin	Sodium conductance blockade increased in the lobster giant axon with tarichatoxin tetrodotoxin.
17	simple photoreceptors in limulus polyphemus	Single photoreceptors in limulus polyphemus.
17	some factors influencing sodium extrusion by internally dialyzed squid axons	Some factors influence sodium extrusion by axons of dialyzed squid.
17	effect of inhibitors on alanine transport in isolated rabbit ileum	Inhibitor effects on alanine transport in rabbit isolated ileum.
17	aldosterone hypersecretion in non salt losing congenital adrenal hyperplasia	Hypersecretion of apos; aldosterone in nonsaline medium loss of apos; congenital adrenal hyperplasia.
17	an analysis of the surface fixed charge theory of the squid giant axon membrane	An analysis of the fixed surface charge theory of the giant axonal membrane of squid.
17	studies on the characteristics of the control system governing sodium excretion in uremic man	Studies of the characteristics of the control system for apos; sodium excretion in elders; uremic male.
17	effect of bile infusion on the dog kidney	The effect of the infusion on the kidney of the dog.
17	an upper limit to the number of sodium channels in nerve membrane	This is the upper limit of the number of sodium channels in the nerve membrane.
17	facilitation of heart muscle contraction and its dependence on external calcium and sodium	Easy heart muscle contraction and its dependence on-to-external calcium and sodium.
17	transport of monosaccharides in kidney cortex cells	Transport of monosaccharides into renal cortical cells.
17	the dependence of slow inward current in purkinje fibres on the extracellular calcium concentration	The dependence of the slow inward current in purkinje fibers on the extracellular calcium concentration.
17	the relationship between glomerular filtration rate and sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the rat nephron	The relationship between the glomerular filtration rate and sodium reabsorption by the proximal rat nephron tubule.
17	sites of action of sodium depletion on aldosterone biosynthesis in the dog	Apos sites; action of sodium depletion on dog biosynthesis; aldosterone.
17	nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xvi formation of protoplasts spheroplasts and related forms from a gram negative marine bacterium	Nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xvi is the formation of spheroplast protoplasts and related forms from a Gram-negative marine bacterium.
17	effect of diluents on blood clot lysis	Effect of diluents on the lysis of blood clots.
17	alanine and sodium fluxes across mucosal border of rabbit ileum	Dapos, alanine and sodium flow through the mucosal margin of the rabbit ileum.
17	sodium flux and electrical activity of arterial smooth muscle	Sodium flow and electrical activity in arterial smooth muscle.
17	water and sodium absorption in the human intestine	Absorption of water and sodium from the human intestine.
17	the site of the stimulatory action of vasopressin on sodium transport in toad bladder	Site of apos; stimulatory action of vasopressin on toad bladder sodium transport.
17	effects of lithium on different membrane components of crayfish stretch receptor neurons	Lithium effects on different membrane components of d*apos receptor neurons; pod stretching; crayfish.
17	the effect of cations on the electrical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig vas deferens	The effect of cations on the electrical properties of smooth muscle cells in the guinea pig vas deferens.
17	active transport of ions by the gastric mucosa of the rabbit foetus	Active transport of ions by rabbit fetal gastric mucosa.
17	a role for the sodium pump in photoreception in limulus	The sodium pump plays a role in photoreception of the limulus.
17	effects of cardiac glycosides on electrical activity in the isolated retina of the frog	Effects of cardiac glycosides on apos; electrical activity in isolated retina of frog.
17	structural requirements for active intestinal sugar transport the involvement of hydrogen bonds at c 1 and c 6 of the sugar	Structural requirements for active l&apos sugars intestinal transport; involvement of hydrogen bonds at c1 and c6 sugar levels.
17	demonstration of a hormonal inhibitor of proximal tubular reabsorption during expansion of extracellular volume with isotonic saline	Demonstration of apos; a hormonal inhibitor of proximal tubular reabsorption during apos; expansion of extracellular volume with isotonic saline.
17	functional correlates of compensatory renal hypertrophy	Functional correlates of the apos; compensatory renal hypertrophy.
17	further observations on asymmetrical solute movement across membranes	D' further observations on the asymmetric motion of solute molecules across membranes were made.
17	sodium fluxes in internally dialyzed squid axons	Sodium flow in dialyzed squid axons internally.
17	sodium movements in perfused squid giant axons passive fluxes	Sodium shifts in perfused giant squid axons of passive flux.
17	hellebrigenin 3 haloacetates potent site directed alkylators of transport adenosinetriphosphatase	L' helebenin 3 haloacetates is a powerful site directed towards the alkylators of the transport adenosinetriphosphatase.
17	acetazolamide and sodium bicarbonate in treatment of salicylate poisoning in adults	Acetazolamide and sodium bicarbonate in the treatment of apos; adult salicylate poisoning.
17	the accumulation of guanethidine by human blood platelets	The accumulation of guanethidine by human blood platelets.
17	studies on streaming i inhibition of protoplasmic streaming and cytokinesis of chaos chaos by adenosine triphosphate and reversal by magnesium and calcium ions	Studies on apos; inhibition of the formation of i protoplasmic fluxes and cytokinesis of chaos by l' adenosine triphosphate and l' inversion by magnesium and calcium ions.
17	use of potassium pyroantimonate in the localization of sodium ions in rat kidney tissue	Use potassium pyroantimonate to localize sodium ions in rat kidney tissue.
17	a down then up staircase in frog ventricle due to altered excitation contraction coupling	A staircase at the bottom and then at the top in the frog's ventricle due to a change in the-contraction excitation coupling.
17	diffusional resistance of the innermost layer of the placental barrier of the rabbit	Diffusion resistance of innermost layer of the rabbit placental barrier.
17	depression of fractional sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the dog without sodium diuresis	Depressed fractional sodium reabsorption by the dog proximal tubule without sodium diuresis.
17	effect of acute hypertension on sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule	Effect of sodium aposteroids; acute hypertension on sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule.
17	an evaluation of perfusion techniques in the study of water and electrolyte absorption in man the problem of endogenous secretions	Evaluation of perfusion techniques; study of dosage; absorption of water and electrolytes; problem of the endogenous secretions.
17	sodium content of community water supplies in california	Sodium content in California community water supply.
17	condylactis toxin interaction with nerve membrane ionic conductances	Interaction of condylactis toxin with ionic conductances of the nerve membrane.
17	the phosphaturic effect of sodium bicarbonate and acetazolamide in dogs	L' phosphaturic effect of sodium bicarbonate and l' acetazolamide in dog.
17	natriferic and hydrosmotic effects of neurohypophysial peptides and their analogues in augmenting fluid uptake by bufo melanostictus	Hydrosmotic and natriferic effects of neurohypophysial peptides and their analogues in the apos; increase in apos; absorption of fluid by bufo melanostictus.
17	slow inactivation of currents in cardiac purkinje fibres	Currents are slowly inactivated in cardiac purkinje fibers.
17	control of the orientation of cilia by adenosinetriphosphate calcium and zinc in glycerol extracted paramecium caudatum	Control of calcium and zinc glycerol; orientation of cilia by calcium and zinc adenosine triphosphate in glycerol extracted from paramecium caudatum.
17	synaptic activation of an electrogenic sodium pump	Synaptic activation of apos; an electrogenic sodium pump.
17	regional distribution of acid mucopolysaccharides in the kidney	Regional distribution of acidic mucopolysaccharides in the kidney.
17	the effect of salicylates on the hemostatic properties of platelets in man	The effect of salicylates on the hemostatic properties of the platelets in humans.
17	amiloride a potent inhibitor of sodium transport across the toad bladder	Amiloride is a potent inhibitor of sodium transport through the bladder of toads.
17	direct measurement of acetylesterase in living protist cells	Direct measurement of acetylesterase in live protist cells.
17	the effect of cyanide on the efflux of calcium from squid axons	L' effect of cyanide on apos; calcium efflux from squid axons.
17	monosodium l glutamate its pharmacology and role in the chinese restaurant syndrome	Monosodium glutamate l, its pharmacology and role in Chinese Restaurant Syndrome.
17	lysine transport across isolated rabbit ileum	Transport of lysine through apos; isolated rabbit ileum.
17	mechanism of change in the excretion of sodium per nephron when renal mass is reduced	Apos-varying mechanisms; sodium excretion per nephron when renal mass is reduced.
17	mechanism of exaggerated natriuresis in hypertensive man impaired sodium transport in the loop of henle	The mechanism of hypertensive men's exaggerated natriuresis altered sodium transport in the hen's anse.
17	failure to demonstrate a hormonal inhibitor of proximal sodium reabsorption	Failure to demonstrate apo; existence of apo; a hormonal inhibitor of proximal sodium reabsorption.
17	effective plasma volume in cirrhosis with ascites evidence that a decreased value does not account for renal sodium retention a sponteneous reduction in glomerular filtration rate gfr and a fall in gfr during drug induced diuresis	The effective plasma volume in ascites cirrhosis shows that decreased renal sodium retention, a spontaneous reduction in glomerular filtration rate, and a fall in the gfr level during drug-induced diuresis do not explain the decreased value.
17	cystic fibrosis of the pancreas diagnosis by sodium electrode sweat tests	Kystic fibrosis of the pancreas diagnosis by sodium electrode sweatshirt tests.
17	the binding of sodium dodecyl sulphate to various proteins	Binding of sodium dodecyl sulfate to various proteins.
17	nitrification importance to nutrient losses from a cutover forested ecosystem	The importance of nitrification for nutrient losses from forests; a forest ecosystem that is clear-cut.
17	human immunity to the meningococcus 3 preparation and immunochemical properties of the group a group b and group c meningococcal polysaccharides	Human immunity to meningococcal 3 preparation and immunochemical properties of meningococcal group a b and c polysaccharides.
17	effect of changes in renal perfusion pressure on the suppression of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption due to saline loading	Effect of changes in renal perfusion pressure on the suppression of saline-induced proximal tubular sodium reabsorption.
17	the effect of sodium and calcium on the action potential of the smooth muscle of the guinea pig taenia coli	Lapses; effect of sodium and calcium on potential; action of smooth muscle of the taenia coli guinea pig.
17	effect of a saline environment on sodium transport by the toad colon	Effect of salt environment on sodium transport by toad colon.
17	factors affecting mucosal water and sodium transfer in everted sacs of rat jejunum	Factors affecting the mucous water and sodium transfer in returned rat jejunum bags.
17	metabolic studies aldosterone secretion rate and plasma renin after carbenoxolone sodium	Metabolic study of rate of secretion of aldosterone and plasma renin following sodium carbenoxolone.
17	a study of the end plate potential in sodium deficient solution	A study of the potential of terminal plaque in sodium-deficient solution.
17	nonsteady state three compartment tracer kinetics ii sodium flux transients in the toad urinary bladder in response to short circuit	Non-stationary kinetics of three-compartment tracers ii transient sodium flux into the toad bladder in response to short-circuit.
17	effects of sodium concentration and osmolality on water and electrolyte absorption form the intact human colon	The effects of sodium concentration and osmolality on body weight, water and body weight, and on the absorption of sodium and electrolyte form the intact human colon.
17	current voltage relations during illumination photoreceptor membrane of a barnacle	Current voltage relationships during the process; photoreceptor membrane illumination; and a barnacle.
17	sodium inactivation in nerve fibers	Inactivation of sodium in nerve fibers.
17	intra hepatic vascular response to sodium nitrite	Intrapatic vascular response to sodium nitrite.
17	sodium and calcium components of action potentials in the aplysia giant neurone	Sodium and calcium components of d&apos potentials; action in giant neuron of apos; aplysia.
17	the action of ethacrynic acid on sodium efflux from single toad oocytes	L' action of apos; ethacrynic acid on apos; sodium efflux from oocytes of isolated toads.
17	action of amphotericin b on the toad bladder evidence for sodium transport along two pathways	L' action of apos; amphotericin b on the bladder of the toad indicates apos; existence of apos; two-way sodium transport.
17	renin aldosterone system in parkinson s disease	Kidney dysfunction-aldosterone in Parkinson's Disease.
17	antagonistic effect of monovalent cations in maintenance of cellular integrity of a marine bacterium	Antagonistic effect of monovalent cations in maintenance of cell walls; cellular integrity of plants; a marine bacterium.
17	cation interactions and biochemical composition of the cell envelope of a marine bacterium	Cationic interactions and biochemical composition of the cells; cell envelope; a marine bacterium.
17	ionic interactions in acetylcholine contraction of the denervated rat diaphragm	Ion interactions in acetylcholine contraction of denervated rat diaphragm.
17	micropuncture studies of the sweat formation in cystic fibrosis patients	Micropuncture sweat formation studies in cystic fibrosis patients.
17	the relationship between peritubular capillary protein concentration and fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule	The relationship between peritubular capillary protein concentration and reabsorption of fluid by the renal proximal tubule.
17	metabolism and rate of secretion of aldosterone in the bullfrog	Metabolism and secretion rate of bullfrogs; aldosterone.
17	comparison of the effects of water deprivation and sodium chloride imbibition on the hormone content of the neurohypophysis of the rat	Comparison of the effects of sodium chloride starvation and sodium chloride starvation on the hormone content of rat neurohypophysis.
17	tetrodotoxin resistant electric activity in presynaptic terminals	Tetrodotoxin-resistant electrical activity in presynaptic terminals.
17	brain lesions in an infant rhesus monkey treated with monsodium glutamate	Brain damage in a baby rhesus monkey treated with mussodium glutamate.
17	diarrhoea associated with medullary carcinoma of the thyroid	Diarrhea associated with spinal cord carcinoma of the thyroid.
17	circulatory changes and renin secretion in sheep in response to feeding	Circulatory changes and renin secretion in sheep in response to feeding.
17	role of acetate in the reduction of plasma free fatty acids produced by ethanol in man	The role of l' acetate in the reduction of the plasma free fatty acids produced by l' ethanol in l' man.
17	phage typing scheme for salmonella braenderup	Phage typing scheme for salmonella braenderup.
17	on the mechanism of action of aldosterone	On the mechanism of apos; action of the apos; aldosterone.
17	synaptic current at the squid giant synapse	Synaptic current to squid giant synapse.
17	membrane potential as the sum of ionic and metabolic components	The membrane potential is the sum of the ionic and metabolic components.
17	renal excretion of calcium and sodium in acute nephritis	L' acute renal excretion of calcium and sodium in nephritis.
17	production of mouse urinary bladder carcinomas by sodium cyclamate	The production of mouse-bladder carcinomas by sodium cyclamate.
17	comparison of methods for tuberculosis bacteriology	Comparison of tuberculosis bacteriological methods.
17	23na nuclear magnetic resonance relaxation studies of sodium ion interaction with soluble rna	Nuclear magnetic resonance relaxation studies of l&apos 23na; interaction of l' sodium ion with soluble rna.
17	spontaneous and evoked activity of motor nerve endings in calcium ringer	Spontaneous and evoked activity of motor nerve terminals in the calcium ring.
17	the action potential in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig taenia coli and ureter studied by the double sucrose gap method	The action potential of taenia coli and guinea-pig ureter in smooth muscle was studied by the double-band sucrose gap method.
17	effect of sodium ions on calcium movements in isolated synaptic terminals	Effects of sodium ions on calcium movement in isolated synaptic terminals.
17	determination of iodine concentration and distribution in rat thyroid follicles by electron probe microanalysis	Determination of concentration and distribution of apo; iodine in rat thyroid follicles by apo microanalysis; use of electronic probes.
17	change of tubular reabsorption of sodium and water after renal denervation in the dog	Changes in tubular reabsorption of sodium and d' water after renal denervation in dog.
17	nuclear magnetic resonance studies of sodium ions in isolated frog muscle and liver	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies of sodium ions in isolated frog muscle and liver were performed.
17	the relation of membrane changes ot contraction in twitch muscle fibres	There is a change in the relationship between membrane and contraction in twitch muscle fibers.
17	contractile repriming in snake twitch muscle fibres	Repair of contractions in muscle fibers of twitching snake.
17	production of an artifact during methanolysis of lipids by boron trifluoride methanol	Production of d' an artifact during lipid methanolysis by boron methanol trifluoride.
17	sodium influxes in internally perfused squid giant axon during voltage clamp	Sodium influx into the giant squid axon perfused during voltage clamp.
17	potential differences between mother and foetus at different gestational ages in the rat rabbit and guinea pig	Potential maternal and fetal differences at different gestational ages in rabbit and guinea pig.
17	mechanisms regulating the renal excretion of sodium during pregnancy	Mechanisms by which sodium is regulated; renal sodium excretion during pregnancy.
17	current separations in myxicola giant axons	Current separations in the giant myxicola axons.
17	the effect of acute changes in haematocrit in the anaesthetized dog on the volume and character of the urine	Lapos; effect of acute changes in the apos; hematocrit in anesthetized dog on volume and character of the apos; urine.
17	the effect of urea loading on volume and concentration of urine in rabbits	The effect of weight on the volume and concentration of urine in rabbits.
17	mechanism of bicarbonate absorption and its relationship to sodium transport in the human jejunum	Mechanisms; absorption of bicarbonate and its relation to sodium transport in the human jejunum.
17	interrelationships of chloride bicarbonate sodium and hydrogen transport in the human ileum	Interrelationship between transport of sodium bicarbonate chloride and d*apos; hydrogen in human ileum.
17	defect in urinary acidification induced in vitro by amphotericin b	Dysfunction; urinary acidification induced by in vitro exposure; and amphotericin b.
17	isolation and partial characterization of an immunogenic moiety obtained from salmonella typhimurium	Isolation and partial characterization of a Salmonella typhimurium-derived immunogenic fraction.
17	resistance of pseudomonas to quaternary ammonium compounds i growth in benzalkonium chloride solution	Resistance of pseudomonads to quaternary ammonium compounds grown in benzalkonium chloride solution.
17	microbiological study of water softener resins	Microbiological study of softening resins in water.
17	the effect of electrical stimulation and ouabain on the uptake and efflux of l u 14c valine in chopped tissue from guinea pig cerebral cortex	The effects of electrical stimulation and apos; ouabain on the apos; absorption and apos; efflux of u 14c valine into guinea pig cerebral cortical tissue.
17	method for quantitating formaldehyde gas in air	Quantification method for gaseous formaldehyde in air.
17	diuretics in cardiac edema 1969	Diuretics in heart disease, 1969.
17	the interaction of monosodium urate with connective tissue components	L' interaction of monosodium urate with connective tissue (CT) components.
17	direct evidence from nuclear magnetic resonance studies for bound sodium in forg skeletal muscle	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies have revealed the presence of bound sodium in intact skeletal muscle.
17	evidence for a single stranded adenovirus associated virus genome isolation and separation of complementary single strands	In addition, there is the possibility of a single strand; adenovirus associated with the virus; isolation of the genome of the virus and separation of complementary single strands.
17	ionic channels and nerve membrane lipids cholesterol tetrodotoxin interaction	Key words: ion channels and nerve membrane lipids; tetrodotoxin-cholesterol interaction.
17	growth from spores of clostridium perfringens in the presence of sodium nitrite	Growth from clostridium perfringens spores in the presence of sodium nitrite.
17	inhibition of the effects of angiotensin ii on adrenal steroid production by dietary sodium	L' inhibition of the effects of angiotensin ii on the production of dietary sodium adrenal steroids.
17	na plus facilitated reactions of neutral amino acids with a cationic amino acid transport system	In addition, it facilitates the reaction of neutral amino acids with a cationic amino acid transport system.
17	hypernatraemia special problems with angiocardiography in total anomalous pulmonary venous drainage	Hypernatraemia special problems with angiocardiography in total anomal pulmonary venous drainage.
17	assessment of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption during water diuresis in patients with heart disease	Evaluation of the proximal tubular sodium reabsorption during water diuresis in patients with cardiac disease.
17	spectrophotometric methods for monitoring the microbial transformation of steroids i determination of 9 alpha fluorohydrocortisone and 9 alpha fluoro 16 alpha hydroxyhydrocortisone in fermentation broths	Spectrophotometric methods for monitoring steroid microbial transformation i determination of 9 alpha fluorohydrocortisone and 9 alpha fluoro 16 alpha hydroxyhydrocortisone in fermentation broth.
17	enzymatic analysis of the requirement for sodium in aerobic growth of salmonella typhimurium on citrate	Enzymatic analysis of sodium requirements in the aerobic growth of Salmonella typhimurium on citrate.
17	enlargement of taurocholate micelles by added cholesterol and monoolein self diffusion measurements	Brightening taurocholate micelles with apos; addition of cholesterol and d&apos measurements; auto-monolein release.
17	effects of increased sodium delivery on distal tubular sodium reabsorption with and without volume expansion in man	Effects of increased intake of sodium on sodium reabsorption in distal tubules, with and without volume expansion in men.
17	acetate and bicarbonate in the correction of uraemic acidosis	Bicarbonate and acetate in the correction of uremic acidosis.
17	neutron activation analysis of manganese and sodium in bacterial cells	Neutron activation analysis of manganese and sodium from bacterial cells.
17	an accuate method for measurement of aldosterone production	Accuate method to measure production of apos; aldosterone.
17	synaptic potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method from the rabbit superior cervical ganglion	Recorded synaptic potentials by the rabbit superior cervical ganglion sucrose gap method.
17	effects of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate on renal function in the rabbit	Effects of apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate on renal function in rabbits.
17	endocrine and metabolic disordes in bronchial carcinoma	Histopathological and endocrine Disorders in Bronchial Cancer.
17	proteins of avian tumor viruses with different coat antigens	Avian tumor virus proteins with different skin antigens.
17	lipid composition of chlamydia psittaci grown in monkey kidney cells in defined medium	Lipid composition of chlamydia psittaci grown in monkey kidney cells in a defined medium.
17	time course of the sodium influx in squid giant axon during a single voltage clamp pulse	L' temporal evolution of the apos; sodium influx into the giant squid axon during a single voltage imposed pulse.
17	sodium dependency of l alanine absorption in canine thiry vella loops	Sodium dependence of adults; absorption of alanine in pubescent dog vella loops.
17	the role of sodium current in the radial spread of contraction in frog muscle fibers	The role of sodium current in radial diffusion of contraction in frog muscle fibers.
17	effect of intraluminal ph on the absorption of pteroylmonoglutamic acid	Effect of intraluminal ph on apos absorption; absorption of apos; pteroylmonoglutamic acid.
17	growth of pseudomonas fluorescens with sodium maleate as a carbon source	Growth of pseudomonas fluorescens with sodium malate as carbon source.
17	growth responses of escherichia coli to the surfactant dodecyl benzene sulfonate	Growth reactions of Escherichia coli with dodecyl benzene sulfonate surfactant.
17	effect of sodium fluorescein and plating medium on recovery of irradiated escherichia coli and serratia marcescens from aerosols	The effect of sodium fluorescein and the culture medium on the recovery of escherichia coli and serratia marcescens irradiated in aerosols.
17	the effect of altered sodium concentration in the distal nephron segments on renin release	L' effect of alteration of sodium concentration in distal nephron segments on renin release.
17	on the role of antidiuretic hormone in the inhibition of acute water diuresis in adrenal insufficiency and the effects of gluco and mineralocorticoids in reversing the inhibition	On the role of glucos; antidiuretic hormone in apo; inhibition of acute aqueous diuresis in apo; adrenal insufficiency and effects of gluco and mineralocorticoids in reversal of apo; inhibition.
17	changes in bone sodium and carbonate in metabolic acidosis and alkalosis in the dog	Changes in sodium and bone carbonate in dogs; metabolic acidosis and liver; alkalosis.
17	postglomerular vascular protein concentration evidence for a causal role in governing fluid reabsorption and glomerulotublar balance by the renal proximal tubule	The concentration of post-<-> glomerular vascular proteins indicates a causal role in the regulation of reabsorption of fluid and l' glomerulotublar balance by the renal proximal tubule.
17	disproportionate inhibition of sodium reabsorption in the unilaterally diseased kidney of dog and man after an acute saline load	Disproportionate inhibition of sodium reabsorption in the dog's unilaterally diseased kidney; man after an acute saline load.
17	nitrification of aspartate by aspergillus flavus	Nitrification of apos; aspartate by apos; aspergillus flavus.
17	sodium inactivation experimental test of two models	Apos experimental test; sodium inactivation of two models.
17	an investigation of alpha methyl amino acids and their derivatives on isolated tissue preparations	A study of alpha-methyl-amino acids and their derivatives in isolated tissue preparations.
17	vaccinia virus structural polypeptide derived from a high molecular weight precursor formation and integration into virus particles	Structural polypeptide of the vaccine virus derived from the formation of d&apos, a high molecular weight precursor and its integration into virus particles.
17	lpp 1 infection of the blue green alga plectonema boryanum 3 protein synthesis	Infection 1 of the protein synthesis of the plant; blue-green alga-green plectonema boryanum 3.
17	factors affecting the secretion of staphylococcal enterotoxin a	Factors affecting the secretion of ectomycorrhizal parasites; staphylococcal enterotoxin a.
17	electrical potentials of the sigmoid colon and rectum in irritable bowel syndrome and ulcerative colitis	Electrical potentials of sigmoid colon and rectum in irritable bowel syndrome and ulcerative colitis.
17	theoretical and experimental basis for a specific countertransport system in membranes	Theoretical and experimental basis for a specific contra @-@membrane transport system.
17	renin secretion an anatomical basis for tubular control	Renin secretion is an anatomical basis for tubular control.
17	reversible osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier	Reversible osmotic opening of the blood/blood barrier-encephalic.
17	partial purification and properties of a highly specific trehalose phosphate phosphatase from mycobacterium smegmatis	Partial purification and phosphate phosphatase properties of a highly specific mycobacterium smegmatis trehalose phosphate phosphatase.
17	paracrystalline sheets reaggregated from solubilized exosporium of bacillus cereus	Paracrystalline leaves reaggregated from solubilized bacillus cereus exosporium.
17	linear single stranded deoxyribonucleic acid isolated from kilham rat virus	Linear, single-strand, deoxyribonucleic acid isolated from rat virus kilham.
17	ultracentrifugal analysis of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Ultra-centrifugal staphylococcal alpha toxin analysis.
17	genetic heterogeneity in streptococcus mutans	Genetic heterogeneity in the streptococcus mutans.
17	the distribution of inorganic cations in mouse testis electron microscope and microprobe analysis	The distribution of inorganic cations in mouse testis, electron microscopy, and microprobe analysis.
17	effects of batrachotoxin on membrane potential and conductance of squid giant axons	The effects of batrachotoxin on the membrane potential and conductance of giant squid axons.
17	angiotensin forming enzyme in brain tissue	Apos; apos-forming enzyme; angiotensin in brain tissue.
17	structural proteins of simian virus 40	Structural proteins of the simian virus.
17	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of rous sarcoma virus kinetics of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and specificity of the products	Viral deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases rous sarcoma kinetic synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid and product specificity.
17	structural proteins of rabies virus	They're structural proteins from the rabies virus.
17	number and molecular weights of foot and mouth disease virus capsid proteins and the effects of maleylation	Number and molecular weight of FMD virus capsid proteins and effects of maleylation.
17	separation and structure of components of nuclear polyhedrosis virus of the silkworm	Separation and structure of the nuclear polyhedrosis virus (NPSV) components of the silkworm.
17	infectivity and sedimentation of rhinovirus ribonucleic acid	Infectivity and sedimentation of the ribonucleic acid rhinovirus.
17	early intracellular events in the replication of t4 bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acid vii 32p suicide stabilization	The first intracellular events of replication of bacteriophage t4 of the deoxyribonucleic acid vii 32p of the suicidal stabilization.
17	determination of hydrogen sulfide in fermentation broths containing so 2	Determination of Dapos sulphide; hydrogen in fermentation broths containing Dapos 2.
17	nonelectrolyte permeability sodium influx electrical potentials and axolemma ultrastructure in squid axons of various diameters	Nonlectrolyte sodium permeability electrical potentials and axolemma ultrastructure in squid axons of various diameters.
17	purification and properties of colicin k	Purification and properties of Colicin k.
17	effect of simulated solar radiation and sodium fluorescein on the recovery of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus from aerosols	Effect of simulated solar radiation and sodium fluorescein on the recovery of Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis from aerosols.
17	new quantitative qualitative and confirmatory media for rapid analysis of food for clostridium perfringens	New qualitative and confirmatory quantitative media for Clostridium perfringens; rapid food analysis for Clostridium perfringens.
17	removal of nonidet p40 absorbance for optical density monitoring of cytoplasmic ribonucleic acid	Removal of l' absorbance nonidet p40 for monitoring optical density of l' cytoplasmic ribonucleic acid.
17	absorption of sodium and water by human rectum measured by a dialysis method	Absorption of sodium and d' water through the human rectum is measured by a dialysis method.
17	inactivation of t antigen forming capacites of simian virus 40 and adenovirus 12 by ultraviolet irradiation	Inactivation of the apos; t-antigen forming the abilities of simian virus 40 and apos; adenovirus 12 by ultraviolet irradiation.
17	characterization of the genome of cytoplasmic polyhedrosis virus	Characterization of cytoplasmic polyhedrosis virus genome.
17	electron microscope study of ribonucleic acid of myxoviruses	Electron microscopic study of l' myxovirus ribonucleic acid.
17	renal effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and dibutyryl adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate evidence for a role for adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption	The renal effects of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and dibutyryl adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate suggest that l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate plays a role in the regulation of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption.
17	ostnatal development of renal function micropuncture and clearance studies in the dog	Ostnatal development of micropuncture-induced renal function and clearance studies in dogs.
17	intracortical distribution of number and volume of glomeruli during postnatal maturation in the dog	Intracortical distribution of number and volume of glomeruli during dog postnatal maturation.
17	a stored charge model for the sodium channel	This is a model of a stored charge for the sodium channel.
17	accelerated reabsorption in the proximal tubule produced by volume depletion	Accelerated reabsorption into the proximal tubule of the skin caused by volume depletion.
17	dicarboxylic amino acid influx across brush border of rabbit ileum effects of amino acid charge on the sodium amino acid interaction	Influx of d' dicarboxylic amino acids across the brush border of the apos; rabbit ileum effects of d&apos loading; amino acids on the apos; interaction of sodium amino acids.
17	composition of the sulfur particle of chromatium vinosum strain d	Sulfur particle composition of chromatium vinosum d.
17	studies on escherichia coli sex factors evidence that covalent circles exist within cells and the general problem of isolation of covalent circles	Studies of sexual factors in Escherichia coli have shown that there are covalent circles in the interior of cells and the general problem of insulation; isolation of covalent circles.
17	nitrogenase activity in cell free extracts of the blue green alga anabaena cylindrica	L' nitrogenase activity in extracts of l' blue algae-green anabaena cylindrica.
17	cell wall and peptidoglycan from lactobacillus fermenti	Lactobacillus fermenti cell wall and peptidoglycan.
17	analysis of sodium transport in the amphibian oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques	Analysis of sodium transport by extractive and radioautographic techniques; oocyte of amphibian.
17	optical studies on the kinetics of the sodium pump in mammalian non myelinated nerve fibres	Optical kinetics studies of the sodium pump in nonmyelinated mammalian nerve fibers.
17	on the control of glycogenolysis in mammalian nervous tissue by calcium	On calcium control of glycogenolysis in mammalian nerve tissue.
17	on the mechanisms of sodium ion transport by the irrigated gills of rainbow trout salmo gairdneri	On the mechanisms of sodium ion transport by irrigated rainbow trout gills-in-rainbow trout gairdneri.
17	formation of protoplasts from resting spores	Protoplast formation from resting spores.
17	experimental alteration of coupling resistance at an electrotonic synapse	Experimental modification of coupling strength to an electrotonic synapse.
17	mechanism of compensatory renal hypertrophy	Mechanisms of repair and replacement; compensatory renal hypertrophy.
17	angiotensin ii vascular receptors their avidity in relationship to sodium balance the autonomic nervous system and hypertension	Angiotensin receives vascular receptors whose avidity is linked to the apos, the sodium balance of the autonomic nervous system and the apos, and high blood pressure.
17	energetics of sodium transport in frog skin ii the effects of electrical potential on oxygen consumption	Sodium transport energy in frog skin ii effects of electrical potential on consumption of oxygen.
17	changes in total body calcium and sodium in osteomalacia	Changes in total calcium and sodium levels in the body; osteomalacia.
17	na and ca components of action potential in amphioxus muscle cells	Na and ca components of the apos potential; action in the muscle cells of the apos; amphioxus.
17	the effect of metal ions and antidiuretic hormone on oxygen consumption in toad bladder	The effects of metal ions and lipids; antidiuretic hormone on appetite; oxygen in toad bladder.
17	the sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect of sodium on alanine fluxes	L' interaction of sodium alanine in rabbit ileum; effect of sodium on sodium fluxes; alanine fluxes.
17	the sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect of alanine on sodium fluxes	L' sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum; sodium flux alanine.
17	proximal tubular function in dogs with thoracic caval constriction	Proximal tubular functions in dogs with thoracic constriction of the thoracic cavity.
17	slow sodium an oral slowly released sodium chloride preparation	Sodium chloride prepared orally and released slowly by the oral route.
17	the influence of the carbonic anhydrase inhibitor benzolamide cl 11 366 on the reabsorption of chloride sodium and bicarbonate in the proximal tubule of the rat	L' influence of apos; benzolamide inhibitor; benzolamide carbonic anhydrase cl 11366 on the reabsorption of sodium chloride and bicarbonate in the rat proximal tubule.
17	effect of peritubular protein concentration on reabsorption of sodium and water in isolated perfused proxmal tubules	Effect of peritubular protein concentration on reabsorption of sodium and d' water content in isolated perfused proxmal tubules.
17	evidence for a direct action of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol on the renal transport of phosphate sodium and calcium	Evidence of a direct action of both cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol on the renal transport of sodium phosphate and calcium.
17	plasma aldosterone concentration at delivery and during the newborn period	Concentration of plasma aldosterone at birth and during neonatal period.
17	effect of chronic bile duct obstruction on renal handling of salt and water	Chronic obstruction of the bile duct on the renal handling of salt and lapos; water.
17	the influence of angiotensin infusion on the urine composition in individual kidney function tests	Lapos; influence of infusion of apos; angiotensin on composition of apos; urine in individual kidney function tests.
17	the recovery of resting potential and input resistance in sheep heart injured by knife or laser	The re-establishment of the resting potential and resistance of sheep that have been injured by a knife or laser.
17	studies on the porphobilinogen deaminase uroporphyrinogen cosynthetase system of cultured soya bean cells	Studies of the system of porphobilinogen deaminase uroporphyrinogen cosynthetase in soybean cultured cells.
17	intrarenal distribution of blood flow and cortico medullary sodium gradient after unilateral splanchnicotomy in the dog	Intrarenal distribution of blood flow and the cortico sodium gradient-medullary after unilateral splanchnicotomy in dogs.
17	membrane calcium current in ventricular myocardial fibres	Membrane calcium current in ventricular myocardial fibers.
17	the relation between membrane potential membrane currents and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibres	The relationship between potential membrane currents and l' activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibers.
17	the binding of tetrodotoxin to nerve membranes	How tetrodotoxin binds to nerve membranes.
17	the frequency dependent character of the membrane capacity in cardiac purkyn fibres	Frequency dependence of membrane capacity in cardiac purkyn fibres.
17	loss of the penicillinase plasmid after treatment of staphylococcus aureus with sodium dodecyl sulfate	Treatment of staphylococcus aureus with sodium dodecyl sulfate resulted in loss of the penicillinase plasmid.
17	effect of membrane lipid composition on the allosteric inhibition by sodium of the ca 2 adenosine triphosphatase from escherichia coli	Effect of membrane lipid composition on apos; allosteric sodium inhibition of apos; adenosine triphosphatase d' about 2 d' escherichia coli.
17	antimicrobial activity of sodium n alkylsalicylates	Antimicrobial activity in sodium alkylsalicylates.
17	the relationship of amniotic fluid sodium to the latent period of saline abortion	The relationship between sodium in the amniotic fluid and the latent period of the salt abortion.
17	renal handling of sodium and water in the hypothyroid rat clearance and micropuncture studies	Renal manipulation of sodium and sodium; water in clearance and micropuncture studies in hypothyroid rats.
17	effects of sodium warfarin on capillary ultrastructure	Effects of sodium warfarin (SSA) on the apos; capillary ultrastructure.
17	thermoregulation around a new set point established in the monkey by altering the ratio of sodium to calcium ions within the hypothalamus	The thermoregulation around apos; a new threshold established in monkeys by changing the ratio of sodium to calcium ions in the apos; hypothalamus.
17	irreversibility of methylandrostenediol induced hypertension in the rat after suspension of the androgen treatment	L' irreversibility of methylandrostenediol induced apos; hypertension in rats after suspension of androgen treatment.
17	effects of sodium intake on inherited hypertension in the rat	Effects of apo; sodium absorption on apo; hereditary hypertension in rat.
17	radioautographic localization of sodium pump sites in rabbit intestine	Radioautographic localization of sodium pump sites in the rabbit intestine.
17	recurrent hyperkalaemia due to selective aldosterone deficiency correction by angiotensin infusion	Recurrent hyperkalemia due to selective correction of apos; aldosterone deficiency by infusion of apos; angiotensin.
17	angiotensin sodium interaction in blood pressure maintenance of renal hypertensive and normotensive rats	Sodium angiotensin in the maintenance of blood pressure in normotensive and hypertensive renal rats.
17	photodynamic alteration of sodium currents in lobster axons	Photodynamic alteration of sodium currents in axons of lobster.
17	the renal functional defect of postobstructive nephyropathy the effects of bilateral ureteral obstruction in the rat	L' renal functional abnormality of neophysiology post-obstruction; bilateral ureteral obstruction in rat.
17	plasma renin levels and vascular complications in hypertension	High blood pressure, plasma renin levels and vascular complications.
17	micropuncture studies of phosphate transport in the proximal tubule of the dog the relationship to sodium reabsorption	Micropuncture studies of phosphate transport in the dog proximal tubule related to sodium reabsorption.
17	interdependence of exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration in determining blood pressure in patients treated by maintenance dialysis	Interdependence of exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration in the determination of arterial blood pressure in patients treated with D&apos dialysis; maintenance.
17	beta blockers and plasma renin activity in hypertension	Beta-blockers and plasma renin activity in the apos; hypertension.
17	indentification of an intestinal sodium and calcium dependent phosphatase stimulated by parathyroid hormone	Identification of a sodium and calcium-stimulated intestinal phosphatase; parathyroid hormone.
17	effect of acute and chronic calcium administration on plasma renin	Dosage effects; chronic and acute administration of calcium to plasma renin.
17	intrapartum hypertension and intravenous saline	Intrapartum hypertension and intravenous saline.
17	hemodynamic and humoral characteristics of hypertension induced by prolonged stellate ganglion stimulation in conscious dogs	Hemodynamic and humoral characteristics of the vascular system; hypertension induced by prolonged stellate ganglion stimulation in conscious dogs.
17	control plasma renin activity and changes in sympathetic tone as determinants of minoxidil induced increase in plasma renin activity	L' plasma renin activity and changes in sympathetic tone as determinants of minoxidil induced an increase in l' plasma renin activity.
17	the effect of sodium salicylate on bile secretion in the dog	L' effect of sodium salicylate on biliary secretion in dogs.
17	detection of low renin hypertension evaluation of out patient renin stimulating methods	Prevalence of hypertension among reindeer in the United States.
17	relationships of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system and sodium balance to blood pressure regulation in chronic renal failure of polycystic kidney disease	Relationship between the renin system @-@angiotensin-aldosterone and l*apos; sodium balance, d*apos; and blood pressure regulation, d*apos; on the other hand, in apos; chronic renal failure of polycystic renal disease.
17	normal plasma renin activity in low renin hypertension	L' plasma renin activity in apos; low renin arterial hypertension is normal.
17	effects of renal nerves on renal hemodynamics i direct stimulation and carotid occlusion	Effects of renal nerves on renal hemodynamics, direct stimulation and carotid occlusion.
17	regulation of protein phosphorylation and sodium transport in toad bladder	Regulation of toad protein phosphorylation and sodium transport in bladder.
17	sodium stimulus for puddling behavior by tiger swallowtail butterflies papilio glaucus	Sodic stimulation of the behaviour of puddles; water in papilio glaucus moths with tails; tiger swallow.
17	reciprocation of renin dependency with sodium volume dependency in renal hypertension	J' studied the relationship between the renin response and the volume dependence of sodium in renal hypertension.
17	clinical determinants of survival from postoperative renal failure	Clinical determinants of survival; postoperative renal failure.
17	effect of angiotensin ii and an angiotensin ii inhibitor on renin secretion in the dog	Effect of apos; angiotensin ii and dos; apos inhibitor; angiotensin ii on renin secretion in dogs.
17	hypertension due to renal artery stenosis in transplanted kidneys	Hypertension due to luteal stenosis; renal artery in transplanted kidneys.
17	role of angiotensin ii in experimental renal hypertension in the rabbit	The role of l' angiotensin ii in apos; experimental renal hypertension in rabbits.
17	prorenin in human plasma	Prolinein in the human plasma stream.
17	urinary kallikrein excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats	L' urinary excretion of kallikrein in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	effect of varying perfusion pressures on the output of sodium and renin and the vascular resistance in kidneys of rats with post salt hypertension and kyoto spontaneous hypertension	Effect of varying infusion pressures on sodium and renin release and vascular resistance in kidneys of rats with d*apos; post-hypertension-salt and d*apos; spontaneous kyoto hypertension.
17	a circulating renin activator in essential hypertension	Renin activator circulating in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	renal prostaglandin synthesis in the goldblatt hypertensive rat	Renal prostaglandin synthesis in Goldblatt hypertensive rat.
17	renal control of sodium and fluid balance in newborn infants during intravenous maintenance therapy	Renal control of the apos; sodium and fluid balance in newborns born during intravenous maintenance.
17	an essential ionized acid group in sodium channels	This is an essential ionized acid group in the sodium channels.
17	effects of an acetyl coenzyme a carboxylase inhibitor and a sodium sparing diuretic on aldosterone stimulated sodium transport lipid synthesis and phospholipid fatty acid composition in the toad urinary bladder	The effects of acetyl coenzyme, a carboxylase inhibitor, and d' sodium-sodium-saving diuretic; aldosterone stimulate lipid synthesis and phospholipid fatty acid composition of toad bladder sodium transport.
17	studies of renin and aldosterone in cirrhotic patients with ascites	Renin and apos studies; aldosterone in cirrhotic patients with apo; ascites.
17	effects of sodium depletion on plasma renin activity and on the urinary excretion of cyclic amp and aldosterone in hypoparathyroid patients	Effects of sodium depletion on apo; plasma renin activity and apo; urinary apo excretion; cyclic ampulla and apo; aldosterone in hypoparathyroid patients.
17	the relationship between kallikrein and water excretion and the conditional relationship between kallikrein and sodium excretion	The relationship between kallikrein and apos; phosphate excretion; water and the conditional relationship between kallikrein and apos; sodium excretion.
17	control of plasma renin activity in chronic stable renal disease	Control of the apo; plasma renin activity in the apo; chronic renal failure.
17	vascular angiotensin ii receptors and sodium balance in rats role of kidneys and vascular renin activity	Vascular angiotensin ii, receptors and sodium balance in rats, role of the kidneys and vascular renin activity.
17	role of acth in regulation of aldosterone secretion	The role of the apos; acth in the regulation of the secretion of apos; aldosterone.
17	effect of progesterone on renal sodium handling in man relation to aldosterone excretion and plasma renin activity	Effect of progesterone on the handling of renal sodium in apos; man in relation to apos; excretion of apos; aldosterone and apos; plasma renin activity.
17	diuretics urate excretion and sodium reabsorption effect of acetazolamide and urinary alkalinization	Effect of Lipos; acetazolamide on appetite; urinary excretion and sodium reabsorption of diuretics and lipos; urinary alkalinization.
17	marked elevation of plasma renin activity during post diuretic sodium conservation in furosemide stimulated subjects	A marked elevation of l' plasma renin activity during post-@ sodium diuretic storage in furosemide-stimulated subjects was observed.
17	hemodynamics compartments and the renin aldosterone system in chronic heart failure	Hemodynamic compartments and renin system-aldosterone in patients with chronic heart failure.
17	renal blood flow and its response to angiotensin ii an interaction between oral contraceptive agents sodium intake and the renin angiotensin system in healthy young women	Renal blood flow and its response to angiotensin ii, an interaction between oral sodium ingestion and renin in healthy young women.
17	effect of carbohydrate intake on the urinary excretion of magnesium calcium and sodium in fasting obese patients	Effect of apo; intake of carbohydrate on apo; urinary excretion of magnesium, calcium and sodium in fasted obese patients.
17	role of aldosterone in the initial stage of 2 forms of experimental vasorenal hypertension	Role of aldosterone in the initial phase of 2 forms of apos; experimental vasorenal hypertension.
17	the renin angiotensin system in rats with hereditary hydronephrosis	In hereditary hydronephrosis rats, the renin system-angiotensin.
17	changes of sodium appetite during the estrous cycle of sheep	Changes in appetite; sodic appetite during the sheep's estrous cycle.
17	production of aldosterone by the regenerated adrenal gland after neonatal autograft in the normal and the sodium deprived rat	Production of apos; aldosterone by the regenerated adrenal gland following neonatal autograft in normal and sodium-deprived rats.
17	sodium kinetics in aorta of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Sodium kinetics in rat aorta; spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	an inhibitor of sodium transport in the urine of dogs with normal renal function	An inhibitor of sodium transport in urine from normal renal function dogs.
17	control of plasma aldosterone in infancy and childhood a study of plasma renin activity plasma cortisol and plasma aldosterone	Apos control; early childhood and early childhood plasma aldosterone; childhood study; apo study; plasma renin activity; plasma cortisol and plasma aldosterone.
17	circadian rhythm of plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone in normal man and in renal allograft recipients	Apos circadian rhythm; plasma renin activity and apos; plasma aldosterone in apos; normal male and renal allograft recipients.
17	spontaneous changes in weight leg volume renin aldosterone and sex hormones in patients with cyclical oedema	In addition to the above-mentioned changes in leg volume, renin aldosterone and sex hormones in patients with apo; cyclic edema.
17	antagonism of the effects of furosemide by indomethacin in normal and hypertensive man	Indomethacin in normal and hypertensive man.
17	renal blockade to angiotensin ii in acute and chronic sodium retaining states	Angiotensin ii in acute and chronic sodium retention states.
17	sodium flux through the sodium channels of axon membrane fragments isolated from lobster nerves	Sodium flow in sodium channels of axonal membrane fragments isolated from lobster nerves.
17	the influence of ouabain on in vitro renin secretion and intracellular sodium	L' influence of ouabain on renin secretion in vitro and intracellular sodium.
17	effects of sodium and magnesium cations on the dark and light induced chlorophyll a fluorescence yields in sucrose washed spinach chloroplasts	The effects of sodium and magnesium cations on dark and light induce chlorophyll a fluorescence in sucrose-washed spinach chloroplasts.
17	high output heart failure in the dog systemic and intrarenal role of angiotensin ii	High-throughput heart failure in dogs due to systemic and intrarenal role of apos; angiotensin ii.
17	hypertension as a disease of modern society	L'apos; hypertension is a disease of modern society.
17	rapid infusion of sodium bicarbonate and albumin into high risk premature infants soon after birth a controlled prospective trial	Rapid infusion of sodium bicarbonate and d' high-risk preterm birth albumin soon after birth, as part of a prospective controlled trial.
17	the importance of sodium balance on the effect of angiotensin ii on aldosterone production	Lapos; importance of apos; sodium balance on apos; effect of apos; angiotensin ii on apos production; aldosterone.
17	diurnal variations of plasma aldosterone in supine man relationship to plasma renin activity and plasma cortisol	Diurnal changes in apo; plasma aldosterone in the relationship between the elongated male and the elongated male; plasma renin activity and plasma cortisol.
17	duration of central action of angiotensin ii estimated by its interaction with csf na	The duration of the central action of angiotensin II was estimated by its interaction with csf Na.
17	the distribution of sodium in aortic walls from spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats	Sodium distribution in aortic walls of spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats.
17	renin secretion from rat renal cortical cell suspensions	Renin secretion by renal cortical cell suspensions from the rat.
17	reversal of chronic renal hypertension role of salt and water excretion	Reversal of the role of eposylate; excretion of water and salt; chronic renal hypertension.
17	nmr in cancer vii sodium 23 magnetic resonance of normal and cancerous tissues	Rmn in vii sodium cancer 23 magnetic resonance imaging of normal and cancerous tissue.
17	aldactazide induced consummatory and operant responding to sodium by rats	Aldactazide induced a food and operative response to sodium in rats.
17	acute effect of nephrotoxic serum on renal sodium transport in the dog	Acute effect of nephrotoxic serum on renal sodium transport in dogs.
17	hypertension in terminal renal failure	Hypertension in the apos; end-stage renal failure.
17	the role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal human subjects	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal humans.
17	exaggerated phosphaturic response to volume expansion in patients with essential hypertension	Phosphaturic response to apos exaggerated; volume expansion in patients with apos; essential hypertension.
17	renal effects of prostaglandin e1 in hypertensive patients	Renal effects of prostaglandin e1 in hypertensive patients.
17	urinary kallikrein excretion and sodium metabolism in hypertensive patients	Urinary Kallikrein and sodium metabolism in hypertensive patients.
17	increased intestinal absorption in the rat caused by sodium lauryl sulphate and its possible relation to the camp system	An increase in the rate of intestinal absorption in the rat caused by sodium lauryl sulfate and its possible relationship to the encampment system.
17	actions of aldosterone on rrna and na transport in the toad bladder	The action of l' aldosterone on transport rrna and na in the toad bladder.
17	the influence of sodium intake on the pressor response to angiotensin ii in the unanaesthetized rat	L' influence of apos; sodium absorption on pressor response to apos; angiotensin ii in unanaesthetized rat.
17	urinary kallikrein in hypertensive animal models	Urinary Kallikrein in hypertensive animal models.
17	relationships among urinary kallikrein mineralocorticoids and human hypertensive disease	Relations between urinary kallikrein mineralocorticoids and human hypertensive diseases.
17	plasma renin activity and renal sodium and water excretion following infusion of arachidonic acid in rats	Lapos; plasma renin activity and apo; renal sodium and water excretion after infusion of apo; arachidonic acid in rat.
17	beta adrenergic blockade in essential hypertension reduced renin release despite renal vasoconstriction	Beta adrenergic blockade of the essential hypertension reduced renin release despite renal vasoconstriction.
17	intrapatient comparison of treatment with chlorthalidone spironolactone and propranolol in normoreninemic essential hypertension	Intrapatient comparison of chemotherapy with chlorthalidone spironolactone and propranolol in normoreninemic and essential hypertension.
17	pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of alprenolol in the treatment of hypertension ii relationship to its effect on blood pressure and plasma renin activity	Pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of the apo; alprenolol in the treatment of apo; hypertension ii related to its effect on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity.
17	separate roles of sodium ion concentration and fluid volumes in salt loading hypertension in sheep	Distinct roles of sodium ion concentration and fluid volumes in sheep; saline charge hypertension.
17	cellular basis for reversal of hyperkalemic electrocardiographic changes by sodium	Cellular basis for reversing hyperkaliemic electrocardiographic changes by sodium.
17	the effect of different preparations of human growth hormone on plasma renin activity in normal males	The effect of various preparations of human growth hormone (HGH) on the immune system; plasma renin activity in normal males.
17	correlation between juxtaglomerular index kidney renin content and plasma renin concentration in the rat	Renal renin content in rat juxtaglomerular index and plasma renin concentration correlate.
17	renal prostaglandins in relation to sodium regulation and hypertension	Renal prostaglandins in relation to the sodium regulation and l' hypertension.
17	effect of drugs affecting sodium permeability on the muscle spindle of frogs	Effects of medications affecting sodium permeability on frog muscle spindle.
17	the effect of active immunization against aldosterone on the colonic potential response and sodium excretion in rabbits	Lapos; effect of apos; active immunization against apos; aldosterone on colonic potential response and apos; rabbit sodium excretion.
17	calcium and sodium ions as charge carriers in the action potential of an identified snail neurone	Calcium and sodium ions as charge carriers in the potential d' action of a d&apos neuron; identified snail.
17	stimulation by aldosterone of the sodium efflux in barnacle muscle fibres effects of rna inhibitors and spironolactone	Apos stimulation; apos aldosterone; sodium efflux into goose muscle fibers; effects of rna and spironolactone inhibitors.
17	influence of sodium intake on vascular and adrenal angiotensin ii receptors	Influence of the apos; sodium absorption on vascular and adrenal receptors of the apos; angiotensin ii.
17	renin angiotensin system in hypertension after traumatic renal artery thrombosis	Dapos system; renin angiotensin in apos; thrombosis hypertension; traumatic renal artery.
17	renin dependency of blood pressure analysis by angiotensin ii antagonist p113 in hypertensive patients treated with salt depletion and propranolol	Angiotensin ii, p113, is dependent on renin in hypertensive patients treated with saline depletion and propranolol.
17	plasma renin activity angiotensin ii and aldosterone during intense heat stress	L' angiotensin ii and aldosterone plasma renin activity during intense heat stress.
17	influence of ethacrynic acid on intrarenal renin release mechanisms	Influence of ethacrynic acid on the mechanisms of release of intrarenal renin.
17	comparative evaluation of fractional excretion of sodium following saline infusion in transplanted kidneys and in isolated perfused kidneys in conditions of previous high or low dietary sodium intake	Comparative evaluation of apo; fractional excretion of sodium following saline infusion in transplanted and isolated perfused kidneys under drought conditions; high and low dietary sodium intake.
17	renin profiling in hypertension and its use in treatment with propranolol and chlorthalidone	Renin profileiling in hypertension and its use in propranolol and chlorthalidone treatment.
17	the effect of plasma calcium on plasma adh levels in anephric patients	Lapos; effect of plasma calcium on vascular levels; plasma adhesion in eviscerated patients.
17	renal tubular sodium reabsorption during the recovery from the oliguric phase of acute nephritis	Renal tubular sodium reabsorption during recovery of oliguric phase of acute nephritis.
17	phosphate transport by isolated renal brush border vesicles	Phosphate transport by isolated renal brush-edge phosphate vesicles.
17	plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration in children	Lapos; plasma renin activity and aldosterone levels in children.
17	the objective and timing of drug disposition studies appendix ii plasma concentrations of oxyphenbutazone in dogs given oxyphenbutazone or the calcium or sodium salts of its phosphate ester	Objective and schedule of studies on the drug; elimination of the drug Schedule ii Plasma concentrations of d' oxyphenbutazone in dogs receiving l' oxyphenbutazone or the calcium or sodium salts of its phosphate ester.
17	abnormal sodium transport in leucocytes from patients with essential hypertension and the effect of treatment	Sodium abnormal transport in leukocytes of patients with essential hypertension and stroke; treatment effect.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in congestive failure in conscious dogs	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in the apos; congestive insufficiency in conscious dogs.
17	the role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal man	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in the apos; cardiovascular homeostasis in the apos; normal man.
17	treatment of patients with severe hypertension by inhibition of angiotensin converting enzyme	Treatment of patients with apo; severe hypertension by apo inhibition; conversion enzyme; angiotensin.
17	effect of sodium intake on gentamicin nephrotoxicity in the rat	Effect of sodium poisoning on the nephrotoxicity of gentamicin in rats.
17	renal function in normo and hypertensive 50 year old males	Normal and hypertensive renal functions in 50-year-old men.
17	active and passive immunization against angiotensin ii in the rat and rabbit evidence for a normal regulation of the renin angiotensin system	L' active and passive immunization against angiotensin II in rats and rabbits, indicating normal regulation of the renin system-angiotensin.
17	effect of the angiotensin ii blocker 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on renal artery clip hypertension in the rat	Effect of apos blocker; angiotensin ii 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on apos; renal hypertension clip in rat.
17	effect of sodium intake on aldosterone and corticosterone production the serum sodium concentration and body weight in infant rats during weaning period	Effect of sodium; absorption of sodium on production of aldosterone and corticosterone, serum sodium concentration and body weight in newborn-rats born during the weaning period.
17	sodium transport by the colon of bufo marinus na uptake across the mucosal border	Sodium transport through the colon of bufo marinus na capture across the mucous border.
17	effect of intravenous frusemide on plasma renin concentration suppression of response in hypertension	Effect of intravenous frusemide on suppression of the plasma renin concentration response in apos; hypertension.
17	evidence for a humoral factor in unilaterally nephrectomized dogs stimulating renal growth in isolated canine kidneys	Evidence of apo; existence of apo; a humoral factor in unilaterally nephrectomized dogs, inducing renal growth in isolated dog kidneys.
17	content of total metabolic sodium in arterial hypertension of varying origin	Total metabolic sodium content in apo; high blood pressure; a variety of sources.
17	low renin hypertension a distinct entity	L' low renin hypertension is a separate, distinct entity.
17	plasma renin activity pra and aldosterone pa in patients with chronic glomerulonephritis gn and hypertension	In patients with chronic glomerulonephritis gn and d&apos, plasma renin activity pra and aldosterone pa; hypertension.
17	reciprocal relation between renin dependency and sodium dependency in essential hypertension	Relationship between renin dependence and sodium dependence in essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity pra and plasma aldosterone pa in hypertensive kidney allograft recipients	L' Plasma renin activity pra and aldosterone p in recipients of hypertensive renal allografts.
17	inhibition of the sodium inactivation of the nodal membrane by anemonia sulcata toxin ii	Inhibition of the node membrane; sodic inactivation of the node membrane by lupus sulcata toxin; anemony ii.
17	a method for measurement of angiotensin ii in tissues and its application to rat kidney	A method of measuring angiotensin ii in the tissues and its application to the kidney of a rat.
17	the renin aldosterone system and renal hemodynamics in patients with posttransplant hypertension	The renin system-aldosterone and l' renal hemodynamics in patients with apos; hypertension post-transplantation.
17	an assessment of the optimal range of dietary sodium for inducing a pause in laying	Evaluation of the optimal range of dietary sodium to cause a spawning pause.
17	circadian rhythms of serum renin activity and serum corticosterone prolactin and aldosterone concentrations in the male rat on normal and low sodium diets	Circadian rhythms; serum renin activity and serum levels of prolactin and d' aldosterone corticosterone in male rats fed a normal diet and a low sodium diet.
17	effect of indomethacin on cholera induced fluid movement unidirectional sodium fluxes and intestinal camp	Lapos; effect of apos; indomethacin on cholera induced one-way fluid movement of sodium and intestinal camp.
17	intrarenal site of action of calcium on renin secretion in dogs	Site d' intrarenal action of calcium on renin secretion in the dog.
17	a morphometric study on the pars intermedia of the hypophysis during impairment of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in sodium depleted mice	A morphometric study of the intermedia pars of the pituitary gland during apos; renin alteration-angiotensin-aldosterone in sodium-depleted mice.
17	effect of calcium gluconate infusion on renin in the dog	Effect of calcium gluconate infusion on reindeer foxes in dogs.
17	arterial and venous angiotensin ii in normal subjects relation to plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration and response to posture and volume changes	Venous and arterial angiotensin ii in normal subjects in relation to posture and volume changes; plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration; plasma aldosterone concentration.
17	the effects of altered sodium balance and adrenergic blockade on renin release induced in rats by angiotensin antagonism	Apo effects; apo alteration; sodium and apo balance; adrenergic blockade of apo-induced renin release; apo antagonism; angiotensin in rats.
17	the effects of des asp1 angiotensin ii on blood pressure plasma aldosterone concentration and plasma renin activity in the rabbit	The effects of asp1 angiotensin ii on blood pressure, concentration of apos; plasma aldosterone and l' plasma renin activity in rabbits.
17	aldosterone and sodium homeostasis in preterm infants	L' aldosterone and l' homeostasis sodium in preterm infants.
17	effect of renin angiotensin system on sodium intake	The effect of the renin system-angiotensin on glucose; absorption of sodium.
17	intrarenal renin angiotensin sodium interdependent mechanism controlling postclamp renal artery pressure and renin release in the conscious dog with chronic one kidney goldblatt hypertension	Interdependent mechanisms of apos; intrarenal renal sodium angiotensin controlling post-clamp renal arterial pressure and renin release in conscious dog with chronic hypertension of a Goldblatt kidney.
17	pressor response to 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii saralasin in hypertensive subjects	The pressor response to 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii saralasin in hypertensive subjects.
17	renal renin output during continuous intracarotid infusions of iso and hypertonic sodium chloride solutions in the rat	Renal renin flow during continuous intracarotid infusions of iso and hypertonic sodium chloride in the rat.
17	cardiovascular complications in matched pairs of low and normal renin hypertensive patients	Cardiovascular Complications in the paired pairs of normal hypertensive patients and weak renin hypertensive patients.
17	sensitivity of renin secretion to volume depletion in the anaesthetized dog comparison between urinary drainage and slow haemorrhage	Sensitivity of renin secretion to volume depletion in comparison between urine drainage and slow hemorrhage in anesthetized dogs.
17	stretch receptor model for renin release with evidence from perfused rat kidney	D&apos receptor model; Stretch for renin release with perfused rat kidney evidence.
17	incidence and pathophysiological changes in chronic two kidney hypertension in the dog	Chronic renal hypertension in the dog.
17	plasma renin activity following central infusion of angiotensin ii and altered csf sodium concentration in the conscious goat	L' plasma renin activity after central d' angiotensin ii and l' altered cardiovascular sodium concentration in conscious goat.
17	hypertension in end stage renal disease the relationship between blood pressure plasma renin plasma renin substrate and exchangeable sodium in chronic hemodialysis patients	Lapses; terminal hypertension; renal failure the relationship between plasma renin plasma blood pressure substrate and exchangeable sodium in patients with apo; chronic hemodialysis.
17	experimental studies of effects of acute renal venous congestion on renal function with particular reference to renal arterio venous plasma sodium difference	Experimental studies of the effects of acute renal venous congestion on renal function, particularly on the difference in plasma sodium arteriosus.
17	hypertension associated with early stage kidney disease complementary roles of circulating renin the body sodium volume state and duration of hypertension	Hypertension associated with the early stages of apo; Complementary roles of circulating renin; body sodium volume status and duration; hypertension.
17	estimating renin participation in hypertension superiority of converting enzyme inhibitor over saralasin	Estimation of renin contribution to superiority of apos; saralasin conversion enzyme inhibitor in apos; hypertension.
17	distribution of mineralocorticoid receptors in the kidney cells of rats with different levels of aldosterone in their bodies	Distribution of mineralocorticoid receptors in renal cells from rats with different levels of aldosterone in their bodies.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in normal man and patients with essential hypertension blood pressure effects depending on renin and sodium balance	Angiotensin II blocks the effects of apo; essential high blood pressure in normal man and patients, according to Apos; and renin balance-sodum.
17	the role of renin in the control of blood pressure in normotensive man	The role of renin in normotensive control of blood pressure in men.
17	changes of blood pressure plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration following the infusion of sar1 ile8 angiotensin ii in hypertensive fluid and electrolyte disorders	Changes in apo; plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration following infusion of angiotensin sar1 ile8 in hypertensive fluid and electrolyte disturbances.
17	the use of saralasin in the recognition of angiotensinogenic hypertension	Lapses; use of saralasin in angiotensinogenic hypertension recognition.
17	the effects of the angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin on blood pressure and plasma aldosterone in man in relation to the prevailing plasma angiotensin ii concentration	The effects of l*apos; antagonist of l*apos; angiotensin ii, saralasin, on blood pressure and l*apos; plasma aldosterone in the apos; man, in relation to the dominant plasma concentration of d*apos; angiotensin ii.
17	haemodynamic effects of sar1 ala8 angiotensin ii in patients with renovascular hypertension	Hemodynamic effects of apos; angiotensin sar1 ala8 ii in patients with apos; renal hypertension-vascular.
17	comparative studies of the humoral and arterial pressure responses to sar1 ala8 sar1 ile8 and sar1 thr8 angiotensin ii in the trained unanaesthetized dog	Comparative studies of blood and humoral pressure responses to apos; angiotensin sar1 ala8 sar1 sar1 ile8 and sar1 thr8 ii in trained and unanesthetized dogs.
17	agonist and antagonist effects of sar1 ala8 angiotensin ii in salt loaded and salt depleted normal man	Antagonistic and antagonistic effects of l' angiotensin sar1 ala8 ii in the charged salt and the depleted salt of l' normal man.
17	decrease in the maximum sodium permeability and slow sodium inactivation in ranvier s nodes treated with trimecaine	Decreased maximum sodium permeability and dosage; slow inactivation of sodium in rancher nodes treated with trimecaine.
17	bidirectional sodium ion movements via the paracellular and transcellular routes across short circuited rabbit ileum	Two-way movement of sodium ion by paracellular and transcellular pathways through the apos; short rabbit ileum-circulation.
17	angiotensin blockade its clinical significance	Angiotensin blocks its clinical significance.
17	usefulness and limitations of saralasin a partial competitive agonist of angioten ii for evaluating the renin and sodium factors in hypertensive patients	Usefulness and limitations of saralasin, a partial competitive agonist of lacid; angioten ii, for lacid; renin and sodium factors assessment in hypertensive patients.
17	distal tubule na and juxtaglomerular apparatus renin activity in uranyl nitrate induced acute renal failure in the rat an evaluation of the role of tubuloglomerular feedback	L' renin activity of the distal tubule na and l' juxtaglomerular apparatus in the nitrate d' uranyl induced acute renal failure in the rat, an evaluation of the role of the tubuloglomerular feedback.
17	studies of the renin angiotension aldosterone system cortisol doc and adh in normal and hypertensive pregnancy	Studies of the apo system; cortisol aldosterone renin angiotension doc and apos; adherence during normal and hypertensive pregnancy.
17	the renin angiotensin system and sodium excretion during gestation	The renin system-angiotensin and lidos; sodium excretion during pregnancy.
17	the effects of saralasin an angiotensin ii antagonist on blood pressure and the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in normal and hypertensive subjects	The effects of Saralasin, an angiotensin ii antagonist, on blood pressure and the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in normal and hypertensive subjects.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in patients with essential hypertension	Angiotensin ii blocks in patients with essential high blood pressure.
17	effects of aldosterone on na transport in the toad bladder ii the anaerobic response	Effects of Apos; aldosterone on transport n in toad bladder ii anaerobic response.
17	dissociated effect of sodium intake on glomerular and pressor responses to angiotensin	Dissociated effect of apos; sodium absorption on pressor and glomerular responses to apos; angiotensin.
17	renin release by rat kidney slices incubated in vitro role of sodium and of alpha and beta adrenergic receptors and effect of vincristine	Renin release from slices of rat kidney incubated in vitro the role of sodium and the adrenergic receptors alpha and beta and l' effect of vincristine.
17	evidence that prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors increase the concentration of sodium and chloride in rat renal medulla	It appears that inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis increase the concentration of sodium and chloride in the renal medulla of the rat.
17	mechanisms of hypertension during the acute and intermediate phases of the one clip two kidney model in the dog	Molecular mechanisms of hypertension during acute and intermediate phases of the one-clip-two kidney model in dogs.
17	plasma prorenin in normal hypertensive and anephric subjects and its effect on renin measurements	Plasma prorenin in normal effervescent and hypertensive subjects and its effect on renin measurements.
17	an inactive renin in human plasma	Inactive renin in human plasma.
17	dose dependent stimulation and inhibition of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption by angiotensin ii in the rat kidney	Dose-dependent stimulation and inhibition of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption by l' angiotensin ii in rat kidney.
17	inhibition of sodium transport by angiotensin ii in the main duct of the rabbit mandibular gland isolated and perfused in vitro	Inhibition of sodium transport by l' angiotensin ii in the main canal of isolated and vitro perfused rabbit mandibular gland.
17	possible role of renin in hypertension as suggested by renin sodium profiling and inhibition of converting enzyme	The possible role of renin in hypertension is suggested by sodium profiling of renin and l' inhibition of l' conversion enzyme.
17	unusual low plasma renin hypertension in a child	In general, the plasma renin hypertension is low in a child.
17	dissociation of renin and aldosterone during dehydration studies in a case of diabetes insipidus and adipsia	Dissociation of renin and aldosterone in the course of dehydration studies in a case of diabetes insipidus and adipsia.
17	effect of catecholamines on sodium resorption and oxygen tension in rat kidneys	Effect of catecholamines on sodium resorption and oxygen in rat kidneys.
17	effect of renal sympathetic nerve stimulation on proximal water and sodium reabsorption	Effect of renal sympathetic nerve stimulation (RNSC) on sodium reabsorption and proximal water reabsorption.
17	kinetics of active sodium transport in rat proximal tubules and its variation by cardiac glycosides at zero net volume and ion fluxes evidence for a multisite sodium transport system	The kinetics of active sodium transport in the rat proximal tubules and its variation by zero net volume cardiac glycosides and ionic fluxes indicate the existence of d' a multisite sodium transport system.
17	maternal and fetal effects of lumbar epidural analgesia for labor and delivery in patients with gestational hypertension	Maternal and fetal effects of oral pain; epidural lumbar pain medication for work and rest; delivery in patients with apo; gestational hypertension.
17	salt frusemide and renin in severe experimental renal hypertension	Frusemide and renin salts in severe experimental renal hypertension.
17	anti hypertensive action of dl alpha tocopharyl esters in rats	Hypertensive action of dl tocopharyl alpha esters in rats.
17	reduced plasma renin activity in essential hypertension effects of blood pressure age and sodium	Reduction of the apo; plasma renin activity in the effects of apo; essential hypertension of the apo; blood pressure and sodium age.
17	determination of renin dependency and sodium dependency in the three renin sub groups of essential hypertension	Determination of renin and sodium dependence in all three sub--renin groups of lyso; essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity plasma angiotensin ii and extracellular fluid volume in patients after renal transplantation	L' plasma renin activity L' plasma angiotensin ii and volume of extracellular fluid in patients after a renal transplant.
17	renin angiotensin and kallikrein kinin systems in sodium homeostasis and hypertension in rats	Renin, apo, angiotensin and kallikrein kinin systems in apo; sodium homeostasis and apo; hypertension in rats.
17	further unravelling of the causes of acth induced hypertension in the sheep	A more detailed investigation of the causes of ovarian hypertension in sheep was carried out.
17	does the renin angiotensin system contribute to the vascular lesions in renal hypertensive rats	The renin system-angiotensin contributes to vascular lesions in renal hypertensive rats-t @-@?
17	renin release from isolated rat glomeruli	Renin release from isolated glomeruli of rats.
17	effects of anoxia and metabolic inhibitors on reaction of the fast sodium system	The effects of anoxia and metabolic inhibitors on the response of the fast sodium system.
17	angiotensin ii antagonists in dehydrated rabbits without baroreceptor reflexes	The antagonists of l' angiotensin ii in dehydrated rabbits without baroreceptor reflexes.
17	hyperprolactinaemia and antihypertensive effect of bromocriptine in essential hypertension identification of abnormal central dopamine control	Anti-hypertensive effect of bromocriptine in apos; identification of apos; essential hypertension of central abnormal control of dopamine.
17	effect of sodium bicarbonate on canine left ventricular function	Impact of sodium bicarbonate on left ventricular function canine.
17	oral contraceptive induced hypertension after adrenalectomy and hypophysectomy	Oral contraception induced hypertension after hypophysectomy and adrenalectomy.
17	detection of renovascular hypertension with angiotensin ii blockade	Detection of apoes; renal hypertension-vascular with apos; angiotensin ii blockage.
17	renin reactivity as a determinant of responsiveness to antihypertensive treatment	Reactivity to renin is a determinant of responsiveness to antihypertensive therapy.
17	placental transport of sodium in the guinea pig	Acute toxicity of sodium in rats.
17	spironolactone antagonism of aldosterone action on na transport and rna metabolism in toad bladder epithelium	L' spironolactone antagonism of the apos; action of the apos; aldosterone on transport na and metabolism rna in the apos; epithelium of the bladder of the toad.
17	effects of sodium bicarbonate administration during cardiopulmonary resuscitation	Effects of sodium apo; administration of sodium bicarbonate during cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
17	effects of propranolol on development and maintanance of severe renal hypertension in rats	The effects of propranolol on the development and maintenance of apos; severe renal hypertension in rats.
17	effect of intrarenal angiotensin ii blockade on renal function in conscious dogs	Effect of intra-renal angiotensin ii on renal function in conscious dogs.
17	natriuretic response to saline infusion in normotensive and hypertensive man the role of renin suppression in exaggerated natriuresis	Natriuretic response to saline infusion in hypertensive and normotensive man the role of renin suppression in exaggerated natriurese.
17	the rational use of diuretics in the treatment of arterial hypertension	Rational use of diuretics in the treatment of high blood pressure.
17	stabilized venous distensibility of normotensive and hypertensive humans on high and low sodium intake	Stabilized venous Distensitivity of normotensive and hypertensive human subjects with high and low sodium intake.
17	renin release and pressor response to renal arterial hypotension effect of dietary sodium	Renin release and pressor response to dietary sodium; renal hypotension effect.
17	hypotensive effects of sodium volume depletion and 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii in relation to plasma renin in hypertensive patients	Hypotensive effects of sodium depletion and 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii as compared to plasma renin in hypertensive patients.
17	renin sodium and vasodepressor response to saralasin in renovascular and essential hypertension	Sodium renin and the vasodepressor response to saralasin in the apos; essential hypertension and renascular.
17	plasma renin activity in pregnant women with oedema treated with hydrochlorothiazide	Lapos®; plasma renin activity in pregnant women with esophageal disorders; edema and oral therapy; hydrochlorothiazide.
17	blood pressure and renin activity in essential hypertension under pindolol	Pindololol is high blood pressure and renin activity in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	the effect of conjugated estrogens on the renin angiotensin system	Lapos; effect of conjugated estrogens on the apos system; angiotensin of renin.
17	the renin aldosterone system in exaggerated natriuresis of essential hypertension	The renin system-aldosterone in the exaggerated natriuresis of epos; essential hypertension.
17	age and the renin aldosterone system	L' age and the system of renin-aldosterone.
17	alteration of the electrophysiologic characteristics of the neurons of the great pseudo equine leech after increasing the intracellular concentration of sodium ions	Modification of the electrophysiological characteristics of leech pseudo-equine neurons after increasing the intracellular sodium ion concentration.
17	on the question of body fluid volume or sodium status influencing renin release	On the question of the volume of the body fluids or the sodium status influencing renin release.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in normal man interaction of renin and sodium in maintaining blood pressure	L' angiotensin ii blocks blood flow; renin interaction-sodium in apos; normal man in blood pressure maintenance.
17	age related changes in na excretion in saline loaded spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effect of Na excretion on reneflags of non-influx hypertensive rats.
17	correlations between blood pressure blood volume plasma renin and urinary catecholamines in normal subjects and in patients with benign essential hypertension	The correlations between blood pressure, plasma renin and urinary catecholamines in normal subjects and patients with apo; benign essential hypertension.
17	effect of norethisterone acetate on salt excretion and of the renin aldosterone system in man	Effect of apos; norethisterone acetate on apos; saline and renin excretion-aldosterone in the apos; man.
17	urinary kallikrein in rats bred for susceptibility and resistance to the hypertensive effect of salt and in new zealand genetically hypertensive rats	Kallikrein urinary in rats reared for sensitivity and resistance to l' hypertensive effect of salt and in new sexually hypertensive zeland rats.
17	sodium intake and furosemide administration in hypertensive patients with renal insufficiency	Lapos; sodium absorption and lapos; furosemide administration in hypertensive patients with fetal heart disease; renal failure.
17	role of sodium and water in hypertensive patients on maintenance hemodialysis	Role of sodium and apo; water in apo; hemodialysis; maintenance of hypertensive patients.
17	on the inappropriate in hypertension research	On the left; unsuitable for research on hypertension.
17	the effect of beta adrenergic blockade on patterns of urinary sodium excretion blood pressure and plasma renin activity in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension	Effect of beta adrenergic block on urinary sodium excretion of blood pressure and renal plasma activity in patients with both essential and renovascular hypertension.
17	plasma renin and prorenin in essential hypertension during sodium depletion beta blockade and reduced arterial pressure	Plasma renin and prorenin in apos; essential hypertension during beta-blockade of sodium depletion and reduction of blood pressure.
17	search for a natriuretic mechanism sensitive to sodium in the brain of the monkey	Look for a sodium-sensitive natriuretic mechanism in the monkey brain.
17	studies on sodium ion retention and antidiuretic effects after administration of l tryptophan to rats	Studies of sodium retention and antidiuretic effects following administration of tryptophan l to rats.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the newborn lamb response to furosemide	The renin system-angiotensin,-aldosterone, in the response of l' new lamb,-furosemide.
17	renal arterial stenosis and circadian water and sodium excretion in subjects with a reduced fluid intake	Renal arterial stenosis and sodium and water circadian excretion in subjects with reduced water intakes.
17	effects of the angiotensin ii antagonist 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii in hypertension in man	Effects of apos; apos antagonist; angiotensin ii 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on apos; apos hypertension; man.
17	plasma vasopressin concentrations and effects of vasopressin antiserum on blood pressure in rats with malignant two kidney goldblatt hypertension	The effects of the drug; vasopressin antiserum on blood pressure and plasma vasopressin concentrations in rats with apos; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	sodium renin aldosterone catecholamines and blood pressure in diabetes mellitus	Sodium renin, aldosterone, catecholamines and blood pressure in diabetes mellitus.
17	effect of furosemide on urinary excretion of prostaglandin e in normal volunteers and patients with essential hypertension	Effect of furosemide on apo; urinary prostaglandin e excretion in normal volunteers and patients with apo; essential hypertension.
17	synergistic effects of hydralazine and alpha or beta adrenergic blockers the role of plasma renin activity	Synergistic effects of apos; hydralazine and alpha or beta-adrenergic blockers on the role of apos; plasma renin activity.
17	measurement of plasma renin activity blood volume and exchangeable sodium an aid in the orientation of treatment of essential arterial hypertension	Measurements of blood volume, plasma renin activity and exchangeable sodium help guide the treatment of essential hypertension.
17	effect of sodium loading and exercise on renal haemodynamics and urinary sodium excretion in young patients with essential hypertension before and during propranolol treatment	Effect of sodium loading and exercise on renal hemodynamics and urinary sodium excretion in young patients with essential hypertension before and during treatment with propranolol.
17	effects of ethanol on sodium 3 o methyl glucose and l alanine transport in the jejunum	Effects of apos; ethanol on sodium transport 3 o methyl glucose and apos; alanine in the jejunum.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system and sodium in normal pregnancy a longitudinal study	Renin-angiotensin-aldosterone and sodium during normal pregnancy were the subjects of a longitudinal study.
17	sodium restriction and inhibition of the renin angiotensin system in renovascular hypertension in the rat	Renin angiotensin system in renovascular hypertension in the rat.
17	intrarenal distribution of plasma flow in cirrhosis as measured by transit renography relationship with plasma renin activity and sodium and water excretion	Intrarenal distribution of plasma flow in cirrhosis, as measured by the relationship of transit renography to l' plasma renin activity and l' sodium and d&apos excretion; water.
17	intrarenal role of angiotensin ii in controlling sodium excretion during dehydration in dogs	Intrarenal role of apos; angiotensin ii in control of apos; sodium excretion during dehydration in dogs.
17	the treatment of dysmenorrhea with naproxen sodium a report on two independent double blind trials	The treatment of dysmenorrhea with naproxen sodium, report of two independent double-blind trials.
17	plasma renin plasma aldosterone and exchangeable sodium in normotensive and hypertensive kidney transplant recipients with and without transplant renal artery stenosis	Renin plasma Aldosterone and exchangeable sodium in normotensive and hypertensive renal transplant patients, with or without stenosis of the transplanted renal artery.
17	effect of immersion on the urinary excretion of aldosterone in trained and untrained male subjects author s transl	Effect of apos; immersion on apos; urinary excretion of apos; aldosterone in trained and untrained males.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system of the normothermic marmot	Renin system-angiotensin-normothermal groundhog aldosterone.
17	sodium exchange between two sites the binding of sodium to halotolerant bacteria	Sodium exchange between two sites binds the sodium to halotolerant bacteria.
17	concurrent estimation of total body and exchangeable body sodium in hypertension	Simultaneous estimation of total body sodium and exchangeable body sodium in the high blood pressure.
17	renal hypotension in sodium and fluid deprivation experimental findings in renin depleted rats	L' renal hypotension in sodium and fluid deprivation was observed in rats depleted in renin.
17	renal vein renin activity a prospective study of sampling techniques and methods of interpretation	L' renal renal renin vein activity a prospective study of sampling techniques and methods; interpretation.
17	kinetics of bidirectional active sodium fluxes in the toad bladder	Kinetics of active two-way sodium fluxes in toad bladder.
17	extraction and radioimmunoassay of urinary aldosterone in the rat	Extraction and radioimmunoassay of rat urinary aldosterone.
17	control of aldosterone secretion during sodium restriction adrenal receptor regulation and increased adrenal sensitivity to angiotensin ii	Control of the secretion of d' aldosterone during regulation of sodium restriction adrenal receptors and increased adrenal sensitivity to l' angiotensin ii.
17	inhibition of sodium transport by prostaglandin e2 across the isolated perfused rabbit collecting tubule	Prostaglandin e2 inhibition of sodium transport across the isolated perfused rabbit collecting tube.
17	kinetic analysis of sodium and chloride influxes across the gills of the trout in fresh water	Kinetic analysis of sodium and chloride inputs across trout gills in freshwater.
17	hypertension treated by salt restriction	Saline restriction hypertension.
17	2 models of indomethacin induced arterial hypertension in rats in chronic experiments	In chronic experiments, two models of hypertension induced by apos; indomethacin were used in rats.
17	role of the natriuretic factor in the phenomenon of exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension	Role of natriuretic factor in exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension.
17	urinary prostaglandin and sodium metabolism in patients with essential hypertension	Urinary sodium and prostaglandin metabolism in patients with apo; essential hypertension.
17	mechanism of the prophylactic effect of adaptation to altitude hypoxia on the development of hypertension	Mechanisms of infection; protective effect of infection; adaptation to infection; hypoxia; altitude on development of infection; high blood pressure.
17	renal vascular response to interruption of the renin angiotensin system in normal man	Renal vascular response to apos; interruption of angiotensin renin system in normal male.
17	the effect of dietary sodium intake on the blood pressure and cardiac output responses to angiotensin ii in unanaesthetized rats	Lapos; effect of apos; dietary sodium intake on blood pressure and cardiac output responses to apos; angiotensin ii in unanesthetized rats.
17	plasma renin levels and systemic haemodynamics in essential hypertension	Acute hemodynamic and plasma renin levels in the liver; essential hypertension.
17	role of sodium intake in the antihypertensive effect of propranolol	The role of sodium intake in the antihypertensive effect of propranolol.
17	kidney transplant artery stenosis interrelationship between blood pressure kidney function renin aldosterone system and body sodium content	Arterial stenosis related to the renal transplantation interrelationship between the renal function of blood pressure, the renin system-aldosterone and the sodium content of the organism.
17	effect of prostaglandin a1 infusion in hypertensive patients with renal artery stenosis	Effect of prostaglandin-1 infusion on patients with renal artery stenosis.
17	the significance of body sodium content in hypertension following renal transplantation exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration before and after renal transplantation	The importance of the sodium content of the cells; the organism in the cells; hypertension following transplantation; renal transplantation, exchangeable sodium concentration and plasma renin concentration before and after renal transplantation.
17	urinary kallikrein in normal renin essential hypertension	Urinary Kallikrein in the essential hypertension of normal renin.
17	sodium intake following destruction of the anterior hypothalamus in the rat	Addition of sodium after destruction of the etapos; anterior hypothalamus in the rat.
17	effect of acth on plasma renin activity aldosterone level and deoxycorticosterone level in humans author s transl	Effect of apos; acth on the level of apos; aldosterone and deoxycorticosterone in apos; and plasma renin activity in humans.
17	pressor response to saralasin 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii bolus injection in hypertensive patients	Pressor response to saralasin 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii bolus injection in patients with hypertension.
17	basolateral plasma membrane localiztion of ouabain sensitive sodium transport sites in the secretory epithelium of the avian salt gland	Basolateral plasma membrane localizes ouabain-sensitive sodium transport sites in the avian saline gland secretory epithelium.
17	renin reactivity renin activity and renin concentration in patients with normal and low renin essential hypertension	L' renin activity of the renin reactivity and renin concentration in patients with normal and low essential renin hypertension.
17	inactivation of sodium channels second order kinetics in myelinated nerve	Inactivation of second-order kinetic sodium channels in the myelinated nerve.
17	sodium balance in very low birth weight infants	Sodium balance in infants of very low birth weight.
17	activity of lysosomal beta glucuronidase in leukocytes of rats exposed to benzene and sodium selenate	Lysosomal beta glucuronidase activity in leukocytes exposed to benzene and sodium selenate.
17	stimulus secretion coupling in pancreatic acinar cells influences of external sodium and calcium on responses to cholecystokinin pancreozymin and ionophore a23187	Coupling of the stimulus secretions in pancreatic acinar cells influences external sodium and calcium on responses to pancreozymin cholecystokinin and l' ionophore a23187.
17	renin secretion as a function of renal renin content in dogs	Renin secretion as a function of renal renin content in the dog.
17	renal sodium retention and ascites formation in dogs with experimental cirrhosis but without portal hypertension or increased splanchnic vascular capacity	Renal sodium retention and ascites formation in dogs with experimental cirrhosis but no increase in splanchnic vascular capacity or portal hypertension.
17	renal micropuncture study of normotensive and milan hypertensive rats before and after development of hypertension	Study of the renal micropuncture of milan and normotensive hypertensive rats before and after development of hypertension.
17	the renin angiotensin system and sodium appetite	The renin system-angiotensin and l' appetite sodium.
17	plasma prolactin in essential and renovascular hypertension	Plasma protactin in the apos; essential and renal hypertension.
17	sodium and renin in the hypertension of early renal disease	Hypertension of early renal disease.
17	relationship of basal plasma noradrenaline to blood pressure age sex plasma renin activity and plasma volume in essential hypertension	Ratio of basal plasma noradrenaline to apos; age at blood pressure Sexual Plasma renin activity and plasma volume in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	role of the renin angiotensin system in post transplantation hypertension in patients with multiple kidneys	Role of the apo system; renin angiotensin in apos; post-hypertension-transplantation in patients with multiple kidneys.
17	the cycling of calcium sodium and protons across the inner membrane of cardiac mitochondria	The cycle of sodium calcium and protons through the inner membrane of cardiac mitochondria.
17	reproducibility of plasma renin activity pra profile in essential hypertension patients	Renin activity pra plasma reproductibility in essential hypertension patients.
17	renin subgroups in essential hypertension an analysis and critique	Under-renin groups in the apos; essential hypertension analysis and critique.
17	partial characterization of aortic renin in the spontaneously hypertensive rat and its interrelationship with plasma renin blood pressure and sodium balance	Partial characterization of aortic renin in the spontaneously hypertensive rat and its relationship to blood pressure and the plasma sodium balance of renin.
17	effects of 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on arterial pressure renin and aldosterone in hypertension	Effects of 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on renin and apos; aldosterone of blood pressure in apos; hypertension.
17	what makes the renin angiotensin system a pathogenic factor	This fact makes the renin system-angiotensin a pathogen.
17	the immediate pressor response to saralasin in man a test of angiotensin ii receptor vacancy	The immediate pressor response to saralasin in humans has been tested on the apos; angiotensin ii, a deficiency of the receptor.
17	sodium intake and the effects of isoproterenol and exercise on plasma renin in man	Lapos; sodium absorption and effects of isoproterenol and lapos; plasma renin exercise in men.
17	the influence of different sodium loads on renin release in hypertensive and normotensive states of chronic renal failure	L' influence of different sodium loads on renin release in normotensive and hypertensive states of l' chronic renal failure.
17	health effects of long term exposure to sodium sulfate dust	Health effects of sodium sulphate poisoning; long-term exposure to sodium sulphate dust.
17	the effect of increasing the plasma magnesium concentration on renin release from the dog s kidney interactions with calcium and sodium	Effect of increased plasma magnesium concentration on renin release through interactions of dog kidney with calcium and sodium.
17	effect of magnesium on sodium transport in toad urinary bladder	Effect of magnesium on sodium transport in bladder.
17	reversal of renal hypertension effects on renin salt and water balance	Reversal of renal effects on renal saline and water balance.
17	the renal kallikrein kinin system in various types of diuresis and under the effects of inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis in rats	The renal kallikrein kinin system in various types of diuresis and the effects of inhibitors of rat prostaglandin synthesis.
17	sodium uptake across the apical border of the isolated turtle colon confirmation of the two barrier model	L' sodium absorption across the apical border of the isolated turtle colon supports the two-barrier model.
17	weak a c magnetic field effects changes in cell sodium pump activity following whole animal exposure	A weak magnetic field alters cellular sodium pump activity as a result of exposure to whole animals.
17	17 alpha hydroxylase deficiency a combination of hydroxylation defect and reversible blockade in aldosterone biosynthesis	Alpha hydroxylase deficiency, a combination of dapos; a lack of dapos; hydroxylation and dapos; reversible blockade of apos biosynthesis; aldosterone.
17	prolonged infusions of ile5 angiotensin ii in sodium replete and deplete man effects on aldosterone acth cortisol blood pressure and electrolyte balance	Prolonged infusions of apos; ileum angiotensin ii in effects of sodium rich and depleted man on blood pressure of apos; aldosterone acth cortisol and apos; electrolyte balance.
17	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in hypertensive children with coarctation of the aorta	Role of the Renin System-angiotensin-aldosterone in hypertensive children with coarctation of the aorta.
17	desoxycorticosterone in normal pregnancy ii cortisol dependent fluctuations in free plasma desoxycorticosterone	Normal pregnancy deoxycorticosterone ii cortisol-dependent fluctuations in free plasma deoxycorticosterone.
17	thyroid hormone aldosterone interaction on na transport in toad bladder	Interaction of l' thyroid hormone aldosterone on transport n in the bladder of toads.
17	effect of parathyroid hormone on plasma renin activity and sodium excretion	Effect of apo; parathyroid hormone on apo; plasma renin activity and apo; sodium excretion.
17	interrelations between plasma renin activity aldosterone and sympathetic nervous system activity in essential hypertension	Interrelationships between apos; aldosterone and apos plasma renin activity; sympathetic nervous system activity in apos; essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity following renal transplantation	L&apos®; plasma renin activity after renal transplantation.
17	calibration and evaluation of a system of total body in vivo activation analysis using 14 mev neutrons	An evaluation of a total body system in vivo activation analysis using fourteen mev neutrons.
17	correlation of structural and ultrastructural modifications of the renal cortex with water sodium and protein excretion in rats rendered hypertensive by perinephritic constriction by collodion	Correlation between structural and ultrastructural changes in the renal cortex and apos; sodium and protein excretion in the apos; water in collodion-induced perinephritic constriction hypertensive rats.
17	sodium losing renal disease two cases and a review of the literature	Two cases of sodium-loss-induced nephropathy and a review of the literature.
17	a composite analysis of renin classification methods	Composite analysis of renin classification methods.
17	renal hemodynamics and the renin angiotensin system in cirrhosis relationship to sodium retention	L' renal hemodynamics and renal angiotensin system in relation to cirrhosis and sodium retention.
17	effect of papaverine on renin release in dogs in vivo and in vitro	Effect of papavérin on renin release in dogs in vivo and in vitro.
17	calcium and sodium excretion in rats in response to prolonged treatment with polythiazide	Calcium and sodium excretion in rats in response to prolonged polythiazide treatment.
17	polkissen cells and their possible role in renin secretion	Polkissen cells and their possible role in renin secretion.
17	renin secretion during dynamic changes in renal perfusion pressure	Renin secretion during dynamic changes in renal-infusion pressure.
17	intrarenal renin and autoregulation of renal plasma flow and glomerular filtration rate	Intrarenal renal renal plasma flow and glomerular filtration rate self-regulation.
17	effect of hematocrit variation on the urinary sodium excretion in normal and uremic dogs author s transl	Effect of change in apo placentae; hematocrit on apo placentae; urinary sodium excretion in normal and uremic dogs.
17	renal kallikrein variations in relation to sodium intake and experimental renovascular hypertension author s transl	Changes in renal kallikrein as a function of sodium intake and apo; experimental vascular hypertension translated by the authors.
17	plasma mineralocorticoids plasma renin and urinary kallikrein in salt sensitive and salt resistant rats	Plasma renin and urinary kallikrein mineralocorticoids in both salt-sensitive and salt-resistant rats.
17	continuous determination of various enzymes and sodium concentration in urine a usable method for diagnosis of kidney graft rejection	Ongoing determination of various enzymes and sodium levels in urine is a useful method to diagnose rejection of kidney transplant patients.
17	angiotensin thirst and sodium appetite retrospect and prospect	The craving for apos; angiotensin and apos; sodium appetite retrospectively and prospectively.
17	the renin angiotensin system and thirst some unanswered questions	The angiotensin renin system and thirst some unanswered questions.
17	lymphatic network of kidney ii effect of diuretics on intrarenal renin release	Kidney Lymphatic Network ii The effect of diuretics on intrarenal renin release.
17	collecting duct sodium reabsorption in deoxycorticosterone treated rats	Sodium reabsorption from the collecting duct in deoxycorticosterone-treated rats.
17	kinetics of sodium in rabbit arterial wall inability of aldosterone to alter extra to intracellular distribution	Sodium kinetics in the rabbit arterial wall are unable to alter the cellular extra-distribution of l' aldosterone.
17	the effect of extremely high sodium intake on plasma renin activity plasma aldosterone concentration and urinary excretion of aldosterone metabolites	Extremely high sodium intake affects the concentration of apos; plasma aldosterone; renin activity and glucose; urinary excretion of d*apos metabolites; plasma aldosterone.
17	sodium retention and hypertension with short dialysis	He's got sodium retention and hypertension with short dialysis.
17	innappropriate renin secretion unmasked by captopril sq 14 225 in hypertension of chronic renal failure	Inadequate renin secretion not masked by captopril sq 14,225 in the apos; hypertension of the apos; chronic kidney failure.
17	comparison of two angiotensin ii analogues in normal subjects and hypertensive patients	Comparison of two analogs of apos; angiotensin ii in normal subjects and hypertensive patients.
17	renin aldosterone and renal haemodynamics in cirrhosis with ascites	Renal hemodynamics and aldosterone regeneration in cirrhosis with ascites.
17	renal responses to angiotensin ii and 1 sar 8 ala aii in sodium replete and deplete dogs	Renal responses to angiotensin ii and 1 sar 8 alaii in sodium-poor dogs.
17	effects of chronic lithium administration on concanavalin a binding to plasma membranes from the corpus striatum of rat brain	Effects of apos; chronic administration of lithium to concanavalin, a binding to striated plasma membranes of rat brain.
17	orthostatic hypotension in complicated diabetes mellitus study of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system author s transl	Dissolved diabetes mellitus study of the reindeer angiotensin aldosterone system.
17	renin sodium profile and its therapeutical implications in arterial hypertension	Pattern of sodium renin and its therapeutic implications in high blood pressure.
17	elevated plasma renin activity in patients with acute pyelonephritis	High plasma renin activity in patients with severe pyelonephritis.
17	coupled sodium chloride influx across brush border of flounder intestine	Coupled influx of sodium chloride through the brush border of the intestinal flap.
17	plasma volumes and hematocrits in rats with chronic sinoaortic denervation hypertension	Plasma volumes and hematocrit levels in rats with chronic aortic hypertension due to sino denervation-aortic.
17	essential role of mean circulatory filling pressure in salt induced hypertension	Essential role of mean circulatory filling pressure in the blood vessel; salt-induced hypertension.
17	salt intake and diuretic treatment of hypertension	Absorption of salt and diuretic treatment of high blood pressure.
17	increased glomerular filtration rate after converting enzyme inhibition in essential hypertension	An increase in the glomerular filtration rate after conversion of the apos; enzymatic inhibition in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	plasma active and inactive renin in the rabbit effect of dietary sodium depletion and repletion	Active and inactive plasma renin in the apos; rabbit effect of sodium depletion and refluxing.
17	studies on the inhibitory effect of indomethacin and meclofenamate on the adrenalectomy induced increase in plasma renin concentration	Studies of apo; inhibitory effect of indomethacin and meclofenamate on adrenalectomy have induced an increase in plasma renin concentration.
17	angiotensin ii blockade during combined thiazide beta adrenoreceptor blocker treatment	L' angiotensin ii blocks during combined beta treatment with a thiazide adrenoceptor blocker.
17	effects of high salt intake and meclofenamate on arterial pressure and renal function in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effects of high salt and meclofenamate levels on blood pressure and renal function in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	urinary prostaglandins and kallikrein in essential hypertension	Urinary protaglandins and kallikrein in the bloodstream; essential hypertension.
17	sodium balance urinary prostaglandin e2 and renin in normal man	Sodium spp. urinary balance prostaglandin e2 and reindeer in normal man.
17	effect of chronic treatment with desoxycorticosterone on the dipsogenic response of rats to isoproterenol and angiotensin	Effect of chronic deoxycorticosterone treatment on dipsogenic response of rats to isoproterenol and apos; angiotensin.
17	angiotensin and sodium balance their role in chronic two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Apos; angiotensin and sodium balance their roles in the chronic hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	the role of angiotensin in the control of blood pressure during sodium depletion	The role of l' angiotensin in the control of blood pressure during the depletion of sodium.
17	factors controlling plasma renin and aldosterone during pregnancy	The factors controlling the regulation of plasma renin and aldosterone during pregnancy.
17	exchangeable sodium in angiotensinogenic and nonangiotensinogenic renovascular hypertension	Sodium exchangeable in angiotensinogenic and nonangiotensinogenic renovascular hypertension.
17	effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance on the renin angiotensin system in renovascular and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in the sodium balance on the renin system in spontaneously hypertensive and renal-vascular rats.
17	inhibition by angiotensin ii of some vasopressin effects on renal function in sheep	L' angiotensin ii inhibits certain vasopressin-induced effects on kidney function in sheep.
17	divergent blood pressure responses during short term sodium restriction in hypertension	The effect of sodium on hypertension, in the Journal of the American Medical Association.
17	application of equivalent electrical circuit models to study of sodium transport across epithelial tissues	Application of electrical circuit models equivalent to apos; study of sodium transport in epithelial tissues.
17	change in the selectivity of the sodium channels of a nerve fiber membrane under the action of veratrine	Change in the selectivity of sodium channels; a nerve fiber membrane under the veratrin action.
17	sodium intake and plasma angiotensin level as modulators of adrenal and uterine angiotensin ii receptors in the rat	Sodium intake and apo levels; plasma angiotensin as modulators of rat apos receptors; adrenal angiotensin ii and uterine.
17	factors influencing the release of renin in patients under chronic dialysis treatment	Factors influencing renin release in patients on chronic dialysis.
17	idiopathic sustained inappropriate secretion of adh with associated hypertension and thirst	Lapses; idiopathic adhesive maintained an inappropriate secretion of adhesion associated with high blood pressure and thirst.
17	renal tubular reabsorption in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal tubular reabsorption in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	hemodynamics of central infusion of angiotensin ii in normal and sodium depleted dogs	Hemodynamics of central infusion of apos; angiotensin ii in normal dogs and in sodium-free dogs.
17	reactive hyperreninemia in renovascular hypertension after angiotensin blockage with saralasin or converting enzyme inhibitor	Reactive hyperreninemia in renovascular hypertension after angiotensin blockage with saralasin or enzyme inhibitor.
17	changes of plasma renin and renal renin concentration in hgcl2 induced acute renal failure in rats	Changes in the concentration of plasma renin and renal renin in the apos; hgcl2 induced acute renal failure in rats.
17	diuretics role of sodium balance	Diuretic role of l' sodium balance.
17	prostaglandin e2 induced hypertension in conscious dogs	Prostaglandin e2 induced apos; hypertension in conscious dogs.
17	neonatal changes in the plasma levels of cortisol cortisone and aldosterone in the calf	Neonatal changes in cortisone and d&apos plasma cortisol aldosterone levels in calves.
17	nephrotic syndrome vasoconstriction and hypervolemic types indicated by renin sodium profiling	Vasoconstriction nephrotic syndrome and hypervolemic types as indicated by renin sodium profiling.
17	effects of the oral converting enzyme inhibitor sq 14225 in a model of low cardiac output in dogs	The effects of the apo; inhibitor of the apo; oral conversion enzyme sq 14225 in a model of low cardiac output in dogs.
17	effect of the angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin on plasma aldosterone concentration and on blood pressure before and during sodium depletion in normal subjects	Effect of aldosterone; apos antagonist; angiotensin ii, saralasin, on plasma aldosterone concentration and blood pressure before and during sodium depletion in normal subjects.
17	plasma and urine dopamine in man given sodium chloride in the diet	Plasma and urinary dopamine in adults; men who received sodium chloride in the diet.
17	the blocking effect of magnesium on the secretion of adrenal catecholamines induced by the omission of sodium from the extracellular medium	L' magnesium-blocking effect on the adrenal catecholamine secretion induced by epos; omission of sodium from the extracellular medium.
17	effect of angiotensin ii and sodium depletion on angiotensinogen production	Effect of angiotensin ii and sodium depletion on production of angiotensinogen.
17	effects of metoprolol on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in thiazide resistant hypertensive patients	Effects of metoprolol on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity in thiazide-resistant hypertensive patients.
17	stability of carmustine in the presence of sodium bicarbonate	Carmustine stability in the presence of sodium bicarbonate.
17	somatostatin stimulates sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit ileum	Sodium and chloride absorption in rabbit ileum stimulated by somatostatin.
17	intrarenal prostaglandins effect of sodium and indomethacin on pge2 and pgf2 alpha in rabbits	Effect of intrarenal sodium and l&apos prostaglandins; indomethacin on pge2 and pgf2 alpha in rabbits.
17	reversible colchicine induced disruption of amygdaloid function in sodium appetite	Reversible colchicine induced a disruption of the amygdaloid function in the sodium appetite.
17	alterations in the responses of the sympathetic nervous system and renin in borderline hypertension	Alterations in sympathetic nervous system and renin responses in the apos; limiting hypertension.
17	circadian changes in plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in two kidney hypertension rats	Circadian changes in apos; plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in two renal hypertensive rats.
17	primacy of the renin angiotensin system in mediating the aldosterone response to sodium restriction	The primacy of the renin angiotensin (RNA) system in mediating the response of apos; aldosterone to sodium restriction.
17	angiotensin ii plasma renin and sodium depletion as determinants of blood pressure response to saralasin in essential hypertension	Lapos; angiotensin ii, plasma renin and sodium depletion as determinants of blood pressure response to saralasin in estos; essential hypertension.
17	responses of the renin angiotensin system and kallikrein kinin system to sodium and converting enzyme inhibitor sq 14 225	Sodium and sodium reagents; renin angiotensin and kallikrein kinin systems; conversion enzyme inhibitor sq.
17	captopril and salt subtraction to treat uncontrollable hypertension in haemodialysis patients	Captopril and subtract salt to treat apos; uncontrollable hypertension in hemodialysis patients.
17	effects of chronic alpha and beta adrenoceptor blockade with labetalol on plasma catecholamines and renal function in hypertension	Chronic alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor blockade with labetalol on plasma catecholamines and renal function in hypertension.
17	decreased urinary kallikrein activity and elevated blood pressure normalized by orally applied kallikrein in essential hypertension	Diminished urinary kallikrein and high blood pressure normalized by the apos; oral application of kallikrein in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	chronic blockade of angiotensin ii formation during sodium deprivation	Chronic blockade of the formation of apos; angiotensin ii during sodium deprivation.
17	importance of the radioimmune method of determining renin activity in the blood plasma for the differential therapy of hypertension	Importance of the-immune radio method for determination of apos; renin activity in blood plasma for differential treatment of apos; hypertension.
17	extracellular ph selectively modulates recovery from sodium inactivation in frog myelinated nerve	The extracellular ph selectively modulates the recovery of l' sodic inactivation in frog myelinated nerve.
17	renal handling of water and sodium in children with proximal and distal renal tabular acidosis	The renal manipulation of water and sodium in children with proximal and distal renal tubular acidosis.
17	chronic effects of lead on renin and renal sodium excretion	Chronic effects of lead on kidney function; renin and renal sodium excretion.
17	the relationship of urinary prostaglandins and plasma renin to sodium balance and diuresis in normal man	Relation of urinary prostaglandins and renal plasma to sodium balance and diuresis in normal man.
17	the renin angiotensin system in newborn dogs developmental patterns and response to acute saline loading	The system d' angiotensin renin in dogs new-born and response to an acute saline load.
17	evidence for na retaining humoral agents and vasoconstrictor humoral agents in hypertension prone dahl s rats prevention of nacl induced hypertension in dahl s rats with thiazide	Evidence of retention of humoral and cellular agents; vasoconstrictor humoral agents in dahl rats exposed to apo; hypertension, prevention of apo; nacl-induced hypertension in dahl rats exposed to thiazide.
17	the effect of sodium pentobarbital on the preservation of fertilizing capacity of turkey spermatozoa	L' effect of sodium pentobarbital on the maintenance of turkey sperm fertilization capacity.
17	reversal of two kidney one clip renovascular hypertension in the rat	Lapus reversal; renal hypertension-two-kidney vascular one clip in rat.
17	sequential method for combined screening antihypertensive and diuretic agents in the same spontaneously hypertensive rat shr	A sequential method for the combined screening of antihypertensive and diuretic agents in the same narrowed spontaneously hypertensive rat.
17	is low urinary prostaglandin concentration a stage in the development of essential hypertension	The low concentration of urinary prostaglandins is a stage in the development of the essential hypertension.
17	sodium induced elevation of blood pressure in the anephric state	Sodium induced a rise in blood pressure at the collapsed state.
17	in vitro neutralizing capacity of commercially available antacid mixtures and their role in the treatment of peptic ulcer	In vitro neutralization capability of commercially available antacid mixtures and their role in the treatment of gastroduodenal ulcers.
17	renal interstitial pressure and sodium excretion during renal vein constriction	Renal interstitial pressure and sodium excretion during renal venous constriction.
17	effect on renal sodium and water excretion of the inhibition of prostaglandin synthesis in extracellular volume expansion	Effect on apo; apo excretion; renal sodium and water from apo; inhibition of prostaglandin synthesis in apo; expansion of extracellular volume.
17	the present status of the autoregulation theory of the pathogenesis of hypertension	Current status of apo theory; self-regulation of apo pathogenesis; high blood pressure.
17	intrarenal conversion of prostaglandin f2 alpha into prostaglandin e2 and renin release in the isolated perfused rat kidney	Intrarenal conversion of prostaglandin f2 alpha to prostaglandin e2 and release of renin in the isolated perfused rat kidney.
17	diminished urinary prostacyclin metabolite in essential hypertension	Decrease of the urinary prostacyclin metabolite in urine; essential hypertension.
17	role of prostaglandin in the antihypertensive mechanism of captopril in low renin hypertension	The role of prostaglandin in the antihypertensive mechanism of captopril in rabbits; low renal hypertension.
17	influence of sodium on experimental renovascular hypertension in rats	Sodium influence on apos; experimental renal hypertension in rats.
17	active and inactive renin in individual juxtaglomerular apparatuses	Active and inactive renin in individual juxtaglomerular devices.
17	angiotensin ii and not sodium status is the major determinant of the agonistic antagonistic balance of saralasin s actions	L' angiotensin ii, not l' sodium status, is the primary determinant of l' agonistic antagonistic balance of saralasin actions.
17	long term regulation of arterial pressure glomerular filtration and renal sodium reabsorption by angiotensin ii in dogs	The long-term regulation of glomerular filtration of arterial pressure and renal sodium reabsorption by etapos; angiotensin ii in dogs.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the maintenance of blood pressure aldosterone secretion and sodium balance in normotensive subjects	Renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in maintenance of d&apos secretion; aldosterone and l' sodium balance of blood pressure in normotensive subjects.
17	acceleration of hypotension and development of stroke in the spontaneously hypertensive rat by unilateral ureteral obstruction	Lapse; hypotension and stroke development; stroke in spontaneously hypertensive rat by unilateral obstruction of the urethra.
17	use of first dose response or plasma renin activity to predict the long term effect of captopril identification of triphasic pattern of blood pressure response	Use of first dose response or apo; plasma renin activity to predict apos; long-term effect of apos; identification of captopril on blood pressure response triphasic profile.
17	regulation of receptor binding interactions of 125i angiotensin ii and 125i sarcosine1 leucine8 angiotensin ii an angiotensin antagonist by sodium ion	Regulation of binding interactions of 125i angiotensin receptors ii and 125i sarcosine1 leucine8 angiotensin ii, a l&aposin antagonist; angiotensin, by sodium ion.
17	specific inhibition of renin by an angiotensinogen analog studies in sodium depletion and renin dependent hypertension	Specific inhibition of renin by an analog of l' angiotensinogen in sodium depletion and l' renin-dependent hypertension.
17	angiotensin and other peptides in the control of water and sodium intake	L'apos; angiotensin et d'apos; other peptides in the control of apos; absorption of apos; water and sodium.
17	interaction of catecholamines and the renin angiotensin system in regulating sodium reabsorption in the rat kidney	Interaction of catecholamines and the renin system-angiotensin in the regulation of rat kidney sodium reabsorption.
17	a comparison of sodium chloride thiocyanate and sucrose spaces as estimates of extracellular fluid volume	Comparison of sodium chloride thiocyanate spaces with sucrose to estimate the volume of the extracellular fluid.
17	clinical and biochemical effects of spironolactone administered once daily in primary hypertension multicenter sweden study	Clinical and biochemical effects of spironolactone administered daily as part of a sweden multi-centre primary study of apo; hypertension.
17	na and ca2 ingestion plasma volume electrolyte distribution at rest and exercise	Distributions of apos; electrolyte of plasma volume; ingestion of na et ca2 at rest and at ease; exercise.
17	heterogeneous distribution of the sodium dependent alanine transport activity in the rat hepatocyte plasma membrane	Heterogeneous distribution of apos; sodium-dependent alanine transport activity in rat hepatocyte plasma membrane.
17	a dose response comparison of the actions of angiotensin ii and angiotensin iii in sheep	Dose comparison @- response of angiotensin ii and angiotensin iii in sheep.
17	regulation of serum progesterone in patients with essential hypertension	The regulation of serum progesterone in patients with essential high blood pressure.
17	obesity and essential hypertension hemodynamics intravascular volume sodium excretion and plasma renin activity	Intravascular hemodynamic essential hypertension, sodium excretion and plasma renin activity.
17	effects of indomethacin and meclofenamate on renin release and renal hemodynamic function during chronic sodium depletion in conscious dogs	The effects of apos; indomethacin and meclofenamate on renin release and renal hemodynamic function during chronic sodium depletion in conscious dogs.
17	angiotensin inhibitors for hypertension	The inhibitors of apos; angiotensin for apos; hypertension.
17	effects of acute haemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance upon experimentally hypertensive rats	The effects of acute hemodialysis have induced changes in sodium balance in experimental hypertensive rats.
17	efficacy of captopril in experimental low renin hypertension	L' effectiveness of captopril in low renin experimental hypertension.
17	testosterone a specific competitive antagonist of aldosterone in the toad bladder	Testosterone is a specific competitive antagonist of aldosterone in the bladder of toads.
17	sodium and water content and the central hemodynamic indices in hypertension	Sodium and water content and central hemodynamic indices of high blood pressure.
17	transport of glycyl l proline into intestinal and renal brush border vesicles from rabbit	Transport of glycyl proline in the intestinal and renal brush border vesicles of the rabbit.
17	vascular renin in hypertension	Vascular renin in the apos; hypertension.
17	hypertension produced by sodium depletion and unilateral nephrectomy a new experimental model	L' hypertension caused by sodium depletion and unilateral nephrectomy (SNP) is a new experimental model.
17	enhanced parathyroid function in essential hypertension a homeostatic response to a urinary calcium leak	Increased parathyroid function in the apos; essential hypertension a homeostatic response to a leak of urinary calcium.
17	disturbance of kidney aldosterone sensitivity and the mechanism of its development during neurodystrophy	Disturbance of the sensitivity to and mechanism of development of renal aldosterone during neurodystrophy.
17	aldosterone receptor measurements during changes in dietary sodium	Measurement of apos; aldosterone receptors during dietary sodium changes.
17	renin angiotensin system in acute hepatitis author s transl	Renin Angiotensin System in acute hepatitis author s.
17	quantitative x ray microanalysis of frozen hydrated bulk biological specimens	Quantitative X-ray microanalysis of frozen and bulk hydrated biological specimens.
17	evidence that the acute hypotensive effect of captopril in dogs is not wholly explained by a reduction of plasma angiotensin ii and its direct vasoconstrictor effect	The acute hypotensive effect of captopril in the dog is not fully explained by a reduction in plasma angiotensin ii and its direct vasoconstrictor effect.
17	urinary tetrahydroaldosterone and aldosterone 18 glucuronide excretion in white and black normal subjects and hypertensive patients	Urinary tetrahydroaldosterone and aldosterone 18 Excretion of glucuronide in normal white and black subjects and hypertensive patients.
17	renal management of sodium under indomethacin and aldosterone in the elderly	Renal management of sodium under indomethacin and aldosterone in elderly patients.
17	kinetic disposition and diuretic effect of frusemide in acute pulmonary oedema	Kinetic layout and diuretic effect of frusemide in apos, acute pulmonary edema.
17	overview of the role of angiotensin inhibitors in delineating the function of the renin angiotensin system	An overview of the role of inhibitors of l-apos; angiotensin in delineating function of the l-apos system; angiotensin renin.
17	studies of the functional role of the intrarenal renin angiotensin system	Studies of the functional role of the system of l'apos; angiotensin intrarenal renin.
17	effects of two angiotensin ii analogues on blood pressure plasma aldosterone concentration plasma renin activity and creatinine clearance in normal subjects on different sodium intakes	The effects of two apos analogs: angiotensin ii on serum arterial pressure concentration, aldosterone, and plasma renin activity and creatinine clearance in normal subjects on different sodium intakes.
17	the effect of sodium on aldosterone metabolic clearance	Effect of sodium on metabolic clearance of aldosterone.
17	increased sodium appetite in the rat induced by intracranial administration of components of the renin angiotensin system	Apos; increase in appetite; rat sodium appetite induced by apos; intracranial administration of apos system components; renin angiotensin increased apos; rat sodium appetite.
17	changes of urinary kallikrein and kinin excretions induced by adrenalin infusion in conscious dogs	Changes in urinary excretion of kallikrein and kinin induced by d' adrenaline infusion in conscious dogs.
17	inborn error in the terminal step of aldosterone biosynthesis corticosterone methyl oxidase tpe ii deficiency in a north american pedigree	Innate error in apos; terminal stage of biosynthesis of apos; aldosterone corticosterone methyl oxidase tpe ii in a North@-@ American pedigree.
17	differential renal effects of cyclooxygenase inhibition in sodium replete and sodium deprived dog	Differential renal effects of apos; inhibition of cyclooxygenase in sodium-starved and sodium-filled dogs.
17	sodium balance and plasma renin activity during the development of two kidney goldblatt hypertension in rats	L' sodium balance and apos; plasma renin activity during apos development; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys in rats.
17	the role of the renal effects of angiotensin ii in hypertension	The role of the renal effects of angiotensin ii in the development of high blood pressure.
17	exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension and the role of the natriuretic factor	Experimental hypertension and the role of the natriuretic factor.
17	the effects of hemorrhage and sodium depletion on plasma concentrations of angiotensin ii and des asp1 angiotensin ii in the rat	The effects of apos; hemorrhage and sodium depletion on plasma levels of apos; angiotensin ii and apos; angiotensin ii in rats.
17	influence of sodium intake on catecholamine release by angiotensin and renal nerve stimulation in dogs	L' influence of apos; sodium absorption on catecholamine release from apos; angiotensin and renal nerve stimulation in dogs.
17	hypertension following renal transplantation the role of the host s kidney	L'apos; hypertension that follows renal transplantation, the role of the kidney of the host.
17	effects of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in essential hypertension	Effects of apo; apo inhibition; apo conversion enzyme; angiotensin on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity in apo; essential hypertension.
17	neuroeffector function of isolated portal vein from spontaneously hypertensive and wistar kyoto rats dependence on external calcium concentration	The portal vein neuroeffector function isolated from spontaneously hypertensive and wistar kyoto rats is dependent on external calcium concentration.
17	leucocyte cation transport in essential hypertension its relation to the renin angiotensin system	Transport of leukocyte cations in essential hypertension is linked to the apos system; renin angiotensin.
17	studies on the mechanism of renin release from rat kidney slices calcium sodium and metabolic inhibition	Studies on the mechanism of renin release from thin slices of calcium-sodium rat kidney and metabolic inhibition.
17	functional renal involvement in normotensive patients with progressive systemic sclerosis impaired sodium excretion during isotonic saline infusion	Lapos; functional renal involvement in normotensive patients with progressive systemic sclerosis (PSS) altered apos; sodium excretion during isotonic saline infusion.
17	angiotensin in the control of water and sodium intake	Lapses; angiotensin in the control of apos; absorption of apos; water; and sodium.
17	comparison of oral diazoxide and minoxidil in refractory hypertension	Comparison of oral diazoxide and minoxidil in apos; hypertension refractory.
17	abnormal urinary kallikrein in hypertension is not related to aldosterone or plasma renin activity	Abnormal urinary kallikrein in apos; hypertension is not associated with apos; aldosterone or apos; or plasma renin activity.
17	effect of dietary salt on hemodynamics of established renal hypertension in the rabbit implications for the autoregulation theory of hypertension	Effect of dietary salt on the hemodynamics of established renal hypertension on the salforegulation theory of hypertension.
17	body weight reduction necessary to attain normotension in the overweight hypertensive patient	Reduction in body weight necessary to achieve normotension in hypertensive and obese patient.
17	in vivo modification of angiotensin ii pressor responsiveness in sheep by indomethacin	Change in vivo of pressor responsiveness to apos; angiotensin ii in sheep by apos; indomethacin.
17	effect of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition with sq 14 225 on blood pressure in sheep	Effect of apos; inhibition of apos; conversion enzyme of apos; angiotensin with sq 14,225 on blood pressure in sheep.
17	renal prostaglandins renin release and renal hemodynamic function in high renin states	Renal renin release and renal hemodynamic function of renal prostaglandins in the elevated renal states.
17	relationships between sodium clearance plasma renin activity plasma aldosterone renal hemodynamics and blood pressure in essential hypertension	Relationship between apos; renal hemodynamics of apos; plasma aldosterone and blood pressure in apos; essential hypertension.
17	enhancement by diuretics of the antihypertensive action of long term angiotensin converting enzyme blockade	Diuretic augmentation of apos; antihypertensive action of apos; conversion enzyme of long-term blocker angiotensin.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cirrhosis	Renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in cirrhosis.
17	prostaglandins role in renin regulation and mediation of antihypertensive drug effects	The role of prostaglandins in the regulation of renin and the mediation of antihypertensive drug effects.
17	dynamic responses of active and inactive renin in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension	Active and inactive renin dynamic reactions in patients with essential hypertension and renal-vascular.
17	low plasma renin activity in normotensive patients with diabetes mellitus relationship to neuropathy	Low plasma renin activity in normotensive patients with neuropathic diabetes mellitus.
17	plasma volume osmolality vasopressin and renin activity during graded exercise in man	Osmolality of plasma volume vasopressin and renin activity during dosing; a graded exercise in men.
17	hydrostatic ultrafiltration during hemodialysis using decreasing sodium dialysate	Hydrostatic ultrafiltration during apos; hemodialysis using a decreasing sodium dialysate.
17	blood pressure and sodium balance in hypertensive patients in hospital	Blood pressure and blood pressure; sodium balance in hospitalized, hypertensive patients.
17	interactions between angiotensin peptides and the sympathetic nervous system mediating intestinal sodium and water absorption in the rat	Interactions between the peptides d' angiotensin and the sympathetic nervous system mediating the apos; intestinal absorption of sodium and d' water in the rat.
17	synaptic transmission and intracellular sodium ionophore induced sodium loading of nerve terminals	Sodium loading of nerve terminals was induced by synaptic transmission and intracellular sodium ionophore.
17	continuous positive airway pressure impairs renal function in newborn goats	Continued positive respiratory pressure alters renal function in newly born-goats.
17	the renin kallikrein prostaglandin system plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein during prostacyclin infusion in man	Plasma prostaglandin active and inactive renin kallikrein and urinary renin during prostacyclin infusion in men.
17	stimulatory action of angiotensin ii on water and electrolyte transport by the proximal colon of the rat	Stimulatory action of the drug; angiotensin ii on the transport of both water and fluid; electrolytes by the proximal colon of the rat.
17	increased sodium appetite in adrenalectomized or hypophysectomized rats after intracranial injections of renin or angiotensin ii	Lupos; sodium appetite was increased in adrenalectomized or hypophysectomized rats following intracranial renin or d&apos injections; angiotensin ii.
17	essential hypertension and diabetes	Essential hypertension and diabetes?
17	inappropriate renin secretion and abnormal cardiovascular reflexes in coarctation of the aorta	Inappropriate renin secretion and abnormal cardiovascular reflexes in the aortic coarctation.
17	the relationship between sodium pump activity and twitch tension in cardiac purkinje fibres	The relationship between sodium pump activity and twitch tension in cardiac purkinid fibers.
17	effect of oral sucrose on blood pressure in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effect of oral sucrose on spontaneously hypertensive rat blood pressure.
17	the effect of weight reduction on blood pressure plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone levels in obese patients	Lapses; effect of weight reduction on weight; plasma renin blood pressure activity and elevation; plasma aldosterone in obese patients.
17	sodium dependent inhibition of amino acid and dipeptide transport by harmaline in monkey small intestine	Sodium-dependent inhibition of amino acid and dipeptide transport by lidos; harmaline in monkeys; small intestine.
17	influence of unilateral adrenalectomy on renin angiotensin aldosterone system in primary aldosteronism	L' influence of apos; unilateral adrenalectomy on the renin system-angiotensin@ aldosterone in primary aldosterone.
17	the sodium effect of bacillus subtilis growth on aspartate	L' effect sodium of bacillus subtilis on the apos; aspartate.
17	factors relating to aldosterone secretion rate the excretions of aldosterone 18 glucuronide and the plasma aldosterone concentration in cirrhosis	The factors associated with the secretion of apos; aldosterone are the rates of apos; glucuronide d&apos excretion; aldosterone 18 and the concentration of apos; and plasma aldosterone in cirrhosis.
17	uncontrollable hypertension in patients on hemodialysis long term treatment with captopril and salt subtraction	Uncontrollable hypertension in patients on long-term hemodialysis regimens with captopril and saline subtraction.
17	aldosterone response to sodium deprivation and angiotensin ii in patients with hypopituitarism	Response of apos; aldosterone to sodium deprivation and apos; angiotensin ii in patients with apos; hypopituarism.
17	effect of hypertonic and hypotonic infusions on aldosterone in conscious sodium depleted dogs	Effect of hypotonic infusions on aldosterone in conscious sodium depleted dogs.
17	the effect on salt appetite and the renin aldosterone system on replacing the depleted ions to sodium deficient cattle	L' effect on appetite; salt appetite and the renin system-aldosterone on replacement of depleted ions by sodium deficient cattle.
17	stimulation by injected guanosine triphosphate of the sodium efflux in barnacle muscle fibres pre exposed to aldosterone	Stimulation with apos; guanosine triphosphate injection with apos; sodium efflux into barnacle muscle fibers previously exposed to aldosterone.
17	gated sodium 23 nuclear magnetic resonance images of an isolated perfused working rat heart	Gated sodium 23 nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) images from the isolated perfused rat heart.
17	application of in vivo activation analysis to the compartmental study of sodium in the hand	Application of pH; analysis of pH; in vivo activation at pH; hand-sodium compartmentalization study.
17	vasopressin fluid and electrolyte response to chronic angiotensin ii infusion	Fluid vasopressin and electrolyte response to chronic infusion of angiotensin ii.
17	role of aldosterone in sodium retention of pregnancy in the rat	Role of apos; aldosterone in sodium retention in pregnancy in rats.
17	reduced urine kallikrein excretion and antikaliuresis by chlorazanil in rats	Chlorazanil has reduced urinary kallikrein excretion and apos; chlorazanil antikaliuresis in rats.
17	hypertension treated by sodium restriction	Hypertension treated by restriction of sodium.
17	chronic treatment with the new potent vasodilator ro 12 4713 in moderate to severe hypertension effects on blood pressure endocrine function sodium and plasma volume	Chronic treatment with the new potent vasodilator ro 12,4713 in effects of d*apos; moderate to severe hypertension on the endocrine function of blood pressure, sodium and plasma volume.
17	effects of sodium intake and goldblatt hypertension on renin release in rat kidney slices	Effects of Absorption; Sodium Absorption and Absorption; Goldblatt-like hypertension on renin release in rat kidney slices.
17	subcellular localization of aldosterone induced proteins in toad urinary bladders	Subcellular localization of apos; aldosterone induces protein in toad bladder.
17	na ca exchange in rat myometrium membrane vesicles highly enriched in plasma membranes	L' na ca exchange in the rat myometrium membrane vesicles was found to be very rich in plasma membranes.
17	sodium and angiotensin in the pathogenesis of experimental renovascular hypertension	Sodium and angiotensin in the pathogenesis of experimental renovascular hypertension.
17	plasma vasopressin levels and urinary sodium excretion during cardiopulmonary bypass with and without pulsatile flow	Plasma vasopressin and urinary sodium excretion levels during cardiopulmonary bypass with and without pulsatile flow.
17	connection between the changes in tubular reabsorption and in glomerular filtration rate induced by replacement of plasma sodium and chloride by isotonic mannitol	Relationship between changes in tubular reabsorption and glomerular filtration rate induced by substitution of isotonic mannitol for plasma sodium and chloride.
17	sodium free water clearance in hemodialysis	Sodium-free water in the apos; hemodialysis.
17	sodium and calcium action potentials in cells derived from a rat medullary thyroid carcinoma	Potential for the action of sodium and calcium in cells derived from rat thyroid cell carcinoma.
17	regulation of aldosterone biosynthesis during sodium deficiency evidence for an essential role of the pituitary gland	The regulation of the biosynthesis of aldosterone during sodium deficiency indicates that the pituitary plays an essential role.
17	vasopressin elevation in essential hypertension and increased responsiveness to sodium intake	Vasopressin elevation in apos; essential hypertension and increased responsiveness to apos; sodium absorption were observed.
17	role of the renal nerves in the pathogenesis of one kidney renal hypertension in the rat	The role of renal nerves in the pathogenesis of rat kidney hypertension.
17	renal function aldosterone and vasopressin excretion following repeated long distance running	L' aldosterone and l' vasopressin excretion of renal function was excreted following repeated runs over long distances.
17	sodium proton exchange in mouse neuroblastoma cells	Sodium proton exchange in mouse neuroblastoma cells.
17	investigation of the mechanism of action of prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors on renin and aldosterone secretion and sodium excretion	Examination of d&apos mechanism; action of prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors on renin and d&apos secretion; aldosterone and apos; sodium excretion.
17	plasma substance p levels in normotensive and hypertensive subjects	Plasma p-substance level in normotensive and hypertensive subjects.
17	effects of chronic prazosin treatment on the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in man	Apos; chronic prazosin therapy on the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in men.
17	the effect of prostaglandin inhibition on renin release a comparison of furosemide and low sodium stimulation tests	Lapos; effect of apos; prostaglandin inhibition on renin liberates a comparison of furosemide and low-sodium stimulation tests.
17	sodium appetite in sheep induced by cerebral ventricular infusion of angiotensin comparison with sodium deficiency	An appetite for sodium in sheep induced by cerebral ventricular infusion of apos; angiotensin as compared to sodium deficiency.
17	effects of salt and water depletion on the early phase of hypertension in goldblatt two kidney hypertensive dogs	Effects of salt depletion and water depletion on the early phase of hypertension in goldblatt two hypertensive kidney dogs.
17	asp1 val5 angiotensin 1 8 octapeptide does not stimulate aldosterone secretion in sodium depleted sheep	L' octapeptide asp1 val5 angiotensin 18 does not stimulate the secretion of d' aldosterone in sheep without sodium.
17	aldosterone stimulates na transport without affecting citrate synthase activity in cultured cells	L' aldosterone stimulates transport n without affecting glucose; citrate synthase activity in cultured cells.
17	sodium dependent and calcium dependent calcium transport by rat brain microsomes	Sodium- and calcium-dependent calcium transport by microsomes of rat brain.
17	thermoregulation in spontaneously hypertensive rats effects of antihypertensive treatments	Effects of antihypertensive treatment thermoregulation in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	influence of sodium homeostasis on dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone renin and prolactin secretion in man	Sodium homeostasis influences dopaminergic modulation of prolactin and renin secretion of d' aldosterone in men.
17	analysis of steroids in urine for differentiation of pseudohypoaldosteronism and aldosterone biosynthetic defect	Steroid analysis in apo; urine for differentiation of pseudohypoaldosterone and the biosynthetic defects of apo; aldosterone.
17	renin release after furosemide and ethacrynic acid in man evidence for neural reflex control mechanisms	Renin release following administration of furosemide and dapos; ethacrynic acid in men indicates neural-reflex control mechanisms.
17	renal hemodynamics and sodium excretion in stroke prone spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal hemodynamics and sodium excretion in spontaneously hypertensive stroke-prone rats.
17	the effect of antihypertensive therapy on abnormal leucocyte sodium transport in essential hypertension	Effect of antihypertensive therapy on abnormal sodium leukocyte transport in critical hypertension.
17	genetic markers in spontaneously hypertensive rats	A genetic marker in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	sodium status and the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in compensated liver disease	Sodium status and renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone level in compensated liver disease.
17	changing sodium intake in children the minneapolis children s blood pressure study	Change in sodium intake in children in the Minneapolis area; Minneapolis Children's Blood Pressure Study.
17	severe hypertension hyperkalemia and renal tubular acidosis responding to dietary sodium restriction	Severe hypertension and severe renal tubular acidosis responding to a dietary sodium restriction.
17	angiotensin i ii and iii in sheep a model of angiotensin production and metabolism	In sheep, l' angiotensin i ii and iii is a model of production and metabolism of angiotensin.
17	a comparison of the effects of prostaglandins e2 and i2 on renal function and renin release in salt loaded and salt depleted anaesthetized dogs	The effects of prostaglandins e2 and i2 on renal function and renin release in anesthetized dogs with and without salt were compared.
17	the renin aldosterone profile in hypertension	A study of the relationship between hypertension and renin aldosterone.
17	angiotensin induced sodium excretion patterns in cirrhosis role of renal prostaglandins	Angiotensin-induced sodium excretion patterns in the role of renal prostaglandins in cirrhosis.
17	light dependent delta ph and membrane potential changes in halobacterial vesicles coupled to sodium transport	Light- and membrane-dependent delta ph potential changes in sodium transport coupled halobacterial vesicles.
17	pediatric aspects of essential hypertension	The pediatric aspects of high blood pressure.
17	cardiovascular effects of chronic intraventricular administration of angiotensin ii in dogs	Cardiovascular effects of apos; chronic intraventricular administration of apos; angiotensin ii in dogs.
17	dexamethasone hypertension in rats	Dexamethasone hypertension in rats.
17	dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone secretion	Dopaminergic modulation of apos-aldosterone secretion.
17	urinary excretion of calcium following an oral calcium loading test in healthy children	Lapses; urinary calcium excretion following dosing; oral calcium loading testing in healthy children.
17	transfer of urea sodium and chloride across the perfused human placenta	Transfer of sodium urea and sodium chloride through the perfused human placenta.
17	amino acid dependent sodium transport in plasma membrane vesicles from rat liver	Amino acid dependent sodium transport in rat liver plasma membrane vesicles.
17	effects of acth on the zona glomerulosa of sodium loaded timolol maleate treated rats stereology and plasma hormone concentrations	Effects of apo; acth on the glomerular area of rats treated with sodium-loaded timol maleate and concentrations of plasma hormones.
17	plasma cryoactivated renin and active renin in diabetes mellitus	Plasma cryoactivation of renin and renin is active in diabetes mellitus.
17	reversible acute renal failure from combined triamterene and indomethacin a study in healthy subjects	Reversible acute renal failure due to combination of triamterene and indomethacin, studied in healthy subjects.
17	urine dopamine in normal and hypertensive pregnancies	Urinary Dopamine (UD) in normal and hypertensive pregnancies.
17	hormonal contraception and hypertension	Hormonal contraception and high blood pressure.
17	evidence for a raised concentration of a circulating sodium transport inhibitor in essential hypertension	Evidence of increased concentration of sodium; an inhibitor of sodium transport circulating in the liver; essential hypertension.
17	long term effects of captopril on cellular sodium content and mechanical properties of aortic smooth muscle from spontaneously hypertensive rats	Long-term effects of captopril on the cellular sodium content and mechanical properties of aortic smooth muscle in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	synthesis and migration of proteins and glycoproteins in juxtaglomerular cells of sodium deficient rats an ultrastructural radioautographic study	Synthesis and migration of proteins and glycoproteins in juxtaglomerular cells from sodium-deficient rats were studied by ultrastructural radioautography.
17	an increase in a circulating inhibitor of na k dependent atpase a possible link between salt intake and the development of essential hypertension	An increase in diabetes mellitus; a circulating inhibitor; necro-dependent apase, a possible link between salt absorption and spinal cord development; essential hypertension.
17	exaggerated fractional sodium excretion in hypertension with advanced renal disease the role of renal prostaglandin and kallikrein	Fractional excretion of excessive sodium in the apo; hypertension with kidney disease enhances the role of renal and kallikrein prostaglandins.
17	effect of sodium intake on brain angiotensin converting enzyme activity in spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effect of sodium intake on brain angiotensin converting enzyme activity in spontaneously hypertensive, hypertensive rat.
17	clonidine and lidamidine whr 1142 stimulate sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit intestine	Clonidine and lidamidine whr 1142 enhance apos; sodium and chloride absorption in rabbit intestines.
17	acute hypertension in a nonhuman primate humoral and hemodynamic mechanisms	Acute hypertension in the humoral and hemodynamic mechanisms of a nonhuman primate.
17	physiological and pharmacological dialysate sodium concentrations	Sodium concentrations in the physiological and pharmacological dialysates.
17	effect of av3v lesions on development of doca salt hypertension and vascular na pump activity	Effect of av3v lesions on the development of vascular pumps; hypertension by salt and lapos.
17	effects of chronic sodium depletion on canine brain renin and cathepsin d activities	The effects of chronic sodium depletion on the activities of cathepsin d and canine brain renin.
17	the role of calcium in the control of renin release	The role of calcium in renin release control.
17	abnormalities of sodium and h2o handling in chronic obstructive lung disease	Sodium and h2o handling abnormalities in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
17	responses of active and inactive plasma renin and changes in urinary kallikrein and plasma prekallikrein to various conditions in normal subjects	Reactions of active and inactive plasma renin and changes in urine kallikrein and plasma prkallikrein levels under various conditions in normal subjects.
17	determination of the equilibrium dissociation constants and number of glycine binding sites in several areas of the rat central nervous system using a sodium independent system	Determination of glycine dissociation constants at apos; equilibrium and number of glycine-binding sites in several regions of the rat central nervous system using a sodium-independent system.
17	influence of the renin angiotensin system in the renal haemodynamic responses to modest renal nerve stimulation in the rat	L' influence of the l&apos system; angiotensin of renin in the renal hemodynamic responses to modest renal nerve stimulation in the rat.
17	sodium efflux in rabbit myocardium relationship to sodium calcium exchange	Sodium efflux in the myocardial relationship of rabbit to sodium exchange.
17	inter relationship of sympathetic nervous system and renin angiotensin aldosterone system in three renin subgroups of borderline and persistent essential hypertension	Relationship between the sympathetic nervous system and the aldosterone system of the apos; renin angiotensin in three of the apos' renin groups; limiting and persistent essential hypertension.
17	a case of normoreninemic normotensive primary aldosteronism associated with essential hypertension and nephrocalcinosis	Primary normosenemic aldosterone associated with essential hypertension and nephrocalcinosis.
17	sodium channel sodium pump and sodium calcium exchange activities in synaptosomal plasma membrane vesicles	Sodium channel pump and d&apos activities; sodium calcium exchange in synaptosomal plasma membrane vesicles.
17	characteristics of calcium and sodium transport in the synaptosomes and subsynaptosomal structures of the brain of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Characteristics of calcium and sodium transport in synaptosomes and structures under-ynaptosomal in brain of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the effect of dietary sodium on the blood pressure response to dopamine infusion in the conscious rat	L' effect of dietary sodium on blood pressure response to dopamine infusion in conscious rat.
17	attenuated pressure natriuresis in hypertensive rats	Reduced pressure Natriuresis in hypertensive rats.
17	volume and vasoconstriction in experimental renovascular hypertension	Effect of renascular hypertension on vasoconstriction and volume.
17	the role of urinary pge2 and renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the pathogenesis of essential hypertension	The role of the urinary pge2 and reindeer angiotensin aldosterone system in the pathogenesis of essential hypertension.
17	effects of a nonpressor analogue of vasopressin on plasma renin activity and salt and water excretion in water loaded anesthetized dogs	The effects of vasopressin, a non-pressurized analog of vasopressin, on apos; plasma renin activity and on apos; excretion of apos; water in apos; water loaded anesthetized dogs.
17	exchangeable sodium in rats with goldblatt two kidney one clip hypertension	Sodium in rats with goldblatt 2 kidney 1 clip hypertension.
17	renal function and sympathetic activity during mental stress in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal function and liver function; sympathetic activity during mental stress in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	whole body measurements of sodium turnover in offspring of patients with sustained essential hypertension	Sodium turnover rate in the entire body in the offspring of patients with apo; sustained essential hypertension.
17	formation and activation of renin in vivo	Renin formation and activation in vivo.
17	plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein in normal subjects in response to hydrochlorothiazide spironolactone or aldosterone administration	Plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein in normal subjects in response to oral administration of d*apos; hydrochlorothiazide spironolactone or d*apos; aldosterone.
17	gastric potential difference a reliable index of mucosal integrity	Difference in gastric potential is a reliable indicator of mucosal integrity.
17	changes in the rate of dopamine synthesis in the posterior pituitary during dehydration and rehydration relationship to plasma sodium concentrations	Changes in the rate of dopamine synthesis in the posterior pituitary during the dehydration–rehydration – plasma sodium concentration relationship.
17	use of captopril to estimate renin angiotensin aldosterone activity in the pathophysiology of chronic heart failure	L' use of captopril to estimate apos; apos activity; apos aldosterone; renin angiotensin in apos pathophysiology; chronic heart failure.
17	calcium and renin release inhibition of low sodium induced renin secretion by high calcium concentration in rat kidney perfusion	Calcium and renin inhibition of renin secretion induced by high calcium concentration in rat renal perfusion was found to induce a low renin secretion.
17	hydroosmotic response of collecting tubules to adh or camp at reduced peritubular sodium	Hydroosmotic reaction of collecting tubules to a reduced peritubular sodium concentration; adhesion or encampment.
17	evidence for coupled sodium hydrogen exchange in the rat superficial proximal convoluted tubule	Evidence of coupled sodium hydrogen exchange in the proximal superficial convoluted tubule of the rat.
17	study of sodium bromide in human volunteers with special emphasis on the endocrine system	Study of sodium bromide in human volunteers with an endocrine-related focus.
17	the problem of sodium metabolism in chronic kidney failure	The problem of sodium metabolism in the kidney; chronic renal failure.
17	sodium and chloride transport in the isolated intestine of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l	Sodium and chloride transport in the intestine; isolated from the intestine of the earthworm Lumbricus terrestris l.
17	sodium retention in rats with cadmium induced hypertension	Sodium retention in cadmium-treated rats induced arterial hypertension.
17	renal response to angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition	Renal response to apo; apo inhibition; conversion enzyme; angiotensin.
17	catecholamines sodium and renin in unilateral renal hypertension in man	Sodium and renin catecholamines in apos; unilateral renal hypertension in men.
17	trimethaphan induced hypotension effect on renal function	The trimethaphane induced a hypotension effect on renal function.
17	transport of beta hydroxy beta methyl glutarate and beta hydroxbutyrate by renal brushborder membrane vesicles	Transport of beta @-@hydroxy beta-methyl glutarate and beta-hydroxbutyrate through the membrane vesicles of the brush border.
17	actions of angiotensin ii on the isolated spontaneously hypertensive rat kidney	The action of apos; angiotensin ii on isolated spontaneously hypertensive rat kidney has been demonstrated.
17	role of prostaglandins in the aldosterone response to acth in sodium depleted human subjects	The role of prostaglandins in the response of aldosterone to apos; acth in humans has declined.
17	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone and kallikrein kinin systems in the control of fluid and electrolyte metabolism renal function and arterial blood pressure	Role of renin-angiotensin-aldosterone and kallikrein-kinin in the control of renal function and arterial blood pressure.
17	angiotensin production and metabolism in sheep	Production and metabolism of l' angiotensin in sheep.
17	the renin angiotensin system and hypertension	The renin angiotensin (AN) system and epos; high blood pressure.
17	modification of nerve membrane sodium channels by the insecticide pyrethroids	Modification of the nerve membrane's sodium channels by the pyrethroid insecticide.
17	a method for determination of human urinary inactive kallikrein prekallikrein	Procedure for the determination of human kallikrein, which is inactive in urine.
17	hormones salt hypertension and the interstitium is the interstitium the missing link	The hormones salute the hypertension and the interstium; the interstium is the apos; the interstium is the missing link.
17	45ca fluxes in isolated toad bladder epithelial cells effects of agents which alter water or sodium transport	Fluxes of 45ca in isolated toad bladder epithelial cells affect the effects of agents that modify toad bladder water or sodium transport.
17	effect of chronic and acute changes in sodium balance on the urinary excretion of prostaglandins e2 and f2 alpha in patients with essential hypertension	Effect of chronic and acute changes in appetite; sodium balance on appetite; urinary excretion of prostaglandins e2 and f2 alpha in patients with apo; essential high blood pressure.
17	is the renin angiotensin aldosterone system involved in the sodium retention in the nephrotic syndrome	The-angiotensin-aldosterone renin system is involved in sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome.
17	effect of sodium concentration and plasma sugar concentration on hexose absorption by the rat jejunum in vivo further evidence of two transport mechanisms	The effects of sodium concentration and plasma sugar concentration on apos absorption; hexose by rat jejunum in vivo confirm the existence of two transport mechanisms.
17	blood pressure plasma osmolarity and oedema in pregnancy	Pregnancy blood pressure edema and plasma osmolality.
17	water and sodium excretion in unilaterally denervated normal and sodium depleted anesthetized rats before and after plasma volume repletion	L' excretion of water and sodium in anesthetized, normal or sodium-free, unilaterally denervated rats before and after plasma volume replication.
17	effect of forebrain lesions on response to chronic intraventricular angiotensin ii	Effect of anterior brain lesions on response to chronic intraventricular angiotensin therapy ii.
17	sodium retention and salt appetite following deoxycorticosterone in hamsters	"""Sodial retention and salt appetite after deoxycorticosterone in hamsters,"" J. Toxicol."
17	estimating dietary sodium intake in individuals receiving a randomly fluctuating intake	Estimation of intake of dietary sodium in individuals receiving a variable randomized intake.
17	dietary sodium restriction for mild hypertension in general practice	"""Sodic restriction for mild hypertension in general practice,"" JAMA, Vol."
17	ultrastructure of the perfused rat epididymis effect of luminal sodium ion concentration	Ultrastructure of the perfused rat epididymis effect of luminal sodium ion concentration.
17	two techniques to improve adherence to dietary sodium restriction in the treatment of hypertension	Two techniques for improving appetite; adherence to dietary sodium restriction in the treatment of high blood pressure.
17	transmembrane na and ca2 electrochemical gradients in cardiac muscle and their relationship to force development	Transmembrane na and ca2 electrochemical gradients in cardiac muscle and their relation to force development.
17	enhancement of calcium current during digitalis inotropy in mammalian heart positive feed back regulation by intracellular calcium	Increases in calcium current during apo; digitalin inotropy in mammalian positive heart, versus-regulation by intracellular calcium.
17	dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone responsiveness to angiotensin ii with changes in sodium intake	Dopaminergic modulation of the reactivity of apos; aldosterone to apos; angiotensin ii with changes in apos; sodium.
17	renal function in cystic fibrosis with special reference to the renal sodium handling	Renal function in cystic fibrosis, especially in the handling of renal sodium.
17	sodium balance during development of hypertension in the spontaneously hypertensive rat shr	L' sodium balance during development of apos; hypertension in spontaneously hypertensive rats reduced.
17	effects of dietary sodium on brain angiotensin ii receptors in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effects of dietary sodium on receptors of l' cerebral angiotensin ii in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	renal structural and functional changes and sodium balance in hypothyroid rats	Hypothroid rats: re-structural and functional changes and sodium balance.
17	respiration and sodium transport in rabbit urinary bladder	Respiration and sodium transport in the rabbit bladder.
17	molecular action of aldosterone	Molecular action of lypos; aldosterone.
17	the effect of dialysate sodium concentration on body fluid compartment volume plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in chronic hemodialysis patients	Effect of sodium-dialysate concentration on plasma volume, renin activity, and plasma aldosterone concentration in chronic hemodialysis patients.
17	effect of sodium gradient on calcium uptake by plasma membranes of the myometrium	Effect of sodium gradient on calcium uptake by myometrial plasma membranes.
17	role of renin angiotensin system in glucocorticoid hypertension in rats	The role of the apos system; angiotensin renin in apos; glucocorticoid hypertension in rats.
17	evidence that some mechanism other than the renin system causes sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome	Evidence that sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome is induced by a mechanism other than the renal system.
17	remodeling of the rat aortic endothelial layer during experimental hypertension changes in replication rate cell density and surface morphology	Endothelial layer remodeling of the rat aorta during apo changes; experimental hypertension in cell density of the replication rate and surface morphology.
17	influence of sodium on the alpha 2 adrenergic receptor system of human platelets role for intraplatelet sodium in receptor binding	The influence of sodium on the alpha-2 receptor system of human platelets plays a role in the binding of intraplatelet sodium to receptors.
17	prevention of malignant hypertension in salt loaded s dahl rats with the calcium antagonist nifedipine	Apos prevention; malignant hypertension in sahl rats with apos; nifedipine calcium antagonist.
17	exchangeable sodium plasma renin activity and blood pressure changes during the development of 2 kidney 1 clip hypertension and after subsequent contralateral nephrectomy	Sodium exchangeable plasma renin activity and blood pressure changes during development of the apos; hypertension by 2 renal clips 1 and subsequent contralateral nephrectomy.
17	intracellular na and ca2 activities in aortic smooth muscle cells from spontaneously hypertensive rats	Na and ca2 activity in aortic smooth muscle cells of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	effects of angiotensin ii on the zona glomerulosa of sodium loaded dexamethasone treated rats administered or not with maintenance doses of acth stereology and plasma hormone concentrations	Effects of apos; angiotensin ii on the glomerular area of rats treated with dexamethasone and receiving maintenance doses of apos; aceth and plasma concentrations of apos; hormones.
17	rate of action of anemonia sulcata toxin ii on sodium channels in myelinated nerve fibres	Anemonia sulcata ii on sodium channels in myelinated nerve fibers.
17	effect of sodium intake on biosynthesis of renin	Sodium absorption in the liver; absorption of sodium in the kidney.
17	the role of the cellular sodium pump in human granulopoiesis in vitro	The role of the cellular sodium pump system in human granulopoiesis in vitro.
17	chronology of the sodium hypothesis and hypertension	Chronology of apo; sodium and high blood pressure.
17	dietary sodium and essential hypertension some myths hopes and truths	Dietary sodium and high blood pressure essential certain myths hopes and truths.
17	the sodium currents of nerve under voltage clamp as heterogeneous kinetics a model that is consistent with possible kinetic behavior	Sodium currents of the voltage clamp nerve as heterogeneous kinetics a model that is compatible with the possible kinetic behavior.
17	sodium and chloride transport across the isolated rabbit ciliary body	Sodium and chloride transport through the isolated ciliary body of the rabbit.
17	active and inactive renin release from rabbit kidney cortex slices effect of sodium concentration and of furosemide	Release of active and inactive renin by rabbit renal cortex, effect of sodium concentration and furosemide on renal cortical slices.
17	sodium needs of infants and children with ileostomy	Infants and children who have undergone ileostomy require sodium.
17	the feedback regulation of angiotensinogen production by components of the renin angiotensin system	Feedback on the regulation of angiotensinogen production by components of the apo system; angiotensin of renin.
17	effects of renal sympathectomy on sodium and water excretion in stroke prone spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal sympathectomy effects on apos; sodium and water excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats subject to stroke.
17	contrasting renal effects of different antihypertensive agents in hypertensive rats with bilaterally constricted renal arteries	Comparison of the renal effects of different antihypertensives in hypertensive rats with bilateral constriction of renal arteries.
17	interactions of cocaine and cocaine congeners with sodium channels	Interactions of cocaine and cocaine congeners with cocaine sodium channels.
17	olfactory contributions to dehydration induced anorexia in weanling rats	The olfactory contribution to dehydration induced etapos; anorexia in weaned rats.
17	sodium neural interactions in the development of spontaneous hypertension	Neural interactions in the development of spontaneously hypertensive hypertension.
17	plasma catecholamines and cardiovascular responses during converting enzyme inhibition in normotensive and hypertensive man	Plasma catecholamines and cardiovascular responses during the apo; inhibition of conversion enzymes in normotensive and hypertensive men.
17	dietary sodium and renal alpha 2 adrenergic receptors in dahl hypertensive rats	Adrenergic alpha 2 renal and dietary sodium receptors in dahl hypertensive rats.
17	natriuresis and renal na k atpase activity in kidneys of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal natriuresis and na k atpase activity in kidney of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the relation of genetics to essential hypertension a review	The relationship between genetics and high blood pressure.
17	estrogens and hypertension	Uh, estrogen and hypertension.
17	effect of anteroventral third ventricle lesions on vascular sodium pump activity in two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Effect of anteroventral lesions of the third ventricle on the apos; vascular sodium pump activity in the apos; Goldblatt hypertension of two kidneys.
17	stimulation of aldosterone biosynthesis by sodium sequestration role of angiotensin ii	Stimulation of biosynthesis of apos; aldosterone by sodium sequestration of apos; angiotensin ii.
17	reduced ratio of active to total urinary kallikrein in essential hypertension	Reduction of active to total urinary kallikrein ratio in baseline; essential hypertension.
17	urinary prostaglandin e2 and kallikrein excretion in glucocorticoid hypertension in rats	Urinary excretion of prostaglandin e2 and kallikrein in rats; glucocorticoid hypertension.
17	renal vasoconstrictive response to contrast medium the role of sodium balance and the renin angiotensin system	Renal vasoconstrictive response to contrast, role of the apos; sodium balance and the apos system; angiotensin renin.
17	relations between the renin angiotensin aldosterone system and urinary elimination of sodium study of healthy subjects in clinostatism and on a sodium free diet	Relations between the reindeer angiotensin aldosterone system and urinary elimination of sodium from healthy subjects in clinostatism and a sodium-free diet.
17	changes in plasma sodium concentration in women at the menopause	Changes in the plasma sodium concentration in postmenopausal women.
17	pathologic effects in rodents exposed to sodium combustion products	Disease-causing effects in rodents exposed to sodium combustion products.
17	effect of sodium deficiency on beta melanocyte stimulating hormone stimulation of aldosterone in isolated rat adrenal cells	An effect of sodium deficiency on the stimulation of apos; aldosterone by apos; a hormone that stimulates beta-melanocytes in isolated adrenal cells from rats.
17	modulated anticonvulsant block of sodium channels in nerve and muscle	Anticonvulsant modulable nerve and muscle sodium channel block.
17	changes of alanine sodium co transport during maturation of xenopus laevis oocytes	Changes in the transport of d' alanine sodium during maturation of xenopus laevis oocytes.
17	dopaminergic blockade of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system effect of high and low sodium intakes	Dopaminergic blockade of l' effect of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone and low and high sodium intakes on the renin system-aldosterone.
17	reversal of renovascular hypertension	Reversal of the apos; renal hypertension-vascular.
17	inhibition of guinea pig renal na k atpase by normotensive human plasma effects of a high sodium diet	Lapos; inhibition of guinea pig renal na katpase by normotensive plasma effects of sodium-rich diets in humans.
17	responses to furosemide in normotensive and hypertensive subjects	Effect of furosemide on human immunodeficiency virus infection.
17	decrease of angiotensin sensitivity after bed rest and strongly sodium restricted diet in pregnancy	A decrease in sensitivity to angiotensin after bed rest and a markedly reduced sodium diet during pregnancy.
17	interaction of renal beta 1 adrenoceptors and prostaglandins in reflex renin release	Interaction of renal beta-1 adrenoceptors and prostaglandins in renal reflex release.
17	further observations of aldosterone response in barnacle muscle fibers	D' further observations were made of the response to aldosterone in barnacle muscle fibers.
17	the renin angiotensin system and drinking in the euryhaline flounder platichthys flesus	The renin angiotensin system and drink from platichthys flesus platichthys flesus euryhaline platichthys flesus flounder.
17	structural and functional studies of the adrenal zona glomerulosa in sodium depleted and sodium loaded sheep	Structural and functional studies of the adrenal glomerular zone in sodium-depleted and sodium-loaded sheep.
17	metabolic regulation of apical sodium permeability in toad urinary bladder in the presence and absence of aldosterone	Metabolic regulation of the apical sodium permeability in the toad bladder in the presence and absence of toads; aldosterone.
17	effects of tibalosine a new alpha adrenoceptor antagonist in essential hypertension	Effect of the new alpha-adrenoceptor antagonist, tibalosin, on apos; essential hypertension.
17	precursors of hypertension a review	The warning signs of hypertension were examined.
17	renal function in pregnant rats with two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Renal functions in pregnant rats with apo; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	chemical renal medullectomy and experimental hypertension	Chemical renal medullectomy and experimental hypertension.
17	aldosterone response to renin angiotensin acth hemorrhage and sodium depletion in a freshwater teleost catostomus macrocheilus	Aldosterone response to reindeer angiotensin acth hemorrhage and sodium depletion in a freshwater teleostomus catostomus macrocheilus.
17	defect in the sodium modulated tissue responsiveness to angiotensin ii in essential hypertension	Failure of tissue responsiveness modulated by sodium to apos; angiotensin ii in apos; essential hypertension.
17	comparison of sodium and urea as indicators of pulmonary vascular permeability	A comparison of sodium and urea as indicators of the pulmonary vascular permeability.
17	intracellular na and ca2 in aortic smooth muscle cells after enzymatic isolation in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Intracellular Na and Ca2 in aortic smooth muscle cells following enzyme isolation in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the influence of cytoplasmic sodium concentration on the stoichiometry of the sodium pump	L' influence of cytoplasmic sodium concentration on sodium pump stoichiometry.
17	canine neonatally induced coarctation hypertension in the second year variably hyperresponsive plasma renin activity	Acute hypertension due to canine neonatality in the second year of life; plasma renin activity is variably hyperactive.
17	sodium chloride transport in the medullary thick ascending limb of henle s loop evidence for a sodium chloride cotransport system in plasma membrane vesicles	Transport of sodium chloride in the thick, medullary ascending limb of the hen loop indicates the existence of sodium chloride cotransport systems in plasma membrane vesicles.
17	dogs with experimental cirrhosis of the liver but without intrahepatic hypertension do not retain sodium or form ascites	Dogs with experimental liver cirrhosis but no intrahepatic hypertension do not retain sodium and form ascites.
17	the effect of sodium intake on the blood pressure related to age and sex	Effect of apo; sodium intake on blood pressure according to age and sex.
18	biometric study of spleen and liver weights in africans and europeans with special reference to endemic malaria	Biometric study of spleen and liver weights in African and European patients, particularly with respect to endemic malaria.
18	spleens and holoendemic malaria in west new guinea	Spleen and holoendemic malaria in West New Guinea.
18	a study of the structure of splenic sinuses in man and in the albino rat with the light microscope and the electron microscope	Investigation of the structure of the splenic sinuses in male and albino rats by light and electron microscopy.
18	splenectomy in blood dyscrasia	Splenectomy in cases of blood dyscrasy?
18	intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen i reduced diphosphopyridine nucleotide cytochrome c reductase cytochrome c oxidase and succinic dehydrogenase in the rat and guinea pig	Intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen i reduced cytochrome c reductase diphosphopyridine nucleotide cytochrome c oxidase and succinic dehydrogenase in rats and guinea pigs.
18	method for the study of antigenicity of homologous whole spleen cells in mice	Dapos method; immunoassay; antigenicity of whole homologous spleen cells in mice.
18	studies on the adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxins on antibody formation iii histologic response of the rabbit spleen to a single injection of a purified protein antigen	Immunosorbent studies; adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxins on endosorbital formation; antibody iii histological response of rabbit spleen to a single injection of apo; purified protein antigen.
18	studies on the runting syndrome in newborn mice	Racing syndrome studies in mice new-nées.
18	the cardio active principle in spleen	Cardio principle-active in the spleen.
18	intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen ii some properties and the distribution of ribonuclease in rat spleen	Intracellular localization of enzymes in the spleen ii certain properties and distribution of ribonuclease in the rat spleen.
18	the site of synthesis of the 19s gamma globulins in dysgammaglobulinemia	Site of synthesis of gamma globulins from the 19th century in dysgammaglobulinemia.
18	an action of 5 hydroxytryptamine on adrenaline receptors	An action of 5 hydroxytryptamine on receptors d' adrenaline.
18	humoral aspects of the immune response to homografts ii relationship between the hemagglutinating and cytotoxic activities of certain isoimmune sera	Humoral Aspects of the Immune Response to Homografts ii The relationship between hemagglutinating and cytotoxic activities of certain isoimmune sera.
18	role of the thymus in immune ractions in rats i the immunologic response to bovine serum albumin antibody formation arthus reactivity and delayed hypersensitivity in rats thymectomized or splenectomized at various times after birth	The role of thymus in immune responses in rats: delayed hypersensitivity in thymectomized or splenectomized rats at various times after birth; immune response to antibody formation; bovine serum albumin; responsiveness to l' arthus and l&apos.
18	gamma globulin and antibody formation in vitro iii induction of secondary response at different intervals after the primary the role of secondary nodules in the preparation for the secondary response	The formation of gamma globulin and d' antibody in vitro iii induction of the secondary response at different intervals after primary formation the role of secondary nodules in secondary response preparation.
18	the role of liver and spleen in the metabolism of intravenously injected fat in rabbits	The role of liver and spleen in intravenous fat metabolism in rabbits.
18	actions of bretylium and guanethidine on the uptake and release of 3h noradrenaline	Effects of bretylium and guanethidine on eposalin; absorption and release of 3 h of noradrenaline.
18	plasma protein formation in vitro by tissues from mice infected with staphylococci	In vitro plasma protein formation by mouse tissues infected with staphylococci.
18	passive transfer of transplantation immunity i tritiated lymphoid cells ii lymphoid cells in millipore chambers	Passive apo transfer; transplant immunity tritiated lymphoid cells ii lymphoid cells in millipore chambers.
18	homograft tolerance in mice use of urethan and sublethal irradiation	Tolerance of the homografts of mice to urethane and urethane; sublethal irradiation.
18	immunological unresponsiveness to sensitization with simple chemical compounds a search for antibody absorbing depots of allergen	The immunological inability to respond to sensitization with simple chemical compounds a search for antibodies to absorb deposits of allergens.
18	the lymphod tissues and immune responses of neonatally thymectomized mice bearing thymus tissue in millipore diffusion chambers	The lymphoid tissues and immune responses of newborn mice,-nées thymectomized with thymus in diffusion chambers of millipores.
18	antibody plaque formation by normal mouse spleen cell cultures exposed in vitro to rna from immune mice	Formation of plaques; antibody by normal mouse spleen cell cultures exposed to immune mouse rna in vitro.
18	immunity and susceptibility toward cheek pouch transplants of a mouse leukemia	Immunity and susceptibility to cheek transplantations; leukemia in mice.
18	pigment deposition in viscera associated with prolonged chlorpromazine therapy	Visceral pigment deposition associated with prolonged chlorpromazine therapy.
18	spleen colony formation in anemic mice of genotype ww	Formation of colonies of spleen in anemic mice of the ww genotype.
18	culture of the cytopathic area surrounding virulent cells of bacillus anthracis in mouse spleen	Culture of cytopathic region surrounding virulent cells of anthracis bacillus in mouse spleen.
18	immune mechanisms in parabiosis intoxication	Immune mechanisms of poisoning; parabiosis intoxication.
18	the regeneration of f1 host cell spleen and thymus at ectopic sites in f1 animals induced by implantation of parental spleen and thymus	The regeneration of the spleen and thymus of f1 cells of the host at ectopic sites in f1 animals induced by the implantation of the spleen and the parental thymus.
18	production of immunological tolerance in mice after repeated injections of disrupted spleen cells	Production of apo; an immunological tolerance in mice after repeated injections of disturbed spleen cells.
18	major urinary protein complex of normal mice origin	D&apos major urinary protein complex; origin normal mouse.
18	long term isolation stress in rats	D&apos stress; long-term isolation in the rats.
18	malignant lymphomas following allogenic disease transition from an immunological to a neoplastic disorder	Malignant lymphomas following apo transition; allogeneic apo disease; immunologic disorder to neoplastic disorder.
18	experimental runt disease in mice caused by salmonella typhimurium var copenhagen	Salmonella typhimurium var copenhagen is an avorton caused by Salmonella typhimurium.
18	transplantation tolerance induced in adult mice by protein overloading of donors	Tolerance to induced transplantation in adult mice by protein overload in donors.
18	passive transfer of adjuvant arthritis by lymph node or spleen cells	Passive transmission of lapos; adjuvant arthritis by lymph nodes or splenic cells.
18	congenital anomalies induced in hamster embryos with h 1 virus	Birth defects induced in hamster embryos carrying the h1 virus.
18	further studies of the stimulation of dna synthesis in cultures of spleen cell suspensions by homologous cells in inbred strains of mice and rats	D' other studies on the stimulation of synthesis of l' DNA in spleen cell suspension cultures by homologous cells in mouse and rat inbred lines.
18	immunologic incompetence of immunologically runted animals	Immunologic incompetence in immunologically challenged animals.
18	the differing survival of normal and sensitized spleen cells transferred to allogeneic hosts	The different survival of normal and sensitized splenic cells was transferred to allogeneic hosts.
18	studies on antigenicity the relationship between in vivo and in vitro enzymatic degradability of hapten polylysine conjugates and their antigenicities in guinea pigs	Apos; antigenicity studies, the relationship between in vivo and in vitro enzymatic degradability of d' haptene polylysine conjugates and guinea pig antigenicity.
18	studies on the mechanism of action of riley virus 3 replication of riley s plasma enzyme elevating virus in vitro	Studies on the mechanism of riley virus 3 replication action by riley plasma enzyme increase virus in vitro.
18	production of runt disease in tolerant mice by the injection of syngeneic lymphoid cells	Production of lymphoid degeneration (LPD); aborton in LPD-tolerant mice; syngenic lymphoid cell injection.
18	cellular localization of immunoglobulins with different allotypic specificities in rabbit lymphoid tissues	Cellular localization of d' immunoglobulins with different allotypic specificities in rabbit lymphoid tissue.
18	the interaction of donor and host lymphoid cells in the pathogenesis of renal cortical destruction induced by a local graft versus host reaction	L' interaction of donor and host lymphoid cells; host in pathogenesis of renal cortical destruction induced by local graft versus host.
18	in vitro studies on radiation lymphoid recovery of mouse spleen	In vitro lymphoid recovery studies by irradiation of mouse spleen.
18	antibody formation in vitro by separated spleen cells inhibition by actinomycin or chloramphenicol	Antibody formed in vitro by inhibition of apos-, actinomycin-, or chloramphenicol-separated spleen cells.
18	delta aminolevulinate dehydratase activity in mice with hereditary anemia	Delta aminolevulinate dehydratase activity in mice with anemia.
18	the intracellular localization of pituitary thyrotropic hormone	The intracellular localization of the pituitary thyrotropic hormone.
18	the mechanism of the pressor responses to physostigmine in the rat and their modification by mebutamate and amylobarbitone	The mechanism of pressor responses to physostigmine in rats and their modification by mebutamate and l' amylobarbitone.
18	spleen as a production site for erythropoietin	The spleen as a site of production of apos; erythropoietin.
18	antibody synthesizing cells appearance after secondary antigenic stimulation in vitro	An antibody synthesizing the apos; appearance of cells after secondary antigenic stimulation in vitro.
18	template activity of rna from antibody producing tissues	The activity of the tissue producing antibody.
18	the release of specific bactericidal antibodies by endotoxin	The release of specific bactericidal antibody by the endotoxin.
18	correlation of succinate metabolism and virulence in salmonella typhimurium	Correlation of succinate metabolism with virulence in Salmonella typhimurium.
18	primary macroglobulinemia death due to mesenteric vascular occlusion with gas in the portal venous system	Death of primary macroglobulinemia due to gas-filled, mesenteric vascular occlusion in the portal venous system.
18	humoral and cellular aspects of the immune response to the somatic antigen of salmonella enteritidis	Cellular and humoral aspects of the immune response to the somatic antigen of Salmonella enteritidis.
18	homograft immunity in pregnancy the placental transfer of cytotoxic antibody in rabbits	Placental transfer of the cytotoxic antibody in rabbits is homograft during pregnancy.
18	the survival of pasteurella pestis in materials preserved by solid carbon dioxide dry ice	Survival of pasteurella pestis in materials preserved by carbon dioxide solid dry ice.
18	an electron microscope study of lymphatic tissue in runt disease	Electron microscopic study of lymphatic tissue in Abortion Disease.
18	hog cholera 3 investigation of the complement fixation test for the detection of the virus in swine tissue	Swine cholera research 3 on the complement fixation test for virus detection in swine tissues.
18	antibody synthesis at the cellular level antibody induced suppression of 19s and 7s antibody response	Antibody synthesis at the cellular level resulted in suppression of the response of 19s and 7s antibodies.
18	stimulation of nonspecific resistance to infection by a crude cell wall preparation from mycobacterium phlei	Stimulation of non-specific resistance to apos; infection by a rudimentary mycobacterium phlei cell wall preparation.
18	autoimmune disease in nzb bl mice 3 induction of membranous glomerulonephritis in young mice by the transplantation of spleen cells from old mice	Auto illness-immune in nzb bl 3 mice induction of d' membrane glomerulonephritis in young mice by splenic cell transplantation from old mice.
18	antibody production by cells in tissue culture i morphological evolution of lymph node and spleen cells in culture	Production of antibodies by cultured cells in the morphological evolution of lymph nodes and cultured spleen cells.
18	antibody production by cells in tissue culture ii qualitative and quantitative aspects of antibody production local hemolysis in gum by cells obtained from long term culture	Production of antibodies; antibody by tissue cultured cells ii qualitative and quantitative aspects of production of apo; local hemolysis in gum by cell derived from apo; long-term culture.
18	the effects of antigens and of phytohemagglutinin on rabbit spleen cell suspensions	Antigen and phytohemagglutinin effects on rabbit spleen cell suspensions.
18	chronic infection of rodents by machupo virus	Chronic infection of rodents with the machupo virus.
18	heat labile antigens of salmonella enteritidis ii mouse protection studies	Heat-labile Salmonella enteritidis antigens ii mouse protection studies.
18	metabolic characterization of the genus brucella v relationship of strain oxidation rate of i erythritol to strain virulence for guinea pigs	Metabolic characterization of the relationship between the genus brucella v and the rate of d' oxidation of the strain of l' ierythritol and virulence of the strain in guinea pigs.
18	homograft target cells contact destruction in vitro by immune macrophages	The target cells of d' homografts are destroyed by in vitro contact with immune macrophages.
18	granulocytosis promoting extract of mouse tumor tissue partial purification	Granulocytosis promoting apos; partially purified mouse tumour tissue extract.
18	lymphoma growth in vivo electronic discrimination between tumor and stroma cells	Lymphoma growth in vivo electron discrimination between tumor cells and cells of the stroma.
18	antibody synthesis initiated in vitro by paired explants of spleen and thymus	Synthesis of antibodies is initiated in vitro by paired spleen and thymus explants.
18	immunological competence alteration by whole body x irradiation and shielding of selected lymphoid tissues	Alteration of immunological competence through whole body irradiation and shielding of certain lymphoid tissues.
18	increased incidence of lymphoma after injections of mice with cells differing at weak histocompatibility loci	Increased incidence of lymphoma after apo; injection of different cells into mice at locus d' low degree of histocompatibility.
18	immunization against rauscher mouse leukemia with tissue culture material	Immunization against mouse leukemia to recapture at apos; help tissue culture materials.
18	antagonistic effects of humoral isoantibodies on the in vitro cytotoxicity of immune lymphoid cells	Oppressive effects of humoral isoantibodies on in vitro cytotoxicity of immune lymphoid cells.
18	autoimmune disease in nzb bl mice i pathology and pathogenesis of a model system of spontaneous glomerulonephritis	Antimicrobial disease in the mouse nzb bl blisters and pathogenesis d' a model system of spontaneous glomerulonephritis.
18	electron microscopy of listeria monocytogenes infected mouse spleen	Electron microscopy of Listeria monocytogenes infected the mouse spleen.
18	quantitative studies of the adoptive immunological memory in mice i an age dependent barrier to syngeneic transplantation	Quantitative studies of the adoptive immune memory in a disease-dependent barrier in mice; age at syngene transplantation.
18	ontogeny of the immune response i the development of the follicular antigen trapping mechanism	The ontogeny of immune response is the development of the trapping mechanism of the follicle antigen.
18	effect of pyridoxine deficiency on nucleic acid metabolism in the rat	Pyridoxine deficiency affects nucleic acid metabolism in the rat.
18	two cases of clostridial hepatitis	Two cases of hepatitis C; clostridial hepatitis.
18	lysosomes in lymphoid tissue i the measurement of hydrolytic activities in whole homogenates	Lysosomes in lymphoid tissue i the measurement of whole-homogenate hydrolytic activities.
18	lysosomes in lymphoid tissue ii intracellular distribution of acid hydrolases	Lysosomes in lymphoid tissue ii Intracellular distribution of acidic hydrolases.
18	differentiation and functional expression of potential antibody producing cells in the presence of chloramphenicol	Differentiation and functional expression of potential progeny-producing cells; antibodies in the presence of chloramphenicol.
18	quantitation of transplantation immunity i method	Quantification of organ donation; immunity to transplantation i.
18	cellular sites of synthesis of rabbit immunoglobulins during primary response to diptheria toxoid freund s adjuvant	Cellular sites of rabbit immune globulin synthesis during primary response to adjuvant diphtheria anatoxin freund adjuvant.
18	studies on immunologic reconstitution of thymectomized mice	Immunological reconstitution studies of thymectomized mice.
18	virus induced murine leukemia its inhibition and suppression by serum containing erythropoietin	The virus induced the inhibition and suppression of murine leukemia by serum containing l-apos; erythropoietin.
18	high concentration of injected titanium dioxide in abdominal lymph nodes	High concentration of titanium dioxide injected into the body's abdominal lymph nodes.
18	puromycin induced necrosis of crypt cells of the small intestine of mouse	Puromycin also caused necrosis of the mouse small intestine cryptic cells.
18	spleen cell proliferation in response to homologous antigens studied in congenic resistant strains of mice	Proliferation of spleen cells in response to homologous antigens studied in congener-resistant strains of mice.
18	primary antibody response in organ cultures	The primary immune response in organ cultures.
18	immunological tolerance to microbial antigens ii suppressed antibody plaque formation to shigella antigen by spleen cells from tolerant mice	Immunological tolerance to microbial antigens ii suppressed the formation of anti-shigella antibody plaques by tolerant mouse spleen cells.
18	immunofluorescent antibody studies of a murine leukemia virus	Studies of immunofluorescent antibodies to mouse leukemia virus.
18	the incidence of palpable liver and spleen in the postpartum period	L' incidence of liver and spleen cancer in the postpartum period.
18	loss of thymus distinctive serological characteristics in mice under certain conditions	Loss of the distinctive serological characteristics of the thymus in mice under certain conditions.
18	scanning with macroaggregates of radioiodinated human serum albumin as an adjunct to celiac arteriography a preliminary communication	Scan with apo macroaggregates; radioiodinated human serum albumin in addition to apos; celiac arteriography a preliminary communication.
18	virus induced erythropoiesis in hypertransfused polycythemic mice	The virus induced erythropoiesis in polycythemic hypertransfused mice.
18	heavy chain subclasses of human gamma g globulin serum distribution and cellular localization	Under-heavy-chain classes of the serum distribution of the gamma-human globulins and cell localization.
18	serum alpha globulin fraction survival and recovery effect in irradiated mice	Alpha globulin serum fraction survival and recovery effect in irradiated mice.
18	hemopoietic spleen colony studies ii erythropoiesis	Haematopoietic spleen colony studies ii Erythropoiesis.
18	histocompatibility antigen transfer in utero tolerance in progeny and sensitization in mother	Antigen dapos; histocompatibility in utero transfers tolerance in offspring and sensitizes the mother.
18	immunization with skin isografts taken from tolerant mice	Immunization with oral antibody; skin isografts from tolerant mice.
18	phosphoribosylamidotransferase regulation of activity in virus induced murine leukemia by purine nucleotides	The regulation of l' phosphoribosylamidotransferase activity in purine nucleotide-induced murine leukemia.
18	drug induced tolerance for skin allografts across the h 2 barrier in adult mice	The drug induced a tolerance to cutaneous allografts across the h2 barrier in adult mice.
18	tissue specificity of histone phosphorylation	Tissue specificity of histone phosphorylation.
18	primary antibody response in vitro in peritoneal cells	This is the primary immune response in vitro in peritoneal cells.
18	rabbit lymphoid cells differentiated with respect to alpha gamma and mu heavy polypeptide chains and to allotypic markers aa1 and aa2	Rabbit lymphoid cells differentiate as a function of heavy alpha gamma and mu polypeptide chains and allotypic markers aa1 and aa2.
18	studies on viral plasmacytosis aleutian disease of mink vii infection of mink with dna extracted from diseased spleens	Studies of viral plasmacytosis aleutic disease of the eye; mink vii vison infection with mink; DNA extracted from diseased spleen.
18	primary immune response in grafted cells dissociation between the proliferation of activity and the proliferation of cells	Primary immune response in graft cells dissociation between lacid proliferation; activity and cell proliferation.
18	on the nature of transplantation immunity in the adenovirus tumor system	On the nature of the apo; immunity from transplantation in the adenovirus tumour system.
18	metabolic characterization of the genus brucella vi growth stimulation by i erythritol compared with strain virulence for guinea pigs	Metabolic characterization of the stimulation of growth of brucella vi by erythritol compared with the virulence of the strain in guinea pigs.
18	chromosome abnormality in rat leukemia induced by 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene	Chromosomal abnormality in the rat leukemia induced by 712 dimethylbenz a anthracene.
18	murine lymphoma augmented growth in mice with pertussis vaccine induced lymphocytosis	Murine lymphoma has been shown to increase growth in mice with apos; pertussis vaccine-induced lymphocytosis.
18	lipids of the living coelacanth latimeria chalumnae	Lipids from live coelacanth latimeria chalumnae.
18	biosynthesis of gamma globulin studies in a cell free system	D&apos biosynthesis; studies of gamma globulins in a cell-free system.
18	the influence of cortisone on experimental viral infection 8 suppression by cortisone of interferon formation in mice injected with newcastle disease virus	Influence of cortisone on experimental suppression of apos; viral infection with cortisone 8 of the d&apos formation; interferon in mice injected with Newcastle disease virus.
18	effect of splenectomy on the susceptibility of mice inoculated with diplococcus pneumoniae	Effect of splenectomy on susceptibility of mice inoculated with diplococcus pneumoniae.
18	the mechanism of action of splenic irradiation in chronic myelogenous leukemia	The mechanism of onset; action of onset; splenic irradiation in chronic myelogenous leukemia.
18	hemopoietic colony forming units in regenerating mouse liver suppression by anticoagulants	Hematopoietic colony-forming units in liver suppression of regenerating mice by anticoagulants.
18	effect of neutral alpha and omega amino acids and basic alpha amino acids on uptake of l histidine by intestinal mucosa testis spleen and kidney in vitro a comparison with effect in brain	Effect of alpha and omega neutral amino acids and basic alpha amino acids on the uptake of l' histidine by the intestinal mucous testis of the spleen and kidney in vitro; comparison with effect in the brain.
18	improved in vitro survival of normal functional spleen cells	To improve the in vitro survival of normal functional spleen cells.
18	role of the thymus in tolerance 3 tolerance to bovine gamma globulin after direct injection of antigen into the shielded thymus of irradiated rats	Role of thymus in tolerance 3 to bovine gamma globulin following direct injection of antigen into shielded thymus of irradiated rats.
18	the incorporation of tritium from thymidine into proteins of the mouse	L' incorporation of thymidine tritium into mouse protein.
18	factors influencing hematopoietic spleen colony formation in irradiated mice i the normal pattern of endogenous colony formation	Factors influencing hematopoietic spleen colony formation in irradiated mice i normal endogenous colony formation.
18	ultrastructural localization of antibody in differentiating plasma cells	Ultrastructural localization of antibody in differentiating plasma cells.
18	hemopoietic colony studies v effect of hemopoietic organ stroma on differentiation of pluripotent stem cells	The hematopoietic colonies studied the effects of the stroma of hematopoietic organs on the differentiation of pluripotent stem cells.
18	similarities between the biochemical actions of cycasin and dimethylnitrosamine	Similarities between the biochemical actions of cycasin and dimethylnitrosamine.
18	antigen binding to cells determination by enzymic fluorogenic group hydrolysis	Antigen binding to determination of cells by enzymatic hydrolysis of the fluorogenic group.
18	cytological evidence for a relationship between normal hemotopoietic colony forming cells and cells of the lymphoid system	Cytological evidence suggests a relationship between normal hemotopoietic colonies as forming cells and lymphoid system cells.
18	enhanced erythropoiesis with concomitant diminished granulopoiesis in preirradiated recipient mice evidence for a common stem cell	The presence of a common stem cell in the pre-irradiated recipient mice is evidenced by an increase in apos, an increase in erythropoiesis, and a concomitant decrease in granulopoiesis.
18	the use of a non ionic detergent triton wr 1339 to determine rates of triglyceride entry into the circulation of the rat under different physiological conditions	Use of new nonionic detergent 1339 to determine dosage levels; entry of triglycerides into the rat circulation under different physiological conditions.
18	in vitro synthesis of immunoglobulin by rheumatoid synovial membrane	In vitro synthesis of rheumatoid synovial membrane immunoglobulin.
18	uptake distribution and binding of beryllium to organelles of the rat liver cell	Distribution of the apos; absorption and binding of beryllium to rat liver cell organelles.
18	the origin and kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes	The origin and kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes.
18	the primary immune response in mice i the enhancement and suppression of hemolysin production by a bacterial endotoxin	The main immune response in mice is the increase and suppression of the production of apos; hemolysin by a bacterial endotoxin.
18	serological analysis of thymus and spleen grafts	Serological analysis of the thymus and spleen grafts.
18	high dose delay of the immune response effect of actinomycin d on continuation of the immune response in vitro	Dose is a high-delayed dose of lacid; effect of the immune response of lacid; actinomycin d on the continuation of the immune response in vitro.
18	rejection of renal allografts specific immunologic suppression	Specific immunological suppression of renal allograft rejection.
18	immunosuppression with medroxyprogesterone acetate	Immunosuppression with etapos; drugxyprogesterone acetate.
18	influence of cellular factors on immune unresponsiveness induced by klebsiella pneumoniae capsular antigen	Influence of cellular factors on the immune response to klebsiella pneumoniae capsular antigen.
18	the effect of molybdenum on ascorbic acid metabolism in rats	Effect of molybdenum on the metabolism of ascorbic acid in rats.
18	induced sensitization of normal laboratory animals to brucella abortus endotoxin	Induced sensitization of normal laboratory animals to endotoxin-induced brucella abortus.
18	transplantation of marrow to extramedullary sites	Transplantation of the bone marrow to other sites.
18	use of 125 i and 51 cr labeled albumin for the measurement of gastrointestinal and total albumin catabolism	Use of apos; labelled albumin, 125 i and 51 cc for the measurement of gastric catabolism,-intestinal and total albumin.
18	recall of immunity in mice vaccinated with salmonella enteritidis or salmonella typhimurium	Reminder of immunity in mice vaccinated with Salmonella enteritidis or Salmonella typhimurium vaccine.
18	purification of the moloney and rauscher murine leukemia viruses by use of zonal ultracentrifuge systems	Purification of moloney murine leukemia and rauscher viruses by zonal ultracentrifuge.
18	in vivo growth and distribution of anthrax bacilli in resistant susceptible and immunized hosts	In vivo growth and distribution of anthrax bacilli in resistant, susceptible, and/or immunized hosts.
18	isolation of deoxyribonucleic acid from mammalian tissues	Isolate potato; deoxyribonucleic acid from mammalian tissue.
18	studies on blood capillaries ii transport of ferritin molecules across the wall of muscle capillaries	Studies of blood capillaries ii transport ferritin molecules across the muscle capillary wall.
18	high resolution electron microscopic analysis of the amyloid fibril	High-resolution electron microscopic analysis of amyloid fibril.
18	depressed cellular formation of antibody to shigella antigens in vitro by spleen cell cultures from unresponsive mice	Cultures of rat cells from insensitive mice decreased the cellular formation of antibody to shigella antigens in vitro.
18	immunologic defenses against metastases impairment by excision of an allotransplanted lymphoma	Immunologic defense against apo; alteration of metastasis by apo; excision; all-planted lymphoma.
18	asparagine synthetase activity of mouse leukemias	L'activité de l'apos; asparagine synthetase des leucémies de souris.
18	a new method for the enumeration of antigen reactive cells responsive to a purified protein antigen	A new method to enumerate the number of reactive cells with antigen reacting to a purified protein antigen.
18	hemophilia role of organ homografts	Role of apo; hemophilia in organ homografts.
18	the induction of graft versus host disease in mice treated with cyclophosphamide	L' induction of apos; a graft for immune cell disease; host in cyclophosphamide-treated mice.
18	amyloidosis induced in mice by escherichia coli endotoxin	Apos-induced amyloidosis in mice; endotoxin of apos; escherichia coli.
18	the primary immune response in mice ii cellular responses of lymphoid tissue accompanying the enhancement or complete suppression of antibody formation by a bacterial endotoxin	The primary immune response in mice ii the cellular responses of lymphoid tissue accompanying the apos; the augmentation or complete suppression of the formation of d' antibodies by a bacterial endotoxin.
18	cross protection against salmonella enteritidis infection in mice	Cross-protection against oral infection; Salmonella enteritidis infection in mice.
18	bone marrow as a source of cells in reactions of cellular hypersensitivity i passive transfer of tuberculin sensitivity in syngeneic systems	Bone marrow as a source of cells in cellular hypersensitivity reactions; passive transfer of tuberculin sensitivity into the syngene systems.
18	chronic allogeneic disease i development of glomerulonephritis	Chronic allogenic disease i development of glomerulonephritis.
18	distribution of antibody forming cells of different specificities in the lymph nodes and spleens of guinea pigs	Distribution of antibodies of different specificity in the lymph nodes and spleen of guinea pigs.
18	cell to cell interaction in the immune response 3 chromosomal marker analysis of single antibody forming cells in reconstituted irradiated or thymectomized mice	Cell interaction-cell in immune response 3 analysis of chromosomal markers of single antibody cells (SARs) formed in irradiated or thymectomized reconstituted mice.
18	specificity of the anamnestic response produced by listeria monocytogenes or mycobacterium tuberculosis to challenge with listeria monocytogenes	Specificity of the anamnestic response induced by tuberculous mycobacteria or listeria monocytogenes for challenge by listeria monocytogenes.
18	respiration enhancing effect of tuberculin on splenic cells of hypersensitive guinea pigs	Stimulant effect of tuberculin on spleen cell respiration in hypersensitive guinea pigs.
18	distribution of chromate labeled brucella abortus endoxin in tolerant mice	Distribution of l' chromate-labelled endoxin brucella abortus in tolerant mice.
18	properties of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus grown in vivo	Properties of Venezuelan elk virus; equine encephalomyelitis cultured in vivo.
18	generalized gangliosidosis beta galactosidase deficiency	Generalized Gangliosis - Deficiency in beta galactosidase.
18	lipid metabolism in human platelets i evidence for a complete fatty acid synthesizing system	Human platelet lipid metabolism demonstrates the existence of a complete fatty acid synthesis system.
18	the binding of o aminoazotoluene to deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid and protein in the c57 mouse	The binding of l' aminoazotoluene o to deoxyribonucleic acid, l' ribonucleic acid and protein in c57 mice.
18	neutron activation analysis ofr copper in biological material applied to wilson s disease	Neutron activation analysis of copper r in biological material applied to Wilson's disease.
18	histochemical investigation of acid mucosubstances in secondary amyloidosis	Histochemical examination of acidic mucosubstances in secondary amyloidosis.
18	spontaneous rupture of splenic artery aneurysm in pregnancy report of first known antepartum rupture with maternal and fetal survival	Spontaneous rupture of the apos; aneurysm of the apos; splenic artery during pregnancy: first known prenatal rupture with maternal and fetal survival.
18	cells involved in the immune response vii the demonstration using allotypic markers of antibody formation by irradiation resistant cells of irradiated rabbits injected with normal allogeneic bone marrow cells and sheep erythrocytes	The Cells Involved in the Immune Response vii the demonstration to apo; aid of allotypic markers of apo formation; antibody by apo resistant cells; irradiation of irradiated rabbits injected with normal allogeneic bone marrow cells and sheep erythrocytes.
18	nonspecific staining its control in immunofluorescence examination of soil	Non--specific staining of its control during l' immunofluorescence soil examination.
18	the immediate haematological response in the rat to experimental exposures of carbon monoxide	The immediate hematological response to experimental exposure to carbon monoxide in rats.
18	lipid abnormalities in foam cell reticulosis of mice an analogue of human sphingomyelin lipidosis	Lipid abnormalities in the reticulosis of mouse foam cells, an analog of liposis of human sphingomyelin.
18	infection of an established mouse cell line with cell free rauscher leukemia virus i cytological study with the electron microscope	D&apos infection; a cell line established from mouse by an electron microscopic cytological study of cell-free leukemia virus i.
18	genetic control of the antibody response in inbred mice transfer of response by spleen cells and linkage to the major histocompatibility h 2 locus	Genetic control of immune response in inbred mice by spleen cell transfer and spleen cell binding to major locus d' h 2 histocompatibility.
18	studies on the induction of tolerance of the h y antigen in mice with neonatal skin grafts	Studies on apo; induction of tolerance to apo; antigen h y in neonatal transplanted mice.
18	n acetyl beta glucosaminidases in human spleen	Acetyl beta glucosaminidases in human spleen.
18	effect of specific immune mouse serum on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in nonvaccinated mice challenged by various routes	Effect of a mouse-specific immune serum on the growth of Salmonella enteritidis in unvaccinated mice exposed to various Salmonella enteritidis administration routes.
18	effect of specific immune mouse serum on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice preimmunized with living or ethyl alcohol killed vaccines	The effects of mouse-specific immune serum on the growth of Salmonella enteritidis in mice pre-immunized with apo; ethyl alcohol or live alcohol killed vaccines.
18	dynamics in development of experimental streptococcal immunity in mice	Dynamics of the development of l' experimental streptococcal immunity in mice.
18	high resolution autoradiography of intracellular plutonium	High-resolution autoradiography of intracellular plutonium?
18	cerebral gm1 gangliosidosis chemical pathology of visceral organs	Gm1 cerebral ganglioside chemical pathology of the visceral organs.
18	immunological properties of friend virus from mouse spleen obtained by gel filtration	Immunological properties of mouse spleen-friendly virus obtained by gel filtration.
18	local immune response in experimental pyelonephritis	Local immune response in experimental pyelonephritis.
18	the effect of cytotoxic agents on the passive transfer of cell mediated immunity	L' effect of cytotoxic agents on passive transfer of apos; cell-mediated immunity.
18	the effect of cytotoxic agents on the primary immune response to listeria monocytogenes	L' effect of cytotoxic agents on primary immune response to listeria monocytogenes.
18	pathogenesis of a local graft versus host reaction immunogenicity of circulating host leukocytes	Pathogenesis of apos; local graft versus apo reaction; immunogenic host of apo leukocytes; circulating host.
18	physical separation of hemopoietic stem cells differing in their capacity for self renewal	Physical separation of hematopoietic stem cells whose capacity d'apos differs; auto-renewal.
18	salmonella abony salmonella typhimurium recombinant nonvirulent for the mouse	Recombinant non virulent Salmonella abony salmonella typhimurium in mice.
18	the role of individual spleen cells in the interferon response of the intact mouse	The role of spleen cells in the immune response to intact mouse interferon.
18	sustained effects of brief daily stress fighting upon brain and adrenal catecholamines and adrenal spleen and heart weights of mice	Sustained effects of short daily stress relief on cerebral and adrenal catecholamines and on the weight of the adrenal spleen and heart of mice.
18	further implication of murine leukemia like virs in the disorders of nzb mice	Additional involvement of murine leukemia as virs in nzb mouse disorders.
18	the host response to calmette gu rin bacillus infection in mice	The response of the host to infection with guinea-pig bug in mice.
18	the influence of immunologically committed lymphoid cells on macrophage activity in vivo	L' influence of immunologically engaged lymphoid cells on macrophage; macrophage activity in vivo.
18	pathogenesis of chronic disease associated with persistent lymphocytic choriomeningitis viral infection ii relationship of the anti lymphocytic choriomeningitis immune response to tissue injury in chronic lymphocytic choriomeningitis disease	Pathogenesis of apo; chronic disease associated with persistent viral lymphocytic choriomeningitis ii relationship between the immune response to lymphocytic choriomeningitis and chronic lymphocytic choriomeningitis tissue injury.
18	in vitro induction of a primary response to the dinitrophenyl determinant	In vitro, induction of etapos; a primary response to the dinitrophenyl determinant.
18	liver in felty s syndrome	The liver has a Felty's syndrome.
18	comparison of soluble human and mouse transplantation antigens	Comparison of soluble human antigens with mouse transplant antigens.
18	significance of increased splenic uptake on liver scintiscanning	L' increase of the apos; splenic absorption on the hepatic scintigraphy is significant.
18	platelet life span and sites of platelet sequestration in onyalai	Lifespan of the platelets and platelet sequestration sites in the onyalai.
18	cell sorting automated separation of mammalian cells as a function of intracellular fluorescence	Sorting the cells allows for the automatic separation of the mammalian cells as a function of the intracellular fluorescence.
18	pulmonary hypertension due to micro thromboembolism from splenic and portal veins after portacaval anastomosis	Pulmonary hypertension due to portal and splenic vein microthromboembolism after anastomosis porto-cave.
18	a protein inhibitor of acid deoxyribonucleases	Protein inhibitor for acid deoxyribonucleases.
18	lymphomas in mice failure of induction after a graft versus host reaction	Lapses; lymphoma induction in neosus mice; was not successful after a grafted reaction against the host.
18	studies on tuberculin fever iv the passive transfer of reactivity with various tissues of sensitized donor rabbits	Tuberculin Fever (TCF) studies iv Passive transfer of reactivity with various sensitized donor rabbit tissues.
18	synthesis assembly and secretion of gamma globulin by mouse myeloma cells i adaptation of the merwin plasma cell tumor 11 to culture cloning and characterization of gamma globulin subunits	Synthesis assembly and secretion of gamma globulin by mouse myeloma cells: adaptation of merwin tumor 11 plasma cell 11 to culture cloning and characterization of gamma globulin sub-units.
18	synthesis and metabolism of glycerol 3h triether a nonabsorbable oil phase marker for lipid absorption studies	Synthesis and metabolism of glycerol 3h triether, a marker of the nonabsorbable oil phase for d' lipid absorption studies.
18	cells involved in cell mediated and transplantation immunity in the rabbit i the noninvolvement of the bone marrow antigen reactive cell in the transplant rejection reaction	Cells involved in cell mediation and l' immunity to rabbit transplantation i la non-involvement of reactive cell to l' bone marrow antigen in the transplant rejection response.
18	experimental bluetongue disease in white tailed deer	Experimental, blue-language disease in white-tailed deer.
18	effects of estradiol upon the thymus and lymphoid organs of immature female rats	Effects of apos; estradiol on the thymus and lymphoid organs of immature female rats.
18	antibodies of the iga type in intestinal plasma cells of germfree mice after oral or parenteral immunization with ferritin	iga-like antibodies in intestinal plasma cells from germless mice following oral or parenteral immunization with ferritin.
18	carcinogen induced tumors of the thymus iv humoral influences of normal thymus and functional thymomas and influence of posthymectomy period on restoration	Cancer induces thymus IV tumors humoral influences of normal thymus and functional thymomas, and influences the postthymectomy period on restoration.
18	bone marrow and spleen dissociation of immunologic properties by cortisone	Dissociation of the immunological properties of bone marrow and spleen by cortisone.
18	influence of carotid baroreceptors on different components of the vascular system	L' carotid baroreceptor influence on different components of the vascular system.
18	repression of colony formation reversed by antiserum to mouse thymocytes	Repression of colony formation was reversed by mouse thymocyte antiserum.
18	teratogenicity of vitamin b6 deficiency omphalocele skeletal and neural defects and splenic hypoplasia	Neural and skeletal abnormalities and splenic hypoplasia: teratogenicity of vitamin b6 deficiency.
18	complement fixing antigen from bhk 21 cell cultures infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Antigen binding compound from lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus infected bhk 21 cell cultures.
18	pseudourea 2 2 9 10 anthrylenedimethylene bis 2 thio dihydrochloride dihydrate microbiological assay and tissue distribution studies in mice	Pseudourea 2-910 anthrylenedimethylene bis 2 thio dihydrochloride Microbiological assay and tissue distribution studies in mice.
18	isolation of mycobacterium xenopei from water taps	Isolate xenopei mycobacteria from tap water.
18	vibriolytic antibody forming cells a new application of the pfeiffer phenomenon	The cell-forming vibriolytic antibody is a new application of the pfeiffer phenomenon.
18	a kinetic study on murine myeloid leukaemia	A kinetic study of murine myeloid leukemia.
18	red cell survival in biliary cirrhosis	Survival of red blood cells in biliary cirrhosis.
18	antitumor activity in mice of tentacles of 2 tropical sea annelids	L' antitumor activity in tentacle mice of two tropical annelids of the sea.
18	hepatic influence on splenic synthesis and release of coagulation activities	Hepatic influence on splenic synthesis and release of clotting activities.
18	recovery of rauscher leukemia virus from large volumes of seeded cow s milk and from infected murine spleens	Recovery of leukemia virus from large volumes of stocked cow's milk and infected mice.
18	suppression of established friend virus leukemia by statolon i demonstration of a latent infection in clinically normal mice	Suppression of leukemia caused by statoloni established friend l'apos i virus demonstrates latent infection in clinically normal mice.
18	mediation of immunity to tumor isografts in mice by heterologous ribonucleic acid	Intervention of lacidosis; heterologous ribonucleic acid in mice; immunity to tumour isografts in mice.
18	evidence for transformation of spleen cells one day after infection of mice with friend leukemia virus	In addition, there is evidence of a change in the cells of the spleen one day after infection; infection of mice with the amicus leukemia virus.
18	experimental encephalitis following peripheral inoculation of west nile virus in mice of different ages	Experimental encephalitis following apos; peripheral inoculation of West Nile virus in Dapos mice; different ages.
18	mycotoxicity of aspergillus ochraceus to chicks	Efficacy of aspergillus ochraceus for the control of chicks.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response i synergy in graft versus host reactions produced by cells from nzb bl mice	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating the nzb bl graft – host response i synergy in graft – host reactions.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response ii synergy in graft versus host reactions produced by balb c lymphoid cells of differing anatomic origin	Synergy between lymphoid cells involved in the graft-versus-host response ii Synergy in graft-versus-host reactions produced by lymphoid cells of the balb c d&apos type; different anatomical origins.
18	release of vasoactive amines from rabbit platelets induced by sensitized mononuclear leukocytes and antigen	The release of vasoactive rabbit platelet amines induced by sensitized mononuclear leukocytes and rabbit antigen.
18	the pathogenesis of aleutian disease of mink i in vivo viral replication and the host antibody response to viral antigen	The pathogenesis of Aleutian disease of viral replication in vivo in mink i and the antibody response of the host to the viral antigen.
18	lactoferrin an iron binding protein in neutrophilic leukocytes	Lactoferrin is an iron-binding protein in neutrophil leukocytes.
18	histopathological findings in the combined immunity deficiency syndrome	Histopathological findings in Combined Dapos Syndrome; immunodeficiency.
18	metabolism of arterial plasma estrogens by the splanchnic organs of the dog in vivo	In vivo metabolism of arterial plasma estrogens by dog splanchnic organs.
18	inhibition of nucleic acid and protein synthesis mouse spleen cells in vitro by azathioprine	In vitro, l' azathioprine inhibits protein and nucleic acid synthesis in mouse spleen cells.
18	antibody to nuclear material eluted from isolated spleen vessels in systemic lupus erythematosus	Antibodies to the nuclear material were eluted from the isolated spleen vessels of the systemic lupus erythematosus.
18	non enzymic nature of the pyridine haemochrome cleaving activity of mammalian tissue extracts haem alpha methenyl oxygenase	The non-enzymatic nature of apos; cleavage activity of apos; hemochrome of pyridine d' extracts from mammalian tissue alpha methenyloxygenase.
18	free and membrane bound polyribosomes in normal and rauscher virus infected mouse spleen cells	Membrane-bound free-living polyribosomes in normal mouse spleen cells infected with the virus rauscher.
18	eression of allelic immunoglobulin in homozygous rabbits injected with rna extract	L' oral erection; allelic immunoglobulin in homozygous rabbits injected with l' extract from rna.
18	selective simulation of allelic expression effectf antibodies to allotypic markers on lymphoid cells	Selective Dapos Simulation; Dapos Antibody; allelic expression to allotypic markers on lymphoid cells.
18	acylation of lysolecithin in the intestinal mucosa of rats	Acylation of lysolecithin in the mucosa of the intestinal tract of rats.
18	in vitro initiated secondary anti hapten response ii increasing cell avidity for antigen	Antimicrobial reaction-hapten secondary initiated in vitro ii increasing liver enzymes; cellular avidity for apos; antigen.
18	maternal fetal interaction and immunological memory	Maternal fetal interaction and immunologic memory.
18	survival of listeria monocytogenes in experimentally infected mice	Survival of Listeria monocytogenes in experimentally infected mice.
18	rapid method for the isolation of listeria monocytogenes from experimentally infected mice	A rapid method to isolate listeria monocytogenes from experimentally infected mice.
18	bone marrow histogenesis a comparison of fatty and red marrow	L' histogenesis of bone marrow is a comparison between red marrow and fat marrow.
18	a radiochemical assay for glutamine synthetase and activity of the enzyme in rat tissues	Radiochemical assay of glutamine synthetase and sucrose; enzyme activity in rat tissues.
18	globoid cell leucodystrophy krabbe s disease deficiency of galactocerebroside beta galactosidase	Globoid cell leucodystrophy, krabbe disease, beta galactosidase galactocerebroside deficiency.
18	cellular aspects of the inverse relationship between the net charge of immunogens of antibodies elicited	The cellular aspects of the inverse relationship between net load of antibody immunogens elicited responses.
18	altered nucleic acids of antibody forming tissues	Altered nucleic acids in antibody-forming tissues.
18	selection of a single antibody forming cell clone and its propagation in syngeneic mice	Selection of a single antibody-forming cell-like clone and its propagation in syngenetic mice.
18	in vitro induction of granulocyte differentiation in hematopoietic cells from leukemic and non leukemic patients	In vitro, l' induction of granulocyte differentiation in hematopoietic cells of leukemic and nonleukemic patients.
18	observations on the increasing malignancy of tumours on prolonged growth the influence of immunological changes in the host	The observations on the increasing malignancy of the tumours on the prolonged growth, l' influences the immunological changes in the host.
18	enzyme and isoenzyme alterations in friend disease	Enzymatic and isoenzymatic changes in friend's disease.
18	studies on mammalian glucoamylases with special reference to monkey intestinal glucoamylase	Studies of mammalian glucoamylases, especially monkey intestinal glucoamylase.
18	an experimental system for the simultaneous estimation of mitostatic and lymphotoxic effects of immunosuppressants and cytostatics	Test system for apo; simultaneous estimation of mitostatic and lymphotoxic effects of immunosuppressive and cytostatic.
18	regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides ii action on peritoneal exudate cells	Regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides (polynucleotides) ii action on peritoneal exudate cells.
18	multiplication of pasteurella multocida in the spleen liver and blood of turkeys inoculated intravenously	Pasteurella multocida multiplication in the liver and blood of turkeys inoculated intravenously.
18	leukemia virus activation in chronic allogeneic disease	L' activation of the leukemia virus in chronic allogenic diseases.
18	leukemia evoked with 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat i changes in spleen and thymus	Leukemia evoked anthracene 7,812 trimethylbenz in the rat i changes in the spleen and thymus.
18	further studies of antigenic competition 3 a model to account for the phenomenon based on a deficiency of cell to cell interaction in immune lymphoid cell populations	D' other antigenic competition studies 3 a model to account for the phenomenon based on cell-to-cell interaction in immune lymphoid cell populations.
18	the secondary immune response to a hapten in vitro antigen concentration and the carrier effect	The secondary immune response to a concentration of antigenic drugs; in vitro haptene and anti-Hapos; carrier effect.
18	quantitative isolation of total glycosphingolipids from animal cells	Quantitative isolation of total animal cell glycosphingolipids.
18	acceleration by thymosin of the development of resistance to murine sarcoma virus induced tumor in mice	Development of resistance to mouse tumor-inducing murine sarcoma virus accelerated by thymosin.
18	necessity of the spleen for balanced secondary sex ratios following maternal immunization with male antigen	Needed by the spleen to balance the sex ratio: secondary females after birth; mother immunization with the apo; male antigen.
18	differential response of ribonucleic acid polymerase in preneoplastic and neoplastic ovaries of mice following oestradiol treatment	Differential reaction of l' ribonucleic acid polymerase in the preneoplastic and neoplastic ovaries of mice following d' estradiol treatment.
18	red cell aging in vivo	In vivo red blood cell aging.
18	the acid soluble disulphide and mixed disulphide levels of some normal tissues and transplanted tumours	Levels of acid-soluble disulfide and mixed disulfide in some normal tissue and in transplanted tumours.
18	isotopic studies of the conversion of oxophlorins and their ferrihaems into bile pigments in the rat	Isotopic studies of the conversion of oxophlorines and their ferrihemes to bile pigments in rats.
18	peculiar immunobiology of bone marrow allografts ii rejection of parental grafts by resistant f 1 hybrid mice	Specific immunobiology of allografts of bone marrow (BM) ii rejection of parental grafts by resistant f1 hybrid mice.
18	cell mediated tumor allograft immunity in vitro transfer with rna	Cell-mediated cell-mediated tumor allograft in vitro transfer with rna.
18	breast involvement in wegener s granulomatosis	Breast involvement in Wegener granulomatosis.
18	inducible heme oxygenase in the kidney a model for the homeostatic control of hemoglobin catabolism	L' heme oxygenase inducible in the kidney is a model for the homeostatic control of the catabolism of l' hemoglobin.
18	the spleen in type i hyperlipoproteinemia histochemical biochemical microfluorometric and electron microscopic observations	The spleen in the histochemical histochemical type I hyperlipoproteinemia, microfluorometric and microscopic electron observations.
18	the influence of thymic and bursal lymphoid systems in avian tuberculosis	The influence of avian tuberculosis on thymic and bursal lymphoid systems.
18	some structural and antigenic properties of intracisternal a particles occurring in mouse tumors complement fixation immunodiffusion neuroblastoma plasma cell tumor	Certain structural and antigenic properties of intracisternal a particles present in mouse tumours complete the immunological binding of neuroblastoma plasma neuroblastoma tumor.
18	myeloperoxidase and crystalline bodies in the granules of dmba induced rat chloroma cells	Myeloperoxidase and crystalline bodies in dmba granules induced rat chloroma cells.
18	microbiological assay and tissue distribution of 5 diazouracil in mice	Microbiological dose and tissue distribution of 5 diazouracil in the mouse.
18	peritoneoscopic features of intraabdominal vessels in cirrhosis of the liver	Peritoneal characteristics of the intra-abdominal vessels in liver cirrhosis.
18	regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides v effect on cell associated immunoglobulin receptors and immunological memory	The regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides affects the receptors of d' cell-associated immunoglobulin and immune memory.
18	the binding of radioactive label from labelled phenacetin and related compounds to rat tissues in vivo and to nucleic acids and bovine plasma albumin in vitro	Binding of radioactive label of labelled phenacetin and rat tissue-related compounds in vivo and nucleic acids and bovine plasma albumin in vitro.
18	suppressive effect of immunization with mouse fetal antigens on growth of cells infected with rauscher leukemia virus and plasma cell tumors	Suppressive effect of apo; immunization with fetal mouse antigens on growth of leukemia-infected cells and plasma cell tumours.
18	a survey of the interaction of calcium ions with mitochondria from different tissues and species	A study of l' interaction of calcium ions with the mitochondria of different tissues and species.
18	idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura with normal platelet survival time	Thrombocytopenic idiopathic purpura with normal platelet survival time.
18	immunocompetent cells among mouse thymocytes a minor population	The immunocompetent cells in the mouse thymocyte cell, a minor population.
18	serological and immunogenic activity of soluble mouse transplantation antigens controlled by the h 2 locus	Serological and immunogenic activity of soluble h2 mouse transplant antigens.
18	in vitro inhibition of leucocyte migration in crohn s disease by a sarcoid spleen suspension	In vitro sarcoid spleen suspension inhibits migration of leukocytes into Crohn's disease.
18	control of contamination in psittacosis specimens by antibiotics	Antibiotic contamination of psittacosis specimens is controlled.
18	peyer s patches an enriched source of precursors for iga producing immunocytes in the rabbit	Peyer is implementing an enriched source of precursors for the production of rabbit immunocytes.
18	peculiar immunobiology of bone marrow allografts i graft rejection by irradiated responder mice	L' specific immunobiology of allografts of bone marrow rejection of transplants by responding irradiated mice.
18	unusual particles in splenic disorders	Unusual particles in splenic disorders?
18	suppression of cell mediated immunity to infection by an antimitotic drug further evidence that migrant macrophages express immunity	The suppression of cell-mediated immunity against apos; anti-mitotic drug infection proves once again that migrating macrophages express immunity.
18	viral and cellular surface antigens of murine leukemias and myelomas serological analysis by immunoelectron microscopy	Viral and cellular surface antigens of murine leukemias and myeloma, immunoelectron microscopic serological analysis.
18	chronic allogeneic disease 3 genetic requirements for the induction of glomerulonephritis	Chronic allogenic disease 3 genetic requirements for liver; induction of glomerulonephritis.
18	immune responses in vitro iv suppression of primary m g and a plaque forming cell responses in mouse spleen cell cultures by class specific antibody to mouse immunoglobulins	In vitro Immune Reactions iv suppression of primary m g and d' a plaque that forms cell responses in mouse spleen cell cultures by a mouse immune globulin-specific class antibody.
18	electrophoretically homogeneous antibody synthesized by spleen foci of irradiated repopulated mice	Electrophoretically homogeneous antibody synthesized by splenic foci of repopulated irradiated mice.
18	cellular differentiation of the immune system of mice vi strain differences in class differentiation and other properties of marrow cells	Differentiation of the immune system of the mouse vi strains differences in the differentiation of classes and other properties of the cells of the bone marrow.
18	hemopoietic colony forming cell responses in mice infected with ectromelia virus	Haematopoietic colony forming cell responses in ectromelike virus infected mice.
18	role of hemopoietic colony forming cell responses in the pathogenesis of ectromelia	Role of cell-mediated hematopoietic colonies in the pathogenesis of ectomyelitis.
18	chronic proliferative arthritis of mice induced by mycoplasma arthritidis i induction of disease and histopathological characteristics	Chronic proliferative mouse arthritis induced by arthritid mycoplasma i induction of disease and histopathological characteristics.
18	eperythrozoon coccoides i effect on the interferon response in mice	Eperythrozoon coccoides i has an effect on the response to l' interferon in mice.
18	characterization of an equine infectious anemia antigen extracted from infected horse spleen tissue	Characterization of an equine infectious antigen from infected spleen tissue of horses.
18	in vitro attachment of radioactive endotoxins to lysosomes	Attachment of radioactive endotoxins to lysosomes in vitro.
18	portal venous injection in the rat	I've got a portal venous injection in the rat.
18	defects in hematopoietic differentiation in nzb and nzc mice	Defects in hematopoietic differentiation in the nzb and nzc mice.
18	generalized accumulation of neutral glycosphingolipids with g m2 ganglioside accumulation in the brain	Generalized accumulation of neutral glycosphingolipids with accumulation of g m2 gangliosides in the brain.
18	ceramide like synthetic amides that inhibit cerebroside galactosidase	The ceramide resembles synthetic amides that inhibit cerebroside galactosidase.
18	cytological identification of the chromosome carrying the ixth linkage group including h 2 in the house mouse	Cytological identification of the chromosome carrying the ixth-binding group, including h2 in the domestic mouse.
18	on the 1 9 volt alternating current polarographic signal of tissues	On the tissue 19-volt alternating current polarographic signal.
18	immunologic enhancement of allogeneic tumor growth with soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens	Immunological enhancement of allogeneic tumour growth with soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens.
18	host gene control of c type rna tumor virus inheritance of the group specific antigen of murine leukemia virus	Genetic control of apo; host of apo; inheritance of apo-cell type tumour virus; antigen specific to murine leukemia virus group.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response iv synergy in the gvh reaction quantitated by a mortality assay in sublethally irradiated recipients	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating the graft response vs. the host's response to the gvh reaction, which is quantitated by a mortality test in e.g.-lethally irradiated recipients.
18	development of chicken lymphoid system i synthesis and secretion of immunoglobulins by chicken lymphoid cells	Chicken lymphoid system development he synthesis and secretion of immunoglobulins by chicken lymphoid cells.
18	active suppression of immunoglobulin allotype synthesis i chronic suppression after perinatal exposure to maternal antibody to paternal allotype in sjl x balb c f 1 mice	Active suppression of apo synthesis; apo allotype; perinatal perinatal perinatal exposure to apo immune globulin; maternal antiapo antibody; paternal allotype in sjl x bsp c f 1 mice.
18	immune status of mice tolerant of living cells ii continuous presence and nature of facilitation enhancing antibodies in tolerant animals	Living cell tolerant mice immune status ii Continuous presence and nature of antibodies stimulating facilitation in tolerant animals.
18	suppression of immunoglobulin class synthesis in mice i effects of treatment with antibody to chain	Removal of immunoglobulin class synthesis in mice i antibody-chain treatment.
18	studies on thymus function 3 duration of thymic function	Thymus function 3 studies, thymus function 3 duration.
18	metabolism of the schistosomicidal agent hycanthone by rats and rhesus monkeys	Metabolism of l' agent schistosomicide hycanthone by rats and rhesus monkeys.
18	restoration of antibody forming capacity in cultures of nonadherent spleen cells by mercaptoethanol	Recovery of antibody-forming capacity in non-adherent spleen cell cultures by mercaptoethanol.
18	unimpeded growth of tumour in hosts pre immunized with tyrosyl or dinitrophenyl coated tumour cells	Unimpeded growth of the tumour in pre--host organisms immunized with tyrosyl- or dinitrophenyl-coated tumor cells.
18	immune complexes and visceral deposits of measles antigens in subacute sclerosing panencephalitis	Immune complexes and subacute, visceral deposits of measles antigens in subacute sclerosing panencephalitis.
18	chemical classes of amyloid substance	Chemical classes of amyloid substances?
18	ascorbic acid a culture requirement for colony formation by mouse plasmacytoma cells	Ascorbic acid, a culture necessary for colony formation by the mouse plasmacytoma cells.
18	cellular basis of the genetic control of immune responses to synthetic polypeptides ii frequency of immunocompetent precursors specific for two distinct regions within phe g pro l a synthetic polypeptide derived from multichain polyproline in inbred mouse strains	Cellular basis of genetic control of immune responses to synthetic polypeptides ii frequency of specific immunocompetent precursors for two distinct regions in the synthetic polypeptide polypeptide derived from polyproline in mouse inbred strains.
18	the pathological findings following laparotomy in hodgkin s disease	The pathological results of laparotomy in Hodgkin's Disease.
18	studies of mice with a balanced complement of 36 chromosomes derived from f 1 hybrids of t1wh and t1ald translocation homozygotes	Study of mice with a balanced complement of 36 chromosomes from f1 d' f1 d' homozygous t1wh and t1ald translocation.
18	further observations on whether host immunodepression is associated with tumour growth in mice	Other observations are to determine if immunosuppression of the host is associated with tumour growth in the mouse.
18	spleen weight in rats during tumour growth and in homograft rejection	Rat spleen weight during tumour growth and release; homograft.
18	nucleotide sequence at the binding site for coat protein on rna of bacteriophage r17	The nucleotide sequence at the coat protein binding site on the rna of bacteriophage r17.
18	tissue localization of australia antigen immune complexes in acute and chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis	Tissue localization of the Australian antigenic immune complexes in acute and chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis.
18	genetic control of thymus derived cell function i in vitro dna synthetic response of normal mouse spleen cells stimulated by the mitogens concanavalin a and phytohemagglutinin	Genetic control of thymus-derived cell function i in vitro synthesis response of DNA from mouse normal spleen cells stimulated by concanavalin a and phytohemagglutinin a and phytohemagglutinin mitogens.
18	rejection of ascites tumor allografts i isolation characterization and in vitro reactivity of peritoneal lymphoid effector cells from balb c mice immune to el4 leukosis	Tumour allograft rejection; ascites characterization; isolation and in vitro reactivity of peritoneal lymphoid effector cells from leucose-immunized Berber mice.
18	variation in accessible cell surface immunoglobulin among antibody firming cells	Accessible cell surface immunoglobulin among antibody firming cell cells.
18	detection of dna synthesis in intact organisms with positron emitting methyl 11 c thymidine	Detection of apos synthesis; DNA in intact organisms with methylthymidine-emitting positrons 11 c.
18	transfer amyloidosis i studies on the transfer of various lymphoid cells from amyloidotic mice to syngeneic nonamyloidotic recipients ii induction of amyloidosis in mice with spleen thymus and lymph node tissue from casein sensitized syngeneic donors	Transfer of amyloidosis studies of the transfer of various lymphoid cells from amylotic mice to non-amylotic non-axis induction of amyloidosis; amyloidosis in mice with the thymus of the spleen and lymph node tissue of casein-sensitized syngen donors.
18	thymus derived lymphocytes produce an immunologically specific macrophage arming factor	Thymus-derived lymphocytes produce an immunologically specific factor in the armament of macrophages.
18	thymus derived t cell immunoglobulins presence of a receptor site for igg and absence of large amounts of buried ig determinants on t cells	Thymus-derived t-cell immunoglobulins, a receptor site for apos; igg and absence of large amounts of determinant buried in the t-cell.
18	the immune reaction as a stimulator of tumor growth	The immune response as a stimulator of tumour growth.
18	enhancement of the post occlusive oscillation in the splenic circulation by adenosine	Increase in apo; post-occlusive oscillation in the splenic blood flow by apos; adenosine.
18	gaucher s disease deficiency of acid glucosidase and reconstitution of enzyme activity in vitro	Acid glucosidase deficiency and acid glucosidase reconstitution; enzyme activity in vitro.
18	specific heterologous enhancement of immune responses iv specific generation of a thymus derived enhancing factor	Specific heterologous increase in immune responses iv specific generation of d' a d&apos factor; thymus-derived increase.
18	rapid viral induction of murine lymphomas in the graft versus host reaction	Rapid viral induction of murine lymphoma into the-host graft response.
18	distribution of labeled lymph node cells in mice during the lymphocytosis induced by bordetella pertussis	Distribution of labeled lymph node cells in mice during Bordetella pertussis lymphocytosis.
18	cellular events during the induction of experimental thyroiditis in the rabbit	Induction of experimental thyroiditis in the rabbit.
18	the release of prostaglandins and rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs from rabbit spleen and its antagonism by anti inflammatory drugs	Prostaglandin release and substance contracting the rabbit aorta rcs from rabbit spleen and its antagonism by anti-@-@inflammatory drugs.
18	inhibition of chemical carcinogenesis by viral vaccines	Inhibition of chemical carcinogenesis by the viral vaccines.
18	prenatal and postnatal changes in the content and species of ferritin in rat liver	Prenatal and postnatal changes in ferritin content and species of rat liver.
18	the diagnosis of hodgkin s disease in surgically excised spleens	Diagnosis of Hodgkin's disease in surgically excised female rats.
18	helper activity of human leukemic tissue extracts for leukemia virus expression in mice	Ancillary activity; extracts from human leukemic tissue for apo placentae; leukemia virus expression in mice.
18	the generation from arachidonic acid of rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs by a microsomal enzyme preparation which also generates prostaglandins	The production of arachidonic acid from rabbit aorta by a microsomal enzyme preparation that also generates prostaglandins.
18	glycosphingolipid levels in an unusual neurovisceral storage disease characterized by lactosylceramide galactosyl hydrolase deficiency lactosylceramidosis	Glycosphingolipid levels in unusual neuroviscerular disease characterized by lactosylceramidose-lactosylceramidose-lactosylceramidase galactosyl hydrolase deficient.
18	a classification of the murine leukemia viruses neutralization of pseudotypes of friend spleen focus forming virus by type specific murine antisera	Classification of the neutralization by murine leukemia viruses of friendly spleen root virus pseudotypes by specific murine antisera.
18	regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro i regulatory effect of macrophages and thymus dependent t cells on the response of thymus independent b lymphocytes to endotoxin	Regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro he regulatory effect of macrophages and thymus-dependent t-cells on the response of thymus-independent b-cells to l-apos; endotoxin.
18	thymus independent b cell proliferation in spleen cell cultures of mouse radiation chimeras stimulated by phytohemagglutinin or allogeneic cells	Thymus-independent b cell proliferation in phytohemagglutinin-stimulated mouse radiation chimeras spleen cell cultures or allogeneic cells.
18	the mechanism of antigenic stimulation of primary and secondary clonal precursor cells	Mechanism of antigenic stimulation of primary and secondary clonal precursor cells.
18	deletion of hapten binding cells by a highly radioactive 125 i conjugate	Haptene is suppressed by a highly radioactive 125 i conjugate.
18	brain associated stem cell antigen an antigen shared by brain and hemopoietic stem cells	The stem cell antigen associated with the brain is a shared antigen between the brain and hematopoietic stem cells.
18	influence of lynestrenol on the rat s ovary implanted into the spleen	Lidos; influence of lynestrenol on rat ovary implanted in spleen.
18	leukaemia evoked with 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat 3 changes in lymphoid tissues	Leukemia caused changes in the lymphoid tissues with 7812 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat 3.
18	co infection of mouse spleen cells with murine sarcoma virus and guaroa virus	Co-infection of mouse spleen cells with mouse sarcoma virus and guaroa virus.
18	the persistence of hemopoietic stem cells in vitro	Persistence of hematopoietic stem cells in vitro.
18	bone marrow derived lymphoid cells b cells functional depletion with cobra factor and fresh serum	Bone marrow derived lymphoid cells – Functional exhaustion of b cells with cobra factor and fresh serum.
18	storage of chlorinated pesticides in human organs and tissues in ferrara province italy	Storage of chlorinated pesticides in human organs and tissues in the province of ferrara in Italy.
18	rapid breaking of tolerance against escherichia coli lipopolysaccharide in vivo and in vitro	Rapid interruption of lipopolysaccharide tolerance of Escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro.
18	immunopathogenesis of acute central nervous system disease produced by lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus ii adoptive immunization of virus carriers	Lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus (LCV) induced acute central nervous system disease (CNS) and adopted viral immunizations.
18	equine infectious anemia activity of liquid antigen extracts in the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests	"""Equine infectious anemia activity of liquid antigen extracts in agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests"", Arch."
18	observations on abnormal cells in the peripheral blood and spleen in hodgkin s disease	Observations on abnormal cells in peripheral blood and spleen in Hodgkin's Disease.
18	congenital dyserythropoietic anaemia with erythroblastic multinuclearity	Congenital dyserythropoietic anemia (CDSA) with erythroblastic multinuclearity.
18	portal hypertension in kala azar	Portal hypertension in the azar kala.
18	the effects of stimulation of the left atrial receptors on sympathetic efferent nerve activity	The effects of left atrial receptor stimulation on sympathetic efferent nerve activity.
18	lysosomal localization of fructofuranosidase containing liposomes injected into rats	Lysosomal localization of the fructofuranosidase containing liposomes injected into rats.
18	radioresistance of carrier specific helper thymus derived lymphocytes in mice	Radioresistance in thymus-derived lymphocytes specific to the mouse.
18	enzyme deficiency in cholesteryl ester storage idisease	Enzymatic deficiency in cholesteryl ester storage idisease.
18	immunity of epstein barr virus in hodgkin s disease preceded by infectious mononucleosis	Epstein virus immunity in Hodgkin's disease preceded by infectious mononucleosis.
18	role of the macrophage in natural resistance to salmonellosis in mice	Role of macrophage in natural resistance to salmonellosis in mouse.
18	comparative immunogenicity of heat killed and living oral salmonella vaccines	Comparative immunogenicity of heat-killed and living oral salmonella vaccinations.
18	model approach to immunological rejuvenation of the aged	A model approach for the immunologic rejuvenation of the elderly.
18	post mortem findings in ugandans with hodgkin s disease	A postmortem discovery in Ugandans with Hodgkin's disease.
18	cholesterol vitamin c controls its transformation to bile acids	Vitamin c of cholesterol controls its transformation into bile acids.
18	inhibition of macrophage response to brain injury a new effect of pertussis vaccine possibly related to histamine sensitizing factor	Inhibition of macrophage response to brain damage is a novel effect of pertussis vaccine that may be related to sensitization to apos; histamine.
18	ultrastructural characteristics of the hairy cells of leukemic reticuloendotheliosis	Ultrastructural characteristics of hair cells of leukemic reticuloendotheliosis.
18	interferon inducing polycarboxylates mechanism of protection against vaccinia virus infection in mice	Interferon inducing polycarboxylates to protect against vaccine virus infection in mice.
18	respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide treated mice i increased virulence of mycoplasma pulmonis	Respiratory diseases in mice treated with cyclophosphamide i increased virulence of pulmonary mycoplasma.
18	maturation of the human complement system i onset time and sites of fetal c1q c4 c3 and c5 synthesis	Maturation of the human complement system; fetal appearance and synthesis sites c4 c3 and c5.
18	sites of formation of the serum proteins transferrin and hemopexin	Serum transferrin and hemopexin protein formation sites.
18	the response of t cells to histocompatibility 2 antigens dose response kinetics	The t lymphocyte response to apos; histocompatibility 2 antigens dose-kinetic response.
18	cytotoxicity in graft versus host reaction i role of donor and host spleen cells	Cytotoxicity in the graft-versus-host response: role of donor and spleen cells; host.
18	immune and natural antibodies to syngeneic murine plasma cell tumors	Immune and natural antibody to mouse syngenic plasma cell tumors.
18	colonization resistance of the digestive tract of mice during systemic antibiotic treatment	Resistance to colonization of the gastrointestinal tract of mice during the course of a systemic antibiotic treatment.
18	equine infectious anemia preparation of a liquid antigen extract for the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests	Preparation of an infectious equine anemia, an extract of a liquid antigen for apo assays, gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation.
18	detection of african horsesickness viral antigens in tissues by immunofluorescence	African horse disease viral antigens are detected in tissues by immunofluorescence.
18	anthrax infection in bone meal from various countries of origin	Apos infection; anthrax in flour; bone from various countries; and origin.
18	deficit of specific thymus dependent lymphocytes in transplantation tolerance in the rat	Thymus-dependent specific lymphocyte deficiency in transplant tolerance in rat.
18	critical role of determinant presentation in the induction of specific responses in immunocompetent lymphocytes	Critical role of the determinant presentation in immune response; induction of specific responses in immunocompetent lymphocytes.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response v derivation by migration in lethally irradiated recipients of two interacting subpopulations of thymus derived cells from normal spleen	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating graft response to migration-derived host v in statically irradiated recipients of two sub-@ interactive populations of normal spleen thymus-derived cells.
18	active suppression as a possible mechanism of tolerance in tetraparental mice	Active suppression as possible mechanism of tolerance in tetraparous mice.
18	heterogeneity of the effector cells in the cytotoxic reaction against allogeneic lymphoma cells	Heterogeneity of effector cells in cytotoxic response to allogeneic lymphoma cells.
18	2 4 dinitrophenyl receptors on mouse thymus and spleen cells	Dinitrophenyl receptors on the thymus and cells of the mouse spleen.
18	production of tl antibody by mice immunized with tl cell populations a possible assay for thymic hormone	Production of antibody tl by mice immunized with populations of tl cells, a possible assay for thymic hormone.
18	proliferation of donor marrow and thymus cells in the myeloid and lymphoid organs of irradiated syngeneic host mice	Proliferation of the bone marrow and thymus cells of the donor in the myeloid and lymphoid organs of irradiated syngenic host mice.
18	glucocerebrosidase reconstitution of activity from macromolecular components	Glucocerebrosidase activity from macromolecular components.
18	the organ specificity of ferritin in human and horse liver and spleen	The specificity of ferritin for the organs in the liver and spleen of humans and horses.
18	thrombocytopenic purpura as the sole manifestation of a recurrence of hodgkin s disease	Thrombocytopenic purpura is the only manifestation of apos; a recurrence of the Hodgkinian disease.
18	immunological control of polyoma virus oncogenesis in mice	Immunological control of polyoma virus oncogenesis in mice.
18	cathepsin a in human brain and spleen	Well, cathepsin's in the human brain and the spleen.
18	the subunit structure of horse spleen apoferritin the molecular weight of the oligomer and its stability to dissociation by dilution	The structure of the sub-units of l' apoferritin of the spleen of horse the molecular weight of the oligomer and its stability to dissociation by dilution.
18	carrier rate of salmonellas in sheep and goats and its public health significance	Rates of salmonella infection in sheep and goats and public health importance.
18	alkaline and acid phosphatase in murine leukemia	Alkaline and acid phosphatase in murine leukemia.
18	induction of immunological tolerance to soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens of mice	Induction of immunological tolerance to apos; soluble histocompatibility 2 mouse antigens.
18	demonstration that antigen binding cells are precursors of antibody producing cells after purification with a fluorescence activated cell sorter	Demonstrate that antigen-binding cells are precursors of antibody-producing cells after purification with fluorescent-activated cell sorter.
18	extraction of equine infectious anemia immunodiffusion antigen with the aid of the chaotropic agent thiocyanate	Extraction of apo; antigen; immunodiffusion of apotism; equine infectious anemia; aid of apotis; chaotropic thiocyanate agent.
18	effect of stimulation of the host defense system by coenzyme q 10 on dibenzpyrene induced tumors and infection with friend leukemia virus in mice	L' effect of stimulation of the defense system of the host by coenzyme q 10 on dibenzpyrene induces tumours and infection by the amic leukemia virus in mice.
18	active suppression of immunoglobulin allotype synthesis 3 identification of t cells as responsible for suppression by cells from spleen thymus lymph node and bone marrow	The active suppression of the allotype of the apos, immunoglobulin 3, has allowed the identification of the t-cells responsible for the suppression of the spleen and bone marrow thymus by lymph node cells.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes i allogeneic effect by irradiated host t cells on adoptively transferred histoincompatible b lymphocytes	Cellular interactions between histoincompatible t-cells and b-cells The allogenic effect of irradiated t-cells from the apo; host on the histoincompatible, adoptive transferred b-cells.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes ii failure of physiologic cooperative interactions between t and b lymphocytes from allogeneic donor strains in humoral response to hapten protein conjugates	Cellular interactions between histoincompatible t-cells and b-cells is the failure of co-operative physiological interactions between t-cells and b-cells from allogeneic strains of humoral donors to d&apos protein conjugates; hapten.
18	relative distribution of arylsulphatases a and b in rat liver parenchymal and other cells	Relative distribution of arylsulfatases a and b in parenchymal and other cells of rat liver.
18	a genetic locus for inducibility of c type in balb c cells the effect of a nonlinked regulatory gene on detection of virus after chemical activation	A genetic locus for apo; indutibility of type c in cells; effect of apo; an unlinked regulatory gene on virus detection after chemical activation.
18	chromatographic evidence for the existence of multiple forms of cathepsin b1	Chromatographic evidence of the disease; existence of multiple forms of cathepsin b1.
18	ribonucleic acid protein fractions of virulent salmonella typhimurium as protective immunogens	Protein ends of l' virulent Salmonella typhimurium ribonucleic acid as protective immunogens.
18	detection of delayed hypersensitivity in mice injected with ribonucleic acid protein fractions of salmonella typhimurium	The detection of delayed hypersensitivity in mice injected with the protein fractions of d' ribonucleic acid of Salmonella typhimurium.
18	demonstration of antigenic identity between purified equine infectious anemia virus and an antigen extracted from infected horse spleen	Epos demonstration; antigenic identity between Epos virus; purified equine infectious anemia and antigen extracted from infected horse spleen.
18	subunit interactions in horse spleen apoferritin dissociation by extremes of ph	Interactions with-units in the dissociation of l' apoferritin from the spleen of the horse by extremes of ph.
18	the catalytic activity of horse spleen apoferritin preliminary kinetic studies and the effect of chemical modification	L' catalytic activity of preliminary kinetic studies on elapos; apoferritin of horse spleen and elapos; chemical modification effect.
18	the molecular basis of codominant expression of the histocompatibility 2 genetic region	The molecular basis of apos; a codominant expression of the apos-genetic region 2; histocompatibility.
18	the nature of the collagenolytic cathepsin of rat liver and its distribution in other rat tissues	The nature of collagenolytic cathepsin in rat liver and its distribution in other tissues.
18	murine c type rna virus from spontaneous neoplasms in vitro host range and oncogenic potential	Murine virus type c from spontaneous neoplasms, range of in vitro hosts and oncogenic potential.
18	adjuvant activity of mycobacterium leprae	Adjuvant activity of the leprae mycobacterium.
18	role of mitochondria in the production of rna containing tumor viruses	The role of mitochondria in the production of tumour virus-containing rna.
18	concentrations of asparagine in tissues of prepubertal rats after enzymic or dietary depletion of asparagine	Concentrations of asparagine in tissues of prepubescent rats following enzymatic or dietary depletion of asparagine.
18	a new model for inducing malignant ovarian tumours in rats	New model to induce malignant ovarian tumours in rats.
18	rapid immunological induction of murine lymphomas evidence for a viral etiology	Rapid immunologic induction of murine lymphoma indicates viral etiology.
18	the allogeneic effect in inbred mice i experimental conditions for the enhancement of hapten specific secondary antibody responses by the graft versus host reaction	L' allogenic effect on the inbred mice i experimental conditions for apos; increased responses of specific secondary antibodies to apos; hapten by graft versus host reaction.
18	immunity tolerance to a hapten nip coupled to an isologous carrier mouse gamma globulin	Immune tolerance to a dapos tip; hapten coupled with an isologous gamma-globulin mouse carrier.
18	decreased percentage of polymorphonuclear neutrophils in mouse peripheral blood after inoculation with material from multiple sclerosis patients	Reduced percentage of polymorphonuclear neutrophils in peripheral blood of mice after material from MS patients was inoculated.
18	idiotype expression and the inheritance of mouse antibody clones	L' expression of idiotypes and idiotypes; inheritance of d' mouse antibodies.
18	biological expressions of lymphocyte activation ii generation of a population of thymus derived suppressor lymphocytes	Biological expression of the apos; lymphocyte activation ii generation of apos; a thymus-derived suppressive lymphocyte population.
18	termination of tolerance to human gamma globulin in mice by antigen and bacterial lipopolysaccharide endotoxin	Gamma tolerance ending-human globulin in mice by antigen and l' bacterial lipopolysaccharide endotoxin.
18	differentiation of thymus derived cells from precursors in mouse bone marrow	The differentiation of thymus-derived cells from precursors in bone marrow.
18	a major genetic locus affecting resistance to infection with murine leukemia viruses 3 assignment of the fv 1 locus to linkage group 8 of the mouse	A major genetic locus affecting resistance to mouse leukemia virus infection 3 assigned to linkage group 8 from locus fv 1.
18	stimulation of anti brucella vaccination in mice by tetramisole a phenyl imidothiazole salt	Stimulation of brucella vaccination in mice by tetramisole, phenyl imidothiazole salt.
18	resistance to mycoplasma synoviae is bursal dependent	Resistance to synoviae mycoplasma is bursa dependent.
18	immunity to vibrio cholerae in the mouse ii effect of a cell adherent immune factor	Vibrio cholerae immunity in mice ii effect of d' an immune factor adhering to the cell.
18	host gene control of type c rna tumor virus expression and tumorigenesis in inbred mice	Mastering of the apo gene; host of apo; expression of cna-like tumor virus and tumorigenesis in inbred mice.
18	a tumor antigen in tissue cultures derived from patients with hodgkin s disease	A tumour antigen in tissue cultures from Hodgkin's disease patients.
18	colonization resistance of the digestive tract and the spread of bacteria to the lymphatic organs in mice	Resistance to colonization of the gut and spread of bacteria to lymph organs in mice.
18	induction of type c viruses in cultured guinea pig cells	Induction of the c-type virus in cultured guinea pig cells.
18	serological identification of an ir region product	Serological identification of a product from the ir region.
18	immunodepression by rowson parr virus in mice i growth curves of rowson parr virus and immunological relationships with friend virus	Rowson's parr virus immunosuppression in mice i growth curves of Rowson's parr virus and immunological relationships with the friendly virus.
18	some aspects of the pathogenesis and pathomorphology of leprosy	Aspects of pathogenesis and pathomorphology of leprosy.
18	the allogeneic effect in inbred mice iv regulatory influences of graft vs host reactions on host t lymphocyte functions	L' allogenic effect in inbred mice iv regulatory influences of the graft vs. host responses on host t-cell function.
18	synthesis intracellular distribution and secretion of immunoglobulin and h 2 antigen in muring splenocytes	Synthesis of the intracellular distribution and secretion of l' immunoglobulin and l' h2 antigen in developing splenocytes.
18	serum mediated leukemia cell destruction in akr mice	Serum serum-mediated leukemia cell destruction in Akr mice.
18	oligomeric iga the major component of the in vitro primary response of mouse spleen fragments	L' iga oligomer is the primary component of the in vitro primary response of mouse spleen fragments.
18	immunogenicity and immunosensitivity of urethane induced murine lung adenomata in relation to the immunological impairment of the primary tumour host	Aposemia; immunogenicity and apo; immunosensitivity of apos-induced murine lung adenoma; urethane in relation to apo; immunological alteration of primary host tumor.
18	the time course of cardiovascular changes in lactation in the rat	L' temporal evolution of the cardiovascular changes in lactation in the rat.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro i development of primary and secondary plaque forming cell responses to the random terpolymer 1 glutamic acid 60 1 alanine30 1 tyrosine10 gat by mouse spleen cells in vitro	Genetic control of immune responses in vitro development of plaque-forming primary and secondary cell responses to random Glutamic acid 1 random 60 1 alanine30 1 tyrosine10 gat by mouse spleen cells in vitro.
18	overlap stimulation of primary and secondary b cells by cross reacting determinants	Stimulation of overlay of primary and secondary b cells by cross-reactive determinants.
18	an electrophoretic difference between surface and secreted igm of murine splenocytes	An electrophoretic difference between the surface and the secreted mouse splenocytes.
18	effects of passive antibody on early pathogenesis of marek s disease	Effects of passive antibodies on the early pathogenesis of Marek s disease.
18	tumor induction by cryptococcus neoformans	Tumor induction by the use of cryptococcus neoformans.
18	influence of gonadal factors on skin test reactivity of cfw mice to candida albicans	Influence of gonadal factors on cfw rat skin reactivity test.
18	influence of hormones and chemical carcinogen on murine leukaemia	The influence of hormones and carcinogenic chemicals on murine leukemia.
18	schistosoma mansoni infection in mice depleted of thymus dependent lymphocytes ii pathology and altered pathogenesis	Mansoni schistosome infection in thymus-dependent, lymphocyte-free mice ii pathology and altered pathogenesis.
18	leukemia virus activation during homograft rejection	Lapses; activation of leukemia virus during repudiation; homograft.
18	mechanisms of thrombocytopenia in malignant tertian malaria	Mechanisms of thrombocytopenia in Tertian Malaria.
18	rabbit blood lymphocytes may be t cells with surface immunoglobulins	Rabbit blood lymphocytes may also be T-cells with surface immunoglobulins.
18	unique nuclear dna sequences in the involved tissues of hodgkin s and burkitt s lymphomas	Single DNA sequences in tissues implicated in Hodgkin lymphoma and burkitt s.
18	graft versus host reactions in mice iv thymus cell suppression of antibody formation	Transplant versus Host Reactions in mice iv thymus cell suppression of antibody formation.
18	n2 guanine specific transfer rna methyltransferase i from rat liver and leukemic rat spleen	Guanine-specific N2 transfer rna methyltransferase i from rat liver and leukemic rat spleen.
18	the role of the gut flora in the metabolism of cyclamate	The role of intestinal flora in metabolism of cyclamate.
18	hapten specific ige antibody responses in mice ii cooperative interactions between adoptively transferred t and b lymphocytes in the development of ige response	Mouse serum antibody specific reactions; hapten ii Co-operative interactions between adopted t- and b-lymphocytes in the development of the response ige.
18	transformation of histocompatibility immunogen into a tolerogen	Transformation of the apos; immunogenic d' histocompatibility to a tolerant immunogen.
18	mouse splenic peroxidase and its role in bactericidal activity	Mice splenic peroxidase and its role in the apos; bactericidal activity.
18	recall of acquired cellular resistance in mice by antigens from killed brucella	A reminder of the cellular resistance acquired in mice by antigens from killed brucella.
18	degree of immunity induced by killed vaccines to experimental salmonellosis in mice	Degree of immunity against experimental salmonellosis in mice induced by killed vaccines.
18	helper dependent properties of friend spleen focus forming virus effect of the fv 1 gene on the late stages in virus synthesis	Assist in the concentration-dependent properties of the virus; friend forming the apos; viral effect of the fv1 gene on the final stages of viral synthesis.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice i morphology quantitation tissue distribution	Identification of a novel cell type in mouse peripheral lymphoid organs i morphology quantification of tissue distribution.
18	tumor induction by immunologically activated murine leukemia virus	Immunologically activated murine leukemia virus tumour induction.
18	genetic control of the immune response frequency and characteristics of antigen binding cells in high and low responder mice	Genetic control of the frequency of the immune response and characteristics of antigen-binding cells in high- and low-responsive mice.
18	graft versus host reactions across different regions of the h 2 complex of the mouse	Host versus graft responses in different regions of the mouse h2 complex.
18	biological characteristics of t and b memory lymphocytes in the rat	Biological characteristics of memory t and b lymphocytes in rat.
18	pancreatic involvement by venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in the hamster	Pancreatic involvement of the virus of l'apos; Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis in the hamster.
18	deoxyribonucleic acid dependent ribonucleic acid polymerases from murine spleen cells increased amounts of the nucleolar species in leukaemic tissue	Apos polymerases; apos-dependent ribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid from murine spleen cells increased the amount of apos; nucleolar species in the leukemic tissue.
18	immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion by cells in the mouse thymus that do not bear theta antigen	Synthesis and secretion of apo; immunoglobulins from thymus cells of non-apos-bearing mice; theta antigen.
18	infection at the subcellular level ii distribution and fate of intravenously injected brucellae within phagocytic cells of guinea pigs	Subcellular infection ii distribution and becomes intravenously injected subcellular brucella in guinea pig phagocytic cells.
18	virulence of six strains of mycobacterium bovis bcg in mice	Six strains of mycobacterium bovis bcg in mice.
18	polyarthritis associated with salmonella infection in rats	Apos-associated polyarthritis; Salmonella infection in rats.
18	an analysis of the close relationship of lysosomes to early deposits of amyloid ultrastructural evidence in experimental mouse amyloidosis	An analysis of the close relationship between lysosomes and early deposition of amyloid ultrastructural elements in mouse; experimental amyloidosis.
18	a bacteriological study of endemic tuberculosis in birds	Bacteriological study of endemic tuberculosis in birds.
18	mannosidosis in angus cattle the enzymic defect	Mannosidose in angus cattle is enzyme defect.
18	a mouse b cell alloantigen determined by gene s linked to the major histocompatibility complex	The alloantigen of mouse b cells is determined by genes linked to the major complex of histocompatibility.
18	maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat i migration pattern tissue distribution and turnover rate of unprimed and primed b lymphocytes involved in the adoptive antidinitrophenyl response	Rat b lymphocyte maturation in the rat migration pattern i, tissue distribution, and turnover rate of unbooted and primed b lymphocytes involved in the anti-initrophenyl adoptive response.
18	a cyclical appearance of antibody producing cells after a single injection of serum protein antigen	Lapos; cyclic appearance of egg-producing cells; antibody after single injection of serum protein.
18	anatomical distribution of t and b lymphocytes in the rat development of lymphocyte specific antisera	Anatomical distribution of the t- and b-cells in rat development; lymphocyte-specific antisera.
18	the ability of bacterial lipopolysaccharide to modulate the induction of unresponsiveness to a state of immunity cellular parameters	The ability of bacterial lipopolysaccharide to modulate the apos; induction of the non-response to a state of cellular parameters of the apos; immunity.
18	increased reactivity of mouse spleen cells sensitized in vitro against syngeneic tumor cells in the presence of a thymic humoral factor	The increased reactivity of the mouse spleen cells sensitized syngenic tumor cells in vitro in the presence of thymic humoral factor apos.
18	specific murine b cell activation by synthetic single and double stranded polynucleotides	Specific activation of murine b cells by synthetic single- and double-stranded polynucleotides.
18	regulatory properties of adenosine triphosphate l methionine s adenosyltransferase of rat liver	The regulatory properties of rat liver adenosine triphosphate methionine s adenosyltransferase.
18	enhancement of resistance to infectious diseases by oral administration of brewer s yeast	Increased resistance to infectious diseases through oral administration of brewing yeast.
18	delayed type hypersensitivity and immunity against aerogenic tuberculosis in guinea pigs	Delayed hypersensitivity and immunity to airborne tuberculosis in guinea pigs.
18	effect of corynebacterium parvum treatment on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice	Effect of corynebacterium parvum treatment on growth of Salmonella enteritidis in mice.
18	correlates to increased lethality of attenuated venezuelan encephalitis virus vaccine for immunosuppressed hamsters	Increased lethality of attenuated VEV vaccine in immunocompromised hamsters is correlated with increased lethality.
18	leucocyte migration studies with spleen preparations in crohn s disease	Studies of leukocyte migration with spleen preparations in Crohn's disease.
18	ribonucleic acid components of murine sarcoma and leukemia viruses	Ribonucleic acid components of murine sarcoma and leukemia virus.
18	preparation and biological properties of water soluble adjuvant fractions from delipidated cells of mycobacterium smegmatis and nocardia opaca	Preparation and biological properties of water-soluble adjuvant fractions of unbound mycobacterium smegmatis and nocardia opaca cells.
18	multiplicity of scrapie virus in infected mouse spleen cells in vivo	The multiplicity of scrapie virus in spleen cells of infected mice in vivo.
18	in vitro transformation of mouse bone marrow derived b lymphocytes induced by the lipid component of endotoxin	In vitro transformation of mouse bone marrow-derived b lymphocytes induced by the lipid component endotoxin.
18	granulocyte macrophage precursor cell and colony stimulating factor responses of mice infected with salmonella typhimurium	Granulocyte macrophage cell precursor and colony stimulation factor responses of mice infected with Salmonella typhimurium.
18	mechanisms regulating the cardiac output response to cyanide infusion a model of hypoxia	Mechanisms regulating the response of cardiac output to cyanide infusion, a model of apo; hypoxia.
18	effects of splenectomy and beta adrenoceptor blockade on cardiac output response to acute hypoxemia	Effects of d' splenectomy and d' blockade of beta receptors @-@adrenergic on cardiac output response to acute hypoxemia.
18	selective roles of thymus derived lymphocytes in the antibody response i differential suppressive effect of carrier primed t cells on hapten specific igm and igg antibody responses	Selective roles of thymus-derived lymphocytes in immune response i differential suppressor effect of carrier t cells on igm and igg specific antibody responses to apos; hapten.
18	acute systemic anaphylaxis in the horse	Acute, systemic anaphylaxis in the horse.
18	comparison of the capillary tube and explant methods for the in vitro assay of tuberculin	Hair tube and explant methods for apos; tuberculin in vitro assay.
18	immunogenicity of living and heat killed salmonella pullorum vaccines	Salmonella pullorum vaccines have been killed by the immunogenicity of living and heat.
18	isolation of a neurotropic type c virus	Isolation of apos; a type c.
18	studies of escherichia coli infection in chickens	Escherichia coli infection in chickens.
18	in vitro studies on strain dependent production of thymus specific autoantibodies	Strain-dependent in vitro production studies, d' auto-thymus specific antibodies.
18	monoclonal production of both igm and igg1 antihapten antibody	Monoclonal production of antihaptene and antihaptene antibodies.
18	induction of b cell tolerance in vitro to 2 4 dinitrophenyl coupled to a copolymer of d glutamic acid and d lysine dnp d gl	In vitro induction of b cell tolerance to 24 dinitrophenyl coupled with a d' glutamic acid and d' dng gl lysine acid.
18	proliferation of b and t cells in mixed lymphocyte cultures	B- and t-cell proliferation in mixed lymphocyte cultures.
18	functional heterogeneity of murine lymphoid cells v lymphocytes lacking detectable surface theta or immunoglobulin determinants	Functional heterogeneity of murine lymphoid lymphocytes lacking either surface theta or detectable immunoglobulin.
18	development of cellular and humoral immunity in the respiratory tract of rabbits to pseudomonas lipopolysaccharide	Development of l' cellular and humoral immunity in rabbit respiratory tract tissue against pseudomonas lipopolysaccharide.
18	immunohistochemical demonstration of igg in reed sternberg and other cells in hodgkin s disease	Immunohistochemical demonstration of apos; igg in reed sternberg and dapos; other cells of Hodgkin's disease.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocytes 3 h 2 linkage of a gene controlling the rate of appearance of complement receptor lymphocytes	Cell ontogeny; 3 h 2 b lymphocyte binding; a gene controlling cell level; appearance of complement receptor lymphocytes.
18	induction of immunological tolerance to a thymus dependent antigen in the absence of thymus derived cells	Induction of immunological tolerance to thymus-dependent antigen in the absence of thymus-derived cells.
18	twp populations of t lymphocytes immune to the lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Twp populations of lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus immunized t cells.
18	evaluation of methods for isolating salmonella and arizona organisms from pet turtles	Evaluation of methods; isolation of salmonellae and organisms; isolation of arizona from pet turtles.
18	chromosomal abnormalities in spleens of new zealand black mice a strain characterized by autoimmunity and malignancy	Chromosomal abnormalities in the spleen of black zealous mice, a strain characterized by the apos; auto-immunity and malignancy.
18	primate and murine type c viral nucleic acid association kinetics analysis of model systems and natural tissues	Kinetic analysis of apo; viral association of nucleic acids in c-type primates and mice of model systems and natural tissues.
18	highly purified papain solubilized hl a antigens contain beta2 microglobulin	The a-hl antigens solubilized in highly purified papain contained beta2 microglobulin.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice ii functional properties in vitro	D&apos identification; a novel cell type in the peripheral lymphoid organs of mice ii Functional properties in vitro.
18	isolation and characterization of c type viral gene products of virus negative mouse cells	Isolation and characterization of c-type viral gene products from virus-negative mouse cells.
18	ultrastructural studies of a visna like syncytia producing virus from cattle with lymphocytosis	Ultrastructural studies of a visna, such as syncytia, producing a virus in cattle with lymphocytosis.
18	oncogenicity of an endogenous c type virus chemically activated from mouse cells in culture	Oncogenicity of C-type endogenous virus, chemically activated from cultured mouse cells.
18	procainamide induced sle and lymphoreticular disorders	Procainamide induced sleep disturbance and lymphoreticular dysfunction.
18	simultaneous occurrence of acute myeloblastic leukaemia and multiple myeloma without previous chemotherapy	Acute myeloblastic leukemia and vomiting; multiple myeloma without prior chemotherapy.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny i commitment to immunoglobulin allotype	Limiting the dose; gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny; allotype; immunoglobulin.
18	roles of t and b lymphocytes in the termination of unresponsiveness to autologous thyroglobulin in mice	T- and b-cells are involved in the end of the non-response to autologous thyroglobulin in mice.
18	alloantiserum induced inhibition of immune response gene product function ii genetic analysis of target antigens	Alloantiserum induced apos, inhibition of immune response gene product function, and genetic analysis of target antigens.
18	graft vs host reactions in reciprocal hybrid mice i dissociation of t cell activities in the mixed lymphocyte reaction and two graft vs host assays	Graft vs. host responses in reciprocal hybrid mice i dissociation of the t-cell activities in the mixed lymphocyte response and two graft vs. host assays.
18	autoradiographic studies on the proliferation of antibody producing cells in vitro	Autoradiographic studies on proliferation of antibody-producing cells in vitro.
18	new third class of amyloid fibril protein	This is the new third class of amyloid fibrillar proteins.
18	inhibition of a t cell dependent immune response in vitro by thymoma cell immunoglobulin	Thymoma cell immunoglobulin, an immune response dependent on t-cell in vitro.
18	identity of acid beta glucosidase and glucocerebrosidase in human spleen	Identity of beta-acid glucosidase and glucocerebrosidase in the human spleen.
18	glucocerebrosidase reconstitution from macromolecular components depends on acidic phospholipids	Reconstitution of glucocerebrosidase from macromolecular components was dependent on acid phospholipids.
18	drug induced change in the distribution of sulfonamides in the mother rat and its fetus	The drug induced a change in the distribution of the sulfonamides in the rat,-mother and fetus.
18	immunological control of macrophage proliferation in vivo	In vivo immunological control of macrophage proliferation.
18	the psoas sign hepatic angle normal patients and everyday practice	The psoas sign the apos; hepatic angle of normal patients and the daily practice.
18	action of ribonuclease t1 on 30s ribosomes of escherichia coli and its role in sequence studies on 16s ribonucleic acid	L' action of ribonuclease t1 on the ribosomes 30s; escherichia coli and its role in apos; sequencing of apos; ribonucleic acid 16s.
18	the life span of iga plasma cells from the mouse intestine	Lifespan of iga mucosal plasma cells; intestine of mice.
18	hapten specific stimulation of secondary b cells independent of t cells	Specific stimulation of secondary b cells by etapos; haptene independently of t-cells.
18	induction of t lymphocytes from precursor cells in vitro by a product of the thymus	Induction of t-cells from precursor cells in vitro by a thymus product.
18	comparison of the virulence for mice of salmonella typhimurium given by the intraperitoneal and subcutaneous routes	Comparison of intraperitoneal and skin virulence for Salmonella typhimurium mice.
18	a sequence of seventy three nucleotides from the coliphage r17 genome	Seventy-thirteen nucleotides from the r17 coliphage genome have been sequenced.
18	the sensitivity of cells in exponential and stationary phases of growth to bleomycin and to 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea	Susceptibility of exponential and stationary growth phase cells to bleomycin and 1 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea.
18	the effect of irradiating a transplanted murine lymphosarcoma on the subsequent development of metastases	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of an increase in the risk of cancer.
18	effects of cyclic starvation feeding and of splenectomy on the development of hemosiderosis in rat livers	Effects of cyclic fasting and splenectomy on the development of haemosiderosis in the liver of rats.
18	transplantation of autoimmune potential i development of antinuclear antibodies in h 2 histocompatible recipients of bone marrow from new zealand black mice	Auto potential transplants-immune development of anti-nuclear antibodies in histocompatible h 2 bone marrow transplant recipients of novel zeland black mice.
18	an antigen in hodgkin s disease tissue cultures fluorescent antibody studies	An antigen in Hodgkin's disease tissue is used to culture fluorescent antibodies during immunoassays; fluorescent antibody studies.
18	transformation by simian virus 40 of spleen cells from a hyperimmune rabbit evidence for synthesis of immunoglobulin by the transformed cells	Transformation by simian virus 40 of the spleen cells of d' a hyperimmunized rabbit showed transformed cell immunoglobulin; d&apos synthesis.
18	transformation by simian virus 40 of spleen cells from a hyperimmune rabbit demonstration of production of specific antibody to the immunizing antigen	Simian virus 40 transformation of dapos spleen cells; hyperimmunized rabbit showing production of apos; antibodies specific to apos; immunizing antigen.
18	immunostimulation with bacterial phospholipid extracts	Immuno-stimulation with bacterial phospholipid extracts.
18	first detection of tularaemia in domestic and wild mammals in iran	Initial detection of tularemia in domestic and wild mammals in Iran.
18	biological and biochemical evidence for an interaction between marek s disease herpesvirus and avian leukosis virus in vivo	Biological and biochemical evidence of an interaction between whiting disease herpesviruses and avian leukosis virus in vivo.
18	pathogenesis and immunology of experimental gonococcal infection virulence of colony types of neisseria gonorrhoeae for chicken embryos	Pathogenesis and immunology of experimental viral virulence; gonococcal infections of neisseria gonorrhoeae colony types in chick embryos.
18	immunity to candida albicans induced by listeria monocytogenes	Listeria monocytogenes-induced immunity to candida albicans.
18	synergy among responding lymphoid cells in the one way mixed lymphocyte reaction interaction between two types of thymus dependent cells	Synergy between similarly reactive lymphoid cells was found to mix the apos; interaction of lymphocyte response between two types of thymus-dependent cells.
18	effector cell blockade a new mechanism of immune hyporeactivity induced by multivalent antigens	Effective cells block a new mechanism of d' multivalent antigen-induced immune hyporesponsiveness.
18	antigenic differences between hemopoietic stem cells and myeloid progenitors	Antigenic differences between the hematopoietic stem cells and myeloid progenitors.
18	the effect of sea star coelomocyte extract on cell mediated resistance to listeria monocytogenes in mice	The effect of sea star coelomocyte extraction on mediated cell resistance to Listeria monocytogenes in mice.
18	inhibition of specific cell mediated cytotoxicity by anti t cell receptor antibody	Cell-specific inhibition of cytotoxicity by apos; antibody-receptor from t cells.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocyte function i restricted heterogeneity of the antibody response of b lymphocytes from neonatal and fetal mice	B cell function ontogenesis has limited the immunos; heterogeneity of the b lymphocyte response in newborn and fetal mice.
18	vi antigen from salmonella typhosa and immunity against typhoid fever i isolation and immunologic properties in animals	Salmonella typhosa antigen virus and immunity against typhoid fever infection i Isolation and immunological properties in animals.
18	effects of carbon dust inhalation on the cell mediated immune response in mice	Effects of apo; carbon dust inhalation on cell-mediated immune response in mice.
18	development of specific cell dependent antibody during growth of a syngeneic rat sarcoma	Development of specific cell-dependent antibodies during the growth of rat syngenic sarcoma.
18	the effect of preadministration of corynebacterium parvum on the protection afforded by heat killed and acetone killed vaccines against experimental mouse typhoid	Lapos; effect of apos; prior administration of corynebacterium parvum on heat-killed and lacid-killed vaccine protection; acetone against experimental mouse typhoid.
18	sensitive in vivo assay for detection of murine leukemia viruses	Susceptible in vivo test for detection of murine leukemia viruses.
18	reduced cell yields of mouse cell line cultures after exposure to homogenates of multiple sclerosis tissues	After exposure to multiple sclerosis tissue homogenates, the cell yield of mouse cell line cultures decreased.
18	immunological responses to candida albicans ii amyloidosis in mice induced by candidiasis	Immunological responses to candida albicans ii amyloidosis in mice induced by candidiasis.
18	studies on the extended active sites of acid proteinases	Extended active sites studies of acid proteinases.
18	prostaglandins and the mechanism of analgesia produced by aspirin like drugs	The prostaglandins and the mechanism of the apos; analgesia produced by drugs similar to the apos; aspirin.
18	selective toxicity of diphtheria toxin for malignant cells	Selective toxicity of the diphtheria toxin to malignant cells.
18	a synthetic glycolipid with b cell mitogenic activity	A synthetic glycolipid with b-cell mitogenic activity.
18	studies on the heparin sulphamidase activity from rat spleen intracellular distribution and characterization of the enzyme	Apos studies; apos activity; heparin sulfamidase in intracellular distribution of rat spleen and characterization of apos; enzyme.
18	restoration of immune competence in tolerant mice by parabiosis to normal mice	Re-establishing immune competence in normal mice parabiosis tolerant mice.
18	the purification of bovine cathepsin b1 and its mode of action on bovine collagens	The purification of bovine cathepsin b1 and its mode of action on collagen cattle.
18	permissiveness of athymic nude mice towards congenic memory cells	The permissiveness of naked, athymic mice to the presence of congenic memory cells.
18	immunoblastic lymphadenopathy a hyperimmune entity resembling hodgkin s disease	Immunoblastic lymphadenopathy, a hyperimmune entity resembling Hodgkin's Disease.
18	vinyl chloride induced liver disease from idiopathic portal hypertension banti s syndrome to angiosarcomas	Vinyl chloride induced liver disease of d*apos syndrome; high blood pressure is associated with angiosarcomas.
18	single and repeated infections of grivet monkeys with schistosoma mansoni parasitological and pathological observations over a 31 month period	Single and repeated infections of apes with parasitological and pathological observations of schistosoma mansoni over a period of 31 months.
18	spontaneous regression of friend virus induced leukemia coinfection with regressing and conventional strains of virus	Spontaneous regression of apovirus; friend induced co-leukemic infection with both regressive and conventional virus strains.
18	genetic control of responses to bacterial lipopolysaccharides in mice i evidence for a single gene that influences mitogenic and immunogenic respones to lipopolysaccharides	Genetic control of responses to bacterial lipopolysaccharides in mice shows the existence of single genes that influence mitogenic and immunogenic responsibilities to lipopolysaccharides.
18	pharmacology of a new triazine antifolate in mice rats dogs and monkeys	Pharmacology of a novel triazine antifolate in mouse, dog and monkey rats.
18	different hematological diseases induced by type c viruses chemically activated from embryo cells of different mouse strains	Different hematological diseases induced by chemically activated c-type from embryonic cells of different strains of mice.
18	immune inhibition of allogeneic lymphoma cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice	L' immune inhibition of allogenic lymphoma cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice.
18	alterations in ribonuclease activities in the plasma spleen and thymus of tumor bearing mice	Changes in ribonuclease activities in the spleen and plasma thymus of tumor-carrying mice.
18	experimental cirrhosis of the liver obtained with simultaneous carbon tetrachloride and phenobarbital sodium	Experimental liver cirrhosis was also obtained simultaneously with carbon tetrachloride and sodium phenobarbital.
18	association of salmonella typhimurium with and its invasion of the ileal mucosa in mice	The association of Salmonella typhimurium with ileal mucosa in mice and its invasion by this bacterium.
18	effect of local corticosteroids on antibody forming cells in the eye and draining lymph nodes	Effect of local corticosteroids on antibody formation in the cells of the eye and lymph node drainage.
18	concomitant changes in adenylate cyclase and cytolytic activities of lymphoid cells during graft versus host reaction	Concomitant changes in apo; apo activity; adenylate cyclase activity; and apo and adenos; cytolytic activity of lymphoid cells during the graft – host response.
18	a selective inhibitor of the elicitation of immune mediated reactions	A selective inhibitor of immune-mediated stimulation reactions.
18	accumulation of oxygenated steryl esters in wolman s disease	Accumulation of oxygenated sterilic esters in wolf disease.
18	difference in kinetic properties between hexokinase type i isoenzymes from various rat tissues with reference to the effect of a thiol inhibitor	Difference in kinetic properties of isoenzymes of apos; type I hexokinase of various tissues of rats vs. apos; effect of apos; thiol inhibitor.
18	immunogenic properties of modified antigen e ii ability of urea denatured antigen and alpha polypeptide chain to prime t cells specific for antigen e	Immune properties of the apos; modified antigen; ability of the apos; denatured antigen by apos; urea and alpha polypeptide chain to produce antigen-specific primary t-cells; antigen e.
18	ir associated murine alloantigens demonstration of multiple ia specificities in h 2 alloantisera after selective absorptions	The murine alloantigen associated with l' ir has been shown to have multiple specificities in both alloanties after selective removals.
18	relation of dna synthesis and suppression to development of memory by t cells	The relationship between DNA synthesis and suppression and memory development by t-cells.
18	inhibition of proliferation of lymphoma cells and t lymphocytes by suppressor cells from spleens of tumor bearing mice	Lapses; inhibition of lymphoma and t-cell proliferation by tumor-carrying mouse spleen suppressive cells.
18	capacity of sensitized thymus derived lymphocytes to induce fatal lymphocytic choriomeningitis is restricted by the h 2 gene complex	The ability of sensitized thymus-derived lymphocytes to induce fatal lymphocytic choriomeningitis is limited by the h2 gene complex.
18	the selective action of poly a u on the electrophoretic mobility and surface charge of a subpopulation of b cells	L' selective action of poly a u on electrophoretic mobility and surface charge d' one sub@-@ cell population b.
18	radiocolloid scans in evaluating splenic response to external radiation	Radiocolloid scans in the absence; assessment of splenic response to external radiation.
18	maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat ii subpopulations of virgin b lymphocytes in the spleen and thoracic duct lymph	B lymphocyte maturity in rat ii under-virgin b lymphocyte populations in the spleen and thoracic canal lymph.
18	the adjuvant activity of mycobacterial rna preparations and synthetic polynucleotides for induction of delayed hypersensitivity to purified protein derivative in guinea pigs	L' adjuvant activity of preparations of synthetic mycobacterial rna and polynucleotides for apos; induction of apos; delayed hypersensitivity to a purified protein derivative in guinea pig.
18	complement mediated alteration of antibody specificity in vivo	Change in complement-mediated antibody specificity in vivo.
18	rabbit lymphocyte populations responding to haptenic and carrier determinants for dna synthesis	Rabbit lymphocyte populations that respond to the haptenic determinants and that are carriers of rabbit lymphocyte synthesis.
18	biological expressions of lymphocyte activation iv concanavalin a activated suppressor cells in mouse mixed lymphocyte reactions	Biological expressions of the apos; iv-cell activation of concanavalin activated suppressive cells in mouse mixed lymphocyte responses.
18	listeria cell wall fraction a b cell mitogen	Fraction of the listeria cell wall, which is a b-cell mitogen.
18	adult murine lymph node cells respond blastogenically to a new differentiation antigen on isologous and autologous b lymphocytes	Adult murine lymph node cells are blastogenic to a novel differentiation antigen on isologous and autologous lymphocytes.
18	suppression of the immune response by alpha fetoprotein on the primary and secondary antibody response	The suppression of the immune response by the fetoprotein alpha on the primary and secondary immune response.
18	demonstration of an antibody mediated tolerance state and its effect on antibody affinity	An antibody-mediated state of tolerance and its effect on the apos; affinity of antibodies.
18	sequential responses of mouse spleen t cells in mixed lymphocyte culture induced cytolysis	Sequential responses of t-cells from the mouse spleen in mixed lymphocyte culture induced cytolysis.
18	an inhibitor of cell proliferation released by cultures of macrophages	Released from macrophage cultures as an inhibitor of cell proliferation.
18	actin is the naturally occurring inhibitor of deoxyribonuclease i	It is a natural inhibitor of deoxyribonuclease i.
18	induction of endogenous virus and of thymidine kinase by bromodeoxyuridine in cell cultures transformed by friend virus	Induction of endogenous virus and thymidine kinase by bromodeoxyuridine in friendly virus transformed cell cultures.
18	immunologic induction of malignant lymphoma identification of donor and host tumors in the graft versus host model	Immunological induction of malignant lymphoma is useful in identifying donor and host tumours in the graft model.
18	some aspects of host response to levamisole after chemotherapy in a murine leukemia	Some aspects of the response of the apos; host to levamisole after chemotherapy in a murine leukemia.
18	inhibition of migration of murine spleen cells by rauscher leukemia virus infected syngeneic cells	L' inhibition of the migration of cells from the mouse spleen by leukemia virus infects the syngenic cells.
18	friend leukemia rapid development of erythropoietin independent hematopoietic precursors	Ami leukemia develops rapidly from the hematopoietic precursors that are independent of apos; erythropoietin.
18	isolation of a b tropic type c virus from reticulum cell neoplasms induced in balb c mice by sjl j type c virus	D&apos isolation; a tropical b virus type c from cellular neoplasms of the reticulum induced in balb c mice by sjl j type c virus.
18	interaction between aromatic diamidines and nucleic acids possible implications for chemotherapy	Interaction between aromatic diamidines and nucleic acids, possible implications for the chemotherapy.
18	embryonic antigens shared between chemically induced lymphosarcomas and fibrosarcomas of the mouse	Embryonic antigens are common to both chemically induced lymphosarcomas and fibrosarcomas in mice.
18	failure to detect chromosome damage in vivo in friend virus infected leukemic mice	Failure to detect chromosomal damage in vivo in leukemic mice infected with the virus de l'apos; ami.
18	genetic transmission of endogenous n and b tropic murine leukemia viruses in low leukemic strain c57bl 6	Genetic transmission of n- and b-tropic endogenous murine leukemia viruses in the c57bl 6 strain of low leukemia.
18	inclusion body disease herpesvirus infection of falcons ibdf	Includes herpesvirus body disease of falcons ibdf.
18	inclusion body disease in a great horned owl	Inclusion of body disease in horned owls.
18	virus initiated septic shock acute death of venezuelan encephalitis virus infected hamsters	The virus has caused septic shock, the acute death of hamsters infected with the Venezuelan encephalitis.
18	inhibition of the prostaglandin synthetase systems in ocular tissues by indomethacin	Prostaglandin synthetase systems in ocular tissues are inhibited by indomethacin.
18	splenic mobility and its effect on estimates of splenic mass	Splenic mobility and its effect on spleen mass estimation.
18	a case of waldenstrom s macroglobulinemia complicated by diabetes insipidus	A case of Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia is complicated by diabetes insipidus.
18	detection of nonspecific resistance to listeria monocytogenes in rabbits infected with treponema pallidum	The detection of non-specific resistance to listeria monocytogenes in rabbits infected with pallidum treponema.
18	age dependence of viral expression comparative pathogenesis of two rodent adapted strains of measles virus in mice	Influence of disease; age on comparative disease pathogenesis; viral expression of two adapted strains of measles virus in mice.
18	ammonium nitrogen in fetuses of urea treated sheep	Ammonium nitrogen in sheep fetuses treated with urea.
18	marked prolongation of skin homograft survival with niridazole a first report	A marked prolongation of the survival of homograft skin with niridazole, an initial report.
18	studies on aryl phosphate hydrolysis by human acid phsophatases	Apos studies; phosphate d&apos hydrolysis; aryl by human acid phsophatases.
18	testis antigens of man and some other primates	Testes antigens of humans and other primates.
18	frequency and gradient dispersion of viscosity of dna solutions	Dispersal gradient and frequency of viscosity of DNA solutions.
18	monocytic leukaemia in the dog	He's got monocytic leukemia in the dog.
18	experimental polymer storage disease in rabbits an approach to the histogenesis of sphingolipidoses	Experimental polymer storage disease in rabbits, an approach to sphingolipidosis histogenesis.
18	structural and hormonal alterations in the gastrointestinal tract of parenterally fed rats	Structural and hormonal changes in the gastrointestinal tract,-intestinal changes in parenterally fed rats.
18	immunologic implications of vasectomy i cell mediated immunity	Immunological Implications of Cell-mediated Vasectomy i Immunity.
18	immunologic implications of vasectomy ii serum mediated immunity	Immunological Implications of Vasectomy ii Immunity mediated by serum.
18	the mechanism of carcinogenic action of 1 2 dimethylhydrazine sdmh in rats	Mechanisms; carcinogenic action of 12 dimethylhydrazine sdmh in rat.
18	specific anti tumor responses by cultured immune spleen cells i in vitro culture method and initial characterization of factors which block immune cell mediated cytotoxicity in vitro	Antimicrobial reactions-tumors specific to cultured splenic immune cells i in vitro culture method and initial characterization of factors that block in vitro immune cell-mediated cytotoxicity.
18	induction of malignant lymphomas in swiss mice by n nitroso compounds formed in vivo	The induction of malignant lymphoma in Swiss mice by n-nitroso compounds formed in vivo.
18	immunological phenomena in harmless mice during experimental carcinogenesis induced with long term topical application of 7 12 dimethylbenzanthracene dmba	Immunological events in harmless mice during experimental oral carcinogenesis; long-term topical application of 712 dimethylbenzanthracene dmba.
18	inflammatory lymphocyte in cell mediated antibacterial immunity factors governing the accumulation of mediator t cells in peritoneal exudates	Inflammatory Lymphocyte in Dapos Factors; cell-mediated antibacterial immunity regulating apos; accumulation of t-mediating cells in peritoneal exudates.
18	effect of synthetic disaccharide protein conjugate as an immunogen in salmonella infection in mice	Effect of synthetic disaccharide protein conjugate as immunogenic in mouse Salmonella infection.
18	naturally occurring double stranded rna and immune responses effects on plaque forming cells and antibody formation	Natural effects of immune responses and double-stranded RNA (DNA) on plaque-forming cells and antibody formation.
18	t cell dependent helper and suppressive influences in an adoptive igg antibody response	To assist dependent t-cells and suppressive influences in an adopted antibody response.
18	blocking antigen antibody complexes on the t lymphocyte activation during in vitro incubation before adoptive transfer	Blocking of antigenic antibody complexes; activation of t-cells during apo; in vitro incubation prior to transfer.
18	blocking antigen antibody complexes on the t lymphocye surface identified with defined protein antigens ii lymphocyte activation during the in vitro response	Blocking of the cell complexes; antigenic antibodies on the lymphocyte surface identified at baseline; aid of apo; defined protein antigens ii lymphocyte activation during in vitro response.
18	permanent hapten specific tolerance in b lymphocytes	Specific, permanent tolerance to apos; haptene in b lymphocytes.
18	prolonged c3 depletion by cobra venom factor in thymus deprived mice and its implication for the role of c3 as an essential second signal for b cell triggering	Prolonged depletion of c3 by cobra venom factor in thymus-deprived mice and its involvement in the role of c3 as the second essential signal for triggering b cells.
18	growth of typhoid and paratyphoid bacilli in intravenously infected mice	Growth of both typhoid and paratyphoid bacilli in mice infected intravenously.
18	induction of disseminated virulent cytomegalovirus infection by immunosuppression of naturally chronically infected wild mice	Induction of apotism; virulent cytomegalovirus infection disseminated by immunosuppression of chronically infected wild mice.
18	mast cells and myelofibrosis	Mastocytes and myelofibrosis.
18	antigen specific thymus cell factors in the genetic control of the immune response to poly tyrosyl glutamyl poly d l alanyl poly lysyl	Thymos-specific cellular thymus factors; antigen in the genetic control of the immune response to poly dalanyl poly lysyl tyrosyl glutamyl.
18	the differentiation pathway of t lymphocytes evidence for two differentiated cell types	The differentiation pathway of the t-cells reveals the existence of two types of differentiated cells.
18	concancvalin a binding proteins of lymphoid cell surface	Concancvaline is a surface-binding protein of lymphoid cells.
18	purification of terminal riboadenylate transferase from calf thymus gland	Purification of the terminal riboadenylate transferase from the calf thymus gland.
18	studies and sequences of escherichia coli 4 5 s rna	Abstract studies and sequences; Escherichia coli 4 s rna 5 s rna.
18	differences in subunit composition and iron content of isoferritins	Differences in the composition of units and iron content of isoferritins.
18	nucleotide sequence studies of normal and genetically altered glycine transfer ribonucleic acids from escherichia coli	L' study of the nucleotide sequence of normal and genetically modified glycine transfer ribonucleic acids from apos; escherichia coli.
18	the nucleotide sequence of a precursor to the glycine and threonine specific transfer ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli	The nucleotide sequence of apos, a precursor of glycine- and threonine-specific transfer ribonucleic acids; escherichia coli.
18	cell mediated immune responses in vitro i suppression of the generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by concanavalin a and concanavalin a activated spleen cells	In vitro cell-mediated immune responses suppression of cytotoxic lymphocyte generation by concanavalin a and concanavalin to activated splenic cells.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny ii commitment to immunoglobulin heavy chain isotype	Restriction of disease; gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny ii commitment to apos; isotype of heavy chain of disease; immunoglobulin.
18	quantitative studies on tumor enhancement in mice i enhancement of sarcoma i induced by igm igg1 and igg2	Quantitative studies on the immune response; tumour increase in mice; increase in sarcoma induced by igg1 and igg2.
18	regulation of spleen growth and portal pressure in hepatic shcistosomiasis	Regulation of spleen growth and pressure carries into hepatic shcistosomiasis.
18	acceleration of amyloidosis by syngeneic spleen cells from normal donors	Acceleration of apo; amyloidosis by syngenic cells of the spleen of normal donors.
18	demonstration by affinity chromatography of the cell free synthesis of ribonuclease specific immunoglobulin	Demonstration by d&apos chromatography; ribonuclease-specific immunoglobulin; affinity of cell-free synthesis of apos.
18	size of the polyadenylic acid region of newly synthesized globin messenger ribonucleic acid	Size of region of apos; polyadenyl acid of apos; messenger ribonucleic acid of newly synthesized globin.
18	transmission of marble spleen disease in turkeys and pheasants	Marble spleen disease transmission in turkeys and pheasants.
18	collimation and surface counting in haematology	Collimation and surface counting in the blood; hematology.
18	the effect of electromagnetic radiation on the hematopoietic stem cells of mice	Effect of electromagnetic radiation on hematopoietic stem cells in mice.
18	segmental pancreatic lesions after partial or total splenectomy in rabbits	Segmental lesion of the pancreas following partial or total splenectomy in rabbits.
18	operative choice and technique following pancreatic injury	Optical selection and technique following seizures; pancreatic lesion.
18	the viral envelope glycoprotein of murine leukemia virus and the pathogenesis of immune complex glomerulonephritis of new zealand mice	The glycoprotein of l' the viral envelope of murine leukemia virus and the pathogenesis of the immune complex of glomerulonephritis in neo-Muslim mice.
18	immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia viruses i induction of immunologic disease and lymphoma in balb c times nzb f1 mice by scripps leukemia virus	Immunopathogenicity and immunogenicity; oncogenicity of murine leukemia viruses induction of apo; immunologic and immunologic disease; flu leukemia virus lymphoma in mice.
18	blockage of amyloid induction by colchicine in an animal model	Amyloid Induction Blockage by Colchicine in an Animal Model.
18	isolation of antigen binding cells from unprimed mice demonstration of antibody forming cell precursor activity and correlation between precursor and secreted antibody avidities	The isolation of uninitiated mouse antigen-binding cells demonstrates precursor antibody activity and a correlation between antibody activity, precursor avidity, and secreted antibody avidity.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny iii endogenous iga and igm on the membranes of different plasma cell precursors	Restriction of l' gene expression in endogenous iiga and igm b lymphocytes and their progeny on the membranes of different plasma cell precursors.
18	regulatory mechanisms in cell mediated immune responses i regulation of mixed lymphocyte reactions by alloantigen activated thymus derived lymphocytes	Mechanisms controlling cell-mediated immune responses i regulation of mixed lymphocyte responses by lymphocytes derived from alloantigen-activated thymus.
18	molecular relationship between private and public h 2 antigens as determined by antigen redistribution method	The molecular relationship between private and public h2 antigen species was determined by the antigen redistribution method.
18	in vitro studies on allotype suppression iii compounds of antiallyotype serum active in release from allotype suppression	In vitro studies on the suppression of allotypes iii composed of anti-ally-typical serum active in the release of the suppression of allotypes.
18	the role of macrophages in the generation of t helper cells ii the genetic control of the macrophage t cell interaction for helper cell induction with soluble antigens	The role of macrophages in the generation of auxiliary t cells ii genetic control of apo; interaction of macrophage t cells for apo; induction of auxiliary cells with soluble antigens.
18	the lipoprotein of the outer membrane of escherichia coli a b lymphocyte mitogen	Lipoprotein from the outer membrane of d' escherichia coli has mitogenic b lymphocytes.
18	feedback induction of suppressor t cell activity	Retroactive induction of apos; suppressor t-cell activity.
18	no evidence for particles encapsulating rna instructed dna polymerase and high molecular weight virus related rna in herpesvirus induced tumours of non human primates	No evidence of encapsulating particles of DNA polymerase chain reaction and high molecular weight virus-related rna in apo-induced tumors; herpesviruses in non-human primates.
18	abdominal lavage in blunt trauma	Abdominal lavage to blunt force trauma.
18	heterogeneity in tissue ferritins displayed by gel electrofocusing	Tissue ferritin heterogeneity was demonstrated by gel electrophoretic methods.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes viii in vivo cooperative responses between lymphocytes are controlled by genes in the k end of the h 2 complex	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t-cells and b viii lymphocytes in vivo are controlled by genes located at the apos; the k-terminus of the h2 complex.
18	effect of nonspecific stimulation on the defense mechanisms of inbred mice	The effect of non-specific stimulation on the defense mechanisms of the inbred mouse.
18	preventive effect of hapten reactive thymus derived helper lymphocytes on the tolerance induction in hapten specific precursors of antibody forming cells	Preventative effect of reactive thymus-derived auxiliary lymphocytes; hapten on apos; tolerance induction in specific apo precursors; hapten from antibody-forming cells.
18	antibiotic combinations in the treatment of experimental staphylococcus aureus infection	Drug combinations; antibiotics in the treatment of staphylococcus aureus; experimental infection.
18	depressed immune response in the magnesium deficient rat	In the magnesium-deficient rat, the immune response decreased.
18	accumulation of gold in various organs of mice injected with gold thioglucose	Gold accumulation in various organs of mice injected with thioglucose gold.
18	release of prostaglandin by mitogen and antigen stimulated leukocytes in culture	The release of prostaglandins by the mitogen and the antigen stimulates leukocytes in culture.
18	dna synthesis in tumor bearing rats	Synthesis of DNA in tumour-carrying rats.
18	treatment of an established graft versus host reaction in akr mice by adoptive immunotherapy	Treatment of apo; graft-to-bladder response to apo; host in mice akr by immunotherapy.
18	graft versus leukemia without fatal graft versus host disease in akr mice	Non-fatal graft-mediated leukemia graft against lung disease; host in akr mice.
18	an experimental model for evaluation of factors in tumor escape from immunological attack	A model experimental for the evaluation of factors in the escape of the tumor of the apos; immunological attack.
18	benzo alpha pyrene effects on mouse epithelial cells in culture	The effects of benzo alpha pyrene on mouse epithelial cells in culture.
18	selection for high immunogenicity in drug resistant sublines of murine lymphomas demonstrated by plaque assay	Selection for high immunogenicity in drug resistant murine lymphoma cell lines as demonstrated by the plaque test.
18	genetical control of b cell responses iii requirement for functional mitogenicity of the antigen in thymus independent specific responses	Genetic control of cell responses requires functional mitogenicity of the apos; antigen in specific, thymus-independent responses.
18	x linked b lymphocyte immune defect in cba hn mice i studies of the function and composition of spleen cells	L' study of spleen cell function and composition in cba hn mice revealed x-linked b-cell immunodeficiency in these mice.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice iv identification and distribution in mouse spleen	D&apos identification; a novel cell type in the peripheral lymphoid organs of mice iv identification and distribution in the mouse spleen.
18	functional heterogeneity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus specfic t lymphocytes i identification of effector amd memory subsets	Functional heterogeneity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus t-cells i identification of under-effector memory sets amd.
18	evidence for the clonal abortion theory of b lymphocyte tolerance	Evidence at baseline; support for oral theory; clonal abortion on lymphocyte tolerance b.
18	the characterization fo the b cell repertoire specific for the 2 4 dinitrophenyl and 2 4 6 trinitrophenyl determinants in neonatal balb c mice	Characterization of the b-cell specific repertoire of determinants 2,4 dinitrophenyl and 2,46 trinitrophenyl in neonatal balb mice.
18	t cell migration into allografts	Migration of T cells into allografts.
18	the in vitro induction of immunological tolerance in the b lymphocyte by oligovalent thymus dependent antigens	In vitro induction of immunological tolerance in b-lymphocyte by thymus-dependent oligovalent antigens.
18	tolerance induction in b lymphocytes but thymus dependent antigens t cells may abrogate b cell tolerance induction by prevent an antibody response	Induction of tolerance in b lymphocytes, but thymus-dependent t antigens can nullify tolerance in b lymphocytes by preventing immune response.
18	clonal dominance i restricted nature of the igm antibody response to group a streptococcal carbohydrate in mice	Clonal dominance limited the nature of the antibody response to streptococcal carbohydrate in mice.
18	functional subclasses of t lymphocytes bearing different ly antigens i the generation of functionally distinct t cell subclasses is a differentiative process independent of antigen	Sub--functional classes of t-cells carrying different antigens The generation of functionally distinct t-cell sub-cells is an antigen-independent developmental process.
18	h 2 compatability requirement for t cell mediated lysis of target cells infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus different cytotoxic t cell specificities are associated with structures coded for in h 2k or h 2d	L' a h 2 compatibility requirement for the t-cell-mediated lysis of lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus infected target cells is associated with different cytotoxic specificities of t-cell coding structures in h 2k or h 2d.
18	dissociation between mitogenicity and immunogenicity of tnp lipopolysaccharide a t independent antigen	Dissociation between mitogenicity and immunogenicity of lipopolysaccharide tnp, an independent t-antigen.
18	pathobiological relationships between mycobacterium leprae and its primitive host	Pathobiological relationships between the leprae mycobacterium and its primitive leprae host.
18	cell surface antigen induced by friend murine leukemia virus is also in the virion	Cell surface antigen induced by friendly murine leukemia virus is also present in the virus.
18	reticuloendotheliosis virus nucleic acid sequences in cellular dna	Dapos sequences; reticuloendotheliosis virus nucleic acids in apo; cell DNA.
18	type c rna virus gene expression in human tissue	It's a genetic expression of the virus in human tissue.
18	clinical staging of malignant lymphoma in patients suspected to have hepato splenic schistosomiasis	Clinical stage of malignant lymphoma in patients with suspected hepatocellular splenic schistosomiasis.
18	ontogeny of mouse t lymphocyte function	L-apos; ontogeny of mouse t-cell function.
18	development of b lymphocytes 1 2	Lymphocyte development.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocyte function with respect to the heterogeneity of antibody affinity 1 2	Apos; ontogeny of b lymphocyte function with respect to apos; heterogeneity of apos; affinity of antibodies.
18	casein induced experimental amyloidosis v the response of lymphoid organs to t and b mitogens	Casein induced an experimental amyloidosis v the response of lymphoid organs to mitogens t and b.
18	marek s disease in immunosuppressed chickens growth of a transplantable lymphoma and development of the disease by natural exposure	Marek disease in the immunocompromised chickens caused the growth of apo; transplantable lymphoma and the development of the disease by natural exposure.
18	inhibitory effect of interferon on multiplication of friend leukemia cells in vivo	Inhibitor effect of leukemia; interferon on the multiplication of friendly leukemia cells in vivo.
18	transplantation behavior of allotransplantable tumor lines derived from immunologically modified hosts	Transplantable allransplantable tumour lines derived from immunologically modified hosts.
18	immunopotentiation with bcg dimensions of a specific antitumor response	Immunopotentiation with bcg d&apos dimension; specific anti-tumor response.
18	inhibition of bovine leukemia virus release	Bovine leukemia virus release inhibition.
18	spontaneous delayed splenic rupture case report of a five year interval between trauma and diagnosis	Delayed spontaneous splenic rupture: five-year interval between trauma and diagnosis.
18	immunologic mimicry between mouse tissue and enterobacterial common antigen	Immunological mimicry between mouse tissues and l' common antigen of enterobacteria.
18	localization of a protein antigen in the chicken spleen effect of various manipulative procedures on the morphogenesis of the germinal centre	Localization of apos, a protein antigen in the chicken spleen, effects of various manipulations on germ-centre morphogenesis.
18	the antagonistic action of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp on proliferation of b and t lymphocytes	L' antagonistic action of cyclic gmp and l' cyclic ampoule on b and t lymphocyte proliferation.
18	the control of immune response in vitro by ca2 ii the ca2 dependent period during mitogenic stimulation	Control of immune response in vitro by ca2 ii the ca2-dependent period of mitogenic stimulation.
18	binding of normal human igg to myelin sheaths glia and neurons	The normal human igg binding to the myelin sheath is by glial cells and neurons.
18	the relation between the t cells responsible for cell mediated cytotoxic killing of mastocytoma cells and the helper cell effect	The relationship between the t-cells responsible for the cytotoxic destruction of the mastocytomas by cell mediation and l' effect of auxiliary cells.
18	delayed hypersensitivity and acquired cellular resistance in guinea pigs infected with listeria monocytogenes	In guinea pigs infected with Listeria monocytogenes, hypersensitivity was delayed and cellular resistance was acquired.
18	genital herpesvirus hominis infection in mice i development of an experimental model	Hominis herpesvirus genital infection in mouse development; an experimental model.
18	defense mechanisms against infectious bovine rhinotracheitis virus inhibition of virus infection by murine macrophages	Mechanisms of defense against disease; inhibition of disease; infectious bovine rhinotracheitis virus virus infection caused by murine macrophages.
18	studies on the mechanism of macrophage mediated cytotoxicity	Studies on the mechanism of macrophage-mediated cytotoxicity in rats.
18	cell mediated immunity in the uremic rat	Cell-mediated immunity in uremic rat.
18	immunological abnormalities in splenic atrophy	Immunologic abnormalities in epos; splenic atrophy.
18	splenectomy for haematological cytopenias in patients with malignant lymphomas	Splenectomy for hematological cytopenia in patients with lymphocyte-related malignancies.
18	atypical spherocytosis a disease of spleen as well as of red blood cells	Atypical spherocytosis is a disease of the spleen and red blood cells.
18	observations on the induction of bone in soft tissues	Observations on body fat; induction of osmosis; bone in soft tissue.
18	release of colony stimulating activity from thymus derived lymphocytes	Lapos release; colony-stimulating activity of thymus-derived lymphocytes.
18	alloimmune cytotoxic t cells evidence that they recognize serologically defined antigens and bear clonally restricted receptors	Alloimmune cytotoxic t-cells show that they recognize serologically defined antigens and antigens, and they have restricted clonal receptors.
18	a limited number of globin genes in human dna	Limited number of globin genes in human DNA.
18	activation of t and b lymphocytes in vitro ii biological and biochemical properties of an allogeneic effect factor aef active in triggering specific b lymphocytes	In vitro activation of t-cells and b-cells ii biological and biochemical properties of t-cells; a factor; an allogeneic aef effect in the elicitation of specific b-cells.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro 3 tolerogenic properties of the terpolymer l glutamic acid 60 l alanine30 l tyrosine10 gat for spleen cells from nonresponder h 2s and h 2q mice	Genetic control of immune responses in vitro 3 tolerant properties of l' terpolymeric glutamic acid l 60 l alanine30 l tyrosine10 gat for unresponsive h2s and h2q mouse spleen cells.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro iv conditions for cooperative interactions between nonresponder parental b cells and primed responder plus nonresponder f1 t cells in the development of an antibody response under ir gene control in vitro	The genetic control of immune responses in vitro under ideal conditions; cooperative interactions between non-responding parental b cells and more non-responding t-response t-cells initiated in the development of immune responses; an in vitro gene-mediated immune response.
18	cell to cell interaction in the immune response x t cell dependent suppression in tolerant mice	Cell-to-cell interaction in immune response x cell-dependent cell-t-mediated suppression in tolerant mice.
18	selective roles of thymus derived lymphocytes in the antibody response ii preferential suppression of high affinity antibody forming cells by carrier primed suppressor t cells	Selective roles of thymus-derived lymphocytes in the antibody response ii preferential suppression of high-affinity antibody-forming cells by the t-suppressor cells initiated by the carrier.
18	separable populations of activated thymus derived lymphocytes identified in two assays for cell mediated immunity to murine tumor allografts	Activated thymus-derived separable lymphocyte populations were identified in two cell-mediated immunity to murine tumor allograft assays.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes vi cooperative responses between lymphocytes derived from mouse donor strains differing at genes in the s and d regions of the h 2 complex	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t-lymphocytes and co-operative b-lymphocyte responses between mouse donor strain-derived lymphocytes that differ at the gene level in the s and d regions of the h2 complex.
18	enhancement of tumor growth by graft versus host reaction	Augmentation of tumour growth by graft-versus-host response.
18	cellular immunity against rous sarcomas of chickens preferential reactivity against autochthonous target cells as determined by lymphocyte adherence and cytotoxicity tests in vitro	L' cellular immunity against sarcoma rous of chickens has a preferential reactivity against autochthonous target cells as determined by lymphocyte adhesion and in vitro cytotoxicity tests.
18	induction of increased calcium uptake in mouse t lymphocytes by concanavalin a and its modulation by cyclic nucleotides	Induction of diabetes mellitus; an increase in calcium uptake in mouse t-cell lymphocytes by concanavalin a and its modulation by cyclic nucleotides.
18	thymic regeneration after lethal irradiation evidence for an intra thymic radioresistant t cell precursor	The thymus regeneration after lethal irradiation revealed the presence of a precursor of t-cells that is resistant to thymic intra-thymic radiation.
18	effect of cortisone on the disappearance kinetics and tissue localization of soluble immune complexes	Effect of cortisone on disappearance kinetics and tissue localization of soluble immune complexes.
18	antibody mediated suppression of grafted lymphoma iii evaluation of the role of thymic function non thymus derived lymphocytes macrophages platelets and polymorphonuclear leukocytes in syngeneic and allogeneic hosts	Antibody suppresses grafted lymphoma iii evaluation of the role of thymic function in non-thymus macrophage-derived platelets and polymorphonuclear leukocytes in allogeneic and syngenic hosts.
18	the role of macrophages in the production of lymphokines by t and b lymphocytes	The role of macrophages in the production of lymphokines by both t- and b-cells.
18	the frequency of phosphorylcholine specific b cells in conventional and germfree balb c mice	Frequency of phosphorylcholine-specific b cells in traditional and germless bb c mice.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses i the effect of cell number on the response	Cellular cooperation during antibody responses-haptene in vivo i l' effect of cell number on response.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses ii the effect of in vivo and in vitro x irradiation on t and b cells	Cellular cooperation during antibody responses-haptene in vivo ii l' effect of apos; x-radiation in vivo and in vitro on t and b cells.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses iii the helper cell activity of activated thymocytes of spleen cells treated with anti theta serum and of spleen cells from anti thymocyte serum treated or adult thymectomized donors	Cellular cooperation during antibody responses to apos; haptene in vivo iii lapos; auxiliary cell activity of activated thymocyte cells from antitheta serum-treated and spleen cells from thymocyte serum-treated and adult thymectomized donors.
18	amyloid fibril protein related to immunoglobulin lambda chains	Amyloid fibrillar protein linked to lambda chains of l' immunoglobulin.
18	comparison of scrapie and transmissible mink encephalopathy in hamsters ii clinical signs pathology and pathogenesis	Scrapie versus scrapie; transmissible mink encephalopathy in hamsters ii Clinical Signs Pathology and pathogenesis.
18	host control of endogenous murine leukemia virus gene expression concentrations of viral proteins in high and low leukemia mouse strains	Mastered by apo; host of mucosal concentrations; viral protein expression of endogenous murine leukemia virus in strains of mice with high and low leukemia.
18	type c viral expression in primate tissues	C-type viral expression in primate tissue.
18	lymphomas clinical stages	Clinical stages of lymphoma.
18	influence of dietary protein restriction on immune competence i effect on the capacity of cells from various lymphoid organs to induce graft vs host reactions	L' influence of dietary protein restriction on immune competence affects cell capacity in various lymphoid organs; induces graft reactions-host.
18	heterogeneity of the balb c antiphosphorylcholine antibody response at the precursor cell level	Heterogeneity of the antibody response to balb phosphorylcholine c at precursor cells.
18	relationship between fc receptors antigen binding sites on t and b cells and h 2 complex associated determinants	The relationship between fc receptor binding sites on t- and b-cells and determinants associated with the h2 complex.
18	genetic regulation of the antibody response to h 2db alloantigens in mice i differences in activation of helper t cells in c57bl 10 and balb c congenic strains	Genetic regulation of the immune response to the alloantigen h 2db in mice i differences in apo placentae; activation of helper cells in congenic strains c57bl 10 and balb c.
18	rosette forming ability of thymus derived lymphocytes in humoral and cell mediated immunity ii helper cell activity	The ability of thymus-derived lymphocytes to form rosettes in the apos; humoral immunity and the apos; cell-mediated immunity ii helps the apos; cell activity.
18	extracardiac abnormalities in infants with congenital heart disease	Extracardiac abnormalities in infants with apo; a congenital heart disease.
18	evidence for identity or close association of the fc receptor of b lymphocytes and alloantigens determined by the ir region of the h 2 complex	Evidence of the apos; identity or apos; close association of b lymphocyte fc receptor and alloantigen determined by the ir region of the h2 complex.
18	immunological studies in the postsplenectomy syndrome	Immunological studies on postplenectomy syndrome.
18	islet cell tumors in childhood	Pancreatic islet cell tumours in childhood.
18	failure of lymphocytes to reexpress antigen receptors after brief interaction with a tolerogenic d amino acid copolymer	Failure of lymphocytes to reexpress d&apos receptors; antigens after brief interaction with tolerant amino acid d copolymer.
18	generation of cytotoxic t lymphocytes in vitro i response of normal and immune mouse spleen cells in mixed leukocyte cultures	Cytotoxic t-cell production in vitro of normal and immune mouse spleen cells in mixed leukocyte cultures.
18	generation of cytotoxic t lymphocytes in vitro ii effect of repeated exposure to alloantigens on the cytotoxic activity of long term mixed leukocyte cultures	Cytotoxic lymphocyte generation in vitro; effects of repeated exposure to alloantigens on leukocytes; cytotoxic activity of long-term leukocyte-mixing cultures.
18	evaluation of carbon 11 labelled phenylglycine and phenylalanine for pancreas scintigraphy	Evaluation of 11C-labelled phenylglycine and phenylalanine for pancreatic scintigraphy.
18	incorporation of a 131 iodine deoxycytidine monophosphate protamine complex into the dna of tumor bearing rats following partial synchronization with hydroxyurea	Incorporation of d' a complex 131 iodine deoxycytidine monophosphate protamine in the apos; DNA from rats carrying tumors after partial synchronization with the apos; hydroxyurea.
18	enzymatic synthesis of oligonucleotides of defined sequence addition of short blocks of nucleotide residues to oligonucleotide primers	Enzyme synthesis of apos; apos oligonucleotides; defined sequential addition of short blocks of nucleotide residues to oligonucleotide primers.
18	determination of the 3 terminal nucleotide of dna fragments	Determination of the terminal nucleotide 3 (terminal nucleotide 3) of DNA fragments.
18	rna directed dna synthesis by the dna polymerase of rous sarcoma virus structural and functional identification of 4s primer rna in uninfected cells	The directed synthesis of DNA by sarcoma virus DNA polymerase enables the synthesis; structural and functional identification of the proteins; priming of 4s rna in uninfected cells.
18	human myeloma marrow cells in immunologically deficient mice	Human myeloma spinal cord (HMMC) cells in immunologically deficient mice.
18	rb86 uptake of various organs of the spontaneously hypertensive rats a preliminary note	The uptake of rb86 by various organs from spontaneously hypertensive rats is a preliminary note.
18	protection of a he mice by a friend virus pseudotype against challenge with friend virus	Protection of a mouse by a Friendly Virus (FV) pseudotype against provocation by a Friendly virus.
18	combination chemotherapy of rauscher leukemia and ascites tumors by narcissus alkaloid with standard drugs and effect on cellular immunity	Combination of chemotherapy for leukemia and tumors d' ascites by a narcissistic alkaloid with standard drugs and effect on apos; cell immunity.
18	separation of mouse spleen haematopoietic cell fractions for transplantation purposes in lethally irradiated mice	Separation of hematopoietic cell fractions from mouse spleen in fatally irradiated mice for transplantation.
18	isolation of a low molecular weight serum component antigenically related to an amyloid fibril protein of unknown origin	Isolation of d' a low molecular weight serum component antigenically related to an amyloid fibrillar protein d' unknown origin.
18	evolutionary relationship between immunoglobulins and transplantation antigens	Evolutionary relationships between transplantation antigens and immune globulins.
18	elevated cyclic amp levels in mouse lymphoid tissue after stimulation by cholera enterotoxin in vitro 38468	Increased levels of cholera; cyclic ampoules in mouse lymphoid tissues following spinal stimulation; cholera enterotoxin in vitro.
18	influence of rofenaid 40 feed medication on an experimental salmonella infection in chickens	Chicken rofenaid 40 feedstuff on an experimental salmonella infection.
18	selective thymic localization of murine leukemia virus related antigens in c57bl ka mice after inoculation with radiation virus	Selective thymic localization of murine leukemia virus related antigens in ka c57bl mice after inoculation with radiotherapy virus.
18	immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumours iv direct cellular cytolysis of 51cr labelled target cells in vitro and analysis of blocking factors which modulate cytotoxicity	Immunity to murine sarcoma virus has induced tumours iv direct cell cytolysis of 51cr-labeled target cells in vitro and in vitro; analysis of blocking factors that modulate cytotoxicity.
18	studies on mouse moloney virus induced tumours i the detection of p30 as a cytotoxic target on murine moloney leukaemic spleen cells and on an in vitro moloney sarcoma line by antibody mediated cytotoxicity	Mouse moloney virus studies have induced tumours i detection of p30 as a cytotoxic target on murine moloney leukemic spleen cells and an in vitro moloney sarcoma line by antibody-mediated cytotoxicity.
18	correction of a murine mammary tumor virus associated immunological depression by selective immunosuppression with cytosine arabinoside	Correction of immunologic depression associated with d*apos virus; murine breast tumour by selective immunosuppression with cytosine arabinoside.
18	resistance to infection with nocardia asteroides	Apos resistance; nocardia asteroides infection.
18	inhibition and enhancement of friend leukemia virus by pyran copolymer	Inhibition and augmentation of the amoebic leukemia virus by the pyran leukemia copolymer.
18	mouse pancreas involvement in murine hepatitis virus infection	Mouse pancreatic involvement in apos; mosquito virus infection; murine hepatitis.
18	hemolytic anemia induced by murine erythroblastosis virus possible mechanisms of hemolysis and effects of an interferon inducer	Hemolytic anemia due to apos virus; murine erythroblastosis possible mechanisms of apos; hemolysis and effects of apos; an inducer; interferon.
18	target cell of the polycythemia inducing friend virus studies with myleran	Target cell of polycythemia inducing studies on mylerian friend influenza virus.
18	lymphoproliferative disease in a cotton top marmoset after inoculation with infectious mononucleosis derived epstein barr virus	Lymphoproliferative disease in a cotton top marmoset after inoculation with infectious mononucleosis derived from epstein barr virus.
18	immunosuppression in vitro induced by leukemia virus infected splenocytes 38544	In vitro immunosuppression induced by leukemia virus 38544 infected splenocytes.
18	murine leukaemia virus expression in the akr following thymectomy	Expression of murine leukemia virus in apo; akr after the thymectomy.
18	relationship of infectious murine leukemia virus and virus related antigens in genetic crosses between akr and the fv 1 compatible strain c57l	Infectious murine leukemia virus and virus-associated antigens in genetic crosses between akr and the c57l compatible strain fv 1.
18	studies on the role of the host immune response in recovery from friend virus leukemia ii cell mediated immunity	Studies on the role of the immune response of the host in the recovery of apos; cell-mediated immunity to friendly viral leukemia ii.
18	the immune response to infection with vaccinia virus in mice i infection and the production of antibody neutralizing cell associated and cell free virus	Immune response to vaccine virus infection in mice; infection and production of cell-associated neutralizing antibodies and acellular virus.
18	immunopathology of mouse hepatitis virus type 3 infection iii clinical and virologic observation of a persistent viral infection	Immunopathology of apo; infection with hepatitis virus; hepatitis type 3 in mice iii clinical and virological observation of apo; persistent viral infection.
18	properties of cell lines derived from tumors induced by friend virus in balb c and balb c h 2b mice	Properties of Berb c and Berb c h 2b mouse cell lines derived from friendly virus induced tumours.
18	a quantitative comparison between in vivo and in vitro derived friend leukemia virus	Quantitative comparison between amoelectronic leukemia virus in vivo and virus derived in vitro.
18	coenzyme q deficiency in mice following infection with friend leukemia virus	Coenzyme q deficiency in mouse following amicus infection with amicus leukemia virus.
18	enhanced mononuclear phagocytic activity during trypanosoma cruzi infection in mice	Increase in apos; mononuclear phagocytic activity in trypanosome cruzi infected mice.
18	effects of newcastle disease virus ndv on infection of adult mice with the thogoto like ar 126 arbovirus	Effects of the Newcastle disease virus on apos; infection of adult mice with thogoto as ar126 arboviruses.
18	mechanism of immunologic resistance to herpes simplex virus 1 hsv 1 infection	Immunologic resistance mechanisms to HIV; herpes simplex 1 hsv 1 infection.
18	diversity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus variation due to replication of the virus in the mouse	Lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus variation due to viral replication in mice.
18	protection of mice against friend leukemia by active and passive immunization with isolated viral glycoprotein and its antiserum respectively author s transl	Protection of mice against amicleukemia by active and passive immunization with apos; an isolated viral glycoprotein and its antiserum.
18	activity of dna dependent rna polymerases a and b in spleen nuclei of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	In mice infected with leukemia virus, the activity of rna polymerases is dependent on apos; DNA a and b in the spleen nuclei.
18	deoxyribonucleic acid dependent ribonucleic acid polymerases from spleen of uninfected and rauscher murine leukemia virus infected nih swiss mice	Deoxyribonucleic acid (DMAC); ribonucleic acid polymerases from the spleen of mouse nih swiss infected with murine leukemia virus uninfected or infected by rauscher.
18	induction of endogenous and of spleen focus forming viruses during dimethylsulfoxide induced differentiation of mouse erythroleukemia cells transformed by spleen focus forming virus	L' induction of endogenous and splenic foci-forming viruses during splenic foci-forming virus-transformed mouse erythroleukemia-induced differentiation by dimethyl sulfoxide.
18	adaptation to tissue culture of the murine leukemia asl1 a high producer of tl thymus leukemia antigen	Adaptation to tissue culture of asl1 murine leukemia, a major thymic leukemia antigen producer.
18	the comparative sensitivity of sheep and chicken embryos to bluetongue virus and observations on viraemia in experimentally infected sheep	Comparison of sensitivity of sheep and chick embryos to bluetongue virus infection and observations on viraemia in experimentally infected sheep.
18	cytopathogenic xc assay for bone marrow from mice infected with murine leukemia viruses	Mouse infected with murine leukemia virus is cytopathogenic xc test for bone marrow.
18	combined phytohaemagglutinin and dianhydrodulcitol treatment of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection in mice	Treatment with the combination of phytohemagglutinin and dianhydrodulcitol of the apos; lymphocytic infection with the choriomeningitis virus in mice.
18	a live vaccine against tick borne encephalitis integrated studies h histopathology of mice peripherally immunized with e5 14 virus and challenged with virulent virus	A live vaccine against eapos, tick-borne encephalitis, has been studied in integrated histopathological studies in mice peripherally immunized with the e5-14 virus and exposed to a virulent virus.
18	isolation of friend leukemia virus resistant line from non inbred mouse colony	To isolate the strain resistant to amic leukemia virus from a colony of outbred mice.
18	effect of rifamycin and tilorone derivatives on friend virus leukemia in mice	Effect of rifamycin and tilorone derivatives on the leukemia of the mouse virus.
18	herpes simplex virus infection in guinea pigs an animal model for studying latent and recurrent herpes simplex virus infection	Apos virus infection; guinea pig herpes simplex, animal model for apos; study of apos; latent and recurrent infection with apos virus; herpes simplex.
18	erythropoietin independent erythroid colony formation in vitro by hemopoietic cells of mice infected with friend virus	Erythropoietin-independent erythroid colonies formed in vitro by the hematopoietic cells of mouse infected with L&apos virus; friend.
18	transient impaired cell mediated tumor immunity after acute infection with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Transient altered cell-mediated tumor immunity after acute lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection.
18	granulocytic stem cells in friend leukemia	Granulocytic stem cells in the amicable leukemia.
18	tumor colony formation by friend virus infected cells in immunosuppressed mice	The formation of tumour colonies by cells infected with the virus of l'apos; friendly in immunosuppressed mice.
18	diffusion chamber hematopoiesis in marrow and spleen cells from mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus rlv a	Hematopoiesis in the diffusion chamber in the pith and spleen cells of mice infected with rlv a. rausseus leukemia virus.
18	cell medicated cytotoxicity against ectromelia virus infected target cells iii role of the h 2 gene complex	Cytotoxicity of cells against target cells infected with ectromelia virus iii role of the complex of the h2 gene.
18	cell mediated immunity to moloney sarcoma virus in mice ii analysis of antigenic specificities involved in t lymphocyte mediated in vivo rejection of murine sarcoma virus induced tumors	Cell-mediated immunity against moloney sarcoma virus in mice ii analyses the antigenic specificities involved in lymphocyte t by etapos; intermediate for the in vivo rejection of murine sarcoma virus induced tumours.
18	target cell dependent t cell mediated lysis of vaccinia virus infected cells	Target-cell-dependent t-cell-mediated lysis of vaccine virus infected cells.
18	strain dependent expression of endogenous mouse tropic leukemia viruses in chemically induced murine leukemias	Dependent expression of the endogenous strain of mouse tropical leukemia viruses in chemically induced murine leukemias.
18	immunological studies with hamster cells transformed by cytomegalovirus and herpes simplex virus type 1	Immunological studies on type 1 herpes simplex virus and cytomegalovirus transformed hamster cells.
18	response of marmosets to experimental infection with epstein barr virus	Mosquito reaction to apo; experimental infection with barr epstein virus.
18	continuous replication of friend virus complex spleen focus forming virus lymphatic leukemia inducing virus in mouse embryo fibroblasts retention of leukemogenicity and loss of immunosuppressive properties	Continuous replication of the viral viral viral lymphatic leukemia-induced virus complex virus in mouse fibroblasts maintains leukemogenicity and loss of immunosuppressive properties.
18	the role of the spleen and immunity in the metastatic pattern of a murine reticulum cell sarcoma	The role of the spleen and the apos; immunity in the metastatic profile of apos; a sarcoma of the mouse reticulum cells.
18	characterization of an early cytotoxicity inducing factor in sera of japanese quails after inoculation with rous sarcoma virus	Characterization of serum cytotoxicity; a factor of onset; early induction of cytotoxicity in Japanese quail serum after inoculation with sarcoma virus.
18	the relation between the proliferative activity and the differentiation pattern of bone marrow cells from rauscher leukemia virus infected balb c mice	The relationship between proliferative activity and differentiation pattern of bone marrow cells of Balb c mice infected with the Ruscher leukemia virus.
18	splenocyte plaque assay for the detection of murine leukemia virus	Screening on splenocyte beaches for murine leukemia virus.
18	stimulation of erythropoietic differentiation in balb c mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Stimulation of erythropoietic differentiation in the balb c mice infected with reuser leukemia virus.
18	reversal of leukemia virus induced immunosuppression in vitro by peritoneal macrophages	Leukemia virus inversion induced immunosuppression in vitro by peritoneal macrophages.
18	in vitro granulocytic stem cell clonogenic capacity of marrow and spleen cells from mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Granulocyte stem cell clonogenicity in vitro in the bone marrow and spleen cells of leukemia-infected mice.
18	the innate resistance of cba mice to endogenous murine leukaemia virus infection	Innate resistance of cba mice to murine endogenous leukemia virus infection.
18	neuropathological effects of persistent infection of mice by mouse hepatitis virus	Neuropathological effects of apo; persistent viral infection of mice; hepatitis in mice.
18	physiopathology of human and virus induced murine leukemias	Physiopathology of murine leukemias induced by humans and the virus.
18	immune response to rauscher virus induced leukemia in dba mice i role of cellular and humoral immunity in spontaneous regression	The immune response to the raft virus induced leukemia in mice that played a role in apos; cellular and humoral immunity in spontaneous regression.
18	mixed lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in a murine sarcoma virus moloney induced tumor system comparison between lymphoproliferation and lymphocyte cytotoxicity	Interaction between mixed lymphocyte tumor cells in a mouse sarcoma virus-induced tumour system, a comparison between lymphoproliferation and lymphocyte cytotoxicity.
18	changes in hemopoiesis during the course of acute lcm virus infection in mice	Changes in apo; hemopoiesis over time; acute lcm virus infection in mouse.
18	replication of murine leukemia virus in bone marrow derived lymphocytes	Reproduction of murine leukemia virus in bone marrow-derived lymphocytes.
18	interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes ii infections of b and t cells with friend virus complex indiffusion chambers and in vitro effect of polyclonal mitogens	Interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes ii b-cell and t-cell infections with dolipid chambers; complex amoeuvrability of amoev virus and in vitro effect of polyclonal mitogens.
18	interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes iii alterations of splenic b and t cells in friend virus infected mice	Interactions of mulv of murine leukemia virus with isolated lymphocytes iii alterations of splenic cells b and t in friendly virus infected mice.
18	analysis of the humoral immune response to influenza virus in vitro	Analysis of humoral immune response to influenza virus in vitro.
18	mitogen induction of murine c type viruses i analysis of lymphoid cell subpopulations	Mitogen-induced murine virus type c i analysis of under-populations of lymphoid cells.
18	cytotoxic t cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice infected with ectromelia virus	Cytotoxic t-cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice infected with the virus ectromelia.
18	mechanisms of genetic resistance to friend virus leukemia iii susceptibility of mitogen responsive lymphocytes mediated by t cells	Mechanisms of Genetic Resistance to Friendly Viral Leukemia iii susceptibility of the T-cell-mediated mitogen-sensitive lymphocytes.
18	modification of hemopoietic stem cells of balb c mice by rauscher leukemia virus	Hematopoietic stem cells of balb c mice modified by leukemia ruscher virus.
18	type c rna viruses and leukemogenesis relation of type c virus infectivity and leukemogenesis induced by nitrosourea compounds in mice	Viruses of the c rna type and relationship of leukemogenesis between type c virus infectivity and nitrosourea-induced leukogenesis in mice.
18	lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus induced immunosuppression a virus induced macrophage defect	Lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus caused aposin immunosuppression; a virus-induced macrophage abnormality.
18	histochemical study of the activity of several enzymes in the process of immunogenesis in monkeys orally infected with viruses of the tick borne encephalitis complex	Histochemical study of apo; activity of several enzymes in the process of apo; immunogenesis in monkeys infected orally by viruses of the complex of apo; tick-transmitted encephalitis.
18	effects of rauscher leukemia virus infection on balb c mouse embryos	Effects of leukemia infection; leukemia virus infection on balb mouse embryos c.
18	immune reactivity in the moloney strain of murine sarcoma virus oncogenesis requirement of thymus derived lymphocytes for in vivo protection	L' immunoreactivity of the moloney strain of the mouse sarcoma virus requires apos; oncogenesis of lymphocytes derived from thymus for protection in vivo.
18	immunosuppression by moloney leukemia virus lack of correlation between virus replication and the immunosuppressive effect	Immunosuppression by the Molar Leukemia Virus (MLV), lack of correlation between virus replication and apos; immunosuppressive effect.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against murine cells infected with 6 94 virus a parainfluenza type 1 isolate from multiple sclerosis brain tissue	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against murine cells infected with 6,94-viruses, a type-1 parainfluenza isolate from MS brain tissue.
18	comparison of guinea pig cytomegalovirus and guinea pig herpes like virus pathogenesis and persistence in experimentally infected animals	Comparison of guinea pig cytomegalovirus and guinea pig herpes such as the pathogenesis of the virus and persistence in experimentally infected animals.
18	studies on viremia and antibody formation in ducklings and goslings after experimental infection with lednice yaba 1 virus	Viremia and antibody formation studies in ducklings and goslings after infection; experimental infection with lednice yaba virus.
18	quantitation of friend spleen focus forming virus by a nine day 59fe assay	Quantification of the concentration of the virus-forming friend by a 9-day 59fe test.
18	cell mediated immunity to sendai virus infection in mice	Cell-mediated immunity against apo; sentinib virus infection in mice.
18	transmission of murine leukemia virus scripps from parent to progeny mice a comparison of assay systems	Transmission of murine leukemia virus (scripps) from mother to offspring of mouse; comparative systems of d' test.
18	friend spleen focus forming virus production in vitro by a nonerythroid cell line	Focussed amoeba forming virus in vitro by a non-infectious erythroid cell line.
18	the fv 2r resistance gene in mice its effect on spleen colony formation by friend virus transformed cells	In mice, the fv 2r resistance gene has a transformative effect on the formation of splenic colonies by the friendly virus.
18	growth of a transplantable lymphoma and its modification in mice infected with the inducing virus	Transplantable lymphoma and its modification in mice infected with the inductive virus.
18	biological and biochemical properties of soluble tumor specific transplantation antigen of a simian virus 40 induced neoplasm	The biological and biochemical properties of the transplant antigen specific for the soluble tumour of apos; a simian virus 40 induced the neoplasm.
18	rauscher leukemia virus related sequences in human dna presence in some tissues of some patients with hemotopoietic neoplasias and absence in dna from other tissues	Sequences related to the leukemia virus; human DNA in certain tissues of some patients with hemotopoietic neoplasia and the absence of DNA; DNA in other tissues.
18	role of macrophages in hepatitis induced by herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 in mice	The role of macrophages in the disease; hepatitis due to herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 in mice.
18	cellular immunity in chronic theiler s virus central nervous system infection	Cellular immunity in the body; central nervous system infection caused by chronic plum pox virus.
18	two functionally distinct anti tumor effector cells isolated from primary murine sarcoma virus induced tumors	Tumours are induced by two functionally distinct cells acting against tumor effectors isolated from the primary murine sarcoma virus.
18	effect of friend leukemia virus on megakaryocytes and platelets in mice	Effect of friendly leukemia virus on megakaryocytes and mouse platelets.
18	action of different cell types in influenza antibody production 5 keeping the immunologic memory to influenza virus a serotype by b and t lymphocytes	The action of different cell types in the production of influenza; anti-influenza antibody 5 retains immunologic memory of the influenza virus; influenza a serotype by b and t lymphocytes.
18	replication of herpes simplex virus in mouse spleen cell cultures stimulated by lipopolysaccharide	Replication of the apovirus; herpes simplex virus in lipopolysaccharide-stimulated mouse spleen cell cultures.
18	pathogenesis of cytomegalovirus infection distribution of viral products immune complexes and autoimmunity during latent murine infection	Pathogenesis of the apos; cytomegalovirus infection distribution of complex auto and immune virus products-immunity during the apos; latent murine infection.
18	expression of endogenous murine leukemia viruses during the course of a protracted immunological disorder	Expression of endogenous murine leukemia virus during seizures; a long-term immune disorder.
18	mechanisms of suppression of cytotoxic t cell responses in murine lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection	Mechanisms of suppression of cytotoxic responses of t cells in infection with murine lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus.
18	immunofluorescence and histologic studies of virus induced murine lymphocytic leukemias	Histological and immunofluorescent studies of viral-induced murine lymphocyte leukemias were performed.
18	genetic control of antinuclear antibodies in mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Genetic control of anti-nuclear antibodies in mice infected with the leukemia rauscher virus.
18	viral growth in splenic megakaryocytes of mice experimentally infected with mouse hepatitis virus mhv 2	Viral growth in the splenic megaryocytes of mice experimentally infected with potato virus; mouse hepatitis mhv 2.
18	nasoencephalopathy of mice infected intrananasally with a mouse hepatitis virus jhm strain	Nasoencephalopathic infection of intranasally infected mice with a strain of lacid virus; mouse hepatitis jhm.
18	changes in the cholesterol and phospholipid content of mouse spleen after raucscher leukemia virus infection	Changes in the cholesterol and phospholipid content of the mouse spleen after infection; infection by leukemia virus.
18	expression of an antigen associated with gross virus on the surfaces of murine cells producing an oncornavirus from the radioleukemia of c57bl 6 mice	An antigen associated with a macroscopic virus (MV) on the surfaces of murine cells producing oncornavirus from c57bl 6 mouse radiolukemia.
18	biosynthesis of subviral oncogenic particles virosomes in mitochondria of rous sarcoma and rauscher murine leukemia cells	Biosynthesis of virosomes of oncogenic particles under @-@virales in rat sarcoma cell and mouse leukemia rauscher mitochondria.
18	cytotoxic t cells specific for influenza virus infected target cells	Cytotoxic t-cells specific to target cells infected with the influenza virus.
18	effects of lymphocytes from marek s disease infected chickens on mitogen responses of syngeneic normal chicken spleen cells	The effects of lymphocytes from chickens infected with Marek disease on the mitogenic responses of normal splenic cells from syngenic chickens were studied.
18	the cytotoxicity of specifically sensitized lymphocytes from mouse strains of varying h 2 specificities on lcm virus infected l cells	Cytotoxicity of specifically sensitized lymphocytes from mouse strains with variable h2 specificity to lcm virus-infected lymphocytes.
18	splenic erythroid response to friend polycythemia virus time course in vitro after infection in vivo	Erythroid splenic reaction to apos; evolution of the polycythemia virus in vitro after apos; infection in vivo.
18	immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia virus iii quantitation of spontaneous virus expression	Immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia virus (MLV) iii quantitation of apos; spontaneous viral expression.
18	naturally occurring mouse hepatitis virus infection in the nude mouse	A natural infection with the virus; hepatitis in the mouse nude.
18	leucocyte migration inhibition test as an index of immunological response to measles virus i effect of the environment and measles virus on migration of monkey leucocytes	Dapos tests; inhibition of leukocyte migration as an index of immune response to measles virus; environmental and measles virus effects on migration of monkey leukocytes.
18	the immunodepressive effect of friend virus iii effects on spleen t cells	L' immunosuppressive effect on spleen t cells.
18	virus expression in different tissues of normal and tumor bearing mice inoculated with a murine leukemia virus	Viral expression in different tissues of normal and tumour-carrying mice inoculated with murine leukemia virus.
18	lymphocytic choriomeningitis in laboratory personnel exposed to hamsters inadvertently infected with lcm virus	Lymphocytic cheningitis in laboratory personnel exposed to hamsters that are inadvertently infected with the lcm virus.
18	effect of silica on the pathogenic distinction between herpes simplex virus type 1 and 2 hepatitis in mice	Effect of silica on the pathogenicity of herpes simplex virus type 1 and type 2 hepatitis in mice.
18	general immunocompetence of rats bearing avian sarcoma virus induced intracranial tumors	L' general immunocompetence of avian sarcoma virus-carrying rats induced intracranial tumours.
18	cellular immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumors as measured by macrophage migration inhibition assays	Cellular immunity to murine sarcoma virus has induced tumors, as measured by dapo assays; inhibition of macrophage migration.
18	immunosuppression by spleen cells from moloney leukemia iii evidence for a suppressor cell that is not the leukemic virus producing cell	Immunosuppression by the spleen cells of the leukemia molecule indicates the existence of a suppressive cell that is not the leukemic virus-producing cell.
18	role of friend associated lymphatic leukemia virus in immunization against friend leukemia complex	Role of friend-associated lymphatic leukemia virus in immune supplementation.
18	specifically immune mouse t cells can destroy h 2 compatible murine target cells infected with herpes simplex virus types 1 or 2	T-cells from specifically immunized mice can destroy compatible h2 murine target cells infected with type 1 or 2 herpes simplex viruses.
18	age distribution and serological reactivity of viral antigen in brains of mice infected congenitally with lmc virus	Distribution by age; age and serologic reactivity of viral antigen in the brain of mice congenitally infected with measles virus.
18	in vitro mitogenic stimulation of murine spleen cells by herpes simplex virus	Mitogenic stimulation in vitro of mouse spleen cells by lidos virus; herpes simplex.
18	cell mediated cytotoxic response to cells bearing marek s disease tumor associated surface antigen in chickens infected with marek s disease virus	Cell-mediated cytotoxic response to Marek disease tumour-associated surface antigen (MAR) carrier cells in chickens infected with Marek disease virus.
18	specificity studies on cytotoxic thymus derived lymphocytes reactive with influenza virus infected cells evidence for dual recognition of h 2 and viral hemagglutinin antigens	Specificity studies on cytotoxic lymphocytes derived from the thymus reacting with cells infected with the influenza virus demonstrated the double recognition of h2 and viral hemagglutinin antigens.
18	failure of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus rlv a to develop splenic colonies	Failure of mice infected with leukemia virus to develop splenic colonies.
18	the recovery of mice from influenza virus infection adoptive transfer of immunity with immune t lymphocytes	Recovery of mice infected with the influenza Adoptive Transfer of Immunity with Immune T-cells.
18	requirements for stimulation of t cell responses against virus infected cells nature of ectromelia virus infected cells capable of stimulating cytotoxic t cells in a secondary response in vitro	Requirements for the stimulation of the responses of t-cells to naturally infected ectromelike virus-infected cells capable of stimulating cytotoxic t-cells in a secondary response in vitro.
18	protective activity of secondary effector t cells generated in vitro against ectromelia virus infection in vivo	In vitro secondary effector against ectromelia virus infection in vivo.
18	immunological tolerance to lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus in neonatally infected virus carrier mice evidence supporting a clonal inactivation mechanism	Immune tolerance to lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus in newly infected mice infected with the virus, evidence at baseline; support of apos; clonal mechanism of d*apos; inactivation.
18	effect of pseudotype on abelson virus and kirsten sarcoma virus induced leukemia	L' effect of pseudotype on Abelson Virus and Kirsten Sarcoma Virus induced leukemia.
18	an analysis of the role of lymphatic leukemia virus in the immunodepression exerted by friend complex in leukaemia resistant c57bl 6 mice	An analysis of the role of lymphatic leukemia virus in leukemia-resistant c57bl 6 mice; immunosuppression by the friendly complex.
18	comparative study of b lymphocyte activity in the spleen of mice infected with viruses of the tick borne encephalitis complex	Comparative study of apos; activity of b-cells in the spleen of mice infected with viruses of the complex of apos; tick-transmitted encephalitis.
18	effect of phenylhydrazine pretreatment on splenectomized rauscher leukemia virus infected mice	Effect of phenylhydrazine pretreatment on mice infected with the splenectomized, re-selective leukemia virus.
18	suppressor cells in mice with murine mammary tumor virus induced mammary tumors i inhibition of mitogen induced lymphocyte stimulation	Suppressive cells in mice with mouse apothecia; a murine mammary tumour induces mammary tumours i inhibition of mitogen-induced lymphocyte stimulation.
18	the reticuloendothelium as the target in a virus infection pichinde virus pathogenesis in two strains of hamsters	Reticuloendothelium as a target in the pathogenesis of the pichinde virus in two hamster strains.
18	characteristics of the cellular rna in viral leukemia	Characteristics of cell-line rna in viral leukemia.
18	the effect of rauscher murine leukemia virus infection on the hemopoietic system of balb c mice cell proliferation and cell loss	The effect of ruscher murine leukemia virus infection on the hemopoietic system of cell proliferation and cell loss.
18	helper independent mink cell focus inducing strains of friend murine type c virus potential relationship to the origin of replication defective spleen focus forming virus	To help independent mink cells to induce strains of the friendly mouse virus type c in potential relation to the apos; origin of defective replication of virus forming the focus of the defective spleen.
18	effect of mycobacterium tuberculosis bcg infection on the resistance of mice to ectromelia virus infection participation of interferon in enhanced resistance	Effect of apo; mycobacterium tuberculosis infection bcg on mouse resistance to participation of apo; interferon to apo; infection with ectromelia virus in increased resistance.
18	innate cytotoxicity of cba mouse spleen cells to sendai virus infected l cells	Inborn cytotoxicity of cba mouse spleen cells to l cells infected with sentai virus.
18	the detection of a spleen focus forming virus neoantigen by lymphocyte mediated cytolysis	The detection of a novel viral antigen forming a focal point in the spleen by lymphocyte-mediated cytolysis.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 1 description of the reaction	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against avian sarcoma virus transformed hamster cells 1 description of the reaction.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 2 sensitivity of different subclones	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma virus (avian sarcoma virus) 2 sensitized by different-clones.
18	in vitro studies on cellular immunity in mice infected with influenza virus	In vitro studies of the immune system in mice infected with influenza virus.
18	persistence and pathogenicity of defective friend spleen focus forming virus decreased transplantability of hemopoietic cells as a marker for preleukemic change	The persistence and pathogenicity of a defective virus that forms a foci in the spleen have decreased the hematopoietic cell transplantability as a hematopoietic cell marker; a preleukemic change.
18	effect of infection of mice with friend leukemia complex viruses on background antibody forming cell production in vitro	Effect of apo; in vitro cell-forming antibodies; infection of mice by viruses of the friendly leukemia complex.
18	murine leukemia cell hybrids the quantity of tl antigens expressed by parental and hybrid cells fails to correlate with their sensitivity to tl antibody and complement	In murine leukemia cell hybrids the amount of tl antigens expressed by parental cells and n&apos hybrids is not correlated with their sensitivity to the apos; tl antibody and complement.
18	the immunodepressive effect of friend virus iv effects on spleen b lymphocytes	Lapos; immunosuppressive effect of Friendly Virus IV on spleen b lymphocytes.
18	density gradient separation of spleen cell subpopulations from marek s disease virus infected chickens	Separation of sub@-@ populations of spleen cells along a density gradient in Marek disease virus infected chickens.
18	antibody induced loss of friend virus leukemia cell surface antigens occurs during progression of erythroleukemia in f1 mice	Antibody-induced loss of leukemic cell surface antigens from human papillomavirus; friend occurs during the progression of l' erythroleukemia in f1 mice.
18	radiation leukemia in c57bl 6 mice iii correlation of altered expression of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase to induction of leukemia	Radiation leukemia in the mouse c57bl 6 iii correlation between apos; impaired expression of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase and l' induction of leukemia.
18	activation of latent murine cytomegalovirus infection cocultivation cell transfer and the effect of immunosuppression	Activation of cocultivation of the cell; infection by latent murine cytomegalovirus and effect of the apos; immunosuppression.
18	purification of rna directed dna polymerase from mouse spleen infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Site-directed DNA polymerase from the spleen of leukemia virus infected mice.
18	effect of methotrexate on the activity of dna dependent rna polymerases a and b in the spleen of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus and on the development of virus induced leukemia	Effect of methotrexate on apos; activity of apos-dependent rna polymerases; DNA a and b in the spleen of mice infected with the leukemia virus, and on the development of viral leukemia.
18	rous sarcoma virus transformed avian cells express four different cell surface antigens that are distinguishable by a cell mediated cytotoxicity blocking test	Transformed avian cells of rous sarcoma virus express four different cell surface antigens that can be distinguished by a cell-mediated cytotoxicity blockade test.
18	suppression and enhancement of mitogen response in chickens infected with marek s disease virus and the herpesvirus of turkeys	Suppression and increase of the mitogenic response in chickens infected with Marek's disease virus (MDV); turkey herpesvirus.
18	macrophage activation during experimental murine brucellosis a basis for chronic infection	Initiation of macrophages during experimental murine brucellosis is usually delayed; origin of chronic infections.
18	neuromorphological and immunofluorescence study of experimental infection caused by the attenuated strain of tick borne encephalitis virus	Neuromorphological and immunofluorescent study of apos; experimental infection caused by attenuated strain of apos virus; tick-borne encephalitis.
18	a role for elevated h 2 antigen expression in resistance to neoplasia caused by radiation induced leukemia virus enhancement of effective tumor surveillance by killer lymphocytes	Lapses; increase in apo; expression of apo; antigen 2 in radiation-induced neoplastic resistance increases; effectiveness of tumour surveillance by killer lymphocytes.
18	demonstration of marek s disease tumor associated surface antigen in chickens infected with nononcogenic marek s disease virus and herpesvirus of turkeys	Demonstration of surface antigens associated with horse disease in chickens infected with non-cancerous horse disease virus and turkey herpesviruses.
18	characterization of phosphatidylthreonine in polyoma virus transformed fibroblasts	The fibroblasts were transformed by the characterization of phosphatidylthreonine in fibroblasts transformed by polyoma virus.
18	incapacity of hematopoietic stem cell deprived mice to produce tumor colonies induced by friend virus infected cells	Failure of hematopoietic stem cells to produce tumour colonies induced by friendly virus-infected cells impairs mouse survival.
18	cell mediated immunity to antigens associated with murine sarcoma virus induced tumors augmentation of cytolytic t lymphocyte activity by successive specific and nonspecific stimulation in vitro	L' cell-mediated immunity to the antigens associated with mouse sarcoma virus caused seizures; tumour increase in seizures; cytolytic t lymphocyte activity through specific and nonspecific sequential in vitro stimulation.
18	suppression of in vitro antibody response by spleen cells of mice infected with friend associated lymphatic leukemia virus	The suppression of the antibody response in vitro by spleen cells from friend-associated lymphatic leukemia virus infected mice.
18	antigenic properties and molecular weights of murine leukemia virus binding proteins	Antigenic properties and molecular weights of the murine leukemia virus binding proteins.
18	variations in expression of xenotropic murine leukemia virus genomes in lymphoid tissues of nzb mice	Variations in apo; expression of xenotropic murine leukemia virus genomes in nzb mouse lymphoid tissue.
18	murine antibody dependent cellular cytotoxicity to herpes simplex virus infected target cells	Cell-based mouse antibody-dependent cytotoxicity to target cells infected with the herpes simplex virus.
18	friend erythroleukemia antigen a viral antigen specified by spleen focus forming virus and differentiation antigen controlled by the fv 2 locus	L' antigen of l' friendly erythroleukemia is a viral antigen specified by the spleen concentration virus and l' differentiation antigen controlled by the locus fv 2.
18	listeria pneumonitis influence of route of immunization on resistance to airborne infection	Listeria pneumonitis influences the apos pathway; immunizations for resistance to airborne infections.
18	absence of ecotropic or recombinant murine leukaemia virus in preleukaemic and leukaemic x irradiated nzb mice	Absence of ecotropic or recombinant murine leukemia virus in irradiated, preleukemic and leukemic nzb mice x.
18	the timing of the immune response in relation to virus growth determines the outcome of the lcm infection	The timing of the immune response to viral growth determines the outcome of infection with lcm.
18	effect of bordetella pertussis vaccine on the course of lymphocytic choriomeningitis lcm virus infection in suckling mice pretreated with dianhydrodulcitol dad	Effect of Bordetella pertussis vaccine on the development of lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus lcm infection in breast-feeding mice pretreated with dianhydrodulcitol.
18	changes in hemopoiesis of mice of the c3h strain following transplantation of gardner lymphosarcoma and infection with ldh virus i circulating blood	Changes in the liver; hemopoiesis in mice of the c3h strain following the transplantation of Gardner lymphosarcoma and l' circulating blood ldhi virus infection.
18	antibody induced modulation of friend virus cell surface antigens decreases virus production by persistent erythroleukemia cells influence of the rfv 3 gene	Antibody-induced modulation of the viral surface antigens of the virus reduces virus production by persistent erythroleukemia cells under the influence of the rfv3 gene.
18	fv 2 locus controls expression of friend spleen focus forming virus specific sequences in normal and infected mice	The fv 2 locus controls the expression of virus-specific sequences that form the nucleus of the spleen in normal and infected mice.
18	induction of virus specific and h 2 restricted cytotoxic t cells by uv inactivated murine cytomegalovirus	L' induction of virus-specific cytotoxic t-cells and h2 cells by mouse cytomegalovirus inactivated by apos; uv inhibited cytotoxic t-cell production.
18	quantitative changes in the cellular makeup of the spleen in mice infected with the rauscher leukemia virus and brucella abortus	Quantitative changes in spleen cell composition in mice infected with leukemia rauscher virus and brucella abortus.
18	the role of the spleen in tumor growth kinetics of the murine b cell leukemia bcl1	The role of the spleen in the kinetics of tumor growth of bcl1 murine b-cell leukemia.
18	expression of fv 4r allele in hematopoietic cells from g mice resistant to friend leukemia virus	Expression of apo; fv 4r alleles in hematopoietic cells of amic leukemia virus resistant g mice.
18	further characterization of the polyoma virus y8e from a rauscher leukaemia virus producing mouse cell line and detection of partial sequence homology between polyoma virus y8edna and hamster papovavirus dna	Further characterization of y8e polyoma virus from apos; leukemia-producing mouse cell line and apos detection; partial sequence homology between y8edna polyoma virus and apos; hamster papovavirus DNA.
18	pathogenicity of mengo virus to mice iii potentiation of infection by immunosuppressants	Pathogenicity of mengo virus infection to mice iii potentiation of apos; immunosuppressive infection.
18	experimental infection of broiler and leghorn chickens with virulent and avirulent isolates of hemorrhagic enteritis virus	Infection of broilers and leghorn chickens with virulent and avirulent isolates of the virus of l'apos; hemorrhagic enteritis.
18	inhibition of in vitro friend murine leukemia virus infection of lipopolysaccharide activated b cells with concanavalin a	Lapos; inhibition of apos; murine leukemia virus infection in vitro of lipopolysaccharide-activated cells b with concanavalin a.
18	properties of dna dependent rna polymerase from spleens of mice infected with rauscher leukemic virus	Cell-mediated rna polymerase properties; DNA from mouse spleens infected with the leukemic virus.
18	characterization of a friend virus replicating target cell	Characterization of apos; a friendly virus replicating the target cell.
19	inactivations of oxytocin suggesting peptide denaturation	Inactivations of ocytocin suggesting peptide denaturation.
19	inheritance of a serum protein in swine	Heredity of apos; serum protein in pigs.
19	porcine contagious pleuropneumonia i experimental transmission etiology and pathology	Infectious swine pleuropneumonia i experimental etiology of transmission and pathology.
19	porcine contagious pleuropneumonia ii studies of the pathogenicity of the etiological agent hemophilus pleuropneumoniae	Pleuropneumonia contagieuse porcine ii studies of the pathogenicity of l' etiological agent hemophilus pleuropneumoniae.
19	the presence of renin activity in blood vessel walls	Renin activity in blood vessel walls is indicative of the presence of apos; it is renin activity.
19	studies on human antibodies ii distribution of genetic factors	Anti-anti-anti-anti-anti-human anti-antibody studies, distribution of genetic factors.
19	parathion activation by livers of aquatic and terrestrial vertebrates	L' hepatic activation of parathion in aquatic and terrestrial vertebrates.
19	powassan virus summer infection cycle 1964	Powassan virus, cycle d'apos; summer infection, 1964.
19	an attenuated mutant of japanese encephalitis virus	An attenuated Japanese encephalitis virus mutant.
19	research on ascariasis immunity and immunodiagnosis	Vaccine apo; ascariatic immunity and apo; immunodiagnosis.
19	allosteric properties of glutamate dehydrogenases from different sources	Allosteric properties of glutamate dehydrogenases from a variety of sources.
19	characteristics of clostridium perfringens strains associated with food and food borne disease	Characteristics of strains of clostridium perfringens associated with disease; food and food origin.
19	chemically defined medium for some microaerophilic vibrios	Chemically defined medium for some of the microaerophilic vibrios.
19	effect on the white rat uterus of a toxic substance isolated from fusarium	Effect on the uterus of the white rat, a toxic substance isolated from the fusarium.
19	serum fractions inhibitory to the growth of leptospires	Leptospore growth was inhibited by serum fractions.
19	thyrocalcitonin hypocalcemic hypophosphatemic principle of the thyroid gland	The principle of l' thyroid hypocalcemic hypocitoninemia.
19	comparison of the bactericidal activity of different vertebrate sera	Comparison of l' bactericidal activity of different vertebrate sera.
19	inhibitors of histamine catabolism and the action of gastrin in the rat	Inhibitors of the catabolism of histamine and l' action of gastrin in rats.
19	hog cholera v demonstration of the antigen in swine tissues by the fluorescent antibody technique	Cholera du porc v demonstration of antigen in pig tissue using the technique of fluorescent antibodies.
19	the physiopathological changes in synovial fluid in arthritic swine	The pathophysiological changes in synovial fluid in arthritic pigs.
19	observations on a swine herd health program	Comments on a program for the health of swine herds.
19	bone density measurements in vivo improvement of x ray densitometry	In vivo bone density measurements improved x-ray densitometry.
19	hog cholera iv detection of the virus in tissue culture preparations by the fluorescent antibody technique	Hog cholera iv virus detection in tissue culture preparations by the fluorescent antibody technique.
19	minor proteases in the stomach of the pig	Minor proteases are found in the pig stomach.
19	studies on human antibodies iv purification and properties of anti a and anti b obtained by absorption and elution from insoluble blood group substances	Human antibody studies iv purification and properties of anti-a and anti-b obtained by absorption and elution from insoluble blood-group materials.
19	characterization of the renin antirenin system	Characterization of antirenin system of renin.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs ii the immune response	Apos studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs immune response.
19	thyrocalcitonin cytological localization by immunofluorescence	Cytological localization of thyrocalcitonin by immunofluorescence.
19	isolation of salmonellae by selective motility systems	Salmonella isolation by selective motility systems.
19	piglet birthweights and the order of farrowing	Piglet weight at birth and shoot order.
19	plaque formation by teschen disease virus and the effect of certain associated factors	Plaque formation by testicular disease virus and its associated factors.
19	studies on transmissible gastroenteritis of swine ii selected characteristics of a cytopathogenic virus common to five isolates from transmissible gastroenteritis	Studies of Gastro-transmissible swine enteritis ii Selected characteristics d' a cytopathogenic virus common to five isolates of gastro-transmissible enteritis.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs i experimental reproduction of colibacillosis	Apo studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs; experimental reproduction of colibacillosis.
19	gel filtration applied to the study of lipases and other esterases	Gel filtration treatment applied to the apos; study of lipases and other esterases.
19	an antiviral substance from penicillium funiculosum vi prevention of the establishment of passive immunity to semliki forest virus infection in mice by helenine	An antiviral substance of penicillium funiculosum vi prevents seizures; establishment of seizures; passive immunity to seizures; semikinous forest virus infection in mice; helenin.
19	metabolism of d glucuronolactone in mammalian systems inhibitory properties of the products of d glucuronolactone dehydrogenase action	Metabolism of glucuronolactone d in mammalian systems, inhibitory properties of lacid products; action of glucuronolactone dehydrogenase d.
19	mechanism of action and some properties of a tissue activator of plasminogen	Mechanism of action and some properties of a plasminogen tissue activator.
19	autochthonous intestinal bacterial flora and cholesterol levels in specific pathogen free swine fed high lipid and high sucrose diets	The autochthonous bacterial flora and cholesterol levels in apo-free pigs; specific pathogens were fed high fat and sucrose diets.
19	mycoplasma latex agglutination reaction	D&apos reaction; latex agglutination of the mycoplasma.
19	leptospiral selection growth and virulence in synthetic medium	Growth and virulence of leptospiral selection in synthetic medium.
19	role of differential air pressure zones in the control of aerosols in a large animal isolation facility	Role of air pressure zones; differential air pressure in aerosol control in an aerosol plant; isolation of large animals.
19	movement of lipids into and out of the blood during hyperlipidemia induced in rabbits by pituitary extract and fraction h	Lipid movement at the apos; interior and exterior; external blood flow during apos; hyperlipidemia induced in rabbits by apos; pituitary extract and fraction h.
19	decarboxylation of 2 keto fatty acids by brain	Brain decarboxylation of 2 keto fatty acids.
19	a soluble precipitating antigen hca from hog cholera virus propagated in tissue culture ii incidence of hca antibodies in sera of hog cholera immune and nonimmune swine	Porcine cholera virus soluble precipitating hca antigen spreads in tissue cultures ii incidence of hca antibodies in immune and nonimmune porcine cholera sera.
19	some observations on the penetration of antibiotics through mucus in vitro	Here are some observations on antibiotic penetration into mucus in vitro.
19	studies on the content of antibodies for equine influenza viruses in human sera	Studies on the content of antibodies to the viruses of the equine virus in human sera.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs clinical studies and preliminary transmission trials	Exudative epidermitis in swine clinical studies and transmission trials.
19	some observations on the diagnosis and epidemiology of leptospirosis in swine	Some observations on the epidemiology of leptospirosis in swine.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs 3 evaluation of orally administered specific antisera	Dosage studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic swine 3 assessment of specific oral antisera.
19	screening test of animal sera for the cultivation of leptospires	Serum screening test for leptospirae culture animals.
19	leucine aminopeptidase in extracts of swine muscle	Leucine aminopeptidase in pig muscle extracts.
19	the intestinal absorption of pig and bovine immune lactoglobulin and human serum albumin by the new born pig	Lapos; intestinal absorption of lactoglobulin and dapos; human bovine and porcine immune serum albumin by the new-ne porcine.
19	powassan virus persistence of virus activity during 1966	Powassan virus, persistence of apos; viral activity in 1966.
19	the response of colostrum deprived specific pathogen free pigs to experimental infection with teschen disease virus	The response of the colostrum deprived free-living disease-specific pathogens of the testes of an experimental virus infection.
19	the isolation of hyaluronic acid and chondroitin sulphate from kidneys and their reaction with urinary hyaluronidase	L' isolation of the hyaluronic acid and chondroitin sulfate of the kidneys and their reaction with the apos; urinary hyaluronidase.
19	the immune response to a hybrid protein molecule specificity of secondary stimulation and of tolerance induction	The immune response to the specificity of a protein molecule hybrid of secondary stimulation and d' induction of tolerance.
19	toxicity to rats of corn invaded by chaetomium globosum	Toxicity to corn-based rats invaded by chaetomium globosum.
19	group q streptococci i ecology serology physiology and relationship to established enterococci	Group q streptococci i serological physiology and relationship to established enterococci.
19	alkaline and acid phosphatase activity ph and osmotic pressure of boar semen	Alkaline phosphatase and ph-acid activity and osmotic pressure of wild boar sperm.
19	a study of procine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the toronto area i isolation and serological grouping of viruses	A study of procinative enteroviruses isolated from swine in the Toronto area and the serologic clustering of viruses.
19	positional distribution of isomers of monoenoic fatty acids in animal glycerolipids	The positional distribution of monoenoic fatty acid isomers in the animal glycerolipids.
19	pepsinogen c and pepsin c further purification and amino acid composition	Pepsinogen c and pepsin c further purification and amino acid composition.
19	the requirement for bivalent cations in formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by nicotinamide mononucleotide adenylyltransferase of pig liver nuclei	The need for divalent cations in the formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by nicotinamide mononucleotide adenyltransferase from the hepatic nuclei of pigs.
19	histidine sequences in the active centres of some serine proteinases	Sequences of histidine in the serine proteinase active centers.
19	kinetic studies with liver galactokinase	Kinetic studies with galactokinase in the liver.
19	further observations on the significance of a equine 2 63 antibodies in man	D' other observations on the meaning of equine 263 antibody in men.
19	experimental sprue like small intestinal lesions in pigs	Experimental sprout like intestinal lesions in pigs.
19	water retention in the carcasses of pigs and lambs treated with diazoxide	Conservation of vegetables; diazoxide-treated lambs; water in hog and sheep carcasses.
19	propagation of porcine cytomegalic inclusion disease virus in cell cultures preliminary report	Spread of disease virus of apos; porcine cytomegalic inclusion in cell cultures preliminary report.
19	boar semen studies i laboratory evaluation of processing phases	Studies of wild boar semen i laboratory evaluation of the treatment phases.
19	a study of porcine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the toronto area ii characterization of the viruses as members of the picornavirus group	A study of porcine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the Toronto area ii characterized the viruses as picornavirus.
19	the antigenic determinants of the protein polysaccharides of cartilage	Antigenic determinants of protein polysaccharides in cartilage.
19	blood groups of the i system in pigs association with variants of serum amylase	In pigs, blood groups in the system are associated with serum amylase variants.
19	the reproductive tract of the porcine female a biometrical study	L' reproductive apparatus of the female pig a biometric study.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs etiological studies and pathology	Exudative epidermitis in porcine etiological and pathological studies.
19	thyrocalcitonin ultracentrifugation in gradients of sucrose	Ultracentrifugation of thyrocalcitonin in sucrose gradients.
19	synthesis of ribonucleic acid in normal bone in vitro	Synthesis of the apos; ribonucleic acid in the apos; normal bone in vitro.
19	african swine fever i antiserum production	African swine fever and the production of antisera.
19	malabsorption of hemoglobin iron in pernicious anemia correction with intrinsic factor containing substances	Iron deficiency in apo; hemoglobin in pernicious correction of apo; anemia with intrinsic substance-containing factor.
19	studies on the biosynthesis of 16 dehydro steroids the metabolism of 4 14c pregnenolone by boar adrenal and testis tissue in vitro	Studies of the biosynthesis of 16 steroids dehydroxed the metabolism of 4c pregnenolone by adrenal boar and testicular tissue in vitro.
19	african swine fever iv demonstration of the viral antigen by means of immunofluorescence	African swine fever iv demonstration of immunofluorescent viral antigen.
19	african swine fever v cultivation of the virus in primary pig kidney cells	African swine fever against culture of virus in primary cells of swine kidney.
19	isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from liver	Isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase of the liver.
19	boar semen studies ii laboratory and fertility results of a method for deep freezing	Semen studies of wild boar ii Laboratory results and fertility d' a method of deep freezing.
19	comparison of pathogenicity of various isolates of bordetella bronchiseptica in young pigs	Comparison of pathogenicity of various Bordetella bronchiseptica isolates in young swine.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs bacteriological studies on the causative agent	Exudative Epidermitis in Pigs Bacteriological studies on the causative agent.
19	effect of heating cooling the hypothalamus on behavioral thermoregulation in the pig	Cooling heat effect of the apos; hypothalamus on behavioral thermoregulation in pigs.
19	a simple method for the isolation of adrenal chromaffin granules on a large scale	A simple method to isolate adrenal chromaffin granules on a large scale.
19	the proteins and protein bound carbohydrates of the serum of the developing pig	Proteins and carbohydrates bound to developing pig serum proteins.
19	a viral gastroenteritis of ontario swine 1 clinical illness and recovery of the virus	Gastro-Ontario swine viral enteritis 1 clinical illness and recovery of virus.
19	experimental hemorrhagic septicemia gross and microscopic lesions resulting from acute infections and from endotoxin administration	Experimental hemorrhagic septicaemia, macroscopic and microscopic lesions resulting from acute infection and lupus; administration of endotoxins.
19	effect of urokinase antiserum on plasminogen activators demonstration of immunologic dissimilarity between plasma plasminogen activator and urokinase	The effects of apos; antiserum urokinase on plasminogen activators demonstrated an immunological difference between apos; plasma plasminogen activator and apos; and urokinase.
19	hyperpyrexia during anaesthesia	Hyperpyrexia, during anesthesia.
19	lectins in extracts of certain polygonaceae seed precipitate animal and human serums	Lectins in the extracts of some polygonaceous seeds precipitate animal and human sera.
19	drug resistance of enteric bacteria 13 distribution of r factors in escherichia coli strains isolated from livestock	Enterobacterial drug resistance 13 Distribution of r factors in strains of escherichia coli isolated from cattle.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs iv comparison of enteropathogenic and nonenteropathogenic strains	Studies of apo; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs iv comparison of enteric and non-enteropathogenic strains iv.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs v evaluation of the effects of oral and parenteral administration of immune serum	Immunologic studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic swine; evaluation of the effects of oral and parenteral antibody therapy; immune serum.
19	further studies on the use of nicotine to promote leanness in pigs	D' other studies on apos; use of nicotine to promote weight loss in pigs.
19	studies on transmissible gastroenteritis of swine 3 the effect of selective inhibitors of viral replication on a cytopathogenic virus from transmissible gastroenteritis	Gastro @-@transmissible swine enteritis studies 3 weeks; effect of viral replication inhibitors; selective viral replication inhibitors on a transmissible cytopathogenic gastroenteritis virus.
19	evidence for the presence of 16 alpha hydroxypregn 4 ene 3 20 dione in adrenal venous blood of young pigs	Evidence for 16 alpha hydroxypregn 4 ene 320 dione in adrenal venous blood of young swine.
19	the effect of acetylsalicyclic acid on platelet function	L' effect of apos; acetylsalicyclic acid on platelet function.
19	comparative studies of atherosclerosis in swine	Comparative studies of apos; atherosclerosis in swine.
19	purification of rabbit kidney cytokinase and a comparison of its properties with human urokinase	Purification of rabbit kidney cytokinase activity and comparison of its properties with those of human urokinase.
19	the purification of 3 3 dimethylallyl and geranyl transferase and of isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from pig liver	Purification of 3 dimethylallyl and geranyl transferase and isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from pig liver.
19	calcitonin from ultimobranchial glands of dogfish and chickens	Calcitonin of the ultimobranch glands of chicken and dog meat.
19	simplified presumptive tests for carbohydrate hydrolyzing enzymes	Simplified presumptive tests for carbohydrate hydrolysing enzymes.
19	pathogenicity of vibrio coli for swine i experimental infection of gnotobiotic pigs with vibrio coli	Pathogenicity of vibrio coli to experimental infection of gnotobiotic swine with vibrio coli.
19	pathogenicity of vibrio coli for swine ii experimental infection of conventional pigs with vibrio coli	Vibrio coli Pathogenicity in Swine Products ii Experimental infection of conventional swine with vibrio coli.
19	enzootic pneumonia of pigs complement fixation tests for the detection of mycoplasma antibodies in the serum of immunized rabbits and infected swine	Enzootic swine pneumonia complements binding tests for detection of mycoplasma antibodies in serum from immunized rabbits and infected swine.
19	diagnosis of transmissible gastroenteritis in pigs by means of immunofluorescence	Gastro diagnosis-transmissible pig enteritis by immunofluorescence.
19	changes in erythrocyte sedimentation rate and serum proteins during experimentally produced erysipelatous arthritis in swine	Changes in sedimentation rates of erythrocytes and serum proteins over the course of the experiment resulted in eerysipatic arthritis in swine.
19	a serological survey for brucellosis in canadian swine	Serological study of brucellosis in Canadian swine.
19	the distribution of monoamine oxidase and alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in pig brain	The distribution of monoamine oxidase and alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in the pig brain.
19	the purification and concentration of hog cholear virus with electron micrographs a preliminary note	Purification and concentration of the swine cholear virus with electronic micrographs a preliminary note.
19	plaque morphology of teschen disease viruses and certain pig enteroviruses in primary pig kidney monolayer cultures	Morphology of the range of testis disease virus and certain porcine enteroviruses in primary monolayer cultures of swine kidney.
19	a serological survey of sera from domestic animals on easter island	Serological study of seros; domestic animals on the island of l'apos; Est.
19	deoxycytidine and radiation response exceedingly high deoxycytidine aminohydrolase activity in human liver	L' deoxycytidine aminohydrolase activity in human liver is excessively high in response to deoxycytidine and to radiation.
19	nicotine hydrogen tartrate effect on essential fatty acid deficiency in mature pigs	Effect of d'apos tartrate; nicotine hydrogen on essential fatty acid deficiency in mature pigs.
19	experimental appraisal of factors involved in provision of donor livers	Experimental evaluation; evaluation of risks; evaluation of factors involved in donation; evolution of liver production from donor liver donors.
19	interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharide generation of a factor chemotactic for polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Interactions of the complement system with the production of endotoxic d&apos lipopolysaccharides; a chemotactic factor for polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
19	vaccinia virus infection of synchronized pig kidney cells	Vaccine virus infection of pig synchronized renal cells.
19	comparative studies of antigens from mycoplasma mycoides and escherichia coli	Comparative studies of mycoplasma mycoides and d' escherichia coli antigens.
19	iron metabolism in copper deficient swine	Iron metabolism in copper-deficient pigs.
19	adrenal secretion rates and adrenal tissue concentrations of pregnenolone progesterone 11 beta oh androstenedione and some other steroids in young pigs and dogs	Adrenal secretion rates and concentrations of progesterone pregnenolone 11 beta oh androstenedione and d' other adrenal tissue steroids in young pigs and dogs.
19	the uptake of plasma constituents by the mammary gland of the sow	L' absorption of plasma components by the sow's mammary gland.
19	the action of cyanate on human and pig kidney alkaline phosphatases	Cyanate action on human and pig kidney alkaline phosphatases.
19	beta d glucosidases and related enzymic activities in pig kidney	Beta of glucosidases and related enzymatic activities in the kidney of a pig.
19	negligible release of cardiolipin during milk secretion by the ruminant	Negligible release of cardiolipin during ruminant milk secretion.
19	kinetics of the reaction of renin with nine synthetic peptide substrates	The kinetics of the renin reaction with nine synthetic peptide substrates.
19	the pyrophosphatase activity of pig kidney alkaline phosphatase and its inhibition by magnesium ions and excess of pyrophosphate	L' pyrophosphatase activity of the pig kidney alkaline phosphatase and its inhibition by magnesium ions and l' excess pyrophosphate.
19	enzootic pneumonia in pigs propagation of a causative mycoplasma in cell cultures and in artificial medium	Enzootic pneumonia in swine spread of a causal mycoplasma in cell cultures and artificial medium.
19	lesions of the gastrointestinal tract of pigs infected with transmissible gastroenteritis	Damage to the gastro tract-intestinal of pigs infected by a transmissible gastro-entéritis.
19	the histopathological changes in the skin of pigs with dermatosis vegetans	Histopathological changes in the skin of pigs with dermatological plant dermatosis.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis of swine in ontario	Gastro-Transmissible Pork Enthusiast in Ontario.
19	an attempt to experimentally produce edema disease in swine by oral administration of escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1	Experimental production attempt; swine edemata by oral administration of apos; escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1 by oral administration.
19	attempts to produce experimental edema disease in swine by parenterally injecting escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1	Tests for the production of experimental swine eggs by parenteral injection into swine; escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1.
19	synthesis of 10 11 dihydrofarnesyl pyrophosphate from 6 7 dihydrogeranyl pyrophosphate by prenyltransferase	Synthesis of 10 11 dihydrofarnesyl pyrophosphate from 67 dihydrogeranyl pyrophosphate by the prenyltransferase.
19	analogues of geranyl pyrophosphate as inhibitors of prenyltransferase	Analogs of geranyl pyrophosphate as a selective inhibitor of the prenyltransferase.
19	physiological and serological comparisons among strains of mycoplasma granularum and mycoplasma laidlawii	Physiological and serological comparisons between mycoplasma granularum and mycoplasma laidlawii strains.
19	detection by hemagglutination of antibodies to group a and group e streptococci by the use of o stearoyl derivatives of their cell wall carbohydrate grouping antigens	Antibody detection by hemagglutination for group a and group e streptococci using o stearoyl derivatives of their antigen-grouping cell carbohydrates.
19	trichinosis in south west ireland	Trichinose in the south-west of l' Ireland.
19	virus of the 1918 influenza pandemic era new evidence about its antigenic character	Flu Virus 1918 pandemic influenza era with new evidence of its antigenic nature.
19	the comparative structure of mammalian glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenases	Comparison of structure of 3 mammalian glyceraldehyde phosphate dehydrogenases.
19	fauna of catal h y k evidence for early cattle domestication in anatolia	The fauna of the catal h y k is an indication of the early domestication of cattle in anatolia.
19	triglyceride synthesis by the small intestinal epithelium of the pig sheep and chicken	Triglyceride synthesis by apos; epithelium of apos; small intestine of hog sheep and chicken.
19	assay of the possible organization of particle bound enzymes with squalene synthetase and squalene oxidocyclase systems	Possible organization of particle-bound enzymes with squalene synthetase and squalene oxidocyclase systems.
19	mycoplasma taxonomy studiedy electrophoresis of cell proteins	Mycoplasma taxonomy studied cell protein immunos; electrophoresis.
19	renal fructose metabolizing enzymes significance in hereditary fructose intolerance	Renal fructose-metabolizing enzymes are important in the hereditary fructose intolerance.
19	characterization of a human serum inhibitor of clostridium histolyticum proteinase s	A proteinase inhibitor is a human serum proteinase inhibitor of Clostridium histolyticum s.
19	the biosynthesis of some androst 16 enes from c21 and c19 steroids in boar testicular and adrenal tissue	The biosynthesis of certain androst 16 ene species from c21 and c19 steroids in wild boar testicular and adrenal tissues.
19	porcine lactic dehydrogenase in the serum of patients treated by extracorporeal porcine liver perfusion	Swine lactic dehydrogenase in the serum of pork liver extracorporeal infusion patients.
19	preparation and some properties of l 3 glycerophosphate dehydrogenase from pig brain mitochondria	Preparation and some properties of the glycerophosphate dehydrogenase l-3 of pig brain mitochondria.
19	early stages of intestinal absorption of specific antibiodies in the newborn an ultrastructural cytochemical and immunological study in the pig rat and rabbit	The early stages of the disease; intestinal absorption; specific antibodies in the new@-@born, an ultrastructural cytochemical and immunological study in the porcine rat and rabbit.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs vi effects of feeding bacteria free filtrates of broth cultures	Apos study; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs; effects of apos; free-filtration feeding of bacteria from cultures in broth.
19	glasser s disease of swine produced by the intracheal inoculation of haemophilus suis	Sliding sickness in pigs caused by apos; intracheal inoculation of apos; haemophilus suis.
19	arbovirus plaquing in a clonal line ps y 15 of porcine kidney	Plated Arbovirus in a ps y 15 clonal line of pig kidney.
19	induction in vitro of microtubular crystals by vinca alkaloids	In vitro, l' induction of microtubular crystals by vinca alkaloids.
19	vinblastine induced precipitation of microtubule protein	Vinblastine induced the precipitation of microtubular protein.
19	control of the citric acid cycle by glyoxylate the mechanism of inhibition of oxoglutarate dehydrogenase isocitrate dehydrogenase and aconitate hydratase	Control of the cycle of the apos; citric acid by glyoxylate the mechanism of the apos; inhibition of the apos; oxoglutarate dehydrogenase isocitrate dehydrogenase and of the apos; aconitate hydratase.
19	specificity in the assembly of multisubunit proteins	Specificity in the appos; multi-protein assembly-under-units.
19	fractionation of phytohemagglutinin i purification of the rna and dna synthesis stimulating substances and evidence that they are not proteins	Fractionation of the phytohemagglutinin i purification of the synthesis of rna and apos; stimulant DNA substances and proof that they are not proteins.
19	incidence of salmonellae in meat and meat products	Effect of the presence of Salmonella in meat and meat products.
19	artificial substrates for prenyltransferase	Artificial substrates for the prenyltransferase.
19	studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage heterogeneity fractionation and characterization	Studies of protein polysaccharides from fractionation and characterization of the laryngeal cartilage; heterogeneity of the laryngeal cartilage of the pig.
19	biosynthesis of the fungal estrogen f 2 and a naturally occurring derivative f 3 by fusarium moniliforme	Biosynthesis of apo; estrogen f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f 3 f f moniliform fusarium moniliform.
19	evaluation of culture media for the isolation of salmonellae from feces	Assessment of culture media for salmonella isolation from the faeces.
19	radiation sterilization of prototype military foods 3 pork loin	Apos prototypes are irradiated sterilization; military foods 3 pork loin.
19	studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage extraction and purification	Studies on protein polysaccharides from the extraction and purification of the laryngeal cartilage of pigs.
19	aflatoxin production in meats i stored meats	Production of apos; aflatoxin in stored meats.
19	country cured ham as a possible source of aflatoxin	The dried country ham could be a source of apos; aflatoxin.
19	an immunological approach to the study of evolution of trypsins	An immunological approach to the immune system; study of the immune system; evolution of the trypsins.
19	transferable drug resistance among enterobacteriaceae isolated from cases of neonatal diarrhea in calves and piglets	Drug resistance transferable in enteric bacteria isolated from neonatal diarrhea in calves and piglets.
19	the rate of molecular evolution considered from the standpoint of population genetics	Rate of death; molecular evolution of the rate of death; molecular evolution of death; molecular evolution from the perspective of genetic genetic genetic engineering of the population of the population of genetic engineering of the population of the population of genetic engineering; rate of death; molecular evolution of the population of genetic engineering; molecular evolution of the population of genetic engineering; molecular evolution of the population of genetic engineering.
19	the assay of gastrin using the perfused rat stomach	Gastrin dosage at baseline; aid of perfused rat stomach.
19	autolytic changes in the digestive system of germfree escherichia coli monocontaminated and conventional baby pigs	Autolytic changes in the digestive system of monocontaminated germfree escherichia coli and traditional baby pigs.
19	the electrocardiogram of conventional and miniature swine sus scrofa	L' classical pork electrocardiogram and miniature pork on a scrofa.
19	strontium 90 effects of chronic ingestion on farrowing performance of miniature swine	The effects of apos; chronic ingestion of strontium 90 on the calving performance of miniature pigs.
19	scanning electron microscopy of cells	Scanning electron microscopy of cells.
19	esterolytic activity of elastase	Esterolytic activity of apos; elastase.
19	the effects of in utero viral infection on embryonic fetal and neonatal survival a comparison of smedi porcine picorna viruses with hog cholera vaccinal virus	The effects of in utero viral infection on fetal and neonatal embryonic survival were compared between smedi porcine picorna virus and porcine cholera vaccine virus.
19	the isolation of three neurophysins from porcine posterior pituitary lobes	L' isolation of three porcine posterior lobe neurophysins; pituitary gland.
19	the antibody response in pigs inoculated with attenuated african swine fever virus	The immune response in pigs inoculated with the attenuated African swine fever virus.
19	antibody development in pigs inoculated with live or killed cultures of brucella abortus	In addition, it is possible to develop antibodies in pigs that are inoculated with live or killed cultures of brucella abortus.
19	the purification and concentration of hog cholera virus	Purification and concentration of swine cholera virus.
19	experimental enteric colibacillosis in piglets	Experimental enteric colibacillosis in the piglets.
19	purification and properties of 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase from sheep liver	The purification and properties of the sheep liver 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase product.
19	some properties of cytochrome b5 from liver microsomes of man monkey pig and chicken	Some properties of cytochrome b5 of hepatic microsomes of swine and human monkey chicks.
19	vitamin a and carotenoids the enzymic conversion of beta carotene into retinal in hog intestinal mucosa	Vitamin a and carotenoids enzymatic conversion of beta carotene to retinal in the intestinal mucosa of pigs.
19	characterization of protein polysaccharides of articular cartilage from mature and immature pigs	Characterization of protein polysaccharides in articular cartilage of mature and immature pigs.
19	acid soluble phosphorus compounds in mammalian semen	"""Soluble acid phosphorus compounds in mammalian semen"", Environ."
19	action of bacterial growth on the sarcoplasmic and urea soluble proteins from muscle i effects of clostridium perfringens salmonella enteritidis achromobacter liquefaciens streptococcus faecalis and kurthia zopfi	Action of bacterial growth on sarcoplasmic and lipid-soluble proteins; urea of the muscle effects of clostridium perfringens salmonella enteritidis achromobacter liquefaciens streptococcus faecalis and kurthia zopfi.
19	growth and development of competence in the group h streptococci	Growth and competency development in h streptococci group.
19	studies on the 1967 8 foot and mouth disease epidemic the relation of weather to the spread of disease	Foot-and-mouth disease epidemic of 1967, the relationship between weather conditions and the spread of the disease.
19	vibrio enterotoxin in miniature pigs	"""Vibrio enterotoxin in miniature pigs"": a review."
19	transmissible gastroenteritis tge of swine the possible role of dogs in the epizootiology of tge	Gastro @-@transmissible enteritis in swine The possible role of dogs in swine gastroenteritis; gastrointestinal epizootiology.
19	immunological relationships between the neuraminidases of human and animal influenza viruses	Immunological relationships between human and animal influenza viral neuraminidases.
19	correlation of bedrock type with the geography of leptospirosis	Correlation between mother-rock type and leptospirosis geography.
19	a stable l form of haemophilus pleuropneumoniae	Stable form of pleuropneumoniae hemophilus.
19	interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharides in immunoglobulin deficient sera	Interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharides in immunoglobulin-deficient sera.
19	native human parathyroid hormone an immunochemical investigation	The indigenous human parathyroid hormone is an immunochemical investigation.
19	proteins of the group b arbovirus kunjin	Proteins of the kunjin kunjin b-arbovirus group.
19	coronary aortic and cerebral atherosclerosis in swine of 3 age groups implications	Lapses; atherosclerosis of the coronary aorta and brain in pigs of 3 groups; age implies implications.
19	the isolation identification and synthesis of two metabolites of guanethidine formed in pig and rabbit liver homogenates	Two guanethidine metabolites formed in pig and rabbit liver homogenates were identified and synthesized.
19	a collaborative study of heparins from different sources	A joint study of heparins from different sources.
19	the biosynthesis of androst 16 enes in boar testis tissue	The biosynthesis of the 16 yenes of androst in the testis of wild boar.
19	preliminary report on the development of a diffusion in gel method for the diagnosis of ram epididymitis	The results of the study are presented in Appendix A. Preliminary report on the development of a gel diffusion method for the diagnosis of sheep epididymitis.
19	effects of glucagon dibutyryl cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate and theophylline on calcitonin secretion in vitro	Effects of cyclic dibutyryl glucagon 3-5 adenosine monophosphate and theophylline on calcitonin secretion in vitro.
19	polymerizing equilibria in neurophysin	Polymerization of the equilibria in neurophysin.
19	method for eliminating anticomplementary activity in animal sera	Methods of detection; elimination of parasites; anti-competing activity in animal sera.
19	crystalline 3 phosphoglycerate kinase from skeletal muscle	Skeletal muscle crystalline 3 phosphoglycerate kinase.
19	some properties of the microsomal 2 3 oxidosqualene sterol cyclase	Some microsomal 2-3 oxidosqualene sterol cyclase properties.
19	r factor transmission in vivo	Transmission of r factor in vivo.
19	a reinvestigation of the substrate specificity of pig kidney diamine oxidase	A new study of the substrate specificity of pig kidney diamine oxidase was carried out.
19	the role of ceruloplasmin in iron metabolism	Role of ceruloplasmin in iron metabolism.
19	amino acid sequences around the disulphide bridges and methionine residues of porcine pepsin	D&apos sequences; amino acids around the disulfide bridges and porcine pepsin methionine residues.
19	variations in the ecology of glossina spp with special reference to nigerian populations of glossina tachinoides	Variations in the ecology of glossina spp., especially in Nigerian glossina tachinoide populations.
19	the absorption of polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the new born pig intestine	L' absorption of polyvinyl pyrrolidone by new intestine of born pig.
19	experimental immunization of sows with cell cultured tge virus	L' immunization experimentally of sows with cell-grown virus tge.
19	effect of rye ergot on growth and n retention in growing pigs	The effect of rye fertilization on growth and retention in swine.
19	response of gnotobiotic pigs to escherichia coli	Gnotobiotic swine reaction to acid; escherichia coli.
19	somatic antigens of streptococcus group e i comparison of extraction techniques	Somatic antigen of group Streptococcus spp. and comparison of extraction techniques.
19	carboxyl terminal residues of mammalian fibrinogen and fibrin	Terminal mammalian fibrinogen and fibrinogen carboxyl residues.
19	number and types of peptide chains in thyroglobulin tryptic peptides of noniodinated hog thyroglobulin	Number and types of peptide chains in thyroglobulin tryptic peptides from non-iodinated pigs.
19	experimental infection of weanling pigs with a swine influenza virus i epidemiology and serological response	Experimental infection of weaned pigs with swine influenza virus infection i epidemiology and serologic response.
19	experimental infection of weanling pigs with a swine influenza virus 3 immunity in piglets farrowed by antibody bearing dams experimentally infected a year earlier	Experimental infection of weanlings with immunity to swine influenza virus 3 in pigs reared by pregnant mothers experimentally infected 1 year earlier.
19	purification and properties of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent isocitrate dehydrogenase from pig liver cytoplasm	Purification and properties of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent on the isos; isocitrate dehydrogenase of pig liver cytoplasm.
19	nuclear membranes from mammalian liver i isolation procedure and general characterization	Nuclear membranes of mammalian liver, isolation and general characterization.
19	nuclear membranes from mammalian liver ii lipid composition	Nuclear membranes of mammalian liver lipid composition ii.
19	oxychlordane animal metabolite of chlordane isolation and synthesis	An animal metabolite oxychlordane; isolation and synthesis of chlordane.
19	the action of certain antibiotics and ether on swine enzootic pneumonia	Antibiotic action of certain antibiotics and of the ether on swine enzootic pneumonia.
19	the effect of rotor velocity on sedimentation coefficients	L' effect of rotor speed on sedimentation coefficients.
19	radioreceptor assay of adrenocorticotropic hormone new approach to assay of polypeptide hormones in plasma	Apo radioreceptor assay; new approach to adrenocorticotropic hormone; polypeptide hormone test in plasma.
19	quantitation of the antigenicity and immunogenicity of purified foot and mouth disease virus vaccine for swine and steers	Quantification of foot-and-mouth disease; antigenicity and immunogenicity of purified FMD vaccine in swine and steers.
19	distribution of bacteria in feces of swine	Spread of bacteria in swine feces.
19	comparison of two plating media for detection of salmonella from swine tissues	Comparison of two culture media for the detection of salmonellae in swine tissues.
19	a research standard for human serum immunoglobulins igg iga and igm	A research standard for human serum immunoglobulins, igg iga and igm igg igm.
19	polypeptide with broad biological activity isolation from small intestine	Polypeptide with broad biological activity and isolated from the intestine; small intestine.
19	gonadotropin releasing hormone one polypeptide regulates secretion of luteinizing and follicle stimulating hormones	The polypeptide 1 of l&apos, the gonadotropin release hormone, regulates the secretion of luteinizing and follicle-stimulating hormones.
19	a focus of rumenal cancer in kenyan cattle	This is an outbreak of rumen cancer in Kenyan cattle.
19	serum creatine phosphokinase levels in pigs reacting abnormally to halogenated anaesthetics	Serum creatine phosphokinase levels in pigs which are abnormally reactive to halogenated anesthetics.
19	the clinical and metabolic effects of porcine calcitonin on paget s disease of bone	Clinical and metabolic effects of porcine calcitonin on bone disease of the paget.
19	salmonella isolations in abattoirs in greece	Salmonella isolation in slaughterhouses in Greece.
19	sewer and drain swabbing as a means of investigating salmonellosis	Sampling of sewers and sewers as a means of detecting salmonellosis.
19	the excretion of two virulent strains of african swine fever virus by domestic pigs	L' the shedding of two virulent strains of African swine fever virus by domestic swine.
19	virulence and pathogenesis of yellow fever virus serially passaged in cell culture	Virulence and pathogenesis of yellow fever virus have been mass-cultured in cell cultures.
19	studies of the bulbo urethral cowper s gland mucin and seminal gel of the boar	Studies of bulbo urethral cowper s mucin gland and wild boar seminal gel.
19	growth of the ib rs 2 pig kidney cell line in suspension culture and its susceptibility to foot and mouth disease virus	Growth of the swine kidney cell line ib rs 2 in suspension culture and susceptibility to FMD virus.
19	effects of oxyamylose and polyacrylic acid on foot and mouth disease and hog cholera virus infections	Dosage; oxyamylosis and lacidosis; polyacrylic acid on foot-and-mouth disease and cholera infections in swine.
19	relationship of the frequency of isolation of salmonellae to their resistance to drying and freezing	Relationship between frequency of isolation and drying and freezing resistance of salmonellae.
19	iodination of glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Gluceraldehyde iodination 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	comparison of microtiter procedures with the plaque technique for assay of vesicular stomatitis virus	Comparison of microtitration procedures with the plate-titration technique for vesicular stomatitis virus.
19	comparison of animal sera for suitability in coagulase testing	Comparison of animal sera to determine s' suitable for use in clotting.
19	the relationship of arterial blood ph and pco2 to the viability of the newborn piglet	The relationship between ph and pco2 of arterial blood and the viability of the new piglet-born.
19	experimental immunization of sows with inactivated transmissible gastroenteritis tge virus	Experimental vaccination of sows against the inactivated virus of the gastro-transmissible tge.
19	steroidal free radicals as possible intermediates in the biosynthesis of c19 delta 16 steroids	Free steroid radicals are possible intermediates in the biosynthesis of the delta 16 c19 steroids.
19	organic mercury identified as the cause of poisoning in humans and hogs	Mercury has been identified as the cause of death; poisoning in humans and swine.
19	ultrastructural localization of intracellular antigen using enzyme labeled antibody fragments	Ultrastructural localization of apos; intracellular antigen at apos; aid of d*apos fragments; antibodies labeled by enzymes.
19	ultrastructural localization of calcitonin in the parafollicular cells of pig thyroid gland with cytochrome c labeled antibody fragments	Ultrastructural localization of calcitonin in parafollicle cells of the pig thyroid gland with cytochrome c-labeled calcitonin antibody fragments.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs the role of milk in protective immunity to e coli enteritis	Escherichia coli immunity in swine the role of milk in immunity; protective immunity against intestinal infections; enteritis to e coli.
19	studies on the bacterial floral of condemmed portions from arthritic hogs	Studies of bacterial flora in condensed portions of arthritic pigs.
19	a study of escherichia coli strains isolated from pigs with gastro intestinal disease	A study of Escherichia coli isolated from swine infected with apo; a gastro-intestinal illness.
19	dose response relationship of luteinizing hormone to luteinizing hormone releasing hormone in man	Dose ratio-response of apo; luteinizing hormone to apo; luteinizing hormone; luteinizing hormone in apo; man.
19	further investigations on the airborne excretion of foot and mouth disease virus	Continued research on foot-and-mouth disease; aerial shedding of foot-and-mouth disease virus.
19	ihalation persistence and dispersal f foot and mouth disease virus by man	Persistence and dispersal; inhalation of foot-and-mouth virus by humans.
19	anaesthetic induced malignant hyperpyrexia a suggested method of treatment	Anesthesia induces a hyperpyrexia malignant, a suggested treatment method.
19	the growth and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in the bovine mammary gland	The growth and persistence of the virus of FMD in the bovine mammary gland.
19	the purification and properties of the l serine o sulphate degrading system of pig liver	The purification and the properties of the system that degrades the pig liver serine or the pig liver sulphate.
19	isolation and fractionation of glycopeptides from porcine thyroglobulin	Isolation and fractionation of porcine thyroglobulin glycopeptides.
19	the structure of a glycopeptide purified from porcine thyroblobulin	Structure of a purified porcine thyroblobulin glycopeptide.
19	the influence of deep body temperatures and skin temperatures on peripheral blood flow in the pig	Influence of deep body temperatures and skin temperatures on peripheral blood flow in pigs.
19	vertebrate faunas and chronology of hominid bearing sediments east of lake rudolf kenya	Vete fauna and chronology of hominids bearing sediment at the eastern kenya rudolf lake.
19	competitive labelling a method for determining the reactivity of individual groups in proteins the amino groups of porcine elastase	Competitive Labelling of Dapos; a method to determine the reactivity of individual groups in protein amino groups of porcine elastase.
19	effect of ph changes on the binding of vitamin b12 by intrinsic factor	Effect of ph-changes on the binding of vitamin b12 by an intrinsic vitamin factor.
19	adrenal medullary calcitonin like factor a key to multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2	Adrenal medullary calcitonin plays a key role in type 2 multiple endocrine neoplasia.
19	enzyme purification by electrodecantation	It's called enzymatic purification by electro-sedimentation.
19	carbohydrate content of insoluble elastins prepared from adult bovine and calf ligamentum nuchae and tropoelastin isolated from copper deficient porcine aorta	Carbohydrate content of insoluble elastins prepared from adult calves and bovine ligamentum nuchae and copper-deficient porcine aorta.
19	transient kinetic studies of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase	Transient kinetic studies of the muscle lactate dehydrogenase of pigs.
19	heterogeneity of protein polysaccharides of porcine articular cartilage the sequential extraction of chondroitin sulphate proteins with iso osmotic neutral sodium acetate	Heterogeneity of porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharides, sequential extraction of chondroitin sulfate proteins with l' isosmotic neutral sodium acetate.
19	ultraviolet light a new stimulus for the induction of platelet aggregation	Ultraviolet radiation is a new stimulus for platelet aggregation.
19	total synthesis of acetate from co 2 methyltetrahydrofolate an intermediate and a procedure for separation of the folates	The total synthesis of l' acetate from methyl tetrahydrofolate in position 2 is an intermediate and a method of folate separation.
19	bile salts of germ free domestic fowl and pigs	Germ-free bile salts; domestic and swine birds.
19	inhibition of the renin angiotensinogen reaction by pepstatin	Inhibition of the renin glucos reaction; angiotensinogen by pepstatin.
19	the metabolism of phosphatidylinositol in the thyroid gland of the pig	Metabolism of phosphatidylinositol in the pig thyroid gland.
19	an active site peptide from pepsin c	Peptide of the active site of pepsin c.
19	role of the cytoplasmic membrane in the synthesis of ribonucleic acid by disrupted spheroplasts of pseudomonas schuylkilliensis	Role of cytoplasmic membrane in the synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid by broken spheroplasts of pseudomonas schuylkilliensis.
19	membranes of chromaffin granules isolation and partial characterization of two proteins	Key words: chromaffin granule membranes, isolation and partial characterization of two proteins.
19	the reaction of glucagon with its receptor evidence for discrete regions of activity and binding in the glucagon molecule	Glucagon's reaction with its receptor demonstrates the existence of discrete regions of activity and binding in the glucagon molecule.
19	neurohypophyseal hormone responsive adenylate cyclase from mammalian kidney	Apos-reactive neurohypophysial adenylate cyclase; hormone in mammalian kidney.
19	starch gel electrophoresis of fructose 6 phosphate phophoketolase in the genus bifidobacterium	L' d&apos gel electrophoresis; fructose phophoketolase 6 phosphate starch of the genus bifidobacterium.
19	electrophoretic and immunological characterization of rat neurophysin	Electrophoretic and immunological characterization of rat neurophysin.
19	thyrocalcitonin stimulation of secretion by pentagastrin	Pentagastrin stimulates thyrocalcitonin secretion.
19	characteristics of antimicrobial resistance of escherichia coli from animals relationship to veterinary and management uses of antimicrobial agents	Characteristics of antimicrobial resistance in animals; escherichia coli arising from animal interactions with veterinary uses and from management of antimicrobial agents.
19	inhibition by rifampin of african swine fever virus replication in tissue culture	Rifampin inhibition of the replication of African swine fever virus in tissue cultures.
19	classification of north american porcine enteroviruses a comparison with european and japanese strains	Classification of North American porcine enteroviruses-against European and Japanese strains.
19	nucleoside pyrophosphatase activity associated with pig kidney alkaline phosphatase	Nucleoside pyrophosphatase activity associated with alkaline phosphatase from pig kidney.
19	bovine pepsinogens and pepsins the sequence around a reactive aspartyl residue	Pepsinogens and bovine pepsins the sequence around reactive aspartyl residue.
19	coupling of glycosaminoglycans to agarose beads sepharose 4b	Coupling of glycosaminoglycans on potato beads; agarose Sepharose 4b.
19	glycolytic enzymes in mammalian spermatozoa activities and stabilities of hexokinase and phosphofructokinase in various fractions from sperm homogenates	Glycolytic enzymes in mammalian sperm activities and stability of the apos; hexokinase and phosphofructokinase in various fractions of sperm; homogenates of sperm.
19	tentative identification of a vasopressin neurophysin and an oxytocin neurophysin in the rat	A vasopressin and dapos neurophysin; a dapos neurophysin; and oxytocin in the rat.
19	bacteriological survey of fresh pork sausage produced at establishments under federal inspection	Bacteriological study of fresh pork sausages produced in federally inspected establishments.
19	studies of the toxicity of helminthosporium maydis	Toxicity studies of maydis helminthosporium.
19	identification and aflatoxin production of molds isolated from country cured hams	Identification and production of apos; aflatoxin from moulds isolated from hams cooked according to the traditional method.
19	effect on young swine of consumption of rations containing corn invaded by fusarium roseum	Effect on young pigs of consuming rations containing corn that has been invaded by Fusarium roseum.
19	antipeptic activity of antacids	Anti-peptic activity of the antacids.
19	on the identity of dopa decarboxylase and 5 hydroxytryptophan decarboxylase immunological titration aromatic l amino acid decarboxylase serotonin dopamine norepinephrine	On the apos; identity of dopa decarboxylase and 5 hydroxytryptophan decarboxylase aromatic immunological titration of amino acid decarboxylase serotonin dopamine norepinephrine.
19	evolution of neurophysin proteins the partial sequence of bovine neurophysin i vasopressin oxytocin carrier proteins automated amino acid sequence analysis homology protein evolution	L' neurophysin protein evolution, the partial sequence of neurophysin i vasopressin-carrying bovine proteins, automatizes l' amino acid sequence analysis and l' evolution of proteins d' homology.
19	plasminogen activator in bile during extracorporeal perfusion of pig liver	Activator of plasminogen in bile during extracorporeal infusion of pig liver.
19	heterogeneity of foot and mouth disease virus further studies on plaque formation by two plaque size variants	The heterogeneity of the FMD virus has been the subject of further studies on beach formation by two variations in beach size.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs serum gamma globulin levels indirect hemagglutinating antibody titres and bactericidal activity against e coli in pigs up to five weeks of age	Immunity to Escherichia coli in porcine serum levels of indirect hemagglutinating gamma globulin; antibody and bactericidal activity against e coli in pigs up to; apo; age five weeks.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs antibody secretion by the mammary gland after intramammary or intramuscular vaccination with an e coli vaccine	Immunity to Escherichia coli in secretion of pork antibodies from the mammary gland following e coli vaccine intramammary or intramuscular immunization.
19	the effect of medicated feed on the nasal microflora and weight gain of pigs	Effect of medicated feed on nasal microflora and weight gain in swine.
19	influenza a of human swine equine and avian origin comparison of survival in aerosol form	Influenza a d' human and animal pig origin; avian origin; comparison of survival in the form of d' aerosol.
19	interaction of porcine mycoplasmas with fresh animal serum	Interaction of the pig mycoplasmas with fresh animal serum.
19	the comparative susceptibility of hysterectomy produced colostrum deprived pigs and naturally born enzootic pneumonia free pigs to enzootic pneumonia	The comparative sensitivity of the apos; hysterectomy produced colostrum-deprived pigs and enzootic-pneumonia-free pigs born naturally to enzootic pneumonia.
19	heterogeneity of tubulin subunits	Heterogeneity of sub-units of tubulin.
19	pancreatin as a source of hospital acquired salmonellosis	Pancreatin, the source of salmonellosis at the hospital, has contracted salmonellosis.
19	comparison of the microtubule proteins of neuroblastoma cells brain and chlamydomonas flagella	Comparison of microtubule proteins in brain of neuroblastoma cells and chlamydomonas flagella.
19	platelet interaction with polymerizing fibrin	Platelet interaction with polymerizing fibrin.
19	hypothalamic follicle stimulating hormone fsh and luteinizing hormone lh regulating hormone structure physiology and clinical studies	Hypothalamic stimulatory follicles; fsh and luteinizing hormone lh regulating hormonal structure and clinical studies.
19	isolation of psychrophilic bacteriophage host systems from refrigerated food products	Isolate bacteriophage-hosting systems from refrigerated food products.
19	action of pseudomonas fragi on the proteins of pig muscle	L' action of pseudomonas fragi on pig muscle protein.
19	dna constancy in heteroploidy and the stem line theory of tumors	Apos consistency; DNA in apos; heteroploidy and tumor stem-line theory.
19	studies on the biochemistry of mitochondria and cell morphology in the neonatal swine hepatocyte	Studies of mitochondrial biochemistry and cell morphology in neonatal pig hepatocytes.
19	the kinetics of phenethylhydrazine oxidation by monoamine oxidase	The kinetics of monoamine oxidase oxidation of phenethylhydrazine.
19	isolation of normal immunoglobulin e by means of an immunoadsorbent	Isolate the normal immune globulin using an immuno-adsorbent.
19	synthesis and oxidation of aminoalkyl onium compounds by pig kidney diamine oxidase	Synthesis and oxidation of aminoalkyl onium compounds by pig kidney diamine oxidase.
19	a distinctive cell contact in the rat adrenal cortex	This is a distinct cellular contact in the rat adrenal cortex.
19	heterogeneity of protein polysaccharides of porcine articular cartilage the chondroitin sulphate proteins associaterd with collagen	Heterogeneity of porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharides, collagen-associated chondroitin sulfate proteins.
19	vitamin d intoxication treated with porcine calcitonin	Vitamin d toxicity treated with calcitonin porcine.
19	enteritis due to salmonella panama from infected ham	Panama salmonella enteritis from infected ham.
19	salmonella in pigs and animal feeding stuffs in england and wales and in denmark	Salmonella from pigs and animal feed in England and Wales and Denmark.
19	salmonellas on pig farms and in abattoirs	Salmonella bacteria in swine farms and slaughterhouses.
19	an epidemiological study of the incidence of salmonellas in pigs	Epidemiological study of the incidence of salmonella in swine.
19	comparative complement fixation studies with subtype strains of foot and mouth disease virus	Comparative complement binding studies with strains under <-@ FMD virus types.
19	radio immunoassay of gastrin in human plasma	Radioimmunoassay of human plasma gastrin levels.
19	m ssbauer studies of adrenodoxin the mechanism of electron transfer in a hydroxylase iron sulphur protein	Lapos; apos msbauer study; adrenodoxine, the mechanism of d&apos transfer; electrons in an iron hydroxylase sulfur protein.
19	n terminal amino acid sequence of african lungfish immunoglobulin light chains	N sequence d' terminal amino acids of African lungwort light chains; immunoglobulins.
19	susceptibility of gnotoibiotic swine to escherichia coli isolated from nonenteric human infections	Gnotiotic swine susceptibility to Escherichia coli isolated from non-enteric human infections.
19	calcitonin receptors of kidney and bone	Calcitonin receptors in kidneys and bones.
19	inhibition of pig kidney diamine oxidase by substrate analogues	Inhibition of the pig kidney diamine oxidase by substrate analogs.
19	rapid detection of salmonella microcolonies by fluorescent antibody	Rapid detection of microcolonies of Salmonella by fluorescent antibodies.
19	observations by electron microscopy on pig muscle inoculated and incubated with pseudomonas fragi	Electron microscopic observations on porcine muscles inoculated and incubated with pseudomonas fragi.
19	an evaluation of the efficiency of cleaning methods in a bacon factory	Product evaluation; cleaning efficiency in a bacon plant.
19	the production of pneumonia with or without pleurisy in gnotobiotic piglets with pure cultures of strain tr 32 of mycoplasma hyorhinis	Production of pneumonia, with or without pleurisy, in pure cultured gnotobiotic piglets of strain tr 32 of mycoplasma hyorhinis.
19	investigation into rabbit infusion media for the growth of mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens for inoculation into rabbits	Study of rabbit perfusion media for growth of mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens for use in rabbits; rabbit inoculation.
19	natural selection of parental ability to vary the sex ratio of offspring	Natural selection of the ability of parents to vary the sex ratio of their offspring.
19	application of an improved system of electrophoresis in acrylamide gel to studies on the sera of different species	Application of apos; an improved apos system; apos gel electrophoresis; apos acrylamide; apos acrylamide; study of sera of different species.
19	etiology of hyperparathyroidism and bone disease during chronic hemodialysis 3 evaluation of parathyroid suppressibility	Etiology of apo; hyperparathyroidism and bone disease during apo; chronic hemodialysis; evaluation of parathyroid suppressibility.
19	further studies of porcine malignant hyperthermia	Other malignant swine hyperthermia studies were conducted.
19	the enzymic degradation of l serine o sulphate mechanism of the reaction	Enzyme degradation of the serine o sulfate mechanism of the reaction.
19	human parathyroid hormone amino acid sequence of the amino terminal residues 1 34	In addition, there are no end-points for human parathyroid hormone and amino acids.
19	nucleated assembly of microtubules in porcine brain extracts	Nucleic assembly of microtubules in pig brain extracts is complete.
19	studies on the biosynthesis in vivo and excretion of 16 unsaturated c 19 steroids in the boar	Studies on in vivo biosynthesis and apos; excretion of 16 c 19 unsaturated steroids in the wild boar.
19	a comparative study of the rabbit and pig gut loop systems for the assay of escherichia coli enterotoxin	A comparative study of the systems of intestinal loops of rabbit and swine for the determination of cholesterol; enterotoxin d' escherichia coli.
19	dietary induction of mulberry heart disease and hepatosis dietetica in pigs i nutritional aspects	Mulberry heart disease and liver disease food induction; dietary hepatosis in swine i nutritional aspects.
19	50 chromium labeled erythrocyte half time disappearance from adult sinclair s 1 miniature swine	Fifty chromium-labeled erythrocytes disappear at half-time of death; adult sinclair s 1 pork miniature.
19	effect of supplemental vitamin e and selenium in high moisture corn diets on the incidence of mulberry heart disease and hepatosis dietetica in pigs	Dosage; vitamin and selenium supplementation; incidence of mulberry heart disease and luteum; dietary pig liver disease.
19	vitamin e selenium and methionine supplementation of dystrophogenic diets for pigs	Vitamin e selenium and methionine supplementation of diets for pigs.
19	distribution of porcine fecal coliflora throughout a barn	Distribution of fecal coliflora in a barn.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs anti enterotoxins in colostrum and serum from vaccinated and non vaccinated sows	Immunization against Escherichia coli in pigs can control enterotoxins in colostrum and serum from both vaccinated and unvaccinated sows.
19	ecology of intestinal escherichia coli in pigs	Ecology of intestinal intestinal escherichia coli in pigs.
19	mixed conformations of deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin a preliminary report	Preliminary report on the mixed conformations of the deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin.
19	electrophoretic separation and differentiation of enzymes from human and from porcine liver	Electrophoretic separation and differentiation of human and porcine liver enzymes.
19	isolation of porcine immunoglobulins and determination of the immunoglobulin classes of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antibodies	Isolate porcine immunoglobulins and determine classes of viral antibody immunoglobulins against transmissible gastro-enteritis.
19	antigenic relationships between type a influenza viruses of human porcine equine and avian origin	Antigenic relationships between human and avian influenza-like viruses (HIV-like viruses); human and animal swine origin; avian origin.
19	swine influenza epizootiological and serological studies	Epizootiological and serological studies on the swine flu.
19	hong kong influenza infection in swine experimental and field observations	Hong Kong Influenza Infection in experimental and field observations in swine.
19	experimental infection of human volunteers with a swine influenzavirus antigenically related to the human a hong kong 68 virus	Human hong kong virus 68 is an experimental infection of human volunteers with an antigenically related porcine influenzavirus.
19	studies on the adsorption of certain medium proteins to mycoplasma gallisepticum and their influence on agglutination and haemagglutination reactions	Studies on the adsorption of certain proteins from the medium to mycoplasma gallisepticum and their influence on d' agglutination and hemagglutination.
19	the influence of deep body and skin temperatures on thermoregulatory responses to heating of the scrotum in pigs	L' influences deep body and skin temperatures on thermoregulatory responses to scrotal heating in pigs.
19	squamous metaplasia of the opening of bronchial glands	Squamous metaphasia; opening of bronchial glands.
19	saint louis encephalitis viral ribonucleic acid replication complex	Apos replication complex; viral ribonucleic acid (VAR) from apos; St. Louis encephalitis.
19	51 chromium labeled erythrocyte half time disappearance from miniature swine	Erythrocytes labeled with chrome 51 from miniature pigs.
19	chronological development of mycoplasma hyorhinis and mycoplasma hyosynoviae infections in cultures of a swine synovial cell strain	The time course of mycoplasma hyorhinis and hyosynoviae mycoplasma infections in d' a swine synovial cell line.
19	the significance of proliferation and enterotoxin production by escherichia coli in the intestine of gnotobiotic pigs	The importance of the proliferation and production of escherichia coli; enterotoxins by escherichia coli in the intestines of gnotobiotic pigs.
19	the effects of spraying on the amounts of airborne foot and mouth disease virus present in loose boxes	Effects of spraying on the amount of foot-and-mouth virus present in apo; air in the loose can.
19	serological relationships among herpesviruses cross reaction between marek s disease virus and pseudorabies virus as detected by immunogluorescence	Serological relationships between herpesviruses result in a cross-reactivity between Marek disease virus and pseudorabies virus as detected by immunogluorescence.
19	studies on the wholesomeness of ready to eat meat products i bacteriological evaluation of comminuted heated products	Prepared meat safety studies-@-@ eat i bacteriological evaluation of shared heated products.
19	the vascular architecture of the porcine small intestine	L' vascular architecture of l' small intestine of the pig.
19	studies on the wholesomeness of ready to eat meat products ii chemical evaluation of comminuted heated products	Ready-to-eat meat safety studies-@-@ ii Chemical evaluation of comminuted heated products.
19	the effect of chlortetracycline feed additive on the antibiotic resistance of fecal coliforms of weaned pigs subjected to experimental salmonella infection	Effect of apo; food additive to chlortetracycline on the antibiotic resistance of weaned fecal coliforms experimentally infected with Salmonella.
19	bovine viral diarrhea virus in swine neutralizing antibody in naturally and experimentally infected swine	Bovine viral diarrhea virus virus in porcine neutralizing antibodies in naturally and experimentally infected swine.
19	evidence for the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic elastase	Proof of sequence; amino acids of the protein; porcine pancreatic elastase.
19	the hampshire epidemic of foot and mouth disease 1967	L' outbreak of foot-and-mouth disease in hampshire in 1967.
19	transmission of infectious drug resistance from animals to man	Transmission of infectious drug resistance from animals to humans.
19	correction of adverse response to suxamethonium of susceptible pigs	Correcting the adverse reaction to sux-amethonium in swine that are sensitive.
19	association of escherichia coli with the small intestinal epithelium i comparison of enteropathogenic and nonenteropathogenic porcine strains in pigs	Dos; association of Escherichia coli with intestinal epithelium; small intestine; comparison of enteropathogenic and non-enteropathogenic pig strains in the pig.
19	association of escherichia coli with the small intestinal epithelium ii variations in association index and the relationship between association index and enterosorption in pigs	Escherichia coli with apos; epithelium of apos; small intestine ii variations of apos; index of apos; association and relationship between apos; index of apos; association and apos; enterocorption in swine.
19	the role of a tyrosyl residue in the mechanism of action of carboxypeptidase b luminescence studies	The role of d' a tyrosyl residue in the mechanism of d' action of carboxypeptidase b is studied by luminescence.
19	the intramitochondrial location of the glutaminase isoenzymes of pig kidney	Intramitochondrial localization of pig kidney glutaminase isoenzymes.
19	transport of glutamine and glutamate in kidney mitochondria in relation to glutamine deamidation	Glutamine and glutamate transport in renal mitochondria in relation to glutamine deamidation.
19	biosynthesis of proteoglycans in cartilage slices fractionation by gel chromatography and equilibrium density gradient centrifugation	Biosynthesis of proteoglycans by cartilage slice fractionation by gel chromatography and l&apos density gradient centrifugation; equilibrium.
19	a catalytic mechanism for the enzyme benzylamine oxidase from pig plasma	Pig plasma benzylamine oxidase enzyme catalytic mechanisms.
19	the characterization of two reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate linked aldehyde reductases from pig brain	The characterization of two adenine dinucleotide phosphate-linked aldehyde reductases of pig brain reduces nicotinamide.
19	effects of some disinfectants on african swine fever virus	The effect of certain disinfectants on African swine fever virus.
19	the pathogenesis of potter s syndrome of renal agenesis	The pathogenesis of renal agenesis.
19	d myoinositol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphohydrolase	D myoinositol 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphohydrolase.
19	phosphoric acid triester glutathione alkyltransferase a mechanism for the detoxification of dimethyl phosphate triesters	Triester d' phosphoric acid glutathione alkyltransferase, a detoxification mechanism of dimethyl phosphate triesters.
19	antibody responses in serum colostrum and milk of swine after infection or vaccination with transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Antibody reactions in serum colostrum and pork milk after infection or vaccination with the virus of the gastro-transmissible enteritis.
19	the purification and properties of factor x from pig serum and its role in hypercoagulability in vivo	Purification and properties of x-factor of swine serum and its role in in vivo hypercoagulation.
19	physiology and chemistry of the hypothalamic releasing factors for gonadotropins a new approach to fertility control	The physiology and chemistry of hypothalamic gonadotropin-releasing factors are new approaches to fertility control.
19	humoral antibody responses of swine infected experimentally with group e streptococcus i whole cell agglutinin response	Reactions of humoral antibodies from experimentally infected pigs with response to l' whole-cell agglutinin group e streptococcus i.
19	humoral antibody responses of swine infected experimentally with group e streptococcus ii antistreptokinase and antistreptodornase responses	Antitreptokinase and antitreptodornase responses of group e streptococcus ii.
19	polyserositis and arthritis due to escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs	Polyserosis and arthritis due to apos; gnotobiotic swine escherichia coli.
19	the pattern of enteroviral infections in a herd of swine	The pattern of enteroviral infections in a swine herd.
19	antigenic type specificity of swine isolates of streptococcus equisimilis	Specificity of the antigenic type of porcine streptococcus equisimilis isolates.
19	swine interferon i induction in porcine cell cultures with viral and synthetic inducers	Swine Interferon i induction in swine cell cultures with viral and synthetic inducers.
19	swine interferon ii induction in pigs with viral and synthetic inducers	Swine interferon ii induction with viral and synthetic inducers in pigs.
19	african swine fever application of immunoelectroosmophoresis for the detection of antibody	Application of l' immunoelectro-osmophoresis against African swine fever for antibody detection.
19	studies on relationships between human and porcine influenza 1 serological evidence of infection in swine in great britain with an influenza a virus antigenically like human hong kong 68 virus	Studies of the Relationship Between Human and Swine Influenza 1 Serological evidence of infection in pigs in Grande-Brittany by an influenza virus antigenically similar to the human hong kong virus.
19	studies on relationships between human and porcine influenza 2 immunological comparisons of human a hong kong 68 virus with influenza a viruses of porcine origin	Relationship Studies between Swine and Human Influenza 2 Immunologic Comparisons Between Human a Hong Kong Virus 68 and Influenza a Dapos; origin of swine.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes i phagocytic and bactericidal properties of polymorphonuclear leukocytes from swine	In vitro studies of group e streptococci in leukocytes from pigs i phagocytes and bactericidal properties of polymorphonuclear leukocytes from pigs.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes ii phagocytic and bactericidal properties of macrophages from immune and nonimmune swine	In vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes ii phagocytic and bactericidal properties of swine macrophages, both immature and nonimmune.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes 3 the migration inhibition test as an indication of delayed hypersensitivity in streptococcic lymphadenitis	In vitro studies of group streptococci in porcine leukocytes 3; migration inhibition as an indication of disease; delayed hypersensitivity in streptococcal lymphadenitis.
19	the effect of chlortetracycline feed additive on experimental salmonella infection of swine and antibiotic resistance transfer	L' effect of apo; food additive to chlortetracycline on apo; experimental infection of pigs with Salmonella and transfer of antibiotic resistance.
19	age dependent resistance to transmissible gastroenteritis of swine tge i clinical signs and some mucosal dimensions in small intestine	Gastro-transmissible enteritis of clinical signs in pigs and certain dimensions of the mucosa of the intestines; small intestine.
19	electron microscopy of intestinal epithelial cells of piglets infected with a transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Electron microscopy of intestinal epithelial cells from swine piglets infected with the @-@transmissible gastrointestinal virus.
19	isolation of escherichia coli o157 from pigs with colibacillosis in canada and the united states	Escherichia coli o157 isolated from swine with colibacillosis in Canada and the U.S. states.
19	role of the k88 antigen in the pathogenesis of neonatal diarrhea caused by escherichia coli in piglets	Role of antibiotics; antigen k88 in pathogenesis of neonatal diarrhea caused by escherichia coli in piglets.
19	aggregation of human blood platelets by vasopressin	Vasopressin aggregation of human blood platelets.
19	the enzymic degradation of l serine o sulphate by a specific system from pig liver studies on the mechanism of the reaction	The enzymatic degradation of serine o sulfate by a specific system from animals; studies in pig liver on the mechanism of the reaction.
19	subcellular organization of neurophysins oxytocin 8 lysine vasopressin and adenosine triphosphatase in porcine posterior pituitary lobes	Subcellular organization of neurophysins oxytocin 8, lysine vasopressin, and adenosine triphosphatase in pig posterior pituitary lobes.
19	characterization of the coronary vascular adrenoceptor in the pig	Characterization of coronary vascular adrenoceptor in swine.
19	changes in the protein polysaccharides of pig articular cartilage during prenatal life development and old age	Changes in pig articular cartilage protein polysaccharides during prenatal development and aging.
19	haemorrhage as a complication of extracorporeal pig liver perfusion studies on mechanism and prevention	Hemorrhage as a complication of pig extracorporeal hepatic infusion studies on mechanisms and prevention.
19	lipogenic enzyme activities and cellularity of porcine adipose tissue from various anatomical locations	Lipogenic enzymatic activity and cellularity of porcine adipose tissue in various anatomical regions of the body.
19	cholesterol turnover synthesis and retention in hypercholesterolemic growing swine	Cholesterol turnover synthesis and retention in hypercholesterolemic growing pigs. pp.
19	inhibition of monoamine oxidase by substituted hydrazines	Inhibition of monoamine oxidase activity by substituted hydrazines.
19	16 unsaturated c 19 3 oxo steroids as metabolic intermediates in boar testis	In the case of wild boar, 16 unsaturated steroids c 19 3 oxo as metabolic intermediates in the testicles.
19	synthetic peptides in the diagnosis of exocrine pancreatic insufficiency in animals	Synthetic peptides in the diagnosis of the apos; exocrine pancreatic insufficiency in animals.
19	properties of the enterotoxic component in escherichia coli enteropathogenic for swine	Properties of the enterotoxic component of the organism; and Enteropathogenic Escherichia coli for swine.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens i serological identification of saint louis encephalitis virus soluble antigens	Arbovirus group b, structural and non-structural antigens i serological identification of the soluble antigen(s) of the Saint-Louis virus.
19	an antiphagocytic factor associated with group e streptococcus	Antiphagocytic factor associated with streptococcus group e.
19	the effect of vaccination with a live attenuated strain of japanese encephalitis virus on stillbirths in swine in taiwan	The effect of vaccination with an attenuated live strain of Japanese encephalitis on stillbirths in pigs in Taiwan.
19	enhanced protein adsorption at the solid solution interface dependence on surface charge	Improvement of the proteins; adsorption of proteins to the membranes; interface of the solid solution with the surface load.
19	two morphologically distinct blood brain barriers preventing entry of cytochrome c into cerebrospinal fluid	There are two morphologically distinct blood barriers,-encephalic, preventing the apos; cytochrome c entry into the cerebrospinal fluid-spinal fluid.
19	action of phospholipase a 2 and phospholipase c on bacillus subtilis protoplasts	Action of phospholipase a 2 and phospholipase c on protoplasts of bacillus subtilis.
19	antibodies against human types a and b influenzaviruses in the sera of animals in spain	Antibody antibodies to human influenzavirus (HIV) in the serum of human animals in Spain.
19	liver preservation by single passage hypothermic squirt perfusion	Liver conservation by single-pass hypothermic jet infusion.
19	pour plate method for the detection of coagulase production by staphylococcus aureus	Pour plate method for detection of coagulase production by staphylococcus aureus.
19	observations on diseased pigs with high sulfate intake and normal tissue copper levels	Observations on diseased pigs with high sulphate intake and normal copper levels in tissues.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis in feeder swine clinical immunofluorescence and histopathological obervations	Gastro-transmissible enteritis in apos; clinical immunofluorescence in swine; fattening and histopathological ovations.
19	viability and ultrastructural changes in group e streptococci after in vitro phagocytosis by swine macrophages	The viability and ultrastructural changes of group e streptococci following phagocytosis in vitro by macrophages from pigs.
19	experimental colibacillosis in gnotobiotic baby pigs i microbiological and clinical aspects	Experimental colibacillosis in the gnotobiotic piglets i microbiological and clinical aspects.
19	production of ochratoxins a and b on country cured ham	Production of ochratoxins a and b from field-grown, salted ham.
19	the role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea tarda an in vitro model	The role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea delayed the development of an in vitro model.
19	calcitonin resistance clinical and immunologic studies in subjects with paget s disease of bone treated with porcine and salmon calcitonins	Clinical and immunological studies on calcitonin resistance in paget bone disease patients treated with both porcine and salmon calcitonins.
19	radiation sterilization of prototype military foods low temperature irradiation of codfish cake corned beef and pork sausage	Apos prototype irradiation sterilization; low temperature irradiation of corned beef and cod cake pork sausages.
19	comparison of three techniques for the total count of anaerobes from intestinal contents of pigs	Comparison of three techniques for total anaerobic count from the intestinal contents of pigs.
19	the role of zinc ions in the transformation of lymphocytes by phytohaemagglutinin	The role of zinc ions in the phytohemagglutinin-mediated transformation of lymphocytes.
19	proteoglycans of the knee joint cartilage of young normal and lame pigs	Proteoglycans of the knee articular cartilage of limping, normal young pigs.
19	thiopeptin a new feed additive antibiotic biological studies and field trials	Thiopeptin, novel feed antibiotic, biological studies and field trials.
19	the transfer of mannose from guanosine diphosphate mannose to dolichol phosphate and protein by pig liver endoplasmic reticulum	The transfer of mannose from guanosine diphosphate mannose to dolichol phosphate and proteins by the endoplasmic reticulum of pig liver.
19	identification and measurement of the folates in sheep liver	Identification and measurement of folate in sheep liver.
19	the role of superoxide anion radical in the reduction of ferritin iron by xanthine oxidase	The role of superoxide anion radical in xanthine oxidase reduction of ferritin.
19	secretory protein synthesis in the stimulated rat parotid gland temporal dissociation of the maximal response from secretion	Synthesis of secretory proteins in the stimulated parotid gland of the rat, temporal dissociation of the maximum response to secretion.
19	occurrence of the enzymes effecting the conversion of acetyl coa to squalene in homogenates of hog aorta	The enzymes responsible for the conversion of acetyl coa to squalene are present in the pig aorta.
19	toxic metabolite produced by aspergillus wentii	Toxic metabolite produced by aspergillus wentii.
19	ammonium sulfate fractionation of sera mouse hamster guinea pig monkey chimpanzee swine chicken and cattle	Ammonium sulfate fractionation of serum mouse hamster guinea monkey chimpanzee swine and cattle.
19	multiple forms of acetylcholinesterase from pig brain	Multiple forms of acetylcholinesterase from the brain of pigs.
19	isolation of salmonellae from pork carcasses	To isolate the salmonella from the carcasses of pigs.
19	selective isolation of leptospiras from contaminated material by incorporation of neomycin to culture media	Selective isolation of leptospiras from contaminated material by neomycin incorporation into culture media.
19	isolations of subgenus 3 salmonellas arizonas in cardiff 1959 1971	Isolation of under-genres 3 of salmonella arizonas to cardiff 1959 1971.
19	bacteriophage restriction in salmonella typhimurium by r factors and transfer factors	Bacteriophage limitation in Salmonella typhimurium by r and transfer factors.
19	cholesterol solubility in bile evidence that supersaturated bile is frequent in healthy man	The solubility of cholesterol in bile indicates that supersaturated bile is common in healthy adults.
19	demonstration of r factors in bordetella bronchiseptica isolated from pigs	Demonstration of r factors in isolated swine bordetella bronchiseptica.
19	localization of spirochetes with the structural characteristics of treponema hyodysenteriae in the lesions of swine dysentery	Localization of spirochetes with the structural features of treponema hyodysenteriae in porcine dysentery lesions.
19	fecal bacterial beta glucuronidase control by diet	Control of faecal bacterial beta-glucuronidase by diet.
19	the kinetics of the interconversion of intermediates of the reaction of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase with oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and lactate	Kinetics of l' interconversion of intermediates from the reaction of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase with oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and lactate.
19	von willebrand factor gene dosage relationships and transfusion response in bleeder swine a new bioassay	Willebrand factor gene assay and transfusion response in hemorrhagic swine, a new bioassay.
19	amino acid sequence of porcine pepsin	Sequence of porcine pepsin amino acids.
19	immunoelectrophoretic analysis of mycoplasma mycoides var mycoides	Immunoelectrophoretic analysis of mycoplasma mycoides var. mycoides.
19	microtubule surface lattice and subunit structure and observations on reassembly	Structure of @-@unit and microtubule surface network and reassembly observations.
19	amphibian pituitary growth hormone and prolactin immunochemical relatedness to rat growth hormone	Amphibian pituitary growth hormone and prolactin were found to be immunochemically related to rat growth hormone.
19	characterization of ileal vitamin b12 binding using homogeneous human and hog intrinsic factors	Characterization of ileal vitamin b12 binding to apos; aid of homogeneous intrinsic factors in humans and in swine.
19	comparison of six methods for isolating mycobacteria from swine lymph nodes	Comparison of six methods to isolate mycobacteria from the pig lymph nodes.
19	pentapeptide pepstatin inhibition of brain acid proteinase	Pepstatin, pentapeptide, proteinase inhibition of the apos; brain acid by pepstatin.
19	titration and neutralization of rabies virus era strain following its replication in a pig fallopian tube cell line	Title and neutralization of the rabies virus era strain after replication in a fallopian tube cell line.
19	glucocorticoid induced stress susceptibility in swine adrenocortical pathology	Glucocorticoids induced stress susceptibility in the porcine adrenocortical pathology.
19	antigenic and biochemical characterization of the c type particle of the stable porcine kidney cell line pk 15	Antigenic and biochemical characterization of the c-type particle from the stable line of pk 15 kidney cells.
19	paradoxical increase in rate of catabolism of low density lipoproteins after hepatectomy	Paradoxically increased rate of catabolism of low-density lipoproteins following hepatectomy.
19	quantitative study of the bacterial flora of the large intestine of dysenteric swine	Quantitative study of the bacterial flora of the large, dysenteric pig intestine.
19	observations of cattle goats and pigs after administration of synthetic interferon inducers and subsequent exposure to foot and mouth disease virus	Post-fetal observations of goats and pigs; administration of drugs; synthetic inducers; interferon and subsequent exposure to foot-and-mouth disease virus.
19	a preliminary study on the intestinal flora of cecum and colon of eight ten and 12 week old swine	A preliminary study of the intestinal flora of the caecum and the colon of eight swine aged 10 and 12 weeks.
19	concentration of igg in serum and large intestine of dysenteric swine	Dapos concentration in serum and large intestine of dysenteric pig.
19	bordetella agglutinating antibody in swine a herd survey	Bordetella agglutinating antibody in pigs a herd survey.
19	use of mailed questionnaire data in a study of swine congenital malformations	Use of mailed questionnaire data in porcine congenital malformations study.
19	isolation of a glucagon containing peptide primary structure of a possible fragment of proglucagon	Isolation of apos; a glucagon containing the primary peptide structure of apos; a possible proglucagon fragment.
19	purification and some properties of cytoplasmic aspartate aminotransferase from sheep liver	The purification and certain properties of the cytoplasmic aspartate aminotransferase from sheep liver.
19	kinetic studies of the acylation of pig muscle d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase by 1 3 diphosphoglycerate and of proton uptake and release in the overall enzyme mechanism	Kinetic studies of apos; glyceraldehyde acylation-3 porcine muscle phosphate dehydrogenase by 13 diphosphoglycerate and l' proton absorption and release in the apos; complete enzyme mechanism.
19	conformation of the mucopolysaccharides x ray fibre diffraction of heparin	Conformation of mucopolysaccharides x diffraction of apo rays; heparin.
19	binding of oligosaccharides of hyaluronic acid to proteoglycans	Binding of etapos; hyaluronic acid oligosaccharides to proteoglycans.
19	system for studying uninfected and virus infected cell cultures in hyperbaric chambers	Apos system; study of virus-infected uninfected cell cultures in hyperbaric chambers.
19	comparison of brilliant green agar and hektoen enteric agar media in the isolation of salmonellae from food products	Comparison of brilliant green agar and enteric hektoen agar in the apos; isolation of salmonella from food products.
19	lytic activity of vibrio phages on strains of vibrio fetus isolated from man and animals	The lytic activity of vibrionic phages on vibrionic fetus strains isolated from human and animal vertebrates.
19	isolation of porcine parvovirus from commercial trypsin	To isolate porcine parvovirus from commercial trypsin.
19	susceptibility of the mouse intestine to heat stable enterotoxin produced by enteropathogenic escherichia coli of porcine origin	Vulnerability of apo; mouse intestine to apo; heat-stable enterotoxin produced by enteropathogenic escherichia coli; porcine origin.
19	lead inclusion bodies in osteoclasts	Body d' inclusion of lead in osteoclasts.
19	isolation of edwardsiella tarda from swine	To isolate the apos; Edwardsiella delayed from the pigs.
19	microbiology of the frankfurter process salmonella and natural aerobic flora	Microbiology of Frankfurter Salmonella process and natural aerobic flora.
19	selective pancreatic enzyme secretion due to a new peptide called chymodenin	Selective secretion of pancreatic enzymes is due to a novel peptide called chymodenin.
19	therapeutic effect of lincomycin and spectinomycin water medication on swine dysentery	Therapeutic effect of lincomycin and spectinomycin treatment on the pig dysentery.
19	experimental edema disease of swine e coli enterotoxemia i dectection and preparation of an active principle	Experimental disease of the apos; edema caused by apos; enterotoxemia with pig E. coli and preparation of apos; an active ingredient.
19	experimental edema disease of swine e coli enterotoxemia 3 pathology and pathogenesis	Experimental pathology of apos; edema of apos; porcine enterotoxemia 3 and pathology and pathogenesis.
19	experimental alkylmercurial poisoning in swine lesions in the peripheral and central nervous systems	Experimental oral poisoning; alkylmercury in porcine lesions of the central and peripheral nervous systems.
19	clinical and pathological observations on the experimental passage of swine dysentery	Clinical and pathological observations on experimental passage of porcine dysentery.
19	growth and lability of chaetopterus oocyte mitotic spindles isolated in the presence of porcine brain tubulin	Growth and lability of mitotic spindles of chaetopterus oocytes isolated in the presence of porcine brain tubulin.
19	chemotherapy of experimental streptococcal endocarditis ii synergism between penicillin and streptomycin against penicillin sensitive streptococci	Apos chemotherapy; experimental streptococcal endocarditis ii penicillin - streptomycin synergism against penicillin-susceptible streptococci.
19	plasmin induced platelet aggregation and platelet release reaction effects on hemostasis	Plasmin induced the effects of platelet aggregation and platelet release on the apos; hemostasis.
19	population changes in enteric bacteria and other microorganisms during aerobic thermophilic windrow composting	Changes in the populations of enteric bacteria and other microorganisms during thermophilic aerobic composting of apo; entanglement.
19	cellular localization of gastric inhibitory polypeptide in the duodenum and jejunum	Cellular localization of gastric inhibitory polypeptide in duodenum and jejunum.
19	mycotoxic nephropathy in pigs	Mycotoxic nephropathy in swine.
19	seasonal infection of culex mosquitos and swine with japanese encephalitis virus	Seasonal infection of culex mosquitoes and pigs with Japanese encephalitis.
19	sources of contamination of cooked ready to eat cured and uncured meats	Sources of contamination for ready-to-eat, salted and uncooked cooked meats.
19	endogenous phospholipids of swine liver effect of fat deprivation on molecular species of phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine	Effect of lack of fat on the molecular species of phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine of pig liver on endogenous phospholipids.
19	the influence of body core temperature and peripheral temperatures on oxygen consumption in the pig	L' influence of central body temperature and peripheral temperatures on pork oxygen consumption.
19	the effects of heating and cooling the spinal cord and hypothalamus on thermoregulatory behaviour in the pig	The effects of heating and cooling of the spinal cord and spinal cord; hypothalamus on the pork thermoregulatory behaviour.
19	gastric emptying in young pigs	Gastric emptying in young pigs.
19	hyaluronic acid in cartilage and proteoglycan aggregation	Hyaluronic acid in cartilage and cartilage; proteoglycan aggregation.
19	swine vesicular disease attempts to transmit infection to cattle and sheep	Hog bladder disease attempts to transmit the infection to cattle and sheep.
19	swine vesicular disease comparative studies of viruses isolated from different countries	Hog Bladder Disease (HBV) Comparative studies of viruses isolated from different countries.
19	the site at which 4 iodoacetamidosalicylate reacts with glutamate dehydrogenases	The site where 4 iodoacetamidosalicylate reacts with glutamate dehydrogenases.
19	the amino acid sequence of the amino terminal 37 residues of human parathyroid hormone	The amino acid sequence of the amino terminus 37 residues of the human parathyroid hormone.
19	the effect of acetyl coenzyme a on phosphate activated glutaminase from pig kidney and brain	The effect of apos; acetyl coenzyme a on phosphate has activated glutaminase in pig kidney and brain.
19	mycoplasma hyorhinis swine arthritis 3 modified disease in piney woods swine	Arthritis-modified porcine mycoplasma hyorhinis disease 3 in swine from pine wood.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens ii purification of saint louis encephalitis virus intracellular antigens	Arbovirus group b, structural and non-structural antigens ii purification of the intracellular antigen(s) of L&apos virus; St.-Louis encephalitis.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens 3 serological specificity of solubilized intracellular viral proteins	Group B Arbovirus, structural and nonstructural antigens 3 serological specificity of solubilized intracellular viral proteins.
19	involvement of the host cell nuclear envelope membranes in the replication of japanese encephalitis virus	L' involvement of apos membranes; nuclear envelope of the host cell in apos virus replication; and Japanese encephalitis.
19	enterovirus neutralizing activity in the gastrointestinal tract of piglets	Enterovirus neutralizing activity in piglet gastro-intestinal tract.
19	the transporting proteins of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol in serum of chicks and other species partial purification and characterization of the chick proteins	Cholelecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol transport proteins in serum from chicks and d' other species partially purify and characterize chicken proteins.
19	immunological study of the heat labile enterotoxins of escherichia coli and vibrio cholerae	Immunological study of heat-labile enterotoxins of escherichia coli and vibrio cholerae.
19	swine vesicular disease virological studies of experimental infections produced by the england 72 virus	Vesicular disease of pigs Virological studies of animals; experimental infections produced by virus 72 of l'apos; England.
19	cellular localization of a vasoactive intestinal peptide in the mammalian and avian gastrointestinal tract	Cellular localization of d&apos, a vasoactive intestinal peptide in the gastrointestinal tract of both mammals and birds.
19	the isolation of escherichia coli from a poultry packing station and an abattoir	Insulation of plants; Escherichia coli in slaughterhouse and poultry packing facilities.
19	protection against gram negative infections with antiserum to lipid a from salmonella minnesota r595	Protection against Gram-negative infections with anti-fatty a-mercum Salmonella minnesota r595.
19	mechanism of lysergic acid diethylamide interference with rabbit antibody biosynthesis	Mechanisms of action; interference of diethylamide; lysergic acid with rabbit antibody biosynthesis.
19	restraint of cholesterol accumulation in tissue pools associated with drastic short term lowering of serum cholesterol levels by clofibrate or cholestyramine in hypercholesterolemic swine	Limiting cholesterol accumulation in tissue pools associated with a dramatic short-term decrease in serum cholesterol levels by clofibrate or cholestyramine in hypercholesterolemic pigs.
19	incompatibility reactions of r plasmids isolated from escherichia coli of animal origin	Responses; incompatibility of isolated plasmids; escherichia coli isolates; animal origin.
19	attemps to infect pigs with coxsackie virus type b5	Time to infect pigs with the swine coxsackie virus type b5.
19	the significance of deep body temperature in regulating the concentration of thyroxine in the plasma of the pig	L' the importance of deep body temperature in regulating thyroxine concentration in pig plasma.
19	isolation and characterization of luminal membranes from urinary bladder	Insulation and characterization of urinary bladder luminal membranes.
19	ecological studies on culex tritaeniorhynchus as a vector of japanese encephalitis	Ecological studies on the Japanese culex tritaeniorhynchus as a vector for Japanese encephalitis.
19	radioimmunoassay of somatomedin b application to clinical and physiologic studies	Radioimmunoassay of somatomedin b applied in clinical and physiological studies.
19	recent trends in human salmonellosis in england and wales the epidemiology of prevalent serotypes other than salmonella typhimurium	Recent trends and mitigation of human salmonellosis in England; epidemiology of prevalent serotypes other than Salmonella typhimurium.
19	continuous non therapeutic use of antibacterial drugs in feed and drug resistance of the gram negative enteric florae of food producing animals	Continued non-therapeutic use of antibacterial drugs in feed and resistance to drugs in enteric flora @ gram-@ negative in food producing animals.
19	intramammary infections in the sow during the peripartum period	Infections in the perinatal period of the sow.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis in feeder pigs observations on the jejunal epithelium of normal feeder pigs and feeder pigs infected with tge virus	Gastro-transmissible in swine; fattening Notes on apo; jejunal epithelium of swine; normal fattening and swine feeding; fattening infected with the virus tge.
19	aromatic amino acid hydroxylase inhibitors 4 3 substituted alpha methyltyrosines	L&apos inhibitors; aromatic amino acid hydroxylase 4 alpha-substituted methyltyrosines 3.
19	distribution of prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase and types i and ii 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase in swine kidney medulla and cortex	Distribution of prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase and types i and ii 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase in the medulla and renal cortex of pigs.
19	purification characterization and radioimmunoassay of thyrocalcitonin from rat thyroid glands	Characterization of the purification and radioimmunoassay of thyrocalcitonin from rat thyroid glands.
19	the properties of muscarinic receptors in mammalian cerebral cortex	The properties of muscarinic receptors in the mammalian cerebral cortex.
19	the demonstration of plasma cells and other immunoglobulin containing cells in formalin fixed paraffin embedded tissues using peroxidase labelled antibody	Demonstration of plasma and apo cells; other cells containing apo; peroxidase-labeled antibodies; immunoglobulin in paraffin-coated tissues attached to formalin.
19	synergism between trichuris suis and the microbial flora of the large intestine causing dysentery in pigs	The synergism between trichuris suis and the large intestinal microbial flora also causes dysentery in pigs.
19	anionic and cationic dog trypsin isolation and partial characterization	Anionic and cationic isolation of dog trypsin and partial characterization.
19	purification of 125i labelled lysine vasopressin by affinity chromatography on sepharose bound neurophysins	Purification of 125i-labeled vasopressin lysine by D' affinity to Sepharose-linked neurophysins.
19	fluorescence studies on the active sites of porcine pepsin and rhizopus pepsin	Active site fluorescence studies of porcine pepsin and pepsin rhizopus.
19	fluorescent and spin label probes of the environments of the sulfhydryl groups of porcine muscle adenylate kinase	Fluorescent probes and spin labels for sulfhydryl group environments of porcine muscle adenylate kinase.
19	purification and partial characterization of human and porcine c3a anaphylatoxin	Purification and partial characterization of human and swine c3a anaphylatoxin.
19	circular dichroism of c3a anaphylatoxin effects of ph heat guanidinium chloride and mercaptoethanol on conformation and function	Circular dichroism of the effects of l' anaphylatoxin c3a of guanidinium chloride and mercaptoethanol on the conformation and function.
19	a comparison of ventricular weights and geometry in newborn young and adult mammals	A comparison of ventricular weight and geometry in the newborn and adult mammals.
19	in vitro labeling of beta apolipoprotein with 3h or 14c and preliminary application to turnover studies	In vitro labelling; beta-apolipoprotein with 3h or 14c and preliminary application to renewal studies.
19	characterization of metabolites in domestic sow urine after intravenous administration of radioactive estrogen and corticosteroids	Characterization of metabolites in urine of domestic sow after dosing; intravenous administration of estrogen and radioactive corticosteroids.
19	distribution of sulphate and iduronic acid residues in heparin and heparan sulphate	Distribution of residues of sulfate and d' iduronic acid in heparin and l' heparan sulfate.
19	platelets fixed with paraformaldehyde a new reagent for assay of von willebrand factor and platelet aggregating factor	The platelets have fixed with paraformaldehyde a new reagent for the determination of von willebrand and d&apos factors; platelet aggregation.
19	an attempt to identify the intestinal receptor for the k88 adhesin by means of a haemagglutination inhibition test using glycoproteins and fractions from sow colostrum	Attempted apo placenta; identification of intestinal receptor; adhesin k88 by means of apo placental test; apo placenta; hemagglutination using sow glycoproteins and colostrum fractions.
19	influence of dietary 1 3 butanediol on wieght gain blood and liver metabolites and lipogenesis in the pig and chick	L' influence of dietary butanediol 13 on blood gain and liver metabolites as well as lipogenesis in swine and chicken.
19	the granulovesicular bodies of the arterial wall	Granulovesicular bodies of the arterial wall.
19	minor calyces as primary pacemaker sites for ureteral activity in man	Calice as the main site of the pacemaker for the apos; ureteral activity in the apos; man.
19	cytological cytochemical and immuno fluorescence studies with dugbe virus a new nigerian tick borne virus	Cytochemical and immunofluorescence studies with the virus dugbe, a new Nigerian tick-borne virus.
19	immune mediated emigration of neutrophils into the lumen of the small intestine	Neutrophils emigrate into the lumen of the intestine; small intestines are immune mediated.
19	the efficiency of operatnt thermoregulatory behavior in pigs as determined from the rate of oxygen consumption	The efficiency of the thermoregulatory behaviour of pork as determined by the rate of consumption of oxygen.
19	evaluation of a bovine viral diarrhea vaccine produced in a porcine kidney cell line	Evaluation of a vaccine against bovine viral diarrhea produced in a swine kidney cell line.
19	cadmium its in vivo detection in man	Cadmium, its detection in vivo in the human body.
19	separation of two new trypsin inhibiting fractions from human serum	Separation of two new trypsin-inhibiting fractions from human serum.
19	d asparatate oxidase in the thyroid gland	Asparatate oxidase in the thyroid gland.
19	effect of prostaglandin e2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in intact dog swine and lamb	Effect of prostaglandin e2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in intact lambs and pigs.
19	properties of the stable aerobic and anaerobic half reduced states of nadph cytochrome c reductase	The aerobic and anaerobic stable half properties reduced the states of nadph cytochrome c reductase.
19	oxidation of methionine residues of porcine and bovine pepsins	Oxidation of porcine and bovine pepsin methionic residues.
19	phosphorylation of purified thyroid plasma membranes incubated with 32 p atp	Phosphorylation of purified thyroid plasma membranes incubated at 32 p atp.
19	the effect of alcohols on mitochondrial monoamine oxidase activity	L' effect of alcohols on apos; mitochondrial monoamine oxidase activity.
19	the induction persistence and loss of framycetin sulphate resistance in enteric e coli of pigs	Persistence of induction and loss of framycetin sulfate resistance in swine enteric e coli.
19	adenoviruses of man and animals	Adenovirus in humans and animals.
19	studies on immunity to aujeszky s disease pseudorabies virus infection in pigs	Apos studies; immunity to apos; pseudorabies of apos disease virus; Aujeszky in swine.
19	protection by natural infection and vaccination against respiratory diseases caused by mycoplasmas	Protection by natural infection and vaccination against mycoplasma respiratory diseases.
19	the importance of picornavirus infections in respiratory disease of man and other mammals	Extent of picornavirus infections in respiratory diseases of humans and other mammals.
19	the importance of mycoplasmas in respiratory infections	L' importance of mycoplasma in respiratory infections.
19	radioimmunoassay for motilin	Radioimmunoassay of motilin.
19	5alpha androstenone in peripheral plasma of pigs diurnal variation in boars effects of intravenous hcg administration and castration	Pig peripheral plasma 5alpha androstenone diurnal variation of wild boar effects of apos; intravenous administration of hcg and castration.
19	determination of sensitivity of mycoplasma hyosynoviae to tylosin and selected antibacterial drugs by a microtiter technique	Determination of the sensitivity of hyosynoviae mycoplasma to tylosin and some antibacterial drugs by a microtitration technique.
19	protective effect of immunoglobulins in serum and milk of sows exposed to transmissible gastroenteritis virus	The protective effect of immunoglobulins in the serum and milk of sows exposed to the gastrovirus-transmissible enteritis.
19	the effect of antisera on porcine enteropathogenic escherichia coli in ligated segments of pig intestine	The effect of antisera on porcine enteropathogenic escherichia coli in ligated porcine intestinal segments.
19	antibacterial activity of antisera against homologous and heterologous escherichia coli of porcine origin	Antibacterial activity of antisera against homologous and heterologous d&apos Escherichia coli; pig origin.
19	the detection of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antigens by immunodiffusion	Detection of immunodiffusion-transmissible viral antigens of gastro-enteritis.
19	a study of articular surfaces and synovial fossae of the pectoral limb of swine	A study of articular surfaces and synovial pore-limb pits in pigs.
19	pharmacokinetics of phenylbutazone and oxyphenabutazone in the pig	Pharmacokinetics of phenylbutazone and l' oxyphenabutazone in pigs.
19	immunocytochemical localization of substance p in mammalian intestine	Immunocytochemical localization of the substance p in the mammalian intestine.
19	porcine parvovirus natural and experimental infections of the porcine fetus and prevalence in mature swine	Swine parvovirus infections in the pig fetus and prevalence in mature swine.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs adhesion of enteropathogenic escherichia coli to isolated intestinal epithelial cells	Emission of escherichia coli in pigs, adhesion of d' enteropathogenic escherichia coli to isolated intestinal epithelial cells.
19	bifunctional reagents as vapour and liquid phase fixatives for immunohistochemistry	Bifunctional vapor phase reagents and liquid phase fixatives for apos; immunohistochemistry.
19	microspectrophotometric detection of heparin in mast cells and basophilic granulocytes stained metachromatically with toluidine blue o	Microspectrophotometric detection of apos; heparin in metachromatically toluidine blue metachromatically stained mast cells and basophilic granulocytes.
19	immunofluorescent localization of the female sex steroids in the porcine ovary	Immunofluorescence localization of female sex steroids in porcine ovary.
19	reproductive failure in swine associated with maternal seroconversion for porcine parvovirus	Reproductive failure in swine associated with a maternal seroconversion of the virus.
19	experimental scoliosis in primates failure of a technique	Experimental scoliosis in failed primates, a technique.
19	lung vascular smooth muscle as a determinant of pulmonary hypertension at high altitude	Pulmonary vascular smooth muscle is a determinant of lacidosis; pulmonary hypertension at high altitudes.
19	denaturation and proteolytic digestion of porcine low density lipoprotein in aqueous guanidine hydrochloride solutions	Denaturation and proteolytic digestion of low-density pig lipoproteins in aqueous guanidine hydrochloride solutions.
19	porcine malignant hyperthermia effects of halothane on mitochondrial respiration and calcium accumulation	The effects of apos; porcine malignant hyperthermia of apos; halothane on mitochondrial respiration and apos; calcium accumulation.
19	prevention of porcine malignant hyperthermia by epidural block	Malignant swine hyperthermia by epidural blockade.
19	a vascular catheter implanting device	A vascular catheter implantation.
19	surveillance of iowa swine herds for influenza like illness combined serologic and virus isolation method	Surveillance of the apo; Iowa swine herds for influenza such as illness combined the serologic and viral isolation methods.
19	electron microscopic evaluation of bone cells in pigs with experimentally induced bordetella rhinitis turbinate osteoporosis	Electron microscopic evaluation of the bone cells of pigs with osteoporosis turbinate induced experimentally by bordetella rhinitis.
19	effects of prednisone on gastric secretion and development of stomach lesions in swine	Effects of prednisone on gastric secretion and development of gastric lesions in the pig.
19	porcine parvovirus frequency of naturally occurring transplacental infection and viral contamination of fetal porcine kidney cell cultures	Prevalence of infection by swine parvovirus; natural transplacental origin and viral contamination of fetal swine kidney cell cultures.
19	influence of antibody mediated immune suppression on clinical viral and immune responses to swine influenza infection	Antibody-mediated immunosuppression of clinical viral and immune responses to infection; swine influenza infection.
19	cannulation of ductus deferens of the boar a surgical technique	Cannulation of the vas deferens of wild boar by surgical technique.
19	frequency of sarcocystis spp in detroit metropolitan area michigan	Frequency of sarcocystis spp. in metropolitan area of Detroit, Michigan.
19	an immunoperoxidase technique for the identification of gastrin producing cells	An immunoperoxidase technique for gastrin-producing cells.
19	serodiagnostic application of immunohistoperoxidase reactions on antigen coupled agarose beads	Serodiagnostic application of immunohistoperoxidase reactions to antigen-coupled d' agarose beads.
19	brain cells in culture morphological transformation by a protein	The morphological transformation of brain cells into culture by a protein.
19	radioligand receptor assay for urinary and serum hcg	A review of the radioligand receptor assay for urinary and serum hcg hg.
19	binding of bile salts to pancreatic colipase and lipase	Bile salts bind to pancreatic colipase and lipase.
19	nutritional studies on east african herbivores 2 losses of nitrogen in the faeces	Nutritional studies on herbivores of l' Africa of l' Is 2 losses of d' nitrogen in the feces.
19	nicotinamide 3 n4 ethenocytosine dinucleotide an analog of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide synthesis and enzyme studies	Nicotinamide 3 n4 ethenocytosine dinucleotide analogue of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide synthesis and enzyme studies.
19	further characterization of bovine pancreatic lipase	Further characterization of bovine pancreatic lipase.
19	thyroid microsomal membrane proteins effects of solubilization on molecular size	Effects of solubilization on the molecular size of thyroid microsomal membrane proteins.
19	kinetics of alkaline phosphatase from pig kidney mechanism of activation by magnesium ions	The alkaline phosphatase kinetics of the d&apos mechanism; pig kidney magnesium ion activation.
19	the calcium induced dissociation of human plasma clotting factor xiii	Calcium-induced dissociation of human plasma clotting factor xiii.
19	type c virus production by a continuous line of pig oviduct cells pft	Production of c-type virus by a continuous pft swine oviduct cell lineage.
19	the proteins of murray valley encephalitis virus	Proteins of the virus; murray Valley encephalitis.
19	antigenic and antiheparin properties of human platelet factor 4 pf4	Antigenic and anti-heparin properties of human platelet 4 pf4.
19	a convenient spectrophotometric assay for the determination of l ergothioneine in blood	A convenient spectrophotometric test for determination of the ergothionein in the blood.
19	characterization of gastric mucoproteins isolated by equilibrium density gradient centrifugation in caesium chloride	Characterization of gastric mucoproteins isolated by d&apos density gradient centrifugation; cesium chloride equilibrium.
19	conformational changes in gastric mucoproteins induced by caesium chloride and guanidinium chloride	Conformational changes in gastric mucoproteins induced by cesium chloride and guanidinium chloride.
19	x ray fibre diffraction of cartilage proteoglycan aggregates containing hyaluronic acid	X X-ray fiber diffraction of cartilage proteoglycan aggregates containing l' hyaluronic acid.
19	study of rickettsioses in slovakia i coxiella burneti and rickettsiae of the spotted fever sf group in ticks and serological surveys in animals and humans in certain selected localities in the lucenec and v krt s districts	Study of rickettsia in Slovenian ticks i coxiella burneti and rickettsia in the sf spotted fever group and serological studies in animals and humans at selected localities in lucenec and v krt s districts.
19	sites of organic acid production and pattern of digesta movement in the gastrointestinal tract of swine	Production sites; organic acids and pattern of digesta movements in the swine intestinal tract.
19	changes in the intestinal lactase activity in the small intestine of two breeds of swine from birth to 6 weeks of age	Changes in intestinal lactase activity; intestinal lactase activity in the intestine; small intestine of two strains of swine, from birth to death; age 6 weeks.
19	pure human big gastrin immunochemical properties disappearance half time and acid stimulating action in dogs	In dogs, the immunochemical properties of large pure human gastrin disappear at mi-time and stimulate l' action of l' acid.
19	comparison of three methods for the detection of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by five european laboratories	Comparison of three methods for detection of trichinella spiralis infections in swine by five European Laboratories.
19	serodiagnosis of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by enzyme linked immunosorbent assays	Immuno-enzymatic testing for trichinella spiralis infections in pigs.
19	effect of follicular fluid and oestradiol on the luteinization of rat granulosa cells in vitro	Effect of follicular fluid and estradiol on luteinization of rat granulosa cells in vitro.
19	development of ceruloplasmin in pigs during the neonatal period	The development of ceruloplasmin in the pig during the neonatal period.
19	leptospirosis in ethiopia a serological survey in domestic and wild animals	Leptospirosis (leptospirosis) in Ethiopia is a serological study in domestic and wild animals.
19	effects of estradiol 17beta on lh rh fsh rh induced and spontaneous lh release in prepubertal female pigs	Effects of l*apos; estradiol 17beta on lh rh rh fsh rh induced and spontaneous release of lh in prepubertal female swine.
19	acute and chronic estradiol 17beta inhibition of lh release in prepubertal female pigs time course and site of action	Acute and chronic inhibition of estradiol 17beta release of lh in prepubescent female pigs chronologically and at the d&apos site; action.
19	serologic evidence of venezuelan equine encephalitis in some wild and domestic populations of southern texas	Serological evidence of Venezuelan encephalitis in some wild and domestic populations in southern Texas.
19	chemical debridement of burns	Chemical shedding of burns.
19	investigation of choriocarcinoma clonal cell lines in vitro and choriocarcinoma transplants in the hamster for the secretion of a thyroid stimulating factor	Examination of clonal choriocarcinoma cell lines in vitro and choriocarcinoma grafts in hamster for d&apos secretion, a thyroid-stimulating factor.
19	the removal of the seminal vesicles from the boar and the effects on the semen characteristics	L' removal of wild boar seminal vesicles and effects on the characteristics of the semen.
19	drug and chemical residues in domestic animals	Drug and chemical residues in domestic animals.
19	passive immunity in transmissible gastroenteritis of swine immunoglobulin characteristics of antibodies in milk after inoculating virus by different routes	Immunity passive in the gastro-transmissible enteritis of the characteristics of d' porcine immunoglobulin of antibodies in milk after inoculation of the virus by different routes.
19	pharmacologic endocrinological findings in animal experiments with turisynchron and suisynchron 4 analysis of residuals in pig carcasses	Pharmacological endocrinological results obtained from animal experiments using apo; turisynchron and follow-up analysis of residues in swine carcasses.
19	synchronization of estrus by the use of turisynchron premix and insemination time in young gilts	Synchronization of apo; use of apo; a turisynchronous premix and time; insemination in young children.
19	behavior of neutral 17 ketosteroids in the urine of female pigs	Behaviour of the 17 neutral ketosteroids in the female pig's urine.
19	onset of puberty in young gilts kept under conditions of intensive husbandry	Early puberty in young gilts kept under drought conditions; intensive rearing.
19	some effects of growth medium composition on the antigenicity of a t strain mycoplasma	Some effects of composition of growth medium on antigenicity of a mycoplasma mycoplasma strain.
19	prevention by methylprednisolone of the endothelial lesions in rabbits on a hypercholesterolic diet or submitted to immunologic injury	Methylprednisolone prevention of endothelial lesions in hypercholesterically fed rabbits and rabbits exposed to immunological lesions.
19	identification of a folate binder in hog kidney	Identification of a folate binding agent in the swine kidney.
19	uptake of dopamine into fractions of pig caudate nucleus homogenates	Dopamine uptake in d&apos fractions; homogenates of caudate pork nuclei.
19	distribution of the dental lamina and deciduous tooth development in the mandible of the domestic pig	Distribution of the dental lamina and development of the deciduous teeth in the mandible of domestic pork.
19	diagnostic and therapeutic use of lh releasing hormone	Diagnostic and therapeutic use of llh-releasing hormone.
19	calcium antagonism a new principle in coronary vasodilation	Calcium antagonism is a new principle in the coronary vasodilation.
19	oestrogen progesterone and corticosteroid concentrations in peripheral plasma of sows during pregnancy parturition lactation and after weaning	Concentrations of progesterone and estrogenic corticosteroids in the sow's peripheral plasma during pregnancy lactation and postweaning.
19	superfusion in vitro in the study of ovarian steroidogenesis	In vitro superfusion in the apos; ovarian steroidogenesis study.
19	the lethal effect of mebendazole on secondary echinococcus granulosus cysticerci of taenia pisiformis and tetrathyridia of mesocestoides corti	L' lethal effect of mebendazole on the secondary echinococcus granulosus cysticerci of taenia pisiformis and mesocestoid tetrathyridia corti.
19	laryngeal chemosensitivity a possible mechanism for sudden infant death	Laryngeal chemosensitivity is a possible mechanism of sudden infant death syndrome.
19	experimental intracerebral movement of electron microscopic tracers of various molecular sizes	Experimental intracerebral movement of electron microscopic tracers of varying molecular sizes.
19	ultrastructural changes in ascaris suum intestine after mebendazole treatment in vivo	Ultrastructural changes in the intestine of the intestine; ascaris suum after mebendazole treatment in vivo.
19	treatment of gastroschisis and omphalocele with biological dressings	Treatment of gastroschisis and epos; biological dressings.
19	microtubule macrotubule transitions intermediates after exposure to the mitotic inhibitor vinblastine	Transitions of microtubule macrotubules were intermediate after exposure to the mitotic inhibitor vinblastine.
19	growth of nosema algerae in pig kidney cell cultures	Growth of nosema algerae in cultured pig kidney cells.
19	immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine i investigations with the tube test author s transl	Apos technique; immunofluorescence for diagnosis of trichinella in swine surveys with apos; author of air-tube test.
19	immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine ii comparative investigations with the tube test and the cryostate method author s transl	Procedure; immunofluorescence in the diagnosis of trichinella in pigs ii comparative studies with tube test and cryostate method; transl.
19	hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis virus hev infections in swine serologic indication for infectional occurrence in denmark	Hepatic hepatitis viral infections; hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis in swine serological indications for onset of apos; infection in denmark.
19	radioimmunoassay of serum pancreatic amylase in normal and pancreatectomized pigs 38504	Serum pancreatic amylase in normal and pancreatized pigs 38504.
19	failure of free fatty acids to influence degree of myocardial injury following acute coronary artery occlusion in pigs	Inability of free fatty acids to affect degree of myocardial injury after acute occlusion of the porcine coronary artery.
19	radioimmunoassay for gh release inhibiting hormone	Immunoassay of the hormone inhibitory to gh release.
19	effect of chronic ethanol ingestion on mitochondrial protein synthesis in sinclair s 1 miniature swine	Effect of chronic ethanol ingestion on protein synthesis in sinclair s 1 miniature swine.
19	drug metabolism in early life	Metabolism of early life medications.
19	the influence of route of vaccination on the systemic and local immune response in the pig	L' influence of route of immunization on systemic and local immune response in swine.
19	histochemical development of myofibres in neonatal piglets	Histochemical development of myofibres in newborn hogs and piglets.
19	growth of motor end plates and histochemistry of intrafusal myofibres in neonatal piglets	End-plate growth and histochemistry of intrafusal myofibres in newborn-piglets.
19	intestinal adenomatosis in the pig a possible relationship with a haemorrhagic enteropathy	Intestinal adenomatosis in pigs a possible association with enteric hemorrhagic disease.
19	plasma scalpel excision of burns an experimental study	Plasma scalpel burns an experimental study.
19	villous atrophy in pigs orally infected with salmonella cholerae suis	Villositary wasting in pigs with orally infected amoeba salmonella.
19	cultures of pig macrophages	Pig macrophage.
19	the characterisation of campylobacter sputorum subspecies mucosalis isolated from pigs	Characterization of campylobacter sputorum from the isolated swine under-species mucosalis.
19	the experimental reproduction of thrombocytopenic purpura in piglets	Experimental reproduction of thrombocytopenic purpura in piglets.
19	studies on influencing gonadal function sexual behavior and growth in the pig by prenatal treatment with testosterone enanthate or estradiol benzoate	Studies on the dosage; influence of prenatal treatment with testosterone enanthate or benzoate d' estradiol on sexual behaviour and gonadal growth in pigs.
19	effect of glucocorticoids on release of lysosomal enzymes in liver ischemia and hemorrhagic shock in pigs	Effect of glucocorticoids on glucose release; lysosomal enzymes in the liver; hepatic ischemia and hemorrhagic shock in pigs.
19	sequence of heme decomposition by the coupled oxidation of myoglobin with ascorbic acid	Apos decomposition sequence; heme by apos; coupled oxidation of myoglobin with apos; ascorbic acid.
19	identification of a calcium binding protein as a calcium dependent regulator of brain adenylate cyclase	Identification of a brain adenylate cyclase calcium-binding protein as a calcium-dependent regulator.
19	increased parathyroid hormone secretion and hypocalcemia in experimental pancreatitis necessity for an intact thyroid gland	Increases in apo secretion; parathyroid hormone and apo; hypocalcemia in experimental pancreatitis required for intact thyroid gland.
19	use of neuroleptic agents in modern pig farming author s transl	Use of neuroleptic agents in modern swine rearing.
19	problems of resistance author s transl	The problem of resistance is a translation of the problem of resistance.
19	efficacy of different phosphorus supplements for sows during gestation and lactation	Efficiency of various phosphorus supplements for sows during pregnancy and lactation.
19	intestinal intubation in the unanaesthetised miniature pig technique for sampling and measurement of gut length per fistulam	Intestinal intubation in the miniature unanaesthetized swine technique for intestinal trapping; sampling and measurement of digestive tract length by fistulam.
19	an immunologic study of hyaluronidase of different animal origin	Immunological study of apotism; hyaluronidase d*apos; different animal origin.
19	a comparative study of the anti anemic effect of new bulgarian iron dextran complexes with miofer 100 and ferroglucin 75 in rats and swine	A comparative study of the anti-anemic effect of new Bulgarian iron dextran complexes with miofer 100 and ferroglucine 75 in rats and pigs.
19	the pathogenesis of swine plague the hepato cerebral syndrome	The pathogenesis of swine fever, the brain syndrome of the liver, is at the origin of the disease.
19	escherichia coli serotype distribution in man and animals	Distribution of Escherichia coli serotypes in humans and animals.
19	primary pathological changes in cells infected with tick borne encephalitis virus	Primary pathological changes in LV-infected cells; encephalitis transmitted by ticks.
19	use of procine zenografts in treatment of fournier s gangrene	Use of procin zenografts in the treatment of the gangrene of furnaces.
19	occurrence of k88 negative escherichia coli serotypes in pigs with post weaning diarrhoea	Presence of serotypes of d' escherichia coli k88 negative in pigs with post-weaning diarrhea.
19	experimental transmission of japanese encephalitis virus by culex tritaeniorhynchus and c fuscocephalus	Experimental transmission of the virus of l' Japanese encephalitis by culex tritaeniorhynchus and c fuscocephalus.
19	force generating capacity and contractile protein content of arterial smooth muscle	Force production capacity and contractile protein content of the arterial smooth muscle.
19	development of skin interfacing cannula	D&apos canule development; skin interface.
19	assessment of gh releasing hormone activity in sephadex separated fractions of porcine hypothalamic extracts by hypophyseal portal vessel infusion in the rat	Lapos; evaluation of apos; apo activity; gh-releasing hormone in the sephadex separated porcine hypothalamic extracts by infusion of pituitary portal vessels in the rat.
19	rabbit beta glucuronidase subcellular distribution and immunochemical properties	Subcellular distribution and immunochemical properties of rabbit beta glucuronidase.
19	the effects of acetylcolletotrichin on the mitochondrial respiratory chain	Effects of acetylcolletotrichine on the mitochondrial respiratory chain.
19	comparison of the sensitivity of laboratory animals and tissue cultures to infection with aujeszky s disease virus	Comparison of susceptibility of laboratory animals and tissue cultures to apos disease virus; Aujesky s.
19	samonellosis and meat hygiene red meat	Samonellosis and Meat Hygiene Red meat.
19	the effect of species and organ specific features of tissue systems on the reactogenic and immunogenic properties of influenza virus	Effect of species- and organ-specific characteristics of the tissue systems on the reactogenic and immunogenic properties of the influenza virus.
19	the zoonoses order 1975	Zoonotic order 1975.
19	problem of homologization of the cerebral neocortex in cetaceans	Cerebral neocortex registration in cetaceans.
19	observations on the histomorphology of sarcosporidian cysts of some east african game animals artiodactyla	Observations on l' histomorphology of Sarcosporid cysts of some hunting animals of l' Africa of l' East, artiodactyla.
19	evaluation of prosthetic grafts of different porosity for arterial reconstruction	Evaluation of different porosity artificial limbs for arterial reconstruction.
19	sites of organic acid production and absorption in gastrointestinal tract of the pig	Production sites and sites; absorption of organic acids in the pig intestinal tract.
19	arsenic residues in livers of swine lamb and poultry and in eggs	Dapos residues; arsenic in the liver of pork and poultry lambs and eggs.
19	frequency distribution of s typhi murium phage types in various countries	Frequency of distribution of Typhi Murium phage types in various countries.
19	on the sugar content of the lipopolysaccharides of the various strains known as yersinia enterocolitica	On the sugar content of the lipopolysaccharides of the various strains known as the yersinia enterocolitica.
19	investigations on toxic fractions of swine erysipelas bacteria erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 1 communication toxicity investigation on a phenol water extract in chicken embryos author s transl	Studies of toxic fractions of the pig erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae bacterium 1 Toxicity study of phenol to communication; an aqueous extract in translational chicken embryos.
19	the differenziation of swine mycoplasma by acrylamide gel electrophoresis author s transl	The difference in electrophoretic acrylamide gel electrophoresis in mycoplasma.
19	pasteurella multocida serotyping results 1971 1973	Results of serotyping pasteurella multocida 1973.
19	bone canaliculus endings in the area of the osteocyte lacuna electron microscopic studies	Bone canalicular endings in the region of the apos; electron microscopic study of bone cells in lacunaries.
19	a comparsion of glycopeptides from the transferrins of several species	Comparison of the glycopeptides from transferrins of several species.
19	active sitve titration of pig plasma benzylamine oxidase with phenylhydrazine	Title of active seat of pork plasma benzylamine oxidase with phenylhydrazine.
19	lidocaine effects on brain mitochondrial metabolism in vitro	Effects of lidocaine on the cerebral mitochondrial metabolism in vitro.
19	purification and heterogeneity of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pig scapula cartilage	Purification and lapos; heterogeneity of inorganic cartilage pyrophosphatase of pork omelet.
19	properties of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pig scapula cartilage	Properties of inorganic pig cartilage pyrophosphatase; pork shoulder blade.
19	observations on the lipolytic and melanotropic properties of neurophysin proteins	Observations on the lipolytic and melanotropic properties of the neurophysins.
19	bacteriocinogeny in yersinia enterocolitica	"""Britiocinogenesis in yersinia enterocolitica.""."
19	the formation of mono n acetylhexosamine derivatives of dolichol diphosphate by pig liver microsomal fractions	Microsomal fractions of pig liver formed mono n acetylhexosamine derivatives of dolichol diphosphate.
19	chronic urticaria from isophane insulin therapy sensitivity associated with noninsulin components in commercial preparations	Uricaria chronic de l'apos; isophane insulin sensitive to apos; insulin therapy associated with non-insulin components in commercial preparations.
19	conduit reconstruction of right ventricular outflow tract experience with 17 patients	Right ventricular canal rehabilitation in 17 patients.
19	biotransformation of pregnenolone 7alpha 3h progesterone 7alpha 3h and dehydroepiandrosterone 7alpha 3h by porcine fetal and maternal adrenal homogenate preparations	Biotransformation of pregnenolone 7alpha 3h progesterone 7alpha 3h and dehydroepiandrosterone 7alpha 3h by preparations of porcine and maternal fetal adrenals.
19	temperature distribution produced in models by three microwave applicators at 433 92 megahertz	Temperature distribution in models by three micro-@-@wave (433,92 megahertz) applicators.
19	some investigations on the adjuvant mechanism of deae dextran	Research into the adjuvant mechanism of deae dextran.
19	inhibition spectra of the human pancreatic endopeptidases	Spectrum D' inhibition of human pancreatic endopeptidases.
19	simultaneous changes in pancreatic and gastric secretion induced by acute intravenous ethanol infusion effect of atropine and reserpine	Simultaneous changes in pancreatic and gastric secretion due to apos; effects of acute intravenous infusion of apos; ethanol dapos; atropine and reserpine.
19	lens cell growth in tissue culture	Growth of lens cells in tissue cultures.
19	tests on the bactericidal effectiveness of iodophor a in the halls of a pig fattening station	Tests on the bactericidal efficiency of l'apos; iodophor a in the corridors d'apos; a station; fattening of pigs.
19	pharmacokinetic study of maleate acid of 2 n n dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 cyclohexylpropionate cyprodenate and of n n dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 in animals	Pharmacokinetic study of 2-n n-dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 cyclohexylpropionate cyprodenate and n-dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 in animals.
19	the two domain structure of cytochrome b5 in deoxycholate solution	The two-domain solution structure of cytochrome b5 in deoxycholate.
19	activity values of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the serum of farm aminals	D&apos values; lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity in farm aminals serum.
19	use of electron microscopy for the rapid diagnosis of poxvirus diseases smallpox in swine	Use of electron microscopy for the rapid diagnosis of disease caused by poxvirus variola in swine.
19	evaluation of chromatin clumping and myelination of the spinal cord of pigs with congential tremor	Evaluation of chromatin agglomeration and spinal cord myelination in pigs with congenital tremors.
19	the etiology of swine dysentery iii the role of selected gram negative obligate anaerobes	Swine dysentery etiology iii the role of some gram-mandatory anaerobic negatives.
19	anthrax in england and wales 1963 1972	Immigration in England and Wales 1963.
19	investigation of suspected cases of mycotoxicosis in farm animals in britain	Investigation of suspected cases of mycotoxicosis in Great Farm animals-Brittany.
19	activity of several serum enzymes in swine with acute plague	The activity of several serum enzymes in swine infected with apo-positive swine.
19	phage typing of strains of s enteritidis isolated in bulgaria	Lysotyping of enteritidis s strains isolated from Bulgaria.
19	partial purification and characterization of the antidiuretic hormone inactivating enzyme from renal plasma membranes	Partial purification and characterization of the apos; enzyme d' inactivation of the apos; antidiuretic hormone of the renal plasma membranes.
19	coupled optical rate determinations of amino acid oxidase activity	Determination of coupled optical rates of apos; apos activity; amino acid oxidase.
19	a cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent histone kinase from pig brain purification and some properties of the enzyme	An apos-dependent histone kinase; cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from purification of pig brain and certain properties of the enzyme.
19	organophosphate inhibitors the reactions of bis p nitrophenyl methyl phosphate with liver carboxylesterases and alpha chymotrypsin	L' organophosphate inhibits the reactions of bis pnitrophenyl methyl phosphate with the hepatic carboxylesterases and l' alpha chymotrypsin.
19	isolation composition and functional properties of alpha lactalbumins from several species	Composition and functional properties of, isolation of alpha lactalbumins of several species.
19	the porcine endothelial cell in tissue culture	Porcine endothelial cell in tissue culture.
19	distribution of fatty acids incorporated into triacylglycerols by microsome cytosol preparations from adipose tissue	Distribution of d' fatty acids incorporated into triacylglycerols by adipose tissue microsomal cytosolic preparations.
19	pigs susceptible to energy metabolism in the fulminant hyperthermia stress syndrome	Pigs sensitive to energy metabolism in a raging hyperthermic stress disorder.
19	microtubule formation from two components separated by gel filtration of a tubulin preparation	Microtubule formation from two gel filtration separated components; tubulin preparation.
19	characterization and quantitation of the five major plasma protein fractions in seven day old piglets	Characterization and quantification of the five major plasma protein fractions of 7-day-old piglets.
19	diagnostic value of serum creatine phosphokinase activity for the porcine malignant hyperthermia syndrome	Diagnostic value of apo; serum creatine phosphokinase activity for d*apos syndrome; swine malignant hyperthermia.
19	mechanics of the knee joint part ii the final rotation author s transl	Mechanical voice; knee joint part ii l' final translation rotation author.
19	protection against neonatal enteric colibacillosis in pigs suckling orally vaccinated sows	Epidemiology of colibacillosis in the United States.
19	enteric colibacillosis evaluation of strains of escherichia coli utilizing the ligated loop technique in gnotobiotic swine	Evaluation of enteric colibacillosis in gnotobiotic swine; escherichia coli using the lupus technique; ligated anse.
19	efficacy of two dichlorvos formulations against larval and adult hyostrongylus rubidus in swine	Effectiveness of two dichlorovos formulations against adult and larval hyostrongylus rubidus in the pig.
19	effects of different concentrations of corn oil magnesium sulfate and oat hulls in a porcine ulcerogenic ration	Effects of varying concentrations of magnesium sulphate from potato; corn oil and potato hulls; oats in ulcerable swine diet.
19	incidence of antibody for hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis virus in serums from swine in the united states	Incidence of antibodies to the virus of l'apos; hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis in sera of pigs in the states @-@United States.
19	joint changes in lameness of confined swine	Joint changes in confined hog limp.
19	swine dysentery pathogenicity of treponema hyodysenteriae	Treponema hyodysenteriae is found to be a pathogen of porcine dysentery.
19	imprinting of domestic animals on man	The apos; imprint of the pets on the apos; man by lapos; imprint of the pets on the apos; man.
19	neuraminidase neutralizing antibodies in pigs with chronic erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae infection author s transl	Antibody-neutralizing neuraminidase (Neuraminidase) in swine with apos; erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae chronic apos; transl infection.
19	the intestinal phase of gastric secretion	The intestinal phase of gastric secretion.
19	effects of hypoxia on the distribution of calcium in arterial smooth muscle cells of rats and swine	Effects of hypoxia on the distribution of calcium in smooth muscle cells in rats and pigs.
19	ultrastructural study of crystalloids in sertoli cells of the normal intersex and experimental cryptorchid swine	Ultrastructural study of crystalloids in Servoli cells of normal intersex and cryptorchid experimental pigs.
19	nitrofurantoin test for the differentiation of bordetella bronchiseptica author s transl	Nitrofurantoinne smear test for the differentiation of translational author bordetella bronchiseptica.
19	studies of the toxic components of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 2 communication detailed characterization of an extracted endotoxin author s transl	Toxic component studies of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 2 communication, detailed characterization of apos; author of endotoxin extracted s transl.
19	purification and characterisation of two porcine hypothalamic fractions with lh releasing activity evidence for a single lh and fsh releasing hormone	Purification and characterization of two porcine hypothalamic fractions with lupus release activity demonstrated the existence of apos; a single release hormone of lh and fsh.
19	induced synthesis of metallothionein by pig kidney cells in vitro in response to cadmium	In vitro synthesis of metallothionein by pig kidney cells in response to cadmium.
19	sleep stage regulation of ventricular arrhythmias in the unanesthetized pig	The regulation of sleeping ventricular arrhythmias in unanesthetized pigs.
19	functional evaluation of the porcine heterograft in the mitral position	Functional evaluation of the apos; pig heterograft mitral position.
19	radioassay of serum folate with use of pig plasma folate binders	Urine testing of serum folate at apos; assistance with porcine plasma folate binders.
19	the copolymeric structure of pig skin dermatan suplhate characterization of d glucuronic acid containing oligosaccharides isolated after controlled degradation of oxydermatan sulphate	The copolymeric structure of pig dermatan under @-@plhate characterization of l' glucuronic acid d containing oligosaccharides isolated after controlled degradation of sulfate d' oxidatane.
19	the copolymeric structure of pig skin dermatan sulphate isolation and characterization of l idurono sulphate containing oligosaccharides from copolymeric chains	Copolymeric structure of l' isolation of pig skin dermatan sulfate and characterization of the lidurono sulfate oligosaccharide-containing oligosaccharide from the copolymer chains.
19	application of polyvinylpyrrolidone as a carrier for kallikrein	Application of polyvinylpyrrolidone as a kallikrein carrier.
19	the effect of growth hormone on established cartilage lesions a presidential address to the association of bone and joint surgeons 1974	The effect of growth hormone on established cartilage lesions, a presidential speech at the Association of Bone and Joint Surgeons, 1974.
19	small angle x ray scattering of pig thyroglobulin in solution	Small angle x scattering solution of pig thyroglobulin X-rays.
19	studies on the metabolism of 5alpha androst 16 en 3 one in boar tests in vivo	Studies of the metabolism of 5alpha androst 16 in wild boar in vivo.
19	severe hemolysis with a fabric worn cloth covered aortic valve prosthesis	Severe hemolysis with worn tissue covered the aortic valve prosthesis.
19	purification properties and kinetics of sheep and human renin substrates	Purification and kinetic properties of human renin and sheep renin substrates.
19	amino terminal residue heterogeneity of bovine and ovine growth hormones as revealed by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis revealed apos; heterogeneity of terminal amino residues of bovine and ovine growth hormones.
19	an inhibitory influence of granulosa cells and follicular fluid upon porcine oocyte meiosis in vitro	Inhibitor influence of granulosa cells and follicular fluid on in vitro porcine oocyte meiosis.
19	development of a radioimmunoassay for porcine relaxin using 125i labeled polytyrosyl relaxin	Development of apos; a radioimmunoassay of porcine relaxin at apos; 125i labelled polytyrosyl relaxin.
19	the importance of the stomach in gastrin induced hypocalcemia in the rat	Lapos; importance of the stomach in the gastrin induced rat hypocalcemia.
19	cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate levels in separated bone cells	Cyclic rate of d' adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in separated bone cells.
19	ultrastructure of the early ovary and testis in pig embryos	L' ultrastructure of the apos; early ovary and testis in pig embryos.
19	relationship between enhanced turnover of phosphatidylinositol and lymphocyte activation by mitogens	Relationship between apos; increase in phosphatidylinositol turnover and apos; lymphocyte activation by mitogens.
19	ion pair formation as a source of enhanced reactivity of the essential thiol group of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	The formation of pairs of d' ions as a source of increased reactivity of the essential thiol group of the d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	fetal ingestion and metabolism of amniotic fluid protein	Fetal ingestion and metabolism of the amniotic fluid protein.
19	role of pyloric reflux in experimental stress ulceration during haemorrhagic shock	The role of pyloric reflux in experimental hemorrhagic shock stress ulceration.
19	flat gel polyacrylamide electrophoresis of porcine mycoplasmas	Polyacrylamide flat gel electrophoresis (PGA) of porcine mycoplasmas.
19	total calcium content of skeletal muscle isolated from humans and pigs susceptible to malignant hyperthermia	Calcium is the total calcium content of the skeletal muscle isolated from humans and from swine that are sensitive to apos; malignant hyperthermia.
19	procaine in porcine malignant hyperthermia	Procaine in hyperthermia hyperthermia.
19	cellular characteristics of skeletal muscle in selected strains of pigs and mice and the unselected controls	Skeletal muscle cell characteristics in some strains of swine and mice and unselected controls.
19	complete identification of endocrine cells in the gastrointestinal tract using semithin thin sections to identify motilin cells in human and animal intestine	Complete identification of endocrine cells in the gastro-intestinal tract-at baseline; assistance with thin sections of semithin to identify motilin cells in the human and animal intestines.
19	swine lipoproteins and atherosclerosis changes in the plasma lipoproteins and apoproteins induced by cholesterol feeding	Pig lipoproteins and l-apos; atherosclerosis alter cholesterol-induced lipoproteins and plasma apoproteins.
19	gelbsilber rabbits a closed colony of high responders to the lactic dehydrogenase isoenzyme ldh h4 possible mechanisms controlling the response	Gelbsilber rabbits form a closed colony of highly reactive individuals; isoenzyme ldh h4 of lactic dehydrogenase as a possible mechanism of response control.
19	use of the immune tolerance induction in the production of an antilymphocyte serum als free of antibodies against serum proteins	Use of apo; induction of immune tolerance in the production of apo-free anti-cellular serum; serum protein antibody.
19	fragments of bovine serum albumin produced by limited proteolysis isolation and characterization of tryptic fragments	Bovine serum albumin produced by limited isolation by proteolysis and characterization of tryptic fragments.
19	survival of certain pathogenic organisms in swine lagoon effluent	Survival of certain pathogens in swine lagoon effluent.
19	on the relationship between tetracycline and the incremental lines in dentine	The relationship between tetracycline and the increments in dentine.
19	the ultrastructure of the sensory end organs baroreceptors in the atrial endocardium of young mini pigs	L' ultrastructure of baroreceptor terminal sensory organs in the atrial endocardium of young mini-pigs.
19	elevated serum growth hormone in protein deprived rats and decreased liver rna after hypophysectomy	Lapos; increase in serum growth hormone in protein-deprived rats and decrease in post-aposal liver rna; hypophysectomy.
19	physical parameters and chemical composition of porcine pancreatic elastase ii	Physical parameters and chemical composition of the porcine pancreatic elastase ii.
19	application of immunofluorescence and immunoenzyme methods in the serodiagnosis of trichinella spiralis infection	Application of apos, immunofluorescence and immunoblotting methods; immunoenzyme in diagnosis of apos; trichinella spiralis infection.
19	neutral glycosphingolipids containing mannose from the bivalve corbicula sandai	Glycosphingolipids containing mannose from the bivalve corbicula sandai.
19	biological characterization of fusobacterium necrophorum cell fractions in preparation for toxin and immunization studies	Biological characterization of the cellular fractions of fusobacterium necrophorum in preparation for toxin and immunization studies.
19	a rapid modified gas chromatographic assay for esterase activity	A modified rapid gas chromatographic test for esterase activity.
19	microfluorometric evaluation of conjugate specificity with the defined antigen substrate spheres dass system	Microfluorometric evaluation of conjugate specificity with the defined spherical substrate system of the antigen dass system.
19	ultrastructure of the synaptic junctional lattice isolated from mammalian brain	Synaptic junctional network ultrastructure isolated from mammalian brain.
19	intracellular distribution of beta galactosidases in mucosal cells from hog small intestine	Intracellular distribution of beta galactosidases in porcine mucosal cells; small intestine.
19	subcellular fractionation partial purification and characterization of neutral triacylglycerol lipase from pig liver	By subcellular fractionation, partial purification, and characterization of neutral pig liver triacylglycerol lipase.
19	effects of various dietary levels of dried whey on the performance of growing pigs	Effects of various dietary levels of dried whey on performance of growing pigs.
19	effects of diets containing dried whey on the lactase activity of the small intestinal mucosa and the contents of the small intestine and cecum of the pig	Effects of diets containing dried whey on appetite; lactase activity of the mucosa of the intestines; small intestine and the contents of the intestine; small intestine and the caecum of the pig.
19	differential responses of duroc hampshire and crossbred pigs to a superimposed experimental infection with the intestinal threadworm strongyloides ransomi	Differential responses of duroc hampshire and swine to experimental infection by Strongyloides ransomi filament worms.
19	in vitro biology of corneal epithelium and endothelium	In vitro biology of the epithelium corneum and the apos; endothelium.
19	feed refusal factors in pure cultures of fusarium roseum graminearum	Food-refusal factors in pure fusarium roseum graminearum cultures.
19	helminth parasitisms among intermingling insular populations of white tailed deer feral cattle and feral swine	Helminth parasitism among the island populations interspersed with both wild-tailed cattle and wild swine.
19	l fucose metabolism in mammals purification of pork liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase by nad agarose affinity chromatography	Metabolism of fucosis in mammals purification of pig liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase by d&apos chromatography; affinity with nad agarose.
19	l fucose metabolism in mammals kinetic studies on pork liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase	Metabolism of mammalian fucosis Kinetic studies of pig liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase.
19	guinea pig proinsulin primary structure of the c peptide isolated from pancreas	Primary structure of guinea pig proinsulin from peptide c isolated from the pancreas.
19	proinsulin a proposed three dimensional structure	Proinsulin is a proposed three-dimensional structure.
19	evidence for a factor in pig adipose tissue controlling the specificity of the acyltransferase s of triacylglycerol synthesis	L' existence of a factor in porcine adipose tissue that controls the specificity of the triacylglycerol acetyltransferase.
19	binding of 14 c salicylic acid and 14 c pentobarbital to plasma proteins of several species during the perinatal period	Binding of l' salicylic acid 14 c and pentobarbital 14 c to plasma proteins of several species during the perinatal period.
19	comparative study of immunity in swine vaccinated with foot and mouth disease vaccines prepared with various adjuvants	Comparative Dosage Study; immunity in swine vaccinated with FMD vaccines prepared with various adjuvants.
19	influence of tissue emulsions on the phagocytic activity of the res	Influence of tissue emulsions on the cell; res phagocytic activity.
19	effect of intramuscular and oral use of antianemic iron preparations in suckling pigs	Effect of oral and intramuscular use of iron anemia preparations in suckling swine.
19	porperties of a strain of herpesvirus suis isolated in cases with various epizootologic and clinical courses of the disease	The porosity of apos, a strain of herpesviruses, is isolated in cases with various clinical and epizootological progression of the disease.
19	use of the direct immunofluorescence method for determination of the tge viral antigen in swine	Use of Dapos method; direct immunofluorescence for determination of antibody; viral antigen tge in swine.
19	antibody formation in swine vaccinated with a lapinized k vaccine and serum against hog cholera	Antibody formation in pigs vaccinated with rabbitized K vaccine and swine cholera serum.
19	level of estrogens in the blood of swine during pregnancy	Dapos; estrogen in blood of pigs during pregnancy.
19	immunoglobulin containing cells in pig mammary gland	L' immunoglobulin contains cells in the mammary gland of pigs.
19	a screening method for determining nitrofuran drug residues in animal tissues	Methods for the detection of residues of nitrofuran in animal tissues.
19	the carboxylic acid groups of bovine luteinizing hormone the effects of their modification on receptor site binding and subunit subunit interaction	D&apos groups; carboxylic acids; luteinizing hormone, the effects of their modification on binding to the receptor site and l' interaction at-unit-unit.
19	proton magnetic resonance spectra or porcine muscle adenylate kinase and substrate complexes	Proton magnetic resonance spectra or complexes of d' adenylate kinase and porcine muscle substrates.
19	sequence position of 3 hydroxyproline in basement membrane collagen isolation of glycyl 3 hydroxyprolyl 4 hydroxyproline from swine kidney	Position of the sequence of 3 hydroxyproline in the basal membrane collagen of pig kidney; isolation of glycyl 3 hydroxyprolyl 4 hydroxyproline.
19	formation and excretion of pyrrole 2 carboxylic acid whole animal and enzyme studies in the rat	Formation and apo; apo excretion; apo pyrrole acid-2 carboxylic acid in the whole animal and enzyme studies in the rat.
19	enzymatic arginylation of beta melanocyte stimulating hormone and of angiotensin ii	Enzyme arginylation of apos; stimulation hormone of the melanocytes beta and apos; angiotensin ii.
19	affinity labeling of d amino acid oxidase with an acetylenic substrate	Marking of apos; affinity of apos; d-amino acid oxidase with acetylene substrate.
19	use of 5 deazafad to study hydrogen transfer in the d amino acid oxidase reaction	Use of 5 deazafad to study d' hydrogen transfer in amino acid oxidase d.
19	properties of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent aldehyde reductase from pig kidney amino acid composition reactivity of cysteinyl residues and stereochemistry of d glyceraldehyde reduction	Properties of l' aldehyde reductase nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent on reactivity of cysteinyl residues of amino acid composition of pig kidney and stereochemistry of reduction of d glyceraldehyde.
19	vasopressin sensitive kidney adenylate cyclase structural requirements for attachment to the receptor and enzyme activation studies with vasopressin analogues	Vasopressin-sensitive renal adenylate cyclase, structural requirements for vasopressin; receptor attachment and d&apos studies; enzyme activation with vasopressin analogs.
19	hodgkin s disease an epidemiological study on 140 children urban rural relation profession of parents domestic animal contact	Hodgkin's disease: an epidemiological study of 140 children living in rural areas, whose parents have been in contact with domestic animals.
19	identification and differentiation of lens cells in tissue culture	Identification and differentiation of the lens cells in tissue culture.
19	study of the tryptophan hydroxyproline coefficient of the meat of animals of different species	Study of the animal dose coefficient; tryptophan hydroxyproline in meat; animals of different species.
19	the purification and some properties of electron transfer flavoprotein and general fatty acyl coenzyme a dehydrogenase from pig liver mitochondria	Purification and certain properties of flavoprotein electron and general fatty acyl acetate transfer coenzyme to dehydrogenase from pig liver mitochondria.
19	rates of passage of digesta and water absorption along the larg intestines of sheep cows and pigs	Digesta and dapo passage rates; absorption of abs; water along the large intestines of sheep, cows and pigs.
19	sequence variability and structure of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Sequence variation and structure of dglyceride phosphate dehydrogenase 3.
19	comparative characteristics of some products of decomposition of lactic protein and fat in cheeses produced with addition of boar pepsin	Comparative characteristics of some of the decomposition products of lactic proteins and fats in cheese obtained by adding wild boar pepsin.
19	candida ingens as a potential fodder protein	Candida ing. is a potential forage protein.
19	chicken glucagon isolation and amino acid sequence studies	Chicken glucagon isolation and amino acid sequence studies.
19	orthotopic liver transplantation utilizing a vascular stapling instrument	Hepatic orthotopic transplants at the apos; aided by a vascular staple.
19	renal transplantation in the unimmunosuppressed pig an abnormal response	Renal transplants in non-immunosuppressed swine and rabies; an abnormal response.
19	increase in numbers of gonadotropin receptors on granulosa cells during follicle maturation	Increased number of gonadotropin receptors on granulosa cells during maturation of follicles.
19	the role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea tarda ii inhibition of uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase	The role of iron in the pathogenesis of skin porphyria was delayed; inhibition of apos; uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase.
19	the microbial flora in the digestive tract of the monogastric and its effect on the nutritional metabolism of the host	The microbial flora in the gastrointestinal tract of the monogastric complex and its effect on the nutritional metabolism of the host organism.
19	the sequences of the coenzyme binding peptide in the cytoplasmic and the mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferases from sheep liver	Coenzyme-binding peptide sequences in cytoplasmic and mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferases from sheep liver.
19	purification of porcine enterokinase by affinity chromatography	Apos purification; porcine enterokinase by apos chromatography; affinity.
19	pig liver pyruvate carboxylase purification properties and cation specificity	Pig liver pyruvate carboxylase purification properties and specificity to pork liver cations.
19	scanning electron microscopy and electron probe microanalysis of calcified alpha elastin coacervates	Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) microanalysis and electron probe of calcified coacervates; alpha-elastin.
19	effect of modifiers on the hydrolysis of basic and neutral peptides by carboxypeptidase b1	Effect of modifiers on apos; hydrolysis of basic and neutral peptides by b1 carboxypeptidase.
19	progesterone synthesis of pig corpus luteum tissue during superfusion	Synthesis of pig corpus luteum progesterone during superfusion.
19	the demonstration of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antigens by immunoelectrophoresis and counterimmunoelectrophoresis	Demonstration of immunoelectrophoretically transmissible and anti-immunoelectrophoresis viral antigens of gastro-enteritis.
19	kinetic study of the percutaneous absorption of 1 2 4 3h labelled flupamesone	Kinetic study of l' percutaneous absorption of 12.43 h of flupamesone label.
19	trends in salmonella food poisoning in england and wales 1941 72	Trends in the incidence of foodborne illness due to salmonella in England and Wales.
19	cleavage of the third complement component c3 and generation of the spasmogenic peptide c3a in human serum via the properdin pathway demonstration of inhibitory as well as enhancing effects of epsilon amino caproic acid	The cleavage of the third component of the c3 complement and the production of the spasmogenic peptide c3a in human serum via the intermediate of the properdin pathway demonstrate the apos; inhibitory effect as well as the apos; stimulatory effect of the apos; caproic acid epsilon.
19	induction of histamine release and desensitization in human leukocytes effect of anaphylatoxin	Induction of Dapos release; histamine and desensitization in apos; effect of apos; anaphylatoxin on human leukocytes.
19	light microscopical electron microscopical and clinical findings in orthotopic allogenic porcine liver homografts author s transl	Light microscopic electronics and clinical results in hepatic homografts of allogeneic orthotopic pig s translators.
19	trans chest ventricular defibrillation of heavy subjects using trapezoidal current waveforms	Trans thoracic ventricular defibrillation of heavy subjects at apo; aid of dapo forms; trapezoidal current waves.
19	studies on brain cytosol neuraminadase i isolation and partial characterization of two forms of the enzyme from pig brain	Studies on apos; isolation of brain cytosol neuraminadase i and partial characterization of two forms of l' pig brain enzyme.
19	concanavalin a nsc 143504 its action on experimental tumor cells and possible use in cancer chemotherapy	Conanavalin has nsc 143504 its action on experimental tumour cells and its possible use in cancer chemotherapy.
19	the nadph dependent cytochrome p 450 reduction in liver microsomes of rats of different ages with and without phenobarbital pretreatment	The nadphin-dependent reduction of cytochrome p 450 in liver microsomes from d' different ages, with and without phenobarbital pretreatment.
19	histamine stimulated hydrogen ion secretion by in vitro piglet gastric mucosa	L' histamine enhanced hydrogen ion secretion from the in vitro gastric mucosa of the piglet.
19	growth hormone release inhibiting hormone in gastrointestinal and pancreatic d cells	The growth hormone inhibits the release of the gastrointestinal and pancreatic growth hormone.
19	inhibition by quinaldate of dehydrogenases	Inhibition of dehydrogenase activity by quinaldate.
19	evaluation of various protein sequences on the nutritional carry over from gestation to lactation with first litter sows	Evaluation of various protein sequences on nutritional transfer from pregnancy to lactation with early litter sows.
19	studies on the metabolism of beta hydroxy aspartic acid	Studies of lipos metabolism; beta acid-hydroxyaspartic acid.
19	histochemical identification of glycoproteins in pig bronchial epithelium a normal and b hypertrophied from enzootic pneumonia	Histochemical identification of glycoproteins in the epithelium; bronchial epithelium has normal pork and b hypertrophied as a result of d'apos; enzootic pneumonia.
19	porcine streptococci causing meningitis and septicaemia in man	Swine streptococci cause meningitis and sepsis in males.
19	changes with age in the occurrence of c19 steroids in the testis and submaxillary gland of the boar	The presence of c19 steroids in the testicles and gland under-maxillary of the wild boar changes with age.
19	improvements in the technical conditions for the evaluation of an elastolytic activity the role of tryspin as an activator author s transl	Improvement of technical conditions for the apos; evaluation of apos; elastolytic activity role of tryspin as a translator activator.
19	estimation of seric and parietal inhibiting power of elastase its changes with experimental conditions	Estimation of the serum and parietal inhibitory potency of elastase, its changes under experimental conditions.
19	relative competition of corticosterone cortisol cortisone 11 dexycortisol and prednisolone with 1 2 3h cortisol in various protein binding radioassay systems	Comparison of cortisone cortisol cortisone 11 dexycortisol and prednisolone with cortisol 1 2 h in a variety of radioactive protein-binding systems.
19	the split ejaculate of the boar contributions of the epididymides and seminal vesicles	L' divided ejaculate from bloody contributions of epididymides and seminal vesicles.
19	the isolation and characterization of lactoferrin from sow milk and boar seminal plasma	Isolation and characterization of sow's milk lactoferrin and seminal plasma from wild boar.
19	on the interactions between pancreatic lipase and colipase and the substrate and the importance of bile salts	On interactions between pancreatic lipase and colipase and substrate and lipid; importance of bile salts.
19	clearance from the circulation of the rat and whole body autoradiography in the mouse of 125i labelled neurophysins	The clearance of 125i-labelled neurophysins from rat and whole-body autoradiography.
19	isoelectric focusing of boar spermatozoa	Isoelectric focusing of wild boar sperm.
19	physiological temperature response and embryonic mortality in stressed swine	The effects of stress on embryonic mortality.
19	embryonic and placental development during prolonged inanition in the pig	Embryonic and placental development during prolonged porcine starvation.
19	cross linking of hemoglobin haptoglobin and hemoglobin haptoglobin complex with bifunctional imidoesters	Cross links between haptoglobin hemoglobin and haptoglobin complex and bifunctional imidesters.
19	utilization of amino acids administered enterally or parenterally to young pigs	Use of enteral or parenteral amino acids in young pigs.
19	multiple vascular and gastric cannulation of swine for studies of gastrointestinal liver and peripheral tissue metabolism	Multiple vascular and gastric cannulation of pigs for studies of metabolism of the gastro livers-intestinal and peripheral tissues.
19	primary structure of porcine pepsin i purification and placement of cyanogen bromide fragments and the amino acid sequence of fragment cb5	Primary structure of porcine pepsin purification and placement of cyanogen bromide fragments and cb5 amino acid sequence.
19	primary structure of porcine pepsin ii amino acid sequence of two cyanogen bromide fragments cb3 and cb4	Primary structure of the sequence d' porcine pepsin amino acids ii of two cyanogen bromide cb3 and cb4 fragments.
19	effect of electronic cooking on fatty acids in meats	Effect of electronic cooking on the fatty acids in meats.
19	action of growth hormone in vitro on the net uptake and incorporation in protein of amino acids in muscle from intact rabbits given protein deficient diets	Action of in vitro growth hormone (in vitro growth hormone) on capture and uptake; net incorporation of amino acids into muscle proteins of intact rabbits fed protein-deficient diets.
19	intestinal amino acid absorption in vitamin d dependent rickets	L' intestinal absorption d' amino acids in vitamin d-dependent rickets.
19	boar acrosin ii amino acid composition amino terminal residue and molecular weight estimations by ultracentrifugation	Boar Acrosin ii, amino acid composition, amino terminal residue and molecular weight estimation via ultracentrifugation.
19	porcine thyrotropin the amino acid sequence of the alpha and beta subunits	Thyrotropin porcine, sequence d' amino acids of the sub-alpha units and beta.
19	porcine proparathyroid hormone identification biosynthesis and partial amino acid sequence	Biosynthesis of apos; identification of apos; porcine proparathyroid hormone and partial amino acid sequence.
19	amino acid transport by the helicoidal colon of the new born pig	Transport of amino acids via the helical colon of the new-porcine ne.
19	secretion of endogenous amino acids in the gastrointestinal tract and amino acid resorption in the swine	Dapos secretion; endogenous amino acids in the gastrointestinal tract and resorption of amino acids in swine.
19	the mechanism of action of d amino acid oxidase i evidence for a free radical mechanism of the reaction catalyzed b a dimeric form of the enzyme	The mechanism of action of amino acid oxidase i suggests the existence of apos; a free radical reaction mechanism that catalyzes a dimer form of apos; enzyme.
19	studies on the additive character of amino acid absorption data obtained from pigs 2 studies using regression technic	Studies on the additive nature of apo data; amino acid absorption from pigs 2 to apo; and the use of regression techniques.
19	enhancement of antibody response to soluble hsa antigen of young rabbits pretreated with deoxyribonucleic acids from adult donors	Stimulation of the immune response to apos; soluble hsa antigen in young rabbits pretreated with deoxyribonucleic acids from adult donors.
19	phosphoric acid ester preparations used in cattle swine and sheep with special reference to cholinesterase activity 3 use of phosphoric acid ester preparations and their effect on acetylcholinesterase activity in swine	Dapos preparations; phosphoric acids used in swine and sheep, especially for apo; cholinesterase activity 3, apo; use of apo preparations; apo esters; phosphoric acids and their effect on apo; acetylcholinesterase activity in swine.
19	active site chlorination of d amino acid oxidase by n chloro d leucine	Chlorination of amino acid-acid oxidase active site by leucine n chloro.
19	human pituitary lutropin isolation properties and the complete amino acid sequence of the beta subunit	The properties of the isolation of human pituitary lutropin and the complete amino acid sequence of the beta-unit.
19	limiting amino acids of chickpeas cicer arietinum for chickens and pigs	Restriction of amino acids of arietinum capper chickpeas for chickens and swine.
19	amino acid metabolism in the piglet 2 influence of fasting on plasma free amino acid concentration and in vivo oxidation of methionine isoleucine and threonine	The metabolism of amino acids in piglet 2 affects the plasma concentration of free amino acids and l' in vivo oxidation of methionine isoleucine and threonine.
19	vinylglycine and proparglyglycine complementary suicide substrates for l amino acid oxidase and d amino acid oxidase	Both Vinsylglycine and proparglycine are complementary suicidal substrates for amino acid oxidase and l' amino acid oxidase d.
19	influence of coronary effective substances on the concentration of nonesterified fatty acids in the serum of patients with angina pectoris	Influence of effective coronary substances on the concentration of nonesterified fat acids in serum of angina pectoris patients.
19	characterization of tryptic peptides from porcine haptoglobin light chain and an amino acid sequence	Characterization of d&apos light chain tryptic peptides; porcine haptoglobin and d' a d&apos amino acid sequence.
19	correlation of degradative rates of proteins with a parameter calculated from amino acid composition and subunit size	Correlation of protein degradation rates with parameter calculated from amino acid composition and size of sub-units.
19	the effect of halofenate or halofenate free acid on human rat and guinea pig platelet aggregation	The effect of apos; free acid of apos; halofenate or apos; halofenate on apos; platelet aggregation of human rat and guinea pig.
19	studies on the true amino acid digestibility in pigs of various wheat varieties from the soviet union	Studies on the true digestibility of amino acids in pigs of various varieties of wheat of the Soviet Union.
19	protein utilization of mixed feed rations in lactating pigs with reference to the essential amino acid content of the feed proteins 2 report utilization of the feed proteins in the use of soy bean extraction residue waste liquor yeast horse bean meal fish meal and maize gluten for a basic ration	The use of mixed dietary protein in lactating swine with respect to the essential amino acid content of dietary protein 2 refers to apos; food protein use in apos; use of d&apos residue; soybean liqueur extraction of yeast bean flour and corn gluten for a basic diet.
19	protein utilization of mixed feed rations in lactating pigs with reference to the essential amino acid content of the feed proteins 3 report correlation between the protein metabolism data and the amino acid content of the dietary protein	L' utilization of protein from mixed diets in lactating piglets relative to the essential amino acid content of dietary proteins 3 indicates a correlation between the data on protein metabolism and the amino acid content of the dietary protein.
19	conclusions about aminopeptidase in tissue sections from studies of amino acid naphthylamide hydrolysis	Studies on apos; amino acid hydrolysis by naphthylamide led to conclusions on apos; aminopeptidase in tissue sections.
19	effect of alcohols on the structure and function of d amino acid oxidase	Effect of alcohols on structure and function of amino acid oxidase d.
19	determination of the true digestibility of amino acids in pigs	Determination of the true amino acid digestibility of pigs.
19	constant level of intestinal amino acids as a function of the composition of same	Constant level of intestinal amino acids as a function of acid composition.
19	distribution of radioactivity in the body and rate of incorporation of radioactivity into the tissue proteins of monogastric animals following intravenous injection of tracer amino acids	Distribution of radioactivity in the organism and its levels; incorporation of radioactivity into tissue proteins of monogastric animals after intravenous injection of tracer amino acids.
19	amino acid metabolism in the piglet influence of level of protein and of methionine in the diet on tissue uptake and in vivo oxidation	Piglet amino acid metabolism influences the level of protein and methionine in the diet on the apos; tissue absorption and l' in vivo oxidation.
19	oxidation of sarcosine and n alkyl derivatives of glycine by d amino acid oxidase	Oxidation of sarcosine and nalkylated glycine derivatives by apos; amino acid oxidase d.
19	amino acid sequence of penicillopepsin iv myxobacter al 1 protease ii and staphylococcus aureus protease fragments and homology with pig pepsin and chymosin	Penicillopepsin iv myxobacter al 1 protease ii amino acid sequence and staphylococcus aureus protease fragments and porcine pepsin and chymosin homology.
19	the composition of lipids in intestinal digesta of young pigs receiving diets containing tallow and tallow fatty acids	The composition of lipids in the intestinal digestions of young pigs fed tallow and tallow fatty acid diets.
19	the amino terminal sequence of the vhiii subgroup of pooled porcine igg	The sequence of the apos; amino end of the sub-group vhiii d' group swine.
19	influence of amino acids on gastric emptying in young pigs	L' influence of amino acids on gastric emptying in young swine.
19	ribonucleic acid stimulation of mammalian liver nuclear envelope nucleoside triphosphatase a possible enzymic marker for the nuclear envelope	Stimulation by elapos; ribonucleic acid of the nucleoside triphosphatase of elapos; nuclear envelope of mammalian liver, a possible enzymatic marker for elapos.
19	free fatty acids and arrhythmias following acute coronary artery occlusion in pigs	Free fatty acids and arrhythmias after acute occlusion of coronary artery in pigs.
19	some methodical problems in the determination of the true amino acid digestibility in swine	Some methodological problems in determining amino acid digestibility in pigs.
19	influence of dietary trans fatty acids on swine lipoprotein composition and structure	Influence of dietary trans fatty acids on porcine lipoprotein structure and composition.
19	relationships between the apparent digestibility of crude protein and the amino acid balance of the swine digestive tract	Relationship between apparent digestibility of crude protein and digestive amino acid balance in swine.
19	gas chromatographic separation of cholesteryl esters of fatty acids of different degrees of unsaturation	Gas chromatographic separation of cholesteryl esters; fatty acids of varying degrees of degeneration; unsaturation.
19	effect of hydrophobic probes on the higher structure of d amino acid oxidase	Effect of hydrophobic probes on the upper structure of the amino acid oxidase d.
19	effect of halide anions on the binding of fad to d amino acid oxidase and the tryptophanyl fluorescence of the apoenzyme	Effect of halide anions on fad binding to apos; amino acid oxidase and tryptophanyl fluorescence of apos; apoenzyme.
19	interaction of steroids with d amino acid oxidase	Interaction of the steroids with amino acid oxidase d.
19	potentiation of fmd vaccines with polycationic nucleic acid complexes	Potentialization of fmd vaccines by d*apos complexes; polycation nucleic acids.
19	the effect of solids from pig manure as food components in rations for fat bulls heifers and calves on the crude nutrient and amino acid content of the longissimus dorsi muscle	The effect of pig manure solids as dietary components in male heifer and calf rations on the crude nutrient and amino acid content of the muscle longissimus dorsi.
19	comparison of various immunological methods for distinguishing among mammalian pancreatic ribonucleases of known amino acid sequence	Comparison of various immunological methods to distinguish known amino acid sequences of mammalian pancreatic ribonucleases.
19	xiii sausages and luncheon meats comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods	A comprehensive assessment of the fatty acids in foods.
19	n terminal amino acid sequences of acid proteases acid proteases from penicillium roqueforti and rhizopus chinensis and alignment with penicillopepsin and mammalian proteases	N d&apos sequences; terminal amino acids of Penicillium roqueforti and rhizopus chinensis acid proteases and alignment with penicillopepsin and mammalian proteases.
19	studies on nitrogen and amino acid absorption in the swine part 2 the course of 15 n labeling in the chyme urine and blood	Studies on the absorption of nitrogen and nitrogen; amino acids in the porcine part 2 during labelling at 15 n in urine and chyme blood.
19	amino acid requirements of the breeding sow the dietary lysine requirement during pregnancy	The dietary requirements for lysine during pregnancy correspond to the amino acid requirements of reproductive sows.
19	concentrations of cortisol glucose and free fatty acids in the blood plasma of swine in relation to age and in sows close to farrowing	Glucose concentrations of cortisol and dapos; free fatty acids in blood plasma as a function of age in pigs and in sows near delivery.
19	structural study of circulating thymic factor a peptide isolated from pig serum ii amino acid sequence	Structural study of the circulating thymic factor peptide isolated from pig serum ii sequence d' amino acids.
19	lipase hydrolysis of mammalian long chain 1 2 alkanediol diesters nonrandom distribution of fatty acids	L' hydrolysis by lipase of diesters of mammalian long chain 1 alcanediols; does not result in random distribution of fatty acids.
19	absorption of amino acids in isolated pig caecum in situ effect of concentration of enzymatic casein hydrolysate on absorption of amino acids	Lapses; absorption of amino acids in the isolated porcine caecum has an in situ effect of the concentration of the apos; enzymatic hydrolysate of casein on the apos; amino acid absorption.
19	isolation of gamma amino butyric acid from pig hypothalami and demonstration of its prolactin release inhibiting pif activity in vivo and in vitro	L' l&apos isolation; gamma acid-amino-butyric acid; porcine hypothalami and demonstration of prolactin release inhibit l' in vivo and in vitro peaks.
19	binding of fatty acids and tryptophan to alpha fetoprotein from fetal pigs	Determination of fatty acids and of tryptophan at apos; alpha-fetal fetoprotein.
19	estimation of rate of protein synthesis by constant infusion of labelled amino acids in pigs	Estimation of protein synthesis rate by constant infusion of labelled amino acids in pigs.
19	amino acid requirements of the breeding sow 2 the dietary lysine requirement of the lactating sow	Amino acid requirements of breeding sow 2: lysine requirements of feeder sow.
19	partial amino acid sequences of two proteins in developing porcine enamel	Partial sequences; amino acids of two proteins in the developing pig enamel.
19	heterogeneity of amino acid sequence in hippopotamus cytochrome c	Heterogeneity of the amino acid sequence in l' hippopotamus, cytochrome c.
19	porcine follitropin the amino acid sequence of the beta subunit	Swine follitropin, d&apos sequence; amino acids of swine follitropin under-beta unit.
19	the optimal amino acid supplementation of barley for the growing pig 1 response of nitrogen metabolism to progressive supplementation	The optimal amino acid supplementation barley for the response of growing pig 1 nitrogen metabolism to progressive amino acid supplementation.
19	the amino acid supplementation of barley for the growing pig 2 optimal additions of lysine and threonine for growth	Amino acid supplementation of porcine growth barley 2 optimal additions of lysine and threonine for growth.
19	studies on digestion and absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 6 measurements of the flow of amino acids	Digestion and apo studies; intestinal absorption in growing pigs 6 Measures of flux of amino acids.
19	performance dependent lysine requirement of fattening pigs 3 effect of amino acid and energy intake on fat protein and lysine deposition of swine	Effect of amino acids and l' energy input on fat protein and lysine deposition in fattening swine.
19	nitrogen and amino acid absorption in swine 3 endogenous secretion and absorption of nitrogen	Absorption of nitrogen and nitrogen; amino acids in pigs 3 endogenous secretion and nitrogen absorption.
19	nitrogen and amino acid resorption by swine 4 amino acid resorption	Resorption of nitrogen and amino acids by swine Resorption of 4 amino acids.
19	performance related lysine requirement of fattening pigs 4 effect of energy and amino acid intakes on composition of gain and derivation of lysine requirement	Effect of the addition of energy and amino acids on the composition of gain and derivation of requirements for lysine in fattening swine.
19	studies on trypsin inhibitors part ix synthesis and trypsin inhibitory activity of the duopentacontapeptide corresponding to the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor ii kazal	Trypsin Inhibitor Studies, Part X synthesis, and trypsin inhibitory activity of duopentacontapeptide corresponding to the d&apos sequence; l&apos amino acids; porcine ii kazal pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor.
19	de novo fatty acid synthesis and fatty acid elongation catalyzed by subcellular fractions from hog and human aorta	De novo synthesis of fatty acids and fatty acid elongation catalyzed by subcellular fractions of pork aorta and l' human aorta.
19	lysine requirement of fattening boars in respect to their performance 1 influence of the consumption of energy and amino acids on the fattening performance	The lysine requirements of wild boars; fattening relative to their performance 1 influence their consumption of energy and amino acids; fattening.
19	protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 5 results of the application of 35s methionine	Protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the pig gut 5 resulted from the application of methionine 35s.
19	reactions of cysteamine and other amine metabolites with glyoxylate and oxygen catalyzed by mammalian d amino acid oxidase	Cysteamine and d&apos reactions; other amino metabolites with glyoxylate and l' mammalian oxygen; amino acid oxidase.
19	performance dependence of the lysine requirement of fattening sows 1 effect of energy and amino acid consumption on fattening performance	The effect of feed consumption; energy and amino acids on feedstock performance; fattening is dependent on the performance of the sow's lysine requirement.
19	protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 3 results of the fractionation of ileum chyme after feeding various rations	Protein digestibility and apo; amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 3 result from fractionation of chyme from apos; ileum after apos; feeding various rations.
19	protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 4 digestibility of crude protein and amino acids and rate of passage through the duodenum and ileum and the total digestive tract of growing pigs	Protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of growing pigs 4 digestibility of crude proteins and amino acids and rate of passage through the duodenum and l' ileum and total digestive tract.
19	chlorination of an active site tyrosyl residue in d amino acid oxidase by n chloro d leucine	Chlorination of an active tyrosyl residue in amino acid oxidase by n-chloro-leucine.
19	free fatty acids as inhibitors of the respiratory chain in testicular homogenates	Free fatty acids as respiratory chain inhibitors in homogenates of the testis.
19	appearance of 15n labeled intestinal microbial amino acids in the venous blood of the pig colon	L' appearance of 15n-labelled intestinal microbial amino acids in pig colon venous blood.
19	structural study of the heme crevice in cytochrome b5 based on individual assignments of the 1h nmr lines of the heme group and selected amino acid residues	L' structural study of the gap; heme in cytochrome b5 is based on the apos; individual 1h nmr allocation of the heme group and a selection of amino acid residues.
19	studies on digestion and absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 8 measurements of the flow of total lipid acid detergent fibre and volatile fatty acids	For the purposes of this study, the total flux of detergent fibers from both lipidic acids and volatile fatty acids is calculated as the total flux of detergent fibers.
19	the amino acid sequence of porcine intestinal calcium binding protein	The amino acid sequence of the porcine intestinal calcium binding protein.
19	protein digestibility and absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 2 protein and amino acid balances at the end of the small intestine and of the whole digestive tract apparent and true protein and amino acid digestibility	Protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 2 balances proteins and amino acids at the end of the intestine; small intestine and l' whole digestive tract, apparent and true digestibility of proteins and amino acids.
19	porcine pancreatic lipase sequence of the first 234 amino acids of the peptide chain	Pancreatic porcine lipase sequence of the first 234 amino acids in the peptide chain.
19	purification and n terminal amino acid sequence determination of anionic and cationic canine trypsinogens	Purification and sequencing of the terminal amino acids of anionic and cationic canine trypsinogens.
19	amino acid transport by small and large intestine of newborn pig	Amino acid transport by the new pig's small and large intestines-born.
19	gamma glutamyl transpeptidase mediated transport of amino acid in lecithin vesicles	Amino acid transport by gamma glutamyl transpeptidase in lecithin vesicles is mediated by the amino acids.
19	detection of plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in an isolate of lactobacillus acidophilus	Detection of l' deoxyribonucleic plasmid acid in a lactobacillus acidophilus isolate.
19	in vitro effects of fatty acids on the actions of serum on rat and pig cartilage	In vitro effects of fatty acids on the immune system; effects of serum on the cartilage of pigs and rats.
19	messenger ribonucleic acids from pig intestinal mucosa direct synthesis of calcium binding protein in a cell free translation system	Messenger ribonucleic acids of pig intestinal mucosa directly synthesize calcium-binding protein in a cell-free translation system.
19	the primary structure of mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase from pig heart peptides obtained by cleavage at basic residues	The primary structure of the mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase of porcine cardiac peptides obtained by cleavage to basic residues.
19	studies of the spectrum of nonesterified fatty acids in blood and muscle tissue of swine 1 effect of genotype muscular substance	Spectrum studies of nonesterified fatty acids in swine blood and muscle tissue 1 effect of swine muscle genotype.
19	addition of amino acids and oligopeptides to the diet of piglets ii effects on apparent digestion of some alimentary principles	The addition of amino acids and dapos to the piglet diet has effects on the apparent digestion of certain dietary principles.
19	porcine liver dihydrofolate reductase purification properties and amino acid sequence	Swine liver dihydrofolate reductase purification properties and amino acid sequence.
20	the effect of temperature on the direct muscle twitch response and the action of drugs on the isolated denervated rat diaphragm	L' effect of temperature on direct muscle response in twitch and l' action of drugs on isolated rat denervated diaphragm.
20	the maintenance of a colony of anopheles gambiae with observations on the effects of changes in temperature	The maintenance of an anopheles colony with observations on the effects of temperature changes.
20	effects of temperature on the generator and action potentials of a sense organ	The effect of the temperature on the generator and on the potentials; the action of a sensory organ.
20	ethylene oxide gaseous sterilization i concentration and temperature effects	Sterilization at 48°C; oxides of nitrogen; ethylene oxide gaseous concentrations and temperature effects i.
20	a temperature gradient bar and its applications to the study of temperature effects on the growth of reiter s treponeme	A bar of temperature gradient and its applications to apos; study the effects of temperature on the growth of repeated treponem.
20	the effect of temperature on the uptake of radiosulfate by rat renal tissue from radiosulfate containing solutions in vitro	L' effect of temperature on apos; absorption of radiosulfate by rat kidney tissue from radiosulfate-containing solutions in vitro.
20	effects of temperature and anions on titration curves of frog muscle	Effects of temperature and anions on frog muscle titration curves.
20	temperature change the basic variable in the early handling phenomenon	Temperature modifies the basic variable of early manipulation phenomena.
20	celsius versus centigrade the nomenclature of the temperature scale of science	It's the temperature scale of science, the temperature scale of science.
20	cardiovascular responses of the chicken to seasonal and induced temperature changes	Chicken cardiovascular responses to seasonal and induced temperature changes.
20	retardation of division of three ciliates by intermittent and continuous ultraviolet radiations at different temperatures	Division of three ciliates is retarded by intermittent and continuous ultraviolet radiation at different temperatures.
20	temperature and lambda phage reproduction	Temperature and reproduction of lambda phage.
20	temperature and the reproduction of lambda phage mutants	Temperature and reproduction of mutants of the phage lambda.
20	effect of temperature on the potential and current thresholds of axon membrane	Effect of temperature on potential and actual thresholds of the axonal membrane.
20	temperature effects on day old drosophila pupae	The effects of temperature on the pupae of fruit flies and fruit flies.
20	actinomycin d suppression of recovery in x irradiated mammalian cells	Actinomycin suppresses recovery in the cells of irradiated mammals x.
20	influence of moderate temperature on growth and malic dehydrogenase activity of a marine psychrophile	Influence d' moderate temperature on growth and weight; activity of dehydrogenase malic d' marine psychrophil.
20	effect of environmental temperatures on infection with mycobacterium marinum balnei of mice and a number of poikilothermic species	Effect of ambient temperatures on apo; infection by Mycobacterium marinum balnei; a number of poikilothermic species.
20	temperature sensitive dextransucrase synthesis by a lactobacillus	A temperature-sensitive dextransucrase synthesis by a lactobacillus.
20	temperature sensitive hydrogenase and hydrogenase synthesis in a psychrophilic bacterium	Synthesis of heat-sensitive hydrogenase activity in a psychrophilic bacterium.
20	airborne microorganisms in broiler processing plants	Micros-airborne organisms in chicken broiler processing plants.
20	production of penicillin acylase	Penicillin acylase production.
20	survival of shigella in sewage ii effect of glycerol on shigella flexneri and shigella bacteriophage	Survival of shigella in wastewater systems ii effect of glycerol on shigella flexneri and bacteriophage shigella.
20	response of clostridium perfringens spores and vegetative cells to temperature variation	Temperature variations of spores and vegetative cells of clostridium perfringens.
20	characteristics of infectious pancreatic necrosis virus	Characteristics of the infectious pancreatic necrosis virus.
20	temperature dependence of anesthesia in goldfish	Anesthesia is a temperature-dependent process in goldfish.
20	multiplication and therapy of toxoplasma gondii in tissue culture	Propagation and treatment of toxoplasma gondii in cultured tissue.
20	metabolism of mevalonic acid by lactobacillus plantarum	Metabolism of l' mevalonic acid by lactobacillus plantarum.
20	effect of salinity and temperature on coccidioides immitis and three antagonistic soil saprophytes	Effect of salinity and temperature on coccidioides immitis and three soil antagonistic saprophytes.
20	effect of the temperature of growth of escherichia coli on the formation of beta galactosidase	Effect of growth temperature of apos; escherichia coli on beta galactosidase formation.
20	continuous in vitro cultivation of spherules of coccidioides immitis	In vitro culture of spherules of coccidioides immitis.
20	selective destruction by pseudomonas aeruginosa of common antigen of enterobacteriaceae	Pseudomonas aeruginosa selective destruction of the common antigen of enterobacteria.
20	attachment and growth of bacteria on surfaces of continuous culture vessels	Attachment and growth of bacteria on vascular continuous culture surfaces.
20	temperature dependence of the activity of the antitumor factor in the common clam	L' activity of soft-shell clam anti-tumour factor depends on temperature.
20	the effect of temperature on the formation of t1 and t2r bacteriophage	The effect of temperature on the formation of the bacteriophages t1 and t2r.
20	optimal conditions for the transformation of streptococci	Optimal conditions for transformation of streptococci.
20	on the mechanism of some temperature effects on drosophila	The mechanism of certain temperature effects on Drosophila.
20	purification and activity of proteinase of streptococcus faecalis var liquefaciens	Streptococcus faecalis var liquefaciens proteinase activity and purification.
20	isolation of toxigenic strains of clostridium perfringens from soil	Toxigenic strains of clostridium perfringens are isolated from soil.
20	growth characteristics of the blue green algal virus lpp 1	Growth characteristics of blue-green alga lpp.
20	some effects of carbon source aeration and temperature on growth of a psychrophilic strain of pseudomonas fluorescens	Some effects of aeration and temperature of carbon source on growth of a psychrophilic strain of pseudomonas fluorescens.
20	thermally induced genital appendages on mosquitoes	Heat-induced genital appendages on mosquitoes.
20	an electron microscope examination of urinary mucoprotein and its interaction with influenza virus	Electron microscopic (EM) examination of urinary mucoprotein and its interaction with the influenza virus.
20	interrelationship between temperature and sodium chloride on growth of lactic acid bacteria isolated from meat curing brines	Relationship between temperature and sodium chloride on the growth of lactic acid bacteria isolated from healing meats brines.
20	characterization of enterococcus bacteriophages from the small intestine of the rat	Characterization of apo bacteriophages; apo enterococci; rat small intestine.
20	repression of staphylococcus aureus by food bacteria i effect of environmental factors on inhibition	The inhibition of staphylococcus aureus by food bacteria is influenced by environmental factors.
20	cell free amino acid incorporating system from pseudomonas indigofera	Cell-free amino acid incorporating the system of pseudomonas indigofera.
20	studies on the mechanisms of hypersensitivity phenomena ix histamine release from human leukocytes by ragweed pollen antigen	Studies on the mechanisms of the phenomena of apo; hypersensitivity; release of apo; histamine from human leukocytes by apo; pollen antigen of apo; lice herb.
20	drug resistance of enteric bacteria v high frequency of transduction of r factors with bacteriophage epsilon	Drug resistance of enteric bacteria with epsilon bacteriophage high frequency r factor transduction.
20	temperature optimum of mycobacterium leprae in mice	Optimum temperature of the leprae mycobacteria in mice.
20	stimulation of the salt receptor of the blowfly ii temperature	Stimulation of the fly's salt receptor ii. temperature.
20	environmental temperature and choline requirement in rats i choline deficiency in rats at various temperatures	Temperature of apo; environment and choline requirements in choline-deficient rats in rats at various temperatures.
20	environmental temperature and choline requirements in rats ii choline and methionine requirements for lipotropic activity	Room temperature and choline requirements in the rat are required for lipotropic activity, choline and methionine.
20	further study of factors affecting amino acid incorporation into protein by isolated mitochondria	Further study of the factors affecting amino acid incorporation into proteins by isolated mitochondria.
20	stress and the toxicity of venoms	Stress and toxicity are factors of stress and toxicity.
20	factors in lysis and lysis inhibition by lambda bacteriophage	Causes of death; inhibition of lysis and lysis by the lambda bacteriophage.
20	kinetics of bacteriophage lambda deoxyribonucleic acid infection of escherichia coli	Kinetics of apos; apos infection; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) of the bacteriophage lambda dapos; escherichia coli.
20	temperature and frog eggs a reconsideration of metabolic control	Frog temperature and eggs a reexamination of metabolic control.
20	zone centrifugation in a cesium chloride density gradient caused by temperature change	The results of this study are consistent with the results of an area-based cesium chloride density gradient induced by temperature change.
20	arginine metabolism in halobacterium salinarium an obligately halophilic bacterium	Moose metabolism; arginine in halobacterium salinarium, an obligate halophilic bacterium.
20	interactions of human cytomegalovirus with human fibroblasts	The interaction of human cytomegalovirus (HMV) with human fibroblasts.
20	antiviral action of mouse interferon in heterologous cells	Antiviral action of l' mouse interferon in heterologous cells.
20	effect of temperature on the rate of germination in bacillus cereus	Effect of temperature on germination rate of the bacillus cereus.
20	histochemical studies on the uptake of horseradish peroxidase by rat kidney slices	Histochemical studies on horseradish peroxidase uptake by rat kidney slices.
20	biological rhythms a new type in strains of a mutant of neurospora crassa	Apos biological rhythms; a new type in apos strains; a neurospora crassa mutant.
20	hela cells effects of temperature on the life cycle	Effects of temperature on the life cycle of the helical cells.
20	the oxygen equilibrium of mammalian hemoglobin some old and new physicochemical studies	L' oxygen balance; mammalian hemoglobin, some physico studies-old and new chemicals.
20	sequential gene action in the establishment of lysogeny	Genic sequential action in the apos; establishment of lysogenesis.
20	induction and properties of a temperature bacteriophage from bacillus stearothermophilus	Induction and properties of a thermal bacteriophage of the bacterium stearothermophilus.
20	photodynamic inactivation of enteroviruses	Photodynamic inactivation of enteroviruses.
20	effect of cholesterol on the sensitivity of mycoplasma laidlawii to the polyene antibiotic filipin	The effect of cholesterol on the sensitivity of laidlawii mycoplasm to the polyene antibiotic filipin.
20	temperature coefficients of the electrical thresholds of taste sensations	Temperature coefficients of electrical thresholds for taste sensations.
20	agrobacterium tumefaciens thermal inactivation of tumor inducing ability	Agrobacterium tumefaciens thermal inactivation of the ability to induce tumors.
20	thermal migration in biological transport	Thermal migration in biological transport?
20	deoxyribonucleic acid base composition of some members of the micrococcaceae	Composition of the bases of certain members of the micrococcaceae into a deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	alterations in host specificity of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid after an increase in growth temperature of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Changes in the specificity of the host; host; bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid after an increase in the growth temperature of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
20	polysaccharide depolymerase associated with bacteriophage infection	Polysaccharide depolymerase associated with apos; bacterial infection.
20	storage stability of clostridium botulinum toxin and spores in processed cheese	Stability of toxin and spores of Clostridium botulinum stored in processed cheese.
20	injury and growth of serratia marcescens studied in a thermal gradient incubator	Lesions and growth of serratia marcescens were studied in a thermal gradient.
20	basis for the exclusion of escherichia coli from the rumen ecosystem	Rationale for listing; exclusion from listing; Escherichia coli from listing; rumen ecosystem.
20	spectral studies of a chlorophyll pigment with fluorescence maximum at 698 mu	Spectral studies d' a chlorophyll pigment with a maximum fluorescence at 698 mu.
20	fluorescence quantum yield measurements vitamin b6 compounds	The quantum yield of the fluorescence measures the vitamin b6 compounds.
20	sterols and temperature tolerance in the fungus pythium	Sterols and temperature tolerance in pythium fungus.
20	host parasite relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in iran 3 effect of water temperature on the ability of miracidia to infect snails	Effect of temperature; water on the capacity of snails; infection of snails by snails; effect of snail temperature; water on the parasitic relationship-host of bulinus truncatus and snails; hematobium of schistosoma in Iran.
20	temperature independence of an arbitrary temporal discrimination in the goldfish	Temperature independence; arbitrary temporal discrimination in goldfish.
20	an inducible system for the hydrolysis and transport of beta glucosides in yeast i characteristics of the beta glucosidase activity of intact and of lysed cells	Inducible system for the synthesis; hydrolysis and transport of beta-glucosides in yeast i characteristic of l' beta activity-glucosidase of intact and lysed cells.
20	structure of the red fluorescence band in chloroplasts	The structure of the red band of fluorescence in the chloroplasts.
20	clostridium perfringens in meat and meat products	Clostridium perfringens in meat and meat products.
20	influence of temperature on bacterial infection of the hen s egg	Influence of temperature on apo; bacterial apo infection; hen egg.
20	differential inhibitory effects of actinomycin d among strains of poliovirus	The differential inhibitory effects of apo; actinomycin d among poliovirus strains.
20	replication of mengovirus ii general properties of the viral induced ribonucleic acid polymerase	Replication of mengovirus ii general properties of apos; virus-induced ribonucleic acid polymerase.
20	model for the mechanism controlling the expression of competent state in pneumococcus cultures	Model for the mechanism controlling the respiratory tract; expression of the respiratory tract; competent condition in pneumococcal cultures.
20	effect of 3 percent hydrogen peroxide on the viability of serratia marcescens	Effect of peroxide poisoning; 3% hydrogen on the viability of Serratia marcescens.
20	antileptospiral activity of serum i normal and immune serum	Anti-leptospiral activity of normal and immune serum.
20	induction of cellular morphogenesis in myxococcus xanthus i general description	Induction of cellular morphogenesis in myxococcus xanthus i. general description.
20	filament formation in clostridium acidiurici under conditions of elevated temperatures	Formation of filaments in Clostridium acidiurici under high temperature conditions.
20	effects of high incubation temperature upon the cell wall of escherichia coli	Incubation of the cell wall of the cell wall of the cell wall; escherichia coli.
20	uptake of griseofulvin by the sensitive dermatophyte microsporum gypseum	L' griseofulvin uptake by the sensitive dermatophyte microsporum gypseum.
20	genetic transformation of neisseria gonorrhoeae to streptomycin resistance	Genetic conversion of Neisseria gonorrhoeae to streptomycin resistance.
20	factors affecting the development of clostridium botulinum in whole milk	Factors affecting development of clostridium botulinum in whole milk.
20	effect of temperature of liquid nitrogen on radiation resistance of spores of clostridium botulinum	The effect of temperature of the liquid nitrogen on the radiation resistance of spores of Clostridium botulinum.
20	application of polarizing microscopy to medical mycology	Application of Polarizing Microscopy technology to medical mycology.
20	rapid technique for the enumeration of clostridium perfingens	Fast-acting technique for counting clostridium perfingens.
20	relative stability of pertussis vaccine preserved with merthiolate benzethonium chloride or the parabens	Relative stability of the pertussis vaccine preserved with benzethonium chloride merthiolate or with parabens.
20	rapid methods of staining bacterial spores at room temperature	Rapid staining of bacterial spores at room temperature.
20	wind as an aversive stimulus	The wind like an aversive stimulus.
20	conversion of d biotin to biotin vitamers by lactobacillus arabinosus	Conversion of biotin d to biotin vitamins by Lactobacacillus arabinosus.
20	effects of temperature on growth rate of cultured mammalian cells l5178y	Effects of temperature on cell growth rate of cultured l5178y mammals.
20	physical studies of phospholipids 3 electron microscope studies of some pure fully saturated 2 3 diacyl dl phosphatidyl ethanolamines and phosphatidyl cholines	Physical studies of phospholipids 3 electron microscopic studies of some diacyl dl ethanolamines and phosphatidyl cholines completely saturated 2 diacyl dl.
20	characteristics of the photoreactivation of pseudorabies virus	Characteristics of pseudorabies virus photoreactivation.
20	elevated temperature technique for the isolation of salmonella from streams	High temperature technology for isolation of salmonella from streams; water.
20	effects of additives on the survival of lactic streptococci in frozen storage	Effect of additives on survival of streptococci in frozen storage areas.
20	improved motility medium	Better average motility.
20	some interactions between human platelets and glass von willebrand s disease compared with normal	Some interactions between human platelets and normal Glass von willebrand disease.
20	flagella of salmonella typhimurium spheroplasts	Flagella of Salmonella typhimurium spheroplasts.
20	the inhibition of caeruloplasmin by azide	L' azide inhibition of caeruloplasmin.
20	kinetic studies on the destructive action of oxygen on lyophilized serratia marcescens	Kinetic studies on the apos; destructive action of apos; oxygen on lyophilized Serratia marcescens.
20	oxidation of secondary alcohols by extracts of a corynebacterium	Oxidation of apos; secondary alcohols by corynebacterium extracts.
20	preparation and properties of a vi antigen degrading enzyme	Preparation and properties of apos; enzyme-degrading enzyme; vi enzyme antigen.
20	nonphotoreactivating repair of ultraviolet light damaged micrococcus lysodeikticus cells	Nonphotoreactive repair of ultraviolet-damaged lysodeikticus cells damaged micrococcus lysodeikticus.
20	induced rapid release and uptake of phosphate by microorganisms	The rapid release and uptake of phosphate by the microorganisms were induced.
20	lethal action of ribonuclease for thermophilic bacilli	L' a lethal action of ribonuclease on thermophilic bacilli.
20	the immunologic character of acquired inhibitors of antihemophilic globulin factor 8 and the kinetics of their interaction with factor 8	The immunological character of the 8-fold acquired antihemophilic globulin inhibitors and the kinetics of their interaction with this factor.
20	formation of bacterial flagella i demonstration of a functional flagellin pool in spirillum serpens and bacillus subtilis	Formation of bacterial flagella i demonstration of a functional pool of flagellin in spirillum serpens and bacillus subtilis.
20	temperature measurements from oxygen isotope ratios of fish otoliths	The temperature is measured from the isotope ratios of oxygen in the otoliths of fish.
20	effect of sodium chloride and ph on the outgrowth of spores of type e clostridium botulinum at optimal and suboptimal temperatures	Effect of sodium chloride and ph on spore growth of the eclostridium botulinum type at optimum temperatures and under optimum conditions.
20	purification and properties of penicillin amidase from bacillus megaterium	The purification and properties of megaterium bacillus penicillin amidase.
20	effect of temperature on the intracellular growth of histoplasma capsulatum	Effect of temperature on intracellular growth of histoplasma capsulatum.
20	aflatoxin b 1 uptake by flavobacterium aurantiacum and resulting toxic effects	Apos; aflatoxin b 1 is absorbed by the flavobacterium aurantiacum and the resulting toxic effects.
20	factors influencing the photodynamic action of benzo a pyrene on escherichia coli	Factors influencing the apos; photodynamic action of benzo a pyrene on the apos; escherichia coli.
20	permanent stained agar preparation of mycoplasma and of l forms of bacteria	Preparation of mycoplasma and bacterial l forms in permanently stained agar.
20	platinum induced filamentous growth in escherichia coli	Platinum induced a filamentous growth in escherichia coli.
20	the ultrastructural route of fluid transport in rabbit gall bladder	The ultrastructural pathway for fluid transport in rabbit gallbladder.
20	survival of bacteria on metal surfaces	Survival of bacteria on the metal surfaces.
20	hydroxyapatite fractionation procedures in the study of the mammalian genome	Methods of fractionation; hydroxyapatite in apo; study of mammalian genome.
20	effect of temperature and relative humidity on survival of airborne columbia sk group viruses	Effects of temperature and humidity on survival of airborne columbia sk group viruses.
20	influence of food microorganisms on staphylococcal growth and enterotoxin production in meat	Influence of food microorganisms on staphylococcal growth and production of enterotoxins in meat.
20	long term storage of bacteriophages of lactic streptococci	Long-term storage of lactic streptococcal bacteriophages.
20	liquid nitrogen preservation of saccharomyces carlsbergensis and its use in a rapid biological assay of vitamin b6 pyridoxine	Saccharomyces carlsbergensis liquid nitrogen and its use in a rapid bioassay of vitamin b6 pyridoxine.
20	a melting point for the birefringent component of muscle	It's called a melting point for the birefringent component of the muscle.
20	new high temperature chiorella	New chiorella, high temperature.
20	low temperature partial alcoholysis of triglycerides	Partial alcoholysis of the triglycerides at low temperature.
20	phase equilibria and structure of dry and hydrated egg lecithin	Lapos lecithin phase equilibria and structure; dry and hydrated egg.
20	forces involved in chylomicron binding by isolated cells of rat liver	The forces involved in chylomicron binding by isolated rat liver cells.
20	isolation of psychrophilic species of bacillus	I'm gonna isolate some psychrophilic bacillus species.
20	pasteurella pestis growth temperature virulence and the graded response	Pasteurella pestis growth temperature virulence and graded response.
20	method of temperature gradient incubation and its application to microbiological examinations	Methodology; thermal gradient incubation and its application to microbiological studies.
20	temperature dependent anomalies in the growth of microorganims	Temperature-dependent growth abnormalities of micro@-@ organisms.
20	yaba tumor poxvirus synthesis in vitro ii adsorption inactivation and assay studies	Synthesis of poxvirus tumour yaba in vitro ii inactivation of apo; adsorption and assay.
20	the effects of adenosine triphosphate and related compounds on some hydrodynamic properties of glycerinated cilia	Effects of l' adenosine triphosphate and related compounds on certain hydrodynamic properties of glycerinated cilia.
20	the origin of the early receptor potential of the retina	L' origin of the early potential receptor of the retina.
20	host parasite relationships in experimental airborne tuberculosis ii reproducible infection by means of an inoculum preserved at 70 c	Parasitic relationship with host in experimental airborne tuberculosis (AVT) ii replicable infection with apos; inoculum stored at 70 c.
20	induction of penicillinase with inorganic phosphate	Induction of the penicillinase by inorganic phosphate.
20	regulation of amino acid transport across intestines of goldfish acclimatized to different environmental temperatures	The regulation of amino acid transport in the intestine of acclimated goldfish at different environmental temperatures.
20	a thermal component of excitation in the lateral eye of limulus	Thermal component of the apos; excitation in the apos; lateral eye of the limulus.
20	characterization and stability of ribosomes from mesophilic and thermophilic bacteria	Characterization and stability of ribosomes of mesophilic and thermophilic bacteria.
20	response of intracellular proteolysis to alteration of bacterial protein and the implications in metabolic regulation	The response of intracellular proteolysis to apo; alteration of bacterial proteins and implications for metabolic regulation.
20	measurement of binding of chloramphenicol by intact cells	Measurement of the binding of chloramphenicol by the intact cells.
20	synergistic effects in sonochemical sterilization	Synergistic effects of sonochemical sterilization.
20	cell motility by labile association of molecules the nature of mitotic spindle fibers and their role in chromosome movement	Cell motility by labile association of molecules, the nature of mitotic spindle fibers, and their role in the movement of chromosomes.
20	tryptophan transport in neurospora crassa i specificity and kinetics	"""Tryptophan transport in neurospora crassa i specificity and kinetics"", Neurospora crassa."
20	activation heat in frog sartorius muscle	Heat d' activation in frog's couturier muscle.
20	pyrimidine dimers effect of temperature on photoinduction	Effect of temperature on photoinduction by pyrimidine dimers.
20	factors influencing contraction and catch in mytilus smooth muscle	Factors influencing uptake and contraction in mytilus smooth muscle.
20	synthesis of macromolecules by escherichia coli near the minimal temperature for growth	Macromolecule synthesis by escherichia coli near minimum growth temperature.
20	differentiation of pathogenic and saprophytic letospires i growth at low temperatures	Differentiation of pathogenic and saprophytic Letospires i increases at a low temperature.
20	sporicidal activity of peracetic acid and beta propiolactone at subzero temperatures	The sporicidal activity of l' peracetic acid and beta propiolactone at temperatures below zero.
20	protein and nucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli pressure and temperature effects	Synthesis of proteins and nucleic acids in the effects of pressure and temperature; Escherichia coli.
20	quantitative studies on fabrics as disseminators of viruses ii persistence of poliomyelitis virus on cotton and wool fabrics	Quantitative tissue studies as virus disseminators ii persistence of polio virus on cotton and wool tissue.
20	effect of time and temperature in assessing microbial contamination on flat surfaces	Effect of time and temperature in apo; assessment of microbial contamination on the flat surfaces.
20	influence of salts on foot and mouth disease virus	In addition, there is a risk of respiratory tract cancer.
20	survival and recovery of enterovirus from foods	Survival and recovery of viruses; enteroviruses in foods.
20	microorganisms of the upper atmosphere 3 relationship between altitude and micropopulation	Micro-organisms in the upper atmosphere 3 relationship between altitude and the micropopulation.
20	effect of lactic acid bacteria on growth of staphylococcus aureus	Effect of lactic acid bacteria on the growth of staphylococcus aureus.
20	modified agglutination test for pasteurella tularensis	Test d' modified pasteurella tularensis agglutination.
20	rapid quantitative serological assay of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Staphylococcal enterotoxin b; rapid quantitative serologic tests.
20	post mortem glycolysis in ox skeletal muscle effect of temperature on the concentrations of glycolytic intermediates and cofactors	Postmortem glycolysis in bovine skeletal muscle affects the concentrations of glycolytic intermediates and cofactors.
20	studies of chloroplast development in euglena xiv sequential interactions of ultraviolet light and photoreactivating light in green colony formation	Chloroplast development studies in euglena xiv, sequential interactions of ultraviolet light and photoreactive light in green colony formation.
20	environmental factors influencing the hyperfine structure of manganous low temperature electron paramagnetic resonance spectra	Environmental factors influencing the hyperfine structure of electron magnetic resonance spectra at low temperature.
20	survival of urinary leucocytes	Survival of the urinary leukocytes.
20	the cytotoxic principle of the phytoflagellate prymnesium parvum	The cytotoxic principle of the phytoflagellate, prymnesium parvum.
20	oxygen solubility in sea water thermodynamic influence of sea salt	L' the thermodynamic influence of sea salt on the solubility of the salt molecules; oxygen in the salt; sea water.
20	temperature characteristics of excitation in space clamped squid axons	Thermal characteristics of the apos; excitation in squid axons clamped in the apos; space.
20	severe impairment of heat induced saliva spreading in rats recovered from lateral hypothalamic lesions	Severe alteration of the heat-induced saliva diffusion pattern in rats recovered from lateral hypothalamic lesions.
20	studies on the permeability of calf thymus nuclei isolated in sucrose	Studies of the permeability of calf thymus nuclei isolated from cows in sucrose.
20	acropetal movement of auxin dependence on temperature	Acropetal movement of temperature dependent auxin.
20	glycogen metabolism in novikoff ascites hepatoma cells	Glycogen metabolism in dapos cells; novikoff ascites hepatoma.
20	some conditions affecting the intracellular arrangement and concentration of tobacco mosaic virus particles in local lesions	Certain conditions may affect the intracellular arrangement and concentration of tobacco mosaic virus particles in the local lesions.
20	coliform behavior in frozen foods i rapid test for the recovery of escherichia coli from frozen foods	Coliform Behaviour in Frozen Foods: a rapid test for the recovery of coliforms from frozen foods.
20	thermal inactivation of type e botulinum toxin	Thermal inactivation of botulinum toxin-like botulinum.
20	survival of microorganisms in a simulated martian environment ii moisture and oxygen requirements for germination of bacillus cereus and bacillus subtilis var niger spores	Survival of microorganisms in a simulated Martian environment ii moisture and oxygen requirements for germination of spores of both bacillus cereus and bacillus subtilis var niger.
20	viral depuration of the northern quahaug	Viral depuration of clams in the United States.
20	pilot plant production of protease by alternaria tenuissima	Protease production by a pilot plant from the plant of Alternaria tenuissima.
20	kinetics of the thermal inactivation of type e clostridium botulinum toxin	Kinetics of apo; thermal inactivation of toxin type and clostridium botulinum.
20	some aspects of thermal injury in escherichia coli	Aspects of thermal injury to Escherichia coli.
20	release of inorganic phosphate from irradiated yeast radiation biodosimetry and evaluation of radioprotective compounds	Release of inorganic phosphate from biodosimetry by irradiation of yeasts and evaluation of radioprotectant compounds.
20	aflatoxins production of the toxins in vitro in relation to temperature	In vitro production of apo; toxin aflatoxins as a function of temperature.
20	studies on amino acid decarboxylases in escherichia coli	Amino acid decarboxylase studies in escherichia coli.
20	binding of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides to diphtheria toxin	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides binds to diphtheria toxin.
20	enzymic glucosylation of phenols	Enzyme glucosylation of phenols.
20	the equilibrium constants of the glutamate dehydrogenase systems	D&apos constants; equilibrium of glutamate dehydrogenase systems.
20	citrate and the conversion of carbohydrate into fat the regulation of fatty acid synthesis by rat liver extracts	Citrate and conversion of carbohydrates to fat regulation of fatty acid synthesis by rat liver extracts.
20	effect of thrombin on the radioactive nucleotides of human washed platelets	Effect of thrombin on radioactive nucleotides in washed human platelets.
20	the effect of temperature and anoxia of rat kidney slices on their subsequent respiration	L' effect of temperature and temperature on subsequent respiration of rat kidney slices.
20	the effect of temperature and anoxia of kidney on the subsequent oxidative phosphorylation of mitochondria	The effects of temperature and kidney anoxia on subsequent oxidative phosphorylation of the mitochondria.
20	temperature compensation in short duration time measurement by an intertidal amphipod	Compensation of temperature by measurement of short duration by an intertidal amphipod.
20	leaf temperatures of desert plants	Leaf temperature in desert plants.
20	oxygen isotope analysis of recent tropical pacific benthonic foraminifera	Isotope analysis of tropical Pacific benthic foraminiferal oxygen.
20	continuous production of clostridium tetani toxin	Continued production of the toxin Clostridium tetani.
20	antigenic modulation loss of tl antigen from cells exposed to tl antibody study of the phenomenon in vitro	Antigenic modulation loss of apo; antigen tl of exposed cells; study of phenomenon by apo; antibody tl in vitro.
20	an examination of the effects of osmotic pressure changes upon transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals	Examination of effects of changes in osmotic pressure on transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals.
20	salinity effect on the maximal growth temperature of some bacteria isolated from marine enviroments	Effect of salinity on maximum temperature of growth of selected bacteria isolated from marine environments.
20	formation of filaments and synthesis of macromolecules at temperatures below the minimum for growth of escherichia coli	Filament formation and macromolecule synthesis at temperatures below the minimum required for the growth of apos; escherichia coli.
20	reduction of ribonuclease by glutathione at elevated temperatures the molecular mechanism	Reduction of ribonuclease by glutathione at high temperatures results in the reduction of the molecular mechanism.
20	the influence of ph and temperature on the properties of myosin	L' influence of ph and temperature on myosin properties.
20	instrumental assay of microbial lipase at constant ph	Microbial lipase assay at constant ph.
20	culture aeration in a polythermostat	Aeration of the culture units in a polythermostat.
20	effect of various gas atmospheres on destruction of microorganisms in dry heat	The effect of various gas atmospheres on the destruction of micro@-@ organisms in dry heat.
20	influence of platen temperatures and relative humidity during storage on the survival of freeze dried salmonella typhimurium	Influence of platinum and apo temperatures; relative humidity during storage; survival of Salmonella typhimurium lyophilized.
20	lactobacilli in ensiled high moisture corn	Lactobacilli in corn with high humidity.
20	factors affecting the resistance of staphylococcus aureus to hydrogen peroxide treatments in milk	Factors affecting the resistance of staphylococcus aureus to treatment with hydrogen peroxide in milk.
20	enzyme substrate reactions in very high magnetic fields i	Reactions of enzyme substrates in very strong magnetic fields i.
20	enzyme substrate reactions in very high magnetic fields ii	Reactions of enzyme substrates in very strong magnetic fields ii.
20	changes in intensity and spectral distribution of fluorescence effect of light treatment on normal and dcmu poisoned anacystis nidulans	Changes in the intensity and spectral distribution of the apos; fluorescence effect of light treatment on the normal and poisoned dcmu anacystis nidulans.
20	the relation between spontaneous activity metabolic rate and the 24 hour cycle in mice at different environmental temperatures	The relationship between metabolic rate of apo; spontaneous activity and 24-hour cycle in mice at different ambient temperatures.
20	absorption of hemoglobin iron the role of a heme splitting substance in the intestinal mucosa	Lapos; absorption of the apos; iron hemoglobin in the intestinal mucosa; a substance separating the apos; heme in the intestinal mucosa.
20	fate of free amino acids and nucleotides in spoiling beef	Fate of free amino acids and nucleotides in rotten beef.
20	behavior of the no beta d glucosiduronic acid of n acetyl n phenylhydroxylamine as a substrate for beta glucuronidase	Acetyl n-acetyl n-phenylhydroxylamine behaviour; n-beta beta d-glucosiduronic acid as substrate for beta glucuronidase.
20	phosphate uptake in an obligately marine fungus ii role of culture conditions energy sources and inhibitors	Phosphate uptake by a mandatory marine fungus energy sources and inhibitors depend on the role of culture.
20	effect of abrupt temperature shift on the growth of mesophilic and psychrophilic yeasts	The effect of a sudden change in temperature on the growth of mesophilic and psychrophilic yeasts.
20	effect of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid tris hydroxymethyl aminomethane on release of the acid soluble nucleotide pool and on breakdown of ribosomal ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; ethylenediaminetetraacetic trihydroxymethylaminomethane on the release of the apo-soluble nucleotide pool; acid and apo degradation; ribosomal ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
20	onset of and recovery from diving bradycardia in ducks	Beginning and recovery of diving bradycardia in ducks.
20	effect of incubation temperature and serum content in agar overlay on plaque production by foot and mouth disease virus	Effect of temperature, incubation and serum content of agar on plaque production by FMD virus.
20	the redox state of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in rat liver homogenates	The redox state of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in rat liver homogenates.
20	a spectrophotometric study of the denaturation of deoxyribonucleic acid in the presence of urea or formaldehyde and its relevance to the secondary structure of single stranded polynucleotides	A spectrophotometric study of the denaturation of the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in the presence of urea or formaldehyde and its importance in the secondary structure of the mononuclear polynucleotides.
20	studies on the role of polyamines associated with the ribosomes from bacillus stearothermophilus	Studies of the role of polyamines associated with the bacterium stearothermophilus ribosomes.
20	measurement of growth hormone released by ox anterior pituitary slices in vitro	In vitro measurement of apos; growth hormone released from previous beef slices; pituitary.
20	fluorimetric determination of d amino acid oxidase	Fluorimetric determination of amino acid oxidation.
20	a study of the hydrolysis of unfractionated reticulocyte ribosomal ribonucleic acid by pancreatic ribonuclease and its relevance to secondary structure	A study of apos; hydrolysis of reticulocyte ribonucleic ribosomal acid not fractionated by pancreatic ribonuclease and its relation to secondary structure.
20	reactivities of actin as a contractile protein	Reactivity of l' actin as a contractile protein.
20	applied studies on the viability of el tor vibrios	Applied studies on viability of viability; torque torque torque of torque; applied studies on viability of torque; seawater.
20	thermal stimulation of hypothalamic neurones in unanaesthetized rabbits	Thermal stimulation of hypothalamic neurons in unanesthetized rabbits.
20	effect of temperature of aldehyde fixation on the radioautographic localization of ribonucleoprotein in nucleoli of hela cells inhibition by puromycin and actinomycin d	Effect of apos binding temperature; aldehyde on the radioautographic localization of ribonucleoprotein in apos nucleoli; inhibition of helical cells by puromycin and apos; actinomycin d.
20	effect of some proteins on the yeast cell membrane	The effect of certain proteins on the cellular membrane of the yeast.
20	comparison of the alpha amylase of bacillus subtilis and bacillus amyloliquefaciens	Comparison of l' alpha-amylase of bacille subtilis and amyloliquefaciens.
20	proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci ii role of membrane proteinase in cellular function	Lactic streptococci proteinase enzyme system(s) ii role of membrane proteinase in cellular function.
20	the effects of soaking the skin in water at various temperatures on the subsequent ability to sweat	The effects of skin immersing in water at various temperatures on subsequent sweating ability.
20	the renewal of photoreceptor cell outer segments	The renewal of the outer segments of the cells.
20	purification and properties of lysozyme produced by staphylococcus aureus	Purification and the properties of lysozyme produced by staphylococcus aureus.
20	the surface coat of chylomicrons lipid chemistry	The surface layer of the chylomicron lipid chemistry.
20	temperature effects on pacemaker generation membrane potential and critical firing threshold in aplysia neurons	Effects of temperature on membrane potential for cardiac pacemaker generation and critical firing threshold in neurons; aplysia.
20	characterization of purified staphylococcal lipase	Characterization of staphylococcal lipase purified.
20	effects of a high magnetic field at different osmotic pressures and temperatures on multiplication of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of an intense magnetic field at different osmotic pressures and temperatures on saccharomyces cerevisiae multiplication.
20	a study of the mechanism of quantal transmitter release at a chemical synapse	A study of the release mechanism of a chemical synapse; a quantum transmitter.
20	multiple sensitivity of chordat typani fibres of the rat and hamster to gustatory and thermal stimuli	Both rat and hamster typani chordate fibers have multiple sensitivities to gustatory and thermal stimuli.
20	growth of bacillus coagulans in chemically defined media	Growth of bacillus coagulans in chemically defined growth media.
20	preliminary studies of some physiological properties of torula jeanselmei	Preliminary studies of some of the physiological properties of torula jeanselmei torula jeanselmei.
20	thermosensitive replication of a kanamycin resistance factor	Temperature-sensitive replication of kanamycin resistance factor.
20	the electrical response of the planarian ocellus	The electric response of the planar cell.
20	infectivity destroying effect of humidity for dried coliphage t1	Deteriorating effect of sprays; Infectiousness of sprays; Humidity for coliphage t1 dried.
20	specificity of penicillin acylase of fusarium and of penicillium chrysogenum	Specificity of fusarium penicillin acylase and penicillium chrysogenum.
20	the characterization of scintillons bioluminescent particles from the marine dinoflagellate gonyaulax polyedra	Characterization of bioluminescent scintillons of marine dinoflagellate gonyaulax polyedra.
20	spontaneous activity in isolated somata of aplysia pacemaker naurons	Spontaneous activity in somas isolated from the aplysia naurons pacemaker.
20	carbon dioxide exchange in cotton some anomalous fluctuations	Exchange of carbon dioxide in cotton some anomalous fluctuations.
20	decay of influenza a viruses of human and avian origin	Influenza degeneration is a human and avian influenza virus.
20	effect of prostaglandins e1 and e2 on intestinal motility in the guinea pig and rat	Effect of prostaglandins e1 and e2 on intestinal motility in guinea pigs and rats.
20	cardiovascular response to localized heating of the anterior hypothalamus	Cardiovascular response to localized heating of the epos; anterior hypothalamus.
20	effect of tryptophan and selected analogues on body temperatur of endotoxin poisoned mice	Effect of tryptophan and some analogues on body temperature of endotoxin-poisoned mice.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid homology in bacterial taxonomy effect of incubation temperature on reaction specificity	Homology of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in bacterial taxonomy, temperature effect; reaction specificity incubation.
20	tiliqua scincoides temperature sensitive units in lizard brain	Tiliqua scincoides heat-sensitive units in lizard brain.
20	a comparison of the killing of cultured mammalian cells induced by decay of incorporated tritiated molecules at 196 degrees c	A comparison of destruction of cultured mammalian cells induced by decomposition of tritiated molecules incorporated at 196 degrees c.
20	vacuum ultraviolet studies on the nature of the radiation inactivation of trypsin	Apos studies; vacuum ultraviolet on the nature of the protein; trypsin radiation inactivation.
20	thermal depolarization of fluorescence from polytene chromosomes stained with acridine orange	Thermal depolarization of the fluorescence of polytene chromosomes stained with orange acridine.
20	inactivation of microorganisms by electrohydraulic shock	Inactivation of the microorganisms by electrohydraulic shock.
20	effect of cookery and holding on hams and turkey rolls contaminated with clostridium perfringens	Effect of cooking and handling on turkey hams and turkey rolls contaminated with clostridium perfringens.
20	staphylococcal hyaluronate lyase purification and characterization studies	Dosage purification and characterization studies; staphylococcal hyaluronate lyase.
20	role of relative humidity in the survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae	Role of pH; relative humidity in survival of airborne pneumonia mycoplasma.
20	proton magnetic resonance of transfer rna	It's called proton magnetic resonance of the transfer rna.
20	some effects of pco2 and ph on nerve tissue	Effects of pco2 and ph on nerve tissue.
20	use of capillary blood in measurement of arterial po2	Use capillary blood to measure the arterial pox2.
20	the effect of calcium depletion upon the tension independent component of cardiac heat production	L' effect of calcium depletion on voltage-independent component of cardiac heat production.
20	the catalase hydrogen peroxide system role of sub units in the thermal deactivation of bacterial catalase in the absence of substrate	The role of sub-@-units in catalase hydrogen peroxide system in thermal quenching of bacterial catalase in the absence of substrate.
20	the effect of season on testicular weight and spermatogenesis in turkeys	L' effect of season on testicular weight and sperm production in turkeys.
20	sensitivity of an enrichment culture procedure for detection of clostridium botulinum type e in raw and smoked whitefish chubs	Sensitivity of plants; a method of culture; enrichment for detection of Clostridium botulinum type in raw or smoked whitefish minnows.
20	microbiological deterioration of frozen parfried potatoes upon holding after thawing	Microbiological deterioration of frozen scented potatoes after thawing.
20	assessment of aerosol stability of yellow fever virus by fluorescent cell counting	Evaluation of the stability of yellow fever virus (YFV) aerosols by fluorescent cell count.
20	influence of catalase activity on resistance of coagulase positive staphylococci to hydrogen peroxide	Influence of peroxides; catalase activity on the coagulase-positive staphylococci resistance to peroxides; hydrogen.
20	timing of the auxin response in coleoptiles and its implications regarding auxin action	Chronology of auxin reaction in coleoptiles and its implications for apos; action of apos; auxin.
20	electrophysiological organization of the eye of aplysia	Electrophysiological organization of the epos; eye of the aplysia.
20	sporicidal action of auto oxidized ascorbic acid for clostridium	Sporicidal action of ascorbic acid auto-oxidized for clostridium.
20	preservation of influenza virus infectivity by lyophilization	Preservation of apos; infectivity of influenza virus by freeze drying.
20	methodological study and a recommended technique for determining the euglobulin lysis time	Methodological and technical study recommended to determine euglobulin lysis time.
20	denaturation and renaturation of viral ribonucleic acid i annealing r17 ribonucleic acid with denatured replicative form or with denatured replicative intermediate	Denaturation and renaturation of apos; viral ribonucleic acid annealed from apos; r17 ribonucleic acid denatured replicative or replicative intermediate denatured replicative form.
20	activation of the ephippial egg of daphnia pulex	Activation of daphnia pulex (ephippial egg) and daphnia pulex.
20	the effect of hypertonic solution on the wet weight and contractions of rat uterus and vas deferens	Effect of hypertonic solution on the rat wet weight and contractions of the uterus and rat vas deferens.
20	effects of meat curing salts and temperature on production of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Effects of meat curing salts and temperature on potato production; staphylococcal enterotoxin b.
20	synthesis of protein and ribonucleic acid in a psychrophile at normal and restrictive growth temperatures	Protein and d&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid (RNA) in a psychrophil at normal and restrictive growth temperatures.
20	esterase heterogeneity dynamics of a polymorphism	Dynamic d' heterogeneity of d&apos esterases; polymorphism.
20	lecithin aerosols generated ultrasonically above 25 degrees c	Lecithin aerosols were generated by ultrasound at-above 25 degrees c.
20	the relationship between caffeine contracture of intact muscle and the effect of caffeine on reticulum	The relationship between caffeine contracture and intact muscle and the effect of caffeine on reticulum.
20	the enzymatic nature of c 1r conversion of c 1s to c 1 esterase and digestion of amino acid esters by c 1r	The enzymatic nature of c1r conversion from c1s to c1 esterase and c1r digestion of amino acid esters.
20	separation of mono and diglycerides by gas liquid chromatography	Separation of mono- and diglycerides by liquid-phase gas chromatography.
20	the effect of temperature on catalytic and regulatory functions of pyruvate kinases of the rainbow trout and the antarctic fish trematomus bernacchii	Effect of temperature on the catalytic and regulatory functions of the pyruvate kinases of rainbow trout-in-in the sky and of Antarctic fish trematomus bernacchii.
20	temperature sensitive steps in the biosynthesis of venezuelan equine encephalitis virus	Temperature-sensitive steps in the biosynthesis of Venezuelan eel virus; Venezuelan equine encephalitis.
20	control of bacteriophage induced enzyme synthesis in cells infected with a temperature sensitive mutant	Bacteriophage control induces enzyme synthesis in cells infected by a heat-sensitive mutant.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase catalyzing synthesis of double stranded arbovirus ribonucleic acid	Ribonucleic acid polymerase catalyzing the synthesis of a ribonucleic acid double-stranded arbovirus.
20	purification and properties of a thermophilic bacteriophage lytic enzyme	Purification and properties of a lytic enzyme from the thermophilic bacteriophage.
20	interference among group a arboviruses	Interference between a group of arbovirus, arbovirus, and arbovirus.
20	factors affecting the translocation of oxaloacetate and l malate into rat liver mitochondria	Factors affecting translocation of oxaloacetate and laloacetate into rat liver mitochondria.
20	interaction of salt ph and temperature on the growth and survival of salmonellae in ground pork	Interaction of ph salt and temperature on salmonella growth and survival in ground swine.
20	lipase of mucor pusillus	Lipase from pusillus mucorus.
20	effect of temperature on the coproduction of chlortetracycline and tetracycline by streptomyces aureofaciens	Effect of temperature on co-production of chlortetracycline and tetracycline by streptomyces aureofaciens.
20	rhinovirus plaque formation in wi 38 cells with methylcellulose overlay	Formation of rhinovirus plaques in methylcellulose-coated wi 38 cells.
20	mechanism of resistance to enteroviruses of some primate cells in tissue culture	Enterovirus resistance mechanisms of selected primate cells in tissue culture.
20	replication of western equine encephalomyelitis virus i some chemical and physical characteristics of viral ribonucleic acid	Reproduction of apovirus; equine encephalomyelitis of apos; West he certain chemical and physical characteristics of apos; viral ribonucleic acid.
20	the inhibitory effects in vitro of phenothiazines and other drugs on lipid peroxidation systems in rat liver microsomes and their relationship to the liver necrosis produced by carbon tetrachloride	The in vitro inhibitory effects of phenothiazines and d' other drugs on lipid peroxidation systems in rat liver microsomes and their relation to carbon tetrachloride induced hepatic necrosis.
20	the relation between environmental temperature and oxygen consumption in the new born baby	The relationship between ambient temperature and oxygen consumption for the newborn.
20	evaporative water loss in the new born baby	Loss of water by evaporation at the new @-@born.
20	purification and properties of an amine dehydrogenase from pseudomonas am1 and its role in growth on methylamine	Purification and properties of Pseudomonas am1 amine dehydrogenase and its role in growth on methylamine.
20	discrete conductance fluctuations in lipid bilayer protein membranes	Discrete conductance fluctuations in protein membranes of lipid bilayers.
20	plasmolysis of escherichia coli b r with sucrose	Plasmolysis of apos; escherichia coli b r with the sucrose.
20	sensitivity of pseudomonas aeruginosa to normal serum and to polymyxin	Sensitivity of pseudomonas aeruginosa to both normal serum and polymyxin.
20	polynucleotide sequence relationships among members of enterobacteriaceae	Relationships among polynucleotide (polynucleotide) sequences in enterobacteria.
20	total synthesis of acetate from co2 ii purification and properties of formyltetrahydrofolate synthetase from clostridium thermoaceticum	Total synthesis of l' acetate from co2 purification ii and properties of formyltetrahydrofolate synthetase from thermoaceticum clostridium.
20	the effect of ambient temperature upon post natal changes in oxygen consumption of the guinea pig	The effect of ambient temperature on postnatal changes in guinea pig oxygen consumption.
20	evidence for separate monoglyceride hydrolase and triglyceride lipase in post heparin human plasma	Evidence of apos; existence of distinct monoglyceride hydrolase and apos; a distinct triglyceride lipase in human plasma post-heparin.
20	intracellular transport of secretory proteins in the pancreatic exocrine cell iv metabolic requirements	Intracellular transport of secretory proteins in the human metabolic requirements IV of pancreatic exocrine cells.
20	purification and properties of alpha d mannosidase from jack bean meal	The purification and properties of the alpha d mannosidase of the flour of gray bean.
20	survival of aerobic and anaerobic bacteria in chicken meat during freeze dehydration rehydration and storage	Survival of aerobic and anaerobic bacteria in chicken meat during meat rehydration by cryodehydration and storage.
20	effect of low frequency ultrasound and elevated temperatures on isolation of bacteria from raw milk	The effect of low-frequency ultrasound and high temperatures on the intestines; isolation of bacteria from raw milk.
20	low temperature absorption spectra of chlorophyll a in polar and nonpolar solvents	Spectrum d' absorption of chlorophyll a in polar and nonpolar solvents at low temperature.
20	chemical states of bacterial spores dry heat resistance	Chemical status of dry heat resistant bacterial spores.
20	effect of temperature on growth of salmonella in rehydrated skim milk from a food poisoning outbreak	The effect of temperature on the growth of Salmonella in skimmed milk rehydrated as a result of an outbreak of the disease; food poisoning.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms properties of rainbow trout fructose diphosphatase	Temperature and regulation of pH; enzymatic activity in poikilothermic properties of Arc-@ trout fructose diphosphatase in-sky.
20	a comparison of the properties of the pyruvate kinases of the fat body and flight muscle of the adult male desert locust	Comparison of the properties of pyruvate kinases of fat body and flying muscle in adult male locusts.
20	cytochromes of aquatic fungi	Aquatic fungus cyochromes.
20	variation in the fine structure of a marine achromobacter and a marine pseudomonad grown under selected nutritional and temperature regimes	Variation in the fine structure of a marine and coastal achromobacterium; a marine pseudomonad grown under selected thermal and nutritional regimes.
20	characteristics of rna degradation in the erythroid cell	Characteristics of rna degradation processes in erythroid cells.
20	microincineration electron microscopy and electron diffraction of calcium phosphate loaded mitochondria	Microscopic electron microscopy-incineration and electron diffraction of phosphate-loaded mitochondria.
20	temperature dependence of resistance at an electrotonic synapse	The resistance to electrotonic synapse depends on temperature.
20	factors affecting the intracellular parasitic growth of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus developing within escherichia coli	Factors affecting the intracellular parasitic growth of developing bdellovibrio bacteriovorus in escherichia coli.
20	freezing tolerance in an adult insect	Freezing tolerance in the adult insect.
20	the chemistry of flavines and flavorproteins photoreduction of flavines by amino acids	Flavin chemistry and flavprotein photoreduction of flavin by amino acids.
20	shear and the melting of dna an especially sensitive portion of the e coli genome	Shear and fusion of DNA is a particularly sensitive part of the E. coli genome.
20	partial purification of the anti inflammatory factor s in inflammatory exudate	Partial purification of anti-@-@ inflammatory factors in the inflammatory exudate.
20	replication and complementation of human adenoviruses and simian papovavirus at an elevated temperature	Replication and complementation of human adenoviruses and simian papovaviruses at high-temperature conditions.
20	production of enterotoxin a in milk	Production of apoes; enterotoxin a in the milk.
20	production of phosphatase by aspergillus awamori var kawachii in a low phosphate medium	Production of phosphatase by l' aspergillus awamori var kawachii in low-phosphate medium.
20	effect of diurnal temperature cycles on the production of aflatoxin	Effect of diurnal temperature cycles on production of apos; aflatoxin.
20	a model of thyroxine metabolism based on the effects of environmental temperature	Thyroxine metabolism model based on the effects of ambient temperature.
20	biochemical studies on adenovirus multiplication 13 synthesis of virus specific ribonucleic acid during infection with human adenovirus type 12	Biochemical studies on the synthesis, by adenovirus 13 multiplication, of d' viral-specific ribonucleic acid during apovirus; human adenovirus type 12 infection.
20	inhibition of arbovirus protein synthesis by interferon	Inhibition of arbovirus protein synthesis by arbovirus interferon.
20	electron microscopic study of the morphogenesis of vesicular stomatitis virus	Electron microscopic study of vesicular stomatitis virus morphogenesis.
20	histamine release by sodium chloroplatinate	D'apos; histamine par le chloroplatinate de sodium.
20	inhibition of host cell protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis by newcastle disease virus	Inhibition of protein synthesis and host cell ribonucleic acid by Newcastle disease virus.
20	characteristics of bacteriophages attacking psychrophilic and mesophilic pseudomonads	Characteristics of parasitic bacteriophages attacking psychrophilic and mesophilic pseudomonads.
20	structure and leukemogenic activity of a murine leukemia virus	Leukemogenic structure and activity of apos, a murine leukemic virus.
20	deterioration of cycloserine in the tropics	Cycloserine's getting worse in the tropics.
20	pyruvate kinase variants of the alaskan king crab evidence for a temprature depenet iterconversion between two forms having distinct and adaptive kinetic properties	Variations of the king crab pyruvate kinase from Alaska demonstrate the existence of a temperature iterconversion between two distinct and adaptive kinetic forms.
20	bacteriophage release in a lysogenic strain of agrobacterium tumefaciens	Bacteriophage release into a lysogenic strain of d' agrobacterium tumefaciens.
20	critical arginine residue for maintaining the bacteriophage tail structure	Bacteriophage tailings; essential arginine to maintain bacteriophage tail structure.
20	specific reduction of carboxyl groups in peptides and proteins by diborane	Specific diborane reduction of carboxyl groups in peptides and proteins.
20	cellulolytic enzymes during morphogenesis in dictyostelium discoideum	Cellulolytic enzymes during morphogenesis in the dictyostelium discoideum.
20	effects on growth and toxin production of exposure of spores of clostridium botulinum type f to sublethal doses of gamma irradiation	Effects on growth and production of toxins; sublethal exposure of spores of type F Clostridium botulinum; gamma irradiation.
20	effect of cold temperatures on the viability of chromobacterium violaceum	Effect of cold weather on the viability of chromobacterium violaceum.
20	significance of 12s toxin of clostridium botulinum type e	Importance of the toxin 12s of Clostridium botulinum type e.
20	cell free amino acid incorporating systems from bacillus licheniformis and bacillus stearothermophilus 10	Cell-free amino acid incorporating the bacillus licheniformis and stearothermophilus 10 systems.
20	warm water strain of leucothrix mucor	Warm water strain of mucor mucor leukothrix.
20	recombination between a thermosensitive kanamycin resistance factor and a nonthermosensitive multiple drug resistant factor	A temperature-sensitive resistance factor to kanamycin and a non-therapeutic multidrug-resistant factor.
20	the permeation of non electrolytes through the single barnacle muscle cell	The permeation of non-electrolytes through the epos; unique muscle cell of the barnacle.
20	metabolism of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate by epithelial cells of the toad bladder	Toad bladder metabolism; adenosine 3,5 monophosphate by toad bladder epithelial cells.
20	effects of temperature agitation and donor strain on chromosome transfer in escherichia coli k 12	Effects of apos; heat agitation and the donor strain on chromosome transfer in escherichia coli k 12.
20	the release of thyroxine from serum protein in the vessels of the liver	Release of thyroxine from serum proteins into vessels of liver.
20	light scattering and birefringence changes during activity in the electric organ of electrophorus electricus	Light scattering and birefringence change over time; activity in the electrical organ of the apos; electrophoretic electricus.
20	a protein component of the cell surface of staphylococcus aureus	The protein component of the cell surface of the staphylococcal aureus.
20	studies of copper ion induced mitochondrial swelling in vitro	In vitro studies of mitochondrial swelling induced by etapos; copper ion.
20	studies on ferrochelatase the enzymic formation of haem in proplastids chloroplasts and plant mitochondria	Studies of ferrochelatase, enzymatic formation of apos; hematoma in plant proplastal chloroplasts and mitochondria.
20	nucleoside triphosphate pools and the regulation of rna synthesis in e coli	Nucleoside triphosphate pools and regulation of rna synthesis in e coli.
20	comparative hybridization of mitochondrial and cytoplasmic aminoacyl transfer rna with mitochondrial dna from rat liver	Comparison of apo; hybridization of mitochondrial and cytoplasmic aminoacyl transfer with apo; mitochondrial DNA of rat liver.
20	studies on collagenase from rheumatoid synovium in tissue culture	Rheumatoid synovium collagenase studies in tissue culture.
20	replication of mengovirus in hela cells preinfected with nonreplicating poliovirus	Mengovirus replication in helical cells pre-infected with the non-replicating poliovirus.
20	enzymic degradation of heparin a sulphamidase and a sulphoesterase from flavobacterium heparinum	Enzymatic degradation of sulphamidase heparin and sulphoesterase from flavobacterium heparinum.
20	effects of division synchronizing hypoxic and hyperthermic shocks upon tetrahymena a respiration and intracellular atp concentration	Divisional effects synchronizing hypoxic and hyperthermic shocks on tetrahymena, respiration and intracellular atp.
20	direct bacterial count as a rapid freshness test for fish fillets	The direct bacterial count as a rapid test of fish fillets' freshness.
20	survival of t3 coliphage in varied extracellular environments i viability of the coliphage during storage and in aerosols	Survival of t3 coliphage in various extracellular environments i viability of coliphage during storage and aerosols.
20	factors affecting the persistence of staphylococcus aureus on fabrics	Factors affecting persistence of staphylococcus aureus on tissue.
20	growth stimulation of lactobacillus species by lactic streptococci	Stimulation of growth of lactobacilli species by lactic streptococci.
20	effect of ph on growth and survival of three avian and one saprophytic mycoplasma species	Effect of Ph on growth and survival of three avian and d&apos mycoplasma species; a saprophytic species.
20	a study of the effects of hydrostatic pressure on macromolecular synthesis in escherichia coli	Effects of hydrostatic pressure on macromolecular synthesis in escherichia coli were studied.
20	electron spin resonance signals in injured nerve	Electronic spin resonance signals in the damaged nerve.
20	staphylococcal acid phosphatase preliminary physical and chemical characterization of the loosely bound enzyme	Preliminary physical and chemical characterization of loos phosphatase; staphylococcal acid.
20	physiological and biochemical changes in bacterial cells exposed to oxygen	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix C. Physiological and biochemical changes in bacterial cells exposed to oxygen.
20	ribosome synthesis in rhodopseudomonas capsulata cells growing in continuous and intermittent light	Ribosome synthesis in Rhodopseudomonas capsulata cells grown under continuous and intermittent light.
20	thermal injury and recovery of streptococcus faecalis	Thermal lesion and recovery of the bacterial streptococcus faecalis.
20	response of the mimeae to some physical and chemical agents	Implications response to certain physical and chemical agents.
20	growth and destruction of salmonella typhimurium in egg white foam products cooked by microwaves	Growth and destruction of typhimurium salmonella in white foam products; micro cooked eggs @-@wave.
20	the equilibrium constant of the isocitrate dehydrogenase reaction	Constant d' equilibrium of isocitrate dehydrogenase (DC) reaction.
20	specificity and control of choline o sulfate transport in filamentous fungi	Specificity and transport control of choline o sulfate in filamentous fungi.
20	fate of recipient deoxyribonucleic acid during transformation in haemophilus influenzae	Fate of the receptor deoxyribonucleic acid during transformation in the apos; haemophilus influenzae.
20	events occurring during the replication of bacteriophage t4 dna	Replication events of bacteriophage t4 DNA.
20	solubilization of particulate proteins and nonelectrolytes by chaotropic agents	Solubilization of particulate proteins and non-electrolytes by chaotropic agents.
20	spin labeled transfer rna	Labelled spin transfer rna.
20	radical transformation in irradiated dna and its constituents	Radical transformation in the irradiated DNA and its components.
20	permeability of a cell membrane junction dependence on energy metabolism	D&apos permeability; a cell membrane junction depends on energy metabolism.
20	stabilities of dried suspensions of influenza virus sealed in a vacuum or under different gases	Stabilization of dried suspensions of Flu Virus; vacuum-sealed or gas-sealed influenza.
20	effect of incubation temperature on t agglutination typing of streptococcus pyogenes	Temperature effect of incubation on t-agglutination typing of streptococcus pyogenes.
20	radiosensitivity of mammalian cells 3 effect of suboptimal growth temperatures on recovery from radiation induced division delay	Effect of radiation sensitivity of mammalian 3 cells on recovery from radiation-induced division delay from growth temperatures at-optimum.
20	production of thermostable alkaline proteases by thermophilic streptomyces	Production of heat stable alkaline proteases by thermophilic streptomyces.
20	interacting factors that influence long term storage of live pasteurella tularensis vaccine and rift valley fever virus	Factors influencing apo; long-term storage of live Pasteurella tularensis vaccine and Rift Valley fever virus.
20	delay of poliovirus plaque formation with use of fresh bovine serum in the growth medium of host cells	Postponement of poliovirus plaque formation by apo; use of fresh bovine serum in host cell growth media.
20	foot and mouth disease virus stability of neutralizing antibody after freeze drying and air drying	Stability of FMD virus neutralizing antibody after lyophilization and air drying.
20	immunofluorescent detection of enterotoxin b in food and a culture medium	Immunofluorescent detection of e.g., enterotoxin b in food and culture media.
20	changes in the patterns of synthesis of ribonucleic acid species in immature rat uterus in response to oestrdiol 17 beta	Changes in patterns of synthesis of d&apos species; ribonucleic acid in immature rat uterus in response to estos; estradiol 17 beta.
20	experimental conditions affecting ribonucleic acid polymerase in isolated rat liver nuclei effect of nucleoside triphosphate concentration temperature ammonium sulphate and heparin	Experimental conditions affecting ribonucleic acid polymerase in isolated nuclei of rat liver, temperature effect of nucleoside triphosphates, sulfate d' ammonium and heparin.
20	absorption of proteins and peptides in the far ultraviolet	Protein and peptide absorption in the apos; far ultraviolet.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms properties of lungfish fructose diphosphatase	Temperature and regulation of phosphate; enzymatic activity in the poikilothermic properties of lungfish fructose diphosphatase.
20	purification and general properties of delta aminolaevulate dehydratase from nicotiana tabacum l	Purification and general properties of delta aminolaevulate dehydratase from nicotiana tabacum l.
20	an artificial leucocyte control suspension	Artificial suspension of leukocyte control?
20	oscillation and repetitive firing in squid axons comparison of experiments with computations	Oscillation and repetitive discharge in squid axons compare experiments with calculations.
20	role of isoleucyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in ribonucleic acid synthesis and enzyme repression in yeast	The role of l' isoleucyltransfer of l' ribonucleic acid synthetase in the synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and enzyme repression in yeast.
20	dissimilation of methionine by a demethiolase of aspergillus species	Methionine dissimulation by aspergillus demethiolase of apos species.
20	salmonella in wastes produced at commercial poultry farms	Salmonella in wastes from commercial poultry farms.
20	environmental and genetical contributions to class difference a model experiment	Contribution of environment and genetics to class difference, a model experience.
20	assay and properties of diaminopimelate epimerase from bacillus megaterium	Dosage and properties of megaterium diaminopimelate epimerase.
20	rnase activity in erythroid cell lysates	Rnase activity in erythroid cells.
20	stability of st louis encephalitis virus in the airborne state	Stability of potato virus; St. Louis encephalitis at apos; airborne state.
20	partial purification and characterization of dihydrodipicolinic acid synthetase from sporulating bacillus megaterium	Partial purification and characterization of l' dihydrodipicolinic acid synthetase from megaterium sporulation.
20	influence of bolus temperature on human esophageal motor function	L' influences human esophageal motor function by the temperature of the bolus.
20	biosynthesis of cytidine diphosphate diglyceride by human platelets	Biosynthesis of cytidine diphosphate diglyceride by the human platelets.
20	effect of temperature on radiosensitivity of newcastle disease virus	Effect of temperature on Newcastle disease virus radiosensitivity.
20	motile nocardoid actinomycetales	Movable nocardoidal actinomycetales.
20	partial purification of native rrna and trna cistrons from mycoplasma sp kid	Partial purification of mycoplasma sp kid native rrna and trna cistrons.
20	synthesis of vaccinia viral proteins in cytoplasmic extracts i incorporation of radioactively labeled amino acids into polypeptides	Synthesis of viral proteins of vaccinia in cytoplasmic extracts and incorporation of radioactive amino acids into polypeptides.
20	biochemical studies on adenovirus multiplication xvi transcription of the adenovirus genome during abortive infection of elevated temperatures	Biochemical studies of xvi transcriptional adenovirus multiplication in the adenovirus genome during an aborted infection at high temperatures.
20	synthesis of ribonucleic acid in cells infected with lsc poliovirus at elevated temperatures	Synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in cells infected with the poliovirus lsc at high temperatures.
20	phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesis under primitive earth conditions	Synthesis of phenylalanine and tyrosine under primitive terrestrial conditions.
20	a new approach to isoelectric focusing and fractionation of proteins in a ph gradient	A novel approach to isoelectric focusing and fractionation of ph-gradient proteins.
20	the clearance and antidiuretic potency of neurohypophysial hormones in man and their plasma binding and stability	The clearance and antidiuretic potency of human neurohypophysial hormones as well as their plasma binding and stability.
20	correlation of melting temperature and cesium chloride buoyant density of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid	Correlation between melting temperature and cesium chloride flotation density of the cell; bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	characterization of injury incurred by escherichia coli upon freeze drying	Characterization of damage to escherichia coli during freeze-drying.
20	solution of fatty acids from monolayers spread at the air water interface identification of phase transformations and the estimation of surface charge	Spread-out solution of monolayer fatty acids; air interface-water identification of phase transformations and l' surface charge estimation.
20	liquid gel chromatography on lipophilic hydrophobic sephadex derivatives	Liquid-gel chromatography of the lipophilic, hydrophobic, sephadex derivatives.
20	an endogenous inhibitor of microsomal mixed function oxidases in homogenates of the southern armyworm prodenia eridania	An endogenous mixed-function microsomal oxidase inhibitor in southern legionnaire homogenates, the prodenia eridania legionnaire.
20	functional significance of isoenzymes in thermal acclimatization acetylcholinesterase from trout brain	L' functional importance of isoenzymes in the intestine; thermal acclimation of the intestine; and trout brain acetylcholinesterase.
20	compartmentation of the inulin space in mouse brain slices	Comparison of DNA; DNA space; inulin in mouse brain slices.
20	the requirement of serine esterase function in complement dependent erythrophagocytosis	Serine esterase function was found to be required in complement-dependent erythrophagocytosis.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterization i experimental apparatus and methods	Microbiological aspects of environmental sterilization; environmental oxides; ethylene experimental devices and methods.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization ii microbial resistance to ethylene oxide	Microbiological Aspects of Environmental Sterilization; Dapos Oxide; Ethylene ii microbial resistance to apos; Dapos oxides; Ethylene.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization 3 effects of humidity and water activity on the sporicidal activity of ethylene oxide	Microbiological aspects of spoilage; oxides; ethylene 3 effects of spoilage; moisture and pH; spoilage activity; water on spoilage; spoilage activity; spoilage oxide; ethylene.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization iv influence of thickness of polyethylene film on the sporicidal activity of ethylene oxide	Microbiological aspects of sputum sterilization; oxides; ethylene iv influences sputum; thickness of polyethylene film on sputum; sporicidal activity of sputum; oxides of sputum; ethylene.
20	behavior of salmonellae in sliced luncheon meats	Salmonella behaviour in sliced deli meats.
20	viral susceptibility range of the fathead minnow pimephales promelas poikilothermic cell line	Variation in head poikilothermal promelas cell line viral sensitivity-@-@ ball pimephales promelas.
20	studies on the effect of vitamin d on calcium absorption and transport	Studies on the effects of vitamin D intake on calcium absorption and transport.
20	the nature of the carbon dioxide substrate and equilibrium constant of the 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase reaction	The nature of the carbon dioxide substrate and the constant d' equilibrium of reaction 6 of phosphogluconate dehydrogenase.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms fructose diphosphatase from migrating salmon	Temperature and regulation of sucrose; enzymatic activity in migrating salmon poikilotherms fructose diphosphatase.
20	the importance of life time changes in fluorescence depolarization	L' importance of life-time changes in the depolarization of fluorescence.
20	hydrolysis of penicillins and related compounds by the cell bound penicillin acylase of escherichia coli	L' hydrolysis of penicillins and related compounds by penicillin acylase attached to the d&apos cell; escherichia coli.
20	factors affecting the synthesis of ampicillin and hydroxypenicillins by the cell bound penicillin acylase of escherichia coli	Factors affecting the synthesis of apos; ampicillin and hydroxypenicillin by penicillin acylase linked to the cell of apos; escherichia coli.
20	the effect of low temperatures on fatty acid biosynthesis in plants	L' effect of low temperatures on the biosynthesis of fatty acids in plants.
20	the influence of stimulus parameters on contractions of isolated frog muscle fibres	L' influence of stimulus parameters on isolated frog muscle fiber contractions.
20	limits of microbial existence temperature and ph	Limits of Immunity; microbial existence temperature and ph.
20	purification and properties of proteolytic enzymes from thermophilic actinomycetes	The purification and properties of the proteolytic enzymes of thermophilic actinomycetes.
20	temperature sensitive conjugation defective f factor in escherichia coli	Defective temperature-sensitive conjugation factor in escherichia coli.
20	cell wall glucans of the yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis	Glucans of yeast cell wall and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis.
20	thermal reversal of ultraviolet irradiation damage in salmonella typhimurium	Thermal reversal of apo damage; ultraviolet irradiation in Salmonella typhimurium.
20	proton magnetic resonance study of ferredoxin from clostridium pasteurianum	Proton magnetic resonance study of clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxin.
20	the meyerhof quotient and the synthesis of glycogen from lactate in frog and rabbit muscle	The meyerhof quotient and glycogen synthesis from lactate in frog and rabbit muscle.
20	viability control for mildew testing of materials and equipment in tropical chambers	Viability testing for mould testing of materials and tropical room equipment.
20	enzymatic removal of diacetyl from beer 3 enzyme protection and regeneration of cofactor	Beer enzymatic removal of diacetyl 3 enzyme protection and cofactor regeneration.
20	studies of laryngotracheitis virus in avian tissue cultures 3 enhancement of infectivity by diethylaminoethyl dextran	Studies of the laryngotracheitis virus in tissue cultures of birds; 3 increases in apos; infectivity by diethylaminoethyl dextran.
20	hydrogen sulfide production by bacteria and sulfmyoglobin formation in prepacked chilled beef	Production of d&apos sulfide; hydrogen by bacteria and sulfmyoglobin in chilled pre-packaged beef.
20	occurrence of purple sulfur bacteria in a sewage treatment lagoon	The presence of purple sulphurous bacteria in a sewage lagoon.
20	detection and incidence of escherichia coli on storage pen surfaces of fishing trawlers	Detection and incidence of escherichia coli on fishing trawl enclosure surfaces.
20	endocarpic microorganisms of two types of windrow dried peanut fruit arachis hypogaea l	Endocarp microorganisms of two types of fruit; peanuts dried with hypogaea peanuts l.
20	purification and properties of a glycerol ester hydrolase lipase from propionibacterium shermanii	Purification and propionibacterium shermanii glycerol ester hydrolase lipase properties.
20	additional factors in chronic bronchitis	Other factors contributing to chronic bronchitis.
20	effects of temperature on the irritability caused by ddt and ddt analogues in anopheline mosquitos	Effects of Temperature on Apos; irritability caused by ddt and ddt analogues in Anopheles mosquitoes.
20	the use of gamma radiation for the elimination of salmonella from frozen meat	Use gamma rays to remove salmonella from frozen meat.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase induced in cells infected with sendai virus	L' ribonucleic acid polymerase is induced in sentai virus infected cells.
20	synthesis of cell constituents by methane grown methylococcus capsulatus and methanomonas methanooxidans	Synthesis of cell components by methane-grown methylococcus capsulatus and methanomonas methanooxidans.
20	depolarization of the intrinsic and extrinsic fluorescence of pepsinogen and pepsin	Depolarization of intrinsic and extrinsic fluorescence of pepsinogen and pepsin.
20	substrate specificity and kinetic properties of alpha galactosidases from vicia faba	Substrate specificity and kinetic properties of vicia faba alpha galactosidases.
20	differential stability of 28s and 18s rat liver ribosomal ribonucleic acids	Differential stability of ribosomal ribonucleic acids from rat liver 28s and 18s.
20	purification and characterization of bovine aorta ribonucleases	Purification and characterization of bovine aortic ribonucleases.
20	laboratory and clinical characteristics of attenuated strains of influenza virus	Laboratory and clinical characteristics of attenuated influenza virus strains.
20	shock synthesis of amino acids in simulated primitive environments	Amino acid shock synthesis in simulated primitive environments.
20	experimental control of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys by the dipping of eggs in tylosin and spiramycin	Experimental control of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys by egg immersion in tylosin and spiramycin.
20	naphthylamidase activity of leptospira	Leptospira naphthylamidase activity.
20	production of amylase in liquid culture by a strain of aspergillus oryzae	Production of apos; amylase in liquid culture by aspergillus oryzae.
20	chromate transport in human leukocytes	"""Chromate transport in human leukocytes"", in Human leukocytes, Vol."
20	taxonomic implications of temperature dependence of the allosteric inhibition of 3 deoxy d arabino heptulosonate 7 phosphate synthetase in bacillus	Taxonomic implications of temperature dependence of l' allosteric inhibition of 3 deoxy d' arabino heptulosonate 7 phosphate synthetase in the bacillus.
20	intracytoplasmic membrane structures in vibrio marinus	Intracytoplasmic membrane structure in vibrio marinus marinus.
20	characteristics of a non complement dependent c3 reactive complex formed form factors in nephritic and normal serum	A non-completion-dependent c3 reagent complex formed formation factors in nephritic and normal serum.
20	an extracellular agarase from a cytophaga species	An extracellular agarase from apos; a cytophaga species.
20	factors affecting deoxycholate inactivation and mg reactivation of bacillus megaterium km membrane nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced form oxidase	Factors affecting deoxycholate inactivation and reactivation of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide membrane of bacillus megaterium km in mg reduced the oxidase form.
20	fatty acid distribution in mesophilic and thermophilic strains of the genus bacillus	Distribution of fatty acids in mesophilic and thermophilic strains of the genus bacillus.
20	growth kinetics of yaba tumor poxvirus after in vitro adaptation to cercopithecus kidney cells	Growth kinetics of poxvirus tumour yaba after in vitro adaptation to cercopithecal renal cells.
20	relationship between atmospheric temperature and survival of airborne bacteria	The relationship between atmospheric temperature and survival of suspended bacteria in air.
20	short term storage at 4 c of trypsinized tissues	Short-term storage at 4 c's of trypsinized tissue.
20	alterations in the phospholipid composition of escherichia coli b during growth at different temperatures	Alterations in the phospholipid composition of the ester; escherichia coli b during growth at different temperatures.
20	purification and characterization of beta glucosidase of alcaligenes faecalis	The purification and characterization of the beta-glucosidase of the alkaligenic acid faecalis.
20	microgermination of bacillus cereus spores	Microgermination of cereus bacillus spores.
20	fine structure of vibrio cholerae during toxin production	Fine structure of vibrio cholerae during the toxin production.
20	study of the thermal denaturation of ribonuclease a by differential thermal analysis and susceptibility to proteolysis	Investigation of thermal denaturation of ribonuclease a by differential thermal analysis and proteolysis susceptibility.
20	ribonucleic acid synthesis and transport in animal cells at 27 degrees c	L&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid (RNA) and transport in animal cells at 27 degrees c.
20	protection antisera afford against death by endotoxin	Antisera protect against death by endotoxin.
20	occurrence of vibrio parahaemolyticus and related hemolytic vibrios in marine environments of washington state	Presence of vibrio parahaemolyticus and related hemolytic vibrios in the marine environment of Washington State.
20	mycotoxin from a blue eye mold of corn	Mycotoxin from apos; a blue corn mussel in the eyes.
20	methods used to monitor the microbial load of returned lunar material	The methods used to monitor the microbial load of returned lunar material will be as follows.
20	seasonal incidence of bacterial temperature types in louisiana soil and water	Seasonal incidence of bacterial temperature types in the soil and in Louisiana water.
20	biochemical characterization of sulfur assimilation by salmonella pullorum	Biochemical characterization of apos; sulphur assimilation by salmonella pullorum.
20	formation and ultrastructure of extra membranes in escherichia coli	Formation and ultrastructure of additional escherichia coli membranes.
20	reassociation of deoxyribonucleic acids from actinoplanes and other actinomycetes	Reunion of the deoxyribonucleic acids of actinoplanes and d' other actinomycetes.
20	amino acid transport in mycobacterium smegmatis	Amino acid transport in the smegmatis mycobacterium.
20	mode of action of pectic enzymes ii further purification of exopolygalacturonate lyase and pectinesterase from clostridium multifermentans	Modes; action of pectic enzymes ii further purification of the enzymes; exopolygalacturonate lyase and pectinesterase of the clostridium multifermentans.
20	comparative study of isoenzyme formation of bacterial beta galactosidase	Comparative study of bacterial beta galactosidase isoenzymes.
20	calorimetric evidence for the liquid crystalline state of lipids in a biomembrane	Calorimetric evidence for apos; liquid crystalline lipid state in a biomembrane.
20	prototrophic thermophilic bacillus isolation properties and kinetics of growth	Properties of isolation of thermophilic prototrophic and kinetic growth bacilli.
20	intracellular protein breakdown in a thermophile	Dissolution of proteins in a thermophile.
20	effect of temperature on survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae	Effects of temperature on survival of airborne pneumonia mycoplasma.
20	effect of bacteria on chemotaxis in the cellular slime molds	The effect of bacteria on the chemotaxis of the cellular myxomycetes.
20	herpes type virus of the frog renal adenocarcinoma i virus development in tumor transplants maintained at low temperature	The frog's herpes-like virus; renal adenocarcinoma (RCA) develops in low-temperature tumour transplants.
20	contribution of the excluded volume of bovine serum albumin for solute molecules to the aprent nonsolvent water	Contribution of the excluded volume of bovine serum albumin to the molecules of solute at the apos; non-soluble water from the apron.
20	the decomposition of soluble collagen by gamma irradiation	The gamma irradiation decomposition of soluble collagen.
20	acetylcholine concentrations in rat brain diurnal oscillation	"""Acetylcholine concentration in rat brain diurnal oscillation,"" J. Am."
20	nucleic acid similarities among pseudomonas pseudomallei pseudomonas multivorans and actinobacillus mallei	Comparison of nucleic acids between pseudomonas pseudomallei pseudomonas multivorans and actinobacillus mallei.
20	base composition of deoxyribonucleic acid of the temperature sensitive kanamycin resistant r factor rts1	Base composition of kanamycin resistant rts1-deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	biochemical changes during fungal sporulation and spore germination i phenyl methyl sulfonyl fluoride inhibition of macroconidial germination in microsporum gypseum	Biochemical changes during fungal sporulation and the germination of iphenyl methyl sulfonyl fluoride spores that inhibit macroconidial germination in microsporum gypseum.
20	aerobic heterotrophic bacteria indigenous to ph 2 8 acid mine water predominant slime producing bacteria in acid streamers	Aerobic heterotrophic bacteria native to soils; acid mine water ph 28 which produces primarily bacterial sludge in acidic coils.
20	isolation and properties of lipoproteins from normal rat serum	Isolation and properties of normal rat serum lipoproteins.
20	relation of mitochondrial phospholipase a activity to mitochondrial swelling	Relationship between l' mitochondrial phospholipase a activity and mitochondrial swelling.
20	a spectrophotometric study of the secondary structure of ribonucleic acid isolated from the smaller and larger ribosomal subparticles of rabbit reticulocytes	A spectrophotometric study of the secondary structure of l' ribonucleic acid isolated from the sub-smaller, larger, ribosomal particles of rabbit reticulocytes.
20	effect of temperature acclimatization on the fatty acid composition of goldfish intestinal lipids	Effect of pH; temperature acclimation on fatty acid composition of goldfish intestinal lipids.
20	release of vitamin b12 binding protein by human leukocytes in vitro	Release of vitamin b12 binding protein from human leukocytes.
20	the biosynthesis of phosphatidylinositol in human platelets	The biosynthesis of phosphatidylinositol in the human platelets.
20	partial purification and kinetics of oestriol 16 alpha glucuronyltransferase from the cytosol fraction of human liver	Partial and kinetic purification of estriol 16 alpha glucuronyltransferase from the human liver cytosolic fraction.
20	salt effects on the denaturation of dna	Effects on denaturation of DNA.
20	effects of atmospheric humidity and temperature on the survival of airborne flavobacterium	Effects of weather and humidity on the survival of airborne flavobacteria.
20	inhibitory action of tetrathionate enrichment broth	Inhibitor action of d&apos broth; tetrathionate enrichment.
20	replicate surveys of larval habitats of aedes aegypti in relation to dengue haemorrhagic fever in bangkok thailand	Repeat the surveys of larval habitats of d' aedes aegypti in relation to dengue hemorrhagic fever in the area of Bangkok, Thailand.
20	a generalized system for automation of enzyme assays	System of generalized enzyme testing; automation of enzyme testing.
20	conditioned nalorphine induced abstinence changes persistence in post morphine dependent monkeys	Changes in the persistence of nalorphine; nalorphin-induced abstinence after conditioning in morphine-dependent monkeys.
20	bacteriological and shelf life characteristics of canned pasteurized crab cake mix	Bacteriological characteristics and shelf life of pasteurized crab cake mix in canned form.
20	dengue virus plaque development in simian cell systems ii agar variables and effect of chemical additives	Plaque development of dengue virus in simian cell systems ii variable agar and effect of chemical additives.
20	effects of moisture content and temperature on aflatoxin production in corn	Effects of moisture content and temperature on production of apos; aflatoxin in corn.
20	thermoelectrically cooled temperature gradient apparatus for comparative cell and virus temperature studies	Thermoelectric temperature gradient (TLD) device for comparative studies of cell and virus temperature.
20	nitrite and hydroxylamine reduction in higher plants fractionation electron donor and substrate specificity of leaf enzymes principally from vegetable marrow cucurbita pepo l	Nitrite and apo reduction; hydroxylamine in higher fractionation plants, donor of d' electron and substrate specificity of leaf enzymes, mainly from the cucurbita pepo l of the plant pith.
20	studies on a testosterone glucuronyltransferase from the cytosol fraction of human liver	Studies of testosterone glucuronyltransferase from the cytosolic fraction of human liver.
20	estimation of platelet adhesiveness on whole blood and platelet rich plasma	Estimation of apo; adhesion of platelets to whole blood and platelet-rich plasma.
20	a simple diagnostic milk medium for pseudomonas aeruginosa	A simple medium for the diagnosis of pseudomonas aeruginosa milk.
20	cytoplasmic filaments of amoeba proteus i the role of filaments in consistency changes and movement	Cytoplasmic filaments of the apos; amoeba proteus i the role of filaments in movement and consistency changes.
20	factors influencing the activity of succinate dehydrogenase in membrane preparations from micrococcus lysodeikticus	Factors influencing apos; succinate dehydrogenase activity in membrane preparations of micrococcus lysodeikticus lysodeikticus.
20	uncertainties in the determination of the cortisol binding capacity of plasma and their removal	Uncertainties with respect to determination of plasma cortisol binding capacity and plasma cortisol elimination.
20	carbon monoxide association of community air pollution with mortality	L' association of carbon monoxide pollution with air pollution; community air with mortality.
20	antibody against western equine encephalitis virus occurring in the serum of garter snakes colubridae thamnophis in saskatchewan	Antibody to potato virus; equine potato encephalitis; West present in the sera of colubridae thamnophis garter snakes in Saskatchewan.
20	preparation and properties of creatine kinase from the breast muscle of normal and dystrophic chicken gallus domesticus	Preparation and properties of normal and dystrophic chicken gallus domesticus mammary muscle creatine kinase.
20	penicillic acid production by blue eye fungi on various agricultural commodities	Production of potatoes; penicillic acid by mushrooms of blue eyes on various agricultural products.
20	kinetic constants for aerobic growth of microbial populations selected with various single compounds and with municipal wastes as substrates	Kinetic constants for aerobic growth of selected microbial populations with various simple compounds and municipal wastes as the substrate.
20	bacteriology of manganese nodules v effect of hydrostatic pressure on bacterial oxidation of mnii and reduction of mno2	The bacteriology of manganese nodules affects mnii bacterial oxidation and mn2 reduction by hydrostatic pressure.
20	temperature dependent van der waals forces	Van der waals forces are dependent on the temperature.
20	flavin photosensitized reactions of retinol and stilbene	Flavines also photosensitize the reactions of retinol and stilbene.
20	determination of high affinity oestrogen receptor sites in uterine supernatant preparations	Determination of high affinity estrogen receptor sites in preparations of uterine supernatants.
20	photodynamic action of proflavine on coliphage t3 i kinetics of inactivation	Photodynamic action of proflavine on protein kinetics; inactivation of t3 coliphage i.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase in virions of newcastle disease virus comparison with the vesicular stomatitis virus polymerase	Comparison of l' ribonucleic acid polymerase from Newcastle disease virus virions with vesicular stomatitis polymerase virus.
20	proton magnetic resonance studies of the ferredoxins from spinach and parsley	Proton magnetic resonance studies of ferredoxins in spinach and parsley.
20	micro indirect hemagglutination test for cytomegalovirus	Indirect micro-d&apos test; hemagglutination for the cytomegalovirus.
20	biochemical alterations in bacillus megaterium as produced by aflatoxin b1	Biochemical alterations of megaterium bacillus produced by aflatoxin b1.
20	morphological alterations in bacillus megaterium as produced by aflatoxin b1	Morphological alterations of megaterium bacillus produced by aflatoxin b1.
20	zonal centrifuge applied to the purification of herpesvirus in the luck frog kidney tumor	Zonal centrifuge applied to purification of the apos; herpesvirus in frog kidney tumor portal-happiness.
20	new technique for microscopic examination of the fouling community of submerged opaque surfaces	New technique; microscopic examination of the community; fouling of opaque submerged and opaque surfaces.
20	injury of bacteria by sanitizers	Bacterial lesion caused by the disinfectants.
20	labile serum factor and its effect on arbovirus neutralization	The labile serum factor and its effect on the neutralization of arboviruses.
20	effect of storage of mueller hinton agar plates on zone sizes for antimicrobial testing	Effect of pH; storage of agar plates; hinton mueller on size of area for antimicrobial testing.
20	agar overlay plaquing technique for pseudomonas aeruginosa in hela monolayers	Plating technique on agar for pseudomonas aeruginosa in apo monolayers; agar.
20	bacteriophage active against the lactic acid beverage producing bacterium lactobacillus casei	Active bacteriophage against sucrose drink; lactic acid producing the lactobacillus casei bacterium.
20	use of acetone dried vaccines for preparing capsular antisera against the klebsiella group and the lyophilization of klebsiella cultures	Use of dried apo vaccines; acetone to prepare capsular antisera against the klebsiella group and lyophilization of cultures of klebsiella.
20	properties of caulobacter ribonucleic acid bacteriophage phi cb5	Properties of the bacteriophage phi cb5 of Caulobacter ribonucleic acid.
20	stability of antibiotics and chemotherapeutics in agar plates	Stability of antibiotics and chemotherapeutic agents in agar plates.
20	electrical characteristics of sphingomyelin bilayer membranes	Electrical characteristics of sphingomyelin double layer membranes.
20	a male producing strain of the house fly	A male producing the stump of the domestic fly.
20	effect of injury on shivering thermogenesis in the rat	Effect of lesion on shivering thermogenesis in rat.
20	the effect of semicarbazide on the nature and stability of collagen fibrils	Effect of semicarbazide treatment on the nature and stability of collagen fibrils.
20	thermodynamic studies of the assembly in vitro of native collagen fibrils	Thermodynamic studies of native collagen fibrils; in vitro collagen fibril assembly.
20	the mechanism of uptake of cobalt ions by neurospora crassa	The mechanism is the absorption of the cobalt ions by the neurospora crassa.
20	circular dichroism studies at variable temperature urobilinoid conformation	Variable temperature circular dichroism studies are carried out on the urobiloid conformation.
20	hybridization properties of dna sequences directing the synthesis of messenger rna and heterogeneous nuclear rna	Properties of d' DNA sequence hybridization, directing synthesis of messenger and heterogeneous nuclear rna.
20	rna metabolism in hela cells at reduced temperature i modified processing of 45s rna	The transformation of 45s rna was altered by rna metabolism in helical cells at reduced temperature i.
20	physiological studies of methane and methanol oxidizing bacteria oxidation of c 1 compounds by methylococcus capsulatus	Physiological studies of methane and methanol oxidizing acids; oxidation of compounds c1 by the bacteria by methylococcus capsulatus.
20	ultrastructure of the cell wall of erwinia amylovora	Cell wall ultrastructure of erwinia amylovora.
20	observations on the rhodanese activity of desulfotomaculum nigrificans	Observations on desulfotomaculum nigrificans; rhodanese desulfotomaculum nigrificans activity.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization among strains of lactobacilli	Lipos hybridization; deoxyribonucleic acid among lactobacilli strains.
20	effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the ribosomes of bacillus subtilis	Effect of sulfhydryl reagents on ribosomes of the bacillus subtilis.
20	effect of hydroxyethylrutosides on blood oxygen levels and venous insufficiency symptoms in varicose veins	The effect of hydroxyethylrutosides on blood levels; oxygen in the blood and symptoms; and the effect of venous insufficiency in varicose veins.
20	natural causes of variations in the weight of sarcoma 180	Natural causes of weight changes in sarcoma 180.
20	the effects of varying concentrations of colchicine on the progression of grasshopper neuroblasts into metaphase	The effects of various colchicine concentrations on the progression of metaphase grasshopper neuroblasts.
20	accumulation and elimination of coliphage s 13 by the hard clam mercenaria mercenaria	Accumulation and elimination of coliphage 13 by mercenary clams.
20	production of ochratoxins in different cereal products by aspergillus ochraceus	In addition, it is used in the production of ochratoxins in various cereal products; aspergillus ochraceus.
20	tremorgenic toxins from penicillia 3 tremortin production by penicillium species on various agricultural commodities	Tremorgenic toxins produced by the production of penicillia 3 tremortin by penicillium species on various agricultural products.
20	transient phases of the isometric tetanus in frog s striated muscle	Isometric tetanus transient phases in frog striated muscle.
20	the temperature activity relationships of serum cholinesterases	Relationship between temperature and serum cholinesterase activity.
20	molecular events in the growth inhibition of bacillus subtilis by d tyrosine	Molecular events in the host; inhibition of growth of the subtilis bacillus by tyrosine d.
20	changes in membrane lipid composition in exponentially growing staphylococcus aureus during the shift from 37 to 25 c	Changes in the lipid composition of the membrane of exponentially growing staphylococcus aureus from 37 to 25 c.
20	cytological studies of deoxyribonucleic acid replication in escherichia coli 15t replication at slow growth rates and after a shift up into rich medium	Cytological studies of the replication of deoxyribonucleic acid in the replication of apos; escherichia coli 15t at slow growth rates and after a shift to a rich medium.
20	lysis of blue green algae by myxobacter	Lysation of the blue-green algae by the myxobacterium.
20	properties of the amylase from halobacterium halobium	Properties of Apos; Dapos amylase; Halobacterium halobium.
20	leakage of oxygen from blood and water samples stored in plastic and glass syringes	Oxygen leak from blood and urine samples; water stored in plastic and glass syringes.
20	vitamin b12 uptake by intestinal microorganisms mechanism and relevance to syndromes of intestinal bacterial overgrowth	Vitamin b12 uptake by intestinal microorganisms is a mechanism and a link to intestinal bacterial growth-promoting syndromes.
20	miniculture plaquing technique for mouse cytomegalovirus	A mini-culture plating technique for mouse cytomegalovirus.
20	quantitative studies on fabrics as disseminators of viruses v effect of laundering on poliovirus contaminated fabrics	Quantitative studies of tissues as diffusers of virus whitening effect on tissues infected with polioviruses.
20	new method of isolating salmonellae from milk	New method for the isolation of Salmonella from milk.
20	differential identification of mycobacterium kansasii and mycobacterium marinum	Differential identification of mycobacterium kansasii and mycobacterium marinum.
20	the effect of temperature change upon transmitter release facilitation and post tetanic potentiation	L' effect of temperature change on facilitation of transmitter release and transmitter potentiation post-tetanic.
20	ribosomes from xenopus laevis ovaries and the polyuridylic acid directed biosynthesis of polyphenylalanine	Ribosomes from the ovary of xenopus laevis and l' polyuridylate directed the biosynthesis of polyphenylalanine.
20	effect of geometrical and chemical constraints on water flux across artificial membranes	The effect of geometrical and chemical constraints on the flow of water through the artificial membranes.
20	oxygen 18 studies of recent planktonic foraminifera comparisons of phenotypes and of test parts	Oxygen 18 studies of recent foraminiferous planktonic comparisons of phenotypes and parts of plants; test.
20	variant of penicillinase mediated by an r factor in escherichia coli	Variant of r-mediated penicillinase in escherichia coli.
20	cephaloglycin and its biologically active metabolite desacetylcephaloglycin	Cephaloglycine and its biologically active metabolite, deacetylcephaloglycine.
20	microorganisms of the san francisco sour dough bread process ii isolation and characterization of undescribed bacterial species responsible for the souring activity	The micro-@ organisms of the salted bread process of San francisco ii isolation and characterization of undescribed bacterial species responsible for the apo; activity d' origin.
20	incidence of infectious drug resistance among fecal coliforms isolated from raw sewage	Incidence of infectious drug resistance among the fecal coliforms isolated from raw sewage.
20	spermidine requirement for bacillus thuringiensis ribosomes in cell free phenylalanine incorporation	Spermidine required for bacillus thuringiensis ribosomes; incorporation of phenylalanine acellular.
20	roadrunners energy conservation by hypothermia and absorption of sunlight	Lapos conservation; energy from the apos; hypothermia and l' absorption of sunlight.
20	the development and the extinction of hyperthermia induced by conditioned avoidance behavior in rats	Development and death; hyperthermia induced by predatory behaviour; conditioned avoidance in rats.
20	in vitro stimulation of enzyme secretion and the synthesis of microsomal membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig	In vitro stimulation of enzyme secretion and synthesis of microsomal membranes in guinea pig pancreas.
20	an assay for intercellular adhesive specificity	A test for specificity of the implant; intercellular adhesive for specificity of the implant; intercellular adhesive.
20	proteins of polyhedal cytoplasmic deoxyvirus ii nucleotide phosphohydrolase activity associated with frog virus 3	Polyhedral cytoplasmic deoxyvirus proteins ii nucleotide phosphohydrolase activity associated with frog virus 3.
20	comparison of the ribonucleic acid polymerases of two rhabdoviruses kern canyon virus and vesicular stomatitis virus	Comparison of the polymerases of l' ribonucleic acid of two rhabdoviruses, canyon kern virus and vesicular stomatitis virus.
20	a model of respiratory heat transfer in a small mammal	A respiratory heat transfer model in a small mammalian animal.
20	efeect of temperature on hospital admissions for myocardial infarction in a subarctic area	Effect of temperature on hospitalizations for myocardial infarction (MI) in a subarctic region.
20	factors influencing the inhibitory action of anti inflammatory drugs on carrageenin induced oedema	Factors that influence carrageenan are known to cause edema as a result of the inhibitory action of anti-@-@inflammatory drugs.
20	influence of temperature on the iron metabolism of a fluorescent pseudomonad	In addition, a pseudomonad fluorescents are used to regulate the metabolism of iron.
20	properties of aldolase from francisella tularensis	Properties of francisella tularensis aldolase.
20	glucocorticoid induced alteration of the surface membrane of cultured hepatoma cells	The glucocorticoids induced an alteration of the surface membrane of the hepatoma cultured cells.
20	staphylococcal bacteriophage associated lysin a lytic agent active against staphylococcus aureus	Staphylococcal bacteriophage associated with lysine, a lytic agent that is active against Staphylococcus aureus.
20	growth and reproduction of mice cross fostered between parents reared at different temperatures	Growth and reproduction of the crossed mice were promoted by parents reared at different temperatures.
20	a comparison of mitochondria from torulopsis utilis grown in continuous culture with glycerol iron ammonium magnesium or phosphate as the growth limiting nutrient	A comparison of torulopsis utilis mitochondria grown in continuous culture with glycerol, iron, and ammonium, magnesium, or phosphate as growth-limiting nutrients.
20	protein and carbohydrate moieties of a preparation of lactamase ii	Proteins and carbohydrates from lactamase preparation ii.
20	inorganic particles in cigars and cigar smoke	Inorganic particulate matter in cigars and cigar smoke.
20	characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplast 5s ribosomal ribonucleic acid from broad bean leaves	Characterization of apos; ribosomal ribonucleic acid 5s cytoplasm and chloroplast from bean leaves.
20	purification and some kinetic properties of rat liver glucosamine synthetase	Purification and certain kinetic properties of rat liver glucosamine synthetase.
20	binding of substrates and modifiers to glucosamine synthetase	Attachment of substrates and modifiers to glucosamine synthetase.
20	cholesterol metabolism in the macrophage i the regulation of cholesterol exchange	Cholesterol metabolism in macrophage he regulation of cholesterol exchange.
20	the kinetics of influx of calcium and strontium into rat intestine in vitro	The kinetics of the apos; calcium and strontium influx in the apos; rat intestine in vitro.
20	nucleated sites for the assembly of cytoplasmic microtubules in the ectodermal cells of blastulae of arbacia punctulata	Nucleated sites for the apos; cytoplasmic microtubule assembly in ectodermal cells of blastulas d' arbacia punctulata.
20	ribonucleic acid transcriptase acitvity in purified wound tumor virus	"""Ribonucleic acid transcriptase acitvity in purified wound tumor virus,"" Arch."
20	mammary carcinoma a specific biochemical defect in autonomous tumors	Breast carcinoma is a specific biochemical abnormality found in autonomic tumors.
20	disinfection of cystoscopes by subatmospheric steam and steam and formaldehyde at 80 degrees c	Disinfection of cystoscopes by subatmospheric vapour and vapour and 80 degree c formaldehyde.
20	uptake of tetracycline by membrane preparations from escherichia coli	Absorption of tetracycline by membrane preparations of apos; escherichia coli.
20	prostaglandin e 1 in platelet harvesting an in vitro study	Prostaglandin 1 in platelets collected as part of an in vitro study.
20	prostaglandin e 1 in preparation and storage of platelet concentrates	Prostaglandin e 1 is used for the preparation and storage of platelet concentrates.
20	lytic enzyme from lysates of streptomyces venezuelae infected with actinophage msp2	L' lytic enzyme of bacterial streptomycin lysates infected with msp2 actinophage.
20	purification of bacteroides amylophilus protease	Bacterioide amylophilus protease purification.
20	influence of temperature of incubation and type of growth medium on pigmentation in serratia marcescens	Influence of temperature, incubation, and type of growth medium on pigmentation in serratia marcescens.
20	induction of pigmentation in nonproliferating cells of serratia marcescens by addition of single amino acids	Induction of pigmentation in the non-proliferating cells of serratia marcescens by the addition of a single amino acid.
20	temperature control of phospholipid biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Temperature control of phospholipid biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
20	extracellular transglucosylase and alpha amylase of streptococcus equinus	Extracellular streptococcus equinus transglucosylase and alpha-amylase.
20	mescaline induced changes of brain cortex ribosomes role of sperimidine in counteracting the destabilizing effect of mescaline of brain cortex ribosomes	Mescaline induced changes in the role of ribosomes of the cerebral cortex of sperimidine in the neutralization of the apos; a destabilizing effect of mescaline on ribosomes of the cerebral cortex.
20	the arrangement of proteins on the deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin	L' protein arrangement on the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin.
20	a laboratory study of spontaneous platelet aggregation	Laboratory study of spontaneous platelet aggregation.
20	the association in vitro of polyribosomes with ribonuclease treated derivatives of hepatic rough endoplasmic reticulum characteristics of the membrane binding sites and factors influencing association	L' in vitro association of polyribosomes with ribonuclease-treated derivatives of hepatic rough endoplasmic reticulum characteristics of membrane-binding sites and factors affecting them; association.
20	sugar transport effect of temperature on concentrative uptake of alpha methylglucoside by kidney cortex slices	L' effect of temperature on sugar transport; concentrative absorption of sugar; alpha-methylglucoside by thin slices of renal cortex.
20	evidence of gene diminution during the formation of the macronucleus in the protozoan stylonychia dna density melting curves micronuclear dna polytene chromosomes	Evidence of a gene diminution during macronucleus formation in the protozoan stylonychia the fusion density of the apos; DNA polytene chromosomal micronuclear curves of the apos; DNA.
20	studies on energy linked reactions energy linked reduction of oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by succinate in escherichia coli	The reduction of succinate-oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli is energy related.
20	rabies detection in road killed skunks mephitis mephitis	Detection of road rage has killed mephitis mephitis skunks.
20	application of immunofluorescence to studies on the ecology of sphaerophorus necrophorus	Application of apo; immunofluorescence to apo studies; ecology of the sphaerophorus necrophorus.
20	arylamidase of cephalosporium acremonium and its specificity for cephalosporin c	Cephalosporium acremonium Arylamidase and its specificity to cephalosporin c.
20	initiation of staphylococcal growth in laboratory media	Initiation of staphylococcal growth in laboratory.
20	kinetics of the vaccinia virus plaque neutralization test	Vaccine plate virus neutralization test kinetics.
20	the total thermal insulation of the new born baby	Total thermal insulation of the new-born.
20	circular dischroism of bradykinin and related peptides	Circular dischroism of bradykinin and related peptides.
20	polyribosomal attachment to rat liver and hepatoma endoplasmic reticulum in vitro a method for its study	L' polyribosomal attachment to rat liver and endoplasmic reticulum of liver; in vitro hepatoma is a method of study.
20	the amylase of the beetle callosobruchus chinensis properties	L' amylase of the properties of beetle callosobruchus chinensis.
20	effects of hydrostatic pressure and temperature on the uptake and respiration of amino acids by a facultatively psychrophilic marine bacterium	Effect of hydrostatic pressure and temperature on the absorption and respiration of amino acids by a marine bacterium that is facultifiably psychrophilic.
20	fatty acid composition of bifidobacterium and lactobacillus strains	Fatty acid (FA) composition of bifidobacterium and lactobacillus strains.
20	structural changes during lysis of a psychorophilic marine bacterium	Structural changes during lysis of apos; a marine psychorophilic bacterium.
20	sarcoplasmic reticulum and the temperature dependent contraction of smooth muscle in calcium free solutions	Sarcoplasmic reticulum and smooth muscle contraction were found to be temperature dependent in calcium-free solutions.
20	basal bodies but not centrioles in naegleria	The basal bodies, but not the centrioles, in naegleria.
20	the effect of light chloralose and pentobarbitone anaesthesia on the acid base state and oxygenation of arterial blood in dogs	Effect of apos; mild chloralosis and pentobarbitone anesthesia on apos; basic acid and apos; oxygenation of arterial blood in the dog.
20	inward spread of activation in vertebrate muscle fibres	Internal diffusion of l' activation in vertebrate muscle fibers and muscle fibers.
20	factors influencing the uptake of 125 i polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the intestine of the young rat	Factors influencing the apos; absorption of polyvinyl pyrrolidone 125 i by the young rat intestine.
20	events occurring near the time of synapsis during transformation in diplococcus pneumoniae	Events occurring near the time of synapsis during diplococcus pneumoniae transformation.
20	positive and negative control of r factor replication in proteus mirabilis	Positive and negative control of r factor replication in mirabilis protein.
20	genetic behavior of r factors in vibrio cholerae	The genetic behaviour of r factors in the vibrio cholerae.
20	effect of temperature on the fatty acid composition of the extreme thermophiles bacillus caldolyticus and bacillus caldotenax	Effect of temperature on the fatty acid composition of extreme thermophilic caldolyticus and caldotax.
20	separation of the primary dehydrogenase from the cytochromes of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced form oxidase of bacillus megaterium	Separation of primary dehydrogenase from nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide cytochromes reduces the oxidase form of the bacillus megaterium.
20	dihydroxyacetone phosphate its structure and reactivity with glycerophosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase and some possible metabolic implications	Dihydroxyacetone phosphate structure and reactivity with glycerophosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase and some possible metabolic implications.
20	protein phospholinase reactions in mammalian testis stimulatory effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of basic proteins	Reactions of the protein phospholinase in mammalian testes stimulatory effects of l' cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate on basic protein phosphorylation.
20	nuclear magnetic resonance spectrum of lysine vasopressin and its structural implications	The nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) spectrum of lysine vasopressin and its structural implications.
20	concentration and purification of viruses by adsorption to and elution from insoluble polyelectrolytes	Virus concentration and purification by adsorption and elution from insoluble polyelectrolytes.
20	t 2 toxin production by fusarium tricinctum on solid substrate	Toxin t 2 production by fusarium tricinctum on a solid substrate.
20	streptomycin uptake by mycobacterium tuberculosis	L' absorption of streptomycin by tuberculous mycobacteria.
20	ultrafiltration as a method for concentrating rift valley fever virus grown in tissue culture	L' ultrafiltration as a method of concentrating the tissue cultured rift valley fever virus.
20	automated method for the determination of free formalin in biological products	Automated method for the determination of organic free formalin.
20	method for the preservation of diagnostic sera for field and laboratory work	Method for the preservation of diagnostic serum products for field and laboratory work.
20	transport of vitamin b 12 in escherichia coli	Vitamin b12 transport in the Escherichia coli.
20	synthesis of pyruvate carboxylase from its apoenzyme and biotin in bacillus stearothermophilus mechanism and control of the reaction	Synthesis and reaction control of pyruvate carboxylase from its apoenzyme and biotin in the stearothermophilus bacillus.
20	dielectric dispersion in aqueous solutions of oxyhaemoglobin and carboxyhaemoglobin	Dielectric dispersion in aqueous solutions of oxyhemoglobin and carboxyhemoglobin.
20	flow dependence of transtubular potential difference in isolated perfused segments of rabbit proximal convoluted tubule	The difference in transtubular potential is a function of flow in isolated and perfused segments of the rabbit proximal contoured tubule.
20	simplified fluorometric method for the determination of plasma glycerol	Simplified fluorometric method for determination of plasma glycerol.
20	polyoma tumor antigen an activator of chromosome replication	Polyoma tumor antigen, an activator of chromosomal replication.
20	proton magnetic resonance studies of chromatium high potential iron protein	Proton magnetic resonance study of ferric high-potential protein of chromatium.
20	differential effect of phleomycin on the infectivity of poliovirus and poliovirus induced ribonucleic acids	The differential effect of phleomycin on poliovirus and poliovirus infectivity induces ribonucleic acids.
20	influence of polycations on the interaction between poliovirus multistranded ribonucleic acid and hela cells	Influence of polycations on apos; interaction between apos; poliovirus multi-stranded ribonucleic acid and helical cells.
20	enlargement of escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection ii proposed mechanism	An increase in the number of bacteria; Escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection; infection by bacteriophage ii.
20	rapid methods for determining decarboxylase activity ornithine and lysine decarboxylases	Rapid methods to determine apos; ornithine decarboxylase activity and lysine decarboxylase activity.
20	rapid methods for determining decarboxylase activity arginine decarboxylase	Rapid methods to determine the apos; arginine decarboxylase activity.
20	repair of injury in freeze dried salmonella anatum	Repair of lesions caused by lyophilized salmonella anatum.
20	transport media for herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2	Transport media for potato viruses; herpes simplex types 1 and 2.
20	formation of aerial hyphae in candida albicans	Formation of aerial hyphae in the candida albicans.
20	channel catfish virus a new herpesvirus of ictalurid fish	The channel catfish virus is a new herpesvirus found in the ictalurid fishes.
20	binding of ddt to lecithin	Uh, the D.O.L. binding to lecithin.
20	the computed distribution of copper ii and zinc ii ions among seventeen amino acids present in human blood plasma	Calculated distribution of copper ions ii and zinc ions ii among the 17 amino acids present in human blood plasma.
20	the significance of changes in the temperature of the skin and body core of the chicken in the regulation of heat loss	L' importance of changes in chicken skin and body temperature in regulating heat loss.
20	mechanism of adsorption and eclipse of bacteriophage phi x174 i in vitro conformational change under conditions of eclipse	Eclipse of bacteriophage phi x174 i in vitro conformational change under laboratory conditions; eclipsing; eclipsing.
20	genetic polymorphisms in varied environments	Genetic polymorphisms in different environments.
20	incidence of prosthecate bacteria in a polluted stream	The impact of prosthetic bacteria in a contaminated water classroom.
20	growth temperatures and temperature characteristics of aeromonas	Growth temperature and temperature characteristics d' Aeromonas.
20	microagglutination procedures for febrile agglutination tests	Microagglutination methods for apo testing; agglutination febrils.
20	disc plate method of microbiological antibiotic assay i factors influencing variability and error	Disc plate method for dosage; antibiotic microbiological test i factors influencing variability and dosage; error.
20	disc plate method of microbiological antibiotic assay ii novel procedure offering improved accuracy	Disc plate method; antibiotic microbiological test ii new method with increased accuracy.
20	synthesis of l 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine from l tyrosine by microorganisms	Synthesis of l4 dihydroxyphenylalanine from tyrosine l by microorganisms.
20	bactericidal antibody response in the pacific hagfish eptatretus stoutii	Reaction of bactericidal antibodies in Pacific hagfish, eptatretus stoutii.
20	utilization of palmitic acid by mycobacterium avium	Use of l' palmitic acid by avium mycobacterium.
20	cell free passive transfer of delayed hypersensitivity to chemicals in guinea pigs	Cell-free passive transfer of the cells; delayed chemical hypersensitivity in guinea pigs.
20	antiviral immune cytolysis at an early stage of paramyxovirus infection	Antiviral immunocytolysis at an early stage of apos; infection with paramyxovirus.
20	experimental alteration of the relationship between the external calcium concentration and the contractile force generated by auricular trabeculae isolated from the heart of the frog rana pipiens	Experimental modification of the relationship between external calcium concentration and contractile force generated by fleshy atrial columns isolated from the heart of rana pipiens frog.
20	analysis of the potential dependent changes in optical retardation in the squid giant axon	Analysis of potential optical retardation-dependent changes in the squid giant axon.
20	replication of the r factor rts1 in proteus mirabilis	Reproduction of rts1 factor in the Proteus mirabilis.
20	characteristics of s organism isolated from methanobacillus omelianskii	Characteristics of the organism; isolated from methanobacillus omelianskii.
20	germination of heat and alkali altered spores of clostridium perfringens type a by lysozyme and an initiation protein	Heat and alkali germination altered spores of Clostridium perfringens type a per lysozyme and protein initiation.
20	effect of temperature on the integrity of bacillus psychrophilus cell walls	Effect of temperature on apos; cell wall integrity of psychrophilic bacillus.
20	studies on the induction and biosynthesis of vitellogenin an oestrogen induced glycolipophosphoprotein	Studies on the induction and biosynthesis of vitellogenin, an estrogen-induced glycolipophosphoprotein (EGP) protein.
20	thermal and ph stability of 2 isopentenyl pyrophosphate	Thermal and ph stability of 2 isopentenyl pyrophosphate.
20	separation of molecular species of lipoprotein lipase from adipose tissue	Apos separation; lipoprotein lipase molecular species from adipose tissue.
20	rapid recovery of escherichia coli from estuarine water	Rapid re-establishment of apos; Escherichia coli in estuarine water.
20	bacterial cell production from hexadecane at high temperatures	Production of bacterial cells from hexadecane, at high temperature.
20	sporostatic and sporocidal properties of aqueous formaldehyde	Sporostatic and sporocidal properties of aqueous formaldehyde.
20	stability of live attenuated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccine	Sustained live attenuated vaccine against apos; Venezuelan equine encephalitis.
20	thyroxine binding globulin characterization of the binding site with a fluorescent dye as a probe	Characterization of thyroxine binding globulin binding site to apo; aid; a fluorescent dye as probe.
20	new pseudomonad utilizing methanol for growth	This is a new pseudomonad that uses methanol for growth.
20	isolation of mycoplasma membranes by digitonin	Isolation of mycoplasmic membranes by digitonin.
20	interaction of l cells and chlamydia psittaci entry of the parasite and host responses to its development	Interaction of l cells and chlamydia psittaci parasite entry and host response to development.
20	aerosol survival of pasteurella tularensis and the influence of relative humidity	Aerosol survival of pasteurella tularensis and lapos; influence of lapos; relative humidity.
20	growth of salmonella typhimurium in skim milk concentrates	Salmonella typhimurium growth in skim milk concentrates.
20	a ribosome dissociation factor from rabbit reticulocytes fluoride e coli ribosomes initiation factors	A ribosome dissociation factor from rabbit reticulocyte fluoride and coli ribosome initiation factors.
20	detection of polyadenylic acid sequences in viral and eukaryotic rna polu u cellulose columns poly u filters fiberglass hela cells bacteriophage t4	Detection of DNA sequences; polyadenyl acid in columns of viral and eukaryotic polynuclear cellulose, poly u u filters, fiberglass helical cell bacteriophage t4.
20	lifetime of the excited state in vivo i chlorophyll a in algae at room and at liquid nitrogen temperatures rate constants of radiationless deactivation and trapping	The life span of phosphate; excited state in vivo i chlorophyll a in algae, ambient temperature and temperature of phosphate; liquid nitrogen, is constant rate of radiationless quenching and trapping.
20	lifetime of the excited state in vivo ii bacteriochlorophyll in photosynthetic bacteria at room temperature	Life span of apo; excited state in vivo ii bacteriochlorophyll in photosynthetic bacteria at ambient temperature.
20	colorimetric determination of serum acid phosphatase activity using adenosine 3 monophosphate as substrate	Apos colorimetric determination; serum acid phosphatase activity using d&apos monophosphate; adenosine 3 as substrate.
20	altered thermal sensitivity in injured and demyelinated nerve a possible model of temperature effects in multiple sclerosis	Change of thermal sensitivity in damaged and demyelinated nerve tissue, a possible model of the effects of temperature in multiple sclerosis.
20	some effects of temperature on the growth of f pili	Some of the effects of temperature on pili growth.
20	effect of temperature on the intra hepatic vasculature	Effect of temperature on intra-@ hepatic vascularization.
20	electron spin resonance of an irradiated single crystal of 5 chlorouridine	The electron paramagnetic resonance of a single crystal irradiated with 5 chlorouridine.
20	lactamases of r factors derived from shigella and salmonella strains	R-factor lactamases derived from strains of both shigella and salmonella.
20	purification and properties of an polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase produced by bacillus pumilus	A trans polygalacturonic acid (trans-polygalacturonic acid) produced by the pumilus bacillus.
20	in vivo and in vitro action of new antibiotics interfering with the utilization of n acetyl glucosamine n acetyl muramyl pentapeptide	L' action in vivo and in vitro of novel antibiotics that interfere with the apos; use of n acetyl glucosamine n acetyl muramyl pentapeptide.
20	effect of growth temperature on the lipid composition of thermus aquaticus	Effect of growth temperature on lipid composition of thermus aquaticus.
20	human senile cataractous lens protease isolation and some chemical characteristics	Isolation of human senile cataract lens protease and chemical characteristics.
20	rna polymerases of maize partial purification and properties of the chloroplast enzyme	Maize partial purification rna polymerases and chloroplast enzyme properties.
20	isolation of a calcium sequestering protein from sarcoplasmic reticulum	Isolate a protein that sequesters the sarcoplasmic reticulum (TSR) calcium.
20	cellulolytic activity of thermomonospora curvata optimal assay conditions partial purification and product of the cellulase	L' cellulolytic activity of thermomonospora curvata provides partial purification and cellulase product.
20	isolation and characterization of mitochondrial dna from drosophila melanogaster	Isolation and characterization of the mitochondrial DNA of the Drosophila melanogaster.
20	aspartate transcarbamoylase from phaseolus aureus partial purification and properties	Partially purified phaseolus aureus aspartate transcarbamoylase and properties.
20	isolation and identification of xanthotoxin 8 methoxypsoralen and bergapten 5 methoxypsoralen from celery infected with sclerotinia sclerotiorum	Isolation and identification of xanthotoxin 8 methoxypsoralen and bergapten 5 methoxypsoralen from celery infected with sclerotia.
20	properties of the refolding and unfolding reactions of ribonuclease a	Properties of folding and unfolding reactions of a ribonuclease.
20	some properties of pyruvate and 2 oxoglutarate oxidation by blowfly flight muscle mitochondria	Pyruvate and 2 oxoglutarate oxidized by muscle mitochondria of flies.
20	synthesis characterization and properties of uridine 5 d apio d furanosyl pyrophosphate	Characterization of the synthesis and properties of uridine 5 d apio d furanosyl pyrophosphate.
20	partial purification and properties of the pyruvate uridine diphospho n acetylglucosamine transferase from staphylococcus epidermidis	Partial purification and properties of pyruvate uridine diphospho n acetylglucosamine transferase of staphylococcus epidermidis.
20	purification and characterization of epizootic diarrhea of infant mice virus	Purification and characterization of the epizootic diarrhea of the childhood mouse virus.
20	physiochemical properties of the native zinc and manganese prepared metalloprotease of bacillus polymyxa	Physiochemical properties of metalloprotease of polymyxa bacillus prepared from native zinc and manganese.
20	production and purification of a staphylococcus epidermidis bacteriocin	Production and purification of apos; bacteriocin of staphylococcus epidermidis bacteriocin.
20	uric acid characterization of its interaction with human serum albumin	Characterization by etapos; uric acid for interaction with human serum albumin.
20	isolation and properties of mesosomal membrane fractions from micrococcus lysodeikticus	Mesosomal membrane fraction isolation and properties of micrococcus lysodeikticus.
20	platelet concentrates sterility of 400 single units stored at room temperature	Concentrated sterility of 400 single units of platelets stored at room temperature.
20	human placental cathepsin b1 isolation and some physical properties	Isolation of the human placental cathepsin b1 and some physical properties.
20	isolation of a specific enhancer for echovirus 6 from uninfected permissive host cells	Isolation of apos; a specific apos activator; echovirus 6 from uninfected, permissive host cells.
20	proton magnetic resonance and magnetic susceptibility characterization of ferredoxin i from bacillus polymyxa	Characterization of the magnetic susceptibility and proton magnetic resonance of ferredoxin i of polymyxa bacillus.
20	characterization of the dominant aerobic microorganism in cattle feedlot waste	Characterization of the micro-aerobic organism dominant in feedlot and feedlot waste.
20	beta d phosphogalactoside galactohydrolase from streptococcus cremoris hp purification and enzyme properties	Beta d phosphogalactoside galactohydrolase of hp purification of streptococcus cremoris and enzymatic properties.
20	inactivated rabies vaccine produced from the flury lep strain of virus grown in bhk 21 suspension cells	Inactivated rabies vaccine produced from the flurry strain of lep virus grown in suspension in bhk 21 cells.
20	the purification and properties of extracellular glycosidases of the cellular slime mould dictyostelium discoideum	Purification and properties of extracellular glycosidases of dictyostelium discoideum myxomycete.
20	purification and properties of undecyl acetate esterase from pseudomonas cepacia grown on 2 tridecanone	The purification and properties of the esterase of apos; acetate of apos; undecyl of pseudomonas cepacia grown on 2 tridecanones.
20	purification of polynucleotide phosphorylase by affinity chromatography and some properties of the purified enzymes	Purified polynucleotide phosphorylase by d&apos chromatography; affinity and some properties of purified enzymes.
20	partial characterization and purification of a rabbit granulocyte factor that increases permeability of escherichia coli	Partial characterization and purification of rabbit cells; a rabbit granulocyte factor that increases the permeability of escherichia coli.
20	cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bone characterization of the enzyme and studies of inhibition by thyroid hormones	Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bone characterization of apos; enzyme and d' d&apos studies; thyroid hormone inhibition.
20	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formate dehydrogenase from clostridium thermoaceticum purification and properties	The nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate is formate dehydrogenase dependent upon purification and the properties of thermoacetic clostridium.
20	progesterone binding components of chick oviduct viii receptor activation and hormone dependent binding to purified nuclei	L' activation of viii receptors of the chicken oviduct and hormone-dependent binding to progesterone-purified nuclei are binding components.
20	purification properties and mode of action of hemicellulase i produced by ceratocystis paradoxa	Purification properties and method; action of apos; hemicellulase i produced by ceratocystis paradoxa.
20	on the fidelity of dna replication characterization of polynucleotides with errors in base pairing synthesized by avian myeloblastosis virus deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase	On the fidelity of characterization of the replication of the apos; DNA of polynucleotides with errors in the apos; pairing of bases synthesized by the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase of avian myeloblastosis virus.
20	purification and characterization of mouse kidney beta glucuronidase	Purification and characterization of beta glucuronidase in mouse kidney.
20	preparation and purification of polymerized actin from sea urchin egg extracts	Preparation and purification of apo; polymerized actin from apo extracts; eggs; sea urchins.
20	purification and properties of homoserine transacetylase from bacillus polymyxa	The purification and properties of the homoserine transacetylase of polymyxa bacillus.
20	poly 8 bromoadenylic acid synthesis and characterization of an all syn polynucleotide	Synthesis of l' bromoadenylic acid, poly-8; and characterization of apos; an all syn polynucleotide.
20	characterization of the genome of phycomyces blakesleeanus	Characterization of genome of phycomyces blakesleeanus.
20	properties of a prolactin receptor from the rabbit mammary gland	The properties of a rabbit mammary gland prolactin receptor.
20	isolation and characterization of mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid of acanthamoeba castellanii	Isolation and characterization of apos; mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid; acanthamoeba castellanii.
20	isolation of salt soluble elastin from ligamentum nuchae of copper deficient calf	Isolate the apos; salt-soluble ligamentum nuchae elastin from copper-deficient calf.
20	properties of corynebacterium acnes bacteriophage and description of an interference phenomenon	Properties of bacteriophage corynebacterium acnes and description of d' a d&apos phenomenon; interference.
20	assay characterization and localization of an enterotoxin produced by salmonella	Characterization and localization of a Salmonella-induced enterotoxin.
20	virus isolation and titration at 33 degrees and 37 degrees c	Virus isolation and titration at 33 degrees 37 degrees c.
20	purification and properties of a serine protease from pseudomonas matophilia	Purification and properties of a pseudomonas matophilia serine protease.
20	hatching in the monogenean parasite dictyocotyle coeliaca from the body cavity of raja naevus	Hatching of dictyocotyl coeliaca monogenean occurs in the body cavity of raja naevus.
20	hansenula lynferdii sp nov	Hansenula lynferdii sp. nov.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of bhk 21 c13 cells partial purification and characterization of the enzymes	Deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase from bhk 21 c13 cells Partial purification and enzyme characterization.
20	purification and properties of the pyruvate kinase of sturgeon muscle	The purification and properties of pyruvate kinase from white sturgeon muscle.
20	isolation characterization and stability of the 30s ribosomal rna complex from hela cells	Characterization and stability of the cell; isolation of the 1930s ribosomal complex from helical cells.
20	purification and properties of a beta 1 6 clucosidase from flavobacterium	The purification and the properties of a beta 16 clucosidase of flavobacterium.
20	purification and properties of nucleic acids from an unusual cytoplasmic organelle in the flagellate protozoan crithidia oncopelti	Purification and properties of d&apos nucleic acids; an unusual cytoplasmic organelle in the protozoan flagellate Crithidia oncopelti.
20	platelet antiheparin activity the isolation and characterisation of platelet factor 4 released from thrombin aggregated washed human platelets and its dissociation into subunits and the isolation of membrane bound antiheparin activity	Platelet anti-heparin activity, isolation and characterization of platelet factor 4 released from washed and aggregated human platelets by thrombin and its dissociation under @-@units and l' isolation of plaque; anti-hepos membrane-bound anti-hepin activity.
20	purification of a derepressible arylsulfatase from chlamydomonas reinhardti properties of the enzyme in intact cells and in purified state	Apos purification; a derepressible arylsulfatase from apos properties; enzyme in Chlamydomonas reinhardti in intact and purified cells.
20	isolation of an extracellular neutral proteinase from pseudomonas fragi	Isolate extracellular neutral proteinase from Pseudomonas fragi.
20	purification properties and induction of a specific benzoate 4 hydroxylase from aspergillus niger ubc 814	Purification and induction of specific benzoate hydroxylase from aspergillus niger 814 and benzoate 4 hydroxylase.
20	partial purification and characterization of the lipase of a facultatively psychrophilic bacterium acinetobacter o16	Partial purification and characterization of lipase d' an facultatively psychrophilic lipase bacterium, acinetobacter o16.
20	an experimentally pathogenic bacillus species i description and characterization of the organism	A pathogenic bacillus species experimentally describes and characterizes the organism.
20	isolation of aeromonas sp atcc 29063 a phenol producing organism from fresh haddock	Isoler aeromonas sp atcc 29063, a phenol-producing organism; fresh haddock.
20	the purification of cholinesterase from horse serum	Cholinesterase purification from horse serum.
20	purification and characterization of aspergillus niger exo 1 4 glucosidase	Purification and characterization of the apos; aspergillus niger exo 1 glucosidase 4 glucosidase.
20	the cytotoxins of cobra venoms isolation and partial characterization	Cytotoxins from cobra venom were isolated and partially characterized.
20	purification and properties of elastolytic enzyme from flavobacterium immotum	Purification and properties of the elastolytic flavobacterium immotum enzyme.
20	purification and properties of beta galactosidase from aspergillus oryzae	The purification and properties of aspergillus oryzae beta galactosidase.
20	enzymatic studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride ii purification and properties of two cellulases	Enzyme studies on a cellulase system of virid trichoderma ii purification and properties of two cellulases.
20	purification and some properties of alkaline pullulanase from a strain of bacillus no 202 1 an alkalophilic microorganism	Purification and some properties of the alkaline pullulanase a bacillus strain No. 202 1 a micro-@alkalophilic organism.
20	purification and characterization of two activities of the intracellular dextransucrase from leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299	Purification and characterization of two intracellular dextransucrase activities of leuconostoc mesenteroides nrl b 1299 f.
20	myosin from molluscan abalone haliotis discus isolation and enzymatic properties	Abalone myosin abalone disc; abalone and enzymatic properties.
20	isolation and purification of flavobacterium alpha 1 3 glucanase hydrolyzing insoluble sticky glucan of streptococcus mutans	Isolation and purification of flavobacterium alpha 13 glucanase hydrolyzing insoluble streptococcus mutans sticky glucan.
20	production purification and characterization of an extracellular chitosanase from streptomyces	Production, purification, and characterization of extracellular streptomycin chitosanase.
20	colchicine binding protein of the liver its characterization and relation to microtubules	The liver colchicine binding protein, its characterization and microtubule relationship.
20	physicochemical properties of planorbis corneus erythrocruorin	Physico properties-chemicals of planorbis corneus erythrocruorin.
20	isolation and identification of rumen bacteria capable of anaerobic phloroglucinol degradation	Isolate and identify rumen bacteria capable of degrading the anaerobic phloroglucinol.
20	staphylococcal micrococcins ii isolation purification and identification	Staphylococcal micrococcins ii purification of tissues; isolation and identification.
20	the isolation and characterization of a temperate phage y46 e2 from erwinia herbicola y40	Isolation and characterization of a temperate herbaceous phage y46e2 of herbaceous plants.
20	a rapid method for purification of human granulocyte cationic neutral proteases purification and characterization of human granulocyte chymotrypsin like enzyme	A rapid method for purification of cationic neutral proteases from human granulocytes and for characterization of chymotrypsin from human granulocytes similar to the enzyme.
20	epizootic and enzootic aspects of minchinia nelsoni haplosporida disease in maryland oysters	Enzootic and epizootic aspects of minchinia nelsoni haplosporida disease in maryland oyster huters, Arch.
20	characterization of a specific transport system for arginine in isolated yeast vacuoles	Characterization of apos; a specific transport system for arginine in isolated yeast vacuoles.
20	purification and properties of an exo cellulase component of novel type from trichoderma miride	Purification and properties of a component of the cellulase; exo cellulase d' a new type from trichoderma miride.
20	studies on phospholipases from streptomyces iii purification and properties of streptomyces hachijoensis phospholipase c	Investigation of the phospholipases of streptomyces iii purification and the properties of streptomyces hachijoensis phospholipase c.
20	isolation and characterization of a proteinase from the sarcocarp of melon fruit	Isolation and characterization of melon; a proteinase from the fruit melon sarcocarp.
20	purification of herpesvirus saimiri and properties of the viral dna	Purification of the virus; saimiri herpesvirus and its properties; viral DNA.
20	purification characterization and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dependent lactate dehydrogenase from actinomyces viscosus	Characterization and regulation of the purification of apos; a l&apos-dependent nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide lactate dehydrogenase; actinomyces viscosus.
20	colchicine affects kinetics of concanavalin a mediated agglutination of hepatoma cells and plasma membranes from liver and hepatoma cells	Colchicine affects concanavalin kinetics, a mediated agglutination of liver and liver cells; hepatoma and plasma membranes; and hepatoma.
20	purification and properties of arylsulphatase from the brain of the silkworm bombyx mori	The purification and properties of the bombyx mori silkworm brain arylsulfatase.
20	purification and characterization of a streptomyces albus endo n acetylmuramidase lytic for group a and other beta haemolytic streptococci	Purification and characterization of an endogenous lytic streptomycin acetylmuramidase for group a and d' other hemolytic beta streptococci.
20	partial purification and properties of protease from torula thermophila	Partial purification and protease properties of the thermophila torula.
20	a case of deficiency of the seventh component of complement in man biological properties of a c7 deficient serum and description of a c7 inactivating principle	A case of deficiency of the seventh component of the complement in human biological properties; a case of serum deficiency in c7 and the description of c7; a case of inactivation of c7.
20	characterization of primary reactants in bacterial photosynthesis ii kinetic studies of the light induced epr signal g 2 0026 and the optical absorbance changes at cryogenic temperatures	Characterization of primary reagents in bacterial photosynthesis ii kinetic studies of g 2,0026 light-induced esr signal and changes in apo; optical absorbance at cryogenic temperatures.
20	15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase from human placenta 1 isolation and characterization	Hexprostaglandin dehydrogenase 15 from the isolation and characterization of human placenta 1.
20	purification and properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from parsely leaf	Purification and properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from scattered leaves.
20	correlations between physical and drug release characteristics of polyethylene glycol suppositories	Correlations between physical characteristics and release characteristics of polyethylene glycol (PGE) suppositories.
20	a dna polymerase from embryos of drosophila melanogaster purification and properties	DNA polymerase from drosophila melanogaster embryos, purifying and possessing properties.
20	membranes of tetrahymena iv isolation and characterization of temperature responsive smooth and rough microsomal subfractions	Tetrahymena membranes iv, isolation and characterization of under-smooth and rough temperature sensitive microsomal fractions.
20	separation of cholinergic proteolipids from quenched rat cerebral cortex and resolution of properties at low temperature	Separation of cholinergic proteolipids from the rat cerebral cortex and resolution of cholinergic properties at low temperature.
20	increased reactivity of rat alpha foetoprotein with corresponding antiserum after 125i labelling	Increased reactivity of rat alpha fetoprotein with the corresponding antiserum after labelling with 125i.
20	purification and properties of a yeast protein kinase	Purification and properties of yeast protein kinase.
20	purification and characterization of two peroxidases from hard wheat	Purification and characterization of two durum peroxidases.
20	tryptophanase from sphaerophorus funduliformis purification molecular weight and subunit properties	Sphaerophorus funduliformis tryptophanase, molecular mass of purification and properties of sub-units.
20	purification and characterization of a glycosyltransferase complex from the culture broth of streptococcus mutans fa1	Purification and characterization of cells; glycosyltransferase complex from apos; streptococcus mutans fa1 culture broth.
20	purification and properties of myeloperoxidase from mice leukocytes	Purification and properties of mouse leukocyte myeloperoxidase.
20	chemically induced temperature sensitive mutants of dengue virus type 2 i isolation and partial characterization	Temperature-sensitive mutants induced chemically for isolation and partial characterization of the dengue virus type 2 i.
20	lh rh interactions with pituitary receptors properties and characterization	Rhh interactions with pituitary receptor properties and characterization.
20	characterization of an inducible amidase from pseudomonas acidovorans ae1	Characterization of apos; an inducible pseudomonas acidovorans ae1 amidase.
20	characterization of n ethylmaleimide reactive proteins from human tonsillar ribosomes by two dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Characterization of reactive proteins in human amygdal ribosomes by two-dimensional, polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
20	magnetic susceptibility measurements of deoxygenated hemoglobins and isolated chains	Magnetic susceptibility measurement of deoxygenated hemoglobins and of isolated chains.
20	prolactin binding in rat mammary gland during pregnancy and lactation	Attachment of prolactin in the rat mammary gland during pregnancy and lactation.
20	purification of sea urchin ribosomal rna genes with a single strand specific nuclease	Purification of sea urchin ribosomal genes by single-stranded nuclease.
20	isolation and characterization of two alkaline ribonucleases from calf serum	Isolation and characterization of two alkaline calf serum ribonucleases.
20	the glass point of elastin	The glass tip of the elastin.
20	purification and characterization of an extracellular exo d galacturonanase of aspergillus niger	Apos purification and characterization; an extracellular exo galacturonanase; aspergillus niger.
20	in vitro preparation and characterization of a 700 nm absorbing chlorophyll water adduct according to the proposed primary molecular unit in photosynthesis	In vitro preparation and characterization; an absorbing chlorophyll adduct; 700 nm water according to apos; primary molecular unit proposed for photosynthesis.
20	an improved assay for bacterial methane mono oxygenase some properties of the enzyme from methylomonas methanica	An improved assay of bacterial methane monooxygenase, certain properties of the bios; enzyme of methylomonas methanica.
20	oxygen uptake and blood respiratory properties of the caecilian boulengerula taitanus	L' oxygen absorption; and respiratory properties of blood from the caecilian boulengerula.
20	characterization of an extracellular dextranase from fusarium moniliforme	Characterization of apos; extracellular dextranase from moniliform fusarium.
20	kinetic studies on pantothenase from pseudomonas fluorescens effects of ph on substrate and inhibitor binding	Kinetic studies of pseudomonas fluorescens pantothenase inhibitory effects of ph on substrate and binding of l&apos.
20	transfer of heme from heme albumin to hemopexin	Transfer of the apos; heme of the apos; heme albumin to the apos; hemopexin.
20	industrial preparation of poly vinyl chloride	Industrial preparation of polyvinyl chloride.
20	partial purification and characterization of alpha glucosidase from pseudomonas fluorescens w	Partial purification and characterization of pseudomonas fluorescens alpha glucosidase w.
20	isolation of a moderate halophilic ammonia oxidizing bacterium nitrosococcus mobilis nov sp	Isolation of apo; a moderately halophilic bacterium that oxidizes apo; ammonia nitrosococcus mobilis sp. nov.
20	affinity chromatography on immobilised nucleotides some applications to the purification of thermophilic dehydrogenases and kinases	Chromatography of apos; affinity on immobilized nucleotides, some applications for the purification of thermophilic dehydrogenases and kinases.
20	enzymic synthesis of an aromatic ring from acetate units partial purification and some properties of flavanone synthase from cell suspension cultures of petroselinum hortense	The enzymatic synthesis of d' an aromatic nucleus from d' an acetate, which allows partial purification and some flavanone synthase properties from suspension cultures of hortense petroselin.
20	isolation and characterization of active ribosomal subunits from human placenta	Isolation and characterization of sub-active ribosomal units of the human placenta.
20	oestrogen receptors in chick oviduct characterization and subcellular distribution	Dapos receptors; estrogen in egg characterization; chicken oviduct and subcellular distribution.
20	purification and some properties of a novel maltohexaose producing exo amylase from aerobacter aerogenes	Purification and certain properties of a new maltohexaose producing apos; exo amylase from apos; Aerobacter aerogenes.
20	further characterization of the androgen receptor in rat testis	Further characterization of androgen receptor in rat testis.
20	purification and characterization of tonin	Tonin purification and characterization.
20	some biological properties of herpesvirus saimiri from chronically infected monolayer and suspension cultures	Certain biological properties of saimiri herpesvirus (SV) from chronically infected monolayer and suspension cultures.
20	physico chemical properties of ribonuclease a modified with pyridoxal 5 phosphate	Physico properties-chemical ribonuclease has changed by pyridoxal 5 phosphate.
20	human deoxythymidine kinase i purification and general properties of the cytoplasmic and mitochondrial isozymes derived from blast cells of acute myelocytic leukemia	Purification of human deoxythymidine kinase i and the general properties of cytoplasmic and mitochondrial isozymes derived from blast cells of acute myelocytic leukemia.
20	bovine pancreatic lipase i isolation homogeneity and characterization	Homogeneity and characterization of apos; isolation of pancreatic lipase i.
20	physiological and dna characterization of candida maltosa a hydrocarbon utilizing yeast	Physiological characterization and DNA of candida maltosa, a yeast hydrocarbon.
20	effect of temperature salts ph and other factors on the development of peritrichous flagella in vibrio alginolyticus	Effect of temperature salts ph and other factors on the development of peritrichous flagella in the vibrio alginolyticus.
20	dissolution rates of high energy sulfathiazole povidone coprecipitates ii characterization of form of drug controlling its dissolution rate via solubility studies	Dissolution Rates of High Energy Povidone Sulfathiazole Co-Presidents ii. characterization of the form of the drug that controls dissolution rate by solubility studies.
20	cathepsin phosphoprotein phosphatase and acid phosphatase in the soluble fraction of the cattle brain cortex purification and properties author s transl	Cathepsin phosphoprotein phosphatase and acid phosphatase in the soluble fraction of cortical purification of bovine cerebral cortex and properties of the transl.
20	the trypsin and chymotrypsin inhibitors in chick peas cicer arietinum l purification and properties of the inhibitors	The inhibitors of trypsin and chymotrypsin in chickpeas cicer arietinum l purification and the properties of inhibitors.
20	purification of normal human urinary n acetyl beta hexosaminidase a by affinity chromatography	Purification of normal human urine beta-acetyl acetate-hexosaminidase by d*apos chromatography; affinity.
20	physicochemical properties of two atypical cytochromes c crithidia cytochrome c 557 and euglena cytochrome c 558	Chemical properties of two atypical cytochromes, c crithidia cytochrome c 557 and euglena cytochrome c 558.
20	biosynthesis of heparin solubilization and partial characterization of n and o sulphotransferases	Heparin solubilization biosynthesis; partial characterization of n and sulfotransferases.
20	alcohol oxidases of kloeckera sp and hansenula polymorpha catalytic properties and subunit structures	Alcohols oxidases of polymorpha kloeckera sp and hansenula polymorpha catalytic properties and structures of under-units.
20	i n vitro transcription of adenovirus 2 dna i characterization of promoters for e coli rna polymerase	In vitro transcription of apovirus; adenovirus 2 dna characterization of apovirus promoters; e coli rna polymerase.
20	preparation of the lectin b component from the hemagglutinin of lens culinaris	Preparation of lectin b from hemagglutinin of the culinaris lens.
20	purification and properties of an enzyme catalyzing the splitting of carbon mercury linkages from mercury resistant pseudomonas k 62 strain i splitting enzyme 1	Purification and properties of a mercury-resistant enzyme catalyzing the separation of @-@mercury bonds from l' separation enzyme 1 from pseudomonas i strain k62.
20	partial purification and properties of microsomal phosphatidate phosphohydrolase from rat liver	Partial purification and properties of microsomal rat liver phosphatidate phosphohydrolase.
20	purification and some enzymatic properties of the chitosanase from bacillus r 4 which lyses rhizopus cell walls	Purification and some enzymatic properties of chitosanase from r4 bacillus that lyses the cell walls of rhizopus.
20	some physicochemical properties of hemoglobin manitoba alpha2 102ser replaced by arg g9 beta2	Some physico-chemical properties of l' manitoba alpha2 haemoglobin 102ser replaced by arg g9 beta2.
20	laboratory procedures for the isolation of chlamydia trachomatis from the human genital tract	Laboratory procedures for isolation of chlamydia trachomatis from the human genital tract.
20	characterization of the mannosyl and fucosyl transferases in the ovine anterior pituitary glands	Characterization of mannosyl and fucosyl transferases in the anterior pituitary glands of the ovine.
20	polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase in the osmotic shock fluid of erwinia rubrifaciens characterization of the purified enzyme and its effect on plant cells	L' polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase in osmotic shock fluid d' erwinia rubrifaciens characterizes the apos; purified enzyme and its effect on plant cells.
20	purification of plasma membrane penicillinase from bacillus licheniformis 749 c and comparison with exoenzyme	Penicillinase purification from the plasma membrane of the bacillus licheniformis 749 c and comparison with the etapos; exoenzyme.
20	the hydrophobic membrane penicillinase of bacillus licheniformis 749 c characterization of the hydrophilic enzyme and phospholipopeptide produced by trypsin cleavage	Hydrophobic membrane penicillinase of the bacillus licheniformis 749 c characterization of the hydrophilic enzyme and trypsin cleavage-produced phospholipopeptide.
20	isolation and characterization of actinopolyspora halophila gen et sp nov an extremely halophilic actinomycete	Isolation and characterization of l' actinopolyspora halophila gen et sp nov., an extremely halophilic actinomycete.
20	factors affecting the sensitivity of replicating mccoy cells in the isolation and growth of chlamydia a tric agents	Factors affecting the sensitivity of McCoy cell replication in isolation and growth of chlamydia tric agents.
20	partial characterization of prostaglandin synthetase in the reproductive tract of the male house cricket acheta domesticus	Partial characterization of prostaglandin synthetase in the egg; cricket reproductive apparatus purchased domesticus male.
20	classification of micrococci on the basis of deoxyribonucleic acid homology	Micrococcal classification based on apo; homology of apo; deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	circular dichroism and ethidium bromide binding capacity of chromatin from cells temperature sensitive for the transformed phenotype	Circular dichroism and bromide binding ability of temperature-sensitive cells to d' chromatin ethidium for the transformed phenotype.
20	iodination of dna studies of the reaction and iodination of papovavirus dna	The results of the study are summarized in the table below.
20	purification and properties of two initiation factors from bacillus stearothermophilus	Purification and properties of two d&apos factors; stearothermophilus bacillus initiation.
20	further characterization of yeast rna polymerases effect of subunits removal	Further characterization of apo; effect of yeast cell polymerases on apo; removal of sub@-@ units.
20	effects of aureo s 700r on sporulation viability and infectivity of ovine coccidial oocysts	The effects of apos; aureole 700r on sporulation viability and lapos; infectivity of ovine coccidian oocysts.
20	purification and properties of arylsulphatase a from rabbit testis	Purification and properties of arylsulfatase has rabbit testicles.
20	isolation and basic properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from brewing yeast	Thiamine pyrophosphokinase isolation and basic properties of brewing yeast.
20	calorimetric and freeze fracture analysis of lipid phase transitions and lateral translational motion of intramembrane particles in mitochondrial membranes	Calorimetric analysis of lipid phase transitions and lateral translational motion of intramembrane particles in mitochondrial membranes.
20	physiology and characterization of a fungal milk clotting enzyme from aspergillus flavus	Physiology and characterization of a fungal enzyme for the coagulation of milk from aspergillus flavus.
20	partial denaturation of mouse dna in preparative cscl density gradients at alkaline ph	Partial denaturation of the apo; mouse DNA in density gradients cscl preparation to alkaline phalin.
20	characterization of agarose bound trypsin	Characterization of trypsin associated with apos; agarose.
20	purification and characterization of phosphodiesterase i from bothrops atrox	Purification and characterization of phosphodiesterase I from both atrox strains.
20	paromomycin and dihydrostreptomycin binding to escherichia coli ribosomes	Paromomycin and dihydrostreptomycin bind to Apos; Escherichia coli ribosomes.
20	characterization of the toromeric structure in drosophila lummei	Characterization of toromeric structure in drosophila lummei.
20	soluble adenylate cyclase from the culture medium of bordetella pertussis purification and characterization	Soluble adenylate cyclase from the purification culture media and bordetella pertussis characterization.
20	characterization of l asparagine transport systems in stemphylium botryosum	Characterization of the transport systems of the asparagine l in the stem of dephylium botryosum.
20	purification and properties of an endo cellulase of avicelase type from irpex lacteus polyporus tulipiferae	The purification and properties of an avicelase-like endo cellulase, irpex lacteus polyporus tulipiferae.
20	purification and properties of the extracellular dextransucrase from leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299	Purification and properties of extracellular dextransucrase of leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299 c.
20	steroidogenesis in the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal coretx i isolation and some properties of mitochondria from the zona glomerulosa of the bovine adrenal cortex	Steroidogenesis in the glomerular zone of the apos; adrenal cortical isolation i and some properties of bovine adrenal cortical glomerulosa mitochondria.
20	alkaline phosphatase of thiobacillus thioparus partial purification and properties of the enzyme	Alkaline phosphatase from thiobacillus thioparus partially purified and properties of the enzyme.
20	purification and properties of l asparaginase from mycobacterium phlei	The purification and properties of the l-asparaginase from mycobacterium phlei.
20	exocytosis in secretory cells of rat lacrimal gland peroxidase release from lobules and isolated cells upon cholinergic stimulation	L' exocytosis in the peroxidase secretory cells of the rat lacrimic gland releases isolated lobules and cells by cholinergic stimulation.
20	isolation and characterization of a microsomal arylaminopeptidase from rat kidney	Isolation and characterization of rat kidney microsomal arylaminopeptidase.
20	isolation and characterization of dna dna and dna rna	Isolation and characterization of DNA and DNA; RNA.
20	alpha mannosidase from phaseolus vulgaris composition and structural properties	Alpha mannosidase is derived from the composition and structural properties of phaseolus vulgaris.
20	simple isolation method and assay for t4 dna ligase and characterization of the purified enzyme	Simple method of detection; isolation and assay of ligase; purified enzyme; t4 DNA and characterization.
20	functional properties of fragments of the sarcoplasmic reticulum of the fast and slow muscles of rana ridibunda frogs	Functional properties of sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments from slow and fast muscles of rana ridibunda frogs.
20	cytochrome c1 of bakers yeast i isolation and properties	Bakery yeast cytochrome c1 i isolation and properties.
20	purification and characterization of a repressible alkaline phosphatase from thermus aquaticus	Repressive alkaline phosphatase from thermus aquaticus.
20	properties of tubulin in unfertilized sea urchin eggs quantitation and characterization by the colchicine binding reaction	The properties of tubulin in unfertilized sea urchin eggs are quantified and characterized by their colchicine-binding activity.
20	enzymatic studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride iv purification and properties of a less random type cellulase	Enzymatic studies on a cellulase purification system of virid trichoderma iv. and d' a less random type of cellulase.
20	the ovalbumin gene in vitro enzymatic synthesis and characterization	Enzyme synthesis and in vitro characterization of the ovalbumin gene.
20	solubilized nuclear receptors for thyroid hormones physical characteristics and binding properties evidence for multiple forms	Solubilized nuclear receptors for thyroid hormones, physical characteristics and evidence binding properties of multiple forms.
20	isolation and properties of a thermostable restriction endonuclease endo r bst1503	Isolation and properties of endo r bst1503 endo r thermostable restriction endonuclease.
20	isolation and characterization of an enzyme with esterase activity from micropolyspora faeni	Isolation and characterization of micropolyspora faeni; an enzyme with esterase activity from micropolyspora faeni.
20	mccarey kaufman technique of corneal storage before penetrating keratoplasties in rabbits an evaluation	Mccarey kaufman cornea storage technique before penetrating keratoplasty in rabbits an evaluation.
20	purification and characterization of a peripheral protein from the sheep erythrocyte membrane	Purification and characterization of apos, a peripheral protein of sheep erythrocyte membrane.
20	isolation and properties of the fibrinolytic enzyme from the actinomyces thermovulgaris cultural broth	Isolation and properties of apos; fibrinolytic enzyme from d&apos broth; actinomyces thermovulgaris.
20	purification and properties of l asparaginase b from acinetobacter calcoaceticus	The purification and properties of the-asparaginase b of the acinetobacter calcoaceticus.
20	nature and properties of c3hf natural antitumor cytotoxins directed against murine lymphosarcoma cells	Nature and properties of natural antitumor cytotoxins c3hf directed against murine lymphosarcoma cells.
20	partial purification of human intestinal alkaline phosphatase with affinity chromotography some properties and interaction of concanavalin a with alkaline phosphatase	Partial purification of human intestinal alkaline phosphatase with d&apos chromotography; affinity, certain properties, and interaction of concanavalin a with alkaline phosphatase.
20	purification and properties of the extracellular metallo proteinases of chromobacterium lividum ncib 10926	The purification and properties of extracellular metalloproteinases from chromobacterium lividum ncib 10926 are described.
20	the extracellular metalloprotease of serratia marcescens i purification and characterization	Serratia marcescens extracellular metalloprotease i purification and characterization.
20	influence of magnesium on chloride induced calcium release in skinned muscle fibers	The influence of magnesium on chloride induced the release of calcium from the muscle fibers.
20	growth of spirillum lipoferum at constant partial pressures of oxygen and the properties of its nitrogenase in cell free extracts	Growth of spirillum lipoferum under constant partial pressures of apos; oxygen and nitrogenase properties in cell-free extracts.
20	extracellular nuclease produced by a marine bacterium ii purification and properties of extracellular nuclease from a marine vibrio sp	The extracellular nuclease produced by the purification of apos; a marine bacterium ii and the properties of the extracellular nuclease d' a marine vibrio.
20	characterization of a strain of methanospirillum hungatti	Characterization of apos; a strain of hungatti methanospirillum.
20	solubilization partial purification and radioassay for the intrinsic factor receptor from the ileal mucosa	Partial solubilization and radio-test for the ileal mucosal intrinsic factor receptor.
20	coupling of catecholamine receptor from one cell with adenylate cyclase from another cell by cell fusion	Catecholamine coupling; one cell with apos; adenylate cyclase d' another cell by cell fusion.
20	membrane bound dd carboxypeptidase and transpeptidase activities from bacillus megaterium km at ph 7 general properties substrate specificity and inhibition by beta lactam antibiotics	The membrane-bound dd carboxypeptidase and transpeptidase activities of bacillus megaterium km at general properties of ph 7 are substrate specific and inhibited by beta lactamic antibiotics.
20	purification and properties of pyrazon dioxygenase from pyrazon degrading bacteria	Purification and properties of pyrazon dioxygenase from pyrazon-degrading bacteria.
20	properties of renin granules isolated from rat kidney	The properties of the renin granules isolated from the rat kidney tissue.
20	studies on an alpha amylase from a thermophilic bacterium i purification and characterization	Studies of an alpha amylase from a bacterium, a thermophilic bacterium, and purification and characterization.
20	isolation and characterization of acid invertase inhibitor from sweet potato	Isolation and characterization of sweet potato inhibitory acid invertase.
20	structure of nuclear pre mrna viii isolation and characterization of complementary sequences	Structure of the apos; nuclear isolation prior to mrna viii and characterization of complementary sequences.
20	isolation and characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplastic ribosomes and their ribosomal rnas from the diatom cylindrotheca fusiformis	Isolation and characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplast ribosomes and their ribosomal rnas from cylindrotheca fusiformis diatom.
20	synthesis of a disulfide affinity adsorbent for purification of estrogen receptor	D&apos synthesis; a D&apos adsorbent; disulfide affinity for estrogen receptor purification.
20	high resolution proton nuclear magnetic resonance investigation of the structural and dynamic properties of d c15a15 d t15g15	A high-resolution proton magnetic resonance study of the structural and dynamic properties of dc15a15d t15g15 has been carried out.
20	alkaline phosphatase of blastocladiella emersonii partial purification and characterization	Blastocladiella emersonii alkaline phosphatase is partially purified and characterized.
20	characterization of porosity of isostatically pressed and sintered nickel base powdered metal	Characterization of the porosity of nickel-based isostatically pressed and sintered powder.
20	characterization of ribonucleoprotein particles released from isolated nuclei of regenerating rat liver in two different in vitro systems	Characterization of ribonucleoprotein particles released from isolated nuclei of the regenerating rat liver in two different in vitro systems.
20	isolation purification and investigation of physico chemical properties and specificity of leu gly gly amino peptidase	D&apos purification; isolation and study of physical properties-chemicals and specificity of leu gly amino peptidase.
20	purification and properties of two aromatic aminotransferases in bacillus subtilis	Purification and properties of two aromatic aminotransferases of Bacillus subtilis.
20	a new oxygenase 2 nitropropane dioxygenase of hansenula mrakii enzymologic and spectrophotometric properties	A novel oxygenase 2 nitropropane mrakii hansenula dioxygenase with spectrophotometric and enzymological properties.
20	yersinia enterocolitica recovery and characterization of two unusual isolates from a case of acute enteritis	Yersinia enterocolitica Recovery and characterization of two unusual isolates from one case of acute enteritis.
20	numerically dominant denitrifying bacteria from world soils	Denitrifying bacteria numerically dominant in soils worldwide.
20	morpholigic and physiologic repercussions of partial removal of brown adipose tissue in rats acclimated to different temperatures	Morphological and physiological effects of the apos; partial removal of brown adipose tissue in acclimated rats at different temperatures.
20	production and properties of hemagglutinin of haemophilus gallinarum	Production and properties of potato; hemagglutinin of potato; haemophilus gallinarum.
20	characterization of microsomal choloyl coenzyme a synthetase	Characterization of choloyl microsomal coenzyme a synthetase a synthetase.
20	l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase from the insect ceratitis capitata purfication physicochemical and enzymic properties	L'glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase de l'apos; insect ceratitis capitata purification physicochemical and enzymatic properties.
20	isolation and characterization of a bacteriocin produced by bacillus stearothermophilus strain nu 10	Isolation and characterization of a bacteriocin produced by the stearothermophilus strain n.
20	characterization of single stranded viral dna sequences present during replication of adenovirus types 2 and 5	Characterization of the sequences d' single-stranded viral DNA present during replication of types 2 and 5 d' adenovirus.
20	study of the conditions maintaining the synthesis of alpha amylase by bacillus species	Study of conditions that maintain the synthesis of alpha-amylase by bacillus species.
20	purification crystallization and properties of triacylglycerol lipase from pseudomonas fluorescens	Purification crystallization and triacylglycerol lipase properties of pseudomonas fluorescens.
20	intracellular nucleodepolymerase of bacteria representatives of the proteus and providencia groups its isolation and properties	The intracellular nucleo-polymerase of proteus and providence representative bacteria combines its isolation and properties.
20	electron spin resonance investigations of mitochondrial electron transport in neurospora crassa characterization of paramagnetic intermediates in a standard strain	Electron paramagnetic resonance studies of electron d&apos mitochondrial transport in neurospora crassa characterised paramagnetic intermediates in a standard strain.
20	characterization and site of action of a soluble protein that stimulates peptide bond synthesis	Characterization and site of, action of, a soluble protein that stimulates peptide bond synthesis.
20	prolyl 3 hydroxylase partial characterization of the enzyme from rat kidney cortex	Partial characterization of rat kidney cortical enzyme by prolyl 3 hydroxylase.
20	studies on the toxin of aspergillus fumigatus vii purification and some properities of hemolytic toxin asp hemolysin from culture filtrates and mycelia	Studies on the toxin from purification of apos; aspergillus fumigatus vii and on certain properties of apos; hemolysin from apos; aspe, a hemolytic toxin, from culture filtrates and mycelium.
20	partial characterization of epididymal 5 alpha reductase in the rat	Partial characterization of epididymal alpha reductase 5 in rats.
20	studies on urinary kallikreins i purification and characterization of human urinary kallikreins	Urinary kallikrein studies i purification and characterization of human urinary kallikreins.
20	o acetylserine and o acetylhomoserine sulfhydrylase of yeast further purification and characterization as a pyridoxal enzyme	Yeast acetyl-serine and yeast acetyl-homoserine sulfhydrylase are further purified and characterized as a pyridoxal enzyme.
20	purification and some properties of an extracellular alpha amylase from bacteroides amylophilus	The purification and certain properties of an alpha-extracellular amylase of bacteroids amylophilus.
20	purification of hyaluronidase from human placenta	The purification of the hyaluronidase of the human placenta.
20	purification and properties of trna adenine 1 methyltransferase from rat liver	Rat liver trna adenine 1 methyltransferase purification and properties.
20	hemoglobin switching in sheep and goats preparation and characterization of complementary dnas specific for the alpha beta and gamma globin messenger rnas of sheep	Change of apos; sheep and goat hemoglobin, prepare and characterize specific complementary dnas for alpha beta and gamma globin messenger rnas in sheep.
20	isolation chemical characterization and biophysical properties of three different abnormal lipoproteins lp x1 lp x2 and lp x3	Chemically characterization of apos; isolation and biophysical properties of three different, abnormal lipoproteins lp x1 lp x2 and lp x3 lp.
20	characterization of the integration protein of bacteriophage lambda as a site specific dna binding protein	Characterization of protein d' integration of lambda bacteriophage as binding protein; DNA d' specific site.
20	study of the equilibrium conditions for the extractive purification of oleandomycin	Study of drought conditions; equilibrium for extractive purification of oleandomycin.
20	improved efficiency of mouse guinea pig and human c3b inactivator at low ionic strength and reproducible immune adherence with mouse complement	Improvement of the immune system; effectiveness of the immune system; human and mouse guinea pig and inactivator at low ionic strength and speed; reproducible immune adhesion with mouse complement.
